Ok. This petition has also been gaining ground with numbers beginning to sign. Wouldn't it send a message if we could get over 100k on this one next  or more.... you know what to do. #brexit 
Since the referendum, I've seen things happen in this country that I never expected to see, I thought I was immune to it.Watching a Labour MP address a  bunch of ukips and share a platform with Farage, after a video identified public figures as 'enemies', made my blood run cold.  
Nigel Farage addressing an audience at a £63 a head event in Southampton on Sunday, threatening incitement and anarchy if the Brexit he wants isn’t delivered. Saying ‘going to pick up a rifle and head to front lines. Wtf?! Where are the police?  
Watch this. This was the one time that @jeremycorbyn spoke up about Brexit crimes. And it's brilliant. He names all members of @theresa_may's govt involved in Vote Leave fraud. May responds: innocent until proven guilty. Well, now they are. They've admitted it. So..what next???? 
1. There's rather more at stake here than Tory party unity, so a little less constant framing of the Brexit debate though that lens would be 2. In any case, surely the last 3+ years have shown that the idea of 'Tories not being divided by Brexit' is fanciful?#PeoplesVote 
Am I missing something? Conservative MPs face a straight choice: Pushing a Customs Union in direct contravention of our manifesto and opening the door to a Marxist Corbyn Government or leaving on 12th April with WTO trading and an FTA thereafter. #nobrainer 
Geoffrey Cox claims Tory MP Oliver Letwin is colluding with Brussels to keep UK in a customs union  
Can we stop this. This is the dumbest analogy. For nearly three years this country has dragged itself into disarray trying to fulfil the Referendum. How would that work with Remain? For three years they tried to stay in the EU and couldn’t agree how to do it?  IT DOESN’T WORK.  
It would be easier to believe that Brexit wasn’t about racism if senior member of a group of Brexiteers that call themselves the Grand Wizards weren’t now openly quoting their good buddies at the far-right and racist AfD  
@AnnaMcMorrin is still awaiting a reply to the actual question she asked Mrs May..... 
Nearly 3 years on from the referendum and what have we learned?-Turkey isn't joining the EU-It wasn't the easiest deal in history-There was no £350 million for NHS-Food won't be cheaper-Manufacturing isn't safe-UK didn't hold all the cards#Brexit WAS SOLD BY LIARS 
After Vote Leave dropped any further appeal against their guilt on Friday, we now know without question that any MP still saying that the 2016 referendum must be "respected" or "honoured" prefers corruption, fraud & illegality to the democratic rule of law. This includes T. May.  
What does this even mean? What does this man think will happen when we Brexit that will give him 'his' country back? Is he going to be happy? Why? Someone please explain it to me.  
Now that Vote Leave's guilt is finally beyond all question... May: "Everyone is innocent until....' they accept they're guilty? Watch Prime Minister Theresa May's attempted obfuscation over the central roles key members of her government played in the Brexit referendum fraud...  
If you don't want see your money going to businesses that egged on & supported Brexit, here's a nice little list of companies to avoid:-Wetherspoons-Dyson-Tate & Lyle-JCB -Dixons-Patisserie Valerie-Reebok-Next-ButlinsWe're taking our greenbacks elsewhere you mugs 
If we revoke Article 50 we will never hear about brexit again. Retweet the fuck out of that.  
If Brexit were Parkour 
The AfD are neo-Nazis. The fact that you quote them says everything we need to know about your position. If you dine and vote with white-supremacists, then you Are a white-supremacist, Jacob.  Nothing but a seedy little neo-nazi on the make 
Someone launched a petition for England to have a referendum on England leaving the UK and becoming an independent country. The red areas of the map show where most of the petition signers live.  
Meanwhile in the EU  
Brexit promises: “Cut red tape!”Brexit reality: “You now need a Customs Form when sending goods to the EU.”Nobody voted for this fiasco. #StopBrexit. 
The type of #Brexit possible would always be defined by its strength of mandate. It's a simple point that bears repeating. A 52-48 result was a mandate for the softest possible Brexit. If anyone deserves Brexiters' anger, it's the hardliners who grossly overplayed this weak hand. 
Ain’t it funny how remainers believe that Labour are Brexit enablers and Brexiters believe that Labour is the party that’s preventing Brexit???Isn’t it just the case that Labour have common sense on Brexit and are actually handling Brexit in the most democratic way!!  
There is nothing more offensive (and damaging) than a Brexit-obsessed MP insisting on the risk of putting Brexit to a democratic test while refusing to acknowledge the massive damage to social cohesion Brexit has already wreaked and will continue to wreak.  
I went overseas to work; the referendum was half way through my second year.When I came back, it was to a country that was divided, insular, bigoted, and losing influence.I want *my* country back; open, tolerant, caring, a world leader. I want *my* country back! 
MPs who try to force through a #Brexit built on electoral crime without a #PeoplesVote must regarded as complicit in a heinous crime against the British people, and if this happens we must work tirelessly to ensure they are all prosecuted and jailed. #Brexit is a coup. 
The biggest problem here is not that UK politicians don't get that leaving the EU means years of endless trade negotiations, its more that the public supporting Brexit don't understand that...Brexiteer politicians just rely on keeping it in the MSM shadows.#RevokeArticle50 
Millions were unfairly disenfranchised in the Brexit referendum.So we need to give voting rights to EU citizens in the UK and Brits abroad in a #PeoplesVote.Please sign and retweet this petition: 
Jeremy Corbyn declares Labour Party is ready to take power and rebuild BritainThe Labour leader puts forward his alternative plan for Brexit and says a vote of no-confidence may be in the offing  
⁦It’s time to start believing in Britain. @BorisJohnson⁩ ⁦@Telegraph⁩ 
At 1min> May is all over the place, stumbling, stuttering, lost for words, reading her notes. She's rattled. She knows her ministers, her office & herself are all complicit in vote leave's illegalities & malpractice. 
Please Sign & RT - Next Stop 7 Million  Petition: Revoke Article 50 & remain in the EU/#EU #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
These people have been doing so much to stop the Brexit catastrofuck. Please give if you can, then when Leavers ask them “who funds you?”, they can answer with your name. 
As is this... May’s deal is not Brexit, and neither is ‘Common market 2.0’ – they both mean economic serfdom - Briefings For Brexit  
Our highly-paid MPs are getting a 2.7 per cent pay rise tomorrow, on the 20th birthday of the National Minimum Wage. They’re happy to take our taxes whilst they trample over our biggest vote. They shouldn’t get a penny more until they deliver Brexit.  
I intend to alert EU negotiators of “another” GFA Brexit breachThe British Gov has redefined definition of EU nationalThey're imposing Brit. citizenship on all of us in north of Ireland irrespective of GFA & using this as a way to strip us of our EU rights#PerfidiousAlbion 
‘The British people are telling us to “just get on with it”.‘Really? Where’s your evidence for that?Or is it wishful thinking?Coz I’m seeing Revoke, Revoke, Revoke - largest petition in history, in street stalls... and as the most popular options in the polls.Brexit  
If the Labour Party leadership continues to support any form of #Brexit, there is absolutely no chance of them winning a majority in a GE. Why? Because the vast majority of the people who could vote for them are Remainers and most of them will vote for a pro-EU party. 
Europeans asking UK to stay. Lovely petition. @the3million @BritishInEurope @guyverhofstadt @donaldtusk 
Leading Brexit voices align themselves with the European far right. Again. And again. And again.  
A few thoughts on the word 'expat'... #Brexit #FBPE 
Is it any wonder you’re agreeing with a party full of racists, neo-nazis, anti-semites, and Islamophobes? 
(...with h/t as ever to the great @brexit_sham who dug this up) 
Highly recommended read on Maltese journalist Daphne Caruana Galizia with a look at new evidence from the recent @CommonsCMS final report which contests current Maltese PM Joseph Muscat's denials of meeting SCL / Cambridge Analytica & Alexander Nix. 
Listen carefully to this response @EmilyThornberry gave on @RidgeOnSunday.In it she clearly lays out the Blair/Campbell reverse #Brexit strategy:-Turn public opinion against Brexit-Cause political deadlock in Westminster-Call for 2nd referendum-And then campaign for Remain  
Brexit means ceding power to Lithuania. It’s what happens when you vacate the regional economic superpower.  
An important message to those who didn’t vote in the 2016 referendum. Most of you are #RemainerNow. Your voices count. Please speak up. Follow @remainernow for hundreds of stories of people like you. 
Brexit = bureaucracy.  
Welcome to 1975. Customs forms for everything you send to the EU. And why? Because the parcels might arrive after we've left, and face being delayed or rejected otherwise. Thanks, Brexit!  
Meanwhile: a) @LeaveEUOfficial can't prove what continent their money came fromb) The DUP still haven't said who gave it £435,000 in the final weeks of the referendum..c) Vote Leave admitted just two days ago that they BROKE electoral law by overspending nearly £700k! 
And while the UK is bogged down in Brexit Slovakia has just elected a progressive pro-European female president.  
Is there actually any point in being a Conservative Party member ?You vote to get a Member deselected .. CCHQ overrule it..Vote for Brexit 3 years later you're fighting to get a watered down deal through ...Didn't even get a vote on the leader..Only get begging letters   
The private Royal Mail, just another symptom of how #Brexit got this far and why it is not the answer to solving Britain's problems. #SecondReferendum #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
May’s deal is not Brexit, and neither is ‘Common market 2.0’ – they both mean economic serfdom  
And here's Dominic Cummings removing any doubt that Gove, Johnson and Stuart were in fact an integral, and trusted part of the Vote Leave inner circle.They know exactly what happened..... 
The Liberal Democrats were out in their thousands at the People’s vote march and have consistently campaigned against Brexit since before the referendum.If you are opposed to Brexit- join us for free 
Thanks to all of you who rallied with Leave Means Leave on Parliament Square, and to the 17.4m out in the country who are with us.We are not downhearted, but will fight the establishment again and beat them once more.Together we will stop the Brexit betrayal!  
Please support those looking into the corruption in the 2016 referendum you have been studiously ignoring if not actually allegedly interfering with.  
“It was clear in our manifesto that we ruled out being members of a Customs Union, the Single Market or under the jurisdiction of the European Court of Justice. We have a Parliament that's packed out with remain supporting MPs, seeking to dilute Brexit“ @ABridgen#StandUp4Brexit 
Isn’t it wonderful to live in a free and independent nation!Oh... #AprilFool #brexit 
Brexit means Brexit  
No, parliament is not honour bound to leave the EU. Parliament is honour bound to pause and reflect, to investigate wrong doing, and to proceed on the basis of what people think now, not what people thought nearly 3 years ago. 
The most important screenshots you will ever read on the current Brexit situation.  
This is a fascinating, enlightening & ultimately inspiring thread. It  expresses many sentiments I keep hearing from voters across political spectrum (and indeed across Leave/Remain divide) in reaction to political class's failure to deliver #Brexit - ALL MPs should take note  
Sounds like @jeremycorbyn may well have been correct.So #PrimeMinister are your #Ministers going to cooperate fully, provide information & let us know the truth of what they knew & the details of what went on with illegalities in the #Brexit #Referendum? 
I suppose it depends what the daily mail tells him to think 
Explains your ill-informed pro-Brexit rants every morning. #GMB 
Problem is you were in the post of Brexit minister and proved you couldn’t deliver a dominos pizza leaflet.  
Oh, just go away, Emily. The reason why more people aren't vocal about remaining is because Labour hasn't spoken out ONCE for remaining in two whole years. People were looking to you for leadership, but you gave none ... preferring instead to pander to fascists and xenophobes. 
#Brexit petition to revoke Article 50 hits 6 million signatures, one day before its to be debated / #RevokeArticle50 
So....Just to clarify....@theSNP plan to stop #Brexit because they believe leaving the EU will be a disasterThey then plan to hold #indyref2 to leave the UK and, by default, the EUThey believe this will be a huge successYes...that’s the planThey are indeed that stupid 
When all this #Brexit nonsense is gone, serious questions must be addressed....Restoring impartiality of #BBC A truly Free Press and controls on Press BaronsWritten ConstitutionFair Voting System 
Have gone meta for latest @guardian cartoon on the frustrations of keeping up with and trying to continuously produce new material on #Brexit  
Thread #Brexit - there can be no question of revoking Article 50 - all those MP’s who voted for (or abstained) should hang their heads in shame. This is a direct breach of the Conservative and Labour Party manifesto’s and, for the other party’s - 
The guy lifting up the woman with the red T-shirt at the Sunderland referendum cult is reported to be a former member of Neo Nazi Combat 18. A blonde on the shoulders of a Nazi is kind a metaphor for the whole #Brexit vote  
Alexa, show me what a dickhead looks and sounds like?pic.twitter.com/adKxd5dRul 
Oh for goodness sake! You cannot be honour bound to respect the result of a referendum we now all know was perverted by the illegal actions of the Leave campaign!#brexitpsychosis 
I think you'll find there is evidence to show people are beginning to wise up to the fact that restricting freedom of movement means restricting their freedom! #Brexit 
Brexiters claimed Brexit would save £350m a week.Instead, it is already COSTING us £360m a week - money that could otherwise be used to fund our NHS.Stick that on the side of a bus, and #StopBrexit. 
THREAD: Everyone in our movement is absolutely BLOWN AWAY by the unbelievable level of support we've had so far. You've raised us £15,000 in just over 12 hours! THANK YOU SO MUCH! Check it out:  
Your preferred #brexit deal was defeated again on Wednesday, Richard, It hasn’t been re-tabled it for tomorrow. Time for you and all shadow ministers to back & vote for our unanimously agreed policy in support of a #FinalSay public vote. 
Yes Julia Hate-Spewer that's how your side won by never stop talking about Norway which pays in follows the rules and has no say over them... WTF are you complaining about? 
Imagine there's a #Brexit,It's easy if you try.Fascists all around us,Spreading hate and lies.Imagine all the people,Living life in fear.You may say I'm a dreamer,But I'm not the only one.I hope someday we can stop this,If MPs could be less dumb. 
Michael Gove and Sarah Vine as Lord & Lady Macbitch #Brexit pic.twitter.com/rEFyxZsWEq 
Easy understanding of #Brexit  
Julia Hate-Spewer really is a lying peice of shit, IsabelOakeshit was exposed as lying through her teeth on that sofa days later. pic.twitter.com/IuU7k0ig2V 
For 3 weeks Aontú has contacted Michelle O'Neill, Colum Eastwood & their parties seeking a public debate about Stormont in shutdown, rising food, housing & health poverty in the north, Brexit & Unity. We've received no answer. Well paid public reps should debate issues in public  
I'm not quite sure why Nick Boles is surprised that Tories are opposing this idea. Common Market 2.0 means keeping free movement - thus failing the single most important Brexit test.  
The "just get on with it" argument is futile. It's the sort of thing you say when you've got a terrible toothache and your dentist tells you the only way to stop the pain is to extract the tooth. However, where #Brexit is concerned, there is another option. #RevokeArticle50 
It was a criminal referendum you fuckwit. pic.twitter.com/okntCBapea 
BBC execs on Friday:- Dear God, have you seen the news? Brexit is in big trouble.- We can't hide the illegality any longer.- Here's an idea. We get Gisela Stuart on Marr and then we cherry-pick a quote that makes it look like there's no case to answer.- Job done!  
Revoke Article 50 petition calling for Brexit to be cancelled hits 6 million signatures - The Independent  
To those who are pretending that the withdrawal agreement is Brexit, it is clear you are either mistaken, deluded or dishonest.We need to build trust in British politics. The WA will do no such thing.  
Amusing #Brexit odds - 2nd referendum is currently 11/5, but "UK votes to remain in a 2nd referendum" is 2/1, suggesting if we do get a #PeoplesVote, bookmakers think we are more than 100% likely to win! 
List of 111 powers SNP say Scotland will be denied after Brexit  
Tomorrow's front page: SNP call on MPs to act to stop Brexit. PLUS: Tories warn May against calling a snap General Election  
So does anyone who believes in the rule of law. Or do you prefer the corruption, fraud & illegality of the 2016 referendum, as now 100% confirmed by a UK court and admitted to by Vote Leave (no further attempt at appeal)?  
WOW!!    Revoke A 50 petition breaks through 6 MILIION signatures!In polls released today, #RevokeArticle50 is the most popular #Brexit option (41%) and, crucially, has more support than opposition.Give it another big boost before the indicative votes 
Brexit has not only shown the corruption of leading politicians...... but also the sheer laziness and cowardice of our media in holding them to account - with the @BBCNews often bordering on complicit.#VoteLeave #LeaveEU #CambridgeAnalytica #ArronBanks 
The AfD leader asks "Is it any wonder the British see bad faith behind every manoeuvre from Brussels?" 
Ex DUP Head of Policy : “There’s folk in the ERG whose lust to leave Europe is greater than their desire to be unionists.”  #Brexit 
Some Brexiters have told me that as a French citizen in the UK:- I should have no involvement or view in British politics, especially in the struggle for UK to free itself from the EU dictatorship- I should be grateful that I won't be sent back to France after Brexit 
Why are people going on about a Customs Union? It's useless without Single Market membership. A fcking CU alone would give us nothing. No FOM, no working rights, no healthcare, fck all.Why are people pretending it wld be a 'soft Brexit'? It's not that at all.#FBPE #REVOKEA50 
The only second referendum question acceptable to Remainers would be: * Stay in the EU?* Remain in the EU?  The only interesting question is why do Remainers want to be in at all?  No point in asking though. All you’ll get is project fear or abuse. No rational argements.  
The Customs Union is #Labour policy NOT #Conservative and rightly so.It is a betrayal of #Brexit which is what Labour want.  
So, the #RevokeArticle50 petition has over 6 million signatures and 96% are from the UK. Clearly, Nigel Farage's Russian bot theory is a non-starter. No great surprise! 
Misplaced nostalgia, steam age politics, a train heading off backwards - the Brexit ultras summed up #BrexitShambles 
'I SEE YOU SMOKING A FULL FUCKING PACK PER GAME, WHY CANT YOU GIVE ME ONE YOU SELFISH CUNT, FUCK OFF' pic.twitter.com/zS7BFf7mc6 
Angela Merkel insists that the “EU should make sure that every other option has been exhausted before accepting a no-deal Brexit”.  Apart from a timelimit on the backstop, however  
Not true. Also, Parliament (not sure even you think war should be decided by referendum) voted overwhelmingly for it. And if marches should decide policy, I'm sure you would agree @peoplesvote_uk  best option. However they shouldn't. what should decide policy is nat'l interest 
Now is the time to be the change the country needs. 
Supreme Court ruled in Miller that PM couldn’t use sovereign power to decide to leave. But @A50Challenge found the PM made the decision to leave not Parliament. The notification act two years ago merely said PM may notify. Brexit has been launched with a false start.  
... Did you really just put Hitler in the same sentence as Trump and Brexit?  
Heads up folks!This petition has been growing under the radar due to the success of the Revoke A50 petitionThis petition "Halt Brexit For A Public Inquiry" now over 25,000 and growing over 500/hourSIGN this and please RT it!#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
The referendum result was achieved through corruption.The UK will never move on until that is addressed.#Brexitiscorrupt 
Research over the past 24 hours has persuaded me that Customs Union membership is even more dangerous to Britain's economy than the Single Market. We have to leave all of it if Brexit is to be a success. 
This deserves the widest readership:“Even Superleader would not be able to escape from the fatal undermining of the UK’s negotiating position once the deal becomes legally binding. We would be led into a false Brexit in which the benefits of leaving the EU would be sacrificed.”  
This from a man whose ‘populist crap’ spun us into an illegal war that killed a million people & yet he’s now never off our airwaves wanting us to trust his judgement on Brexit.  
AKA 'No deal is actually Brexit' is a nice easy line that helps @piersmorgan get an even bigger profile to spout populist crap knowing that when it all goes tits up, he will have enough money to get through it, and enough fame for plenty more opportunities to present themselves 
Imagine if Remain had won the referendum with a marginal mandate, them gas lighted the nation that the will of the people meant federalisation, adopting the Euro, enforced Eurorailing, and make the Queen a German.  
How on earth did we get from:'Brexit is brilliant and will be totally beneficial to the UK'To:'Doesn't matter how shit Brexit is. If we don't do it, democracy will literally explode and destroy us all!'????  
For any Brits who fell out of love with Britain after that pesky referendum, here's Robert Smith of @thecure doing the most gloriously British thing.It's these moments that define Britain, NOT the colonial past, pompous greedy Etonian MPs or Nigel effin Farage 
Well done @UKLabour for allowing your MPs to rally with the far right and known criminals 
1 April 2019.1271 days after Vote Leave launch1012 days after EU referendum733 days after triggering Article 50263 days after Chequers plan3 days after UK was set to leave EUAnd the UK Parliament holds indicative votes on what Brexit may actually mean.#AprilFoolsDay 
A meme that neatly sums up the merits of no deal Brexit (ht @BrimhamG) 
A reminder that Darren Grimes broke the law, as admitted by Vote Leave on the day we were due to leave the EU as a result of the crooked referendum Darren helped run. Corrupt votes should be annulled, not lionised.  
I told a someone who didn't vote in the referendum about the Revoke Article 50 petition, I said if we Revoke Article 50 you will never hear about Brexit again, she signed the petition. 
An expensive nostalgia project, designed for the 19th century, moving backwards. The perfect metaphor for Brexit.  
Brexit petition to revoke Article 50 hits 6 million signatures  
Illegally funnelling nearly three quarters of a million to targeted  Facebook ads in the week before the referendum, telling people that Turkey is about to join the EU or that if they care about polar bears they need to vote Leave, is NOT A MINOR TECHNICAL RULE BREACH FFS.  
UK cannot simply trade on WTO terms after no-deal Brexit, say expertsIn the interests of balance, I should point out Roger Daltrey would probably disagree. 
Nearly 3 years on from the referendum and what have we learnt.-Turkey isn't joining the EU-It wasn't the easiest deal in history-There was no £350 million for NHS-Food won't be cheaper-Manufacturing isn't safe-UK didn't hold all the cards#Brexit WAS SOLD BY LIARS 
Having @GiselaStuart on the #Marr show without anyone to challenge her was a bad call. She worked with AIQ the now banned company Vote Leave used to break the law after the referendum. Thank you to @GuardianAnushka for the mention & Marr is right to say that I was right all along 
MPs can’t even agree on how to sabotage the referendum result  
Some Leave voters may treat Brexit like a religion, but not the Leave-voting farmers on @BBCCountryfile right now - they're distinctly nervous about what they've unleashed & positively scared by the possibility of an agriculture deal with the US. 
Can i say something folks, #Brexit is a mess, we @UKLabour are now ahead in the polls, the demonisation,smearing, lies will begin, do not rise, block all the trolls/bots, they are tory stooges sent to divide us, we will unite as one and remove this vile tory govt, #GTTO #Labour 
The petition to revoke Article 50 and remain in the European Union reaches its 6 millionth signature, a day before it is debated by MPs.#Brexit | #RevokeArticle50Petition 
The candidate in the Ukraine election has a novel idea.He's pledging to to punish corrupt politicians & ensure they can never stand again!He's not a politician yet, he's a comedian, and has more sense of values than politicians.UK! BE MORE LIKE UKRAINE.#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Do you know what really annoys me? How many people come up to me at business events, in the street, the supermarket or at parties & whisper “I voted Brexit too but I can’t let anyone at work or my friends know.”Voting to Leave the EU isn’t something to be ashamed of.1/3 
BREXIT: More than a THIRD of people back revoking Article 50 in bombshell poll /#EU #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
Corbyn will fight to his last breath against a referendum: he knows that a convincing win for Remain would make his position untenable. 
IF WE HAVE A SECOND REFERENDUM, WHEN DOES IT END? BEST OF 3? BEST OF 5?  
Update: she signed.She also said "no matter which way people voted, it's all a terrible mess now" 
Dear MPsPlease remember how bad things are likely to be 15 years after leaving the EU.We haven't all got time to see the Sunny Uplands.UK significantly worse off under all Brexit scenarios – official forecast  
Have people like J Rees-Mogg + John Redwood forgotten this already?UK cannot simply trade on WTO terms after no-deal Brexit,  say experts  
COME AND WORK IN THE FRIENDLY, WELCOMING UK!We will:• charge you a fortune for the privilege• strew all manner of administrative hurdles in your path• begrudge you using our services• blame you for every mishap• spit at you for speaking your own language in public 
When I hear people talk about Brexit now (away from Twitter) people look embarrassed, uncomfortable and fed up. Speaking to a leave voter yesterday, she told me she just wanted it to be over now. She didn't even care if we ended up staying, so long as it was over. 
I'm sick of being treated as if I'm an idiot - I wish ppl would just cut the bullshit pretence. #Brexit isn't about what's good for the country, the economy, or you and me. It's about making rich people richer and white people whiter - it's nasty and toxic and needs stopped now. 
“I voted Brexit, what are you still doing here” pic.twitter.com/zxKSAeYou0 
Brexit Shaun vs. The rest of the podcast #TouchlineFracas 
Neil Warnock is the face of Brexit means Brexit   
"WE'VE HAD A REFERENDUM! LEAVE MEANS LEAVE!!!"  
Brexit must be rescued by a reinvigorated Tory party. 
The one absolute cast-iron certainty of this whole Brexit farce is that a 2nd Referendum would be the complete opposite of 'unifying'.  
ALEX BRUMMER: Would No Deal Brexit really be that bad?  via @MailOnline 
Brexit legend and Whetherspoons boss, Tim Martin slams Remainer pessimism about food and drink imports from Chair of the Food and Drink Federation, Ian Wright."The whole point is that the EU has 12k+ tariffs. 93% of the world is outside. We can eliminate those tariffs."   
‘Brexit means f*cking Brexit, Maurizio’  
Cabinet ministers are threatening to resign if we truly deliver Brexit. Last Friday the people marched back, we must leave with WTO Brexit to fully deliver the will of the people.  
.@BBCLauraK has chosen NOT to reply to the whistleblower who brought Vote Leave's criminal electoral fraud to the attention of the nation on the day they withdrew their appeal against the Electoral Commission's finding of multiple offences. Please RT to spread awareness. #BBCNews 
The Brexit Express meets The Backstop  
Found guilty to a criminal burden of proof, that is, beyond a reasonable doubt as opposed to on the balance of probabilities; now that they've dropped their appeal, the police investigation and charges should surely be a formality? Are VOTE LEAVE'S RATS practicing their defence? 
The Labour Party mask has slipped, on @RidgeOnSunday today Emily Thornberry confessed “most of us campaigned for Remain and in our hearts we want to Remain” I want us to honour the referendum result, deliver our manifesto commitment and leave the EU.  
NEW: Members of David Gauke's constituency association are petitioning for a special general meeting to be called over his position on Brexit.Just 10% of local members are needed for one to take place - a threshold that is likely to be quickly met.  
Those who wish to thwart Brexit have captured Parliament to deliver a customs union. This would not be a true Brexit. MPs must deliver on the will of the British people.  
Whereas the Tory Party want's to rip the heart out of Brexit and fraudulently pretend they are delivering it.We see you Mr Lewis and you are a fake. Do you really think anybody trusts a word you say?  
The world is watching and what do they see?This in Belgian press: 5.8 million Britons sign a petition against brexit, the government ignores them 
Your pro-Brexit followers should ALL feel betrayed!You told them to vote Brexit because uncontrolled immigration was hurting the UK.Then afterwards you admitted we can already control immigration AND that EU immigration is literally keeping the UK alive!  
Head of Catalan Socialist party: "There won't be independence, nor a referendum, nor self-determination."Denying Catalan independence is a political party's choice.Denying a referendum is a political party's cynical choice.Denying self-determination is  to oppose democracy.  
Did you ever get the feeling you are being cheated? 
Vote Leave broke Electoral Law. Vote Leave have admitted they broke Electoral Law. Could someone remind me, why is Brexit even being contemplated? #marr #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArt50Petition 
Brexit voters are feeling betrayed, disgusted and angry. If you feel the same way, join @brexitparty_uk as a registered supporter now. 
In 2016 the "will of the people" via a referendum was for UK to leave EU.In 2017 the "will of the people" via a general election was for this to be done through a hung parliament.That parliament now failed.Difficult to argue against matter now being referred back to voters. 
Two men vying to be the next Prime Minister oversaw a campaign that spent illegal money on illegal data to cheat in a referendum. In fact, this was the largest breach of campaign finance law in British history. They don’t deserve public office.  
One of the first things any despotic government does is to deny its people their right to vote.The Tories seem awfully keen on preventing us, the people, from voting - no People's Vote, no EU parliamentary elections, no general election.No vote. No say. No justice. 
Those 170 MPs who wrote to May demanding no deal disorderly Brexit, instead of any further delay, the public need to know their names, I think. If no deal happens, they need to own it. 
The Leave Campaign has now been exposed as failing the law and failing the truth. This is a major news story and a national scandal. It negates the first referendum. 
Personally, I wish more people would talk about the ethnic divisions of Brexit politics  
10. Newspeak/Impoverished language:"Brexit means Brexit" 
Umberto Eco identified 14 typical features of fascism. At least 10 of them have manifested themselves during the brexit process (use of lower case 'b' intentional): thread >> 
Your regular reminder that, while the nation has a time sensitive panic over indicative votes, Brexit delay, EU elections, etc, it was Theresa May who wasted 5 weeks for no reason whatsoever delaying the first Meaningful Vote. 
these brexit proposals are getting ridiculous now  
"A hideous ecstasy of fear and vindictiveness, a desire to kill, to torture, to smash faces in with a sledge hammer, seemed to flow through the whole group like an electric current, turning one into a grimacing, screaming lunatic."~ George Orwell, 1984 
Stop and think.Friday gave us a glimpse of what Brexit Britain will look like. Unless we stop it, these are the people who'll be controlling our lives  
1/ You're going to hear wild and contradictory claims about Customs Unions. Two reasons:1. The Brexit conversation has more grifters, chancers and hacks than a Trump Cabinet meeting; &2. A 'Customs Union' can be done in many different ways. Can't fix #1, so a thread on #2. 
Ed Vaizey shifts towards backing second Brexit referendum  
Dark money is pushing for a no-deal #Brexit Who is behind it? writes  @GeorgeMonbiot My thoughts voiced as far back as Nov 2017 'Strip away the layers and Brexit becomes ever more murky'   
Fintan O'Toole - Democracy is about informed consent & the people of Britain were never given their right to informed consent... they were told that brexit would be easy.. this was a complete fantasy & therefore it couldn't survive contact with reality..#PeoplesVote #marr 
Given the awful and rising division in our country, I’ll vote against anything that doesn’t give people a #FinalSay on a deliverable #Brexit. Time for the PM to act like a stateswoman, rise above & guide our country to a resolution, not carry on touting her dire deal #RightToVote 
Man planning our Brexit future does so on a vintage steam train going backwards. Spam for lunch. Glenn Miller on the wireless. No NHS underfunding to worry about because no NHS. All our yesterdays. From the #europeanreactionarygroup 
What do you say to this? I've simply explained how Brexit is affecting my livelihood, as it is affecting thousands of small businesses across the country. Are we expected to meekly sacrifice ourselves in the name of Brexit?  
How about this as a Referendum 
James, as a Party Member, you like other misguided MPs have ignored #Leave Voting majority. There must be no more embarrassment of our Party by @theresa_may and Olly Robbins and a 4th Vote in House. It is suicidal arrogance.  #Brexit on WTO/EU arrangement. get on with it. #UK 
Corbyn Labour front bench confirming their support for Brexit.  It is “Labour’s preferred option”So there you have it.  Corbyn Labour is a pro Brexit party.  It’s time #ChangePolitics #ChangeUK @TheIndGroup 
A very thorough timeline of the the BBC’s deeply concerning lack of investigative coverage concerning Vote Leave’s conduct in the referendum. Pretty damning stuff. @mediareformUK  - yet another reason to genuinely reform & democratise the BBC 
The Brexit Express is going backwards! How perfectly apt 
New Visit Scotland supremo Paul Sweeney unveils his latest tourism advert 
WATCH: Sir John Major explains why it would be wise to put ANY Brexit deal back to the people in a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
This is how Britain's Imperial mindset, fuelled by ignorance of what actually happened during centuries of British Empire, has lead to the chaos and self-delusion of Brexit  
Pssst ... want to see some more proof that the BBC is not unbiased? Since 2013, 35 MEPs have appeared on question time ... 100% of them were pro Brexit.  
When and Indian feeds on matooke and nyama... #HitAfterHit 
No they're not.  The majority of people don't want brexit.  Sadly you confuse the British people with a conservative association tea party.  You need to fucking listen to the people now we know the truth about brexit... and the crimes! 
Labour's Brexit policy is clear and is an attempt to bring the country together.Labour’s preferred option is our proposed Brexit deal.If that can't be secured, then a public vote is an option to prevent a disastrous No Deal Brexit or Tory Brexit deal.#Marr 
Can a country outside the EU be in its #customsunion? Yes, ask Turkey. Can a country outside the EU share its single market? Yes, ask Norway. UK can choose and negotiate terms.  Did the UK #referendum reject either or both? No, it was about EU membership. 
Why aren’t @michaelgove & @BorisJohnson on #marr to explain to the electorate why Brexit should go ahead at all, when Vote Leave have now *admitted* they broke Electoral Law during the referendum?And to explain their role in this too of course...#RevokeArticle50 #RevokeA50 
WATCH: @tom_watson on #Marr on how Labour coming together as 80% of their MPs backing a #PeoplesVote and why this is the solution to the Brexit crisis. Please RT:  
There you are just as I predicted. A ‘softer Brexit’ to get the treacherous Commons to agree. Stay in the Customs Union. Then we don’t really leave, & we can rejoin a little later because nothing much changed anyway. Th fight to leave will be led by UKIP.  
The day after it's confirmed that Vote Leave committed serious breaches of electoral law, #RevokeArticle50Petition reaches 6 million.To allow the fraudulent 2016 referendum to stand is to allow the UK's future to be dictated by liars & criminals.#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Asked @heidiallen75 to repeat on air what she promised her constituents at the last election. To be fair, she did recall saying that she would respect the referendum result. Just doesn’t think it’s important to keep that promise. 
Delighted to join the Brexit Express (@BrexitE) with @DavidDavisMP and others - there is a mood of cheery resolve... 
John Major - Perfectly possible for a nation like the UK to conduct an other referendum... if people are determined to cause disorder in the streets... I think the British people would know how to judge them & would vote against what they're advocating.#marr #ridge #PeoplesVote pic.twitter.com/1u3bdaTOOu 
Revoke Article 50 petition to cancel Brexit passes SIX MILLION signatures!An amazing result. Well done to every Remainer.Brexiters tried to force us out out of the EU this week. They failed.Keep campaigning to #Remain. It’s working! 
#sigh. You know, we know, the whole country knows that the WA isnt Brexit. But only the front bench of your party, and its media cheerleaders in the media pretend otherwise.TheEmpressHasNoClothes.And this charade is destroying your reputation, and is shameful.  
#Marr: Is Labour in favour of another #Brexit referendum in all circumstances?Labour’s Deputy Leader Tom Watson: “I think that’s the only way we can bring the country back together” 
Dislike referendums. But.This would be the least bad referendum.One lesson of the 2016 referendum was that both possible outcomes should be viable.  
UNBELIEVABLE! Gisela Stuart defiant after Vote Leave found guilty of breaking electoral law, laughed out of court for seeking a judicial review of their fines and now dropping their appeal, plays the old "the government and Remain spent more" LIES LIES LIES LIES LIES LIES #Marr 
“You say that there are different types of Brexit... that is something that has been put out there by remainers, because if the vote had been Remain, would we be going ‘what did you mean when you voted for remain?’ ‘what part of the word remain?’ You know, leave is leave”#Marr 
Vote Leave Fraud:Stewart - "We did our best to be compliant with the rules. If they were interpreted differently, so be it. #Brexit #marr 
MUST-READ: Margaret Beckett on why Brexit has to go back to the people in a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
The Sun says “MPs will now have to choose between Mrs May’s deal, a soft Brexit and a second referendum”. But May’s deal is already a “soft Brexit” (i.e. not Brexit). So these three options don’t include Brexit at all. 
Gisela Stuart persists in defending the indefensible.The Leave campaign overspent.It broke the law.That is fact, Ms Stuart. Fact.As is the consequent fact that the 2016 referendum was corrupted.  #marr 
So now, a plurality of the public seem to support simply revoking #Article50 without even having a referendum. I guess they want to halt the whole endless wrangling and get back to sorting out the real problems facing the country. What an idea!  
10,937 folk in Aberdeen South have signed the #RevokeArticle50Petition Their MP, @RossThomson_MP, voted for a no-deal #Brexit.Mr Thomson's majority is 4,752.Just saying. 
Vote Leave broke electoral law during the 2016 referendum. They want this news to be buried. Do not let them get away with it. 
Second Referendum - Margaret Beckett 
New Opinion Poll: 63% majority believe Scotland will become independent. 61% agree there should be another referendum on Scottish independence. Details via @ScotNational and on @progressscot website #ProgressScotland 
Lisa Nandy claiming on Sophy Ridge the referendum to be the biggest democratic exercise in her life-time. It's just not true. The referendum turnout was 72.%. The 1979 General election turnout was 76%: 1983 -73%: 1987 - 75%: and the 1992 - 78%.. When will this lie stop! 
No Deal is actually Brexit. People voted to leave the EU, not to stay in bits of it. 
Status quo and perfection aren’t options when it comes to #Brexit The British people are telling us to “just get on with it”. We need to recognise this and deliver Brexit.Labour need to stop playing political games and using Brexit as as excuse.  
This petition only has 31,000 signatories; it should be much higher. Come on people, support our fellow EU citizens  
The 2016Vote Is Notoriously Tarnished (PM’s QC’s words)By Corruption Vote Leave Now Admit. And People In Downing Street Right nowArePrincipalBeneficiariesOfTheCorruptionBrexit is unsafe, unstable, illegitimate @michaelgove @BorisJohnson 
Just in case anyone has forgotten Nigel Farage's view on 2nd referendum #marr #ridge 
Betrayed, disgusted and angry.This is how #Brexit voters feel as parliament delays leaving the EU.Follow live updates from #Ridge as Tory MPs warn the PM against a general election:  
Theresa May's Government brushed all corruption surrounding the 2016 referendum under the carpet - Michael Gove and Boris Johnson were even hired as Ministers! Brexit must be stopped so a full inquiry can take place into the criminal activities by the Leave campaign! #Marr #Ridge 
We've had enough of this chaos. Have you?Help us fight for our futures as we fight against Brexit!Please share and donate what you can   
Thornberry - "Its in Britain's interests to stay in EU. If public now wants to remain, then that's a challenge for all of us" #Brexit #Ridge 
Please read and RT. Simply spot on “The problem with the Conservative party is not Mrs May. The problem with the Conservative party is the Conservative party. The problem with Brexit is not Mrs May. The problem with Brexit is Brexit” | Andrew Rawnsley  
"She's out of control."Shadow foreign secretary @EmilyThornberry hints at another confidence motion against Theresa May after her #Brexit defeat.Follow live updates from #Ridge as Tory MPs warn the PM against a general election:  
Hey @jeremycorbyn it goes like this: “I was wrong to say I respected the result of the Referendum as the illegal practices of the Leave campaign have now been confirmed. We have also seen that its promises were untrue. We must have a second vote with Remain on the ballot paper.” 
Watson: if Labour backs another referendum it can beat Tories in electionsThis has been obvious for so long. And of course, a failure to do so would cost them dearly. 
And this is BEFORE @10DowningStreet applies for a long extension to #Article50 
8/ Furthermore, they understand the Prime Minister knew of and prevented an investigation into Arron Banks and indeed that spending and other practices in the referendum were corrupt, but proceeded with her "will of the people" mantra nonetheless. /9 
6/Again, #Remainers' protests at this behaviour are not only ignored, but openly jeered at by Leavers. Remainers are also at a loss to understand how it is that despite both Vote Leave and Leave EU being fined by the Electoral Commission for corrupt practice in the referendum /7 
2/ will be nothing but lose/lose all round. Oh, except maybe for those who are trying to avoid the new tax legislation.Second, the 48% who voted #Remain, and the @the3million and @BritishInEurope who were disenfranchised in the 2016 referendum /3 
Dear @ZacGoldsmithAs a "contemptuous Remainer", may I assure you that I have considered the implications of "winning", as you put it, very carefully.First, Remainers long ago gave up the idea of #Brexit being a winner/loser situation. They are all too fully aware that leaving/2  
My view has completely changed & hardened on #brexit... we need to go back to the people as this government couldn't be trusted to run a whelk stall let alone run a country.#Ridge #marr #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Remainers might be laughing up their sleeves thinking they've torpedoed Brexit, who'll be laughing when the state starts cracking heads?If democracy is to survive then Brexit must happen and Macron must fall... Ultimately leading to the break up of the EU pic.twitter.com/QVL12qhlOn 
This is the most serious political crisis since 1940 - self-imposed by the Tory party’s capture by its Brexit right. The best have to come together to resist. The route is clear: a second referendum to Remain- then Reform. The Tory party is no use to anyone now. Save Britain 
Do you realise that Gisela Stuart was part of the 2016 referendum?She was on any questions yesterday and now on #marr.This is outrageous, absolutely outrageous when vote leave have admitted to FRAUD in one of the biggest issues for our country since the war. 
Before the referendum, John Major wanted everyone to accept the result. If only he'd just taken his own advice instead of calling for another one!  
“No-deal preparations are now very far advanced in both the UK and the EU, and No Deal is a more popular option amongst the public than either the Withdrawal Agreement or another referendum...Any further extension to Article 50...would prolong uncertainty”  
A unicorn can’t be a lifeboat - which is why Ken Clarke’s Customs Union proposal is terrible. Only a referendum can now resolve Brexit, and the only viable policy is No BrexitVoting accordingly should be the strategy of sensible MPs this week 
Hmm, it’s not looking good. 
There must be a lesson here for @UKLabour support a final say and you get support. Be seen behind any form of Brexit and you plummet in the polls.  
Cabinet faces collapse as 'six ministers threaten to quit over no deal Brexit'  
Vote Leave cheated! The campaign headed by Boris Johnnson and Michael Gove is guilty of breaking electoral law on 4 counts. They've refused to discuss the issues,but the UK need answers...Brexit is a lie and a fraud - it is not the 'will of the people' #StopBrexitNow #Marr #Ridge 
George is correct. There is a great danger of this happening. Historic moment for the country and party. Where is the leader who can rescue Brexit and prevent the disaster of Corbyn becoming PM?  
Michael Gove and Boris Johnson are culpable for cheating during the 2016 Referendum. They have defrauded the UK & caused huge divisions. We need an inquiry,we need criminal charges,we need to cancel Brexit! @michaelgove & @BorisJohnson must answer for their actions! #Marr #Ridge 
Read this tale of mounting chaos & conflict & it’s obvious that the only way forward now is - No Brexit  
"Conservative leadership candidates Boris Johnson and Michael Gove are facing growing calls to account for illegal behaviour by the official Vote Leave Brexit campaign." #Brexit #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Every single question addressed to Gisela Stuart should refer to referendum fraud. Tom Watson, John Major please do not answer questions. Instead, make statements, make accusations. Brexit is fraud. Brexit is the biggest con-job in living memory. Tell the world.  
Let’s get behind common sense and pragmatism.  There is no ultimate right and wrong about Brexit, it’s a process not a fixed reality.  Government should provide platforms for listening and engagement instead of all this dualistic claptrap. #DominicGrieve I wish you were my MP 
This is spot on from @tom_watson on why the Labour party should be leading the case for a #PeoplesVote."They’ve messed up Brexit that has gone from chaos to national humiliation and are completely incapable of providing the leadership we need." 
Given Boris Johnson, Jacob Rees-Mogg and David Davis get to change THEIR minds and vote for May’s Deal, should we the public get a chance to change OUR minds and have a second referendum? Join me from 1 on @LBC 
If our PM can refuse further extensions, so we leave on 12th Apr without WA, she’ll always be known as the PM who delivered Brexit.  Country will swiftly unite in the new reality: EU drops backstop or UK trading briefly under WTO in transition to new EU trade deal  @Conservatives 
Amazing to see that #RevokeArticle50 is now the most popular Brexit option A few months ago it wasn’t even really discussed as a possibility  
A customs union would be terrible relative to our current EU membership & wld not be Brexit. All the suggested HOC “deals” also require the WA - there is NO EU deal on offer without the WA/backstop. Get real MPs! 
A superb montage of clips. I’m now branded ‘extreme’ for simply staying true to what all these people had promised  and their analysis of what the #Brexit vote would mean and what the 2017 manifestos of @Conservatives & @UKLabour agreed to honour. #staytrue #StandUp4Brexit 
Dominic Grieve being deselected is a red-light showing the extent to which the far right has infiltrated the Conservative party.  To be anti-Brexit is no longer an acceptable Conservative position; the Conservative Party is now UKIP. 
Second Referendum or General Election? You decide. #Brexit 
Vote Leave & Leave. EU broke rules laid down by Parliament to "ensure fairness, confidence and legitimacy" in the referendum. Accordingly, the result cannot be considered legitimate nor fair. No one who believes in democracy can have confidence in it.  #notlawful #notdemocratic 
"A bipartisan group of lawmakers introduced legislation Thurs that would admit Puerto Rico into the union as 51st state without referendum on island's territorial status."Introduced: Puerto Rico statehood bill: "It's time to end 120 years of colonialism"  
"The throne of England is yours." #Brexit  
I updated the Archipelago of Brexit with May's Deal and a colouring by party.  
So, let's get this straight! A PM from a previous government promised the result of an advisory referendum would be enacted. But, as we know, a new government is not obliged to fulfil promises made by an earlier government. And, in 2017, the  government changed. RT if you agree. 
And the Prime Minister argued before the High Court and Court of Appeal that there were still appeals pending in these cases such that it was still possible that the findings of cheating would be overturned.  No longer! The referendum was replete with serious illegalities.  
There are none too mighty that they cannot fall.The idea that they did not know of the referendum fraud is risible.These are people that were happy to participate in a fundamentally dishonest, lying campaign.When will they be prosecuted?  
Seems that the Conservative party has two options:  deliver the referendum result like their manifesto promised.  Or face a General Election wipe out.  Tough call, eh? 
Let’s now put to bed this nonsense that the public are going to blame the ERG and people who are voting against May’s deal for the delay/loss of Brexit. They know who’s to blame. We want WTO Brexit now - they aren’t interested in this Withdrawal Treaty  
Not all Leavers are racists. Some are just plain crazy 
Supporting a confirmatory public vote  #Referendum on the government’s #Brexit deal doesn’t seem to have harmed #Labour : 
Govt delays Brexit, @UKLabour shoots up to 41%, @Conservatives drop 7 points. Join the dots, @theresa_may - go for No Deal Brexit on 12 April.  
Please @bbcpress don’t use this as an opportunity to attack me again. I just want to know why you are platforming the MP that literally knew about the criminality? She hired AIQ to work on her organisation after the referendum. Gisela Stuart has been central to the crimes. #Marr 
Brexit has broken the Conservative and Labour parties. Thank goodness here in Scotland @NicolaSturgeon and her @theSNP Govt are getting on with the day job whilst the UK Govt is in chaos.  We can’t fix broken Britain but we can secure our own future as a European nation. 
.@BBCNews Please put this on the news... not Brexit.  
On the day it was announced that Arron Banks would be investigated by the NCA, @bbclaurak told the readers it was 'unlikely to affect the brexit process'A blatant attempt at trying to control the narrative and limit the damage early on.  
The price of refusing to honour the referendum  
Just checking @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer are you going to continue "respecting" the result of the law-breaking 2016 referendum? We don't. @peoplesvote_uk 
This is what happens when you betray Brexit.  
My 83 year old mother signed this petition on her smartphone. I'm very proud of her. We now need less than 5,000 signatures to reach 6 million!Spread the news!Petition: Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU. 
Wanna see nationalism in its purest form?In the full version, the woman at the end is the kind of Brexit voter I'm fighting for:  
“The spite, pride, mendacity and pitiless commitment to trampling democracy with which we are governed today leads me to describe the situation without hesitation as wrong: deeply, profoundly, intolerably wrong.” 
Quite pished right now and Brexit still looks as fucking mental as it did sober. Still, happy to hear so many accents & languages around the Edinburgh bars. Scotland is a European, internationalist nation. I'm raising a glass to that  
.@SteveBakerHW is bang on, this is now a very simple question - does the public's vote matter? Beneath the lies, the games, the trickery, the answer from Remain and the Tory "rebels" is very clear - no, it does not. This treachery cannot stand.#brexit  
Shout it from the rooftops! The chickens are coming home to roost. Judgement time. "Conservative leadership candidates Boris Johnson and Michael Gove are facing growing calls to account for illegal behaviour by the official Vote Leave Brexit campaign."  
AND so 24 hours after Brexit didn’t happen and, unless you’re in a Surrey golf club or at a Tommy Robinson rally - no one’s really that upset  
BBC News' exclusive coverage on Vote Leave's criminal referendum activities:  
The Brexit Day demonstrations yesterday attracted a range of extremists and ended with the far right looking for a fight - attacking the police, the media, and one another. Share this so people know:  
It is now incumbent on the government to act. We have heard minister after minister say the referendum is valid. This is proof it was not. Going ahead with Brexit in these circumstances would be the biggest betrayal of our democracy of all  
Supporting brexit doesn't make people right wing or mean that they don't like Europeans. It means that they want the British parliament to decide British law and trade. Pride isn't necessary for that. 
To all cowards who hide behind "I don't have a crystal ball so I can't tell you how much Brexit will cost":1) you don't need a ball2) Brexit will cost £50-100bn per year in lost GDP3) NHS budget is £125bn per year4) Brexit's damage nearly = NHS spending - every year 
Street art. #brexit  
I spoke to residents in Brown Edge today. Lots of conversations about Brexit & protecting local services & green spaces. People are absolutely determined we leave the EU & have a clean break as a sovereign, independent, global free-trading nation  #ToryCanvass #StandUp4Brexit 
You've gone very quiet @BorisJohnson @michaelgove What have you to say on the illegal behaviour by the official Vote Leave Brexit campaign?You headed it, you explain to the British public the role you played in this illegal activity. 
Definitive proof that the Referendum was not won legally: .  If evidence is found that any minister, Cabinet or otherwise, was aware of this wrong-doing, they should be sacked immediately. 
Brexit is a conThe EU isn't to blame for the UK's problemsMigrants aren't to blame for the UK's problemsFree movement is a good thingImmigration is a good thingMigrants are by definition among the most resourceful and enterprising people in the UKThis is the truth 
And the Academy Award for Cinematography goes to...the tech on Newsnight. #lighting #reesmorgue pic.twitter.com/LMdi7vvjwJ 
No.  Now they go for PM. 
I've really had enough with people ('left wing' included) standing with Dominic Grieve solely based on his stance on Brexit. He is a typical privileged millionaire Tory who has always voted to take money from the poor to give to the rich. Don't be blinded by Brexit.  
You just know that in a hundred years the history books will have this image to illustrate Brexit  
Brexit in a nutshell. Things must get objectively worse for YOU (the public) to satisfy MY (Brexiters’) subjective preferences.  
Watch as MP Dominic Grieve attempts to peddle Project Fear on WTO Brexit. Gets heckled by Conservative Party members who later voted no confidence in him. MPs should wake up to the public mood. #NoDeal 
Brexit populism explained.  
I too voted for #Brexit.  I support a #PeoplesVote. We know far more now than we did in 2016. This betrayal mantra re the 17.4 million is utterly bogus. The BREXIT zealots are terrified of putting their claim to the test 
Our incompetent MPs don't get it — Brexit is not about the economy, stupid  Pure milk of wisdom from Mervyn King. 
Student in Leaving Cert Oral Exam : I like football. I follow Liverpool.Examiner : Ah Liverpool in the United Kingdom. What do you think of Brexit and the political and economic consequences for the Republic of Ireland? 
“I’ve had enough of hearing about this bloody Brexit”  
“... GDP in Italy is no higher today than it was 20 years ago when it joined the monetary union.“These are dreadful outcomes for the monetary union. Do we really want to be in a club that accepts such outcomes?”  
Former footballer David Bentley on Brexit:  "I disagree with it - I'm a Remainer.  I've got four children and I want them to have the freedom to move and work and have options in life.  You don't want to be isolated with your bigoted opinion sat on your island."  
“The majority of the population that voted for a future in which they would be governed by people they had elected...has now heard in precise terms the contempt in which it is held by its own political class..That majority...will not be able to un-hear it” 
Let's play a game - Post your best #Brexit memes/pictures below, we all need a laugh after last week.  
Remember the Brexit battle bus £350m a week for the NHS? Brexit has already *cost* us £360m a week...  
I wont apologise for meeting people who have traveled from Wales to support Brexit. I dont assume that waving an English flag makes you a “fascist” & I cannot control who walks past me in a public place at a protest. Remain activists stop smearing people! 
.@nigel_farage met up with @JamesDelingpole at the latest Brexit rally:  
Naming my son Brexit 
Phonics screening pseudo words have apparently been leaked. #phonics2019 #brexit  
Fabulous street stall today in MK!- 1000 “Brexit is a mess: just make it stop” leaflets given out- 263 signing up to write to their MP asking for #PeoplesVote or #RevokeArt50 - including 2 #RemainerNow!- overwhelmingly MK people want to #RevokeArt50 to STOP THE BREXIT MESS!  
Don’t forget Grieve is also Chair of the Intelligence & Security Committee. His investigation into interference in the 2016 Referendum has made him some serious enemies, not just his local crackpots.  
A very positive mood on our first extra day in the EU & in #Truro we signed up many new members, undeterred by a "#Brexit Betrayal" rally nearby.Many who voted Leave in 2016 now think the real betrayal was by the Brexiter politicians who have so consistently lied to the public.  
Canvassing  up 'Hanley again Saturday to celebrate #Happy_No_Brexit_Day by handing out 100 plus  QR code leaflets for the  #revokeA50petition #gareth_snellmp #RuthSmeeth @peoplesvote_uk 
Brexit Ref: MP murdered by far right Leave breaks election lawActual Nazis marching by Parliament Rampant islamophobia Anti Catholic flute band marching by Downing St Indyref: Jim Murphy egged 
Simon.  It's not the people of the UK. It's arron banks interfering again. 
This is an important piece of original research on the cost is Brexit.  
Dear @DavidRutleyThanks for stopping by.As MPs can’t decide, it was high time Macclesfield had an “indicative” Brexit vote.Majority now want a #PeoplesVote & to #RevokeArticle50.“Not scientific” but we “shouldn’t let the perfect be enemy of the good”.Your constituents. 
Been canvassing in one of the few areas in Glasgow Southside which was majority no in 2014. There's a definite shift towards Yes, driven by brexit, but a high level of nervousness about potentially adding chaos to chaos. These are the people we need to win. They can be persuaded. 
Brexit preparations on the M20 to Dover. Miles and miles of carriageway ready to receive the expected tailback of lorries. Kent MPs who voted for this Brexit mess will undoubtedly be rewarded by their constituents ...  
The UK has been labelled as dangerous as Congo and Algeria in a new travel advisory ranking system from the US State Department. The UK was designated Level 2, which advises visitors to “exercise increased caution” and “be aware of heightened risks to safety and security”#brexit  
How many were misled by illegally funded lies at the end of the referendum campaign Brexit is based on lies.#RevokeArticle50Now 
For anyone struggling with the concept… #Brexit in pictures… to the left the #Remain view and to the right the #Leave view… #RevokeA50 #Remain 
This video shows why Spain will never accept a Catalan referendum. Thanks @Foreign_Cat and @MALPARIT1 for the video. 
Dear UK Media 
So May wants MPs to have a fourth vote on her failed #Brexit deal, but won’t allow you, the public, to vote on it just once. #BrexitShambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote 
Lots of rumours today that The Independent Group will merge with Liberal Democrats. Wondering what to call themselves. With all those MPs who got elected on #Brexit manifestos & then went against it, how about Liberal Independent Alliance - L.I.A. ?  
Convenient that Vote Leave should finally admit to cheating & breaking Electoral Law on #BrexitDay itself...when likely to go unnoticed.The Brexit referendum was corrupt @theresa_may - & you know this full well. #RevokeArticle50 now. 
Matthew Parris - telling it as it is. Spot on as ever @TheIndGroup #Brexit  
Perfect metaphor for Brexit - it’s pointless and wasteful and stupid but we have to do it anyway. Someone press STOP.  No-deal ferry crossings get underway despite Brexit delay  
The most devastating objection to Brexit is not just the immense economic damage it will cause, but the unthinkable social damage it is causing and which will only escalate. We must not go there. We have a moral obligation to stop it.  
It’s now unchallengeable that Vote Leave broke the law!Vote Leave (Johnson, Gove, Cummings etc.) now accept they cannot succeed with a challenge to the finding they broke the law. In breaking the law they corrupted the #Brexit referendum result.  
Wow! A searing, passionate rant from a ex Conservative MP! “Compromise be damned: we can’t give an inch to the liars & rascals who’ve brought our country to the brink of ruin”Yes, yes, yes!Tinpot Brexiteer vandals have been rumbled.The Times 
CRACKING NE4EU 'Survivor's' Party last night for 'NO Brexit Day' - how  we SCREAMED with delight at 11pm that we were still EU Citizens!!! :) :)  
The Tory Party — of all parties! — has set off down the road of making MPs mandated delegates of their constituency parties. That Cameron referendum was the most destructive and ill thought-out action of any government I can think of. Will he ever apologise? 
It's hard to look at the timing of Vote Leave's capitulation on the electoral law appeal without wondering whether they accepted their guilt all along but were planning to admit it only *after* Brexit had been hauled over the line. Either way, it stinks. 
Show me condescension, show me hypocrisy, show me arrogance, show me manipulation, show me Michael Gove...... 
CU membership completely eliminates our future trade policy independence, as we’d not be in a position to negotiate any trade deals ourselves.That Includes with the fastest growing areas of the world: North America and Asia.#StandUp4Brexit 
This is peak British humour about Brexit  
National pride has evil consequences. Prefer pride in humanity. German pride gave us Hitler, American pride gave us Trump, British pride gave us Brexit. If you must have pride, be proud that Homo sapiens could produce a Darwin, Shakespeare, Mandela, Einstein, Beethoven. 
Who could have predicted that giving the far right everything they've always wanted (via Brexit) would lead to them swaggering about as if they owned the country? So here's a prediction: they most certainly are not stopping here. Brexit gave them the power - now they will use it. 
Why we should be grateful for this Parliamentary farce.  It’s revealed how rotten of political system real is - me writing for @telegraph 
Eagles Meadow, Wrexham. Question: of all the people in this poster, who’d be the last to admit Brexit was a mistake? If the last drop of drinking water ran dry, cancer drugs couldn’t be imported and the £ fell to parity with the Venezuelan Bolívar, who’d be the last to hold out?  
Remember clocks go forward an hour tomorrow and then back 50 years on 12th April x #ClocksGoForward #Brexit 
So @tconnellyRTE has written some top things about #Brexit and Ireland, but none better than this...John Bercow should print 650 copies, lock the doors of the House and not open them til every single MP has read. Non-hysterical. Forensic. Brilliant.  
This is appalling. The more you watch it, the more you see what will happen to the UK if we let Brexit win. No foreigner, no Remainer, no one who thinks diffetently will be safe on the streets. The world has seen this type of behaviour before ... and we know where it ends.  
I think this is one of the most shocking pictures of the entire Brexit debacle.A nazi agitator spewing his hatred just feet away from the Cenotaph.The dead it honours must be turning in the graves to which they were sent while fighting a war against this evil. Truly shocking.  
 63% think there should be another referendum on Scottish independence. The same number also think Scotland will become independent. 77% would vote for independence if they can be convinced it would be good for the Scottish economy.  
Man orchestrating campaign to reverse referendum complains of orchestrated campaign to stop him.  
Bravo to Parris. He is expressing the views of 3-4 million voters, Remainers, normally Tory, who feel completely deserted by this rabble. Most are well-informed about Brexit and are livid. If she calls an election, their reaction will make her 2017 defeat look like a victory  
New Opinion Poll: 63% majority believe Scotland will become independent. 61% agree there should be another referendum on Scottish independence. Details on @progressscot website #ProgressScotland 
Can you imagine the indignant Remainer outrage if Brexiters had lost in 2016 & were still furiously trying to overturn the Referendum result nearly 3yrs later?Their hypocrisy stinks.They’d ALL be saying the complete opposite if they’d (we’d) won. #brexit 
I voted leave but I have to say art 50 should be revoked. Brexit is undeliverable under the current parliament. Stop all this messing around and go back to how things were. At least we’d all know where we stand. 
Yesterday the official campaign for Brexit categorically admitted to breaking the law to win the 2016 referendum. Today neither I or anyone involved in bringing this all to light have been asked to talk about it. So please if you come on TV/Radio today/tomorrow, TALK ABOUT IT. 
So as suspected  - guy who shut down Eurostar was a Brexit hooligan waving an England flag. That's thousands of lives disrupted, millions of pounds lost and the police and emergency services diverted from actual emergencies to deal with a drunk fat extremistBrexit in a nutshell 
Mervyn King calls for no-deal Brexit after six months of preparation | News | The Times  
Someone set me straight. It's become a mantra that the 2016 referendum was the biggest democratic vote in history. It had a turnout of 72.2%. The 1992 General Election achieved a turnout of 77.7%. What am I missing? 
Just to be clear -Brexit means implementing a policy based on an advisory vote in which the “winning” side cheated and broke the law.Is everyone OK with that?  
This was London last night and it is not being fully reported. Please share this so others can decide for themselves.  #brexit #democracy #fbpe @peoplesvote_uk @UKLabour @TheIndGroup 
This weekend your MP will be trying to work out what happens next. Help them out: write them an email and tell them that a second referendum is the only way to resolve this crisis. It’ll take 5 minutes. It’s important. Please. 
Remainers - Millions of people now want to stop Brexit. So it’s time for a follow back pro-EU day!Please take a second to:1. Retweet2. Like3. Comment4. Follow & we’ll follow back pro-EuropeansKeep building the #FBPE community to make #StopBrexit voices louder. 
In the EU referendum, Beaconsfield had a majority of voters who voted Remain. Dominic Grieve has been deselected for representing the will of his constituents. 
only one women can sort out brexit pic.twitter.com/KXsgwU8ntC 
This is more than a fight to save Brexit — this is a fight to save democracy itself. Because if the establishment overturns Brexit, it will be saying that our votes and our voices do not matter.Brendan O’Neill speaking outside Parliament yesterday #LeaveMeansLeave 
After a 10mins conversation I managed to turn a leaver to remainer that supports a #PeoplesVote and is from Don Valley. #PeoplesVote#Brexit@Best4Doncaster 
Our new interim leader @heidiallen75 talking with her South Cambridgeshire constituents this morning about Brexit, the state of our broken politics and much more! #ChangeUK #ChangePolitics 
The utter shame of this. This should be tweeted all day every day until the referendum is carried out. This is an astonishing display of dishonesty and treachery even by the standards of politicians. #brexit  
‘Multiple offences under electoral law’ from @vote_leave  and yet more fines and criminal infestations for Leave EU. The vote was rigged, folks. If it had been a binding referendum it would be declared null and void. All this grief for a false result  
Blackadder on Brexit.  
Effigies of Theresa May and Sadiq Khan (can't help but point out, a woman and ethnic minority Muslim), dragged by the neck through the streets of London at the Brexit Betrayal March.Utterly horrific. Deeply unsettling and disturbing. Blood runs cold. 
We dont want to fight them. But if we do... 
Parris “I will never again vote for a party with a no-referendum Brexit in its manifesto. And among the 6 million who signed the Revoke petition, the London marchers on 23 March and the millions of Remainers who voted Tory, there will be a multitude like me” @TheTimes #FBPE 
“Brittany Ferries says ‘there is no turning back’ as all preparations were planned for today... even though the journeys are no longer needed.”So the contingency plan didn’t have a contingency that the contingency might not be needed?That’s so Brexit.  
I voted Remain.But if there's a 2nd Referendum before we even try to honour the result of the 1st, then I will vote Leave purely as a protest against this ongoing attempt to defy & destroy British democracy.I suspect I'm not alone. #Brexit 
If you hadn’t worked out that Brexit is largely about English nationalism...  
‘As Stuart Hall once put it, “Englishness has always carried a racial signature”’. It would be great to have more nuanced and  intersectional use of ‘class’...and this piece helps. 
BREXIT: #Brexit protester says she 'didn't even know' we were part of EU until we were 'leaving it' in bizarre rant  
As a former member of the armed forces I was sent to various places in the world by UK politicians. I accepted their authority because they had the votes of citizens behind them. Now I see politicians actively trying to undermine my vote.Parliament beware. #Brexit 
When you disagree on the most basic values, like national independence, you don't have a broad tent, you have a . Party and country become a laughing stock. 
“Now we've lost that vote, there's only one thing the Prime Minister can do, get us out on the 12th April, get our country back and deliver what we promised because if we don't, God help us” Richard Drax#StandUp4Brexit 
We’ve lost quite a few followers this week due to our position on Brexit.We understand that we will not agree on everything, but hopefully you can see that we really just want the best for our NHS for the sake of everyone.Please follow and RT if you’re still right behind us.  
Let me get this straight. Therese May’s deal has been defeated 3 times but if she can bribe some more people there will be a fourth vote next week. But we can’t have a second referendum because that would be anti democratic ? Where did I put my pitchfork ! 
Showing courage and their faces, @MadeleinaKay and friend stand by their convictions at pro-leave rally, only to be told by face-hiding Donald Trump that they're traitors and not English. Some Americans don’t get irony. #sodem #stopbrexit #RevokeArticle50 #brexit #PeoplesVote 
Some shocking images from the #Brexit march yesterday. Not to mention the violence and arrests which followed. If you still support this Brexit then these are your people. This is your vision for the UK. It really is that simple. #RevokeArticle50#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
It was nice to see and meet some of the #Frexit protesters out in London last night supporting #Brexit  
Vote Leave drop their appeal thereby admitting their criminal overspending in the Referendum. Brexit sold on the basis of lies, fantastical hopes and insidious microtargetting of FB ads. And you still expect us to respect the result? Let's have a #PeoplesVote to confirm it then. 
The MPs too thick to do BrexitMe in @thetimes 
Wonder if Cameron ever looks at footage of people dragging effigies of Sadiq Khan & Theresa May around by their necks and thinks “hmm maybe I do regret calling the referendum a bit” 
Why would anyone prefer staying in the customs union and the single market to staying in the EU completely? We would be supine rule-takers, would pay into the EU budget and be subject to EU Court. Not a single person voted for that kind of #Brexit 
#Brexit #brexitshambles we used to be called Great Britain for a reason... 
@PlanetExpressES Brexit S04E09  
Banksy puts out 'Parliament of Chimps' work on display to mark Brexit day   
I'm fairly sure I speak for everyone, everywhere when I say:'Are you f*cking kidding me??'BBC News - Brexit: Theresa May ponders fourth bid to pass deal  
What on earth does this have to do with BREXIT??? The guy is a psycho. The UKs Muslims were mostly here before we joined the EEC/EU  
You know, if Corbyn hadn’t been elected Labour leader..The Tories would still have a comfortable majorityA Tory Brexit would have sailed through..‘Broken politics’ Chuka wouldn’t be trying to ‘change’ anything.There would be no talk of austerity ending. 
This is madness  Is it the brexit bus  
Brexit, an ugly idea, has unleashed ugly forces, has made our country an ugly place, has corrupted the BBC, has potentiated the ‘worse drives out the better’ rule (think Grieve): when we have stopped this ugly thing we have much repair work to do. 
Brexit v Remain: Who is winning now?  Compare the size of the recent demos. Yesterday's Brexit Betrayal demo shown in blue didn't fill Parliament Square. The Peoples Vote march shown in red filled ALL the streets shown.  You decide.  
Then in September comes the judicial review finding in which the High Court also finds Vote Leave cheated. The BBC initially prints a highly inaccurate story and I am furious about it on twitter. Brian Wheeler eventually comes to me and amends his story. 
Good morning everyone, another day in the parallel universe that is now the UK. Boris thinks HM needs a new Royal Yacht, May wants a 4th vote on her Brexit deal & James Cleverly is considering standing as Tory leader. Please let us have a GE, for our sanity. #SaturdayThoughts x 
Tommy Robinson gets a Podium in Whitehall to bemoan No Brexit. Shame on our country. Shame on the Charlatans, Crooks and Liars who have brought this upon us. So many died fighting this evil to give us our peace and you gave this filth centre stage. Anger doesn’t get close.  
Nigel Dodds has said he would rather see Brexit cancelled than risk the break-up of the United Kingdom.  
"Alberta, with a budget deficit of $9 billion, is still paying into equalization".this article is embarrassing, @edmontonjournal. please stop printing OpEds that spout such nonsense. AB doesn't pay into it &our deficit is irrelevant to the  issue  
Brexit's gone beyond a joke,Universally hated by ordinary folk.They're trying to sell us a pig in a poke.Now we must the politicians provoke,So sign the petition to REVOKE!#SaturdayMotivation #RevokeArticle50 @jk_rowling Pls RT 
A short potted history of the BBC's coverage of Vote Leave's cheating in the Referendum.It begins here, when @GoodLawProject began judicial review proceedings against the Electoral Commission. A balanced piece of coverage (by Brian Wheeler.) /1 
Dominic Grieve is an outstanding Parliamentarian. The transparency and scrutiny he has fought for during the Brexit process, such as the right for MPs to have a "Meaningful Vote' on the Brexit deal, has benefited leavers and remainers - and enhanced our parliamentary democracy. 
Far right & far left factions have taken over the main political parties in the UK, facilitating Brexit  & spreading xenophobia, islamophobia & anti-Semitism. I refuse to let them define my country,  that’s why I support the ⁦@Tig_England⁩/Change UK 
The irony that fascist Tommy Robinson preaches hate to his followers just in front of the Cenotaph, a monument dedicated to the men and women who died fighting fascists. #Brexit  
Vote Leave yesterday accepted that it engaged in major breaches of electoral law in the last referendumThose responsible should be held accountable & not permitted to be engaged in the next referendum campaign 
I honestly think Radio 4 should have a moratorium on interviewing Ian Duncan Smith and David Davis about Brexit. They might as well ask the organizer of the Fyre Festival how he’d improve this year’s Glastonbury. 
There've been bucketloads of Brexity bollocks we've had to call out, but the biggest barnful of bullshit right now must be this Brexit betrayal blather. Bollocks to it. If anyone's betrayed the UK, it's the bullshitting Brexiters with their bottomless barrel of Brexit bollocks. 
Dominic Grieve promised to respect the outcome of the referendum and stood on a clean Brexit manifesto, he then did all he could to stop Brexit altogether through arcane parliamentary process. This is a fair outcome!  
Stunningly good piece by ⁦#MatthewParris on why Remainers must not compromise with the Brexiteers in this hour of decision and reckoning 
The flag of the fascist, white supremacist movement Generation Identity being flown proudly on the Leave Means Leave demo in Parliament Square today.The Christchurch shooter donated €1,500 to the organisation before massacring 50 peopleThe far-right nature of the Brexit project  
Leave : under 10,000 angry protesters, 5 arrests.Remain : over a million peaceful marchers, no arrests.(Plus 6,000,000 signatures demanding A50 be revoked.) 
B comme #Brexit B comme #Bansky 
The mood and language of the Brexit protest was shocking. But it was also surprisingly a damp squid. It was small and had it not been for @the @BBCNews hyping it up not newsworthy. There won’t be massive protests, if we leave the EU, there will be a National, huge sigh of relief 
No one! #TilllyNoMates 
DUP know they made the wrong call on Brexit. They've seen the light, all credit for that. Nigel Dodds wants a soft Brexit in preference to division of the UK. Better still no Brexit. DUP are almost #RemainersNow 
I've nothing but respect for Dominic Grieve. He has refused to make false promises about what Brexit means for his constituents. He has studied the detail more than just about anyone I know. And he has shown he has guts and principles, which are in all too short supply right now 
Bored of Brexit, definitely bored of Theresa Mayhem ... today I am going to focus wholly on .....  
Boris Johnson's Vote Leave campaign has finally admitted that it broke electoral law, and they tried to hide on Brexit Day!, They committed illegal acts which have led to years of chaos and a terminal division of the country... We should throw the book at them! #BrexitCrisis 
Understand #Brexit in just a few lines  
If i was in charge, I would have stopped Brexit by now.#RevokeArticle50 #StopBrexit  
Alexa, show me 'Napoleon Complex' pic.twitter.com/4uIsx2oZIz 
Brexit in a nutshell #BrexitDay #BrexitVote 
Nicola Sturgeon has said that Scotland could end up as a Third World country after Brexit I don't know if things will improve to that extent, but you never know. 
One of Kafka's lesser-known works.#Brexit #BrexitDay 
What other nation other than the Scots would hijack a petition for promoting the independence of the their much larger neighbour who they are trying to gain independence from. 95% of the signatories for English Independence referendum petition are Scots residents! 
Accurate #Brexit  
We all understand the SNP's position has been to show the world that Scotland tried everything first before calling a referendum without a section 30 order to ensure international recognition. We're now past proving and now flogging a dead horse. 
I'm kindly asking all Welsh independence supporters to sign this to help our English neighbours out.  Please RTHold a referendum on England leaving the United Kingdom. - PetitionsPetition: Hold a referendum on England leaving the United Kingdom.  
It's 12.30am on the 30th March, an hour and a half after we're supposed to have left the EU.IT'S A WRAP!!! Thanks @bbclaurak for the past 9 months. The Brexit Storm airs Monday 9pm on BBC Two. #brexit  
I apologize, but this is the best guide to Brexit I have ever seen.  
DUP deputy leader Nigel Dodds: "I would stay in the EU and remain, rather than risk Northern Ireland's position."Yes, that's right. The deputy leader of the #DUP.#Brexit is dead. Now we just need a #PeoplesVote to bury it for good. 
Every so often I like to re-read the utterly wonderful short essay written by the late A. A. Gill just before the 2016 referendum. As last time and the time before that and the time before that, I've now got something in my eye. #Brexit1/2  
This is ridiculous. I may disagree with him on Brexit matters, but Dominic Grieve is a quality MP and a genuine Conservative. The Conservative Party is a broad church not a narrow, intolerant sect. The moment it becomes the latter it ceases to command the support of the public.  
By deselecting Dominic Grieve, #Beaconsfield @Conservatives have shown that they are just part of a hard #Brexit sect - sadly increasingly the case at the grassroots level. He has been a hero in recent months, lucid, rational and measured. Everything those who ousted him are not.  
The descent of the Conservative Party into squalid, gurning populism is complete as its Beaconsfield chapter votes no confidence in the last true statesman in its ranks. #DominicGrieve votes against Brexit in the utmost interest of his constituents and this is how they treat him.  
Why's it alarming? Grieve promised he would respect the referendum result, lied to everyone in his constituency to get voted in, then broke everything he promisedPeople deselect him and you're worried about someone they'll elect as Tory leader? How about someone who doesn't lie  
Holy shit a so-called mainstream news anchor just LIED on air about the nature of today’s #Brexit marches and concluded, “I’ve never seen so many white people in one place”. A few notes on that for @jonsnowC4’s racist white ass... 
1992 Denmark voted in a referendum against the Maastricht treaty.2005 France voted in a referendum against EU constitution.2008 Ireland voted in a referendum against Lisbon treaty.2015 Greece voted in a referendum against EU Bailout.None of them were implemented. #Brexit 
I trust the #BrexitBetrayal playing out before our very eyes will motivate #UK citizens to refrain from re-electing the hundreds of MPs across the political spectrum who continue to actively seek to thwart #Brexit in favour of #Remain aka #SoftBrexit aka @WA. #RespectTheResult 
Brexit update:  
Since you deal in facts and it's all been disproved can you find any evidence that Diabetes UK can guarantee insulin supplies in a No Deal Brexit?Can you point to evidence that the Nuffield health Trust is wrong and it won't cost the NHS £2 billion extra?What about the pallets?  
This evening on Sky News I took on Jonathan Isaby of Brexit Central.He admitted that the deal is terrible, yet backed it. Other Brexiters didn't.How can Brexiters blame anyone but themselves, when they are all over the place on their Brexit voting - even at the eleventh hour?  
And the same Leavers might need reminding that before the 2016 referendum leading Brexiters including Farage, Redwood and Raab were making it clear they would call for another referendum (A straight replay) if Remain won.  
Not content with giving a platform toTommy Robinson, Steve Bannon & Generation Identity, @BBCNewsnight are now helping to resurrect the flagging career of grotesque hard right mysoginist Toby Young by having him on a panel to duscuss Brexit.@BBC propaganda is way beyond a joke. 
Blackadder on Brexit  
A good day to bury bad news...Vote Leave drop appeal & fined £61k for cheating in Brexit referendum. Please RT in case your friends missed it....@PeoplesvoteSWY 
Statements like this just make our international embarrassment worse, Jeremy. Please just keep your head down until we’ve cancelled Brexit. Time for some humility. 
“How dare you cheat us of our Brexit!” say Brexiters who have now admitted they cheated for their Brexit. #BrexitDay 
Brexit means Brexit and we’re going to make the most monumental pigs ear out of it#BrexitDay  
If we are members of a Customs Union, we’d have to also be members of the: Common Agricultural PolicyCommon Fisheries Policy Thus breaking promises to our farmers and fishermen.Let your MP know how you feel about that: #StandUp4Brexit 
Do you know... I've never moved one iota from the marginal "Remain & Reform" position I had in 2016 when I deeply distrusted the zealots for both Remain & Leave & never wanted the Referendum in the first place...I've totally had it with Brexit.David Cameron you're a cunt. 
With a #Brexit hero ⁦@BrexitStewart⁩ standing up for democracy at Parliament Square 
@TheLastLeg #IsItOk that this is the funniest meme I've seen about brexit in awhile  
Hoping no-one notices while the news focuses today’s vote, the #VoteLeave campaign backs down and accepts Electoral Commission finding that it committed multiple offences in #Referendum campaign.=> #Brexit is based on cheating and lies  
Who wore it better? #TommyRobinson #Brexit  
That's how bad The Sun is, they are slagging off the DUP and I still refuse to read it 
I could cry. The excuses the media, Downing Street and MPs made when I came forward proving that Brexit was won by criminal activity and cheating. The hate I received. The way my family was put in danger. The way the BBC attacked me and let people slander me. No more excuses. 
The thing is, if Brexit was such a good idea, it would have happened already. 
Any Questions audience in Dover overwhelmingly anti Brexit including some who told me afterwards they had voted Leave and wished they hadn’t. The will of the people is on the move. Bigly. 
It’s exactly what I’ve said all along...I always remember the wise words of Sir John Major pre-referendum June 2016: “Brexit would throw all the pieces of the constitutional jigsaw up into the air again, and no-one could be certain where they would land.”Let us remain.  
Can brexit just be over I’m sick of hearing my dad call it breadsticks 
Just watching MPs going home for the weekend! #brexit  
"breakout star of Brexit"  
As predicted, the drunk leftovers from today's Brexit rally are starting trouble - a cyclist was punched on Trafalgar Square.  
Not every day that you get an autograph from @Nigel_Farage - on a leaflet cancelling Brexit...  
The Brexit disaster is a reminder of what happens when disingenuous sloganeering runs into the wall of reality. Sort of like the GOP and healthcare. 
This is George Square These are the Angry British Nationalists in George Square on the night Scotland lost the First Independence Referendum In 2014 Their extreme British Nationalism does indeed breed anger The police reports clearly stated YES Campaigners were peaceful  
That's more believable, but it's the Liverpool Champions' League victory parade 
That's St George's Hall. In Liverpool. Good god, you're desperate. 
Standing room only at Cafe Rhu in Arisaig tonight! Lots of engagement with local voters & many new members joining @theSNP this evening! The fishing industry, universal credit & Brexit all hot topics! We’ll be in Mallaig High Street 2mw with our monthly stall so pop along!  
#Brexit summed up...  
How Brexit marchers think they look vs how they really look  
Today, on not-quite-Brexit Day, MPs are getting schooled about the Customs Union that they are due to leave, having spent 40 years in it, 3 years after campaigning in a referendum on EU membership. Gorbachev said that he who is late is punished by history, but this is ridiculous.  
Once again: Vote Leave broke the law. They have finally admitted they had no defence. Thier unlawful behaviour undermined the legitimacy of the referendum, cheated voters of a fair process and caused the constitutional crisis we now find ourselves in.  
Farage and Leave Means Leave just using Fishing as a shtick; want to hear the truth about the fishing sector and how leaving the EU will impact the industry little? 
Nigel Dodds - Better to cancel Brexit than risk the break-up of the United Kingdom /#EU #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
My grandparents immigrated to the UK for a better life. We integrated and respect the people and land of Briatin... I'm British first, Indian second. I voted Leave, I'm not a nazi or a football thug. I'm one for change in such a poison society! #Brexit #BrexitBetrayalMarch 
My feelings exactly love ...  
Nothing, not one single thing about the sick catastrophe of Brexit has incensed me more than the BBC's poisonous decision to provide free promotional services to today's pro-Brexit rally. It has made me physically sick. 
On the Brexit March at Parliament Square. Great to see the French with their #Frexit banners  #vivelaFrance #Brexit   
Vote Leave, the official Brexit campaign, has now accepted that it broke the law. Still struggle to understand why this isn’t front page news  
Leave voters when they see Tommy Robinson and Generation Identity flags at the Brexit march  
Brexit.   
Amazing turnout for #brexit today in London. Thanks to all involved.   
In London today in Parliament Sq at the #LeaveMeansLeavemarch and others our French neighbours joined in and support #Brexit, they were protesting too wanting #Frexit. One thing stood out no Police beat them up, used pepper spray or bullets to move them on! #BrexitDay 
Where in London exactly is that?  Lived in London for 44 years and I'm afraid I don't recognise it. 
Brexit supporters or alt-right trump thugs? Hard to see a difference when the press is treated like this  
Two Channel 4 News reporters describe Orange flute bands playing sectarian tunes as "pipe bands" at London pro-Leave demo. Staggering ignorance or perhaps downplaying the bigots attached to the #Brexit rally? @Channel4News 
DUP would ‘rather see Brexit cancelled’ than risk break-up of UK  
I think it's some NI men who want to be ruled by the English but not be English and to be Irish but not ruled by the Irish, who hark back to the good old days when they were ruled by a Dutchman, and who are protesting against brexit. Hope that's cleared it up for everyone. 
Most accurate thing I've seen on the internet today #Brexit  
Brexit has been betrayed.Now it's time to rally to the flag and fight for Brexit.Let's #MakeBrexitHappen Support UKIP. Join UKIP. Vote UKIP. 
Well well well. Tommy Robinson the far right activist and keen racist was allowed to speak at the pro brexit March today and loads of people watched him. This tells me a lot about the people who voted to leave and reason behind their decision. #brexit  
If there is a general election now how would you vote? (#Conservative & #Labour only)#GeneralElectionNow #GeneralElection #BrexitDay #Brexit 
Everything I have done is because of support from people like you. Help me fight this corruption: . 
.@Channel4News Just referred to an Orange Flute Band marching with the Brexit protest as a "Pipe Band". I don't know any self respecting piper who would want to be associated with those bigoted a**eholes.  Do your research Channel 4, the Orange Lodge are not pipers. 
It’s official: the EU referendum was fraudulent.#RevokeArticle50 
Interviewed today with @SkyNews and @Reuters. We discussed trending national security issues regarding Brexit and Venezuela.  
Now the French want to leave...#Brexit #Frexit 
So they're guilty then.  So the ref was not free and fair. 
Pushing and shoving between Leave protestors and the police next to the Cenotaph #Brexit  
Remain, Leave, don’t care? You’ve got to watch this. This is the entire British Establishment, from Left to Right and everything in-between, telling us that the referendum result would be respected. No ifs, no buts. And here we are, utterly cheated.  
Nadhim Zahawi arguing that not respecting the referendum result 'opens the door to populism'. What planet are these people living on? Does he honestly not realise that Brexit is the ultimate expression of hard right populism, complete with dodgy money, xenophobism, and lies? 
I was outed for this. I was fired for this. I was right all along. They cheated to win the referendum. They broke the law to drive this country into chaos. They slandered me, shamed me, the BBC let them, politicians let them. Do you believe me now?  
DUP acknowledge that #Brexit represents a risk to the Union.Thank goodness then they didn’t:-campaign to leave EU -help to arrange dubious ad -throw their lot in with ERG-heighten constitutional fears-undermine Anglo-Irish relations  
Brilliant!! @mikegalsworthy's delivers some "Brexit Reality" to brexiter Jonathan Isaby... (Mikes face at the end ). #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
"What went wrong? What did they miss, the parents and grandparents who were reading Room on the Broom with its message of the importance of solidarity, partnership, friendship and kindness? The book wasn’t called No Room on the Broom." 
Brexit Britain 
@mikegalsworthy: Brexit itself is collapsing under the weight of its own contradiction, and its own contradictory parties within it. #Brexit  
I had a fantastic in Westminster for the @LeaveMnsLeave Brexit Betrayal March and Rally. I met @Nigel_Farage again and had a great chat with him. And also had my face blasted all over Parliament square! 
Well done guys! There are a number of heroes who have emerged from the Brexit fiasco and you are certainly among them. 
Today a few thousand Brexit supporters descended on Westminster and it got big coverage by @BBCNews, inc. interviews with Brexit marchers. Last weekend, a million plus Remain marchers got barely a mention and no interviews.BBC bias that will never be forgiven or forgotten. 
Here’s a diagram that maps out all the options for Brexit. pic.twitter.com/sllrakjzzI 
This has to be the time for May to declare the referendum result unsafe and revoke A50. It’s a relatively credible way for her to climb out of the hole she has dug. 
This is #Brexit Britain unfolding in Parliament Square this afternoon. This is an absolute disgrace. And why we must fight all that Brexit stands for and all that it will bring for decades to come #RevokeArticle50 #StopBrexitSaveBritain What a contrast to last week #Remain 
I’m here live at Parliament Square waiting for Farage to speak #brexit #nigelfarage 
Mr Grimes wasn't working in our office...... 
Islamophobia apparently doesn’t exist in the @Conservatives party... then #Markfrancois goes and shares a stage with Tommy Robinson and UKIP and I think to myself... sure they don’t... #brexit 
For some unknown reason we have an urge to share this..... 
The finalé of the Brexit Rally in Parliament Square this afternoon.  
3 years on from the referendum, two weeks to go, on brexit day, and MPs are still on the cusp of googling “what is the EU”  
Well done @ByDonkeys - there's a very narrow window for humour to be found from the Brexit shitshow, but you've done it very well whilst making very important points. Hat doffed. 
As well as the couple of Russians interviewed by Sky News, many of the protesters seem to be promoting … erm, Frexit. 
Favourite moment? Farage having a pint in a beer garden, trying desperately to pretend we weren’t 20 metres away broadcasting footage of him calling for a second referendum  
1,009 days agoWe voted to LeaveWe voted for freedom, sovereignty and liberty.We voted to take back control.Believe in DemocracyBelieve in BrexitBelieve In Britain Brexit must be delivered.#BrexitDay 
Funny because in the run up to the referendum that's exactly what everyone in the leave campaign told us it wasn't 
This is my first tweet on #Brexit. What a sh*t show. The fact the economy is broadly ticking along despite wobbles in other G7 countries says a great deal about the people of this country and not a lot about our elected representatives. 
Pre and post Brexit salads #BrexitDay @Coldwar_Steve 
Thank you #France #Frexit #Brexit  
For all their bluster Vote Leave, guilty of serious electoral crimes for which they are being investigated by the police, have today withdrawn their appeal and paid their £61,000 fine, leaving @darrengrimes_ in a somewhat awkward position. 
There's a pro Brexit French contingent in Parliament Square. Now singing the marseillaise.  
Believe In Britain Go Brexit!  
Once #Brexit has happened, be in no doubt that the UK will retain all the capabilities of a global power. Britain has been shaping the world for centuries and we’re here to stay 1/2 
Two Generation Identity (GI) flags are flying at the Leave protest in London in Parliament Square and on Whitehall where Tommy Robinson and his UKIP entourage are speaking. It recently came out that the Christchurch shooter donated €1500 to the Austrian leader of GI. #Brexit  
Maximum coverage of the pro Brexit demonstrations outside Parliament today, in stark contrast to the coverage  given to the Remain coverage last weekend which was massive in comparison.Disgraceful, biased, corrupt reporting. Non-stop Brexiteers being interviewed. #FBPE 
“Britain's poisoned and ripped apart for the egos of conceited Tories thinking they were born to rule” 
Brexit.docBrexit_rev1.docBrexit_newrev.docBrexit_final.docBrexit_finalfinal.docBrexit_finalvote.docBrexit_fuckingfinalforreal.docBrexit_jesussufferingfuckfinal.docFuckall.doc#brexit 
This handy guide to Brexit may help answer your questions  
The speaker on the UKIP stage meant to get the crowd to chant "May out, Corbyn out, Brexit now" but accidentally chanted "May, out, Brexit out, Corbyn now". He got it wrong twice. I was the only one to find it funny & now I'm a bit paranoid. 
Tommy Robinson DOES NOT represent most Brexit voters. I spoke to several Brexit supporters in Parliament Square who are absolutely disgusted to be sharing an event with his lot. #BrexitDay 
Oh god still banging on about a ‘better deal.’ WE DONT WANT BREXIT AT ALL. Don’t be as cloth-eared & absurd as May.  
We at #sodem have been campaigning *loudly* for years. We do not display hateful placardsHere are some of the #leave placards.These nasty thugs are the #ERG footsoldiersIf we #Brexit, this scum will truly have 'won'NEVER LET THEM!#brexitday #WithdrawalAgreement #leavers 
I heard Leavers outside Parliament shouting, ‘Where’s Steve Bray!’ Well I’m here celebrating Happy No Brexit Day   
Remain won a referendum in 1975 by 67-33 so imagine how we felt when we had to have a re-run just to save the Tory vote 
Bloody hell this Brexit business has hit us harder than I thought  
“This is not just a fight for Brexit — this is a fight for democracy”Brendan O’Neill killing it at the #LeaveMeansLeave rally 
29th March 2019 pic.twitter.com/YyZ1cpM9mv 
The Brits can thank me later but I've just found the solution to this Brexit mess...  
The ONLY rational way forward Guy now  is to:i) recognize that the 2016 vote was procured by multiple crimes and is therefore corrupt and illegal and not valid - as May already knows , andii) remain in the EU .  Whether this really needs another referendum is not clear 
Vote Brexit. Get Tommy Robinson. Put that on the side of a bus.  
Right. The SNP called the Brexit referendum. Oh, wait. That was the Tories. But the SNP voted for an immediate Art 50. Oh. wait. That was @UKLabour acting as handmaiden to the Tories. So how exactly is it the SNP's fault except in your pointless smear? 
Delighted to announce I’ve tabled a reworked version of my #RevokeArticle50 amendment having worked cross party to get a bigger consensus & with the drafting skills of the fantastic @JolyonMaugham whose explanatory thread is below #Brexit #IndicativeVotes  
.@LeaveMnsLeave rally in Parliament Square. Total determination to see the referendum result which 17.4 million voted for delivered with a true Brexit.  
Pass the sick bucket. 
Great to see plenty of people from Cornwall in Parliament Square today calling for the referendum to be honoured and that we leave the EU. Lots of St Pirans flags on show as well as friendly Cornish men and women.  
Oh hi Steve from California. Ordinary NHS doctor here. We’ve already seen Brexit harm NHS patients - EU nurses driven away by xenophobia, hospital beds closed. 1.5 million of us work in the NHS. We’re not elite, we are the people. So thanks, but please jog on.  
The deal is dead. We need to move on from Brexit. The Lib Dems are ready to fight European elections and defend our European identity and our place in the EU #BrexitDay 
An interesting graph which sums up #Brexit perfectly on #BrexitDay  
I voted Remain. I accepted the referendum result, of course. I would have wanted any Brexit plan to succeed. But there was no plan, and when a plan finally emerged, the Leavers rejected it.So don't wave your little yellow vest at me. 
We go live to our Brexit correspondent:  
Got to love a good flowchart #Brexit  
Brexit summed up in one image.  
Lets use the Brexit budget to fund the NHS instead.Want a better health service?  Cancel Brexit 
How dare you @skynews say it's @UKLabour who stopped Brexit How dare you. It was 35 Tory MPs who stopped itIt was the DUP who stopped itIt was the SNP who stopped itYOU incite division through your skewed rhetoric 
The government is trying to make it a choice between staying in a Customs Union or No Brexit. The only way to counter that is make it a choice for them of Leaving or Corbyn. 
Have to say, I still think revoking Article 50 might be preferable to a referendum. It keeps blame for this mess where it belongs.A referendum will divide us more, whatever the result. It’s better than nothing, but it’s messy and unpredictable. 
Thank you to @ByDonkeys for coming to Shipley and pointing out the true views of the Tory drivers of #Brexit ! pic.twitter.com/fOWYLjmDhu 
These 28 MPs must form the firmament of future @Conservatives leadership, at least until democratic reform sees new blood come in.They have shown great courage in their principled stance, & many #Brexiteers are notable by their omission.#Brexit#BrexitBetrayal 
Flying the flag for #Brexit here in Westminster!Good to join a million and ONE Brexiteers in Parliament square on a day we should have been celebrating as #BrexitDayWe voted for freedom, sovereignty and liberty.To take back control.Brexit Must Be Delivered.  
Backford - "In any compromise we can get, it still has to be put back to the ppl. The best deal for all of us, is remaining in EU" #Brexit  
Spotted this guy at the anti-Eu Leave protest in Parliament square in London who has a sign on his back that very much echoes the rhetoric of the Christchurch shooter. #Brexit @AntifaIntel 
Spotted a Qanon sign at the Leave protest in Parliament square in London just now. #Brexit  
Friday March 29th, 2019 #BrexitDay #BrexitShambles #Brexit - Britain trying to leave the EU perfectly encapsulated in one short video clip:  
OK, here you go! Inc. new followers thanks to @atmccann & the New York Times V23 #Brexit diagram!No Deal 14% May's Deal 0% General Election 25% Softer Brexit / Long Delay 22% #PeoplesVote 29% Rescind 10% Stats comparison to pre-indicative votes 
we've all been brexiting we just didn't know #brexit #BrexitDay 
You guys ruled half the world?Really? Unbelievable. #Brexit 
The people demand Brexit.  
It's a testament to @jeremycorbyn that just five nominally Labour MPs voted for Theresa May's rubbish #Brexit deal. Their CLPs know what to do. #BrexitDayKevin BaronRosie CooperJim FitzpatrickCaroline FlintJohn Mann 
JERY: Maybe you can just go backTERESA MAY: go back ?JERY: Ya. pretend brexit never happened.MAY: you mean just walk into the EU meeting on Monday morning like it never hapened?JERY: Sure.  People dont take england seriously 
"If the chair of our party can't follow Labour Party policy, where are we?"Jess Phillips says Labour frontbenchers who defied the whip over a second Brexit referendum should resign.We are live on YouTube with analysis from @krishgm: #GroundhogMay 
Just a reminder that the House of Commons represents 46 million voters & 65 mllion citizens. So, our MPs have every right to stand up for the majority & not be bullied by a 17.4 million minority of which over one million have died. #Brexit #FBPE #FinalSay #RemainDay #MV3 
"The problem is the deal is rotten, it stinks." says @SteveBakerHW 
Labour will never honour the Referendum result.We were supposed to leave the EU today. They just voted against Brexit.Share this   
If we can't agree a deal we want:1. We ask for an extension2. If the EU says no there's no time for a referendum so3. Parliament chooses between either (1) No Deal or (2) Revoking, with a commitment to a public inquiry into what we want and a possible further notification  
Today was the day you & I & all of us were going to lose a set of immensely valuable rights, privileges & opportunities because of the malign ambitions of a Brexit cabal. Now for the #PeoplesVote to stop this madness & then to work with our European partners for peace & progress. 
Labour just voted against Brexit on #BrexitDay.Whatever they say, they don’t want us to leave the EU. #plsShare 
#RevokeArticle50 & then get on with holding to account all those who misled/ lied to the public during the Brexit referendum & prosecute as appropriate. Full Mueller-style Brexit inquiry. #BrexitDay 
Here you go Andy. Here’s your Brexit reminder just in case you tried to lie about it. Oh and your buddy Coyne wasn’t to pleased with you either. Andrew Coyne: What would possess Andrew Scheer to endorse this Brexit madness?  
Great Britain leaving the EU#Brexit 
We must never think that our exit from the EU has been stopped by error or incompetence. #Brexit (without the exit) has been achieved by calculated deceit executed upon the nation by a treasonous parliament. Knew what they were doing? Of course they knew.  
Thank you 34 Conservative rebels. Thank you Dominic Grieve, who is speaking eloquently on @SkyNews for a referendumPreferred version of Brexit or Remain in the EUShould his local party deselect Grieve, I hope he will join @TheIndGroup or become an Independent MP. UK needs him 
Please be patient...please allow us to participate in the EU elections..please do not veto a longer extension.The majority in the UK want to#RevokeArticle50#Remain in the EU &#Reform the UK & EU for a better future TOGETHER.#Brexit is not valid#PeoplesVote 
The UK’s border after a No Deal Brexit 
UK leaving EU on 12th of April ! #Brexit  
I've voted in every election and referendum that I have been eligible for. From now on I will only vote for a party that delivers Brexit or spoil my ballot with 'leave means leave'. I have never felt so ignored as a voter as I do now. 
Parliament is so funny. They rejected no deal, rejected no Brexit, rejected common market, rejected customs union, rejected all May’s deals, rejected Labours deal.  I’m surprised Theresa May hasn’t climbed on the benches and screamed “WHAT DO YOU WANT FROM MEEE” like Tyrese. 
"A new Royal Yacht Britannia would act as a boon to the UK’s international trade and “unite” the country following the bitter divisions of the Brexit debate, a government minister has said." Politics Home.Now that really does make me want to puke. pic.twitter.com/u7LeEPhOVo 
Donald.  Please bear with this country a bit longer. 
ERG Deputy Chairman Steve Baker MP, commenting on the government’s defeat, said:“This must be the final defeat for Theresa May’s Deal.“It’s finished. And we must move on. It has not passed. It will not pass...#StandUp4Brexit 
Apologies for all the nonsense! #StopBrexit#RevokeArticle50 
For fuck's sake just end Brexit and get back to dealing with climate change, homelessness, prejudice, economic inequality and which season of Buffy was best. 
The Brexit charlatans have been defeated again. Time for another referendum to end this shitshow once and for all. 
Theresa May has LOST her Brexit vote. Blackmail, should never succeed, excellent result  xx#GeneralElection 
Her deal is now as dead as the dodoBrexit nearly over - next stop, referendum 
Breaking News: Parliament rejected Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit plan for a third time, just 2 weeks before the April 12 date to leave the EU  
In view of the rejection of the Withdrawal Agreement by the House of Commons, I have decided to call a European Council on 10 April. #Brexit 
Brexiteers reject Brexit on the Brexit day. You can’t make this stuff up 
BREAKING: British Parliament rejects EU divorce deal for a third time, leaving future of Brexit up in the air. 
THERESA May's Brexit deal is officially dead, it is no more, it has expired, it is definitely deceased  Lost by 58 even with all the threats and bribery in the world#BrexitDay  
UK MPs reject PM Theresa May’s EU withdrawal agreement by 344 votes to 286, throwing #Brexit plans into further doubtLatest reaction & developments:  
Jeremy Corbyn voting down Theresa May's Brexit deal for the THIRD time  
Working for an MP on Brexit day. #Bercow @MPsassistant 
Another 2 hours to go until we start and the crowd is already enormous.UKIP: Make Brexit Happen Rally4.30pm speakers start, Whitehall.#MakeBrexitHappen 
.@jeremycorbyn nails it again.. “We need to rebuild our country & invest in our communities ....a botched & half baked Brexit deal would only deepen those problems & divisions” Hear hear #VoteDownTheDeal 
Now she's wittering on about the so-called "national interest", Scotland voted remain. My Nation's interest lies in staying in the #EU I will vote for #Scotland and against her damaging #Brexit 
All Brexiteers! Come to Parliament Square for 4pm to meet our marchers at the end of the #MarchToLeave and come to watch Brexiteer speakers to call for a proper Brexit.  
Corbyn: "This Brexit deal is bad for democracy, bad for the economy, and bad for our country".#BrexitDay 
The Leave Means Leave fishing trawler meets St Paul's Cathedral #Brexit #thisisthenewnormal 
Jeremy Corbyn: "The Labour party will not play roulette with this country's future, especially when the roulette wheel is rigged by the Conservative party"Spot on Jeremy!#VoteDownTheDeal #Brexit #brexitday 
Olly Murs reveals he voted for Brexit because he was told by someone it would make Nando’s loads cheaper - but it later turned out the whole conversation had been a dream  
The bible points to a no-deal Brexit, apparently.  
I challenged a woman outside parliament who was shouting “Theresa May is a traitor! Drag her out by her hair!”Regardless of your views, this rhetoric has no place in our political discourse. #Brexit 
“Zionist! Scum!”. This guy marching for #Brexit outside Westminster has just attacked me with his rants just because I’m a journalist. Creepy and shameful.(I was just silently standing in Westminster openair press area looking at the demo)#antisemitism #Brexitday #MarchToLeave 
“The British people feel anger and a great deal of disappointment towards this House and politicians over Brexit. They expected us to be leaving the EU today... But once again we will see the EU’s will is being imposed on the British people” @patel4witham#StandUp4Brexit 
Brexit analysis from the South of Spain, Cadiz.  
A Loyalist flute band named “Livingston True Blues” has turned up at the Brexit protest outside Britain’s parliament. This particular band pays homage to the UFF (a terrorist group). Here’s their logo: a Confederate flag with the six county colony symbol imposed on it.  
Not Brexit Day! Not Brexit Day! Not!Not! Not!Not! Not! Not!Not! Not! Brexit Day!!! #maidmarian #PeopleVote 
Made me smile ... #Brexit  
This has more backbone than your average Conservative EGR member.#Brexit  
At the salad bar with the boys for lunch. Said it was like Brexit, a choice between Leaf and Romaine. Only Hallam Amos laughed. Bright lad. 
What did you get that special someone in your life to celebrate Not Brexit Day? We got @DominicRaab a billboard on the side of a derelict nightclub in Shipley. 
Still loving @NicolaSturgeon!The only UK politician to come out of Brexit looking stronger  
Anna Soubry: ''I believe Brexit will increase the desire of the Scottish people to break away from the UK and strike out by themselves.'' 
New options (and proposers) revealed for Monday’s round of indicative votes #Brexit  
I want to say thanks and 'hat's off' to Steve Bray (@snb19692) of @SODEMAction who has probably taken more face to face abuse than any other remainer since the referendum.#StopBrexit #HowWillBrexitBenefitMe #TakeBackControlOfBrexit 
Yesterday Mark Francois called Steve Bray (@snb19692) a "twat in a hat" so I thought I better produce a helpful visual guide for anybody still confused about this exciting new development in British politics. #TwatInAHat #Brexit pic.twitter.com/UuOohXPLc6 
Brexit day is here......you've all been conned! Leave/Remain, it didn't matter, YOUR opinion doesn't count, it never did, a referendum is merely a guide to public opinion, just because you turned out vote, doesn't mean your 'opinion' actually counted for anything. MP's ain't shit 
People's Vote 8/8: If a Brexit referendum decided without the votes of the people most affected was good, then a referendum with 1.5 million newly-eligible voters is better. 
What are we going to do? Fuck knows, I'm past caring. it's like Brexit in here. pic.twitter.com/0js5AKdRvo 
“It is quite clear from all of those who have communicated with me, talked to me and sent me emails, that there is a very big majority against accepting this agreement... This is not an agreement that the UK, should, in any circumstances, sign up to” @johnredwood#StandUp4Brexit 
“Only discussing the withdrawal agreement because the government was taken to court by a private citizen” Labour MP Jess Phillips tells Tory Culture Secretary Jeremy Wright #Brexit#politicslive  
In 2016 people voted to take back control - but 3 years later, power is still concentrated in the Westminster bubble. Great to talk about the need for citizens' assemblies & democratic renewal on #BBCR4today.Find out what #Brexit voters have been telling me via @DearLeavers. 
On #BrexitDay let us never forget why we voted #Leave.We voted to take back control. We voted to become a proud, sovereign nation state. We voted to be a free trading, innovating country rekindling old alliances and forging new friendships.The fight for #Brexit goes on...  
As @theresa_may fails time and again to hold her fractured party together in desperately selfish endeavours ,the rest of us continue to pay the price. It is unthinkable for Labour MP's to be the midwife of a hard Brexit, do not let people down now, do not bow to tory blackmail.  
We are marching on Parliament to tell them we will not be betrayed. Brexit must be delivered, otherwise democracy is now meaningless. #MarchToLeave 
On the night of the referendum result I was waiting with Toby to go on ITV. It looked like Leave would lose narrowly. Toby told me that this wouldn’t be the end of it. He told me of plans to press on, call for another referendum and use the loss as a springboard for leaving.  
Theresa May promised that Brexit would not be delayed 108 TIMES. Here we are. No Brexit. 
"We're not like the other politicians!" says new leader of the pro-EU breakaways @heidiallen75, she:‣ Lied about respecting referendum result‣ Broke Brexit manifesto commitments ‣ Refuses to call a by-electionSounds like a typical politician to me! 
Illegal bribes from a duplicitous Prime Minister who will immediately be replaced by an ERG PM who will use Brexit to destroy the NHS and the Welfare State. 
To those asking how I'll vote today: Hell would freeze over before I'd vote for this blindfold Tory Brexit that'd leave our future in the hands of Boris Johnson & Jacob Rees-Mogg to finish off the job that Thatcher started of privatising our economy & slashing workers’ rights. 
“The most amazing thing in British politics right now is the steadfastness of Brexit voters. For three years the elites have insulted us and whipped up fear about No Deal and still we’re not budging. That’s how devoted we are to democracy.”Brendan O’Neill on @Dunphy_Official 
I think I have watched too much #Brexit Parliament TV in recent weeks. My 19 month old is running around the house yelling "Order" and says Nein to everything. 
Speaking to a work colleague she said "I don't agree with #Brexit but now we have started we had better finish". "If a rat was gnawing your arm off would you let it finish"? I replied.#BrexitDay #BrexitShambles 
Liam Fox in 2017: "Believe me, we'll have up to 40 ready for one second after midnight in March 2019..."You were saying, Liam? 
Just to break up all the Brexit relentlessness here’s a picture of when I faceswapped with my dog. You’re welcome.  
On what would have been #BrexitDay, here’s a poem called ‘57 Varieties of Brexit’, all of which have been rejected by parliament.  
Dear Leavers, We've honoured the advisory referendum result for 31 months. Unfortunately your advice has proven to be rubbish. Any normal business would have binned the advice and sacked the advisers a long time ago. #PeoplesVote #RevokeArticle50 #Brexit 
MOST Brexit voters I know only ever grumbled about the EU occasionallyThe Referendum win sent them a bit mad and they embraced a #NoDealNow the whole thing has come crashing down they'll be quite happy to go back to grumbling about the EU occasionally#BrexitDay  
Voting for a deal you know will damage the country simply so you get another shot at becoming Prime Minister. Hard to think of a less principled stance on the #Brexit chaos you helped create. You are an utterly shameless charlatan who is unfit to hold office.  
People's Vote 1/8: If one Brexit referendum was good, two are better. 
Former President Mary McAleese says #brexit is the political version of Necrotising Fasciitis ( flesh eating bacteria) which has rendered the word “meaningful” meaningless  She was speaking at DCU Brexit Institute. #rtenews #rtepolitics pic.twitter.com/Bmk9MjE8YW 
Every week, our researchers work tirelessly to inform MPs with factual, impartial information. Thank you to the Speaker of @HouseofCommons for recognising @woodstockjag and Vaughne Miller for their excellent #Brexit research.You too can read our work at  
Listen to Adam Boulton after signing off not realising his microphone is still live... 
So my partner has just been made redundant by a big 6 energy company, the only reason given was brexit. Didn’t realise it was a scape goat for everyone, not just May. 
If you’re a Brexiteer protesting outside Parliament today, PLEASE don’t shout abuse or turn to violence. We have the ballot box and we WILL deliver Brexit through democratic means. We don’t throw things or set fire to cars or attack the police. We’re not French, FFS. 
Just a little librarian humor for the Brits. #Kafka #Brexit  
BREAKING:  Just had an email from the school.LOCAL COUNCIL HAS ADVISED POSSIBLE EU POLLING DAY ON 23 MAY 
Lord King, who served as Bank of England Governor for a decade: - My preference is still No Deal Brexit - Jobs won’t be lost- Political class have lost confidence in country  
They told us the referendum was a once in a lifetime decision. They said they would respect the result. They said we would leave the EU today - including the customs union and single market.They lied. We will never forgive them. 
My comment after Mr Speaker admonished Tories shouting me down as I intervened to say today all about solving Tory political problems & ushering in an unelected ultra right wing Tory PM to negotiate a free trade agreement with no workers rights #Brexit  
10 DUP members have Tories on a string, get to decide Scotland’s future, and have a veto on Brexit outcomes. Yet 35 SNP who represent 62% of Scots are ignored, jeered and told to go home? This can’t go on.  
Huge shots fired by @mrjamesob on @LBC just now as he lays the responsibility of Brexit squarely at the feet of the media being anywhere from dishonest to irresponsible.  Hard to disagree. 
I just joined the Liberal Democrats to demand an exit from a damaging and divisive Tory #Brexit #PutitothePeople- join me here:  via @LibDems 
Remainers, want to know what it feels like today? Imagine if you had won the Referendum 52% to 48%, an overwhelming majority of MPs were then elected on a platform of staying in the EU, but they changed their minds, ignored the Referendum result and voted to take us out anyway. 
REFERENDUMAccording to HoC(House of Commons) briefing note 07212 from 2015, the referendum was designed to be a pre-vote, with any withdrawal agreement going back for a people's voteConvenient how they have forgotten that!Section 5 explains it.... 
is anyone else totally and utterly bored by brexit chat at this point 
I couldn't keep updating my own Brexit flowchart, so I talked to the guy that made 27 versions instead #brexitday 
Just keep this one at the back of your minds. Every single one of them and many others couldn’t look at themselves shaving in the mirror. They genuinely think we are an underclass. #brexit #nodealnoproblem 
Happy Brexit day! £350 million a week to the #NHS? My friend is handing over her NHS badge today & being decommissioned. After 27 years of working in the NHS she now works for Virgin. School nurse and Health Visiting services have been privatised. #BrexitDay 
Letter in The Times today from 4 British Parliamentary observers of October 2017 Catalan referendum disputing Spanish narrative of violent protests that day against Spanish police  
Patrick Harvie: Disrespect shown to Scotland over Brexit is enough reason to push for independence  
Look at the language Alastair Campbell uses:"rightwing""populist""anti-progressive"He's a SPIN DOCTOR.Brexit isn't "rightwing"It's MAINSTREAM. Joe Bloggs voted for Brexit. This language is a manipulative device, nothing more. Do not be shamed into silence by it...  
At the next General Election we mustn’t forget the broken manifesto promises and the shattered referendum commitments to respect our vote by our political class.   
"YOU, the British People, will decide"We decided. We voted to Leave the EU.We voted for freedom, sovereignty and liberty.Brexit must be delivered. 
Brexiteers who don’t watch the news waiting for Brexit to happen today.  
I've been protesting peacefully to #StopBrexit outside parliament every day that parliament sits since Sept 2017 (today incl).As today is #notBrexitDay, the streets of Westminster are peopled by angry Leavers.We have all been lied to about the Brexit fantasy project.Stay safe.  
The media establishment try their utmost to block UKIP from coverage, but that won't happen today.UKIP: Make Brexit Happen Rally, 4pm, WhitehallLet's #MakeBrexitHappen 
Gina Miller nails it:May's deal is a no deal #brexit for 85% of our economy. services. #RevokeArticle50 
Don’t take my word for it. Here’s Theresa May explaining why Theresa May is wrong to split up her own botched Brexit deal.Time to bury her dead deal and move onto a sensible Brexit solution. 
There was no plan. There is no plan. May's reputation had dropped below that of even Chris Grayling. Brexit must be stopped.#RevokeArticle50#peoplesvote pic.twitter.com/qlHVCsc3s4 
GCSE History Question in 2050: “What was the point of Brexit? Discuss” (25 Marks) 
BBC putting on heavy Brexiteers this morning. Working with Number 10 to try to push Mrs May’s dirty deception through. Mervyn King is a Brexit denier, says people don’t care about the economic consequences of Brexit, aided and abetted by John Humphrys. Shameful. #FBPE 
This is like Easter, Western Brexit is on 12 April and Orthodox Brexit is on 22 May. 
Sorry, we tried to deliver your #Brexit#BrexitDay 
I voted against Brexit in January because it is a historic mistake. I voted against it on the 12th March for the same reason. "Nothing has changed," so I will vote against it again today.The sooner we stop #Brexit, the faster we can begin radically fixing this country.  
Happy NO Brexit Day y'all!  
It's a beautiful day in Parliament Square this morning. Get your train tickets, start your car, it's time to rally for Brexit at 4pm today. #MarchToLeave 
Brilliant this, watch as Bruges Group director, Robert - look into my eyes- Oulds, more used to addressing the swivel-eyed-loons that attend Bruges Group meetings, as he is taken to task by @JMPSimor for simply making up false claim after false claim..."You've just made that up!" 
“In Cabinet I am picking up complete and utter despair: ‘..it’s like the living dead in here. Theresa May is the sole architect of this mess. It is her inability to engage in the most basic human interactions that brought us here’.” #StandUp4Brexit #BBCQT 
Ah @Conservatives look what you have become.  The thing you wanted to stop. UKIP. 
Happy Brexit Day to one and all  
2 wasted years since #Article50 was triggered. And at what cost!£5 billion blown on No Deal preparationsInternational reputation trashedCountry dividedNHS, schools, policing neglectedAnd all because 4 years ago David Cameron needed a referendum to 'unite' the Tories. 
Happy #BrexitDay! Well done to our gal on the inside for showing what an absolute disaster the whole idea of Brexit is  
.Happy #Brexit day .... It's not my fault our parliament have failed us.A day to remember the biggest political betrayal our great land has ever seen.  #BrexitDay 
As a howling right wing mob assembles outside Parliament (one @theSNP MP has already been racially abused) Liam Fox & John Humphries have a cosy chat on @BBCr4today about MPs betraying the will of the people. Scotland are you watching this? #Brexit 
My sister hates politics. She voted to Leave as her partner did. She has never signed a petition. BUT, she has signed this! Don't assume, ask everyone you know how they feel about Brexit now & ask them to sign!#BrexitDay 
Going into Parliament today to vote against Theresa May's #Brexit deal for the third time in three months.  
Is this a teaser ad for UKIP’s first gay kiss?#SpongeBobsInLove#RemainDay 
The EU is an empire. It rewards compliance with handouts and punishes dissenters like Greece, Italy and now Brexit Britain. Exit has to be made extremely difficult to prevent peripheral countries negotiating better termsWolfgang Streeck on the EU empire 
This was meant to be #Brexit day Reasons to (try to be) cheerful: - we’ve not left yet - majority want a #PeoplesVote- more MPs supported public vote than any other option - there’s growing understanding that UK needs massive democratic & economic reform- we can do it 
Meaningful Vote 3 Projection:For: 266 (+24)Against: 368 (-23)DEFEAT by 102 Votes (-47)#Brexit #MeaningfulVote #WithdrawalAgreement 
Best #brexit meme I've seen in a while.  
Good morning! Has Father Brexit been? Did he leave racism, food shortages and no medicine out for all the man-childs? Aww, look at their little bright red faces. 
To celebrate #RemainDay, here’s a photo of a broken unicorn cake I’ve just received from Tesco Groceries. 
I woke up at 4am with a warm glowing feeling. Today is not #BrexitDay. A wonderful (temporary) relief.Be kind to people who desperately wanted change, thinking their Brexit vote would give them a better NHS, better life. Don't pick a fight today, stay safe, sign the petition!  
New Royal Yacht Britannia would ‘unite’ the country after Brexit, says minister  
“The (British people) see that they have been let down by politicians who promised to deliver Brexit, promised that Brexit means Brexit and have failed to deliver that. And that I think is an enormous disappointment across the country” @Jacob_Rees_Mogg#StandUp4Brexit 
On Brexit Day it’s worthwhile remembering exactly who did and didn’t vote back in 2016. We should be able to change our minds just like Parliament is able too. #BrexitDay #PeoplesVote 
“This is a deal a nation signs only after having been defeated at war. This is not a deal that is fit for purpose for a sovereign country.“You are ceding control of whether you are going to get out of an international Treaty to a foreign power” @yanisvaroufakis#BBCQT 
Today should be the day that we leave the EU. RETWEET if you don't want to see further delay to Brexit!  
 It is increasingly likely that the UK will leave the EU without a deal on 13 April (00h00).Take action and prepare your business: #Prepare4Brexit #Brexit  
On Brexit day, I’d like to pay tribute to Steve Baker, Mark Francois, Peter Bone and the other titans of the ERG, especially @BorisJohnson. Without them, we would be leaving the EU today.  Now there’s a good chance of a long delay, a much softer exit or perhaps no Brexit at all. 
Dear Brexiters,The reason #BrexitDay is not #brexitday today is because you guys couldn't decide amongst yourselves what Brexit actually means. We Remainers had no such problem. We just wanted to remain.Regards,Tom 
On the front of today’s @TheScotsman:I wrote about what it’s been like following #Brexit for the past three years as an EU citizen 
‘This is a deal that a nation signs only after having been defeated at war’Economist Yanis Varoufakis doesn't mince his words does he.  So much for May's red, white and blue brexit then.#BBCQTpic.twitter.com/a5PgeY2NGT 
Is it Brexit day?#BrexitDay 
Against the backdrop of brexit, heartening to see QI leaders from north and south in Ireland choosing to have a joint stand and celebrating their shared mission #Quality2019 
On Brexit day, children like to play tricks on grown ups by taking societal issues caused by domestic policy and blaming them on the EU. #BrexitDay #BrexitDayTraditions 
My inbox is full of messages from eminent lawyers that Mrs May’s Brexit motion today, which asks the House of Commons to vote us out of the EU with no plans whatever beyond 21 months, is not legalThe job of the prime minister is to obey the law not to subvert it 
EYLES: Populist parties are set to fill the political void in a post-Brexit world. The Tories and Labour have become unrecognisable and will pay a heavy price for what many see as treachery. #csm #brexit @Drystonesonnet 
To anyone suggesting that Brexit has failed because of Remain supporters...Here's a newsflash for you. It would have failed even with the full-throated support of 98% of the country; because it's a fantasy. Brexiters can't agree, because they all want different things. 
From Inside the American Embassy; Channel 4. Filmed roughly Nov '17-Jan '18US Embassy staff discussing Brexit. They know that Brexit is a disaster and that the UK Govt isn't telling the public that 52% voted for something likely to be "very very bad". 
Not exactly sure who is responsible for this but it’s brilliant. #Brexit  
Jacob Rees-Mogg avoided a question about his principles by saying "other people will describe me as they see fit"Ok: You are a callous devious soulless tax avoidant money hoarder. Your shrill push for hard Brexit is evil. You look like Hitler & Milo Yiannopoulos spawned you  
it's March 29th!!! HAPPY INDEPENDENCE DAY!!!! of course, in the UK every day is Independence Day, on account of the fact we're already an independent sovereign country, inside the EU one could almost argue that Brexit has been a complete fucking waste of time. 
87% of British Jews believe Labour Party leader Jeremy Corbyn is an antisemite.Eighty. Seven. Percent. 
Yanis Varoufakis makes uk politicians look just what they are... career simpletons on a massive gravy train. Shame he isn’t negotiating Brexit! @bbcqt 
Brexit is built on a pack of lies. When even former Sun editors are pointing that out, it’s time to #StopBrexit. 
"Brexit is an English problem, not a Scottish or an Irish problem." Well said Yanis Varoufakis.  #bbcqt 
YANIS VAROUFAKIS ‘Brexit is an English issue, not Scottish or Northern Irish... you need to sort out the constitutional issues in the UK before any further referendum.’ 
‘Twas the night before Brexit, when all through the HouseNot a creature was stirring, not even a mouse.The journalist asked was a resolution near?“Fuck knows. I’m past caring. It’s like the living dead in here.” 
Yanis Varoufakis just hit the nail on the head on Question Time. Brexit is not the issue. It's the UK's broken business model based on low wages, low productivity and constant current account deficit that is the real problem. Britain, the cheap labour, cheap n nasty economy. 
“What’s actually happened is that the inherent dishonesty of Brexit has come home to roost.” Former editor of the Sun @davidyelland says it's "impossible for this country to leave without doing irreparable damage to the economy and to our children’s generation”#newsnight 
‘This is a deal that a nation signs only after having been defeated at war’Economist Yanis Varoufakis doesn't mince his words does he.  So much for May's red, white and blue brexit then.#BBCQT 
 Emily Maitlis to Mogg - "You are a slave already, you take your whip from the DUP. You're following them to see what you do next" #Brexit  
The Tories defending literally everything they have done related to Brexit  
"If it's undeliverable, why on Earth did we have a referendum?"After 3 years Suzanne Evans has finally grasped the problem!  #Newsnight 
I think the “oh god...” from Emily Maitlis pretty much sums this up. Having said that, it’s the best Brexit analysis I’ve heard in ages.  
“The Prime Minister’s deal is not Brexit. She said ‘Brexit means Brexit’, but it also means that it satisfies the sovereignty question, it satisfies the control over laws question and the constitutional status of NI question. It doesn’t satisfy any of those” @BillCashMP 
Genuinely love this.....too funny!!  #Newsnight #Brexit  
‘This is a deal that a nation signs only after having been defeated at war’Economist @yanisvaroufakis criticises Theresa May on Brexit. #bbcqt 
My brexit spirit animal #newsnight #BrexitShambles 
At Brexit protest outside UK Parliament ⁦@labourleave⁩ #respectdemocracy#respectarticle50 
WATCH | "This is not Brexit. It's as simple as that. The prime minister's deal is not Brexit."Safe to assume which way @BillCashMP is voting tomorrow afternoon... Support us at  
#Brexit in the medium of football:  
So @jeremycorbyn voted in favour of the customs union proposal *and* the second referendum proposal, which is more than we can say for @ChukaUmunna, @annasoubrymp, @OwenSmith_MP, @vincecable... funny old world.  
“Laugh now, but one day no-one will be in charge” - made by #Banksy 10 years ago, on show again at @bristolmuseum for #BrexitDay #Brexit  
Been feeling a little stressed today with all this Brexit shite. So thought I’d take a brief interlude with a photo of my cat fluffy. Enjoy  pic.twitter.com/AkMrYmO27l 
She's covered Brexit 24/7 for 3 years and it's finally starting to show ? 
"I want to see a Europe & a country that works for the many... standing shoulder to shoulder with our European comrades, fighting down the far-right & fighting down the bankers & ppl who caused the mess in the 1st place" - @labourlewis at the left bloc last Sat. #StopBrexit #GTTO 
There seems to be some confusion about why @theSNP MPs abstained on #Boles & #Clarke amendments last night but it’s really very straightforward so here’s a thread explaining why #Brexit #IndicativeVotes 
“The WA isn’t about withdrawal, it's about a prolonged period of staying with all our existing arrangements, without (a place at the table). It puts the UK into an extremely weak position to negotiate the future partnership, and it breaks the Conservative manifesto” @johnredwood 
I have thought highly of @Anna_Soubry ever since she stood up and confronted the PM on her stubborn #Brexit position! This is absolutely brilliant – really well said! #PeoplesVote 
Please, Linehan.. Riley.. leave charities alone to do their important work, and stop trying to bully them with your thousands of followers and your toxic political agenda.#BoycottRachelRiley#Boycottgraham 
If you’ve seen our disturbing film about the suffering caused by the caging of animals you might want to sign this petition - it’s already gaining lots of signatures. Wherever Brexit leads us is mustn’t lead us to drop standards of animal welfare  
Brexit may end up being a waste of everyone's time - CNNHope so  
We don´t want a soft Brexit, we don´t want any Brexit at all.  We want to #Remain in the EU with the best deal of all :  the one we have now.  #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 
We the Sovereign people hereby solemnly pledge:Never again to vote for any MP who takes any action that might prevent us from leaving the EUOur settled decision to leave was made at the EU Referendum & it must be honoured.RT & like to show your commitment to this pledge 
Cameron clearly stating that a vote to leave would mean we’d be out after two years and be trading on WTO terms, what’s since been called ‘hard Brexit’. It’s what was meant by Brexit.  
Tomorrow, Theresa May will attempt put her rotten deal back to parliament. If it passes, it will be a blank cheque for the Tories to scrap workers' rights, deregulate the economy and attack our communities. The whole Labour movement must unite against it.#VoteNo29March 
Escher´s Brexit.  Perfect.  
Live scenes as the UK tries to figure out what’s going on with Brexit:  
#indyref2 tomorrow  How do you vote The question is.....Do you want Scotland to be an independent country?#Please #RT thanks.#Leadership #Scotland #Brexit #uk #UnitedKingdom #independence #theresaMay #Westminster #EU #Referendum #Poll #YES #nationYour answer is..... 
John no responsible government would lead the country to any Brexit given what we now know and certainly not without checking if people still want to proceed.  
Here's Chuka Umunna saying that a Customs Union compromise Brexit must be taken forward by parliament.Then him and his fellow #Tinge squatter MPs voted AGAINST both of the compromise Customs Union proposals.An absolute snake of a man. 
Now that Theresa May is threatening to call a General Election if she doesn't get the Withdrawal half of her proposals through Parliament tomorrow, any Labour MP who votes in favour of her "Blindfold Brexit" needs deselection. 
Just when you think this Govt. has hit rock bottom, they find new depths to plumb. Their attempt to get a blank-cheque Brexit past the Commons tomorrow- only for Johnson, Raab, Gove or some other chancer to write the price in later for Britain - is transparent, and doomed. 
Are the MILIONS marching peacefuly every year (since 2010) in #Catalonia for their RIGHT TO VOTE IN A BINDING#Referendum (possibly one without violence by #Spain's para-military police or stealing of ballot boxes full of votes) NOT European Mr @eucopresident @donaldtusk Sir? 
English MPs can only stand and look on in awe. @Nigel_Farage this is what a true states and and a true MEP looks like. Not an over privileged, small minded bigot driven by self-interest and hate. #brexit #RevokeA50Now #KeepTheLightsOn @eucopresident this is how many of us feel 
Pro-Brexit group really regrets holding second referendum poll  via @MetroUK 
I don’t think this homage to Escher can be bettered as a description of Brexit. Bravo Bob!  
Inconvenient truth...“The link between the Withdrawal Agreement and Political Declaration means that the commitments of one cannot be banked without the commitments of the other” @theresa_may - 14th January 2019#StandUp4Brexit 
British MP Kenneth Clarke served in David Cameron’s cabinet. He tells me today that calling for a Brexit referendum was “the worst decision David made.”“I was furious that he called it.”“He set off a chain of events which has been disastrous for the working of our democracy.”  
Any Labour MP who votes for Theresa May's Brexit deal tomorrow will be voting against a General Election and the prospect of a Labour government.  
All based on lies  an advisory, criminal referendum with links to dark money and people advocating white supremacy. We don't want #Brexit. This is a coup 
A huge leap in the dark. So the Prime Minister, who said on Brexit nothing is agreed until everything is agreed, is now asking MPs to vote for the UK to leave the EU with no idea what next. No responsible government would lead our country into a blindfold Brexit. 
When my mum says ‘shall we get a Dominos?’ #brexit #bercow #order 
Worth reading this clearly argued  thread from @Keir_Starmer Any MP who votes for this nonsense tomorrow really does not care for the future of this country. And is probably handing real control of Brexit to Boris Johnson.  
‘I remember it well. They died on hospital trolleys. They died broken, in their own homes, with bare cupboards. The homeless froze, and hungry children ate from bins’. ‘Brexit was awful’, he whispered back. ‘This was before brexit’, I replied, ‘this was Tory Britain’ #futureme 
Dear Members of ParliamentThere are two options1. #Brexit #BrexitMeansBrexit 2. #Remain #RevokeArticle50 So pick a side - But remember -If you plan to stand at the next General Election you WILL be held accountable #ABTV 
"When @David_Cameron announced the EU Referendum, it was for show only, Leave was never supposed to win. Unfortunately, the working class were too busy watching X Factor or training their kestrels to pay attention," writes Godfrey Elfwick 
Anybody else feel queasy about this #WithdrawalAgreement thing?I know Tories of old, and I am sure this is some devious method to 1. Get rid of May 2. Put a hard #Brexiteer into her job and drop us out of the EU.If #Labour vote for this, they are complicit in #Brexit#bbcpm 
Graham Linehan decided to try and block funding for a trans charity, now Rachel Riley is messing with a cancer charity..What is up with these maniacs?!Next week, JK Rowling condemns Amnesty International for saying war is bad (blatant pro-Corbyn bias) #BoycottRachelRiley 
Last night Ruth George voted in favour of Article 50 and to support another referendum, despite previously saying that would be a “betrayal”. Take a closer look at her voting record.  
My Brexit amendment lost last night, but I won’t give up fighting for a Final Say | The Independent  
Hi @jarrowstevemp we’ve been chatting to your constituents.60% of people in Jarrow want a #PeoplesVote Please, give the people what they want! 
"...it is only those like me, who will vote against this decision to cancel leaving the EU on 29 March, who are truly representing what the British people decided in the referendum. We are the real majority in this House". Well said, @bernardjenkin If you agree, please RT. 
Brexit by Bansky. #BrexitChaos 
You see, this fucks me off no end.  Brexit = austerity ++.  If you think it's bad now it's gonna be fucking Victorian for millions of kids very soon.  You can not be against austerity and FOR brexit.  It's utter madness.  #FBPE 
Brexit is also short for Bret Michaels has exited the stage. 
Just received my first piece of propaganda from @Conservatives for the election in May. Going right back to you spivs & bandits in pieces in an envelope with no stamp on it. I won't be voting for any party that favours brexit - in any election. Local, national or EU. 
BREAKINGTransport Secretary Chris Grayling announces plans to build the all new new Austin Brexit, and shows the first concept car to emerge from a £500 million investment in British car design.  
Wag1 for Brexit still flopping ? 
Blackadder Does Brexit...…….."Talking tactics"@pitchblacksteed #Blackadder #BBC #Comedy 
Heavens. We’ve just had an email at work from someone in...Afghanistan - saying ‘hope all is ok there in UK with Brexit, wishing u luck’.! 
Many of those who still want Britain to Remain claim that nobody was told during the referendum that we could end up leaving under WTO rules.Not true!  
We call these the Teresa May's Deal Donuts. They're a bit stale, nobody really wants them but I keep bringing them out. If they all get eaten I've promised to resign and the other half, who struggles to heat up pizza, will take over all culinary duties. #Brexit #MaysDeal 
Lord Adonis - You're dead in the Labour Party if you vote for a Conservative #brexit deal which is going to trash the economy... brexit is essentially being imploding & as it implodes the attractiveness of staying in the #EU gets brighter & brighter.#PeoplesVote @Andrew_Adonis 
I don't know who did this, but it's quite accurate. #kafkaesque #brexit #strangethanfiction 
Legally, the referendum was advisory.How do I know this? Firstly, because it says so in this HoC briefing paper and, secondly - if it were binding - the result would have been quashed by the courts because of the industrial-scale cheating that occurred on the Leave side.  
.@UKLabour's approach all along has been to respect the referendum; to get a good deal through the House; avoid no deal & disastrous Tory deal. Govt have failed & underneath all the noise is a story of pain & suffering caused by a decade of austerity & neo-liberalism. Time's up! pic.twitter.com/gR3EMEN968 
The ERG are not only a minority in the House of Commons, but a minority in the country. Most people don't want the extreme Brexit they are advocating, and in fact most polls now show they back Remain. #politicslive pic.twitter.com/yQ24scLnll 
To get past this Brexit impasse we must look at the results from yesterday - a People's Vote has the greatest level of support and a majority of the British people now want this option  
Latvian monthly magazine @ZurnalsKlubs describes the Catalan independence fight after the independence referendum and reveals increasing Spanish repression against Catalans. #ThisIsTheRealSpain #EspañaGlobal 
Brexit is like trying to wank off Sting. 
"The best way forward is not to proceed with Brexit."  
Happy Brexit Day for tomorrow everybody... via @YouTube 
Knew he is still fighting World War 2... Didn't know he's a Hobbit. 
Brexit supporters put the Union Jack up outside Parliament today by getting up at 6am. RT if you are proud of our flag! 
Scottish Labour MEP calls Nicola Sturgeon's handling of Brexit 'top drawer' David Martin also admitted he is no longer sure if it is “worth” fighting to keep Scotland in the UK. 
“No deal remains the legal default option from us triggering A50 2yrs ago, by an overwhelming majority. That says: ‘If we do not leave with a deal we'll be leaving without a deal’. So, that's the one positive decision that Parliament has made in the Brexit process” John Baron  
Paul Drechsler -"We've jumped out of an aeroplane, clocks ticking, there's a parachute and only one rip-cord, and that's Article 50" #Brexit  
I see what the problem is with Mark Francois now.Napoleon complex. 
The Silly Isles - brutal ⁦@TheEconomist⁩ cover, but one that echoes much of the “national humiliation” coverage of #Brexit from this side of the Atlantic  
Any Labour MP who votes for May's deal in MV3 tomorrow is ushering in a new right wing Tory Prime Minister who will rip up the political declaration and negotiate a hard free-market #Brexit in Phase 2 that will destroy workers rights and manufacturing industry in the North East. 
 @NicolaSturgeon: "Theresa May must be the only leader in history who has tried to fall on her own sword... and missed!" Just in case you were wondering what the response in Scotland is at #FMQs to the current Brexit shambles.  
This is why we've been betrayed  RETWEET this video if you are one of the 17.4 million who voted to LEAVE! #Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
I'm now so obsessed with Bercow saying "Mr Peter Bone" that I've spent a period of time setting it to the opening of Beethoven's 5th. Brexit is literally driving me mad.  
UK: How the MPs voted on the different Brexit options in the indicative votes. #BrexitSource: Parliament Data / IfG  
Cancelling Brexit would be a total and utter betrayal of the majority Brits who voted for Brexit. MPs must deliver a WTO Brexit.  
"Leave a light on so that we can find our way home" ICYMI: Scottish MEP @AlynSmith gave a impassioned speech at the European Parliament (via @tictoc)Read the latest on @Brexit as the negotiations continue   
2020 will be a referendum on humanity.  
In 2016, Sheffield South East voted by 66.32% to #Leave the #EU.Last night Labour's Clive Betts voted to revoke Art.50 and cancel #Brexit. If you voted Leave in his constituency, you don't matter. Your voice is irrelevant.   @clivebettsmp  
I voted for a referendum on Brexit and for revoking Article 50 to prevent us leaving the EU without a deal. The referendum motion voted on last night was only 28 votes short of winning! The only way to sort out this mess is to take Brexit back to the people! 
After May’s deal was defeated twice, the Tories voted down every other sensible option presented - Labour supported them all.But yeah, it’s Labour that are “playing politics” over Brexit....  
A few thoughts on how EU27 should now look at Brexit:EU would be stronger if UK remained, not weaker. It would be a historic mistake to listen to those who put more weight on the short-term difficulties to re-integrate UK than on the long-term benefits of a united Europe. 1/5 
“We wanted to get a deal, a deal that worked for the whole United Kingdom, a deal that worked for Northern Ireland. But now we’re in a situation where we cannot sign up to the Withdrawal Agreement and it’s all because the Prime Minister decided to go for that backstop” @DUPleader 
THIS And almost any post by Corbyn, a socialist MP or commentator about poverty, homelessness, racism, climate crisis etc. etc. and even ones in support/memory of sick or deceased comrades is met with a flurry of 'what about Brexit?' comments. Shameful + sickening   
Swivel-eyed-loon, Mark Francois, once again confirming the need for all prospective members of parliament to be required to pass a basic intelligence test.... 
Last Saturday, 1 million people from every corner of the UK came to London to march on Parliament with one demand: that the Gov's Brexit deal is put to the people in a #PeoplesVote.It's clear that a #PeoplesVote is the only way forward. Please RT: 
Bit of #Brexit #banter from ol Joe 
The Post-Brexit Tory Doom  
Lots of chat about #CustomsUnion at the moment. It’s the worst of all worlds meaning no chance of international trade deals & is no #Brexit. #Turkey experience is a case in point. Just wish fellow MPs would take the time to understand its realities. 
“Our unofficial motto would be Kipling’s: ‘If you can keep your head when all about you are losing theirs and blaming it on you...’ This deal isn’t going to go through because there are too many MPs who’ve read it, realise it doesn’t represent Brexit, and will never vote for it”  
WATCH: Margaret Beckett on #r4Today - the Beckett amendment got more votes in support than any other option last night. It's clear that Brexit needs to go back to the people. Please RT:  
Ask the EU again for legally binding changes to the backstop, or use the next fortnight to prepare for no-deal - ex-#Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab sets out his preferred way forward 
Fascinating how many MP's are suddenly taking to Twitter trying to explain their voting intentions regarding #Brexit ..... it's almost as if they've suddenly realised the public might genuinely vote them out of their well paid, perk filled jobs at the next General Election.   
The EU isn't working, and it's not progressive, it's a reactionary, market fundamentalist project that is being rejected by the working class across Europe. Guardian's Larry Elliott at #LeftBrexitTour @tfbrexit #brexit  
Yesterday, the Port of Calais told us it was ready for a no-deal Brexit This morning, Eurotunnel have also told us they too are confident that things will run smoothly in a no-deal Between them they carry 14,000 lorries across the Channel each day 
This also happened to me @manairport Security forced me to remove the 12 #bollockstobrexit stickers from my suitcase.I argued with them for 20 mins that they were violating my Freedom of Expression but I was worried I would miss my flight so complied. 
While Theresa is looking to resign, Corbyn is still standing strong #Brexit #BrexitChaos 
Former Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab "I think this is a time for pragmatism and realism... If they [the EU] still don't move, I think we should have sensible conversations over the two weeks we've got left, around the suite of no-deal arrangements that can be made..." 
Noni has a very special announcement @DermotTodayFM @DaveTodayFM #BREXIT  
While Parliament votes on 8 different types of Brexit 17.4 million leave voters are still arguing about which one they voted for nearly 3 years ago.That's about 2.1m for each version, outnumbered by about 8 to 1 by 16.1m Remain voters.Funny old world eh?  #willofthepeople 
With great pleasure, I have this morning signed the cancellation of Brexit on the 29th March. The new dates are 12th April or 22nd May. Perhaps, even those dates may slip or disappear, if the Withdrawal Agreement is not passed by the Commons & we #Revoke, #Referendum, #Remain! 
The Brexiters blame Remainers. They blame the civil service. They blame the EU27. They blame so-called "elites".They blame everyone but themselves: the very people who cooked up Brexit, sold it as all things to all people, and now cry betrayal when reality intervenes.  
“@Jacob_Rees_Mogg has said repeatedly he won’t vote for the deal if the DUP don't. @SteveBakerHW, the Deputy Chairman, he's not voting for it. And I'm the Vice Chairman and I'm not voting for it. So the officers of the ERG are solid. We're not voting for the deal” Mark Francois 
With our government unable to make up its mind, we stand undivided in support of a People's Vote. RT this video if you're with us (or just love fluffy EU supporting dogs on marches) 
BREXIT: Let's Help - Tusk says EU must support ‘increasing majority’ of anti-Brexit Brits /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Whilst the entire country is consumed with nothing but Brexit the number of children in absolute poverty has hit 3.7 million after increases of 200,000 in a year. We have lost all perspective  
We are in the midst of a national crisis. And it has absolutely nothing to do with our relationship with the EUWhatever happens with Brexit, without a socialist government in power, wages will continue to fall, inequality will continue to rise and lives will continue to be lost  
Here's how inflation rose after the 2016 referendum and earnings did not respond. That's why 2017-18 saw zero real income growth. Compounded by benefits' freeze which hit harder as inflation rose.  
Perhaps Europhobic #markfrancois should read this again. A beautiful letter from an RAF officer in #WW2, written just before the #brexit referendum. ‘If the nation should fall for this deceit I can only conclude the lives of my comrades were lost in vain.’ He died last year.  
While Westminster is bickering over Brexit, people are struggling to put food on the table.This programme spent a week in the seaside town of Rhyl talking to the people living on the breadline.  
Remember when they said the Irish Govt would compromise? Remember when they said the DUP would compromise? If #Brexit has taught us anything, it is how few people beyond this island understand the politics of Ireland and Northern Ireland. 
Last night MPs were asked for our views on Brexit. There’s lots of talk on here about betrayal including from colleagues. I wish they would stop. Most of us are trying in good faith to resolve a mess created by a small group of people which has become a national crisis 
The ONLY reason that we suffer political chaos is that we have a REMAIN Parliament refusing to endorse a LEAVE Referendum. It is just that simple. The politicians think we will lie down ands accept it. I say stand up, fellow patriots, and say ENOUGH. 
“Brexit-supporting MPs should hold their nerve and be prepared to see if the Remainers in Parliament (and government), who are betraying both the country and democracy, are prepared to be judged by the electorate.”  
I love the Brexiteer's reason for not being able to replace the EU flags again tomorrow: "I’ve got a job, I can’t do this all the time like they do."Neatly sums up the difference between Brexit voters and the Remainiacs who've turned standing about protesting into an occupation.  
Full English Brexit.Was: CakeThen: FudgeNow: Eton messSoon: Toast#RevokeArticle50 
Spare a thought for the angry gammons who have gone to all the trouble of buying vol-eu-vents and bunting for tomorrow night's Brexit festivities and are now just going to have to spend the evening spewing out casually racist dogshit on the internet like it's just a normal Friday 
“The British people voted to leave the EU. Let’s just leave.“The deal is a draft international treaty. If we approve it we will bound by it forever in international law” Mark Francois#StandUp4Brexit 
Brexit by Escher, what a gem.  
Last night's votes highlighted that not only is a #PeoplesVote the most popular option in Parliament, but that the decision must return to the people when MPs cannot decide. 
If there was another referendum for Scottish independence, what would you vote #indyref2 #Scotland #indepence 
Haha. Absolutely beautiful  &gt;> Brexit supporters got up at 6am to replace EU flags with 34 Union flags   
The SNP have shown true leadership and a remarkable strength against the Tory government over the last few years, ESPECIALLY @TommySheppard. It was he who stood up and held the Tories to account in Parliament when they tried to cover up the crimes of Brexit. YOU stayed silent. 
"I wouldn't vote for it if they put a shotgun in my mouth," Conservative Mark Francois says he will still vote against the #Brexit withdrawal agreementLive updates:  
Incredible to see the Tories say they won’t appoint a new Minister for Disabled People until Brexit chaos is resolved. They may as well make business cards with the words, “We’ve completely given up even the pretence of governing. PS Disabled voters are worth shit.” 
Of course this great speech by a British MEP will never - unlike Farrage's farragoes of nonsense - get big coverage in the UK, where the BBC follows the tabloid agenda and our navel-gazing-power and insularity has brought us to the catastrophe of #Brexit  
Barnier says the Good Friday agreement, which prevented the return of a hard border between Ireland & Northern Ireland, will continue to apply in all Brexit scenarios. In other words, no hard border, even if No Deal #Brexit.  
Also. Fuck everyone who supports a Brexit that allows the free movement of goods but not that of people. 
"It was really significant in terms of giving us some clues about what might come next" - The Observer's Sonia Sodha on Parliament's #Brexit indicative votes last nightLive updates:  
Last night just 27 Labour MPs stood in the way of securing a #PeoplesVote.These 27 are co-conspirators with @theresa_may in delivering a Tory hard #Brexit. If they succeed, they will never be forgiven. 
Free speech in Europe being eroded by EU . #Article13The burning of books in the 1930s anyone ? Scary shit which ever way you voted on Brexit you should be alarmed.Sleepwalking.#Article13 
Wrong to call it a second referendum. It is a first vote after informed opinion, established facts and reasonable debate rather than lies, propoganda and scurrilous xenophobia. It's the least our children and grandchildren deserve before we leap into the abyss 
27 Labour MPs stopped a people’s vote last night. Anyone who’s still a member of Labour is facilitating Brexit. 
Thank you for marching. Thank you for emailing your MP. Thank you for handing out leaflets, knocking on doors and campaigning for a #PeoplesVote Last night it got more votes in Parliament than any other #brexit option. We can do this!  
A narrative that seems to be completely missing today is that MPs came closer to a consensus in six hours than the government has in three years, even though it worked against them. Both a softer Brexit and a confirmatory referendum would easily pass with its support. #r4today 
To those who "just want it over with". If we do leave the EU, this is just the beginning. Trade negotiations & talks on future political arrangements haven't even begun.Sick of #Brexit? Then campaign to Remain. If not it'll be Brexit Brexit Brexit. For the rest of your life. 
In Calais today where the boss of the port - who has spent €6m preparing for a no-deal - has told us “we should not be afraid of Brexit” because the port is ready "whenever it happens".Story here:  
The behaviour of MPs over #Brexit illustrates perfectly why all politicians need to be directly accountable with their jobs. This crowd of frauds will be accountable at the next election, but the people who run the #EU aren’t accountable to anyone, which is why we voted to leave. 
Last month? LAST month? LAST MONTH?? #LabourAntisemitism 
It’s gone from Project Fear, to Project Apocalypse, and now Project Confusion.MSM is now playing a ”Brexit is so complicated! What is happening?!” narrative.It’s simple:We are supposed to leave the EU at 11pm tomorrow night. That is being betrayed.Whitehall, 4pm, Friday. 
Zac Goldsmith voted for a no deal in Remain voting Richmond..he would definitely lose his seat at a general election. #Brexit pic.twitter.com/PztJoBZAfL 
I love the argument against any new referendum being that 'the trust of the people in Parliament would be lost forever'. Noooo. Imagine if we lost *that* ... 
Two Prime ministers having to resign over their Brexit fiasco, a decade of the worst austerity in generations, a nation utterly divided.. and Boris waiting in the wings to take over.What an absolute clusterfuck of a government this is. 
I assume Brabin, Lavery and De piero will be sacked today? 
Whether you support a 2nd referendum or not is irrelevant, 27 Labour MPs last night voted against it, despite it being official party policy, I'm raging, we have MPs who will enable a tory govt, they hate Mr.Corbyn so much, they'll support May as their voters suffer, bastards. 
‘We should be prepared to trust people to have the final say on #Brexit.’@JustineGreening is in favour of a second referendum and says the people should decide what happens next.  
All people, especially MPs, who support any form of Leave need to answer two questions:1) what real benefits does any Brexit give?2) what is there to respect in the misled result of fraudulent referendum?(Hint - answer to both the same: nothing)#RevokeA50Now 
Some nice, non Brexit news - ‘Spring’ has sprung. Can’t wait to start this at the weekend. #AliSmith 
The one govt announcement in the midst of all this Brexit shit, is  to say cars will be forced to obey the speed limits. Give me strength. 
"Those are my principles, and if you don't like them... well, I have others" #GrouchoMarx #BREXIT  
“The Prime Minister said we will not truly leave the EU unless we regain control of our laws. Under this Withdrawal Agreement the laws are going to be made by 27 other member states over our heads putting us at the mercy of our competitors” @BillCashMP 
“This deal, which sees the PM’s resignation, but only after she’s ensured that her deal gets through... is just not a deal I’ll accept. I will still vote against that deal. I think there are enough of us that will ensure it still doesn’t pass” Anne-Marie Morris#StandUp4Brexit 
Serial liar Boris Johnson told DUP last November in Belfast he thought May’s Brexit bad deal would “leave N Ireland behind as an economic semi-colony of the EU and we would be damaging the fabric of the union.” Now it’s a price he’d pay for a chance to be PM. What a charlatan 
Is this a metaphor for #brexit  
This was the best speech of our debate on Brexit yesterday and received a standing ovationA longstanding Tory MEP gives passionate support for the EU and our place within it  
This is what Brexit is all about.  
Just think. If we revoke article 50 there won’t be a next round of Brexit talks.Because there won’t be Brexit.For the love of god and country, please MPs, kill this thing. 
Brexit date moved to 12 April, the anniversary of the sinking of the Titanic. Another disaster built in Belfast. 
Last time I checked, Catalans were also Europeans. When they celebrated #Diada, 1 milloin marched. Over 2 milloin voted (or tired to) October 1st 2017 #referendum. But no appeals to EP? Is one group of Europeans more important than the other? #EU #Catalonia #Catalunya #Katalonia 
Brexit is what happens when a lazy and incompetent political class aren't prepared to tell you some home truths. It's what occurs when the narrative of liars, racists and fools triumphs over decency, sanity and complexity. The chickens have come home to roost #indicativevotes 
As far as I am concerned, after this Tory Brexit fiasco is eventually resolved, the first action any future government should take is to draw up legislation that bans anyone who attended Eton from public office. 
Clive Betts you snake  #brexit  
If it were'nt so sad it would be funny. #Brexit  
Man detained at @Gatwick_Airport for wearing an anti-brexit badge 
FUCK BREXIT: HERE'S THE BEE GEES IN A BIN. pic.twitter.com/IcfZoCiDhE 
Then you admit the 2016 referendum was flawed? WTF? Why are you still supporting it? 
Let there be no mistake. @UKLabour are as culpable for the Brexit mess as the Tories because of Corbyn. Labour must be held to account for this, they've let us down badly. Vote with your feet, vote any party other than Labour or Conservative. 
To Brexit, brexited, brexiting #Brexit  
Ugandan man here. I support BREXIT for my colonial heroes. 
People from all walks of society in #WestPapua are bravely standing up and demanding an independence referendum pic.twitter.com/VmtA1hSD7X 
If we have a second referendum, how will you vote? 
As my local MP - why did you vote for an second referendum? Hull voted out by 67.6%, we haven't changed our minds. @DianaJohnsonMP #Brexit  
The original #Brexit was in 1776. #2A 
.@ProfBrianCox Hi Brian, I am a big fan.Earlier you tweeted Corbyn and Labour dont support a public vote on the Brexit deal.Yet Corbyn voted and whipped Labour MPs to support the Kyle-Wilson amendment which would’ve put any deal to a public vote.Please clarify to followers. 
Almost no-one seems to have noticed but Jeremy Corbyn actually voted for a second referendum tonight. He- and the Labour Party- have travelled a long way. 
On Friday I’ll attend first political demonstration since I was student in mid-1980s. That’s my level of anger over betrayal of UK democracy. Whatever your views on single issue of #Brexit, surely democratic legitimacy matters more. 
Our next PM? #Brexit  
Brexit.  
#LeaveMeansLeave#Brexit 17,410,742 people voted to leave. I don’t care if people didn’t know what the facts were tough. Do your research before you vote.If I voted for labour and you vote for conservative and the conservative won the election and I wanted to revote can I?  
If this is the result of a fucking poll of the best crisps, we really should never have been trusted with a referendum. pic.twitter.com/oSm5ketmPZ 
“Let’s Brexit the way that I say,”Suggested Prime Minister May;“If I get the ayes,I’ll give you a prize.”(The prize is her going away.) 
MPs who want to 'respect' the referendum: Be warned. When all is done & dusted & we reach GE time - Leave voters will have moved on. They won't really care what you did. They certainly won't mobilise to protect you. But Remainers will mobilise to vote you out. We won't forget. 
This song sums up the House of Commons this evening. #BREXIT #BrexitShambles 
Looks like we’re going to have to take part in the elections for the unelected bureaucrats. 
Majority of the 45 Labour MPs who failed to support a public vote tonight are the same "moderates" who voted No Confidence in @jeremycorbyn in 2016, after blaming him for the original referendum result. Bloody hypocrites. 
So, who will be in the running to replace Theresa May as Prime Minister? It's not just Boris Johnson and Michael Gove. There's a wide choice of great candidates. #Trexit #TheresaMay #ToryLeadership #Brexit  
During this morning’s European Parliament plenary session in Strasbourg,  the emotional speech from Conservative MEP Richard Ashworth, MEP for  South East England, received a standing ovation from his fellow MEPs  (except Nigel Farage’s Brexit MEP team).  
General Election. Should we come to it. I am thinking, don't vote on party lines. Vote as Remainers. Actually study each candidate. Did they vote Leave or Remain? Let's mobilise & vote out every bastard who made Brexit happen. Fuck parties. And Fuck Leavers. 
I assume Brabin, lavery and De piero will be sacked tomorrow 
All those saying these votes were a waste of time are wrong.-a customs union (with cabinet votes) is v close to passing.-Norway/soft Brexit options much weaker than thought.-Ratification ref much stronger, add it to PM's deal and could make it.Was a v useful exercise. 
Labour is an internationalist, pro-European, ‘Remain’ Party. Or it is nothing. If every Labour MP had been true to our roots, a People’s Vote could have passed tonight. We will not be forgiven if we fail our country and allow Brexit to break the UK. 
#PeoplesVote #FinalSay #InformedConsent 2nd Referendum is making a huge journey from the perceived eccentric view of a few Remoaners like me  to becoming a serious proposal to the mainstream political class to resolve the damaging Brexit impasse & hopefully settle the debate!  
I call this 'Brexit, the way forward'  
Mr Rees-Mogg, has described the deal as leaving Britain "a slave state." He is prepared to vote to make the UK a slave state and yet he would still condemn a rape victim wanting a termination. Why does anyone still listen to him? 
Facts: - People's Vote fell short by 27 votes- Labour whipped to support it- 45 Labour MPs voted no or abstainedFinal fact:If Labour are seen to enable Brexit they are finished. 16 million pissed off Remain voters does not translate into an election success. 
Dear #FBPE brigade,Tonight, @jeremycorbyn whipped Labour MPs to support a confirmatory public vote on any #Brexit deal, going even further than official Labour Party policy agreed at conference. 47 Labour MPs defied the whip. When will you acknowledge Corbyn is not your enemy? 
If you're saying you're abandoning Labour over Brexit, you're basically saying you give more of a shit about Brexit than you do austerity, and protecting the vulnerable. No other party stands a chance of sorting those issues out. Don't lose sight of what's really important. 
I was well underway by the time I had second-thoughts.A breakdown of how the Welsh MPs voted on tonight's different #Brexit options:  
I have mapped today's indicative votes on Brexit options:  
“The PM said we won’t truly leave the EU unless we regain control of our laws. And what’s going to happen under this Withdrawal Agreement is that the laws are going to be made by 27 other member states, over our heads, putting us at the mercy of our competitors” @BillCashMP 
So, after 1,007 days since the Referendum, we are no further forward. What will it take for the politicians to catch up with the will of the people to acknowledge that #Brexit is a really bad idea? FFS just #StopBrexit 
The @SNP’s, @JamieHepburn is shocked how focussed we are on Theresa May at this point in the Brexit process #bbcdn 
SMR | BREAKING! | Parliament is MOST IN FAVOUR of a #PeoplesVote With 268 votes in favour of the proposition put forward by the Marvellous Member for Derby South - it would seem there is significant support for giving you the #FinalSay on #Brexit#PutItToThePeople then! 
A Customs Union amendment came within 8 votes of victory.The Independent Group voted against it (11 votes)The SNP abstained (35 votes)Lib Dems abstained (11 votes)They have helped the PM secure her damaging Tory Brexit. 
Do you want Brexit? No.So you don't want Brexit? No.A slightly different Brexit? No.Time to think about it? No.Phone a friend? No. 
These 45 Labour MPs must answer why they gave Rees-Mogg and Boris Johnson the opportunity for Hard Tory Brexit whilst denying their constituents a vote.They should answer it down the foodbank, in job centres and under funded hospitals, for the rest of their lives.#PeoplesVote 
No better way to beat the Brexit blues on this fine evening in Brum, than screen acting with these beauties at @inspireactors #inspiretechnique #actorslife pic.twitter.com/PVaMn5llx8 
Theresa May's Brexit plan #indicativevotes 
Brexit is a dogs dinner!It's time for a Second Wooferendum.  
Ten disgraceful Tory Remainers voted to stop Brexit altogether by revoking Article 50. Tory members back No Deal and overwhelmingly voted Leave, but these MPs don't care. Help us deselect them and get proper pro-Brexit Conservative representatives!  
Nāgārjuna's Brexit, lads.BrexitNot BrexitBoth Brexit and not BrexitNeither Brexit nor not Brexit 
It's time again for the beloved Brexit cat   
Um. The vote on a second referendum was 52% - 48%.  
.@theresa_may's Brexit deal got 242 votes in Parliament.A People's Vote got 268.It's probably about time we had a #PeoplesVote 
"It is clear that Remaining in the EU is an option that is firmly on the table - with a second EU referendum being the most popular option of all”SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP responds to tonight’s indicative votes on the way forward from the Brexit crisis  
“We’ve got Brexit, egg and Brexit, egg bacon and Brexit, egg bacon sausage and Brexit, Brexit sausage Brexit Brexit bacon Brexit tomato and Brexit, Brexit Brexit Brexit baked beans Brexit Brexit Brexit...”  
UK: So what happens now?MPs: Another motion in another hall.UK: So what happens now? MPs: Take your picture off another wall.UK: Where are we going to?MPs: We'll get by we always have before UK: Where are we going to? Theresa May: Don't ask any more#brexit 
Parliament has rejected holding another referendum for the second time. The Speaker says we cant have 3 votes on the same issue. He is fair & impartial so we should have heard the last of @peoplesvote_uk idea then.. 
MPs are so inept they’ve even bungled their coup against the referendum result 
Just on the TV just now  #BrexitChaos #Brexit  
Brexit:What do we want?NoWhen do we want it?No 
Customs union?No no no!Common market? No no no!Referendum? No no no!Theresa's own deal?HELL NO!  
Quick #brexit summary. MPs have voted againstMay's DealNo DealAny other kind of dealA second referendumNot leavingLiterally everythingGoodnight! 
Simon Cowell got it right. If there’s deadlock you go back to the public vote. #Brexit #indicativevotes 
Tomorrow’s Guardian-The mess that is Brexit  
Only 14 MPs need to switch sides for there to be a majority for a referendumSuspect that is doable 
For months, centrists have been claiming that Corbyn is actually pro-Leave, and that he would never vote for a 2nd referendum.Tonight he did. He even instructed the PLP to vote for a 2nd referendum too.And yet...it did not pass.Will centrists now stop blaming JC? 
Something to make watching the debates in parliament more entertaining. #Brexit  
Brexit turned out to be actually quite complicated and not much fun. Maybe, we just shouldn’t do it.. 
A second referendum has secured more support in the House of Commons than Theresa May’s Brexit deal, on either occasion.Here are the vote tallies in full. #IndicativeVotes 
WATCH | Brilliant from Mark Francois: "This attempt to seize the order paper has FAILED. The second referendum has been DEFEATED. The revocation of Article 50 was SMASHED! And surely, the last thing we want to do on Monday is go through this farce all over again!"  
I voted proudly tonight both for a #PeoplesVote and, as an emergency brake, to revoke Article 50, as both would save jobs, opportunities and livelihoods in Pontypridd and across the UK. The people deserve, that whatever Brexit deal is agreed, it’s put back to them for approval! 
Whoever has a warehouse full of these must be a bit miffed pic.twitter.com/fCgAaBffk9 
“Contrary to the rubbish that you hear... that Remainer MPs have a right to take back that decision from the people. It was given to them and they decided by 17.4 million that that was their decision. This Parliament has no right to take that decision back from them” @BillCashMP 
british MPs after they vote down theresa’s brexit deal (again):  
I’m bored of Brexit   
Tonight we are all @joannaccherry My sentiments exactly.#Brexit #FuckingLabour #Useless pic.twitter.com/k6WxxaQHMW 
It’s the students of 2069 I feel sorry for. Imagine having to learn all about this shower of shit for your History GCSE in 50 years time. #brexit 
Brexit has taken out two PMs, umpteen ministers, dozens of firms, thousands of jobs, hurt sterling, rattled the union, let DUP decide fate of Europe, risks Boris in No10 then near 3yrs on, MPs reject ALL solutions to deadlock. And Britain thinks it's fit to rule itself? Lol. 
(small voice)the breakdown of the vote for a second referendum tonight was by a ratio of....(drum roll)52:48 
This remains the only viable option in response to #Brexit  
Theresa May's Brexit deal got 242 votes in Parliament.#PeoplesVote got 268 votes tonight.It's time to put this to the people in a #PeoplesVote. 
WOW!! a #PeoplesVote is the MOST POPULAR option for what to do next with Brexit!!  just 27 votes in it, we only need 14 more MPs to back it!! amazing #indicativevotes 
That’s it, nothing else for it - the cats are taking over Brexit. #indicativevotes 
Results of #indicativevotes show there is a Brexit deadlock that just can’t be solved in Parliament.No majority for May’s deal.No majority for a customs union.No majority for a 2nd referendum.No majority for revoking Article 50.No majority for no deal.We need an election. 
Parliament has rejected ALL Brexit options in #indicativevotes today 
BREAKING: Parliament just voted against every single form of Brexit. What a bunch of useless f*cking clowns. Where is someone, anyone, with the balls to lead us out of this endless nonsense?   #brexit 
Yes!! The biggest win of the evening is the Kyle-Wilson-Beckett ...... to hold a confirmatory referendum on any Brexit deal agreed by Parliament.  
Parliament just voted 268 for, to 295 against, for a public vote on any Brexit deal.We’re just a few MPs short of a majority for a public vote. We’ve never been closer to a public vote. Join the campaign. Text BREXIT and your email address to 60777.  
BREAKING: Parliament says NO to every Brexit option in indicative votes:No deal 160-400Common Market 2.0  188-283EFTA 65-377CU 264-272Labour Plan 237-307Revoke Artixle 50 184-293Second vote 268-295Malthouse 139-422 
If MPs allow us to be yanked out of the EU on the basis of a referendum that the Court of Appeal has confirmed as being so corrupt & fraudulent that it would have had to be voided if it had been formally set up as binding then democracy will have died. Died as in dead.  
Brexit  
Arlene Foster lying on Sky. Says Backstop would damage business as it creates a barrier with UK. This is a bare faced lie! Farmers, Business owners, & even InvestNi believe the DUP Brexit will DAMAGE NI Economy. The Backstop would be a Game changer for NI Economy and drive FDI. 
It's official. Brexit is not happening this Friday.  
Hi, it was actually 1.5 million, we have a petition to STOP Brexit(which was helped along by Farage, Banks, using Cambridge Analytica). The petition has almost 6 million signatures now. We are doing our best to overturn Brexit!. 
Ever feel like you've been cheated? The government never had any intention of honouring the result of the referendum.  Send them a message -  #VoteUKIP. #NewportWest #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit  
we now go live to brexit  
Explain the origins of the *first* 100 years of Brexit. 
The first preference of @theSNP has always been to stop Brexit. If that’s not possible - and until relatively recently it seemed it wasn’t - we’d opt for soft Brexit over hard. But stopping Brexit is possible now and we voted tonight to give that the best chance.  
Tonight Liberal Democrats have supported votes to provide a People's Vote on Brexit, and also to revoke Article 50 in the case of a no deal, crash out scenario#indicativevotes 
Let's get this right. We got a referendum cause Cameron tried to settle internal party politicking, our country got split in 2 cause of internal party politicking, & now they'll vote for a bad deal cause of internal party politiking? I'm starting to think the EU isn't the problem 
On behalf of Leave Voters and Remain Voters across the United Kingdom...F*** You Boris Johnson#indicativevotes 
Arlene Foster says the DUP cannot support the prime minister’s Brexit dealSing it one last time @theresa_may 
Ahhh shit lads, just realised we’re doing Brexit backwards. We should have started with a round of #indicativevotes and ended with a referendum. 
‘@SteveBakerHW received a standing ovation after his speech to the ERG tonight. As he spoke his voice cracked with emotion, so much so that at the end he was hugged by Jacob and others at the top table.There’s no way MV3 will pass.Some excerpts from Steve’s speech 
Brexit is so shit pic.twitter.com/9ehKPS5dod 
Theresa May will "step down as Prime Minister once her Brexit deal has been delivered", which basically means she'll light the fuse and run away as it explodes. #Trexit 
BREAK: DUP leader Arlene Foster tells @SkyNews her party “regrets” that it is unable to support the Withdrawal Agreement while it “poses a threat to the integrity of the UK.” #Brexit  
Liz Truss said there shouldn't be a 2nd referendum because no one has changed their mind about Brexit...What about people who have changed their minds on Brexit? - “I don’t think people have changed their minds”You have - “I have, thats true…” 
"Let's now go live to an update on Brexit"  
Dear Sky News, you lose all credibility when you invite Alastair Campbell onto your panel. He is utterly discredited in the minds of all decent people following his lies over Iraq and Dr David Kelly. His more recent online abusive behaviour also discredits him. #SkyNews #Brexit 
European Scrutiny Committee Chair @BillCashMP says that the decision to leave the EU was given to the people, and they "decided by 17.4 million that that was their decision. This Parliament has no right to take that decision back from them." 
I did not know I had brexited so many times in my life #Brexit #BrexitVote 
This makes me smile so much! If only the government could act like this trio we might have #brexit solved by now!  
Just a reminder #Brexit explained  
.@ChukaUmunna makes it clear that young people are set to lose the most in this #Brexit and must be given a say. #PeoplesVote @OFOCBrexit @FFSake_ 
I'll say one thing about Brexit. Whatever the outcome I am now passionately in favour of Scottish independence. The arrogance of Westminster disgusts me. My only concern is who will save the English from their politicians? 
ThisDemocracy? My A***E!!!#borisJohnson #Jacobreesmogg #ToryMPs #stevebaker 1922committee #theresaMayStatement #indicativevotes #brexit  
Taking off for possibly the last time from EU-Britain. Next time I return, it could well be in the clutches of Brexit. Hard to believe that even after three years, no one can name a single concrete, tangible reason how it will improve our lives.  
Brexit explained.Five people, A, B, C, D & E, are in a car, driving past Heathrow on the M4.A [the driver]: "We're about to leave London, and there's a junction ahead. Where do we go next?"(1/n) 
If the answer to all our problems is really for either Gove or Johnson to become PM then we're in much much much bigger trouble than we thought #Brexit #Trexit 
Don't worry, with MP's like this, we in safe hands. #trexit #brexit  
Backstabbing snake!! Mogg - "Today's about thanking Theresa May, celebrating and admiring her courage in departing."  #Brexit  
RT if you'd rather have*actual* donkeys in charge@ByDonkeys#ledbydonkeys 
How I voted tonight in Indicative Brexit Votes.  
The bottom line is life is hard enough without a few fuckers making it a fuck of a lot harder.  We don't need it. The country doesn't need it. Bin brexit and let's just move on and get on.  #FBPE 
Nearly 6 million people have signed the ‘Revoke Article 50’ petition - including over 27,000 in Cambridge. I told Parliament that we must take this seriously, by revoking article 50 or through a #FinalSay referendum  
"Tory psychodrama is what started this referendum nonsense."Labour MP Jess Phillips says Theresa May "has been terrible - and she's now falling on her sword."#C4News #Trexit 
Tonight I could RT virtually everything appearing on my Twitter feed! I’ve gone from an “angry middle-aged woman” to a “consumed with rage bitch”. However, I’ve also miraculously hit 30k Followers - thank you all for supporting me on this Brexit journey. #StopBrexit Space  
Never mind Brexit, just have a wee munch.  
Rees-Mogg is sickening. A sanctimonious, smarmy hypcrite who would stab you in the back and smile while doing it. The glibness with which he dismisses the risks of a no deal Brexit show exactly how dangerous he is. He should be nowhere hear the levers of power. #C4News 
I remember, a few days after the referendum in 2016 I shared @AlynSmith’s ‘Don’t let Scotland down’ speech, and here we are now close to the end ... #leavealighton #proudlyeuropean  
“Nothing has changed. The backstop is still potentially indefinite. I want to see is a unilateral right for the UK to come out of the backstop. Would you enter a relationship, an agreement with a 3rd party in which they could keep you in that arrangement indefinitely?“ John Baron 
Boris Johnson is a total charlatan who has no principles. Please RT. 
this is all i can see when i try to follow brexit stuff  
“When the EU enters into a trade agreement with a third country, if the UK were in a Customs Union, we would have to offer access to our markets, but we would not get the reciprocal access to that country in return. That is going to be a massive democratic deficit” @GregHands 
.@Telegraph cartoon#indicativevotes #Brexit #MeaningfulVote3 
In 3 days time Brexiteers will unite in Parliament Square to call for a real Brexit. Parliament Square, Friday, 4pm.  
And the polls are open in Parliament's historic indicative votes on Brexit...I'm voting for #PeoplesVote and #RevokeArticle50 - I'll leave others to their unicorns  
If we had literally anyone other than Jeremy Corbyn as leader of the opposition right now brexit would already be dead and buried. 
Theresa May's resignation tells you everything you need to know about the Conservative party.MPs willing to vote for a deal they think is a disaster for the country so they can topple their own leader.Party politics before country: every time.#Brexit #indicativevotes 
Voting no to everything except “No Deal”! #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal 
Brexit is on the same side as the ERG, the DUP, UKIP, Tommy Robinson, James Goddard yellow vests, Nigel Farage, Arron Banks, Donald Trump, Putin. Brexit is about respecting democracy is it? Forgive me if I’m undemocratic for not respecting a vote, in their name. 
Several EU deputies denounce the farce trial on the 1-O referendum and Marchena's lack of impartiality. @josebove @markdemesmaeker 
Brexit was only about a civil war in the Tory party for power ! shameful waste of public money and washing dirty linen in public ! Shameful Machiavellians ! 
We'll just leave this here...... 
It is a measure of the current insanity that today's announcement by the Bank of England that we are already £800m per week worse off because of Brexit, equivalent to 2% of GDP, is not only not headline news, but not even being mentioned. 
Just let’s be clear - the result of 40 years of the Tories talking to themselves about Europe is now  that they talk to themselves about a new leader.Selfish. Self centred. About THEM not us. Brexit: Theresa May vows to stand down if deal is passed  
BREAKING: Shakespeare casts indicative vote on #BrexitTO BE OR NOT TO BE... in the European Union. Would The Bard have been a Brexiteer?  
BREAKING - Jacob Rees-Mogg position has changed again, he'll now support the deal if the DUP abstain. Can Mogg prostitute himself any further for the leadership pretensions of Boris Johnson? Oh you bet he can! 
Any Labour MP who is tempted to back the Deal should read this tweet. You would be giving Boris Johnson a real chance at attaining the highest office in the land. NO THANK YOU! 
Just a reminder that the Brexit deal was agreed last November. Since then, the substance of the agreement remains unchanged, and we've had four months of internal Tory party politics 
Tim Martin, Wetherspoons boss joined our marchers today on the #MarchToLeave. A WTO Brexit will mean cheaper food and drink prices because we can cut tariffs. RT if you want to take back control of our laws, borders and money!  
Me whenever there’s a brexit update  
People saying they are sorry for May. I have no sympathy for her. I feel sorry for the families crippled by Tory austerity and cruel welfare reforms. Good riddance to a useless and uncaring failed politician. HH #brexit  
"I've locked you all in the boardroom so you don't get me. You can leave via the fire escape. We haven't got Brexit, I just didn't have the guts to say that earlier."  
Latest YouGov Brexit tracker finds the proportion of LAB voters thinking Brexit wrong moves to 79% - the highest level since the referendum. It has been in the low 70s  
Glass cliff: When a women is inserted into a tough & nasty leadership job that none of the men want to do, then pushed out of it when they want the job back. #Brexit 
I will be voting for a confirmatory public vote and revocation to avoid no-deal in tonight’s indicative votes. #finalsay #brexit #cardiffnorth 
Irish Border 4-0 Brexit(Davis, o.g.Johnson, o.g.Raab, o.g.May, o.g)Half-time 
“I am prepared to leave this job earlier than I intended in order to do what is right for our country and our party" - UK PM Theresa May confirms she will quit if her #Brexit deal is passed 
BBC propaganda output now :1. Mays deal is going to pass now.2. May has served the people and delivered Brexit before going.Reality :1. Mays deal won't pass due to numbers and Bercow rightly blocking vote.2. We need a GE. 
"There's nothing difficult about the word leave, it's very simple - we've made it difficult." says @KateHoeyMP 
Every single constituency in Scotland voted to remain in the EU. Overall remain won by 2/3 majority.Still proposals by the Scottish Government have been completely sidelined by Theresa May in the Brexit negotiations.Now Scottish Parliament voted to revoke Article 50.#Brexit  
Wow, #brexit really did divert attention. Did we win ww3? Who did we fight? The EU army? 
May: I'll resign when Brexit is complete, which is never. Fools!  
Oh lord - has brexit happened while I've been in here?  
Andrew Percy MP quotes one of his constituents: "Why is it in this matter of  the European Union, Remain only has to win once but Leave has to win twice for our decision to be implemented?" 
Theresa May tells Conservative MPs she will not remain as UK PM for the next phase of #Brexit negotiationsLive updates  
Theresa May is resigning before the next wave of Brexit talks.To the wavering Labour MPs: are you seriously going to put through a deal which will immediately be taken over by the next Tory leader, guaranteed to be a hard right free marketeer?Any "guarantees" are meaningless. 
Second Tory PM prepares to bail after putting #PartyAboveCountryI’m SICK of it! And FURIOUS about the damage the Conservatives are doing to the UK!There’s no majority in UK for Brexit anymore, so WHO is profiting from it so much Tories will sacrifice anything to get it?! 
You will note in the document written as a result of the Referendum Act 2015, Free Movement, Customs Union, in fact a whole range of options were marked as possible outcomes if we voted to no longer be a member of the European Union.  
Scottish parliament votes overwhelmingly to cancel Brexit.  SNP, Labour and Greens all voted to revoke Article 50 and stop Brexit unless there is another referendum. 
Parliament has finally taken control of #Brexit!@CarolineLucas explains what happens tonight & why she's backing the Beckett amendment to give the public a say on whatever deal is agreed. #PeoplesVote  
The referendum wasn't to "Leave the EU", it was to decide "whether the United Kingdom should remain a member of the European Union."This is the summary of the act which gave power to the referendum.  
So true. Why are the British public not allowed to change their minds. #Brexit pic.twitter.com/mCOm89YfSr 
By voting #UKIP, the people of #NewportWest can show this quisling government what the people think of their endless plots to frustrate the #Brexit that we voted for.  
"Consider the consequences for trust in politics if this House forces an outcome on the people that they no longer desire. That really would be the undemocratic establishment stitch-up of all time"Margaret Beckett on case for public vote on #Brexit deal  
WATCH: @Keir_Starmer makes it absolutely clear that Labour will back Margaret Beckett's amendment this evening, backing a #PeoplesVote on any Brexit deal. Please RT:  
"Alright, 1006 days since the referendum, 16 left to go. Let's take a look at what the UK are doing - oh you're taking the fucking piss""What's wrong, Angela?""They're having a wee initial think about what kind of brexit they actually want to happen" 
Laughingstock Farage's cunning plan rumbled by @guyverhofstadt who compares Slackbladder's participation in his 'march of the absurd' to someone who sits on their arse whilst others do all the work..... 
Joan Ryan MP - "Why are you so terrified of going back to the ppl? There's nothing wrong with saying, 'have you changed your mind?' #Brexit  
We have just heard an outstanding speech in the House of Commons by Margaret Beckett putting a powerful case for a confirmatory referendum. 
I am sending a hug to my fellow Remainers, who on 23 June 2016 were classified as second class citizens and completely ignored by Govt and Westminster. I salute your fortitude and courage on not being bullied or silenced. We matter. We have a voice. We fight on  #brexit 
IF John Bercow blocks #MeaningfulVote3 just as Boris, Rees-Mogg, Raab, Davis, McVey, Nadine and the rest of the Tory Brexit charlatans want to vote for it I’m not sure I’ll ever stop laughing 
Clarke - "If in fortnights time we are faced with no-deal, I think feeling in this house is so strong, we must all vote to revoke." #Brexit  
Q1. What evidence is there for “Brexit”?Q2. Give three cheap recipes for hedgehogs.Q3. Why is electricity impossible?Q4. How is a cave house superior to wattle and daub?Q5. How is it that the Irish live forty years longer than we do?Q6. Is life sustainable without kelp? 
“I'm not asking you to solve our domestic discussions. I am asking you to leave a light on so we can find our way home.”Emotional speech by our Scottish MEP @AlynSmith on #Brexit.#Article50 #EPlenary #EU 
Fantastic speech on WTO Brexit from Conservative MP John Baron. What a shame the Prime Minister has  failed to recognise No Deal as a UK backstop of opportunity.   
This was not on the side of a bloody bus. It’s got to stop. We can’t go on Like this. Brexit is crippling us. It is humiliating us. It is hurting us.   
Think the Son of God can overrule the Speaker on this one...#Brexit  
EU politician goes mad for power! Let's leave this prison and regain our sovereignty. Join us in Parliament Square, 29th March from 4pm to save Brexit:  
#Brexit a second referendum is still democratic...  
John Baron MP: "...whilst most of us in this place want a good deal, many of us have taken the view that the deal on offer from the Prime Minister is not a good deal, and therefore the legal default position is that we leave on no-deal/WTO terms." 
Brexit dog  
Of *EIGHT* options being put before Parliament on #Brexit, only ONE represents the will of the people as expressed on June 23rd 2016. Any other option is a total betrayal of everything we repeatedly were informed of during the referendum campaign...  
As @Femi_Sorry points out, Leave promised 2 things in 2016: more sovereignty & a good economy.A soft Brexit would save the economy but lose all sovereignty, and viceversa for no-deal.The reality is those who “aren’t respecting the referendum” are Leave politicians themselves! 
“I caused the pony stampede” @porksmith offered his unique insight on Brexit. pic.twitter.com/QtI0PfFy22 
Deliver Brexit!?  They can't even deliver State Pensions to women, now in their 60's, who worked and paid NIC's for 45+ years!  All the while being led to believe that they'd retire at 60 - yes, SIXTY - with a State Pension!  That's SIXTY - not SIXTY SIX! #PensionlessPensioner 
time lapse Large Big Mac, large fries, cremeegg mc flurry, tomatoe ketchup and brown sauce. McDonald’s monopoly #bigmac #largebigmac #largefries #cremeegg #ketchup #brownsauce @McDonalds #leicester #fastfood #mcdonaldsmonopoly #mcdonalds #nomnomnomimlovingit #brexit #timelapse 
Join the rally to save Brexit this Friday from 4pm:  
Brexit has brought out the worst in some of the worst people. But it has also brought out the best in some of the best - including @Anna_Soubry Thank you for your courage and your eloquence. 
Today in parliament: - Rees-Mogg accuses Boles and Letwin of not respecting the result of the referendum.- Boles points out they voted for the Brexit deal, and Rees-Mogg didn’t.- Rees-Mogg accuses them of not acting like Etonians. 
He's gonna need some ice for that. #Brexit #BrexitChaos 
"Ideologically, I prefer the Brexiteers who want a pure Brexit.That's why I have a real objection to no deal being taken off the table.No deal, compared to Theresa May's deal, is a purer form of Brexit."Well said @piersmorgan  pic.twitter.com/bbY6TezGwD 
Any Brexiteer who backs this deal has capitulated. It will make this country a vassal state. You will no longer be conviction politicians. You will be liars. You will be has as bad as Juncker and all the rest. You will have betrayed Brexit. 
The Prime Minister is failing to deliver Brexit because she can't build a consensus, is unable to compromise, and unable to reunite the country. #PMQs 
It would be decidedly odd if @Jacob_Rees_Mogg votes for May’s Brexit deal  
Great to meet leave supporter @josephafrane outside Parliament today. We Leavers will continue to stand together to ensure the referendum result is respected and delivered.  
Loads of Labour MPs are telling me they will vote for my #RevokeArticle50 to avoid #NoDeal #IndicativeVote option if it’s selected today. Really hope @labourwhips will consider it carefully. Cross party working essential to prevent #NoDeal #Brexit 
#Brexit stands as a cautionary tale to the people of Europe.  We must never take peace and prosperity for granted.  Value it, fight for it and defend it every day. My speech in #EPlenary this morning: 
Explain the origins of the 100 year Brexit. 
Wessex Exam BoardGCSE History Q1:To what extent did Brexit contribute to the division of the UK into feudal kingdoms?(Note: write in both sides of the slate - the supplies from North Wales have been disrupted by a border dispute) 
Was Brexit a Tory party civil war, English civil war, or British civil war? 
LABOUR BREXIT LATEST: Jeremy Corbyn's spokesman explains that the party only supports a referendum on a "damaging Tory Brexit". If Labour takes power, he says, it will negotiate a better Brexit, which won't need a referendum. 
Labour's John McDonnell says he'd back remaining in the EU in a new referendum. But would his party?[tap to expand]  #Brexit  
I see that Corbyn's eleven-dimensional plan to achieve the hardest possible Brexit is nearing fruition.  
Discuss the weaponisation of the word ‘elite’ in the lead up to Brexit and describe its contribution to the eventual disintegration of the United Kingdom. 
“How did the Brexit debate over the last century shape the ongoing Brexit negotiations?” 
Assess the linguistic slide of the term 'meaningful' over the course of early 2019 as it relates to Brexit. 
To what extent did Brexit mean Brexit?  Discuss. 
OK one and all, let's have the future exam questions that might get set on Brexit... 20/50/100 years hence. Any level from GCSE to degree! Make them smart and challenging! 
Today we are supporting the cross-party #PeoplesVote amendment. No Brexit should be allowed to happen without a public vote, with Remain on the ballot paper. 
BREXIT UPDATE:1006 days after the EU referendum, MPs will today finally vote on how they think Brexit should happen. We were due to leave in 58 hours...  
As Jacob Rees-Mogg and Boris Johnson hint they will vote for Theresa May's Brexit deal, James O'Brien looks back over what they've previously said about it.@mrjamesob | #Brexit  
Proud to be supporting the Kyle Wilson amendment tonight.Finally MPs are in control. This is an important opportunity to discuss the different options and take steps to ensure whatever version of #Brexit Parliament can agree on is subject to a confirmatory vote. #PeoplesVote 
1 million marching for a #PeoplesVote, 6 million signing a petition to #RevokeA50Now. YouGov shows 56 pct of women want to stay in the EU now; Survation that 53pct of electorate now want a second ref. STOP TELLING US BREXIT IS WHAT EVERYONE WANTS #PMQs 
MP's who are thinking of backing @theresa_may lousy #Brexit in name only deal are the first rats in history who have actually got back on to a sinking ship! Ditch this useless PM and leave on #WTOBrexit Do you agree? If so please retweet. 
LATEST FOOTAGE  of GB leaving the EU #brexit #RevokeArticle50 
Best #brexit slide to make it to this side of the pond....  
Helena Bonham Carter remaining unbothered whilst also wearing a “Bollocks to Brexit” sticker is the reason we STAN  
Wow. If you didn't get a chance to hear @OFOCNI's Pearse Smith make the case for a #PeoplesVote at the march, do yourself a favour and watch.Brexit is already affecting communities in Northern Ireland. It's time to think again.  
The mood of the country has swung strongly against #Brexit. Tories are running scared of the will of the people.But we will not be silenced. It's time to #PutItToThePeople#PeoplesVote 
“If we sign the Withdrawal Agreement, I promise your viewers we will not be leaving the European Union. And when your viewers realise the small print that we’re trapped in the backstop indefinitely...” @ABridgen#StandUp4Brexit 
Nigel Farage’s Brexit Party is already polling ahead of UKIP. It was only founded this year.  
Labour MPs are being whipped to support the Beckett/Kyle/Wilson indicative vote motion that promotes Brexit referendum 
A brief reminder of what @BorisJohnson said about May's Brexit deal  
EU’s Barnier now admits no hard border after No Deal Brexit. The backstop is an unnecessary political trap we’re being conned into handing over £39 billion for. Wake up.  
.@MichelBarnier to @Nigel_Farage: "No one in Brussels is trying to steal Brexit from you. (...). It is not Brussels that decided UK would leave the EU. You made that choice, you must take responsibility and face up to the consequences. No one else.”#EPlenary #Brexit  
Apparently you have to be pro-Brexit to be patriotic these days.@Femi_Sorry writes why he's campaigning for a #PeoplesVote *because* he cares about the UK. 
Theresa may when we finally finish brexit  
Along with MPs from many other parties, @TheIndGroup has tabled a motion to prevent the UK implementing #Brexit unless a deal is approved in a confirmatory referendum. We will keep pressing Labour and others to do the right thing and support this. #ChangePolitics 
Jacob Rees-Mogg admits changing his mind on May’s deal but remains 100% behind making as much money from Brexit as possible. 
“Indicative” vs. “meaningful”: Understanding the endless #Brexit votes in UK parliament  via @qz 
Remember how you felt when Maradona cheated at the 1986 World Cup when he handled the ball over your head and into the back of the net? Well, that's how millions of people feel about a referendum result that was achieved by cheating voters with a mishandling of the truth.  
Today, one of our British MEPs @RichardAshMEP spoke about #Brexit being a cautionary tale. He addressed young people all over Europe. His advice: Never take peace and prosperity for granted. Value it, fight for it and defend it every day.#EPlenary 
WATCH | Unbelievable! The President of the European Council Donald Tusk says "you cannot ignore the six million people who signed the petition to revoke Article 50".The 17.4 million Brits who voted for Brexit though? Yeah, sod 'em! 
Tusk - "You cannot betray the 6m who signed to revoke A50, or the 1m who marched for PV, or the majority who want to remain in EU." #Brexit  
We mustn't ignore the 6m who signed a petition, because we agree with them.But we MUST ignore the 17.4m who actually voted for Brexit, because we do not.The chutzpah is breathtaking.  
‘We need to make sure we leave one way or another’Brexiteer MP Michael Fabricant says he will back Theresa May’s Brexit deal after having voted against it twice.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg’s changed his mind on Theresa May’s Brexit deal – the only 7 responses you need 
One of the many reasons why the British people feel anger & disappointment towards politicians over Brexit.               Brexit: EU leaders heap praise on MPs for ‘real revolt’ | News | The Times  
#Tusk: Restoring humanity’s faith in Donalds. (Placard spotted at Saturday’s anti-Brexit demonstration in London))  
Because its important to represent the 5 rather the 17.4?They don't understand how it works, and have no wish to. But don't think the European elections will provide the EP with compliant federasts.They shouldn't happen at all, but trust us, if they do we will win them. 
Don't be fooled by Donald Tusk's diplomatic language, he and the rest of the Council are well aware of the illegalities through with the British government is wrongfully attempting to strip 66 million citizens of their rights, freedoms and protections. 
I have been radicalised by Brexit, so I just joined the Liberal Democrats - join me here:  via @LibDems 
If general election happensEvery single remain voter in the country and RemainerNowNeeds to vote for a remain partyDo not vote Tory or labour!Only voteSNPLDPlaid cymruGreenOnly way to stop brexit it is simultaneously turned the Tories & labour into minority parties 
Today in Parliament we have #indicativevotes on Brexit options, many of which do not reflect the result of the Referendum.I have tabled a cross party motion reminding Parliament about our duty to honour the biggest democratic mandate in our nation's history and deliver #Brexit.  
“They’re doing it because they want to reverse Brexit, that is the key issue. Despite the fact that almost all of them have in fact voted for the Withdrawal Act. So this a disgraceful attempt to try to undermine the basis on which the people voted” @BillCashMP#StandUp4Brexit 
European nationals will always belong here. Retweet to say: we are all Londoners. #LondonIsOpen #Brexit  
A must watch. Donald Tusk If the 6 mill who signed the record a50 petition & 1 mill who marched, if they don’t feel represented by UK parliament then they must feel represented by EU. They are Europeans #brexit 
The 'threat' of #GoWTO is that we get a proper Brexit, the one we voted for. Real independence, taking back control, having command of our own armed forces and not being tied up in knots with a failing EU economy. As an added bonus, it will be a lot easier to #FlushTheBog  
Since the referendum I have not felt that I am represented or cared about by my own UK government. But I feel listened to and heard by this man. I am no longer voiceless. Thank you Mr Tusk. I am moved to tears.  
 @theSNP’s @AlynSmith urges MEPs to be open to independent Scottish membership of the EU after #Brexit.“Leave a light on so we can find our way home” @donaldtusk is among those who applaud him in @Europarl_EN Strasbourg. 
Richard Ashworth(Conservative MEP) - @eucopresident... On behalf of 1 million people on the streets of London, on behalf of the 6 million people who have signed the #RevokeArticle50 petition & the 63% who did not vote for #brexit, I want to say thank you.#peoplesvote #FinalSay 
Brexit...  
Verhofstadt on fire"The problem of humiliation is bcus of Tories"On Farage -"I'm surprised you're here, I thought u were marching. #Brexit  
When I was with @Nigel_Farage on Saturday Leave Means Leave March Mansfield to Beeston he walked the full 13 miles and I completed 8/13 miles 
Success is the ability to go from one failure to another with no loss of enthusiasm.” said Sir Winston Churchill. He could be speaking about the UK Parl & PM May today. Today, if the Speaker allows, 16 options for #Brexit on the table. There is certainly no loss of enthusiasm.  
My report today on the Spring #EUCO to the European Parliament: #Brexit  
History will not be kind to those colluding with Brussels today to reverse or frustrate the democratic result of the referendum. Nor will the voters.Brussels leaders heap praise on Commons for ‘real revolt’ 
WATCH: The best ever introduction of a politician on TV #BrexitShambles #Brexit #MayMustGo #GetToriesOut #indicativevotes#PeoplesVoteMarchVideo co/ @PaddySisyphus 
Would anyone who’s replied to me pushing the petition by saying “We have to respect the result of the referendum” like to comment on this?  
More compassion than Theresa May has shown in nearly 3 years of being PM. We are European and we will do all we can to stop this awful Brexit.  
EU cannot betray 6m people who signed petition to revoke Article 50 : @eucopresident #brexit  
Look at the state of this.Thirteen possible answers to the question of what Brexit should mean.Nearly three years after the referendum, and just two days before the original departure date.And this is as far as we have got.  
When you vote in a referendum you legitimise it and agree to abide by, & respect, the result - regardless of the outcome.MPs must not betray the biggest democratic mandate in our country’s history.The #MalthouseCompromise or #NoDeal are the only way to do that. Vote Malthouse 
Give him your thoughts on a second referendum  
Nigel - I have great news!Thanks to the imminent implosion of Brexit (death by internal contradictions), both YOU and MILLIONS OF BRITS and going to keep their jobs!Rejoice!  
Last night, govt emailed 5 million people to reject petition saying it wd ‘honour outcome of referendum’. Time for a lightning round of what ‘honouring’ means here. Who claimed PM was ‘well aware’ of ‘notorious facts’ of mass illegalities but had decided to ‘carry on’ regardless?  
Find it remarkable that upwards of 6 million people sign a petition to stop brexit yet you can't get anyone to sign a petition against austerity or poverty. This is Thatchers dream. Every man for himself + fuck the people that are worse off, under the guise of caring about them. 
Only in Britain would you see the hashtag #ruinafilmbyaddingupyourbum taking the edge off the terminal debate that is Brexit  
A historic day. Tonight, pink slips of paper, marked with Brexit options will be placed in the Commons. When the Speaker blows his whistle, fans will start and MPs will have just seconds to collect as many as they can. When all are counted, Britain’s future will at last be known. 
Among all the talk of indicative votes, extensions, traitors to Brexit, traitors full stop - Let’s not forget that no one has EVER given a single quantifiable benefit of Brexit!That alone is why it must stop. 
Barry Gardiner on #r4Today: "The Labour party is not a Remain party now, we've accepted the result of the referendum."Well said @BarryGardinerWe are not for leave or remain, but for compromise between the two, which reflects the fact leave won, but it was a close result. 
Barry Gardiner gives the official @UKLabour position. Facilitating #Brexit means taking responsibility for the damage to livelihoods & public services. The depressing reality is this: if you’re still campaigning for Labour, you are now campaigning for Brexit.  
Today’s tasks.1. Check Local Election Plan.2. Check Parliamentary Election Plan.3. Check European Election Plan.4. Check Referendum Plan.5. Check Armageddon Plan where all four happen in quick succession.And breathe.... 
“Even if the Prime Minister says that she’s going to go, the other issue is that the Withdrawal Agreement is Brexit In Name Only... The deal is not good for our country, so we need to make sure we’re not lumbered with it after the Prime Minister has gone” @andreajenkyns 
Barry Gardiner wriggling on @bbcr4today Sounds like MPs will be whipped on several indicative votes - will whip against revoking Article 50 and won’t allow public vote vs a bad deal ie May’s Deal. He Concluded ‘Lab is a Brexit party now’ - Goodbye Labour  
If the people of the UK manage to take back control and deny the Tories and Labour their #Brexit wrecking ball then I propose a new #EUPride parade to be held every year on the nearest Saturday to the 29th MarchCelebrate being an EU member every single year.#EuropeanAndProud 
Peter, you know when Maradona outjumped you and punched the ball into the net in 86? Remember how angry you felt? How you’d been cheated? Remember how outrageous it was that someone could lie so brazenly for years about it?That’s Brexit, mate.  
You could've argued that a 2nd referendum was undemocratic a year ago, when we didn't know what the Brexit deal would be.But calling it undemocratic now, is like getting someone to sign a contract, changing the terms, and then when they ask to review it, accuse THEM of cheating. 
I’m just going to say what we’re all thinking:Perhaps the exercise of deciding what type of Brexit parliament supports might have been more appropriate *before* triggering A50, and not 2 years after. 
You know shit's hit the fan when a Jonathan Pie video is 8 minutes long  
Very surprised that Jacob Rees-Mogg has changed his mind on May's deal. Next he'll be advocating a second referendum... pic.twitter.com/PwcadfC7Ij 
Brexit.pic.twitter.com/xPmMRCRbx2 
“No government could commit to an outcome without knowing what it is...” so said Theresa May about the indicative votes. But that is precisely what the governmnent did with the referendum. #Brexit 
Why not talk to the QC who was there @JMPSimor ?? 
THREAD  What are #Brexit Indicative Votes?  How will the process work?What ideas have been tabled? Bare with me on this one... hopefully it’s worth a couple of minutes     
Scottish Parliament to vote for Brexit to be cancelledImagine the Bampots’ rage if, after voting #indyref2 YES, Westminster cancelled independence....What an embarrassing bunch of anti-democratic clowns the SNP & Greens truly are 
Imagine wanting #Brexit so badly you give up your own principles.Imagine wanting #Brexit so badly you give up any integrity you had left.Imagine exercising your democratic right to change your mind but not affording the electorate that choice.Imagine being @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Terrible Little Englander tosh from Boris Johnson, a man who lay down with racists and liars during the referendum.  
Here is Jacob Rees-Mogg in 2011 proposing two EU referendums, with the second referendum used to ratify or reject the final negotiated deal.#PeoplesVote #Brexitpic.twitter.com/8h7cKNYee3 
Strong, clear, principled leadership. Tory waverers take note: the PMs deal is not Brexit, it is imprisonment. Vote against it.   
We need just 180K to get this over 6 MILLION today.The Government’s dismissive response is irrelevant- they’re not in control of Brexit.We’re talking to MPs.This petition clocks up numbers in each and every constituency.  
Parliament is today being asked to change the law so that Brexit Day is no longer this Friday - but Mrs May  can’t decide what should be the new date & is offering Parliament a menuI have a suggestion - 29 March 3019 
MUST READ, especially for MPs including Boris “Carthaginian peace” Johnson: Martin Wolf demolishes the Brexit delusion of taking back control  #BrexitShambles 
It is truly disgusting. This whole sorry mess was never about what is good for the country. It is all about winning  for these idiots. #SpecialPlaceInHell indeed.   
Bank Nifty at 30k. Worth reminding ourselves, it was at around 17,000 the day Raghuram Rajan quit and doomsday was predicted. It's actually biggest ever rally!!The Spotlight with Anuj Singhal: DON'T FRET OVER REXIT OR EVEN BREXIT, MARKETS ARE ...  
Everyone remember this one?What have they actually done in the 2+ years since this tweet?Anyone? 
Its quite bizarre to see the same people demonize the EU for  being an authoritarian undemocratic body which quashes individual rights turn around and romanticize the British Empire #Brexit 
#مراقبه_دوليه_استفتاء_مصر_نجا_واكدHashtag calling for international observation of #Egypt constitutional referendum expected in April  
CFISD’s 2019 bond package allots $207,656,706 for Safety & Security Enhancements. In this brief video, you will find more information about the #CFISDsafety components included in the May 4 referendum.   #CFISDbond 
We are going to have to air drop in meme propaganda to combat the EU's draconian Article 13.Assuming Brexit happens we can stand in the UK and tie memes to balloons and send them to France 
Brexit is harming the NHS, Remain were telling the truth about that too.  
MPs get to vote on Brexit options later.Write to your MP today to let them know you want to:- Revoke Article 50- #Remain in the EU- Put any deal that passes to a #PeoplesVote.Please RT and like to spread the word. Or comment with other ideas. 
Rees-Mogg a man of no principles, just pure hatred of the EU. He now supports May’s deal which he has said was the worst of all worlds. He knows there is no majority of the British people For Brexit but anything to get out of the EU. What a disgusting individual he is. #FBPE 
UK 10-year government borrowing cost now a mere 1.01%, down 0.30pts on the year. The Brexit shambles has had no effect on UK’s ability to borrow. 
for everyone who signed the “Revoke Article 50” petition, like myself... #brexit #RevokeArticle50 
#Brexit shanties in #Truro on Saturday:What shall we do with Jacob Rees-Mogg?Put him offshore where he keeps his money!What shall we do with Nigel Farage?Send him off to Trump with a one-way ticket!#Cornwall #StopBrexit 
My wee road.....North of Ireland in the foreground....Republic of Ireland in the background...………..will I be needing a green card now to walk down it after Brexit...……...  
I will do anything I need to do to stop #Remainer MPs in a Remainer #Parliament stopping #Brexit!  
Emily now says it’s hard to explain #Brexit to a “nation that doesn’t understand it”. That’s right Emily we are as thick as shit. Class. #BBC pic.twitter.com/iuHz0qJg39 
It’s not the Brexit people voted for, it’s not what the vast majority of the labour membership and voters want, but it’s what Jeremy has been dedicated to all his political life. He wants to capitalise on Brexit for his own ideological aims regardless of the pain it will cause.  
MPs who don't keep their promises get punished at the ballot box. 
Pls read  & RT this offensive utter twaddle from arguably the most irresponsible Foreign Sec ever, a former #Leave leader who spun lies & made fake promises to trick good people in to voting #Brexit, who would be our PM & wonder no longer why I left the Tory Party @TheIndGroup 
Retweet if you want the Brexit default to be: Revoke Article 50.  
Teresa May is the political equivalent of an anaesthetist who is on their 4th attempt at intubating a hypoxic patient with the same laryngoscope in the same position and refusing to let the ODP ask for help or consider waking the patient up#Brexit 
UK spends £12M on 7 bedroom New York flat for British trade envoy to the US to handle post-Brexit trade deals. Don’t know about you but I think it’s fucking disgusting. This is our money. A govt totally out of control. Brexit continues to cost the country money. Brexit dividend? 
Delivering a Brexit that both Remainers and Leavers hate is NOT FUCKING DEMOCRACY!pic.twitter.com/309x2CjZIw 
Yes I was wrong about Saddam’s WMDs, Ed Miliband, Jeremy Corbyn,  Brexit, Theresa May, Hillary Clinton, Donald Trump, the Mueller investigation; but I’m right about this current thing | The Guardian  
We made a little film which we hope might amuse and provoke thought … 
Eric Cantona is encouraging Brits to make an exit from Brexit  
“The real divide is not between remain or leave but between the many and the few.”Whatever your brexit opinion, there are people sleeping rough, kids going hungry, people dying in A&E corridors and a neglected mental health system during a time of crisis.Don’t be distracted. 
Brexit  
Pollster John Curtice says that those who voted to Leave in the 2016 referendum “are somewhat less likely to say they would vote Leave again.”A study into British public opinion over the Brexit negotiations has uncovered a deepening frustration amongst voters.  
Good night to everyone except me because I wish I was dead x #Brexit 
I enjoyed the first few seasons of "Brexit", but recent episodes have been a bit unrealistic. I mean, do the scriptwriters really expect us to take a character like @Jacob_Rees_Mogg seriously? 
Hi Jeremy. Please see @UKEUchallenge & their website. Brexit is illegitimate as the referendum was corrupted. If the vote had been binding it would have been overturned, but it was advisory so citizens have no remedy. We need to #RevokeA50 & think again. 
Hello??? Is anyone in the Govt aware that it’s not 2016 anymore. You do not have public support for Brexit. You do not have a mandate - it evaporated before you could implement it #revokeArt50 
“We’ve got MPs here who are trying to thwart the will of the people and completely deny that referendum result existed. Brexit belongs to the people, and we will continue to fight. Brexit doesn’t belong to politicians, it belongs to the people” @andreajenkyns#StandUp4Brexit 
The govt response to the #RevokeArticle50 petition describes the referendum as a "clear instruction". This is a double lie. An advisory referendum cannot be instruction, and the vote was for something as clear as mud.  #LeaveLies #Brexit 
There is another reason to keep signingMPs are very concerned about being re elected. Keep signing & we will update pro Brexit MPs on how many of their constituents want to #RevokeArticle50 !!! 
I think what the government may have miscalculated here is that this just landed in the inboxes of *5 million* people and will go down like a cup of cold sick.Presumably this is the government’s single biggest mailshot on Brexit since the pre-referendum booklet too.  
Nearly three hours since I first read the latest @MarinaHyde, emptying the dishwasher and all I actually did was *think* about ‘fellowship of the ringpieces’ and now I’m clearing up a dropped plate. 
I’m sorry for shagging someone else I’m just so stressed out from brexit!!!  
this Brexit flow chart is getting out of control  
Lol this girl turned up to gym with a bag of @NandosUK, vibing to drake and it’s a whole mooooodThis is the type of energy I need in 2019 
I'm going home this weekend, to Leave territory. I *will* get my mum to sign the petition. 
WATCH: This was @KateHoeyMP in dec 2017 warning of brexit delays! She was laughed at by her colleagues. Kate turned out to be 100% right! #BrexitDebate 
I've never felt 'invisible' anywhere in the world, even in large cities like NY - NOWHERE has ever made me feel like a 'non-person' - which I KNOW is a privilege - but #Brexit has - I never thought I'd ever feel like this in the country I was born and grew up in  
I am told cabinet secretary Mark Sedwill and attorney general Geoffrey Cox informed Cabinet that if at the end of the Letwin process MPs pass a motion mandating the PM to pursue a new route through the Brexit mess - perhaps a referendum, or membership... 
I just joined the Liberal Democrats I want an exit from Brexit - join me here:  via @LibDems 
This petition needs support it has had thirty one thousand hits in the last twenty four hours, it needs more 
Just kicked off at the #timesplus Brexit discussion with @thequentinletts promoting the People’s Vote cause! 
The Britain we know and love is better than this. Britain is outward-looking, open-hearted and open-minded.Our children deserve a better future than Brexit Britain. Let's stop Brexit, and build that better future together.#PeoplesVoteMarch #RevokeArticle50 #PutItToThePeople 
WATCH | @KateHoeyMP on tomorrow's indicative votes: "I hope to revoke Article 50 is there. There are some people who've spent the whole two and a half years trying to stop Brexit & I think it's important we get that out in the open."Quite right, the electorate will be watching!  
If MPs try and block Brexit, 1 in 5 voters say they will never vote again. That includes 38% of leavers. The public will never forgive politicians if they stop Brexit.  
.@jonsnowC4 reveals how 15 priceless Van Gogh paintings were bundled to Britain in a diplomatic bag - because of Brexit concerns. #C4News 
Jeremy, if you had been in court on Feb 21st when @theresa_may 's own Barrister admitted on livestreamed video that the Brexit referendum was illegal, perhaps you would begin to appreciate that this is the biggest crime and threat to democracy that this country has ever faced. 
I just wrote a lovely letter to my cabinet minister MP and suggested that he get prepared for the enquiry that's coming his way. 
Whatever Brexit deal MPs come up with,  it's the public - not politicians - who should have the final say.Agree? SHARE  
Please, @eucopresident 1. Don't trust our politicians 2. Allow us to come back when we have got a decent set of politicians 3. Please don't confuse the population with the politicians 
Tomorrow the @TheIndGroup will support the cross party People’s Vote amendment tabled by Margaret Beckett which ensures no Brexit can occur without a public vote. Remain must be on the ballot paper 
Thank you to all who have liked or retweeted. Totally unexpected response. I’m all for revoking A50, but if it comes to a 2nd referendum the electorate need simple hard facts. No party politically led Leave or Remain campaigns. Just cold hard truths & a bullshit free choice. 
Only 8% of people in Britain identify strongly with a political partyBut 40% now identify strongly with a Remain or Leave #Brexit identityImportant work by @NatCen 
So #Article13 has passed through the EU Government today...Think this is the EU getting back at us for all the Brexit-related DHOTYA entries we’ve had since the referendum 
As MPs vote on Brexit tomorrow, a crucial question: How, exactly, will the NHS survive even more lost staff from - Portugal Spain Ireland  France  Italy  Germany Poland  Greece  Croatia  Holland When we’re 42k nurses & 10k doctors short already? 
Rees-Mogg’s epiphany that #Brexit is ‘a process rather than an event’...... makes me want to slam my head against a brick wall.The sheer arrogance to sell, sell, sell this project to the nation - without having given it due thought. 
Here is that amendment that - if picked by speaker tomorrow - would be debated by MPs and aims at turning the Brexit default from no-deal Brexit to a revocation of Article 50 and remaining in EU  
The 2016 referendum does not deserve any respect*No prospectus*Lies*Fraud*Criminality,#Frauderendum16 History will not look back kindly on this stain on our so called democracy! 
Mark Francois, a sort of inflatable idiot who has spent the past few months bobbing around the broadcast studios like some remnant of the worst ever stag weekend. Can someone please deflate it? Delightful readding very amusing  
I agree @Peston. Whichever side of the debate you are on, revoking Art50 is the best way to TAKE BACK CONTROL of #BREXIT. If MPs won’t support the WA, revoke then plan to leave in a managed way. Alternatively, carve a legit route to remain via the 3Rs: REVOKE, REFERENDUM, REMAIN.  
I mean...#Article13 #Brexit  
The Stop Brexit petition has unprecedented support at nearly 6 million.BUTThis needs to go mega viral now.You know what to do.3.2.1. Go.RETWEETLet's get that counter flying.Petition: Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU.  
#EnoughIsEnough. E-mail your MP and tell them you want to leave on no deal. Join us on Friday in Parliament square to let the government know, that a promise is a promise, and we were promised we would leave on 29th March. #LetsGoWTO 
I respect the 2016 referendum result as much as I respect Lance Armstrong's Tour de France victories 
Important piece by former Court of Appeal judge Sir Richard Aikens. “The way the government has acted...is, at the least, highly unsatisfactory. It must be arguable that the government has acted illegally.” 
Government's telling porkies again: "We will honour the outcome of the 2016 referendum and work to deliver an exit which benefits everyone, whether they voted to Leave or to Remain". There's no #Brexit that benefits even MOST people, let alone everyone. 
Should MPs change the Brexit default from no-deal to “revoke article 50”? What do you think. It would mean UK automatically staying in EU rather than leaving without deal, in event that there is no negotiated exit. SNP have been contemplating putting up amendment to that... 
BREAKING: Sir Bill Cash & ERG lawyer MPs have written to the PM questioning her right to delay Brexit, saying the Govt’s attempt to gain approval of the extension after the event has “called into question the lawfulness of its actions”. Images of letter follows as thread... 
If Brexit is betrayed and the UK remains in the EU, then we are most certainly trapped under the oppressive #Article13 legislation.Whatever your political persuasion, you must now realise that the EU is an enemy of internet freedom. The only solution is to leave it. 
Totally on board with this. If my vote is meaningless then they can't have my money. I urge you to do likewise. Read up on bailiff law, know your rights and starve the beast. If they want a war, let's give them one. 
"I think that we see for the moment a real Brexit revolt by the people in Britain."Guy Verhofstadt MEP, the EU Parliament's Brexit negotiator, reacts to MPs voting to take control of Brexit, the march in London and e-petition.  
David Cameron at home watching the UK fall apart because of his referendum  
Seeing all this #Article13 stuff and it makes you think maybe we should support Brexit after all 
In order to work out whether Brexit is a good or bad thing, you simply need to look at the Brexiteers.BoZoFührageRees-MoggHannanFrancoisBridgenMcVeyBravermanDorriesRaabJenkinCashRedwoodIDSBanksDigby JDysonMartinOdeyEt alYou’d struggle to find much worse. 
I don't trust the ToriesI don't trust MayI don't trust LabourI don't trust CorbynI don't want BrexitI won't be voting for any party which doesn't commit to doing everything possible to #remain, to #RevokeArticle50, to #StopBrexit 
Mayor of Islamabad @ImranKhanPTI we Afghans fully support a free and independent Baluchistan and Pashtunistan. We would like the Paki government to hold a referendum on this issue and let the people of Baluchistan and Pashtunistan decide whether they want to remain part or not 
Dominic Grieve -  To argue that the referendum result imposes a permanency which cannot be challenged is entirely wrong... the House is being prevented from doing its job by this "straightjacket" being imposed on debate.#peoplesvote #RevokeArticle50 #FinalSay 
Politicians have a choice, do they want to be democracy saboteurs or defenders of democracy. Brexit belongs to the people. We will fight on to ensure we get Brexit. 
This is why it’s crucial we all attend LML’s BREXIT RALLY in Parliament Square this Friday 29 March. We need to give MPs the confidence to stand strong against procedural bullying. Sign up here  
The far-left are outraged at @SuellaBraverman's use of the term Cultural Marxism to highlight the oppression of free speech.By proceeding to smear her as far-right and proclaim: "You can't say that!" Haven't you just proven her point?  
2016: The referendum will settle the brexit debate once and for all.2019:  
The perfect way to unwind! @adamfleming from #Brexitcast does Brexit ASMR.   
#Remain sees #Brexit as a nostalgic spasm of imperial grandeur whereas #Leave understands 21st C will bring a bright future of mutually beneficial trade. Why do Remainers find it necessary to ridicule & vilify the #British People? #ukpoli @ActionBrexit #RespectTheResult 
The list of shame.UK MEPs who voted to kill internet freedom with #Article13If Brexit is betrayed and we have a European Parliament election, UKIP is ready to unseat them all, develop a Digital Bill of Rights and protect the people from greedy corporations and censorship.  
So Jacob Rees-Mogg can change his mind & vote for a Brexit deal he voted against twice before because the facts have changed, but he says it would be undemocratic for the public to have a 2nd ref & ratify the final Brexit deal now we are of the facts. The man is fucking deluded 
No right to appeal available for EU citizens if refused #SettledStatus after 29th March! After a criminal conviction you can appeal, why not us who have not done anything wrong besides choosing the UK as our home?Do you think this is acceptable? We certainly don't!@sajidjavid 
Dear @Mike_Fabricant,Wow! You think illegality in the referendum means the Brexit vote was null and void?Me too!Regards from your fellow revoker,Tom(Please RT if you agree with Mike the referendum should be rerun)  
I’ve had an idea, not sure if it’s correct though..If every body stopped selling weapons, nobody could buy any ??Please RT. 
Make no mistake, the reason why we had the Referendum in the first place is the reason we are still in #BrexitLimbo - both @UKLabour & @Conservatives desperately trying to appease potential & previous UKIP voters. They are terrified of a Kipper thrashing in a GE. #StopBrexit 
“We've been made to look a laughing-stock across the world. We've abandoned democracy and have a dictatorship run by the elite.“This is Mrs May's deal... She undermined two Brexit Secretaries who were developing policies (whilst) she secretly developed her own”#StandUp4Brexit 
"In short, the Withdrawal Agreement is a one-way ticket back into the EU – before 2025 and on far worse terms than we currently have...This is NOT is real Brexit. It is a Boomerang Brexit. It is a trap."  
Stressed out by #Brexit? Fear not, I’ve done a relaxing #ASMR version of the deal.  Here’s a preview.  required. (1) 
why am I the only person who doesn’t have a fucking clue what brexit even is? 
Just when you thought the Tory Brexit chaos couldn’t get any worse…What. A. Shambles.  
May faces 20 ministerial resignations if they are not allowed free vote on solving Brexit mess - ITV News  
Brexit & Animal Welfare Impact Assessment: Analysis of Threats - @Animals_MDPI'Brexit poses substantial risks to weaken animal protection in UK, EU & internationally' - @SteveMcCVet#Brexit#SentientBeings#AnimalWelfareImpactAssessment@_UoW  
Brexit is starting to get real. And some people in Britain are making unusual preparations  
I'm done guys. I'm defeated. No matter how hard I try, I'll simply never write a Brexit or Trade article as funny as this 2016 one from Daniel Hannan. Every paragraph is a gift. Thank you @Willem_Leenen for sharing this masterpiece of satire with me. 
I was very much a 'remain' vote for brexit, but now if EU are endorsing #Article13 - LET'S GET OUT! 
UK: does a BrexitThe World: lol stupid UK EU: #Article13The World: I dunno man maybe UK is onto something. 
#TheresaMay and her attempt to get #Brexit completed.#BrexitChaos 
Outcome was a narrow margin. I believe we need to go back to the ppl and ask, in light of what you've seen, do you want another ref? #Brexit  
I've been attacked by ideological Lexiters today so I am putting this out there. If you are a Lexiter you're an absolute disgrace. I don't even think you should be in the Labour Party as #Brexit is the biggest betrayal of working people in every part of the UK in my lifetime. 
Doubt the relatives of tens of millions of dead Soviets would quite see it like this. A recurring characteristic amongst hard line #Brexit leaders - empty headed jingoism married with almost complete ignorance of history.  
Were you mis-sold Brexit?Find out by filling in this simple form, you might be eligible for a revocation (17.4m were mis-sold Brexit in 2016. Your home might be at risk if you don't do something about it) 
We won't let the PM or the Remainer horde in Parliament bully us into backing a toxic Brexit deal  
All the unionists saying they'll never vote again if Brexit doesn't happen... PERFECT #IndyRef2 = 100%  
Yet more evidence of the way the government tries to cheat Brexit through: Leadsom in HoC says ‘indicative votes must conform to 2017 manifestos’ i. e. must only have Brexit options -! NOTE that both Con & Lab manifestos were REJECTED in the 2017 election. 
“Democracy isn’t indefinitely owned by the people who voted that day in the referendum. It’s not owned by the government, the Conservative party, or the Prime Minister. Our country’s future is owned by the people” says @heidiallen75. 
Live scenes as MPs seize control of Brexit:  
Don’t get me wrong, Mogg, I like the ‘Grand Wizards’ name, I’m just saying I’m not sure these are wizard hats 
That became obvious very early on. The referendum was called by Cameron, taken over by May and soon became clear there was no forward planning for the outcome.  What followed was a complete debacle, total lack of negotiating skills and ridicule of the UK by the rest of the world. 
Most voters are not wrong. 
issues these old men could have looked into rather than what people share on the internet1. Climate change2. Unemployment3. Crime cases rising up4. Health and social security5. Immigration 6. Pensions and taxation 7. The education system9. Effects of Brexit#Article13 
The so-called 'People's Vote' campaign is extremely well funded and well resourced, more than 90 staff in its London HQ apparently. Tony Blair and George Osborne want to reverse Brexit, using major donors and big business. This is the establishment vs the People. 
“Are people really suggesting that 65 million people in the UK are incapable of governing ourselves? Well they put that argument in the referendum and they lost. So let’s get on with implementing what the British people want us to do and just leave for God’s sake” Mark Francois  
Despite shifting political dynamics and uncertainty ahead, #PGIMFixedIncome’s base case for #Brexit is that a hard landing will be avoided. 
Mogg is getting frightened. Now ANY Brexit will do!! He’s changed his mind (the public are not allowed to) - because of his taxes... 
Have said this before: but there are far too many Westminster types who spent months attacking Farage and others as paranoid cranks for suggesting Parliament would try and stop Brexit, now calling them naive idiots for not realising Parliament would try to stop Brexit. 
The public will not forgive politicians who admit PM’s deal leaves UK a vassal state forever, locks UK in CU, continues ECJ rule and wastes £39bn for nothing in return, then votes for it anyway.  PM’s deal isn’t Brexit.  Don’t vote for it. 
The ERG had Brexit in their grasp but reached too far, a bit like icarus but with wings made of frozen shit. 
MUST WATCH: @Anna_Soubry passionately explains why MPs must put their constituents first which means allowing them to have a vote on the #Brexit deal.Demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal  
Just out of interest given recent events.#Brexit   Leave or Remain in the EU?Please RETWEET after voting.Please FOLLOW for updates. 
I would love to be reminded of precisely what, in a parliamentary democracy, is democratic about a minority government seizing control from Parliament in order to railroad through a disastrous, economy-wrecking decision based on a non-legally binding, advisory referendum result. 
The awful thing about Brexit is: a lot of these Westminster people seem to be enjoying it. 
I’m at an event in Westminster by Brexit ultras the Bruges Group, and look who’s here to greet us...  
brexit, now that article 13 has passed  
Dear @theJeremyVine @JeremyVineOn5 ..Jeremy just said "it was an advisory referendum ...whatever' brushing it off.Jeremy MUST BE sacked NOW.. No excuses for this idiotic brainwashed bias.  I am sick to death of the BBC's blatant pro Brexit stance. Does JV have offshore funds ? 
Mark Francois never mentions his Italian mother.#WorldWarTwo  
8R Brexit Plan- Rethink (Brexit)- Revoke (A50)- Remain (in the EU)- Reform (the EU)- Rebuild (UK economy)- Rebalance (away from London)- Reconcile (L/R factions)- Reunite (component parts of the UK)Job done! 
“It isn’t Brexiteers who are extremists. It’s the Remainer establishment. Their war on our democratic rights is the ugliest, most prejudicial and most extremist political position in British politics right now.”Brendan O’Neill on the Brexit endgame 
Dear Madhouse,The Corbyn/Starmer Brexit plan is the answer.Now can we please fight austerity? 
Sir Bill Cash is a Brexit hero who has understood long before others the pernicious and disadvantageous nature of previous EU Treaties. He is very clear that May’s deal isn’t Brexit because we won’t have control of our laws. That’s all you need to know. 
Journalists sometimes disparage vox pops, but this guy who spoke to the AP today about Brexit is eloquent.  
“Why would we vote for an agreement which cuts Northern Ireland off from the rest of the United Kingdom, which keeps the United Kingdom in the Customs Union and the Single Market on a premise which has now been exposed as a con” @eastantrimmp#StandUp4Brexit 
Today I chatted with a leave-voting delivery driver. We didn't agree on everything but he said he'd now like to see #Brexit scrapped so we could all "get back to normal". He said he's going to sign the petition.   If we all had that one conversation ...  
The American press is saying Brexit 'seems impossible to understand'.Actually guys, it's very simple. We just made a really big fucking mistake and are too embarrassed to admit it. 
The revoke petition has really authorised political figures to say things they otherwise were too scared to admit 
The Tories have admitted 7,990 people died within 6 months of being rejected for PIP, since 2013. Their current Brexit shambles will make sure hardly anyone gets to know about this.Please retweet this if you think Tory Ministers should hang their overpaid heads in shame. 
Iceland's Minister of Foreign affairs Guðlaugur Þór Þórðarson tells @adamboultonSKY that if the UK joins the EEA post-Brexit then "everyone, everyone will line up to make free trade deals with the UK...for you, it's only opportunities"  
This Brexit debacle is gonna rattle the 2030 A-level History/Politics students 
DAMNING: Majority of voters believe Parliament trying to stop Brexit, poll finds. It’s a disgrace.  
“Back in ‘16 David Cameron was very clear that this was a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity, that’s why we had such a massive national debate...to say that we now need to go back and have a referendum on this, we’ve made that decision” @km_finlayson - Deputy Chair of @ConYoungWomen 
Since our Government & Opposition are failing their job of protecting us from the damage they know Brexit will do, here's a round up of some tools to help folk see why need to StopBrexit (sign the #RevokeArticle50 petition)#PowerToThePeople #WakeUpUK1. 
What’s it like being 18 in this Brexit mess? Watch -  
A group of public school educated men called the "Grand Wizards" driving to a country castle to blackmail the Prime Minister to deliver "no deal" brexit or resign but give UK "vasal state" status is EXACTLY what every last worker in Sunderland or pensioner in Barnsley voted for. 
More good news from Prof. John Curtice: our divided nation is finally coming back together!"Quite remarkable... Leavers & Remainers are now largely united."Both think #Brexit is turning out badly. Of course, Brexiters tend to blame everything but Brexit itself. #PeoplesVote 
Voters in Eddisbury want final say on Brexit, according to new survey  
To all Brexiters who keep threatening civil unrest as they "will take to the streets" unless they get their Brexit: I wouldn't keep crying wolf, if I were you; you can't even muster a couple of hundred people for Fararge's march, even less if it's raining!#StopBrexit 
Have you noticed it’s always the ones telling you to “calm down“ who made you angry in the first place? If Remainers had accepted the result of the referendum, we wouldn’t be divided or angry. We’d be out, and getting on with what’s best for our country, united.  
Helen Clark, ex PM of New Zealand, has just said NZ only ever had one Referendum & it was set up as a 2 stage ref. She was very clear the UK should never have called a one-stage referendum on Brexit. It was a route to disaster. 
Our new polling shows 41% agree that instead of delaying Brexit, Britain should just leave to trade on WTO rules on March 29th, compared to 28% who disagree.It is now up to MPs to take us out on WTO rules.  
Liar. You're simply a liar. No shame. Just straight up lying to the British people.You already admitted that the Brexit deal is worse than Membership because it means we have less sovereignty than EU members. You're now arguing to turn us into what YOU called a SLAVE STATE!  
Leave winning was never part of the plan. They mis-judged the nation and ever since the referendum the elected representatives of the people have have done all they can to NOT implement the will of the people they are supposed to represent.#DrainTheSwamp 
Labour Chief Whip: It would be better to cancel Brexit than leave with no deal  
Brexit protest yesterday outside #ukparliament House of Commons against change of Article 50 date as MPs trying to overturn the Brexit Referendum @LeaveMnsLeave @labourleave @GetBritainOut#respectdemocracy #respect2016referendum #results #leavemeansleave #respectthevotes 
Read the latest piece by one of our Research Executives @JoshMackenzieL explaining the threat that delay or voting for Mrs May's deal poses to the military sovereignty of the United Kingdom 
I’ve started typing so many tweets today re Brexit. Trying to find the right words...Deleted them and started over...And so it continues...I’ve concluded that the best thing to say is simply...WHAT A BLOODY MESS.And a deliberate and manufactured mess no less.#shambles 
. @eastantrimmp "I prefer no-deal to a deal [PM's deal] which does the damage to the UK economy, which does the damage to our constitution, and which does the damage to Northern Ireland, that this deal does." 
Couldn't be clearer. 
@JANUSZCZAK Check out Escher's Brexit.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg's firm Somerset Capital Holdings is managed via subsiduaries in the Cayman Islands and Singapore - thereby avoiding UK tax. So, no contribution towards the NHS, welfare, education, roads or public services. Rees-Mogg isn't community-minded, neither is his Brexit!  
#BBCAskThis Funny how the govt will not be bound by Indicative Votes but seem hell-bent on being bound by an Advisory Referendum. 
"I don't think ppl who were influenced by one of the most dishonest campaigns in democratic history, voted for economic disaster." #Brexit  
We can't ignore the role nationalism & identity played in #Brexit vote.Nor can we ignore need to give every part of the UK a voice & develop a progressive patriotism that is diverse & open.It's time to talk about Englishness.My piece for @timesredbox  
The coming constitutional crunch is taking us to a #Brexit general election at which the people will finally get a choice between a Tory leader committed to Brexit and a Labour leader committed to Brexit. 
It's official.John Curtice, the UK's most widely respected polling guru, says Brexit is no longer the "will of the people".Remain 55%Leave.   35%Britain is a Remain country now.#r4today @LBC #PoliticsLive #Newsnight #bbcaq #bbcqt #marr #ridge 
Just read this from @guardian and I feel sick:‘EU citizens living in the UK would be stripped of their freedom of movement, housing and social security rights by Home Office legislation introduced to regulate immigration following Brexit’ 
DUP’s Jim Shannon on #Today saying he’s disappointed their friends in the ERG appear now to care more about Brexit than the Union. Did someone drop a penny? 
My theory is that GE2017 precipitated a structural fall in polled support for Brexit/ rise for Remain - reflecting changing electorate, and the fact that Brexit had become inextricably linked with perceptions of the May Government’s competence. 
It is so, so easy to find the problem with any attempt at a Brexit solution: a second referendum can cause further division, the Norway model doesn't have voting rights, the petition doesn't change govt policy, May doesn't have to enact indicative votes. So easy and so lazy 
May should be forced to sign this and send it to Tusk:"I hereby give notice that at 11:59 CET on 11th April 2019, if no withdrawal agreement has been signed between the UK and the EU, the UK withdraws its Article 50 notice and chooses instead to remain a member of the EU." 
Proof that no matter how much the media tries to dress up last night's betrayal of British democracy, the public see through the naked, ruthless ambition of our deluded MPs. #DrainTheSwamp Support us at  
Brexit latest: The people who promised sunlit uplands, £350m for the NHS & the easiest deal in human history bear no responsibility for their absence & still have a mandate for a Brexit that delivers none of them. This is because of something called the ‘will of the people’. 
Which is the greater:a) A country that attracts immigrants?b) A country that drives its own citizens away? 
Deborah Meaden told LBC that she is against Brexit because she loves her country and doesn't want business to suffer.@mrjamesob | @DeborahMeaden 
I don’t know what’s more offensive the sun ridiculing hundreds of thousands marching in protest of brexit on Saturday or the sneering repetition of that copy by a presenter of the supposed bbc flagship news programme it’s beyond unprofessional John Humphrys! #r4today 
Our new polling shows the public know what MPs are up to. They are betraying Brexit.  
An interesting result there is the number who now claim to have voted leave has plummeted. Excluding don't knows in September 16 this was 52%, by February 19 is fallen to 45%.Similar to Iraq war, at the time it enjoyed 75% support, now almost no-one will admit to supporting it. 
“There is little to no point in holding any “indicative votes” since we already know that Parliament wants and intends to cancel Brexit. It would prefer to do that in some form where it could pretend that is not what it is in fact doing.”  
How will you be celebrating the UK not leaving the EU on Friday?29th of March is #RemainDay 
Most voters believe Parliament is trying to block Brexit, poll reveals  
"Had a second referendum been held last month, 55% would vote in favour of Remain. Leaving the EU is no longer the view of a majority of the British public” - Sir John Curtice  
"A smart WTO Brexit with well-designed trade, immigration, agricultural, fishing and regulatory policies would, far from being a ‘disaster’, have an excellent chance of delivering substantial long-term net benefits."  
Brexiters always reverently quote Sir John Curtice, to say opinion has not changed. Will they quote him today? "Had a second referendum been held last month, 55 per cent would vote in favour of Remain. There must surely now be doubts that leaving is still the will of the people.” 
“We know there’s a majority of MPs against Brexit. Unfortunately a majority of MPs who don’t respect the referendum, who don’t want to honour their promises of manifesto pledges, are seeking to overturn that. And it’s unacceptable” @SuellaBraverman#StandUp4Brexit 
When Brexit is dead I'm having a party. You're all invited. 
“There’s no way the British people, with a great history of democracy, are going to allow this Parliament to steal Brexit. Even people who voted Remain respect the result. I’m very disappointed with this House of Parliament, as I’m sure the country is” @ABridgen#StandUp4Brexit 
Media reporting that MPs have “seized control of Brexit” from the Government. Wrong. This rotten Parliament has seized the implementation of Brexit from the people. We need to wake men up. It is US vs THEM. Time to insist on the Brexit result being implemented, 
Anyone who thinks that “we’ll be fine” if the UK crashes out of the EU with a no deal Brexit should watch this video and reassess their opinion. 
MPs must remember that parliament cannot be seen to "respect" an advisory referendum that the Court of Appeal confirmed was "won" by corruption, fraud, lies & illegality & would have been voided if not advisory. That would make parliament as corrupt as May & Corbyn.  
The vast majority of MPs were elected on a manifesto promise to respect and implement the outcome of the 2016 referendum, and Conservative MPs were explicitly elected on a promise to leave the Single Market and Customs Union. Now is the time to honour that promise.  
Word of the (Brexit) day: "morass" - an area of boggy, swampy land that engulfs those seeking to traverse it; a situation that traps, confuses, impedes escape or progress (borrowed from the Dutch, "morasch"). See also "quagmire", "muskeg", "tar-pit", "slough" , etc.  
Leave with no deal on 29 March. Robin Tilbrook has started legal action as the extension is illegal 
Brexit in a nut shell @piersmorgan is 100% spot on. #BrexitBETRAYAL #Brexit  
The referendum was a vote to allow government to negociate a UK withdrawal from full EU membership. It was fraudulent.Theresa's negociation has failed to pass parliament. Brexit has failed. There's no mandate to leave without a deal. 
“#Brexit Divides Us - Let’s Stay Together” We are proud to announce the launch of our first crowdfunder campaign to pay for mass leafleting across Yorkshire, so we can spread our positive messages about why we should stay in the EU. Please support & share.  
‘It looks to me that we will end up with revocation followed by referendum, or a referendum ​followed by revocation. Those are the only credible solutions’. My speech in the House of Lords last night  
Just realised that until now I hadn't shared this with family and friends on Facebook. Have you? 
‘See that ‘Brexit’, that’s you that is. That’s your school project, that’s the best piece of homework you could do’.‘See that Theresa May?’.‘I’m aware of her work’.‘You love her, she’s your girlfriend’.‘You are her, that’s you that is’.#Brexit #HistoryToday  
I’ll take a democracy respecting Etonian over you every time.Here’s your shameful record:• demanded a referendum• campaigned for Leave• then Remain• came out against a second ref• stood on clean Brexit manifesto• called for second ref• defects without by-election  
‘Just 6 per cent now think there will be a good Brexit outcome. 55 per cent now support remaining in the EU’ (BBC News)... which is why Revoke & Referendum must now happen 
An early start at Dublin Airport for myself, Niall Murphy & Declan Fearson. We'll be joining up with Daniel Holder from @CAJNi for a packed day of engagements in Strasbourg with MEPsTop of the agenda is the protection of the GFA & citizens rights in Northern Ireland #Brexit  
Don’t eat human poo!  Have a second referendum #brexit #SecondReferendum 
Please Retweet if you think this is unacceptable: “#EU citizens living in the UK would be stripped of their freedom of movement, housing and social security rights by Home Office legislation” 
#remain Let's exit from #Brexit Yours an ex Brexit voter and more important a voter in a marginal seat  
Demonstrates perfectly why it was a massive mistake to hold the referendum in the first place. 
"#RupertMurdoch was once asked why he hated the EU so much. ‘That’s easy,’ he said.’When I go to Downing Street they do what I say; when I go to Brussels they take no notice.’ No wonder, then, that he was an avid supporter of Brexit." AFTER 30 YEARS OF PROPAGANDA HE GETS HIS WISH 
What part of "We have a veto and an opt-out" do you not understand? 
2018 election was an extreme referendum on Trump, following traditional models but in a nationalized & polarized context; party defection was below 4%Congruence between presidential approval & House vote was highest ever:#SocSciResearch Jacobson 1/2 
"No government could give a blank check to commit to an outcome without knowing what it is," Theresa May said before Monday’s vote.  Ummm, isn’t that precisely and entirely what the whole Brexit initiative is and has been? 
Scotland to seek Brexit from England.  
Paid for by British and American taxpayers #GazaUnderAttack 
Owen Smith sums up precisely the potential sleight of hand the Govt might try to ensure a #PeoplesVote gets ruled out...they must not be allowed any more cheating!#RevokeArticle50 Stop #Brexit & #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal.  
Let's see if we can get #NoBrexitNoCouncilTax trending. Take back YOUR power and show the corrupt web of deceit who is really in charge! #Brexit #EU 
Jeremy Corbyn: "I would like to congratulate the house for taking control, the government’s approach has been an abject failure. This house must now find a solution...where Govt has failed, this House must & I believe will succeed" meanwhile the PM was no where to be seen #Brexit 
Still seeing some MPs claiming it was a million who marched. Was a massive march, but was between 312k and 400k, say the experts. Via Wired. 
Whatever Brexit deal the @HouseofCommons now might decide upon is far from what was promised in 2016. The million who marched at the weekend were seeking the opportunity to give their consent in a #FinalSay. This started with the people and should end with the people #RightToVote 
Explained perfectly. Thank you internet. #Brexit  
for me there are 5 distinct stages to reading brexit news1. what has happened2. what has happened again but slower3. what does that mean4. is it good or bad5. ok but how bad 
Now it's about the Kardashians. The Brexit conversation literally lasted 3 minutes & the conclusion was that no one understands the whole thing & that migrants will still be coming regardless. You have 3 minutes to inform someone - where will you even start? 
The Raab (aka the twin brother of Alan B'Stard) has probably heard you have your suspicions about the validity of the #Brexit vote. He doesn't like dissenters.  
Can 329 votes trump 17,400,000?  NO! #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #BrexitVote 
More people in Scotland voted SNP in 2016 on a manifesto commitment to hold an independence referendum  (1,059,897) than voted to Leave the EU (1,018,322). Over half-a-million more voted Remain (1,661,191) than Leave (1,018,322). 
Probably a fucked up thing to say as someone who doesn't live in the UK so is unaffected, but I hope the Brexit negotiations go on forever. Like…I hope in 30 years they are trying to introduce a referendum saying "okay okay, how about we go best out of seven?" 
Brexiteer Andrew Bridgen - I'd like to see May stand down. We won't get #Brexit through this HoC, because 2/3rds of MPs are for remain.   
I think this will end up in a referendum not that I’m happy about it. But IF it went to it, how would you vote? I voted #Remain in the ref but I would vote #Leave to respect the 2016 vote  
Parliament has voted against the right wing coup that the European Research  Group represents in arguing for the calamity of No Deal Brexit - disreputably characterised as the people’s will but not presented at the time. Congratulations to those Tory MPs who put country first 
Now serious talk of a public inquiry into #Brexit - remember these names.  
Jeremy Corbyn has just argued for a new referendum.Well done Jeremy. That's a start. Keep it going.  
We are now heading for at least 12 months delay, European elections and a very soft Brexit or no Brexit at all. Brought to you by people who really want Brexit. No, it makes no sense. No sense at all. 
It’s the political class promising one thing in relation to Brexit & delivering another. Trust in politics is broken...  
At last - MPs will have the opportunity to find a way through this Brexit impasse. But we shouldn’t have had to fight so hard and for so long to be allowed to do our jobs. Poor leadership from the big parties has failed this country. Time for better politics @TheIndGroup 
According to US double standards:Israel stealing and occupying the #GolanHeights, a land that belongs to Syria, and plundering its oil and water—Good!But Crimea, a land that historically belongs to Russia, holding a democratic referendum to rejoin the Russian Federation—Bad! 
"The government have handled Brexit well"Agree: 7%Disagree: 81%via @ComRes 
Letwin is a breakthrough. But soft Brexit isn’t the answer. No one marched this weekend for the customs union or a relationship with the single market. People marched this weekend to defend our European identity and to keep our place in the EU. This is Generation Europe UK. 
Parliament takes control. An opportunity to build a cross-party cooperation leading to an enhanced political declaration & a closer future relationship! #Brexit 
He pressed an egg on his head & given 28 days in prison?Police officers are viciously attacked, left with broken bones, cuts, bruises, flashbacks, nerve damage, removed from frontline & those responsible are spared any punishment let alone prison  #joke 
After nearly 3 years of bullying, lies and bluster, Parliament has voted to take control away from this unhinged government. Now we must work through the options. For any Brexit deal to be legitimate, it must be ratified by the public in a #FinalSay vote. 
Oh Laura ... Laura ... all that careful "news management" ... & you naively let drop that the "Chequers Day-Trippers" cheerfully unashamedly brazenly call themselves "Grand Wizards"? Oh DEAR!!! The truth will out.#GrandWizards #KKK @Conservatives #Tories #Brexit #Brexiteers 
We are witnessing a government falling apart. A PM losing votes. Ministers resigning. The country deserves better than this when we are facing the decision of a generation on the future of the UK. 
This is the week that Parliament betrays Brexit. The week that Parliament discards the Manifestos on which they were elected. The week in which democracy is in the greatest peril of my lifetime.Millions may never vote again. Still the establishment jeers. Still they pour scorn. 
Pahahahaaa he's blocking everyone 
MPs have voted to hold series of none binding votes.  The government is perfectly capable of delivering on the referendum result on April 12th.  If they don’t, it’s because Mrs May and her ministers will have chosen not to 
UK MPs vote to take control of Commons business in unprecedented move to try to find majority for any #Brexit option  
After 34 million of us voted this is how our future is actually being decided. #brexit What century are we in again?  
In 2010 David Cameron refused to build more social housing because he saw it as a breeding ground for Labour voters. When you watch this video below you will come to realise that holding a EU referendum wasn't the worst decision he ever made.  
Gee, I wonder why Brexit is such a dumpster fire   
Tory MPs shout over Ian Blackford, SNP leader at Westminster, and tell SNP elected members to "go home." Join the SNP now, and help bring our government home for good. 
I'm sorry but if you don't admire @Anna_Soubry for persistently speaking up for what is best for the country in the face of credible death threats, you have let squalid party loyalty and the vile toxins of Brexit overcome your better nature. 
Let us not lose sight of who brought brexit to our door and who's behind it. It is less to do with the EU and more to do with an ultra capitalist white supremacist Neo feudalist authoritarian view of how they see the 21st century being ordered, an old...new order. 6/ #FBPE 
Whether or not you agree with @IanBlackfordMP on Independence (and as a group we are neutral), this is a great speech. The SNP have provided far more consistent and effective opposition to #Brexit than Labour.  
Irish PM Leo Varadkar "Confident of Keeping Border Invisible in No-Deal Brexit"It was always thus. Shows that threats of a "hard border" had a whole lot more to do with gaining leverage in the negotiations than fearing restrictions on the border  
2016: BREXIT IS NOT RACIST2019: BREXIT WILL BE RESOLVED BY A GROUP OF WHITE MEN THAT NAMED THEMSELVES AFTER THE KKK 
#DominicGrieve "one of the tendancies since the referendum had been to 'close down' debate". The referendum result was not a 'diktat' banning debate. 'You cannot have a working democracy where you close down debate". Democracy 'goes on every day, every second, all the time'.  
Thank you @Anna_Soubry for mentioning just now in HoC the fact we were there at the #PutItToThePeopleMarch on Saturday - you are so right it is not an elitist movement..... we will be the worst affected by Brexit in the NE.  
There will not be a brexit 50p  
A simple binary referendum question must be offered.  (2/x)  
.@DanielJHannan and @DouglasCarswell wrote a book called The Plan which proposed this process for citizens to be able to use a petition to force a referendum to veto a parliamentary bill.  (1/x)  
Liberal Democrats fined £18,000 over EU referendum campaign breaches  
 @lisanandy passionately attacks the disgraceful behaviour of the govt regarding medicine/stockpiling etc.. Defo a "Must Watch" #Brexit  
Macron's Brexit anger revealed: 'English stopped us from building United States of Europe'  
The establishment are betraying Brexit, so the people are marching back. Parliament Square, 29th March, 4pm. Sign up:  
Regardless of what happens next, I want to say congratulations to all of you. Who'd have thought 2 yrs ago that we'd be 5 days from the scheduled Brexit day and the PM would be considering a new referendum.Stopping Brexit doesn't fix the UK. It just unlocks the tools to do so.  
Jacob Rees mogg and the Grand Wizards of the ERG #grandwizards #Brexit  
Stunned by @theresa_may's arrogance today. "Indicative votes are just that; indicative."Well, guess what? An advisory referendum is just that; advisory.It's been proven that any form of #Brexit will hurt, so why are we still talking about this?! #remainernow #PeoplesVote 
I will be voting for Oliver Letwin’s amendment (a) tonight to give @HouseofCommons the right to vote for alternative solutions to the Brexit deadlock. We cannot keep going round in circles. It’s time to decide on Brexit and for parliament to demonstrate which solution it supports 
The saddest mistake about #brexit is that once the UK replaces its membership with something worse there is no way back to the privileged position it has now. 
MPs want to honour the result of the referendum and act in the national interest. Unfortunately, the only thing going for Brexit is honouring the result of the referendum and there is a key piece of information missing - .... 
In the @HouseofCommons, founding member, Dominic Grieve outlines his co-signature on the Letwin/Grieve amendment: "you cannot have a democracy that shuts down debate...so, to argue that the referendum result imposes a permanency that cannot be challenged is entirely wrong."  
Is it any wonder that trust in British politics has collapsed. The vast majority of the political class promised one thing in relation to Brexit and is doing something else......  
And yet Mr Kerr’s Conservative Party unleashed a #Brexit referendum for which there was no demand. And then, when his country voted to stay he abandoned  them on the high altar of Unionism. He doesn’t speak for Scotland.  #indyref2 
Why can’t Parliamentarians see the danger of utilising novel constitutional procedures without any precedent in order to overturn a referendum that they promised would decide the issue. They are trashing the reputation of one of the most respected Parliaments in the world. 
UKIP are now on 9% in Westminster polls and the final Brexit betrayal hasn't even hit yet.The Tories lied about being the party to trust to deliver Brexit. They will never be trusted again. UKIP is ready.  
"Getting over" no insulin is called dying 
“We operate a system of parliamentary government, not government by Parliament... It is the wish of the Members of Parliament by a majority of the government which forms the government, and therefore the wishes of the electorate are at stake” @BillCashMP 
I’m not a nationalist but I live in Argyll and what Ian has said here resonates with me and I can see it resonating with swaths of people throughout Scotland. A no deal Brexit will have the people in Scotland pulling themselves out of this incompetent Tory mess.  
Labour’s chief whip says he is personally in favour of halting Brexit by #revoking #Art50 if the only other option is #nodeal. Just shows the power of the #RevokeArt50Petition #Brexit  
Here's the government negotiating with the EU 
The other massive problem now is the number of journalists so embedded in support for Brexit that they can’t or won’t report reality. It leaves the public in the dark & so denies us a fundamental prerequisite of functioning democracy. 
Rupert Murdoch: "When I go into Downing Street they do what I say; when I go to Brussels they take no notice".Britain doesn't need fictional independence from the EU. It needs real independence from Murdoch!#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit  
Give these out at street stalls, tables, events, universities etc.QR code links straight to the petition. Please RT RT RT RT17 million signatures  here we come#RevokeArticle50Petition#BollockstoBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
What sort of #Brexit did you expect when you voted in the referendum? Please RT. 
A #Brexit haiku.(Seen on Facebook, and presumably taken on the #PeoplesVoteMarch ) 
That “yet” feels rather superfluous... 
Illusionist @TheUriGeller says he can force a second Brexit referendum - using telepathy!And he wants the UK to help him...  
Theresa May says, "No government could give a blank cheque to commit to an outcome without knowing what it is.”That is exactly what she & her government did on the 29th of March 2017 as they invoked Article 50.#Brexit #UKPolitics #Leave #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
UK Cabinet Ministers prepare for 'managed' No Deal #Brexit  via AwardsDarwin #MondayMotivation Schengen NoDeal Theresa May 
We urge EVERYONE to come out & show your support THIS Saturday 30th March at 3pm!Bring a friend, tell a family member & spread the message please.#Brexit #SharedIreland #EU #BorderCommunitiesAgainstBrexit 
The petition to #RevokeArticle50 has now been signed by more people than the populations of Malta Luxembourg Cyprus Estonia Latvia Slovenia Lithuania Croatia Ireland Slovakia FinlandNext countries to beat: Denmark Bulgaria#Brexit  
May says Letwin's amendment giving Parliament control would overturn the balance of our Constitution. She has wrecked our constitution by treating a criminally corrupted advisory referendum victory as a divine mandate to shut down meaningful democracy on #Brexit. 
.@sarahwollaston says if the government agree to give MPs a say on what type of Brexit deal they would support, then it should also give the public the same right in a #PeoplesVote on the final deal. 
Disappointed but not surprised that amendment (b) was not selected by the Speaker for today’s debate. It was tabled by @willquince and simply reaffirms our commitment to honour the referendum result. Strange decision by the Speaker? 
I genuinely believe the British people should have the #FinalSay on how any Brexit deal compares with the promises made in the 2016 EU referendum. I look forward to meeting with @peterkyle and the PM to discuss our #compromise amendment 
Remember, that. @theresa_may  is only in the position of PM after lying to the Queen about having a workable majority.She now seeks to emulate Charles I using Royal Prerogative over an Advisory Referendum. Parliament settled this matter once and it may have to do so again. 
"Slow Brexit" is going to be used as yet another false justification for just letting any Brexit happen due to Brexit fatigue.ANY Brexit will trigger the better part of a decade of negotiations with the EU. So if you're bored of Brexit, do NOT sleep-walk into that...WAKE UP! 
Things that Brexit will do whatever happens now1. Irish unification within 15 years2. Scots independence3. UK reputation tarnised4. Nativist angry politics as mainstreamEven revocation probably wont stop these now.The UK we know is draining away. 
Helena Bonham Carter marching for the brexit protest ! LEGENDS ONLY !  
Why is the PM incapable of accepting that democracy is a process - not a one-off event?The people want a say on the #Brexit deal.She claims a #PeoplesVote would lead to endless referendums - but a confirmatory vote would be the end of this tortuous process. #PutItToThePeople 
“Slow Brexit”  
Anyway here’s what slow brexit looks like 
. @HenrySmithUK "Almost three years ago, every household in my constituency, like the rest of the country, was sent a leaflet paid for by the taxpayer, from the Government, advocating that we Remain, but also crucially, saying the result would be honoured." pic.twitter.com/ALPxRZLBXA 
ONCE MORE FOR THE CHEAP SEATS (AND @KateHoeyMP )"NO DEAL" MEANS CRASHING OUT. PULLING THE PLUG. FREEFALLING WITHOUT A PARACHUTE. OUT OF THE FRYING PAN AND BONED UP THE ARSE WITH A RED-HOT POKER. IT IS DEMONSTRABLY *NOT* A "DIFFERENT KIND OF DEAL". 
As it stands, deal or no deal, animals will lose vital legal protections post-Brexit unless Michael Gove introduces legislation before/if(!) we leave the EU. Please sign & share our petition to help ensure a #BetterDealForAnimals  #PeoplePower 
. @eastantrimmp "The whole premise of the Withdrawal Agreement is based on a foundation of sand; there will be no checks along the Irish border, therefore no threat to peace, therefore no disruption to the Island of Ireland... When are you going to stop using NI as an excuse?" 
Theresa May suggests her party’s manifesto should guide Brexit not Majority in House. Ken Clarke reminds her that the “manifesto appeared halfway through the election campaign, it was not discussed in cabinet and was not circulated to candidates already fighting their campaigns”  
There would likely be some short-term disruption in a no-deal scenario, but it would ensure a Brexit of opportunity and promise.  
"Slow Brexit" is a bit like "slow death". Better than quick death? Hard to choose, but most people would opt for no death at all. 
WATCH | @CrispinBlunt: "Does the PM understand that by taking No Deal off the table at the behest of this Remain Parliament, she has just put the final torpedo into a real Brexit and represents the most shameful surrender by a British leader since Singapore in 1942?" Brutal!   
. @KateHoeyMP "I don't call it a 'no-deal', it's not a 'no-deal', it's a different type of deal that would take us out, it's a WTO deal.... In the end, what really matters is the people's vote, not what this Parliament says " 
May just told the HoC that the referendum wasn't advisory. Unbelievable.  
Theresa May and the leader of the opposition were too busy to join us on Saturday but does she agree with the observation of the Chancellor that such a referendum would be a perfectly coherent proposition?  
Relatable #Brexit  
So Theresa May will not promise to accept the will of our democratically elected Parliament when we vote on Brexit options -- but she will carry out the result of an advisory referendum, won through cheating and lies, regardless of the cost to the country. 
4) The entire media apart from one or two supported Brexit5) Brexit was sold as a patriotic act 6) I didn't know that I only paid £6 per month to the EU which accounts for 0.7% of the UK spending budget7) I didn't research how much I would end up losing /2 
European Scrutiny Committee Chairman @BillCashMP "There is grave concern that there was no lawful UK authority for the decision on March 22nd to extend the exit date..." 
"If our votes don't count, then we may as well go home"SNP's Ian Blackford asks if #Brexit indicative votes in Parliament will be considered binding by the government  
The @Conservatives today have finally sold out 17.4 Million voters on #Brexit! Now when you vote in Local Elections, European Elections and next General Election remember the #Conservatives have nothing but contempt for your votes. #MakeThemPay #Reigate 
Prime Minister Theresa May has offically stated that another referendum is on the cards.  
May letting cat out of the bag, she won’t accept any result of indicative votes if it:Goes against any manifesto (so single market & customs union out)Doesn’t respect the result of the ref (so revoke & 2nd referendum out)So what are we left with?HER FRIGGING DEAL!! 
One of the cabinet ministers currently agitating for a No Deal Brexit is @andrealeadsom. Like most of them, she's adopted an absolutist position to further her political ambitions. And she doesn't even believe in it.(Billboard location: Wick Rd, London) 
New York Times says 'Brexit is white supremacy'. No it isn't. Look at my face, snowflakes.  
While the UK media fawns over Brexit, Israel ramps up preparations to assault Gaza.Troops amassing at the border and reserve are forces being called up.We cannot allow this to go unreported.@Jeremy_Hunt must make an immediate statement condemning this.#GazaUnderAttack 
Switzerland is in Schengen, you fcukwit ... and you are not a lorry carrying goods.#LeaversAreLiars 
REALITY: Public now back Brexit over remaining in EU by 15-points, poll finds. What part of LEAVE do MPs not understand?  
Hardline Remainers of London want a second referendum but the evidence is that most voters want Remain kept off the table.  
3 weeks from Brexit and these bellends still haven’t googled Schengen  
Richard Drax asks PM for guarantee on Brexit even if there's no deal  
All I want is a one-off special episode about brexit 
I am an Indian and I can tell you that Brits take forever to leave. #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
The EU has today confirmed that in the event of a no deal Brexit on 12 April it will start imposing tariffs on UK exports to the EU.  Hugely damaging for car exports. Disastrous for farmers.  Why does the PM continre to refuse to rule this out?    
Macron: 'English stopped us from building United States of Europe'. For the third time in a century Britain has saved the continent of Europe. 
This is worse than Brexit. 
This #HealthAndSafety classic, sums up #Brexit perfectly.. via youmuppet_ 
New 2,000-strong ComRes carried out a few days ago has 15-point lead in favour of leaving the EU. Only 35% now want to stop Brexit, 50% back leaving either with or without a deal. Hardline Remainers represent a shrinking fringe.  
Brexit by Escher ⁦@theresa_may⁩ 
Dear Leavers of the Brexit March,I voted leave too but changed my mind - I am a #RemainerNow & appreciate we all have our views x Hearing each other out fairly and with respect is key xI have no problem with you x My problem is with those who lied to me to get my vote x 
#UsAgainstWhatever, an electrifying cabaret about life in Hull in Brexit Britain, comes to @HullTruck from 27 Mar-3 Apr  
Referendum is the only solution to resolve the conflict in occupied #WestPapua pic.twitter.com/AWEQIazfrl 
It’s working!5.5 million and still growing fast!Sign and keep sharing: 
What Uri Geller doesn’t realise is that I staged Brexit in the first place. 
After Brexit, we must sort out politics in this country. We are in this position because of the egos of a small group of public school boys. We simply cannot continue with a system that serves these people and hope to be taken seriously on the world stage again. Flush them out. 
The difference between Leave and Remain at the referendum was 1.3  million. This is roughly the amount of people marching on Saturday. So if that amount of people isn't significant enough to listen to, why is it significant enough to make it the 'will of the people'? 
Scotland's future now depends entirely on the position of the DUP, who represent 22% of the N.I. electorate, and whether they back the Tory Brexit, despite Scotland rejecting the Tories for over 50 years, and rejecting Brexit by almost 2 to 1. Welcome to "the equal union." 
Eloquent, erudite and accurate. Bravo @joannaccherry - you speak for me too. #Brexit  
If Brexit isn’t stopped, the following will become a standard exam question by 2050:Describe the similarities between Germany in the 1930s and the UK in the 2020s. Include references to the economy; minorities; payments to other nations; “humiliation”; and empire. 
When the special ‘they stopped Brexit’ honours list is announced (a few years after the public inquiry) a special award like those sometimes given to special forces will be given to the secret heroes of @ByDonkeys 
Brexiters, I was once like you! I voted leave but I have changed my mind. I am a #RemainerNow I would sooner betray Brexit than betray my countrymen. Including you! Why don’t you want to challenge the narrative of Brexit once more? Put it back to the people! 
This is worse than Brexit. 
So Theresa May is meeting Arlene Foster about her deal. Foster is not an MP. She is a member of a devolved parliament which is not sitting. How can this woman be the most important person in the #brexit process? Baffling #politicslive 
We visited Dudley to learn about the ties between English identity, democracy and #Brexit. What is Englishness to you?It's time to define a progressive patriotism we can all be proud of.@CarolineLucas #LetsTalk 
Today it was reported that receptionists are having to monitor A&E patients. I look forward to seeing Jon Snow holding Health Secretary Matt Hancock to same level of account over the state of our NHS as he did here over Brexit.  pic.twitter.com/w8uoR8nqrc 
last week i was interviewed by 5 News about the effects of Brexit on #MentalHealth; that piece is airing TONIGHT on channel 5 at 5pm & 6.30pm!!  it'll be up on social media too!any support HUGELY appreciated! will link a video below this tweet later!  #MentalHealthMatters 
"There is no such thing as a good Brexit."Thank you @IanBlackfordMP for summing up this Brexit madness.#Revokearticle50 #StopBrexit #SteveBrayInterviews 
It's all getting real. JP Morgan is asking staff to sign contracts requiring them to leave the UK in the event of no-deal Brexit  
Why does the Commons Speaker John Bercow shout "order, order"?@AzanaFrancis18 explains the jargon you may have seen in the #Brexit votes - from honourable gentlemen, to ayes and noes[tap to expand]  
Revoke, Referendum, Reform - what I will be saying in the House of Lords today  
BRITS BACK LEAVING NOW | On Friday, the UK has the opportunity to leave and take back control - as promised - without any delay. It's time for MPs to stop frustrating #Brexit. Let's Leave. #LeaveNow 
Revoke A50. Form a National Emergency Govt. Set up a Royal Commission to look at the illegality of the advisory only ref. of 2016 and get on with improving the lives of the worse off while that is going on. Tell the people they were lied to. Shelve Brexit until commission report 
Classic Brexit Cartoon #71  
So what was all the fuss about the border then?! 
Leave supporters have made huge amounts of compromise - and yet are constantly being asked to make even more. Have Remain politicians forgotten which side actually won the referendum?  
How much longer do we have to go on "respecting the result" of the Brexit vote?We already triggered article 50. Wasn't that respecting it?We spent two years trying to negotiate a withdrawal deal. Wasn't that respecting it?We gave it a go and IT HAS FAILED.Respect that. 
#UKIP and #Fascist #TommyRobinson are mobilising in central #London this Friday 29 March. They are trying to use the #Brexit crisis to promote their far right agenda. Whether you voted ‘Leave’ or ‘Remain’ don’t let the #racists divide us.  
EU official also confirms that UK nationals will no longer be able to use EU lanes at airports & ports in ‘no deal’ #Brexit. Duration / purpose of visit / means of subsistence will also be asked for. None of this should be a surprise. 
To the one million EU citizens who have made our city your home: you are Londoners, you make a huge contribution and you are welcome here. Whatever the outcome of Brexit - that will never change. #LondonIsOpen 
Very happy that I got my UK citizenship! Now I can officially support two football teams AND vote to stay in the EU if there is another #Brexit referendum. #PutItToThePeople. 
We count 84 on @Nigel_Farage's #MarchToLeave today. The billboard is our regular reminder that the official @vote_leave campaign specifically ruled out No Deal before the referendum  
“My mandate is to stop Brexit... Scotland voted 62% to remain”SNP MP @joannaccherry says Brexit is the fault of the Conservatives, and not opposition parties #VictoriaLIVE 
Brexit is like half the country rang the bell on the bus by accident, and now they feel like they have to get off even though it's the wrong stop. 
Headbanger. Trash the economy, deprive the entire nation of rights, put people at risk of their health & lives, all for this contemptible fetish of Brexit. People like Fox are unfit for positions of public trust: he is a toxin.  
Perfect! #Brexit pic.twitter.com/HMIxsuHgog 
‘Kirsty Blackman MP: We need a meaningful extension to Article 50 to hold a second EU referendum’ #PutItBackToThePeople #PeoplesVote #BrexitCrisis 
I have tabled an amendment and here it is on the Order Paper for today. I hope the Speaker selects it.This is not controversial in the slightest, just reaffirming our commitment to honouring the result of the 2016 Referendum  and the 2017 General Election manifestos. #Brexit  
Theresa May should resign and a Brexit supporting Prime Minister put in charge.The country has lost faith in her and the Remainers are trying to change a Democratic vote! @Conservatives 
I will never forgive @Conservatives for taking us from the joy, pride & unity of the 2012 Olympics, when we showcased the best of Britain to the world, to the corrupted, fractured shambles of Brexit. As an example of how far a nation can fall in 7 years, it'll take some beating. 
While a #Brexit “no-deal” scenario is not desirable, the EU is prepared for it. We continue supporting administrations in their preparations and urge all EU citizens and businesses to continue informing themselves.More here → and in our thread ↓ 
“The fact is the Prime Minister has all the legal authority she needs to decide the future of this country. Parliament knew exactly what it was voting for when it put the Act through, and that was to leave with a deal or without a deal on Friday the 29th” @bernardjenkin 
If a so called democracy ignores the votes and voices of 17.4 million people,and treats them as meaningless and irrelevant,how can it be a democracy in the first place? #brexit #leavemeansleave # 
It’s a bit rich @GiselaStuart banging on about being honest when her Leave campaign broke electoral law and perverted the result of the referendum. Do not forget that she was the Chair. 
Varadkar's confidence of a invisible border in case of No Deal #Brexit exposes the convoluted backstop as a cynical sham (as we always knew).    
Two thing I keep hearing presented as though in conflict with each other but I think are actually not:- The country is becoming more polarised on brexit;- The country is sick of brexit, find it boring and difficult to follow, are disengaging, and want it all over with. 1/9 
Michael Heseltine just said brexit is the most important issue of our time, I disagree.Here are the most important issues:Record Child PovertyNHS / Social Care Funding CrisesPolice Cuts & CrimeJob Insecurity / Poverty PayEducationMental HealthTax Avoidance#ToriesOut 
Yvette Cooper should keep her referendum promise.  
People are not stupid. If MPs vote to cancel Brexit, they won’t blame Brexiteers. They’ll blame the MPs who, you know, voted to cancel Brexit. 
Exclusive: here are the Prime Minister’s options for the indicative Brexit votes this week:• Theresa May’s Deal • Deal by Theresa May• The Withdrawal Agreement (by Theresa May)• A Deal that looks identical to the Deal by Theresa May• The Prime Minister’s Deal (T May) 
More people in South Belfast constituency have now signed the Brexit petition than voted for the DUP’s @little_pengelly at the 2017 General Election!DUP do not represent NI as a whole, and now no longer their own constituencies either.Clear people in NI want a #PeoplesVote 
People's Vote actually stands for a Britain in which the moneyed middle class of London and Oxbridge thinks it can overule the referendum result of the rest of the country. The hubris and entitlement is extraordinary. #brexit  
In #BBCNews, #LiamFox says there are only three #Brexit options:- May’s deal- No-deal - No Brexit Parliament has already rejected the first two... 
Brexit trade deals will be worse than the deals the UK currently has as part of the EU, says Liam Fox's former trade chief  
People say: well, it’s just an online petition. You only have to click a few buttons.But if Brexit is as popular as Brexiteers claim, where are the SIX million signatories for THEIR petition?Brexit is a busted flush.#PutItToThePeople 
A minister has said publicly what many are now saying privately - Article 50 should be revoked & the Brexit nightmare ended 
As we enter a key Brexit endgame week, a few thoughts on the ironies of British negotiation. Thread: 
Corbyn is being actively excluded by the Tories for political reasons. It’s not because he’s antisemitic, or that he’s incompetent. It’s because to allow him to resolve brexit successfully would likely result in a general election and an end to their smashing of the welfare state 
2016:“Brexit will improve your lives”2019:“Tell the EU we’re off to starve in a desert for 40 years and most of us will die before we see the promised land”  
|￣￣￣￣￣￣ ||       unsafe     | |  referendum  ||   tarnished     | |        by           | |   notorious    | |   corruption   | | says PM's QC | | ＿＿＿＿_＿__| (\__/) || (•ㅅ•) || / 　 づ 
Hilary Benn has done everything he can to frustrate Brexit and now he's calling for a second referendum. Promise broken.  
If a democracy doesn’t implement the result of a once-in-a-generation referendum, it ceases to be a democracy. Feel free to change your mind in 40 years time.  
All Brexit supporting MPs who currently have more signatures to revoke Article 50 than their majority at the last election. Zac Goldsmith                Trudy Harrison Kate Hoey                        Lucy Allan Mark Field                       Simon Clarke Stephen Hammond 
It’s apparent now that the people must have a say on Brexit, in the form of a General Election.  Not only will it change the mathematics of the house, but the new govt would have a mandate to implement their manifesto.Bring on a general election and a Labour government. 
Dominic Grieve - We need to stop faffing about with alternatives & put the PM's deal to the British public with the option to remain. 5,000,000+ have signed the #RevokeArticle50 petition & that suggest huge frustration with the entire enterprise of #brexit#PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Binning May doesn’t solve the Brexit crisis. The Brexit crisis is Brexit itself. Rubbish deal, untrustworthy Brexiters STILL peddling horseshit,(eg Nigel Evans #r4today) NO consensus, public opinion shifting v fast.... Brexiters, you’ve lost the mandate. Get over it.#RevokeA50 
Oliver Letwin says we need to know what is the alternative to Mrs May’s deal in order to stop no deal. He then proposes something incomprehensible. The alternative is simple. No Brexit. Revoke Article 50 
“MPs voted overwhelmingly to trigger Article 50, and therefore to leave the EU on March 29 – this coming Friday. It is a scandal that we are not in fact doing so...We are not leaving this Friday because the government has chickened out.” 
This is the first time a UK Govt Minister has endorsed #revoking #Article50. Very significant. Important that as many voters as possible sign the #RevokeArticle50Petition so politicians can work together to #StopBrexit 
Andrew.  If you look at the petition breakdown, the good news is that it looks likely that lunatic mps such as Raab, Hunt and Villiers will be out on their ears soon. 
Well done (not!) @BBCr4today for your useless discussion of Brexit status this morning!NO mention of at least 1 million (probably nearer 2) marching against Brexit.NO mention of #FinalSay NO mention that 5.3 million (and still rising) signed petition to #RevokeA50 Useless! 
Striking similarity between end of poll tax & end of Brexit. In weeks before Thatcher’s fall ever more absurd & convoluted attempts were made to keep it alive. But only viable course was to scrap it entirely & remove ThatcherRevoke Article 50. Remove May. It’s that simple 
When you desperately try to walk back the previous day's ghastliness in case you might have nixed your husband's chance at No 10 
Brexit music for a film... genius! #ThomYorke 
URGENT CALL:You march in your millions and sign in your millions, yet they ignore and belittle you. Time for a GENERAL STRIKE before it's too late and they destroy the UK with a no-deal Brexit. #RevokeArticle50 
Our #Sodem EUnity flag in The Guardian. 
The Electoral Commission referenced Boris Johnson and Michael Gove:“It’s because the government is in it up to its neck,” he said. “Two cabinet ministers fronted the organisation. There they sit, week after week, the Bonnie and Clyde of Brexit.”  
Also, Brexit and Trump were two elections with EXACTLY the same people and organizations attacking them in exactly the same way: 
Brexit: those stupid people - we do have a means to solve the Brexit problem, but Brexit isn't the problem. It's the close-on 650 stupid people who are unable to do the job for which they are paid...  #Brexit.  
Why didn't you back the amendment for a #PeoplesVote then? 
"After reading Uri Geller’s Facebook post urging Theresa May to cancel Brexit or face his wrath, I have been spending three days learning to harness the power of my mind in order to deal @realDonaldTrump a devastating psychic blow." By Godfrey Elfwick 
Me: we need to engage substantively with the more progressive parts of this growing anti-Brexit movement rather than simply write off its concerns as bourgeois Every single pro-EU sign at that demo:  
1. Brexit was not initiated by Labour2. Brexit is not the responsibility of Labour3. failed Brexit negotiations are not the fault of Labour4. a bad deal Brexit will not be down to Labour5. the EU referendum was on the table prior to Jeremy Corbyn even becoming Labour leader  
‘We’ve blinked, we’ve bottled it’, says man who spent 2 years in high office banging on about how brilliant Brexit would be, resigned when the reality could no longer be ignored, then spent the next 9 months banging on about how good Brexit would have been if he’d been in charge  
Mark Field MP says he’d vote to Revoke but would accept a ‘soft Brexit compromise’. NO! If you think Revoke is right, REVOKE! ‘Compromise’ is appeasement, harms the UK & it’s young: any Brexit is bad & must be stopped. #Revoke &/or #PeoplesVote: 5m petition & 2m march for either. 
All these no voters seemed sad and deflated when they won the 2014 Scottish referendum, didn’t they? Deep down they knew they’d betrayed their country. #BBCScotland 
The Sun turns its back on Theresa May calling for her to resign to save Brexit. The front page splash criticises her for appointing a "weak Cabinet of Remainer friends" leaving the Brexiteers she did appoint "sidelined and ignored". Support us at  
I'm sure @NicolaSturgeon will tell me if I'm wrong, but MORE Scots voted FOR #Brexit than they did for the SNP at the last election, and MORE Scots voted to REMAIN in the #UK in #indyref. The ONLY person ignoring the voice of #scotland is Sturgeon herself. 
“We have blinked. We have baulked. We have bottled it completely. We have now undergone the humiliation of allowing the EU to decide the date on which we may make our own departure.” ⁦@BorisJohnson⁩ ⁦@Telegraph⁩ 
You really didn't think about that Moses comparison @BorisJohnson If you had, you'd have known that the leadership never entered the promised land, the people spent 40 years in the wilderness and were stricken when honouring a False Idol.So very much like Brexit then. 
The ENTIRE WORLD needs this info. Because Cambridge Analytica, which  also helped w/ Brexit & has re-formed as Emerdata, is very much in  business. And its VP, Steve Bannon, is now working with far right  leaders in Europe & beyond. #ReleaseTheFullReport 1/ 
It works looool unreal 
The PM has shown courage. But to seal her deal and deliver Brexit, she needs to resignTomorrow's @TheSun front page editorial The Sun Says: Time's Up, Theresa 
“For 3yrs every Tory MP has chirruped ‘no deal would be better than a bad deal’.. as repeated in the Tory manifesto.“Surely if the PM could not persuade Parliament to support the withdrawal treaty.. She would fulfil the manifesto promise?” @BorisJohnson 
Nigel Farage ran a Brexit poll and it didn’t go his way at all. 
It's hard to explain how much I like this one. #GeekJokes 
I was a remainer and now utterly want to leave.The way that leave voters have been talked down to and insulted is shocking.The media, parliament and general establishment have done everything they can to stop brexit. I think this is a serious threat to democratic norms. 
Just leave this here.... Whether we have a Hard Brexit or Soft Brexit, Whether we exit on the 29th Mar, in June or in 2 years,Whether we have a PeoplesVote with or without Remain option,Tories will be for the few, Labour will always strive for the many#ForTheMany 
#Datatransfer after #GDPR and #Brexit is complicated. Here's what you need to know:  
Brexit negotiations  
The petition is now over 11% of the ***entire**** UK electorate!!!!The supposed mandate for brexit is is tatters 
Ask any country “what are you doing in 5 days’ time?”Sweden “Same old, same old”Germany “Business as usual”Belgium “Same, but with waffles”Australia “Fighting spiders, as per”Japan “Normal country stuff”UK “No clue”#Brexit @JimMFelton 
Shocked that the combined global bargaining power of 28 nations is greater than that of 1.‘Brexit trade deals will be worse than EU deals, says ex-UK trade chief’ 
#Brexit is not working. That is before we even leave. #DominicGrieve is full of common sense. Let's cancel it. If you had booked a holiday & it was probably it would be really bad, you could cancel it or change your booking for something more suitable... 
On #Brexit, surely what we're witnessing here is the deliberate sabotage of British democracy. Britain's mainly pro-EU politicians 'negotiating' with EU boffins that have no intention Brexit succeed. Both trying to spook voters into changing their minds at a 2nd vote. Shameful. 
Sounds like Donald Tusk is correct. There is a special place in Hell for those who pushed us into Brexit without a plan. It’s called Chequers. And this was the guest list.  
Petition to honour ref 
Brexit not invent yet, so just lead tribe into big pointless tar pit for now. 
The idea that we need a second referendum because Leave ‘financially outgunned’ Remain is preposterous. Remain utilised entire machinery of government, big biz, the EU, Labour (half-heartedly), the BBC, the US president, a taxpayer-funded £9m leaflet and had daily coordination! 
In what kind of country do a bunch of men try to depose the PM and stitch up who takes over without election in the very week they were incapable of enacting the decision of a referendum in which half of them promised the undeliverable? The UK verges on democratic joke 
Just revoke the bloody thing and we can all get back to our lives and continue to trade, live, work or study freely with 27 countries.If at some point in the future the Brexiters actually come up with a workable plan for Brexit, then we might just have another referendum. 
If the Prime Minister doesn't get her deal through next week, she must be prepared to leave without one, says @DavidDavisMP 
*Oh What A Perfect Day* 
This is beautiful  
No offence but a woman has been in charge of Brexit for nearly 3yrs & made a complete pig’s ear of it...  
No offence but stick 14 women around the table and Brexit would be sorted by sunset  
Can anyone tell me what the “compromise” would have been if Remain had won the EU referendum 52-48? Would we currently be discussing all these “soft Remain” options to keep Leave voters & MPs happy? Nope. A Remain victory would have meant Remaining in the EU, full stop. 
Brexit is costing us £4.7 million an hour. Put that on a bus.  
Lord Sugar states that Boris Johnson and Michael Gove should be jailed for their “lies” on Brexit. He also added that there’s a good argument for cancelling Brexit and the result of the EU referendum should be made void because people were misled.#RevokeArticle50#StopBrexit 
  Art against BrexitThese are some of the best signs from the Brexit protest#PeoplesVoteMarch #art #artforourplanet #PutItToThePeople #EU #Brexit #socialart 
2 million marchers (possibly more) - a UK record.5 million petitioners (and rising) - a UK record.You cannot argue, @theresa_may, that Brexit is still the Will of the People™ without reasonable doubt.A jury could no longer find for Brexit.#RevokeArticle50 
The answer the First Minister refuses to give is that Scotland's Councils have received none of the Brexit money.And one of her Ministers came to a COSLA meeting and said her Government has already spent it.  
Philip Hammond Chancellor of Exchequer has at last confirmed, what was suspected, that he is disloyal to the Prime Minister. She rejects a second referendum but now Hammond no longer rejects it. Split cabinet needs some dismissals!! 
ICYMI in February - and even more the case now: “#Labour will win more votes than it loses by backing another referendum”   
Is that Peter? He's not 12 until October. It's illegal for him to be in the front seat. 
#marchtoleave IMPORTANT ANNOUNCEMENT REGARDING THE MARCH TO LEAVE.Following @theresa_may's failure, Brexit Day has been put back to 12th April.All #marchtoleave participants need to return to Sunderland to start again at 9am on Monday 1st April.Please retweet widely. 
FWIW wasn’t @michaelgove involved in #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw ?  
Just watched item on German TV about the 150,000 Latvians in the UK. Many now returning home due to #Brexit. Lady reports that Brexit had revealed an ugly side to Britain she had never thought possible. Very sad. What are we doing?#RevokeA50 
Guess what: an article in one of Portugal's most read and prestigious newspapers doesn't mention Theresa May or Corbyn, but ends with a full paragraph quoting Nicola Sturgeon. That is why she was right to be at #PeoplesVoteMarch. The world heard her. 
‘The economy is now 2% smaller than it would have been if the UK had chosen to remain in the bloc, according to the Bank of England. The economic output lost since the referendum is worth about £800 million per week, or £4.7 million per hour’. CNN  
Lord Sugar stated; Boris Johnson and Michael Gove should be jailed for their “lies” on Brexit.. He also added that there’s a good argument for cancelling Brexit.. the result of the EU referendum should be made void because citizens deceived by serious deception..  
David Cameron: There will not be a second referendum on the Brexit terms  via @YouTube 
Correct. India's partition was illegal and undemocratic.There was no referendum:India's people did not get to VOTE on whether they AGREED to give up vast territories that nurtured their civilization for thousands of years.Thanks to: @INCIndia, Nehru, and the fake Mahatma. 
A Brexit update with everyone's favourite Irishman'Theresa May is not physically dead, just dead inside'  
1/Calls are growing for a full public inquiry into #BrexitBoth the Conservative party and the Labour party are ignoring the criminality.However, sources close to Keir Starmer say, he is already drawing up a list of the people he holds responsible. 
This needs to be said repeatedly  who sanctioned this partition? How did the British partition they had no title in. ? No referendum was sought from the Hindus who have a civilizational right to the land. 
Let's get #BAB to 15k members! It was fantastic to see t-shirts and banners yesterday  pic.twitter.com/fSnISDG6OM 
Uri Geller urges mass-telepathy against Brexit  
Councillor Ian Cochrane of @thesnp calls on Scotland to not wait for a referendum and shouts "We take control of this country now!" at Tommy Sheridan's #usethemandate rally. 
“The Brexit vote has acted like a dose of acid, revealing all the problems that the hoary encrustations of ivy had concealed. We see things that looked like they were working for a long time but were not.”David Starkey on Brexit 
#Brexit in just two pics   
Country doesn't seem to want to crash out. If 5m sign online petition to revoke, its because they're concerned about consequences of #Brexit  
Brexit is the equivalent of threatening to move out of the gaf, and your ma just goes right fuck off so, you pack the bags and you’re like bollox what do I do now? where do I go? Apologising is not an option because you’re stubborn. Britain = Hormonal teen. EU = Ma. 
"The whole Brexit project is not working" - Conservative MP Dominic Grieve says a second referendum should be consideredRead more about Theresa May's Chequers crisis talks here:  
Calls grow for public inquiry into Brexit.This shambles must be stopped and investigated.Those who misled the public and got the country into this mess must be held to account. #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit 
The only petition that matters...  Support us at  
Grieve - "I'm sorry, but that isn't democracy. Democracy is about a process of constant engagement".. The #Brexit project is not working  
I mean, what the hell does this guy know about medicines, huh? Just the latest reality check in the wake of the usual scaremongering nonsense about the fake risks of a WTO Brexit.  
Those telling me to stop talking about Brexit because I'm an esports host: you're the reason we are in this fucking mess. If we all followed your logic, no one should care or vote on one of the most important decisions in our country's history.Do me a favour and stfu. 
The democratic right to oppose, change your mind, & sign a petition continues: 5m & not slowing down. For anyone who thinks democracy is threatened or still believes the Leave campaigns & their Brexit reps were crystal clear about what people were voting for... You’re welcome.   
Tom Watson joins calls for Chilcot-style public probe into handling of Brexit - PoliticsHome #PublicInquiry #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #News 
Moral authority now visibly draining from Brexiteers. They daren’t have a 2nd referendum. They are at one another’s throats on the exit terms. They could not mount a march one-tenth the size of Saturday’s, or remotely match the 5 million signatures for revoke. It’s collapsing 
Most of the MSM biased anti Brexit -bound to go along with grossly inflated march figures just like they did last time  
We are where we are.  But..We should have invoked Art50 within a week of the Referendum, so left in 2018, & done as the #EU proposed:Clean Break + quickest and best Free Trade Agreement ever between the EU and another country. (Their words not mine).What an unnecessary mess! 
Every reply to this is about Brexit. Disgusting.  
On very day Michael Gove's wife (@WestminsterWAG) was slandering 2 million peaceful joyous remainers as "lynchers", the woman who started the Revoke petition - Margaret Georgiadou - was receiveing multiple death threats.Its not just about #brexit, its about saving our country. 
The Brexit farce is about to turn to tragedy  
To those saying a ref would be undemocratic: 1. If the will of the people hasn’t changed where’s the problem? 2. If it has changed it would be undemocratic not to hold a #PeoplesVote and #brexit against that will & 3. It’s been three years and the result is not what was promised. 
Doing a 600 follower shoutout-reply/like to be in it 
Dear broadcasters, When you next hear someone claim that the referendum was "the biggest democratic exercise etc, etc" (BTW it wasn't, by any meaningful measure), could you point out that it was also the most corrupt democratic exercise in our island's history? Thank you. 
Never forget. The 2016 referendum was “tarnished” by “notorious” corruption. And the actual decision to leave was May’s and May’s alone.  All that was proved in court. Staggering that this is the foundation for all this mess. 
There is no utility in replacing #TheresaMay with another supporter of her #WithdrawalAgreement . The @Conservatives need full democratic reform to allow a genuine @ToryGrassroots movement to renew the Party & leader-otherwise it's groundhog day.#Brexit 
Being inundated with people telling me they want Article 50 revoked, others wanting a second referendum and others again saying they've changed their minds in Brexit and want to Remain.  Only a people's vote in the end is going to sort this out 
So not only would the 2016 referendum result (“once-in-a-lifetime decision”) be overturned, the choice that most opted for in 2016 won’t even be on the ballot paper in the next referendum?  It would be either Remain or Remainers’ idea of Brexit? Got it.  
i’m convinced we wouldn’t be in this brexit mess if J Hus was free smh 3Jhus 
As this continues to accrue signatures they'll say: "sorry, still shy of 17 million!" - But that's not the point. It's a gauge of current feeling. The absence of an equally popular leave counter-petition suggests support for Brexit has collapsed.  
How Russia sees #Brexit. Describing the April 12th extension, state TV anchor Kiselev says the EU “will boot Britain out with a kick on the butt”, if parliament rejects Theresa May’s deal again. Simplistic view, but you get the idea: Moscow’s enjoying this. pic.twitter.com/V7dsGsyTV2 
My 11 year old just pointed out 5 million is 1/13th of the population. 
By the way. The referendum was an advisory poll. There is absolutely no legal or even moral obligation to 'respect' the result. Cameron did 'promise' it would be implemented but it was not within his gift to make that promise. In fact is it anti democratic to suggest that it is. 
#5Million signatures for the #RevokeArt50Petition and still rising at over 20K per hour.View how your constituency is doing here 
5 million people have now signed the petition calling for Brexit to be cancelled  
 5 MILLION!!Well done everyone, but let’s keep on sharing! >#RevokeA50 #RevokeA50Now #Brexit #ExitFromBrexit #PeoplesVote 
BREAKING The official #RevokeArticle50 petition to parliament just reached5 MILLION signatures !!! All legitimate, with bots and other abusers blocked by the site's security.Petition: Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU. 
We’ve gone from “£350m extra per week for the NHS” to “the NHS will still actually have some medicine”. What a colossal con perpretrated by colossal twats like @DominicRaab #Brexit  
The referendum was won based on lies, cheating and electoral fraud.  Many of those who voted for Brexit have now died.  Others have changed their minds.  And 16-17 year olds denied a vote the first time around are now eligible to vote.  3/n  
They are denied the opportunity to question, to tell the government they now want something different.  That isn’t democracy.  Its dictatorship.  Listening to the Tories filling the airwaves this morning, the corrupt Brexit referendum seems to have gained the same reverence. 2/n  
To be clear, I’m a Spartan as far as Brexit is concerned and will accept no compromise. Things cannot get better till we’ve had worse. 
Dominic Raab blocks James O'Brien after the radio host exposes the MPs shameless hypocrisy/#Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
“We operate under the rule of law. The act of parliament that was passed last year says that we leave the EU and repeal the European Communities Act 1972, which is the anchor of the referendum, on 29th of March. That still remains the law of the land” @BillCashMP#StandUp4Brexit 
“A smart WTO Brexit with well-designed trade, immigration, agricultural, fishing and regulatory policies would, far from being a ‘disaster’, have an excellent chance of delivering substantial long-term net benefits.”  
WATCH: Nicola Sturgeon on #Marr this morning is right to say that the Brexit deal should go back to the people in a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
theresa may: brexit means brexit this is the peoples vote this is what u guys wanteveryone: THIS IS NOTWHAT WE WANT THIS ISNOT YHE PEOPLES VOTE WE DO NOTWANT 
Leaked document suggests government is already preparing to rejoin EU 
If Remain had won the referendum UKIP, the ERG etc. would've carried on trying to get us out like they have for 20 years +.The difference is, they have never got 1m+ to march for them.Brexit is a campaign by the wealthy, for the wealthy and that is why we should #revokeA50 
We act on General Elections & the party voted in by the people gets to govern. Then if we don’t like what they do, we vote them out. That’s how democracy works - not holding  a referendum & then refusing to act on the result.  
This “...we’re the ones having the cross party talks, we’ve been talking to people from all different parties. Jeremy Corbyn has had a whole host of meetings to that end....we’re leading on this initiative to find a way through the deadlock”#Brexit 
Colonialist mentality as usual- sure you’ll take the privilege of an Irish passport and everything that brings post Brexit, but against your will because being British is clearly better. Cuir gaeilge ar “hypocrisy”? @cupofcrow 
Which is more vile? 1. "Sure Blair killed a few hundred thousand ppl, helped PR for ISIS  increasing International terrorism but he understands Brexit better than Corbyn!" 2. "Respect to @TheIndGroup MPs a rational voice that we need right now!3 both#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Why is Theresa Mays husband Philip May at Government meetings about Brexit. He shouldn't be anywhere near them. When the UK comes crashing out of the EU Philip May stands to make Billions. 
Remain ultras heading to Brexit away yesterday   
Scottish independence: Nicola Sturgeon says new referendum will happen  
Amazing what you can do with bots these days pic.twitter.com/MLxYY2lGKd 
Terror attack on other side of planet ... Sadiq Khan:  “there will be extra police at mosques” Young black kids stabbed and slain on streets of London - six in one night... Sadiq Khan: any remainers want a Brexit selfie?  
The establishment are out in full force trying to betray Brexit.Join the Parliament Square protest on 29th March at 4pm to fight back.  
The Prime Minister has lost control of Brexit and thrown our country into crisis. This week Parliament must be given the chance to take control. #Marr 
Just incase you lot were too busy frothing over Brexit: Yemen just entered its fifth year of war. Our govt has helped create the world’s largest humanitarian crisis. More children and more villages starving. This war can be entirely avoided, but half of Britain doesn’t care. 
“For scientists, any form of Brexit is bad.” #PeoplesMarch 
This is a classic response from the Government. Having lost control of events, the Brexit Secretary indicates the Government would frustrate any attempt by Parliament to break the deadlock. We are only in this crisis because ministers have pushed Parliament away at every turn.  
In a recession induced by a No Deal Brexit, the privileged will benefit. Buildings become cheaper to buy, labour becomes cheaper to hire, Sterling becomes easier to acquire, so while the ERG pretend that Britain will do better, their mates might, the poor will be crushed further. 
I think this tweet is the best demonstration of the split within the pro-remain camp that means it can't operate as a cohesive force. For some, the referendum was a symptom of a country in deep crisis, for others, it was an unwelcome end to a status quo they were happy with.  
I'm tired of politicians saying that a referendum now would be undemocratic.There is no public consent for either of the specific Brexit options on the table.So another referendum is the ONLY democratic option.#Ridge #Marr 
@BBCDoctors #s20ep85 'Reflections':Cool episode. Exploring the difficulties and benefits of synesthesia. A fascinating condition, creatively portrayed through some nice compositing work placing the synesthesiast in a painting. #BBCDoctorsNotes pic.twitter.com/pxRuqYvHvO 
Hey @DominicRaab I hear you're blocking folk for sharing this collection of your mendacity and idiocy... 
#Brexit Sec Steve Barclay on another referendum: “Ultimately, in our democracy the way people express their will is at the ballot box… and that means delivering on the vote we had in 2016”#Marr  
The Government is planning for the UK rejoining Europe. Dor to its incompetence and bad faith we haven't even left yet.#ParliamentVsPeople 
Hi @DominicRaab - how does it feel when your hate is thrown right back in your face and you're held to account?You will lose your seat. 
The irony is lost on @SteveBarclay as he tells @AndrewMarr9 that another referendum would undemocratic and then immediately talks of not bringing a 3rd parliamentary vote until they have the numbers #andrewmarr #brexit #moronic 
Iain Duncan Smith has complained that the EU is acting like a bully over Brexit - he's the 'architect' of Universal Credit which has literally taken money away from school dinners for poor chldren...AND #IDS cheering disability benefit? Standard bullying behaviour... #Marr #Ridge 
Wow! Another breathtaking aerial video of the massive #PeoplesVoteMarch - starting from the back and flying to the front.More than a million people marched. We demand a final say on Brexit. Put it to the people. #StopBrexit.Please RT to spread the word 
“Scotland shouldn’t have to choose between the UK market… and the EU single market, which is eight times bigger” Scottish First Minister Nicola Sturgeon on Scottish independenceSNP #Brexit  
Cabal?. The shamelessness of this man, is quite simply astonishing.. The only "cabal" within Westminster, is that of the ERG. #Brexit #Marr 
Former Conservative leader Iain Duncan Smith: "I think what happened over the last 4 days was as close to a national humiliation as I think I've seen..." 
"Our first preference is to remain in the EU, and the best way of achieving that is to have another referendum or to revoke Article 50. As long as our first preference remains an option, that's what the @theSNP will back”: @NicolaSturgeon #Marr 
“Brexit has been a complete and utter mess” London mayor @SadiqKhan says “it’s time to withdraw article 50”.Hundreds of thousands marched in the ‘Put It To The People’ protest in London, campaigning for a second Brexit referendum.@peoplesvote_uk 
‘Medicines will not run out in a no deal Brexit’, royal college says | via @telegraph 
Brexit explained: A small core of racist xenophobes supported by Conservatives who dislike corporate regulation + immigration, lied to 66 million people telling them Brexit would mean more money for social programs and less taxes. The majority now see Brexit = imminent collapse 
Tom Watson telling a huge anti-Brexit demo that he's planning to defy @jeremycorbyn 's orders to actually vote in favour of Theresa May's Tory Brexit (to a chorus of boos) is the most perfect illustration of the strategic cluelessness of Labour Centrists. 
Today on the #MarchToLeave we are joined by @ABridgen as we march from Sutton Bonington.We continue to fight for a No Deal Brexit on our journey to London!  
Organisers say one million people took part in the #PeoplesVoteMarch calling for a second referendum. See the full scale of the protest here  
This is what a democracy changing its mind looks like. 
Philip Hammond is now touting the idea of a second referendum. The establishment are in full force to stop Brexit. 
“The BBC has done itself harm by pursuing a flawed approach to achieving “balance” in its coverage of Brexit. The views of Nobel prize-winning economists on the risks of Brexit are simply not of equivalent merit to those of Nigel Farage.”   
"Corbyn’s absence from yesterday’s march was not because there were Tories there and nor because he feared alienating Leavers, he was not there because he is the left cheek of the anti-EU arse. It is as simple as that."Read more at: 
Brexit was a serious error. DiEM25 campaigned vigorously to prevent it and in favour of a Radical Remain. Our slogan was/is: "In the EU. Against this EU!"   
Wrong and lazy. 1) All mass political engagement/expression is democratic by definition. 2) Brexit today looks nothing like what was promised. I don't like referendums but this particular argument against another one is so vacuous it's untrue.  
The morning after one of the country's biggest ever political protests...Chancellor @PhilipHammondUK tells @SophyRidgeSky that a second referendum is a "coherent proposition" and "deserves to be considered".  
Brexiters...please stop telling me we're overturning democracy.  Farage and other Brexiters said they'd demand another vote if they lost. People are allowed to change their minds. You're not defending democracy, you're trying to cling on to Brexit vote won by lies. #Marr #Ridge 
Philip Hammond now refuses to rule out a second referendum as an option. He is in danger of breaking his 2016 promise.  
Tory bastards are back, and May is so scared of them, she might give us no-deal  
How about a Prime Minister who recognises that public support is breaking in favour of No Deal Brexit? Just get us out.  
Philip Hammond(Chancellor) - A second referendum is a perfectly coherent proposition & it deserves to be considered.#Ridge #marr #PeoplesVoteMarch #peoplesvote 
How come Theresa May gets THREE votes but we only get the one? The public should have the final say on Brexit. Agree? Retweet this video #Ridge #Marr 
Woah. Philip Hammond just said that holding a second referendum is "perfectly coherent" and "deserves to be considered." 
Philip Hammond said on #Ridge if there is no Brexit at all we will face huge problems of confidence in our democracy. So forcing our sovereign parliament to pass a deal which it’s already rejected with historical majorities does what exactly for democracy? 
Brexit is Fyre festival for old people 
One thing we can probably all agree on is that Brexit has exposed our democracy as dysfunctional. Many things need to be done to fix it. But top of the list we must find a way to stop politicians & media lying matters of fact & evidence. Democracy cannot survive in a sea of lies. 
Seeing Michael Gove's wife invoking lynching is properly disgusting. This is a very specific word describing extrajudicial executions of Black people in the US by mobs of white people.She's not stupid. She chose her words deliberately. This cannot stand. 
Bill Cash on #SkyNews: "We had a referendum and it was won by a substantial majority." It was won by <4%. If it was an opinion poll, it would be regarded as within the margin of error. The decision to make a radical change to our country's prospects on this result was immoral. 
From a protest March against #Brexit @RuPaul 
The draft Withdrawal Agreement remains unacceptable because it’s a trap that would give EU control as they pointed out, “forcing” horrors such as defence and security giveaways on the UK. An unnecessary tragedy & inside job - it’s still right to resist. 
Here's me, a serial anti Brexit protestor. Nothing but the finest locally sourced broom handles and poster paint for me. After the march I went home and relaxed with a glass of 2019 vintage Vimto.  
This is John. Some old guy was pissed out of his mind & John arrived to help him out. You see that badge on his shoulder? This is the NHS. I want to know that when people fall down others will come to pick them up. Brexit will destroy the NHS. Let's destroy brexit instead #FBPE 
Useful reassurance ...Medicines will not run out in a no deal Brexit, royal college says 
Here’s Lord Sugar stating that Boris Johnson and Michael Gove should be jailed for their “lies” on Brexit. He also added that there’s a good argument for cancelling Brexit and the result of the EU referendum should be made void because people were misled.  
Couldn’t have have put it better myself! #Brexit #PeoplesMarchVote #LosersVoteMarch 
Memo to Theresa May: Democracy Must Deliver! #cchq #brexit #theresamay #cabinetcoup 
At the protest against BREXIT...  
#SundayMorning Calls grow for public inquiry into Brexit as millions sign to uphold democracy and stop the Leave criminals from selling off our country for their own nefarious ends. #revokearticle50petition @channel4news 
The moment the sound system was unveiled at Brexit march yesterday in London Video Credit:  Edward Jenkins#brexit  
On the train on the way home from the march yesterday a friendly couple asked me "do you think we changed anything" ."Honestly", I said, "I don't know, but we've done what we can, at least politicians know we are real people and we don't want their brexit"#PeoplesVoteMarch 
#Peoplesvote may or may not help solve Brexit, but it won’t solve the homelessness crisis, school funding cuts, social care crisis, child poverty, increase in foodbank usage, privitisation of NHS. That is why we need a #GeneralElection & get @UKLabour in Gvmt 
Brexiters say “we must deliver Brexit or there will be unrest”. NOBODY says “we must cancel Brexit or there will be unrest” despite the fact we got 1m+ marchers and Farage can’t fill a pub car park.So Brexiters are admitting that they’re violent assholes and that we’re not. 
I see the Tories are trying to oust @theresa_may while all this brexit bollocks is going on. I’m changing Driver and ball this week but I’m not changing irons because that would just be too many variables. Stick to the main job at hand! #numptys 
The Brexit issue transcends most issues including race.How does pausing and reflecting on that post contribute to the Brexit issue. Or are you, like so many disingenuous people conflating Leave with racism Clive?I voted Leave on the basis of democracy. Nothing else. 
Theresa May's fake-Conservative government:Brexit betrayed20,000 fewer policeSpiralling violent crimeRapid mass uncontrolled ImmigrationGreen belt paved overCompulsory transgender lessons for 5-year-oldsHS2 financial black holeArmed forces run downIt's time for change! 
With the mess of Brexit and an epidemic of knife crime on the streets, our poor struggling nation needs a lot of prayer right now. Whether you go to church today or not, make sure you hold this nation in your heart. 
To be honest, I did not march for a People's Vote. Especially not the 'Brexit vs Lexit' one Labour seem to want.I marched for #RevokeArticle50 and #StopBrexit. Brexit has damaged the UK enough. Just end it already.#RevokeArticle50March #PutItToThePeople 
This video is INCREDIBLE - watch the amount of people who turned out today in London to say No to Brexit.  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Pro-Remain MPs are drawing up plans for a vote on revoking article 50 as an emergency measure to stop Britain crashing out of the EU, after an online petition to cancel Brexit became the most popular ever. 
Meanwhile in Central Park Nairobi we're worshipping JESUS. Welcome somebody. The service has just began!#NairobiFightNight#Rauka#Brexit  
This American is 100% behind a second #Brexit referendum. The first vote had undue foreign influence. The British people should have a shot at getting this right. A very impressive showing from the British people today!RT if you agree. #PeoplesVoteMarch #PutitothePeopleMarch 
The proprietor of the Sunday Times, when asked why he was so opposed to the European Union, explained, ‘That’s easy, when I go into Downing Street they do what I say; when I go to Brussels they take no notice.' 
nearly 5 million now! 
Flow chart describing what might happen next in the Brexit process  
Just for that song I’m leaving this country fuck me wtf was that #brexit #BrexitMeansBrexit pic.twitter.com/Dwcidx5M2h 
nope, i cannot be fucked with this, i don't want an election triggered; CANCEL BREXIT first, and then by all means fuck off and tear each other & your shitey party apart, but not before Brexit's in its cold messy grave. #CabinetCoup 
Stop messing with our futures.We don't need your #Brexit.We don't want your #Brexit.We hate the consequences of your #Brexit on our futures.If you care about us join the campaign to give us a #FinalSay, and then campaign to #Remain and #RevokeArticle50 
Every single #Remain voter needs to watch this latest episode of "Anywhere but Westminster" by @johnharris1969 if today's #PeopleVoteMarch is to mean anything. We can't just poshsplain it away with the #RevokeRemainRebuild phrase; it has to mean something. 
Oh, you mean Robert and Rebekah Mercer’s #CambridgeAnalytica? The same CA that had Steve Bannon as VP and on its board? The same CA that used to work for @TedCruz and helped to throw the #Brexit voteI bet that DOJ hasn’t forgotten.  
Video: Watson booed at referendum march  
In the #NoDeal Brexit emergency planning nuclear bunker under Whitehall:  
Organisers said more than a million people attended this anti-Brexit march through central London. Here's the birds-eye view.  
Brenden thinks this is disturbing? LOLHere's the Brexit Betrayal March from 9 December 2018. Someone literally brought homemade gallows.  
Brexit affair is a political showdown that has been there for long! PM Teresa May has yet again been given an opportunity by the EU for more consultations, but the British People who matter most, come out in large numbers appealing for another referendum which they truly deserve! 
Some great signs (& humour in the face of adversity) at the #peoplesvotemarch in London today. Reports of over 1m people marching against #Brexit.  
So those who believe in honouring the result of a democratic referendum aren’t ‘real’ patriots?  
Gove's closest confidant wrote an unscientific rant claiming poor people are poor due to 'inferior genes' and rich people are rich due to being 'superior people'.He then led the Brexit campaign - which targeted, guess who, poor people #ScumFloats 
hear that @bbclaurak ? And  
David Davis does not understand what he is talking about. Brexit Day has already changed as a matter of EU law. Failure to change the date in UK law would simply leave a short period when the UK would not have a full domestic legal framework to give effect to membership.  
one desperate thing about today’s amazing #PeoplesVoteMarch is how “The Left” has sought to claim it - either as a protest against the Tories or as some sort of socialist demo. It’s not just a “Tory Brexit” we’re against. It’s a Corbyn Brexit as well. Or *any* Brexit.  
I got 17 threats prior to the march.Via email.Via post.One via a phone call.All clearly meant to stop me marching.All from Brexit supporters.All telling me that, as a foreigner, I have no right to march / voice my view. How dare you.  
The 2016 vote was not a sacred blood oath sworn on the tombs of the ancestors while reciting the names of the ancient deities. It was an advisory referendum vote leading to a government policy which can be reconsidered in the light of new evidence.#PeoplesVoteMarch #Brexit 
A million people on the march against Brexit in London, 4m people and counting sign up to revoke Article 50, Cabinet coup against May fast gathering steam.   Just another day in #Brexit Britain  
Would anyone really want this man to be PM?  His lies & duplicity are all over the bus & running throughout the national tragedy which is Brexit.  #cabinetcoup #Gove 
British democracy faces a simple choice.Do we have politicians who lie to us, that we know lie to us and they know that we know.Or do we have politicians who lie to us and we all pretend that they don't?The only basis for Brexit is for the pretence of the latter. 
Seen on the anti-#Brexit march in London today. #Dallas 
Marching against Brexit unites the arts and sciences  
A massive thank you to @IanDunt, @GuitarMoog,@Sime0nStylites who throughout the shit show of the past 3 years have always commentated with clarity, intelligence and most importantly, sanity. Thank you and thank you to all who oppose brexit. 
are the brexit related to the breen 
It’s strange. I feel more part of the Remain tribe that I have any other; more positive about the EU and energised to reclaim and reform it, than before; more hopeful about the next generation’s political engagement. Maybe Brexit was weirdly useful. Maybe peril motivates action. 
this parliament.exe sign at the Brexit march in London today is  /pic by @MichaelGillett 
Well I guess Piers if you Respect a #Brexit vote based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesForeign InterferenceDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o Consent & The Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the Ppl& Deny a RethinkThat is your rightMillions of us don't. 
May to be booted & replaced with someone who can actually deliver Brexit. Finally!  
Following June 2016 #EUref, former Greek Finance Minister @yanisvaroufakis noted how odd it was that #UK chose a #Remain supporter @theresa_may as PM & to spearhead #Brexit negotiations. Never fear, thought I, #democracy is alive & well in the #UK, she will #RespectTheResult ... 
Incendiary messaging here from the man who only managed to convince 60 to march for his cause. 
If this doesn’t stop brexit I give up  
One of the fastest ways to distinguish a #Remain vs #Leave supporter is that many Remainers see #Brexit as a nostalgic spasm of imperial grandeur whereas most #Leave supporters comprehend 21st C will bring bright future of mutually beneficial partnerships for UK across the world. 
“The vast majority of businesses have prepared for a departure on the 29th. Delay will only disrupt. “If Parliament rejects the deal on offer, the Prime Minister has it in her power to deliver a WTO outcome. That is what she should do.” @DavidDavisMP 
A million people march against the flagship Tory policy of Brexit, and where's the opposition leader? At the fucking seaside. There's a special place in hell for that one. 
Our final speaker to confirm tonight for the rally to save Brexit is Mr Brexit himself Nigel Farage! Join us: More speakers to be confirmed too... 
These guys were awesome. #brexit  
More than a million of us marched.We will be patronised by the Corbynistas and theTory Brexit high command  as the anti-democrats, daring  profoundly to dispute what is happening to our beloved country.Beware! When a million are so moved,they are never wrong. A day of pride. 
To be clear, fuck Brexit. 
A couple of people have asked why I would march for a People's Vote, when I've been so critical of the damage to parliamentary democracy done by the 2016 referendum. Short answer: referendums can uphold parliamentary democracy or subvert it, depending on how we use them. [THREAD] 
Celebrities like Hugh Grant, Annie Lennox and Brian Cox lent their support to a petition calling to cancel #Brexit  
Let's remember that it was the Harper Government that set the current equalization formula. @jkenney was in the Cabinet when it was approved. He's literally launching a referendum against his own policy   
Brexit is an absolute shitstorm isn't it . Back in 2016 I voted leave for what I thought at the time were valid concerns . Mainly over CAP , CFP and the effect on the NHS of the EU possibly implementing TTIP . 
On reflection, these are my favourites, love the ‘Britishness’ of the last one #PutItBackToThePeople #PeopleVote 
We must all follow David’s lead. Britain got along just fine for centuries consuming purely brutish products, pre-1602! #brexit  
We’ve lost a few followers today due to our stance on Brexit.We understand that we will not agree on everything, but hopefully we can win your back around due to our unwavering support for the NHS.Please follow and RT if you’re still right behind us.  
I do not care which side you voted for this is so bloody disrespectful. #Brexit #Remain #Leave 
Calls grow for public inquiry into Brexit  
"We don't want a 2nd referendum. Just the 1st one without the cheating." Breaches of electoral law, misused online data and social media interference renders 2016 referendum tainted. Let's #PutItToThePeople for a #PeoplesVote! My placard @ #PutItToThePeopleMarch #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Look at what happened to poor Gina Miller. And Anna Soubry, and Jess Phillips - they've all had death threats from Leavers. 
Sarah Vine thinks the reason £1 trillion in financial assets have left the UK since the referendum is that “the Remain camp never respected the result”.    
@HouseofCommons think very carefully about how you want to tread the next few weeks. If you try to thwart Brexit you are betraying democracy and politics in this country will change. Remainers of Britain, you lost. Get over it. Let’s move on & get out #LeaveMeansLeave 
Reminder:DEMOCRACYWhat happened in a referendum on 23 June 2016 where the winners lied & broke the law NOT DEMOCRACYMarches, petitions, votes in Parliament, exposing lies from 23 June 2016, any other votes especially on what people believe on any day apart from 23 June 2016 
Shame you weren’t in London with a million of us marching against Brexit. You should’ve been leading it.  
After events of the last few days at least there is one thing that is now in the open. The aim of those calling for a 2nd Referendum is to prevent Brexit. Let's stop pretending it's anything else. It's a legitimate aim but just be honest and stop pretending it's about democracy 
Our second speaker on our rally to save Brexit next Friday is... Wetherspoons boss Tim Martin!Parliament Square, 4pm, March 29th: P.s More speakers TBC 
Also some people have asked me the worst placard I saw. It read:“Brexit is worse than Michael Jackson. Brexit will fuck many more children.”#peoplesVoteMarch 
there’s a uniquely american myth that guns are more than guns, that they’re our heritage and the crown jewel of our free state. guns are a tool for violence. they’re not an identity nor a component of anyone’s identity paradigm. 
He walked the 200 miles last Oct tooBBC News - Brexit march: Remainer walks 200 miles to join protest  
Brexit was pushed by the same nefarious forces that disrupted the 2016 US election. If we could hold a do-over election here, we would. If a 2nd referendum is possible - especially now that the British ppl have a better idea of impacts - they should do it. It’s a big decision.  
The Daily Express is offering readers a Free* Made in the UK** Passport holder.*Send cheque for £0.58**’This offer is open to UK residents only, not available in NI’#Brexit  
“A national humiliation.Made in Britain. Made by Brexit.”  Michael Heseltine speech - Peoples Vote March 23.03.2019  via @YouTube 
I’ll be honest. Since I voted Brexit I’ve second guessed myself - “ooh maybe I got it wrong”. But I’ve never felt so emboldened as a Brexiteer since going to the #PeoplesVoteMarch. I just thought a lot of it was bloody weird? Like watching a sea of One Direction fan girls  
I voted Remain. I still think it was the better option. But the societal divisions caused by a second referendum and the precedent it would set for our democracy would be catastrophic. Complete disregard for the gripes of people who felt left behind by the political class. 
#BreakingNewsNew 50p #Brexit coin from the Royal Mint :)#CoinCollecting #CoinCollection #CollectingCoins 
My Grandchild lost her first tooth today, she didn't want money off the Tooth Fairy. She wanted a second referendum. 
Our democracy has failed. Here are some solutions: 1) Stronger sentences (w/ jailtime) for those that cheat, 2) Press regulatory body, 3) Electoral law reform & 4) Have a full public inquiry (immediately). Pressure your MPs for this, please. 
Today was incredible. Over 1m people marching together in solidarity.Brexit will make ALL of the UK & ALL of Ireland poorer.We’ve made our voices heard. We now hope that the politicians will listen - and do so by putting the deal back to us to have the final say  
 with a little help from the rest of the Whitehall cats and so on - don't doubt it @DiploMog @TreasuryMog @HMCabinetCat it's time for a new #catinet 
#PeoplesVoteMarch Incredible must watch speech today by Michael Heseltine who energised and galvanized the huge pro-European crowd as he extolled the benefits and achievements of the greatest peace project the world has ever seen - Full speech here -  
Very happy to have another referendum. Just implement the last one first. 
What an incredible day. We really hope the leaderships of the main parties got your message: it's time to #PutItToThePeople and have a final say on #Brexit. It's time for a #PeoplesVote. Please sign up to support us too:  
When the going gets tough, the Leader Of The Opposition visits Morecambe.What a pathetic figure.  Does he really think he can sit out #Brexit and become PM? No chance.  
Who would you put in charge of #Brexit? #PutItToThePeople #FinalSay  
'One million' protesters join historic march for second referendum, telling MPs: 'Give the decision back to the people' #FinalSay 
Looking forward to reminding @NicolaSturgeon of this in the extremely unlikely event of Scotland ever voting to leave the U.K. Won’t count if @theSNP win an independence referendum — there’ll have to be a People’s Vote as well.  
Niche #Brexit #FinalSay placard of the day. Looking forward to watching #MilanoSanRemo when I get home tonight. 
Given:- the #RevokeA50 petition (nearly 5m signatures in record time)- the #PutItToThePeopleMarch (a million marching in London,incl many travelling from all over the country)- opinion polls => It’s highly unlikely that #Brexit is still the will of the peopleBest check!  
Guardianista crowds??  You sneer at those defending the people who can’t feed their kids.  Defending those who won’t be able to afford healthcare after Brexit.  Defending those EU immigrants holding our NHS together.  You my friend are missing the point.  Missing the big picture. 
If you look hard, you might spot me - I truly am one in a million! #PeoplesVoteMarch #StopBrexit 
The Blairite and Tory MPs who quit their parties to join The Independent Group are tweeting under the hashtag #PutItToThePeople calling for people to have their say on BrexitThe same MPs who will not #PutItToThePeople by refusing to call by-electionsSelf-indulgent centrists 
While the #PutItToThePeople march in London is calling for a second Brexit referendum, at a pro-Brexit #MarchToLeave rally in Nottinghamshire @Nigel_Farage said if there was another vote, Leave would win again but 'by a much bigger margin' #PeoplesMarch 
"We must, all of us, including you Jeremy Corbyn, come together and demand a People's Vote."Nicola Sturgeon, First Minister of Scotland, calls on the Labour and Conservative leadership to put Brexit "back to the people".  
Anna Soubry mentions the young people who will bear the burden of Brexit here. It's a shame she didn't think of the young people who bear the burden of Austerity today when she voted 51 times to cut welfare spending that left 1/2million of them homeless.  
I can’t be the only person who voted Remain and ideally wish we’d voted to stay in the EU in 2016 but would vote Leave in any second referendum because I actually respect the vote we HAVE ALREADY HAD and think it would be disastrous to ignore it...? 
SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP tells the #PutitothePeople rally there is no such thing as a good Brexit. Parliament must take back control from Theresa May, and put the decision back to the people in a fresh referendum with Remain on the ballot #BrexitCrisis #PeoplesVote 
Govt cannot ignore peaceful protest on this vast scale. There is no valid consent to Brexit until we #PutintothePeople 
'No matter how you voted in the referendum... we can all agree that Brexit has been a complete mess... it's time to give us, the British people, a final say on Brexit,' London Mayor @SadiqKhan calls for a second Brexit referendum #PutItToThePeople march 
Nige, Ticey, Bankski, Wiggy, Gove's lad (Darren), Gino, Deadwood, Jakey, Bonehead...look away now, your boys took one hell of a beating...but @theresa_may ...you wanted consensus, it's on your doorstep luv! 
Calls grow for public inquiry into Brexit | Politics | The Guardian. Public inquiry more likely. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Brilliant march today #DissolveTheUnion #Brexit  
Today, the Scottish First Minister spoke in front of 1 MILLION people demanding a #PeoplesVote.At the same time, the Welsh First Minister released a video on Twitter demanding that 'a form of Brexit' was imperative... It got 18 retweets.She stood up whilst he stood aside. 
Brexit is Nighy... bollox #RevokeArticle50March #women4europe #billnighy 
"However you voted in the referendum...I'm sure you'd agree that Brexit has been a complete and utter mess" - the Mayor of London joins others on a protest march over the handling of BrexitFollow live updates from the #PeoplesVoteMarch here:  
Watch the full speech to #PeoplesVoteMarch from our chair @Cnagpaul. Our message is  clear: #Brexit is bad for patients, bad for health and bad for the NHS #PutItToThePeople 
So proud of my wonderful wonderful wife who, faced with a sea of Union Jack wavers at the Albert Hall, reconfigured Rule Britannia to the tune of Ode to Joy. She’s my hero. #PeopleVoteMarch #Brexit  
Democracy only really works when the people are empowered through the use of their vote. Nowhere does it say those people cannot change their minds particularly in a matter of such importance. A ratification referendum hurts no-one so what are you afraid of @theresa_may? 
BEST OF BRITAIN:  A 94 year-old Second World War brigadier, holder of the Military Cross and MBE, demonstrating against Brexit with his mixed race great-granddaughter, in Parliament Square just now.  (photo by my friend Andrew). #PeoplesVoteMarch 
At Parliament Square with @markgatiss. Bob Against Brexit. #Putittothepeople 
#PeoplesVoteMarch organisers say more than a million people joined protests in central London[tap to expand] #Brexit  
Pic of the day/week/year. A War Criminal at large. And a bitter wee nationalist. #Scotland #Brexit #Campbell #Blair #Iraq #1MillionDead #DrippingInBlood pic.twitter.com/corgMgp5vP 
I will be voting for a confirmatory referendum in the House of Commons next week so that the British people can decide between leaving with a deal or remaining in the EU. #PutItToThePeople 
“Indicative votes” are a dreadful idea, apparently to force upon us what could not be achieved through the subterfuge of the Withdrawal Agreement: Customs Union (CU), against the Conservative manifestoIn any meaningful sense, Brexit would be lost1/12 
 @NicolaSturgeon: "It is too easy to feel a sense of despair, but my message is a message of hope". #PutitothePeopleMarch #Brexit  
Hundreds of thousands are marching in London today to demand a second Brexit referendum.  
Great stunt by @ByDonkeys and @FFSake_ showing why we must have a #PeoplesVote on this #Brexit deal. #PutItToThePeople 
Just been asked to leave the @RoyalOperaHouse for wearing my #PeoplesVoteNow T-shirt. Good luck getting #Europe’s best opera performers after we’ve crashed out. #brexit 
Great reception for @NicolaSturgeon and @theSNP at the #PutItToThePeople rally outside Westminster. Theresa May must give the people a say over their future in a fresh referendum with Remain on the ballot #BrexitCrisis #PeoplesVote 
Join us 29th March at Whitehall for the Make Brexit Happen Rally#BrexitBetrayal 
James O'Brien speaking at today's People's Vote march in London on why Britain needs a second referendum on Brexit  
Lawyer friends. If the referendum was a trial and we the people, the jury and we found in favour of an outcome. And then we discovered that some of the evidence was tainted, illegal and false. Wouldn’t it be logical to have a retrial? #PeopesVoteMarch 
For a start, I want to know exactly why Johnson, Gove and Farage did what they did - and who funded them and why. This is a time of reckoning. 
“You have to ask the question again. Nobody votes to leave without having some inkling of where they’re going.”@mrjamesob on why Britain needs a second referendum #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Nobody voted for this mess, time to Paws Brexit!  
Anti Brexit March poster: Here’s a coincidence I’d missed, mean but relevant. Decent people make bad choices for heart-felt reasons and often pay the price themselves  
Wow. Civil service believed to be preparing for ‘inevitable’ public inquiry into Brexit. How will history judge you, MPs? What did you do?  
Mercedes has even made it to the anti-Brexit protest in London! #PeoplesVoteMarch @Mercedesiman 
The simple truth about the #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Congratulations Theresa May, your approach to #Brexit has turned this leaver into a remainer. Happy to be marching today #PeoplesVoteMarch #remainernow @remainernow 
IT IS MASSIVE!  #PeoplesVoteMarch #Brexit @zdfheute @ReporterZDF 
Pride and Hope indeed! This is the REAL UK!Good humoured, tolerant, inclusive and we've had ENOUGH of #brexit!  
Hey @Nigel_Farage ......look at all those bots!!!! #peoplesvotemarch 
The march in London was the same, we only wanted 75 core marchers too, it's just symbolic you know, to highlight the betrayal of a corrupt parliament trying to force the results of a corrupt referendum on us.  But hey some of our mates turned up, mates are mates gotta love 'em :) 
Not a SINGLE non-White face visible in that "huge crowd" and yet "Tory Brexit is racist Brexit"...  
#PeoplesVoteMarch The biggest of protest march in British History! Fight the elites, be on the right side of History #StopBrexitMarch #PutIttothePeople #PutitothePeopleMarch #1Million of real people to stop #Brexit  
‘For the sake of the NHS let us, the people, have the final say’. Our chair @CNagpaul addresses #PeoplesVoteMarch on the risks of #Brexit to the NHS #PutItToThePeople 
Best BREXIT sign yet! From the march today  
'Brexit is the wurst.'  #dogsmarch4Brexit Dogs  EU 
theresa may: please consider allowing us to delay brexit EU leaders:  
My favourite is “but you must respect the referendum result.” I respect the result of the Battle of Waterloo but I don’t live in 1815.Or in the year of that other referendum 2016. It’s 2019 and we want to #PutItBackToThePeople 
We are also exasperated by your lack of opposition to Theresa May's Brexit. Because you want to end freedom of movement too.  
If there is another referendum we need to make sure that politicians on both sides are unable to lie to the public.#SetAPrecedent#InnocentUnlessProvenGuilty#PeoplesVoteMarch#PutItToThePeople#PeoplesMarch#VoteLeave#VoteRemain#ProsecuteBoris 
An estimated one million people have taken part in the #PutItToThePeople march in London demanding a final say on Brexit#PeopleVoteMarch #PeoplesMarch 
One of the most damaging fallouts of Brexit has been the media creation of the Leave/Remain dichotomy as an identity of two extremes, when opinion on the EU is a spectrum. It’s easier to shift views on a spectrum: but when you cast it as a war of identities, people hunker down. 
Whatever your views are on Brexit you have to admit this march is huge. BBC and Sky are saying there are thousands of campaigners but it is easy to see there are a lot more than that.#PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVoteMarch  
And the winner for Most British Sign At A Brexit March goes to ‘I Mean Honestly!’@StephenMcGann #peoplesVoteMarch 
Parliament Square - ‘give the people the chance to stop Brexit’  
Remainers at Brexit away...   
We are all marching to stop Brexit, @OwenJones84, and Labour has abandoned us. 
Extraordinary how #brexit has created the biggest pro-EU movement ever to be seen. #PutitothePeopleMarch 
What is Mrs May playing at? Is she an automata programmed by the EU? Is she just carrying out the orders of a higher power - ie Mr Juncker? How can a British PM debase themselves & our nation in this way? Do nothing now. Just leave on 29th by default. 
WOW! The crowd is estimated at ONE MILLION!! Please RT so everyone knows. We demand there is a #FinalSay for all on #Brexit #PutItToThePeople @peoplesvote_uk 
She (PM) says the ppl have spoken.. well there's millions of us who don't want to go down path she's taking us down. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Bollocks to Brexit #PeoplesMarch #BollocksToBrexit #PutItBackToThePeople #brexithaiku 
(2) For the record..... so far:#PeoplesVoteMarch #RevokeArt50Now 
Hmmmmm, David Cameron and the whole of the UK would think otherwise #Brexit  
More people have now signed the #RevokeArt50petition than voted UKIP at height of its popularity. If 3.9m UKIP voters in 2015 was a good reason for the last referendum, surely 4.3m & counting calling for us to Remain should be enough for another vote now. #Brexit #PeoplesMarch 
A shout out to Britain’s hard-pressed cartoonists who produce this kind of brilliance repetitive day in, repetitive day out - this is from @bobscartoons #Brexit  
No matter how you voted, I’m sure you’ll agree - #Brexit is a complete and utter mess.  The British people didn't vote for a bad Brexit deal. The British people didn't vote for a no-deal Brexit. It's time to give us - the British people - the final say. #PeoplesVote  
The pro brexit march VS the anti brexit march. But yeah will of the people hey @theresa_may 
Hundreds of thousands are now on the streets for #PeoplesVoteMarch.More than 4 million have signed the #RevokeArticle50 petition.We aren't calling for the status quo, but for the chance to end Brexit and make radical changes to fix the local and global problems we face.  
Ultimately, I believe the outcome of the 2016 referendum must be implemented. It would be so dangerous to set aside the result of the largest ever exercise in direct democracy this country has seen. I think the UK can succeed economically with an independent trade policy. 20/25 
Some of the media attack our judges as enemies of the people.The Prime Minister attacks our MPs for standing up for ordinary people. Well - we are the people - and when it comes to #Brexit we want a say over our future. #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch  
UK & EU forces have tried to undo 2016 #Brexit vote from Day One just like Dems have tried to undo 2016 election here.  
Netflix need to do a Brexit documentary series when this shit is all over 
Today I'm marching for my two sons, and for all our children and young people. They deserve a better future than Brexit Britain. Let's stop Brexit and build a better future, together. #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote #ExitFromBrexit 
"most of the horror stories surrounding a WTO Brexit are redundant given the scale of preparations now made"  
The #PeoplesVoteMarch that calls for a second referendum has started in London.  
A long Brexit delay would be a complete betrayal of Brexit. We voted to leave years ago - we expect to leave on March 29th with No Deal.RT if you agree! 
“If there is to be any respect whatsoever for our system of representative democracy, it has to deliver Brexit. To go back on all those promises to respect the referendum result would make a mockery of democracy.”David Starkey on Brexit 
We’re in the endgame now. 
I think a big part of Nicola Sturgeon/The SNP committing so strongly to stopping brexit is (1) it's the right thing, (2) it shows competence against chaotic UK, and (3) to say they genuinely tried to avoid catastrophe but were largely ignored, bolstering #indyref2 justification. 
Farage trying to have a pint while we broadcast footage of him calling for a second referendum  
London Greeks Against Brexit#PeoplesVoteMarch #PutItToThePeople 
Thank you ⁦@theresa_may⁩ for bringing so many patriotic citizens out on the streets to try to save us from your disastrous Brexit. London Tube stations near today’s #PutitothePeopleMarch are crammed. British people have had enough of Brexit lies, deceit & incompetence  
I'm sorry for any of you who voted to leave EU, wishing to gain back some control, but problem is Tory government, not Europe. BREXIT is about hiding wealthI'd much rather be connected with EU than I would get closer to insane Uncle Sam with his chlorinated chicken and war lust. 
Seeing @theSNP politicians like Nicola Sturgeon in the #PeoplesVoteMarch is testament to their character. The calamity of a no deal Brexit could actually hasten Scottish independence, yet the party is adamant in trying to help English voters see sense in this. I'm proud of them. 
Johnny & Gheorghe would be marching  today in London to show their support for the people’s vote on Brexit  
I'm with the march today in London in spirit. Yes, I signed the petition. We were sold BREXIT on lies, and now we know much much more of what BREXIT really involves, we must vote again.BREXIT is the stupidest act of self harm this country has ever done .You believed the media. 
Compare to the thousands of young people who have been signing up to Students For Brexit in the weeks since its launch#PeopesVoteMarch @Brexit4Students 
Today we’re demanding a People’s Vote - where myths are put aside for facts. Fact: Every Brexit scenario will make Britain worse off.We’re not asking the elites to decide - we want the decision to be put back to the people.Agree? Retweet this now! #PutItToThePeople 
Here’s our founding member, Dominic Grieve, explaining why he’s on the #PutitothePeopleMarch today.  #Brexit #righttovote #FinalSay #PeoplesMarch #PeoplesVoteMarch 
“Britain needs a no-deal Brexit now - not a long delay, say entrepreneurs in swipe at CBI”  
This is now the largest UK wide petition OF ALL TIME. It’s just passed the record set by a petition asking for a second EU referendum  keep the signatures coming!  
Sobering to consider that the endearing ⁦Mr Geller’s⁩ magical thinking is far less deranged, deluded and demented than the magical thinking of the Prime Minister and the Brexiters… 
Bikers against Brexit?#PutItToThePeople #RevokeArticle50 #Brexit #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Only in England: Janeites against Brexit #PutItToThePeople 
The revolt against Brexit, by marching and petitions, is the best answer to all kind of populists and nationalists who promised the undeliverable and then ran away.  
Good luck to everyone on the Losers’ march today, and to everyone signing the Losers’ petition. I lost too, but somehow I found the strength to get over it, thus avoiding making a pointless whiny ‘BUT MY OPINION IS MORE OPINION THAN DEMOCRACY!!’ arse of myself. #Brexit 
Look what @NickBoles used to say about membership of the Single Market and Customs Union#IAgreeWithNick 
Some MPs don’t want Brexit. And they don’t want to respect the Referendum result. And they have a cunning plan.Instead of Parliament being run by the Government you voted for, it would be run instead by a group of self-selected backbenchersMore: 
EU-nited? At the GREAT BRITISH F*CK OFF Festival. OUR LINE UP for next Sunday! Have you got your tickets yet? @theatredeli #TheOldLibrary #GBFO #Brexit #Theatre 
2 Million young people have turned 18 since 2016. We need a #PeoplesVote to defend our future. #PeopleVoteMarch Park Lane. Noon. 
We did this together and I’m grateful to have had you & @chrisinsilico by my side this last year. We’ve been vindicated so many times but the fight still rages on. The referendum was won by criminality. A criminally won vote is not a democratic vote. #RevokeAndInvestigate 
In effect, the result of the referendum created a contract between the people and the government of the day. However, a contract is void if the conditions are not met, or if they were not correct in the first place. We are therefore entitled to regard it as null and void 
The #MarchToLeave was never planned to be a mass march -75 core marchers joined at various points by others - a symbolic march to hilight betrayal of a Remain Parliament of the referendum  
The 2nd referendum march today and the millions of signatures on the revoke A50 petition are significant and important. ButNeither tells us anything we didn’t already know. Millions of people in the UK don’t want Brexit, millions do. And 80%+ of MPs were elected to deliver it 
Dear #PeoplesMarch and #FBPE types    Please seek professional help for your Brexit derangement syndrome. I appreciate that you have been indulged ever since you lost in 2016 but this has not helped your recovery. Kind Regards,17.4m Winners. 
Dear @madgie1941 I send this message in solidarity. Those who respond with violence & anger are the voices we need to make sure we collectively call out.  Please make sure you record these messages & send to the police.  Not all who back Brexit are vile extremists.  Stay safe.  
If Britain believes that it has the right to exit from EU thru a #Referendum, and that the Irish or Scots can also exit from Britain thru a #Referendum, why then is Britain working against the same right for any of the nationalities that were FORCED into ‘One Nigeria’ in 1914? 
#Brexit is largely about nostalgia for a Britain before 1975, what a Carry On it has become!  
Mmm, there seems to be more #PeoplesVoteMarch supporters getting off of one train at Paddington than there are on Nigel Farage's #Brexit march. Today, we really will see the "will of the people". Let's hope our MPs look, learn and listen!  
Hello? Why not join the biggest public revolt against this government’s botched Brexit? Just an idea that a party serious about ever being in government should consider. Hello? Anyone there? Hello, calling @UKLabour 
if you didn't get a chance to express an opinion on the original brexit referendum because your age disenfranchised you - THIS is your chance to exercise your democratic voice on leaving the EU (...so use it)the petition just hit 4 million signatures! 
The betrayal of #Brexit is driving a deeper wedge of division into our society than Islam has managed in 30 years of trying. I’ve never known a situation where people so despised each other for their political views. The rancour and bitterness is worse than the 1980s. Great fun. 
Paddington Station is currently a sea of EU flags and Bollocks to brexit placards. People of all ages coming together to say fuck you to an incompetent government is far more British than brexit ever could be. 
WATCH: David Miliband on #r4Today is absolutely right - the Brexit that was promised by the Leave campaign in 2016 is not on offer. That's why we're marching for a #PeoplesVote today. #PutItToThePeopleMarch 
Jeremy Corbyn is bookies favourite to be next Prime Minister, he's my favourite too!Retweet if you agree!Corbyn bookmakers' favourite to become next prime minister as Theresa May's Brexit crisis deepens  
Exclusive: Larry, @Number10cat tells @ta_nea Greece's newspaper he could get better @Brexit deal than @theresa_may and makes shocking revelations about @GOVUK, @10DowningStreet, @BorisJohnson and @jeremycorbyn  
All those ‘celebs’ and politicos praising Nicola and SNP for supporting THEIR People’s Vote for England watch them vanish like snaw aff a dyke when we go for our democratic mandated referendum. 
ReferendumLoseAnother referendumLoseAnother referendumWinAnother referendumNo chanceThat's not fucking democracy. That's the sort of shite you hear happening in mad fucked up countries who still drive about in Ford Cortinas 
This article is an absolute masterclass in subtle shade. 
omg just remembering that time Uri Geller sent a letter to Theresa May and told her he’d use telepathy to stop brexit 
Thinking of you. We'll march in your name today. 
The Ministry of Defence has set up a Brexit bunker underneath its main building in Whitehall. Could it just leave the Brexiteers in it for 2 years and pretend it is all happening while Article 50 is quietly revoked? 
The #RevokeArt50Petition breaks the 4 million barrier! So proud to be part of the #ScottishSix who created this opportunity. Lets get it to 5 million! #Brexit #PutitothePeople 
Our big red #Brexit bus has been out and about collecting Londoners' views on the b-word. Find out what they're saying and add your view here: . It may end up as part of our permanent collection! 
In essence, Brexit is two very simple questions:(1) Do you want to be governed by people you can elect & throw out?or (2) Do you want to be ruled over by people you can neither elect nor throw out?Everyone on the #PeoplesVoteMarch wants (2) It's a #MarchAgainstDemocracy 
Well, I didn’t predict that Uri Geller would chime in on Brexit, and I certainly didn’t predict Winston Churchill’s spoon. I keep thinking this whole thing can’t get any weirder, but every day it proves me wrong... 
If Ireland were to rejoin the U.K. or commonwealth or  be British governed it would benefit Ireland’s trade with the U.K. and it would benefit Brexit such as the Irish border problem also I would like Ireland to have peace if we rejoined the U.K.  #bbc #brexit @StandUp4Brexit 
My 93 year old gran was waiting for the train to LDN. The announcer said the train was cancelled. She shouted "A BIT LIKE BREXIT WILL BE WHEN WE GET TO LONDON". The waiting public cheered and then clubbed together to all hire a minibus to London. Cant stop her. #PeopleVoteMarch 
TODAY: People from all four corners of our country are on their way to London to demand the British people get the final say on Brexit.Together we'll be sending a clear message: Enough is enough - it's time to #PutItToThePeople See you there! @peoplesvote_uk #PeoplesVote  
Excellent Bob cartoon in today's @Telegraph. Intended as a comment on #Brexit but strongly reminds me of something I once wrote…  
I'm on the #PeoplesVoteExpress to the #PutItToThePeopleMarch. We must stop this catastrophe that is #Brexit. This could be the biggest march in history! @BathforEurope @Bristol4Europe 
"Asking someone to respect the result of the 2016 referendum is the same as asking someone to respect Lance Armstrong’s 7 Tour De France wins"Borrowed from someone else but spot on! 
I’ll be marching to show Scotland’s anger at the Brexit farce | @NicolaSturgeon | #PutitothePeople #FinalSay  
Time to act. 
My placard for the #PeopleVoteMarch. The dark knight of Parliament and one of the only sane voices in the whole brexit mess  
Just been chatting to my 17-nearly-18 year old son. He didn't know about the Revoke Article 50 petition! Has now signed and is going to promote it to his friends today. Everyone double check that all the young people in your life know about this  #RevokeArticle50 
RT if- You voted remain & would prefer to stay in the EU- but you respect democracy & would accept a brexit with Labour influence (such as close ties + customs union)- you are % behind Corbyn's Labour & see a General Election as more important than brexit#PeopleVoteMarch 
If you are still trying to ignore the referendum result three years later, and the manifestos of the major parties at a General Election, can you really be described as the 'moderate' ones? 
At the heart of the Brexit process has been the issue of trust. The people made a decision- would Parliament implement that decision? You cannot tell the country 100 times we will leave on 29th March, break that promise and expect trust to be maintained. 
Can we please make it mandatory that before guest on TV or radio claims to know what the country thinks about #brexit they first have to state when they last left London. 
I’m sorry but what has David Miliband got to do with the current debate over Brexit? He hasn’t been living in the country for 5 years. Let alone in touch with the electorate. @BBCr4today #BBCR4today 
They have made death threats against our elected politicians.They have made death threats against the woman who started the #revokeA50petition.They call themselves "democrats." They are fascists. 
“The PM has no mandate from the Conservative Party to delay our exit. It’s extremely unlikely that the votes are going to change much on the Withdrawal Agreement. It is massively unpopular in the country. She's got to drop it and get on with a smooth exit without it” @johnredwood 
Hi - am the person responsible for the Revoke Art 50 petition. Just needed to tell you that 1. am currently visiting Cyprus. and 2. last night I had three telepohoned death threats. (!) Who wants Brexit so much that they are prepared to kill for it? 
We can defeat Brexit - but the best weapon against the coming backlash is hope. My message for today's #PeoplesVoteNow demo... 
Revoke Article 50 petition to UK Parliament is now at 3.9 million signatories which is an astonishing number in such a short period. This out numbers the other pro Brexit petitions by 10 to 1. I think it will soon probably become the largest ever online petition.  
I have always voted against the Tories, but Corbyn and the Labour manifesto gave me something to vote FOR.Like millions of others, I’m not just going to give up on that.  Not for Brexit, not for the antisemitism smears, and not for Chuka bloody Umunna.#IStandWithCorbyn 
This is a great brexit factoid.More than 60 countries in the world have an annual celebration about getting rid of the British.None of them in the EU.Go Brexiters go. Dump your old friends for people who hate you. 
I’m not marching today because the financial hit from #Brexit means we can’t afford the journey. Every tweet I see & share this morning is a knife in my heart. So do me a favour...if you haven’t already signed the #Revoke petition, please do so. #Remain 
BBC News - Plaid Cymru could call for independence poll after Brexit 
Anyone who has ever inadvertently signed a government petition for a second time knows this is a lie. The second time is simply rejected. 
I am disgusted at the collusion of the Prime Minister, MPs and the EU to delay Brexit and destroy democracy in the UK. I will not be buying any products from the EU until the UK leaves the EU. 29th March is our departure date, and the UK must leave the EU in full and on time. 
The tide is turning and today is the day that we the people reclaim our democracy 
EYLES: Brexit has done us all a favour. Showing up these charlatans for what they really are – a bunch of inadequates & scoundrels. Punishment meted out to them at the ballot box in 2022 or sooner will change the course of our destiny. @Drystonesonnet #csm 
If Uri Geller is able to make Theresa May not execute Brexit by using his mind, why did he need to write her a letter?  
Wouldn't the most democratic way of leaving the EU be to have a Leave-Remain referendum, negotiate the exit deal, and then #PutItToThePeople so it's not just the politicians who get to decide if it's good enough? 
If Brexit does happen, here are people & institutions to blame:David CameronTheresa MayConservative PartyUKIPERGBoris JohnsonMichael GoveAaron BanksNigel FarageDominic Cummings3 Leave campaignsCambridge AnalyticaDaily MailThe SunDaily ExpressBBCJeremy Corbyn 
At 55, today I’m going on my first protest march, just  travelling up from Dorset.    I have never been a member of a political party but I joined the @LibDems a few weeks ago to #ExitFromBrexitThat how strongly I feel about this Brexit madness.  It’s got to stop.#PeoplesMarch 
This is madness, MPs blatantly trying to trash the #EUref result. I really hope that MPs who disregard not only the referendum result, but also the party manifestos their campaigns were based upon, get defeated in the next election. #ukpoli #RespectDemocracy #RespectTheResult 
Morning Bitches! I've just set off on my long journey to the march...Hope to see you there! pic.twitter.com/rqzi7tLIIy 
Asking someone to respect the result of the 2016 referendum is the same as asking someone to respect Lance Armstrong’s 7 Tour De France wins. There was money and social media influence from a hostile foreign state, as well as electoral finance law breaking. #PeopleVoteMarch 
LABOUR BREXIT UPDATE -  a thread.#Labour has tabled an amendment to Monday's government motion to put Parliament in control of the #Brexit process and end the chaos and confusion created by this government’s failure and incompetence.1/9 
Just saw people getting on a coach at 2.30am in Bournemouth town centre heading for the #PeoplesVoteMarch. Really Heart Warming. 
As Brexit chaos looms, @MatthewStadlen asks: do you want: 
It’s not possible to reconcile what Commons Speaker John Bercow  is saying with the fact that 85% of MPs committed to party manifestos supporting #Brexit yet  a majority of them supported taking #NoDealBrexit off the table & want to block Brexit in favour of a #BRINO #WA 
The referendum wasn't to return sovereignty, neither was it to stop freedom of movement. It was about whether or not we remain members of the European Union.  
OK, so this is not a fair point, @GoodwinMJ. If there is a disconnect between what the people who were pushing for one result said and what the referendum is about, then that is all on them.  
If everyone who wanted to march tomorrow was able to attend, Brexit would be killed stone dead just like that. That’s why, if you are wavering, you should go #PutitothePeople #PeopleVoteMarch #PutitothePeopleMarch #RevokeArt50 
This feels like stating the obvious re: Brexit. But nobody else seems to be saying it, so.  
One thing I’ve noticed about this #Brexit thing is that #brexiteers are so negative, apart from taking the country back to the dark ages, everything they do is negative be that organising road blocks to aggressive actions. They have nothing positive to offer.  
david cameron looking in the mirror the morning before he called the brexit referendum  
£1,000,000,000,000 of assets shifted from London to EU ahead of no-deal Brexit (yes you read that right - that’s a trillion pounds - think of all the lost tax revenue)  via @MetroUK 
Just for tonight, no focus on Brexit for me. Tonight I’m focused on the mum and boy who walked the streets last night because they are homeless, who we just got into emergency accommodation tonight. An 8 year old boy, just like my twins, who supports arsenal and loves his mum. 
Theresa May, you're the reason I fight. You're the reason that I will not be satisfied until Brexit is dead and buried. You're responsible for me being here in London, waiting to go on a march with a million likeminded souls.You did that. You radicalised me. Take a bow. 
Theresa May has singlehandedly radicalised millions of Remainers with her rock-solid inability to compromise on Brexit in any way, shape or form.Looking back at the morning of the referendum result. I'd been up all night, watching the result come in, ageing at a year an hour. 
Apologies in advance for the languageJonathan Pie nails it “Austerity broke the contract between Government and citizens.” 
Hundreds of thousands to join 'Put It To The People' march demanding a final say on Brexit 
Let's look at the data so far #WhoAreYou#RevokeArticle50 “Areas in red are places where more people signed the No Deal petition than the Revoke one” 
How many of those ‘three million’ who signed the ‘stop brexit’ petition have marched on the street with working class against fascism, against austerity, against racism, against the Tories, against tuition fees, against war, all before the EU Referendum? The answer: very few. 
What he said 
Depression is no joke, as someone who myself has been affected by it as well as others around me, i urge every single person who sees this to spread the message about help that is possible, such as the suicide hotlines, samaritans or therapists, do you part to tackle this please 
I like this as it’ll upset Brexiteers and the Corbyn cult. 
Here it is. The signature that could have ended this mess. We will end up just one short. You could have pressed the stop brexit (continue) button, and yet you refused.  
Seriously does anyone know of a better #Brexit deal than #RevokeArticle50 ?? Anyone ??? 
Irish in London protesting against Brexit: ‘You can’t leave it to someone else’  @snb19692 @SODEMAction @NE4EU @Anthony_M_Kelly 
Just to confirm. I will be flying across to London for the pro Brexit gathering outside Parliament that afternoon. I feel this is a historic moment. Please attend if you can. We demand Parliament obeys our will. See you all there! #BrexitBETRAYAL #BrexitNow 
Dear British media, please read this  
National Trust bans Nigel Farage’s Brexit march from its properties  
Challenge the oft told lie from leave about the 2016 referendum as the largest exercise in UK democracy in history.  
Can someone appointment Gareth Southgate as PM? He can sort this shit out! #Brexit 
1 week til brexit, 7 weeks til my first exam but what am i thinking about? our fat fuck off summer in 12 weeks :)))))) #GCSEs2019 
Whichever way you voted, you didn’t vote for this.RT if you agree that enough is enough. 
Why is this fcukwit even being asked about it? 
Everything you need to know about Brexit:Nothing is better than the deal we already had.Nothing is better than the deal we already had.Nothing is better than the deal we already had.Nothing is better than the deal we already had.See you on the #PutittoThePeople march. 
“Three million people clicking buttons on their phones is nothing compared to 17.4million people traipsing to polling stations, patiently waiting in line, and weathering the insults of virtually the entire establishment in order to vote for Brexit.”  
Blockstream's satellite messaging app has launched on #Bitcoin’s mainnet and one enterprising bitcoiner has used the platform to beam the U.K.’s proposed Brexit deal into space. @Blockstream 
When I decided to start fighting Brexit in January 2016, it wasn't about economics for me. I was just terrified at the idea of what a government led by a host of moral voids would do to the human rights of UK citizens and the morality of our foreign policy without EU safeguards. 
Everything is so fucked up and weird that Uri Geller says he's going to stop Brexit with mind control and we're like, 'Oh thank God!' 
First the #GammonballRun tried to cross a bridge known to be closed, and then they get thrown off land they're not supposed to be on.  Next they'll miss London and march off the Dover cliffs.  Was there no planning at all?A farsical analogy for #Brexit. 
#PeopleVoteMarchI marched with the unemployed.I marched with CNDI marched with the miners.Tomorrow I march with the majority to stop #brexit#fbpe 
#bbcaq  The level of abuse & thuggery meted out be these vile animals, IMO means that #Brexit must be cancelled. You give in to these barbarians, and you are moving the moral compass to zeroThey do not *deserve* to win anything but a jail sentence 
Is there really a #peoplevotemarch this weekend?  I hadn't realised. There was me going to spend all weekend promoting a party that doesn't listen to the majority of its members, voters or supporters about Brexit. 
Uri Geller promises to stop Brexit using telepathy  
Come on fellow people of West Suffolk send our health secretary a message. The NHS will be screwed with a no deal Brexit! #revokeA50petition 
I've always valued my independence as a hack, for the 25 years I've been in the business. But I signed this tonight as a human. Fuck Brexit  
Here’s a thought Brexit or no Brexit with all the bits in between will make no difference to a sizeable part of the UK population but Corbynism could change their world 
Brexiters: “People are gaming the petition to Revoke. It doesn’t count!” Also, Brexiters:[shown extensive evidence of Leave campaign’s law-breaking and cheating during referendum]“How dare you try to invalidate the vote and say it doesn’t count!” 
By taking back control we have shown that the country is out of control 
We aren’t naive. The WA that you’re pushing is a fake Brexit. No deal Brexit is the only real Brexit option at this stage. Remainer MPs may well stop no deal Brexit, but I’d rather let them do that in plain sight. We are watching. Hope you’re ready for the electoral consequences.  
I know had my father lived he would have marched  in #PeoplesMarch tomorrow b/c he knew Brexit as it stands now is national destruction. But ultimately my dad believed only an election and then a referendum could end the nightmare of Brexit.  
No, mate. Gina Miller trashed the country. This mess is hers alone. Folk have forgotten that. #brexit 
I wish I could march against Brexit tomorrow. If I wasn’t Abroad at the moment I’d be there. 100%. Brexit is shit any way you slice it. It always was. #StopBrexitMarch 
British citizens any where in the world, any age, can sign.EU Citizens (and others) who are resident in UK no matter what their age, can sign.Two Disenfranchised groups can have their say.Go to it. 
Oh come on. #PeopleVoteMarch is fuck all to do with giving the people 'a say'. It's centrists and/or Remainers trying to stop a) Brexit b) a socialist Govt or c) bothAt least be fucking honest about it 
..We’re going to get Brexit: The Rusical for Drag Race UK aren’t we  
Uri Geller heroically blocking Brexit at the 11th hour using telepathy is the ending we need and deserve  
Brexit is now so fucking weird that Uri Geller is threatening to control the prime minister with his mind and everyone is just like yeah ok why not this is normal 
"I can't go home this weekend... I had a really nasty death threat."Independent Group MP Anna Soubry discusses the abuse she's received for her stance on Brexit.  #C4News 
There's no way out for #theresamay in another brilliant Telegraph cartoon by @bobscartoons #brexit  
I’m 43 and tomorrow I’m going on my first protest march. That’s how stupid Brexit is! Rather be down the pub but at least I can say I tired. I marched, signed petitions, wrote to my MP #PeopleVoteMarch 
Victory! Congratulations to the students with #BrownDivest and SJP on the passage of their divestment referendum by an overwhelming margin!  
Great leadership ⁦@tom_watson⁩, joining MPs from across the House and Labour’s Brexit spokesperson ⁦@Keir_Starmer⁩ in unequivocally endorsing the #KyleWilson #Compromise. It’s the only way to break the deadlock and end the Brexit nightmare  
I'm so pissed off by utter shitshow that is Brexit that I'm getting an overpriced train to London tomorrow to join the #PeopleVoteMarch. 
Tories & Labour said they would abide by the Referendum result. 85% or so of MPs elected in 2017 said they would implement the result. They lied. They hold the voters in contempt. We need    proportional representation elections to sweep this lot out.  
.@Telegraph cartoon#TheresaMay #Brexit #meaningfulvote #IMPOSSIBLE 
.@Anna_Soubry has a message ahead of tomorrow's #PeoplesVote March in London. It's time for the government to allow a final say on the Brexit deal #PutItToThePeople 
Get ready for ANOTHER #PeoplesVoteMarch The biggest concentration of posh, white, privileged sorts you will ever see in Central London. #Brexit  
English "Brexit" from Europe on course to outlast Hundred Years War of English withdrawal from France.  
Hey . Running a few polls in quick successionBe really good if you can retweet prior to voting Who would you prefer to deliver brexit? 
If the political establishment #RevokeArt50Now then they will also revoke their status as the political establishment very quickly.Join us at the UKIP: Make Brexit Happen Rally at Whitehall on the afternoon of Friday, March 29, 2019.Exact time to follow. #MakeBrexitHappen 
“I’ve been an MP for 18yrs and I have never seen a shambles like this. If the Government is going to allow unwhipped votes on indicative votes, if there is no Govt position on any of those issues, about the future of our Country, then there really isn’t a Govt” Mark Francois 
Margaret Thatcher would have stood up to the EU over Brexit and refused to give in to bullying from Brussels. Today Britain needs the kind of leadership that the Iron Lady epitomized. #Brexit must be delivered.  
I voted Leave but I’m marching against Brexit tomorrow because it’s a complete fiasco.There are still things about the EU that I don’t like, but there’s a lot about this Brexit I hate with all my soul.#Revoke #PeoplesVote #JustStopTheDamnedThing 
Remember, kiddos: Brexit means Brexit. Especially when you're queuing to get a bag of rice from your friendly martial-law enforcing army personnel.But you'll get a blue passport tho.Not that you'll be able to travel anywhere. 
'Wales should have an independence referendum after Brexit unless our demands are met' - @Adamprice @Plaid_Cymru 
"Some of the Brexiteers will be far away and most of them will be well protected... because they're set up for life."French President Emmanuel Macron says the British people will find themselves in an "economic crisis" if there's a no-deal Brexit.  
BREAKING: @TheUriGeller has today written a letter, handed exclusively to the Jewish Telegraph, to @theresa_may to state that he will "not allow you to lead Britain into #Brexit".  
We notice Labour failing to support the #PeoplesVoteMarch tomorrow even though it's their party policy.Yep we notice, we will remember."In the end we will remember not the words of our enemies but the silence of our friends."- Martin Luther King 
For anyone wanting to know a bit more about the technicalities of removing any duplicate votes that Julia thinks she has snuck through have been audited, this artcile is illuminating 
Referendum can be avoided and issue fixed if the PPC is voted in federally in October. @MaximeBernier and @peoplespca the only ones that will fix equalization. Provinces would be free to succeed at the highest level, or responsible for their own mismanagement. #ppc2019 #cdnpoli 
A Hard Brexit. What would it mean?In a complex world, GZERO provides a clear Signal↓↓↓  
This is Julia Hartley-Brewer lying about the petition.In the comments, someone has helpfully referenced GitHub to show the code used to prevent duplicate use of emails.BBC confirming that what JHB says is a lie. 
Consider the reason David Davis and Dominic Cummings give for now supporting May’s deal: “we’ll end up losing Brexit altogether”. An implicit admission they’d probably lose a fresh referendum. They’re pushing this through *knowing* they may well have no mandate for it any longer. 
Thanks to all of you! I now have 21 followers. Yesterday I didn't care but I saw the petition numbers rise and our voice silenced. Help me reach 100 followers. Please RT and Subscribe 
Anyone who is deluded enough to think that a no deal Brexit will be fine and that dire warnings about the consequences of a no deal Brexit are just “Project Fear” really should read this. This is Project Reality. Nobody in their right mind would want this. 
Brexit negotiations have revealed a hideous truth. For years now we must have had some pretty third rate muppets negotiating deals in Brussels on our behalf. 
#RevokeA50 petition crossed 3.5m!It’s the FASTEST GROWING in history and if you get it over 4.1m it’ll be the BIGGEST PETITION ever on the govt’s own site.May said the country wants Brexit?!We don’t think so! What do you say? 
Through FOI requests I have tried to get Operation Yellowhammer to be published and we now know why I was rejected. No competent government would even entertain this as policy. The gov must release all of its 320 Brexit streams on preparation.  
UK Cabinet Ministers prepare for 'managed' No Deal Brexit  via AwardsDarwin #RevokeArt50Now #FridayFeeling Secret Cabinet Office 
I have just landed in London from Pisa to march tomorrow #PeopleVote #RevokeArt50 so that I can be counted cos I wasn’t allowed a vote in the referendum @BRITISHinITALY BritishInItaly @BritishInEurope 
Would you like a massage?- yes pleaseIt's with a nailgun- then no thanksSorry, you've said yes. Can't change your mind. - but I don't want it! I didn't have all the information: it'll really hurt!Tough. This is what you're getting. Pain. #Brexit 
It's called stockpiling, you hopeless melt 
Regardless of your opinion on #Brexit this is a terrific dismantling of a politician who doesn’t seem to know if it’s Shrove Tuesday or Sheffield Wednesday. As a country we have never needed journalists more. Hats off, @mrjamesob 
Brexiteers should not be naive about what MPs are prepared to do to stop a no-deal Brexit  via @Telegraph 
Tony Blair saying Brexit should be stopped because of a march.The same Tony Blair that took us into an illegal war in Iraq despite over 1 million people taking to the streets to oppose it. 
Any form of a Customs Union with the EU is NOT Brexit. The people voted for the UK to take back control and to have an independent trading policy where we can strike trade deals with the rest of the world. The U.S, China, India, Singapore, Brazil and Australia are all waiting. 
Pretty weird that the people trying to convince everyone a petition is being rigged and saying it's a travesty are the same people who don't care that a referendum was rigged 
Leave supporters are blocking 2 lanes of the #A30 at #Bodmin - 5 miles of tailbacks behind them. In a blockade organised by the #Brexit Direct Action group.  
if Brexit goes badly for the Scots, the demand for Scottish independence can be expected to rise.  
My grandad was due for an operation to remove his cancer today and got sent home because there wasn’t a free bed at the hospital, the British people need more funding for healthcare & all brexit has done is waste more & more every day  
If you set fire to £1 million per minute, it would take you *nearly 2 years* to burn as much money as has already left the UK because of Brexit. Over 10% of the assets of the City - gone! And that means no more dividend taxes, transaction taxes, bank and insurance levies, etc.  
I got involved in Brexit because I was furious about how ordinary, kind people were being treated after Brexit. On my travels I've been taking their photos - I'm passionate that they are represented as the wonderful, brave people they are. Come to our mini Gallery on March 27th.  
Maybe if we hide, it'll all go away  #Brexit #Wooferendum 
For those in Parliament now pushing for a Norway type deal with the EU with its 4 freedoms could they explain how this in any way reflects the referendum vote in 2016...wouldn’t they be more honest to simply say they wish to remain in the EU... 
Wales should hold a referendum on independence if demands on tax and funding are not met after Brexit, says @AdamPrice 
If referendum tomorrow by age18-24 yrs old Remain 77%, Leave 23%25-49 yrs oldRemain 62%, Leave 38%50-64 yrs oldRemain 46%, Leave 54%65 yrs old & aboveRemain 34%, Leave 66% YouGov data #Brexit 
A referendum is held. Result is proven to have been illegally obtained by fraud. John Redwood: Will of the people. Must be respected. A petition is racking up phenomenal numbers. John Redwood: Bollocks. It’s all foreigners & bots.  
#RevokeArt50Now  Let's crash Twitter as well as Just retweet, retweet, retweet to put Brexit in retreat.Retweet to retreat. 
Ah, the BBC is finally talking about the Revoke petition, and is repeating the Brexiter lie that only people currently in the UK should be voting. Any British citizen can participate, which is more than you can say for the crooked referendum.  
Brexit has been betrayed! The only option now is invasion! #EmperorReesMogg #ActivateTheQueen #Brexit 
If there's no Irish backstop - then there will be no UK / US trade deal "no matter what @realDonaldTrump says". That's according to US @TheDemocrats Senator @ChrisMurphyCT#BrexitFull Interview with @MarkDevenport on #InsidePolitics at 6pm 
“There is no question that a WTO Brexit is perfectly manageable – and that in the event it occurred, more mini-deals would emerge to make it even smoother...Such a Brexit would save UK taxpayers at least £39 billion of payments to the EU”  
Theresa May is panicking someone with a clue might take over from her on BrexitTories are panicking someone might take over running the UK & make it work for everybody not just the well-to-doThe media is panicking that it's losing its grip#GeneralElectionNow #JC4PM 
1,000,000 Brits signed a petition to halt Brexit and broke Parliament's website in the process, according to WaPo.  
7 amendments down for Monday’s Brexit debate 
Was on BBC NEWS today discussing Brexit with Funmi and Will.If there’s anything I’ve learned it’s that these so called elite schools and universities struggle to produce a functional political elite. I hope our next PM is from ends. 1/2  
Given how little time there is left until ‘Brexit day’ and the level of uncertainty around what happens next it seems a bit odd that the Commons is now off until after lunch on Monday.  
I was 16 at the time of the referendum and thus, unable to vote on arguably the most important decision of my life. Some of the people that voted unfortunately won't see the true impact of Brexit, but we will be left to pick up the pieces. Where was our choice?#RevokeArt50Now 
For the first time I now think there’s a 50:50 chance of #Brexit being completely lost. People supposedly in favour of Leaving the EU keep refusing to vote for Leaving the EU.  
18 March 1992: In the last all-white vote in #SouthAfrica, whites voted in a referendum to continue politcal reforms to end apartheid with 69% approving   pic.twitter.com/nTpiknPNy3 
Theresa Mays deal is confirmed dead by the DUP. 
Nevermind #brexit my picture of Jeremy Corbyn busy gritting to grips with an alsation in Newport, South Wales today. Copyright - Robert Melen #corbyn #labour #politics #uk #news #wales #brexit @AlamyNews #jeremycorbyn 
The only arguments in existence for going through with Brexit are:It won a small majority by breaking the law in a referendum three years agoIts supporters will inflict violence on us if we don’tDoes *either* of those sound to you like something we should give in to? 
The response we received yesterday in Doncaster is testament to the mood of the country and shows that people are crying out for a WTO Brexit!#LetsGoWTO #MarchToLeave 
Remain ministers warn Theresa May they will quit if she blocks free vote on new bid to stop no-deal Brexit 
Francois: "I've never voted for it and I never will."Thank heavens for the Brexiteers in ERG. They are a principled minority in the House of Commons who are standing up for the 17.4 million. If Parliament does ever manage to overturn Brexit, they would be blameless!  
FYI on why I don’t support a People’s Vote: Too divisive. Puts the debate back into hands of polarising figures like Farage and Blair. Prefer the deliberative democracy of a People’s Assembly. Better chance of finding a consensus than holding another winner-takes-all referendum. 
Swiss government says UK nationals will be exempt from the requirement to obtain a visa to enter the country after Brexit 
Are bots gaming the 'Cancel Brexit' petition?  
Big Brexit  
Even #Remain ministers realise Extension shakes British politics to core#NoDeal & independence on global #GoWTO rules is the only way to honour;Referendum promise that decision would be implementedLeave manifestos Passing legislation to Leave 
One user admitted to signing this petition 33,000 times, & people have been shouting ME down when I said it was bonkers?? Do feel free to RT!#RevokeArticle50Now #RevokeA50 #revokeA50petition #RevokeArticle50BBC - EU referendum petition hijacked by bots  
The only time @DavidMundellDCT will quit, is when his Government are thrown out of office for their reckless mishandling of the folly of Brexit.  
Several errors here Jeremy: (a) under 2, no-deal is in 21 days from now; (b) you omit the key option of a long extension with plan B (referendum or changing May’s red lines); (c) international derision is for options 1 & 2, option 3 would be welcomed as a return to our senses. 
The definition of the ‘big lie’ is Farage claiming the revoke Brexit petition is full of Russian bots! 
Lib Dem leader @vincecable says his meeting today with David Lidington, May's effective Deputy, included discussions of how MPs can consider the options of revoking Article 50 or holding another referendum  
.@Rianneletschert @MaastrichtU calls for continued collaboration in academia between Dutch and UK universities despite #Brexit at meeting #DutchAcademics in London - great to see my alma mater represented here! 
.@JuliaHB1 is telling everyone how to think about Brexit and what to do about Brexit.Is Julia really someone that anyone should listen to or trust?  
Reverse Brexit - and march tomorrow to save Britain! #PutitothePeopleMarch 
We had a general election.Political parties put their Brexit policies to the people.Over 85% of people voted for parties proposing a hard Brexit.#bbcqt 
Brexit is about to destroy the Tory Party and Theresa May, says Michael Portillo /#EU #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
As you perfectly well know, the petitions site can filter out fake signatures. I live in France, where there are at least 350,000 Brits, many of whom have signed this petition. THIS is what real patriotism looks like. We love our country, unlike the Haw-Haw Mogg. 
The sheer scale of the People's Vote march.... (But I still say PV have yet to suggest a fair question).Details from @nicholascecil Hundreds of thousands urged to join Brexit vote march in London  
According to your article they are not but your headline is misleading, if only you had asked similar questions about the legitimacy of the referendum itself instead of platforming those who have proved guilty of electoral fraud? 
If youre sick and tired of brexit, show it and sign this. It takes one minute. Don't sit there and think "my one signature won't matter" because it will! #RevokeArt50Now 
Brexit Broadcasting Cabal asks did the Russian bots steal the 3m Revoke petition (No!) but not 2016 referendum and was Banks & @Nigel_Farage paid by Russia Today - oh yes they did !!! 
So the EU referendum was illegally manipulated. The result cannot stand. #RevokArticle50 
If war were threatened, the @churchofengland would speak.If the NHS were dismantled, the Church would speak.In times of crisis the Church has spoken wisely & courageously.So how will the Church’s public comment on #Brexit be judged by history?  
It's funny how you're interested now but have studiously avoided @carolecadwalla's, @PeterKGeoghegan's and @AdamRamsay's investigations into how the entire Brexit vote was gamed. 
There is a rally on Friday next week.It’s on a weekday and it’s in London.Horribly inconvenient I know. But a Government subverting Brexit _is_ rather inconvenient, isn’t it?Stay at home/work or turn up. Your choice.  
It’s been an international humiliation for ages. I haven’t met a single person outside the UK in the last year (hundreds of scientists in academia & industry) who think Brexit makes any sense at all.Because it doesn’t except when you view it in the light of harm to the UK & EU. 
Well, Michael, you know what to do......THIS IS THE POINT YOU TORY MP BREXITEERS DECIDE......WILL YOU WITHDRAW YOUR VOTING SUPPORT, RESIGN THE WHIP, TO TOPPLE MAY IN A CONFIDENCE VOTE?#Brexit is now in your hands.@ActionBrexit #GoSlow  is underway from 5.30pm tonight. 
Sky News is just interviewing a guy who is promising to 'significantly increase' the number of employees at his company's office in London.Half way through the interview, it turns out they have only three people here.Not sure that will offset all Brexit outflows, lads. 
This in Politico playbook gives a good flavour of who wears the pants in #EUCO on Brexit:  
Labour chairman Ian Lavery: ‘We want Brexit, but we want the Labour Brexit.’Could someone explain the concept of time to this idiot? 
#RevokeArt50Now: Are bots targeting the 'cancel Brexit' petition? 
Brown University students came out in record numbers to take a stand against their university's complicity in the brutal oppression of the Palestinian people, passing a divestment referendum with an overwhelming majority of 69%. pic.twitter.com/uLIX7UaSF1 
In Germany and the only English channels are BBC world News or Sky World News - Brexit this Brexit that #CarryOn 
@little_pengelly how exactly do you represent your constituents views on BREXIT?  
UK's Total Humiliation As PM #MAY Betray's The Will Of 17,400,000 Who Voted #Brexit. UK's May Surrenders- Waves White Flag: Elites Never Had Any Intention Of Allowing #BrexitVotes To Count. #Democracy is Dead. 
The British people rejected both AV and EU In Referendum  
Surely Brexit itself is the national humiliation. The UK should be cooperating with it's international partners and seeking to reform and lead the EU rather than leaving it. We are all diminished by this unnecessary Brexit. 
Bored of Brexit now either do it or don’t we’ll deal with it either way 
"despite Labour conditionally supporting a second referendum."It seems the condition was hell freezing over. As predicted. Labour Leadership. For the Few, sod the many. 
You seem blissfully unaware that the biased reporting of Brexit by sky news since 2016 has created massive feelings of mistrust. You reap what you sow mate 
This is the green light for EEA based Brexit. @NickBoles @SKinnock @LucyMPowell @halfon4harlowMP 
A tale of two sagas: when #Brexit and the failed hunt for an #Alzheimers drug are juxtaposed 
Labour MPs have struggled to reach any view on what to do about Brexit, regardless of Corbyn. They urgently need to start actually making decisions.By me, for Prospect.  
As a French citizen in the UK, I was able to vote for UK candidates for the MEP election.With Brexit, I will be able to vote for a French candidate for the next election.What happens though if Brexit is cancelled and UK ends up organising a vote possibly delayed? 
#BrexitMay: It's my way or the highway.Corbyn: I'm not doing cross party talks if other parties will be present.ERG: The people voted to sell the NHS and import Detol chicken?DUP: The people voted to reignite the troubles.EU: What the hell do you idiots want?World:  
Dear @AnnelieseDodds MP,I made 2 screenshots of petitions data of your constituency:- 310 constituents want a no-deal #Brexit- 5,836 constituents want to #RevokeArticle50The Will of the People has changed and the Parliament should reflect it.Please, do the right thing.  
I don’t like attacking the BBC but the headline and content of this is so far removed from reality that it’s impossible not to say so. What is the motive?Brexit: EU wins itself some breathing space - BBC News  
Another very captivating discussion held in the context of the #RO2019EU, with Guest of Honour Mr. @ Tony Blair, Former Prime Minister of the UK and Executive Chairman of the Institute for Global Change, who presented his personal opinions on Brexit.  
And counting..... people are sick of this - we need a full investigation into the web of #brexit crimes, foreign influences and their consequences or British democracy  
At its first meeting in Amsterdam, EMA’s Management Board re-elected Christa Wirthumer-Hoche as chair and heard updates on #Brexit, medicines  for children and the Clinical Trials Information System.  
Unelected Tusk MOCKS Brexiteers and any MP that dares vote down Theresa May's deal once againHe says there are plenty of places in HELL for them [as well as, presumably, for 17.4m Brexit supporters]As if anyone who does not do the EU's bidding is an associate of the devil  
I signed from Poland... moved here to try for Polish citizenship due to Brexit. My husband signed from Poland too as he’s visiting me this week. We have to live apart due to Brexit. #RevokeArticle50 
What we were promised vs what we're getting #Brexit  
If you are pro-Brexit and you are sick of seeing posts like this where YOU are characterised as being useless, old, stupid and  incapable of protest or fighting for Brexit, get yourselves down to Westminster next Friday and make your voices heard....  
Brilliant post on @euanduk by @BrigidLaffan  on necessary next steps for Brexit debacle - including facing some home truths.  
british people do not cease to have a UK postcode when they are working abroad.  British people do not cease to be Uk citizens when living abroad.  All who reside in the Uk are affected by brexit.  now piss off 
I think every day about how STUPID the referendum was and how it should never have gone ahead after a WOMAN WAS MURDERED, and yet every day a group of people are still having a wee chat about whether it’s a good idea or not, or how best to go about it  
The UK accepts the @EUCouncil offer of a #Brexit extension, as Tim Barrow writes to @eucopresident 
The last big anti-Brexit march had 700,000 turnout. I didn't see *anything like* the buzz around that as I'm seeing about this one in the lead up. This is going to be big. It might not change the minds of govt, but they'll know we're still here, being loud, not going away 
McDonnell's default position. Sitting on the fence. Just wants to use Brexit to force a GE. 'Labour left' interest first, not national interest. Corbyn's front bench are the worst I've encountered in 50 years of politics. Not fit for purpose. 
Wait until they hear about how people in Russia voted in the referendum. 
Haha! Hilarious. Although poor Joan is far too fabulous to portray #TheresaMay #Brexit #CarryOn 
Theresa May should go for No Deal next week instead of pushing Brexit back, Liz Truss warns 
#Brexit: the European Council adopts in agreement with the UK the decision extending the period under Article 50: #EUCO 
Crazy MAY THE DICTATOR, can you believe one person is so elite she sees herself as god of UK& can extend the Brexit date after 100’ s times we leave on 29/03/19. What is it with these types, nothing is normal, totally dishonourable, yes I’m above 17 million Brits, Adolf  mirror? 
Concerns over immigration are absolutely fine. When those concerns are backed up by unjustified claims against a whole religion, you're not just far right, you're a bigot.Get on your Bigot Bike with Brexit Barry back to Bigotsville @GerardBattenMEP! 
Right yes, well, just like the other eight times you stood to be an MP and failed, I don’t think this is going to cause @Conservatives many sleepless nights. #Brexit  
What May has just done with indicative votes is the greatest democratic betrayal & the greatest act of political cowardiceShe's deliberately destroyed Brexit & now wants to run away & hide, attempting to pass the blameShe's no honour or morality, just an atrocious human being 
The shift from "it's less than the referendum" to "we have to destroy it" could be interpreted by some as 'panicking'  
Gonna start referring to Brexit as “Wrexit”.  
Let me write your copy for you. "Far right BrexitAction have vowed to bring the UK to its knees leaving critical medicines at the ports. Connected to Farage's Brexit Party, we asked for Tommy Robinson  & Nick Griffin to comment on their connection to the protest. Smear, bias.." 
Julie, thanks for your constructive criticism of the Petitions website. Here is the report from someone who understands the site because he runs it. An Expert. Feel free to ignore him as you do. Everyone else, well worth a read if you have any doubts. 
DUP excoriating on events at EUCO. A “humiliating” Brexit delay from a PM too willing to “capitulate”. Every grouping she needed to get her Brexit deal through have publicly denounced her in past 48 hours. The ground is feeling very shaky indeed  
Sources say the Government is considering allowing MPs to vote on seven alternative Brexit options next week including the choice of revoking Article 50, holding a second referendum and Prime Minister Theresa May's deal plus a Customs Union 
#Oliverscampaign @leder_team #LeDeR Don’t worry I can post all this awful stuff post Brexit. I am a huge advocate of #LeDeR but it needs to be independent and fit for purpose Oliver’s review is an absolute disgrace 
REMEMBER when this walking ego claimed she was only interested in democracy? Why has this angry bitter woman been propelled to the front line since Brexit?  
Plan for MPs to get votes on seven Brexit options if Theresa May's deal defeated again.Indicative votes are coming whether May likes it or not.  
Enough is enough Sir Graham Brady has to return to No 10 with an ultimatum. Theresa May CANNOT be allowed to continue to wreak damage on party & country in pursuit of her own entrenched ideas. SHE HAS TO GO & make way for a new team to deliver a meaningful Brexit 
Watching Theresa May discuss Brexit on the news is like the end stages of an after party when your pal is talking about their Ex again and greetin. COAT. UP THE ROAD.  
If you need an antidote for Brexit Week, we'll be at the theatre every night next week telling a story of love and acceptance in the face of tragedy.Come for a story and a hug.   
And now the BBC are worried about electronic interference in UK politics? How about investigating the Brexit referendum itself? “Are bots gaming the 'Cancel Brexit' petition?”  
Bank Of England Caused #GBP Sterling To Collapse In 2008, Now #MarkCarney Looks To #BlameBrexit as #TheresaMay Betrays #Britain - The Elites & #politicians Have ZERO Self-Awareness. #NoDealBrexit No Problem, #BrexitBetryal #Brexit #BrexitShambles #Fearmongering & #FakeNews 
Meet the Irish protesting against Brexit on their lunchbreaks in London  via @ITabroad 
1.56pmBig Brexit Brother announces housemates have broken Brexit house rules.Under the Withdrawl Eviction Act it is not possible to nominate the same person for a third time.The eviction tonight will be CANCELLED.There will be another public vote *maybe* next week. 
14a. A society grows great when old men plant trees whose shade they know they shall never sit in. No Deal Brexit means burning down all the trees we already have and poisoning the ground. #ReasonsToRevoke #LetsNotLeave 
UK economy since the Brexit vote: slower GDP growth, lower productivity, and a weaker pound -  
9. There's the fact that our government & many other institutions have studied just how damaging Brexit will be to the nation but yet we are still pressing ahead #ReasonsToRevoke #LetsNotLeave 
Problem is Nige, dead people don't get a vote. One of the criteria for being able to vote is being able to breath. 
@lara_spirit summarises perfectly many of the frustrations I hear from my students. Let's stop this madness! #StopBrexit It’s not too late to stop Brexit. Saturday’s march will force politicians to hear us | Lara Spirit  
That one's for Farago and Assange, the'll send something special for Arron Banks.. 
Over 3 million signatures including more than 2000 in Rutherglen and Hamilton West. As well as backing a #FinalSay referendum, I will continue to support all options to prevent a No Deal Brexit including revoking Article 50 
Merchandise celebrating Brexit voters dying. Sick. All the more hurtful to read on my father’s second anniversary. His generation voted to give their grandchildren an independent nation, having voted Remain in 1975 but then seeing how the EEC evolved.  
Why don't we have a referendum as to whether or not we want to be lumbered with another English Prince of Wales.  My vote would go to Tom Jones! 
Apparently Labour’s Brexit position is “chaos”, “revolution”, and “Cuba”. Maybe I should join the party after all!  
What The Actual F??? What is this? Are you the propaganda wing for the brexit party? @BBCr4today ? Please explain how this gets the power and provenance of a flagship BBC news program. 
If jesus was a Tory #brexit #MayMustGo #RevokeArticle50 #NeverTrustATory or #theindependentgroup 
Gotta love people who just say "Implement the referendum result." As if the last 2.5 years haven't proved that's about as meaningful as saying "Fly to the Moon on a pig." 
If so, May is taking this country into a pre-revolutionary state7 options for MPs including second referendum.  
well MPs will just have to take the plunge, vote against the whip if need be, and take the consequences.  that is the brexit end  game anyway, an end to the two party system that has caused this shit in the first place. 
That's why we're going.No late night "If only I'd..." for you, whatever happens.If Brexit does happen, you can be proud when you tell your son you fought to the last for him and his future.#RevokeArticle50 
They’ll be calling for a referendum on it next - and we know how well that serves us. Emotion and sensationalism and fear by the press and media here too. 
If this happens - and with Brexit, things change by the nanosecond - this could be big. For the first time, revocation of Article 50 will come up in the HOC in a context other than as a dirty word. Will MPs rise to the challenge? I won't risk holding my breath.  
so it seems that @iainastewart, having abandoned his twitter account following a backlash from Remainers (and having blocked half his constituents), has run away to fb to whine about Brexit, where he is suffering a backlash from Brexiters.just who is this MP representing??   
8. There's the sheer cost & effort of arranging Brexit just to make ourselves even poorer.  #ReasonsToRevoke #LetsNotLeave 
In both cases, the right-wing press have made an especial effort to frame them as EXTREME MARXISTS PUSHING AN AGENDA!!! - Varadkar  (whose position on Brexit concessions to the UK is more moderate than Irish public opinion or most of his rivals) is The Obstacle. 
All week we've been hearing people say Brexit is an utter shambles, a humiliation and nothing like what was promised. People who've never spoken about Brexit before.The dam has well and truly burst.We're marching tomorrow to put it back to the people. 
If this is "balance", @BBCTech, how about "did Russian troll farms throw the result of the 2016 referendum" as counterpoint? No?  
very good point made by @roger_scully at the Cardiff Uni Brexit debate yesterday evening. The Scottish Indy ref 2014 'no' campaign was founded on the argument that Scotland's place in Europe was safe. What could possibly be their campaign argument next time around? #Brexit 
Brexit process becoming like that ‘Simpsons already did it’ episode of South Park where the Simpsons are @instituteforgov and ‘did it’ is ‘suggested it as an effective way of managing brexit’  
Why can we not get this much sense and honesty from the other parties? I was a labour voter, but the way that @NicolaSturgeon has handled the Brexit debacle has changed my mind. 
I think it's safe to say that this week I will mostly be wearing #Brexit And it definitely makes my bum look big. 
As Mayor of London, I’m clear we need to revoke Article 50 and end this Brexit disaster | @SadiqKhan #putittothepeople 
Activist @thatginamiller says she's not convinced that Britain will leave the EU with a no-deal Brexit  
DUP's Nigel Dodds has delivered a killer blow to Theresa May's failed Brexit dealThe DUP won't vote for her deal if a third vote attempt happens, leaving Theresa May's Govt in an unsustainable state of collapseThe only way forward is a #GeneralElectionNow#MayMustGo 
Its a much better idea than Brexit!  Anyway, I thought the Brexiters wanted the British Parliament to "take back control"! 
'Nigel Farage's Brexit is coming home to roost - he wants you to give him a job,' says @fleetstreetfox 
Philip May, the Prime Minister's husband, works for a firm that intends to buy up cheap UK assets after a hard Brexit. He is reported to have influenced the PM against a softer Brexit.Why is the PM not recused from Brexit policy making given this clear conflict? #BBCAskThis 
If you've preparing, stockpiling and helping foodbanks before Brexit, please don't stop, extension doesn't mean its over - check dates, rotate stock if necessary, supplement supplies, whilst leaving things for others, never empty shelves. THERE IS STILL NO PLAN FROM HMG. 
Absolutely nothing. The BBC and SKY are attempting to stop Brexit. 
Guys sign this! We must have our vote honoured! #LeaveEU#Petition: Parliament must honour the Referendum result. Leave deal or no deal 29/03/19  
The #RevokeArt50Now fad need to get a sense of reality.This little number will help:#brexit #StandUp4Brexit #17MillionFuckOffs pic.twitter.com/HTrKcyyeuc 
I protested against Blair's Iraq war - shame you didn't join us. I protest against brexit - democracy specifically allows that. Again, it's dictators who don't tolerate protests not democrats. You can get to N Korea via Seoul in S Korea if that's any help !! 
I cannot believe that we are so close to Brexit yet the establishment are trying every trick to not leave the E.U.! Theresa May needs to resign! 
Nigel 'I see dead people' Farage reckons '20 million people in spirit'  are on his march of the absurd!   
Brilliant morning with year 8 and @WalkerWorcester taking part in our version of question time. We discussed education, climate change and Brexit #Democracy #politicsinaction #opportunities 
Tony Blair: “The route is to do what up to now Parliament has not had the opportunity: debate properly the genuine Brexit options, and decide on one; or decide on one but put the final say with the people. But we must move fast.”  
Tony Blair writes in today’s @EveningStandard: “As the Brexit storm rages, wreaking havoc on all in its path, it is hard to stay calm…but this is what the British Parliament and the European Union must do.”Read and share his article  
"still 60 percent probability for no deal" the always optimistic @FabianZuleeg at @epc_eu Post-Summit #Brexit Briefing #EUCO. 
I don't believe any of the smears. But I do believe his deceit n deviousness when it comes to Brexit having been on the receiving end of his manipulative behaviour.I wd vote him out tmw if he was challenged. 
Good to have you on board with the march and Revoke Article 50 petition Billy your clarity in opposing the Tories over the years has been an inspiration and brexit is the biggest assault on the people they have ever tried to perpetrate 
The Trudeau-Notley alliance has failed Albertans. Yesterday, the UCP unveiled our ambitious plan to fight for Alberta, including a referendum on equalization if we don't get new pipelines.  
Is this some kind of Brexit metaphor?  
BREXIT: "I fought in the Second World War, now I am fighting for a second referendum" /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Are bots gaming the 'Cancel Brexit' petition?  
#FF: @cath_haddon. Perhaps an obvious choice for another Brexit-dominated week, but honestly one of the most useful people to help understand what’s going on. And does it in a very human way.  
When comparisons are made between this pic of the Farage misery tour for #Brexit ,and the pics tomorrow of the march to remainIt is going to be the starkest proof yet that the consensus people felt to leave the EU was fake, and amplified by bots and trolls from outside the UK.  
From @HenryNewman: Conservative MPs should beware handing Labour the victory on Brexit  
For those interested, here's a full breakdown of which Government departments have taken out non-disclosure agreements over Brexit... and which can't or are refusing to tell us.  
@lara_eleanor is so spot on here "Any attempt by our party to overturn the referendum result will signal to millions that we take the concerns of the liberal middle classes more seriously than the social class we were founded to represent." 
U.K. Prime Minister Theresa May was relegated to another room while the rest of the EU officials deliberated: Could she have more time to convince her fellow British politicians to accept her Brexit plan? They gave her until April 12. 
Hmm. I think this misreads where MPs are at. The various anti-Brexit parties don't think that JC is gonna pop out at the last minute and neither do second reffers in Labour. Their argument is that nothing else can command a majority in any case. 
Way beyond the 17.4m now. Anger which fuelled Brexit was CORRECT (reaction to austerity, more money funnelled south, not north etc.) But the object of that anger totally misguided. It was never the EU. *Big shock horror end of movie reveal*: it was the govt. all along  
What a relief this #Brexit extension is.I can hoard a lot of malt in a week. But malt the I can hoard over three weeks is astounding. 
Then for some reason the elevator went up and skipped our floor. Embarrassed, I said: "well, it seems like we're stuck in there for longer than expected". "All of this seems familiar" he replied. #Britishpolitics #Brexit #CNN 
Tired of an endless Brexit debate, of inconclusive promises of a European renaissance & of China's monopoly of long-term politics? Then a citizens takeover of EU institutions is what you need. Monday in Brussels w/ @yanisvaroufakis @benoithamon @pamfoundation @HorvatSrecko & more 
Buffer zone. 700 extra parking spaces created at #Rotterdam port in preparation for #Brexit  
Did Russia Influence The Brexit Movement? 'New Yorker' journalist @edcaesar discusses Arron Banks, the British businessman who funded the most extreme end of the pro-Brexit "Leave" campaign — possibly with help from Russia. 
So Jason Kenney wants to hold a referendum to overturn a policy he signed off on. Am I hearing that right?  
WATCH | "She's enraged most of the backbenchers. There isn't really a government!" Scathing attack on Theresa May by Mark Francois after reports she'll allow unwhipped indicative votes on revoking Article 50, second referendum & soft Brexit.Support us at  
I will be marching tomorrow, with my family, with friends and colleagues. Hope to meet some twitter friends too!  It’s not too late to stop Brexit. Saturday’s march will force politicians to hear us | Lara Spirit  
Push him to the short or the long bench? #Brexit© Cartoon:  
I've seen the brexit March.  There will be some tutting, not anarchy. 
Spent most of the referendum campaign confusing process with content and did nothing to counter the wholesale illegal manipulation of primarily working class voters, while indulging shitbags like Milne and throwback 70's socialists. So bored of prevaricating grey haired white men  
7 reasons a no-deal Brexit will be good for Millennials  
How people in Dover, Charlie Elphicke's constituency, feel about Brexit."Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU": 1,401 signatures"Leave the EU without a deal in March 2019": 966 signaturesJust saying.#RevokeArt50 
I wish I had the willpower to just stop reading about Brexit. It would make things so much easier.  
#RevokeArticle50 live update! Plotting the number of signatures whilst working in the lab! Today there has been on average ~100,000 signatures an hour! Meaning we will reach 4 million signatures by 10 PM tonight! #RevokeA50Now #RevokeArticle50 #Brexit #RevokeArticle50Petition #EU 
Can you please just get rid of her. She's ruining Brexit and making the party a joke surely this can't go on. Bring down the government if you have to anything is better than this painful leader and painful on going Brexit mess. We should be leaving next week and she's spoilt it 
Forget the short-term Brexit dilemma, THIS is what we should be watching out for next - "the Brexit vote has accentuating the conflicts between Britain’s nations and infusing their separate histories with new meaning." 
When French ministers make cat jokes about Brexit I'm pretty sure that the 'humiliation' threshold has been reached.Your party are a bad joke. 
Brilliant from the People’s NEC Rep @lara_eleanor;“we must use the opportunity of Brexit to walk away from the increasingly reactionary EU...and avoid any Greek-style strangulation of our progressive movement to build a socialist Britain.”  
Over 3 million signatures to revoke #Article50. I’ve signed. #brexit 
Ever noticed that the ones so vehemently against a second brexit referendum always go on about democracy? The vote was almost a tie. Based on lies. If youre so democratic then let there be a second vote? Youre scared it will change and you know it. 
I lost 2 of mine since the referendum as well. I wasn't offended because I realise it's a joke. 
Thank you for you and your parties tireless campaigning to get the government to do the right thing, selfishly I believe that the UK needs Scotland to be a part of it though fully understand that being independent would make sense after #Brexit 
My house is responsible for two of them, and yes we are British citizens.  Of course we were denied a vote in the referendum along with many others,  otherwise this idiotic leave result would not have happened. 
You have created major division in this Country by lying to the British people and not delivering the Brexit 17-4 million people voted for 
As someone fond of Britain - home to some of the world's most famous cultural, educational and sporting institutions - the omni-shambles that is Brexit makes me wonder what on earth it did in a past life to deserve this.*open history books*OK, apart from (deep breath)... 
Some people are arguing bots could be signing it. They're right too. It's almost like, people should go to some sort of polling booth with a passport and some sort of voting card instead for a referendum. Far fetched I know! 
@BBCWorldatOne @BBCNews Listened to long #Brexit piece today. Interviews with ERG, centre right and Govt loyalist Tory MPs. Three Tories, no opposition spokespeople at all. Criticisms of @UKLabour position allowed without challenge. Why is this OK? 
BREAKING#Today the UK has stooped further into the gutter by voting against all seven resolutions condemning Israel. Welcome to Theresa May's post Brexit Britain where the UK stands shoulder to shoulder with Israel.   
Do you think the result of the 2016 referendum should be respected, and the UK should leave the EU? Vote & RT for a larger sample size! 
Brexit is a mess, but UK startups may find refuge in Estonia’s e-Residency  
Me and the mrs are off to Brussels to sort out this Brexit shit once and for all pic.twitter.com/P997DzJNwj 
Not very good at investigating a certain recent referendum that was peppered with fraudulent behaviour.  How long has it been? 
"the UK lacks the industrial base to switch from foreign to domestic production, thanks to the 1980s shock therapy of the very same disaster capitalists that now champion no-deal"@TomKibasi one of writers I most trust for realist, leftist Brexit analysis  
This driver is well-stocked for Brexit. #airportstuff 
Leader of the SNP in the House of Commons Ian Blackford leaves the Cabinet Office following talks with David Lidington, but his interview with @nickeardleybbc is interrupted by demonstrators shouting “Leave Means Leave” #Brexit  
Ofcom Review of BBC news and current affairsAny thoughts?I think the BBC has totally failed. 
Brexit was a scam from the very beginning. Do something and support @peoplesvote_uk for yours and your family's future.#RevokeArt50Now 
"People criticise cannibalism as a political strategy, but it could certainly help reinforce May’s authority" - @HolyroodLiam comes up with some creative ideas for how the PM could get her Brexit deal through the Commons  
And how much here Greg? You know your own Government’s analysis suggests a ‘no deal’ Brexit would be calamitous and far worse - potentially 8% of GDP - and yet you still voted not to rule out no deal. #RevokeArt50Now 
"Brexit has already damaged the civic and political fabric of our country, thanks to Theresa May’s lamentable leadership. To misquote St Francis of Assisi, she has managed to create discord where there was union and despair where there was hope" - Angela Smith MP (TIG) 
Brexit is like a terribly-written political drama series that you get hooked on despite the fact that it goes on for far too many seasons and has no likeable characters. (...if only it were just fiction) 
I conducted some analysis of skews in online news reporting of Brexit previously (and how the BBC compares to other outlets), but seriously?  
The humiliation is when the ERG refused to take on board the GE result which changed everything. You also elected TM in the 1st place. I'm a leave voter who wanted desperately for brexit to work but it's all based on fantasy thinking. You don't represent me. 
When this referendum all started I was 2/3 weeks too young to have my say. Now I’ve watched my future being put into shambles. Please if you have a spare 2 minutes please give this a sign, it may be small but there is a voice in numbers #RevokeArt50Now 
Careful people.. The Gammon is strong in this one . #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
People of the WorldBrexit is what happens when you allow a disturbed, sociopathic,  religious extremist imbecile with only a 2nd in Geography to become Prime Minister.Please don't make the same mistake we did.Best regardsThe Previously United Kingdom 
Vote Leave loses appeal against ruling that it broke election rules by breaching spending limits during the Referendum. Yet the cheats are still out there saying having a fair referendum based on the clearer facts we now have would be "undemocratic" #FBPE 
It's a proper carry on #Brexit  
Feck. Drink. Brexit.   
This is everything! @CarryOnJoan #Brexit  
A constituent of Wollaton Park Estate rang for an update and expressed anxiety about the chaos of #Brexit She said best thing that could happen is make @LilianGreenwood Prime Minister “she’d sort it out” 
I have watched this five times since getting on the subway this morning and the "chickens vote by referendum" line still gets me every time. 
Government orders hospitals not to reveal Brexit impact assessments to protect 'commercial interests'  
Whether you voted for Brexit or not, no judgment. Its a shit show. There’s no plan and the “will of the people” argument seems to be crumbling. Over THREE MILLION people have signed this petition to end this madness. If you live in the UK, please sign this  
A British conservative MP and I just stepped into an elevator before the doors closed, both wanting to go to the first floor. When the elevator surprisingly went down, I told him "oops, seems like we're going down". "Yep, just like my career" he responded. #Brexit #Britishhumor 
Shadow Chancellor John McDonnell explains why they’ve chosen to alienate both sides instead. #brexit  
Now that an extension to the #Article50 process has been agreed at #EUCO, Parliament must once again vote down the Prime Minister’s #Brexit deal and then take control of the process to determine what we use the extension for. My Urgent Question this morning.  
Opinion: Gina Miller gives the Brexit speech Theresa May should have made  
#DoYouRememberWhen Brexit was going to be the easiest deal ever made and going to build us shiny new hospitals every week?Instead we have s broken paralysed government that does bugger all, controlled by greedy vultures waiting to feast on the carnage 
EU leaders were still not convinced that Theresa May knows how to get the agreement through Parliament so decided to take the threat of an immediate no-deal exit out of her hands 
The fact that the term ‘the Labour Brexit’ is even used shows how much the party has completely lost the plot.  
He literally wrote a letter to the PM setting out his conditions for passing it and stood on a manifesto that backed Brexit. There comes a point where people have to take *some* responsibility for choosing not to hear that. 
I’ll be proud to speak at the @peoplesvote_uk march tomorrow. Scotland voted to remain in 2016 but people across the UK must have the chance to get out of this Brexit mess. Whatever Scotland’s future - I hope independent - it is in all of our interests for UK to be in the EU. 
Plans are being drawn up to give MPs a choice between revoking #A50, a second referendum, the prime minister's deal, her deal plus a customs union, the deal plus a customs union and single market access, a standard free-trade agreement, or a no-deal #Brexit.#RevokeArticle50 
I made this speech in the Scottish Parliament 2yrs ago with almost every concern raised coming to pass. We are fast approaching a #Brexit cliff edge. Warnings ignored, repeated failures to engage with devolved administrations have now left us exactly where we feared.  
Yes Theresa May and the Conservative party look like becoming political casualties of the Brexit crisis but much more importantly our whole political system now has to come into question. 
"Labour needs to see that while there may be a price to pay for failing to go along with the unicorn approach to Brexit, there will be an even bigger price to pay if they facilitate it."  
Forget #brexit  this is Currie Sands today.What an amazing place to be and just a short walk from Orsay House B & B in Portnahaven #bandb #bandbweek #argyllsecretcoast #argyll #wildaboutargyll #argyllandtheisles 
This has confused me for the last two years. The result of an advisory referendum with an incredibly narrow margin was taken over all of the expert opinion, including that of the political parties, business leaders etc. How did that result come to take such precedence? 
I don't want Brexit. I didn't vote for it. BUT if someone was able to show me solid evidence that we would be better off as a result then I would accept the decision. However, i am still waiting. #brexitpetition #RevokeArticle50 #Brexit 
Friends in #Milano, I look forward to talking #Brexit, #EU, and international #federalism at @istbrunoleoni on 3/29. Do come!  
Wouldn't it be fun if the only way we could solve Brexit was to let MPs use a more sophisticated voting-system than the electorate is allowed to have?  
beginning to suspect that the entire Brexit crisis from beginning to end was masterminded by Nick Clegg to demonstrate the danger of false choices imposed by a lack of ranked choice voting 
You don't want us to have a say do you. Brexit was always a Project for crooks. 
They do, for real, think that Brexit will just go away.  
Problem is, you can't argue with stupid. All your best lines go over their head.Just heard @CCriadoPerez destroy the nitwit Mark Francois on the radio. She described Brexit as his "wet dream". Ouch!#PeoplesVote#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Sign this. Over 3m people now. They can’t continue to ignore such large numbers. If nothing else, it should open up the question of a referendum further. I am the people, and May is most definitely not on my side.  
They're gonna need a bigger plane! 
Philip May’s firm is believed to have made $88bn out of Brexit to date.  
#Brexit #EUCO #RevokeArticle50 REMAINERS THINK THEY HAVE JUST KILLED BREXITTHEY NEED TO THINK AGAINTONIGHT AT 5.30pm WILL SEE WIDESPREAD, DISRUPTIVE GO-SLOW ROAD BLOCKADES BY PATRIOT HGV DRIVERSIT IS KICKING OFF WHAT WILL BE A RAPIDLY GROWING CAMPAIGN OF DIRECT ACTION  
European Union: 'Nigel Farage WILL lead new Brexit Party into European elections and return to Brussels as an MEP' 
ANY MPs who back a betrayal deal will be signing a career death warrant ppl have been betrayed why should we vote for MPs who betrayed us PATRIOTS SHOULD RUN BRITAIN not EU SUCKHOLERS. Pressure mounts on Theresa May to quit after Brexit delay  
I like that the revoke petition has moved the "Overton window" making the 2nd referendum the "middle of the road" option between 'revoke' and 'no deal'. 
A no-deal Brexit is more likely than you think, because of legislation you’ve never heard of  via @prospect_uk 
THIS HAS NOT STOPPED THE FAKE NEWS TV PROMOTING IT HOURLY - Brexit petition CON! Half of signatures in Revoke Article 50 petition are OUTSIDE UK  
Are you a British citizen or a UK resident? You may want to consider signing this petition to stop Brexit... over three million people have already signed!  
How on earth can someone go on one of the UK’s top political programmes and not expect to be asked about Brexit? SMFH   
Extreme Left/Right coalition that is #Brexit will destroy living standards in the uk. It won't matter if the uk is under #Nazi-Tory-Right or #Commie-Labour-Left. The uk is the laughing stock of the world, all the other countries R licking their lips. 
Brexit petition: 12,000 in Islington back call for government to revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU 
Wow over 3 million signatures now! If you haven’t signed and want to end this silly debacle called Brexit then do it!  
It's #BrexitBetrayal thru & thru. This Govt & PM @10DowningStreet @theresa_may are untenable, unmitigated disaster. Just take us out as mandated ratified. Stop MOVING #Brexit goal posts. Stop passing #Brexit buck. It is OUR £39 Blns that #EU are after! Don't U get it #Remainers!! 
You have to admit that people who voted against Brexit never die. They are immortal. 
@vaughangething changing his Twitter name to "Vaughan 2 Coaches Gething" is the level of Brexit banter I aspire to achieve someday, I'm sure you'll be getting two coach-loads of coffees bought for you all day tomorrow!! 
The no2av campaign by the same people of voteleave was instrumental for brexit. They knew they needed low trust in parliamentary democracy and build on the dissent towards a brexit vote. The ethics of the ads were the same or even lower than £350KK NHS or Nige’s breaking point  
M&A deal volumes in UK FS rise in 2018 despite continued Brexit uncertainty-UK financial services industry completed 236 deals totalling £23.8bn in 2018, compared to 148 deals in 2017, valued at £27.8bn.  
Just realized that since I'm now a UK citizen I can sign that Brexit petition.Wheeeeeeeeeee 
If you're a British national in Finland who procrastinated about registering to stay here before 29th March, you're in luck. #Brexit chaos means you've got at least 14 more days to get your application sorted!  
8. Finally here is Verhofstatd describing Corbyn's Brexit plan as "heavenly":   
7.  Here's a speech he made in Lisbon in December 2018 - at the height of Brexit negotiations - that you will never have seen because not a single UK broadcaster streamed it:  
Brexit might finally go through with a mere two week extension in a situation where no deal can be reasonably expected. #Brexit #UK #TheresaMay 
Imagine if Jeremy Corbyn was in the streets marching with the people instead of trying to negotiate a softer Brexit.  
So easy to sneer @iainmartin1 What precisely have you done to help achieve a Brexit compromise?  
Thanks, @Frontal21 And we certainly need this discussion with experts on disinformation in the Brexit campaign. Europe needs to see the bigger picture!  
Too divisive. Puts the debate back into hands of polarising figures like Farage and Blair. Prefer the deliberative democracy of a People’s Assembly. Better chance of finding a consensus that another winner-takes-all referendum. 
You have been instrumental in causing this humilation too. Blinded by your arrogance and driven by your obsessive ideological purity, you have sabotaged, obstructed and impeded Brexit. If Brexit doesn’t happen it will be on you too. You don’t get to shift the blame on to others. 
FFS @theresa_may - stop "ploughing on" with a defunct plan that you know you can't get a majority for. Have some humility & the courage to admit your red lines were wrong. Either lead like a leader or step aside for someone who can.#RevokeArticle50 #brexit #brexitpetition 
Eton mess? Is that not Brexit? 
Brexit [verb]:To tell everyone that you are leaving, but then do nothing."Dave said he was leaving the pub and going home, but he's just been brexiting for the last two hours." 
Gardening group trip to @Walton_Gardens today, looking at trees, some of which were planted when the #Greenhall brewery family lived there. Pretty damson blossom in the 2nd pic. During refreshments in the cafe there was friendly chatting, including the subject of #Brexit!  
Theresa May seems to be banking on being remembered as the woman who delivered Brexit, rather than the woman who caused havoc through no-deal. Just like Seth Brundle in The Fly is remembered by everyone as ‘that guy who invented that cool matter transporter.'  
Even more reason to march for a People's Vote tomorrow. 
Right now, perhaps the country needs a strong and stable.....      #Brexit  
Activist @thatginamiller says she's not convinced that Britain will leave the EU with a no-deal Brexit  
Never mind Brexit, roll on the next general election, a major shake up is coming like it or not. This current parliament is a complete joke. A new parliament of Leave voting MP's … it will happen. 
I have always said that once Brexit was postponed, then anything was possible, including stopping Brexit. It seems that Tusk agrees with me.@BremainInSpain 
Also: everyone wants Brexit to be a disaster, because it'll stop all the dickheads in their countries from trying the same thing 
French President Emmanuel Macron says Europe must not remain hostage to Brexit 
This is utterly unreal folks 3.27 million & rising rising.RT even if you've already signed it. Call people you know who don't use Twitter.If all signatories convince 5 more to sign there'll be 19.6mil - 2mil more than voted for brexit.#Find5Friends 
This is the level of desperation Brexpests have reached. Claiming 3.81% of the signatures being from outside the UK is somehow a reason to freak out.BRITS GO ABROAD, FILM AT 11 pic.twitter.com/Oq05sq1aXu 
Fair point that petition to #RevokeArticle50 signed by 3M+ is not compelling when it's already known that more people voted against Brexit in the first place. For comparison I'd like pro-Brexit groups to mount a petition to see how popular #Brexit still is given what's known now. 
May's WA is hard Remain. We have various MPs & many a #Leave voter now claiming this delivers #Brexit. No it doesn't, and it never did so why change your tune? If this is their stance, remove any reference to the Brexit # as they are no better than the Remainers stopping #Brexit! 
KEEP SIGNING: Over 3m people have signed the petition to Revoke Article 50. At present only 0.8% of 115,999 constituents (932 people) have signed this petition from our constituency. Lets send a clear message again that we don’t want Brexit.   
Brits want neither @theresa_may nor @JeremyCorbyn. They’re embarrassed by the excruciatingly dire performances of both, & wish to #StopBrexit. That’s reality,  Messrs. @eucopresident, @MichelBarnier, @JunckerEU & @guyverhofstadt. We don’t want Brexit: we can’t to #RevokeA50! #ffs 
Troubling to see ECB President Mario Draghi telling EU leaders that "overall economic risk to eurozone of no deal Brexit is low"  …Despite serious economic evidence a "no deal" can cost 1.2m jobs in EU27, so also hit €-zone badly 
You know Brexit has fully drained you when you shout 'Cheerio, I'll be half an hour' to the dog when leaving the house and then turn to lock it with your car key fob 
Petition, not referendum! The country voted out and that means out! 
Seen a Kate McCann tweeting about Brexit. Get back to finding Maddie, luv 
Whoops! I meant petition. But you can see why I made that mistake! If we get enough signatures it will virtually become a referendum.  
European media praise EU's plan to counter UK's Brexit 'chaos'  
Outrage! The government's contingency plans in case its a No Deal Brexit is code name Operation Yellowhammer.Keep our birds out of this mayhem please. Especially ones that are decreasing ,due largely to British farming regime. Ironically , EU rules are more protective.Really. 
Number 10 is understood to be considering allowing Parliament to vote on seven Brexit options next week:- Revoking Article 50- 2nd referendum- The deal- Deal plus a customs union- Deal plus a customs union and single market access- A standard free-trade agreement- No-deal 
Catching up with the hundreds of emails from constituents over the past day or so on #Brexit #RevokeArt50Now - May really did herself no favours attempting to pit parliament against people. It would seem my constituents resolve to oppose her deal is, if anything, strengthened. 
.@theresa_may I am not sure who you are working with?  You have made no real attempt to work with the #LibDems or any other of the opposition parties in the 1,000 days since the #Brexit vote.  
More than three million people have signed an online petition urging the U.K. government to cancel Brexit  
Theresa May has blocked a No Deal Brexit by extending A50 and could now allow a Remainer Parliament to kill off a proper Brexit. This would be total surrender.  
Rather than showing leadership and leading us out on March 29, she’s capitulating to our Remain Parliament determined to stop Brexit at all costs. Spineless!  
If the #Brexit referendum is to be treated as binding rather than advisory then it must be subject to the rules that apply to binding polls.  That means that it must be rejected and re-run. 
What’s tomorrow’s Peoples March in London about?It’s not just about #brexit.It’s about showing the Russian funded Farage, Arron Banks, the white suprematist that killed Jo Cox, Katie Hopkins, Julia Hartley-Brewer UKIP, EDF.....that ultimately they will not win 
3.1million signatures on the #RevokeArticle50 petition. Brexit may well go ahead, but #NotInMyName and #NotOnMySide - thankyou everyone who had stood up and been counted on this. It may not change the course but it's making a difference to how it will be written. 
This 16 y/o on Question Time went viral because she nailed Brexit better than any politician 
In a law-abiding country Anna Soubry would have the right to live in her own home. Brexit is criminal, lawless and disordered. It's not my country.  
BBC have told me that there are investigating Brexit corruption and will release information when they have all the evidence. What's the betting it's long after we've left the EU. 
BREAKING: Brexit petition CON! Half of signatures in Revoke Article 50 petition are OUTSIDE UK.It all makes sense with my json data analysis now.Out of 3 million signatures, it's looks like the Government have removed 1.7 million on them  
Corbyn's leadership ratings crash to worst level yet over Brexit  
Politico: Merkel countered Macron about risking a no-deal brexit, calling this irresponsible. She also criticised Tusk over divisive #EUCO debate, accused him of lack of preparedness & told him not to interrupt her, saying “even if you don’t need the U.K., we [the EU] need them” 
Revoke, Remain, Reform.And for goodness' sake stop pretending the Brexit referendum had anything to do with true democracy.  
"if you people didn't exist bigots wouldn't have voted for brexit and we wouldn't have this problem to begin with!" etc etc 
Sky Sources say the Government is considering allowing MPs to vote on seven alternative Brexit options next week including the choice of revoking Article 50, holding a second referendum and Prime Minister Theresa May's deal plus a Customs Union 
The fact that Jack Whitehall and Michael McIntyre are successful comedians in this country is a bigger disgrace to our national pride than anything Brexit could ever do 
Petition to revoke Article 50 and halt Brexit:    3,100,779Petition to not talk about Brexit for 24 hours:   51  
Brexit: Will Theresa May try to take back control?  
As mayor of London, I’m clear we need to revoke Article 50 and end this Brexit disaster - The Independent  
Screw Theresa May, screw the next leader, @Conservatives in name only have collectively screwed Brexit.Burst their bubble.-Cancel memberships-Stop donations-Withdraw support 
Understand Number 10 now seriously considering indicative votes on Brexit next week. Government source tells me there could be 7 options: PM deal, revocation, second ref, deal + customs union, deal + customs + single market, FTA or no deal 
holy shitPopquiz: your country is on fire and the armed forces are activating a nuclear bunker to prepare for Brexit. What do you do?a) attempt to organize a political response to the situationorb) blame marginalized people and organize this "debate"  
Before and after Brexit. Currently we can travel to, live in, and work in all the countries on the left unrestricted. After Brexit we are just an offshore island, excluded from the development of our continent. Tragic for young people.  
More than three million people signed an online petition urging the government to cancel Brexit  
We would like to thank @peoplesvote_uk for a brilliant video promoting Brexit, although we had to fix the end... Join us in Parliament Square, 29th March from 4pm to save Brexit:  
Theresa May should go for No Deal next week instead of pushing Brexit back, Liz Truss warns 
@BBCNews At what number of votes to revoke Article 50 will you finally decide this is the LEAD story on Brexit, not Lord Grievous in human skin's stupid deal? Does 3M in 48 hours not do it for you? #RevokeArt50Now 
Remainers: a referendum of over 33 million people, backed up by a GE is only advisory & can be dismissed. Also Remainers: a petition of 3+ million #FBPE accounts signing the same petition over & over again must not be ignored & represents the will of the right kind of people. 
A succinct Venn diagram depiction of UK politics & Brexit. [Image: The Psychology Babes on fb]  
I don't understand how Tories can't see that the only thing that might possibly save them from total oblivion is getting us out on 29th March. 'Indicative votes' is just MPs wrestling a proper Brexit back from the people & saying 'we can only leave in a way that means we don't'. 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 3,100,779. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Could Brexit break up the UK? Great read from @MishaGlenny To underscore Misha's point, I dug into the data to show one of the most striking patterns from 2016:Scotland was far more Remainy than England, even after accounting for education & deprivation 
I do hope that nobody decides to bow out of the march tomorrow because they now think a referendum is unlikely or prefer to revoke A50. It's about coming together to declare opposition to Brexit regardless of what's happening in parliament (which is wildly unpredictable anyway). 
Laughing at Brexit 
You could spend 99p on a newspaper and read about Brexit OR you could spend 99p and spend a few days in my dark and twisted mind. You decide.   
 BREXIT UPDATE: I’ve come to the difficult decision, that if the Prime Minister’s deal is voted down next week, we must seriously consider revoking Article 50 to avoid crashing out without a deal. This would give us to time to go back to the people #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Lrt I swear this is the most anti-democratic country.Elect a progressive candidate, they move to the right immediately Push progressive legislation, they turn it into corporate welfarePass a ballot referendum, they gut its intent before implementation 
Now that you have made your money and been honoured for public service Ms Lennox it is obvious that you care little about the 17.4m people who voted for Brexit. Even if they have paid for your wallpaper and muesli bars.  
Brexit is breaking Britain. But tomorrow we are marching to help pull our country back from the brink. Join me and thousands from Bedfordshire, Cambridgeshire, Essex, Hertfordshire, Norfolk and Suffolk. @peoplesvote_uk @Remain_Labour @Another_Europe  
Theresa May has promised 29th March so many times, even radio adverts promoting the Brexit date have gone out. Expect gigantic backlash next week when public realise they’ve been lied to.  
On the upside I have worked out how to do Russian characters on my phone just in time for the week when the full пиздец of Brexit will exhaust description in English language. 
out of interest, due to lack of promises being kept, if there was a second vote what would you vote? #brexit 
I am beyond hacked off that the LibDem MPs are still bleating on about a second referendum when there's a huge Revoke petition and party policy is now for straight revocation. #JustMakeItStop 
BREAKING: British satirists in mourning as BBC journalist @BBCkatyaadler claims EU not UK wins itself breathing space over Brexit. More soon ...  
Peston predicts UK to leave without deal on April 12th.Analysis has 3 gaps- Is 4th (April 10th) vote impossible?- Why wouldn't Labour try to stop No Deal Brexit? (What stops them stopping it?)- Where is Ireland in the "EU now prefers No Deal" story? 
Nervous Remainers await helicopter airlift out of UK, as no-deal Brexit nears.  
This is bigger than Brexit UK democracy is being undermined by the prime minister and her allies and is in serious peril 
My #FridayFeeling in summary...- Fed up of #Brexit- Fed up of the Tories- Fed up of unrepentant Thatcherite capitalism- Fed up of fascists- Fed up of centrists enabling them- Fed up of the media- Fed up of those in need being ignored- Fed up with ignorance- Fed up  
Brexit is a coup and those pushing it have taken advantage of the weaknesses in our constitution. This is now a fight for democracy and a fight for values. I am standing in solidarity with those at the sharpest edge of Brexit..those #InLimbo. I'm holding a #YellowRose4EU 
The Brexit farce is about to turn to tragedy  
It's important that this isn't lost among all the Brexshit news. If only people were allowed to look into the financial dealings of the ERG around Brexit chaos. Tory MP Christopher Davies admits expenses fraud  
Public opinion has shifted in favour of No Deal Brexit, poll finds  
How Brexit customs arrangements promise to deliver fraud!  
Rolling my eyes at Brexiters bleating about a tiny minority of the revoke article 50 petition signatories coming from abroad, while ignoring the widespread criminality and foreign interference in the referendum result. 
We’ve now reached the stage where both sides of the Brexit debate are smearing their opponents with links to Russia. All the world’s a Kremlin, and all the men and women merely players?  
I'm deeply concerned by the PM's recent comments on #Brexit, pitting the British public against #Parliament is revolting & dangerous. She is simply passing her ineptitude & inability to strike a good deal onto MPs, rather than working to find consensus to end this chaos. 
"That’s the beauty and the strength of the EU - that the institution can be improved. It’s a little bit like democracy – with all its flaws I don’t think there is anything better that anyone will ever come up with." #EUCO #Brexit #Brussels #Latvia 
'Cancel #Brexit' petition hits 3 million signatures  
WAKE UP WORLD Brexit Disaster, Trump Chaos, France Riots, Merkel Fails, Assad Secure, Bibi Rules, PUTIN WINS!  
In below the line comments, emails in the inbox, on the twitter feed and even talking to some MPs, many still think it is a legal inevitably that Brexit happens next Friday.  The following Saturday could be a quite a shock for them. 
Nigel Farage back in frontline politics as Brexit Party leader  
Hundreds of thousands of people urged to take to the streets of London tomorrow to demand a @peoplesvote_uk public say to “stop the Brexit madness” - full story @standardnews views from @SadiqKhan @JustineGreening @DrRosena @SteveReedMP @MarshadeCordova  
The same credible analysts and publications that told us that there were wmds in iraq and brexit was never going to happen and hilary was winning  
"The media are excited about 2 million signatures on an online parliamentary petition to reverse Brexit. Outside London and a few other cities, the country does not seem to care" - UBS 
BREXIT: Theresa May assures Leave voters that “the will of the people will not undermine the will of the people” as #RevokeArticle50 petition passes 3 million signatures. 
In 2016 the public voted for a magical shiny cake-and-eat-it Brexit deal that never existed.In 2019 we need a #PeoplesVoteNow on the actual grey deal.Which is clearly worse than the deal we already have right now in the EU. 
Lib Dem Leader @vincecable on the practical alternatives to the government's Brexit deal after this week's developments.It's time to end the deadlock by going back to the people and giving them the final say. Add your name if you agree >  
The Revoke Art50 parliamentary petition is at over 3m signatures - currently the second most signed ever. It looks as though it may overtake the current reigning champion of most signatures on a parliamentary petition (afaik) - the petition for another referendum..  
Want to know why Leavers have switched to talking about the EU army?Because no one believes a word of their 2016 economic case for #brexit - not even leave voters.By lying that UK soldiers will be forced to die for Europe they’ve created a patriotic meme to appeal to fear. 
Petition passes  3 MILLION I'll say it again. Brexit has failed. #RevokeArticle50. Let's nuke this thing from space. 
Thanks to the Royal Legion Pub who gave us free chip butties on the #MarchToLeave! The response from the public marching down to Parliament Square has been amazing. The people demand a real Brexit!  
EU leaders “want rid” of “this Brexit poison”. Why a no-deal Brexit on 12 April is highly likely  
The logic of Theresa May's demagogic separation between "the people" and parliament would be to hold a referendum on her deal vs. no deal. 1/2 
The Leavers are definitely unnerved. Mood has changed and I think the reason is simple. Brexit might actually happen and they'll be obliged to take ownership of the chaos. 
The way out of this Brexit Shambles, used 24 times by the EU & can be used by both parties (EU/UK) for the 29th of March to create a seamless trading transition   
We used to wonder how a civilised European country could rapidly descend into the madness of Nazism. Brexit is not Nazism (though there are some echoes), but it is a lesson in how quickly an apparently stable country can sink into political madness.#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit #FBPE 
One day in the future... hundreds of thousands of you.. maybe millions will proudly tell your children, or your Grandchildren..that you marched in London on Saturday March 23rd 2019 and changed history by stopping Brexit.History will be made. Be a part of it. 
"It's Brexit.  It's dead.""Have you tried shocking it?""Yes, but it didn't respond.""Has anyone told Theresa?""Nobody dares."  
The PM’s hypocrisy knows no bounds. She won’t allow the public a vote on her deal or a vote in the EU elections. Yet she stubbornly insists she can bring back her failed deal for 3rd vote. That's what I told the #Brexit Minister earlier #putittothepeople #revokeandremain 
This account was set up to help protect our NHS, and Brexit poses a huge threat to our health service; it really is as simple as that.Please keep signing and sharing the petition: #revokeA50petition 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 3,047,041. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
The SNP's main aim throughout the Brexit process has been to push for #IndyRef2 - we said no, why can't she listen? 
A short delay resolves nothing.The outcome of a referendum isn't guaranteed. A general election might install an even more clueless government. No deal is the worst outcome of all.@clive_crook thinks that revoking Article 50 is the only way forward  
Theresa May has thrown MPs and Parliament under the bus because of her own lack of leadership says Lib Dems Layla Moran expressing her "outrage" to Conservative Rory Stewart about the PM’s speech#Brexit #politicslive  
If the Government are hoping to stall for extra time for Brexit, why don't they seek advice from Cadent Gas, they are the true experts at prolonging all work 
Stop Brexit petition hits 3,000,000 signatures.Keep sharing, keep tweeting, lets make it the biggest petition ever!  via @MetroUK 
#Brexit: Just a reminder of the reality of all this.   
Opinion: Three years on from Jo Cox’s murder, Theresa May is stoking hate by blaming MPs for her Brexit failure  
Jeremy Vine on Radio2 asking ARE YOU ASHAMED TO BE BRITISH because of the handling of #BrexitNo I'm not, I'm ashamed of our Parliament. Being ashamed to be British is something many politicians & leftist/liberals wish me to feel  but I don't 
After “90 minutes of nothing” the EU has taken back control of Brexit - my take on recent events ⁦@bmj_latest⁩ 
Tony Blair: “We have literally wasted almost 3 years on a futile search for a Brexit which has only upside. There is no such Brexit. We have chased the Holy Grail Brexit – the one which will unite the nation. It will never be found.” RT ↓  
'Cancel Brexit' petition passes 2m signatures on Parliament site - BBC News . It is clear the government needs to listen to the people. Time for a #PeoplesVote 
3,000,000 and Counting and Breaking all records.A petition calling for Article 50 to be revoked and Brexit cancelled has attracted more than three million signatures and has become the fastest growing petition ever. 
3 million signiatures!!! The people's voice is pushing to end this disaster. Revoke Article 50 and/or move for a #PeoplesVote - #PutItToThePeople. Let's finish Brexit and we can all get on with our lives! Add your signiature:  #RevokeArt50Now 
Brexit is an Eton messConceived by Boris JohnsonMidwived by David CameronBreast fed by Jacob Rees-MoggBurped by Rory StewartPut Eton under special measures until it learns how to produce people who don't think it's their birthright to fuck with the rest of us #politicslive 
The village idiot Rory Stewart now on the tory politics live, he's a genius at doing interviews. #politicslive #Brexit  
“We’ve spent Billions on preparing for a ‘no deal’ exit. Theresa May has said on countless occasions that ‘no deal, is better than a bad deal. Quite frankly, the failure of not reaching Brexit by March 29th lies firmly with the Prime Minister” @nigelmp#StandUp4Brexit 
'Nothing has actually changed.' @thatginamiller on the state of play in the Brexit psychodrama.  
With the PMs Deal we’ll have ten more years like the last 3. That’s why I’m supporting a confirmatory referendum and failing that if the only choice is No Deal then revocation. Proud to be part of @LoveSocialism who have an alternative vision 
Have we hit peak BBC Brexit bias? That headline?!  
The #RevokeArticle50 petition has surged past 3 million. The most popular Leave petition gained only 373,778 signatures. MPs take note, 3 million voters could swing a lot of seats.  #Brexit 
And you’re the root cause of this whole sorry #Brexit mess.... 
Need to distinguish between PROCESS decisions and OUTCOME decisions. Once it is clear that there is no majority for any outcome decision (remain, soft Brexit, hard Brexit, no-deal) then all that's left are process decisions (extension, general election, 2nd referendum). (1/2) 
UPDATE: Over 3 million people have now signed the petition urging the U.K. government to cancel Brexit  
REMINDER: to anyone not yet registered for residence in Italy, very important to get your registration done at the Comune before 29th March - this is still #Brexit date until any extension becomes fixed in law. #citizensrights 
#Article50 poll the traitors are using to promote the #Brexit demise is a fake. People in India and Russia are signing it but the media are running with it cause it suits their anti brexit narrative #BrexitBETRAYAL 
Please message your friends and family and get them to sign the Article 50 referendum. We need to make sure the pressure grows over the weekend!! 
Arguments like this make me really cross. Many of our poorest regions voted remain. Many of our richest are heavily populated leave areas.  Brexit was really complex.Stop spinning the myth that Brexit was a revolt of the poor. You're feeding Farage's betrayal myth for him.  
The BBC. The Today programme has lost a million listeners because of its pro Brexit bias. Brexiteers, like Farage, get a disproportionate amount of air time on programmes like BBCqt. Do you think the BBC bias has contributed to the Brexit shambles?@BBCr4today 
Despite her refusal to listen to anyone, Corbyn will keep plugging away. That is leadership. #SheHasToGo Jeremy Corbyn to meet Theresa May to stop No Deal Brexit - full interview  
And so it begins. The Brexit Blockades start this afternoon. And all because our dim and artless politicians are incapable of living up to their word and delivering Brexit on time. #csm #blockades #motorwayblockades 
Farage et al. keep reiterating that people will be angry if the vote for Brexit isn't honoured. People should be angry that a thoroughly dishonoured referendum isn't being respected?Surely more should be angry that the rule of law is being ignored to accommodate this madness? 
Funny to note that Brexit supporters think a petition is invalidated by foreign intervention.By their own argument, their precious referendum is also thus invalidated. 
EU leaders give Britain "last chance" for orderly Brexit  
No one believes these lies from JRM anymore. These politicians cnat move their lips without telling a whopper. He, like May, know that Brexit is a vote for pain.  
#Brexit: What happened in Brussels, and what happens next?These are the options [tap to expand]  
I hope those voting to revoke Article 50 realise they are voting for anarchy. No British subject will be obliged to conform to democratically decided laws, taxation etc if the largest democratically decided referendum result is overturned. #NoTaxationWithoutRepresentation 
Cant help thinking that the now approaching 2 billion quid paid to the political wing of a NI terrorist group the DUP, to support an international based money class coup of brexit fraud for tax avoiders, could have been better spent elsewhere.Say feeding School kids. 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 3,008,594. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Paul Pogba's yearly earnings have fallen by €0.1m over the last 12 months to €22.1m owing principally to the value of sterling falling against the Euro as Brexit uncertainty continues  
#Brexit chaos has the potential to spread across Europe. I welcome the #EUCO decision, it underlines that we need clarity before the European elections. Politicians in the UK need to take responsibility. 
And frankly nearly three years after the referendum, I see few white Britons who voted Remain willing to confront, far less, change this aspect of the discourse and collective worldview. 
3 million people have now signed the petition calling for Brexit to be cancelled  
UNITED KINGDOM: A petition to parliament to cancel Brexit reaches 3 million signatures 
BREAKING Revoke Article 50 Brexit petition hits 3million signatures 
Sadiq Khan will be thereCommenting, Sadiq Khan said:“Brexit is a complete and utter mess. We're now days away from falling off a cliff edge with catastrophic consequences. Enough is enough. It's time to take this out of the hands of politicians and put it back to the people. 
Brexit has not yet caused most of the dire economic problems predicted by Remainers, but the obstruction of Brexit by `Remainers has already caused possibly irreparable political damage 
Pretty extraordinary Commons performance by Kwasi Kwarteng holding the government line on Brexit. Began by refusing to confirm anything, then conceded MV3 is next week, ended by cheerfully agreeing indicative votes are probably a good idea. No one give him a job as a spy. 
NEWS! Anti-Brexit petition signed by three-million means nothing, insists man who proudly organised pro-Brexit march for three-dozen  
Literally everyone is saying the Brexit date has been delayed. It has not, it’s nonsense to suggest otherwise. We leave the EU on 29th March 2019 by law. The 29th March leave date can only be changed by a statutory instrument voted on in parliament.  
"I can see why Bill Shorten is going around saying this next election's gonna be a referendum on wages": ha ha...gulp #politicshq82% of respondents in @SkyNewsAust pollSay yes, to a living wage.#ChangeTheRules #auspol 
Brexit petition hits 3 mil. It's all about the people's will. Forgot to pay my leccy bill. Ooh I get the shivers. 
Dear @GodI’ll be honest... I don’t believe in you but I understand our Prime Minister Theresa May does. I am really concerned about her state of mind right now so could you send her a little message to say it’s totally ok if she just calls Brexit off.Thank you Lord!Andy 
The only way out of this Brexit mess is to #PutItToThePeople.Tomorrow thousands will march to demand a #PeoplesVote.We will be there, strong and loud. Join us!  
The choice before MPs is to deliver on the largest democratic mandate in British history or to betray Brexit and British democracy.  
Brexit is 21 days away. #brexit 
News about #Brexit appears to have left millions of people at times feeling powerless, angry or worried. Read our tips to look after your mental health in political uncertainty and change:  
If there's no majority for May's deal, no majority for no-deal, no majority for soft Brexit, then what?MPs need to prepare themselves to support a long extension and a fundamental rethink if they want to avoid no-deal.In the *end*, that will mean a 2nd referendum.(9/9) 
You made a Brexit...  
What? ‘A national change of heart on the whole Brexit business would still be welcome in Brussels but it is not expected‘ - ? Haven’t they been following the polls? “The EU knows it, so do our own MPs – Theresa May is finished | Rafael Behr - the guardian  
Little something I discovered by chance the other day, Crispin Odney the dealer who made 200k shorting the pound on the night of the referendum is Murdoch's son in law.  
This Week in Westminster the main focus for most has been Brexit, but the key point of my week was questioning the Prime Minister on the burning injustice faced by #WASPI women. 
Here’s Tony Blair in today’s ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ on the way out of the Brexit mess   
Tomorrow we're going to make this the biggest anti-Brexit march yet.Join us from 11am tomorrow outside the Dorchester, 53 Park Lane, London, W1K 1QA   
I have signed the petition to revoke Article 50, end Brexit and keep Britain in the European Union. Nearly three million names so far!  
On the one hand, maybe this is the kind of pious bullshit you’d expect a flint-hearted vicar’s daughter to come our with; on the other it’s just one more deep flaw in our society the Brexit nightmare has brought out, and which we need to address if we ever get out of this. 
I’m being briefed by a senior source that when the PM stood in front of the 27 EU leaders at summit yesterday “it was almost as if she wanted them to press the button (of a no deal #Brexit) .. 
"There isn't a majority in Parliament for any given Brexit outcome."Former Conservative Chairman Grant Shapps says May's Brexit deal will be voted down - but "the idea that giving power to Parliament to solve [Brexit] is quite simply untrue...it'll make us even more rudderless"  
I don't fear a second referendum, hell, part of me reckons the Establishment of this country deserves the nastiness that would be unleashed upon them. But it would destroy the social fabric of this country, especially when they stack it against us by fiddling the franchise. 
Ex estate agent caught with fingers in the public purse  probably thought it would go under the Brexit radar news-wise...please share Chris Davies #fraudster 
So @theresa_may you think everyone just wants Government to ‘get on with Brexit’ How then do you explain the fact that in just 48 hours nearly 3 million people have signed a petition asking Parliament to revoke Article 50? They are continuing to sign in their thousands every hour 
16-year-old hailed for her eloquent, wounding Brexit verdict on Question Time - Mirror Online  
Not really... spamming out the signature page just blocks it. Very few actually get through (we’re calculating percentages now). And then govt will also be cleaning as progresses.So petition itself is good — it’s just DDOS and disinfo trying to bring it down reputation-wise. 
Europe's financial system is vulnerable to disruption if Brexit turns chaotic  
So, a double dose of Brexit sub-contracting. May sub-contracts à plan to the EU27, the EU sub-contracts to MPs should May fail/fall. 
The #RevokeArt50Now petition is about to hit three million!  Help get it way beyond there. Think of anyone you can send it to, any way you can share... #StopBrexit #Brexit 
If you haven't done this then please REGISTER to VOTE.  In the current climate there is a high chance of a Referendum, or a General Election (or both) soon. There's even the chance the European Election might still go ahead. If you're not registered, you can't take part. 
Today’s Brexit poll:Please vote and share.Q. You are the Prime Minister and you have to choose between these 2 options. Which do you choose? 
"Parliament is fully justified in REJECTING a #Brexit backstop arrangement that would lock UK in a customs union against its will."Professor Fratzscher, head of the German Institute for Economic Research (DIW) in Berlin.MPs #VoteNo #MeaninglessVote3 
They promised a glorious liberation from the EU. The #Brexit reality is a shambolic retreat from Europe by a confused, misled and bitterly divided country squabbling chaotically with itself as it fails to come to terms with the realities of the modern world. #RevokeArticle50 
Spread this far & wide please. Just in case anyone was in any doubt as to whether the Brexit referendum was corrupt.Statement from The Electoral Commission 21/3/19 #RevokeArt50Now #peoplesvote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Brexit petition SHAME: Half of signatures in Revoke Article 50 petition are OUTSIDE UK  
Of all the questions about Brexit, this is my favourite, from my 11-year-old daughter. At breakfast this morning, with Today programme on in the background: "Do you think Theresa May has ever got so drunk that she has vomited?" 
Kwasi Kwarteng is standing in Parliament stating that Theresa May HAS been prepared to compromise over Brexit! Does he believe his own lines? The PM has exhibited nothing but complete intransigence! Kwarteng is embarrassingly out of his depth... #RevokeArt50Now #StopBrexit 
Tweeting this out again, in light of County Court rejecting 's appeal today.  Vote Leave loses legal challenge over Brexit spending breach  
Decided watching grass grow was more enjoyable than watching Brexit(Pic @justin_ng) 
No Deal Brexit, is the path to cheaper food and clothing for the real people of this country.  
I propose holding another referendum with the following question: should the UK remain a member of the European Union or leave the European Union and get a unicorn per person? Or did we already do that? 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,971,394. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Brexit Minister Kwasi Kwarteng says if indicative votes were to take place on Brexit it would be "surprising" if Conservative MPs were not given free votes to allow them to vote according to their personal views rather than follow Government policy 
"I passionately hate everything that Brexit stands for: music is all about encouraging people from different backgrounds and different countries to work together, encouraging international understanding." We speak to Simon Halsey about music and more:  
BMW: We'll produce electric Minis in UK even after No Deal Brexit. Tariffs ‘won’t change business model’, expect any supply chain disruption to normalise within six weeks.  
I missed that bit in the Referendum when Vote Leave argued for No Deal and going onto WTO terms and leaving the single market and letting the EU build a wall at the Northern Irish border...Apparently that's what everyone knew 'leave' meantDoes anyone have any video clips? 
My latest statement on Brexit and invitation to march with me at the @peoplesvote_hq march tomorrow. The Prime Minister has forced us into this position it could have been so different 
I don't remember 'Labour Brexit' being an option on the ballot. Only 'IN' or 'OUT'  
So as there is now the possibility of a #Brexit extension and we may need to participate in #eu elections, I’m thinking of standing as an MEP.   My slogan will be “Vote Loabi as Golden Retrievers will sort it all out and bring you socks too”What do you think? ⁦@Peston⁩ 
No matter how you voted, I’m sure you’ll agree - #Brexit is a complete and utter mess.  Enough is enough. I’ll be marching tomorrow - with people from every corner of our country, to demand that the British people get the final say. #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople  
#Romania is one of the #EU countries with the greatest potential in the field of digital transformation of our societies. Great work #RO2019EU!#EU #StrongerTogether #Brexit #EUCO #AFP 
Brexit and travelI haven't yet updated the passport/driving licence/health/insurance/roaming/pets briefings; in theory the UK still leaves in a week's timeBut if "no-deal weekend" moves to four weeks today, some implications for people on Easter holidays 
Order! Order! Commons Speaker lifts the lid on Brexit at the University of Birmingham  via @unibirmingham @news_ub 
Emmanuel Macron told his counterparts that he thought there was a 10% chance of Theresa May's deal passing in Parliament.Then after hearing from May he decided it was 5% 
Remoaners, look away now! Production chief Oliver Zipse confirmed that No Deal Brexit "won't change Mini's business model”. Production will remain in Britain. ‍ Support us at  
Lots of people in the last 24 hours have said things to me like: there was a referendum, Britain wants to leave, deal with it. Maybe I'm not very intelligent and I don't 'get it', but this is how I see it:We were lied to. That makes the original vote invalid.#RevokeArt50Now 
.@TheLastLeg #IsItOK we're happy Brexit isn't happening on Friday? It's #WearAHatDay! Thousands are raising money to find a cure for brain tumours & they would steal our thunder! Just 1% of the national spend on cancer research has been allocated to this devastating disease. 
NEW @DianaJohnsonMP: MPs will continue to do what we think is right on Brexit – whatever threats come our way  
I am a British person and "brexit" is against all of my interests, values and morals. You have completely ignored more than 1/2 the population in your selfish pursuit of a form of Brexit noone voted for, bringing the country to the brink.#RevokeArticle50 
I’ll be there. Marching and speaking out for the NHS . For the 1 million patients we treat *every* day - and whose quality of care Brexit threatens. Why will you be there?  
Minister unable to say if the statutory instrument changing Brexit day will be published on Monday. Experts believe Monday is the last day to get it through on time. 
Middle England update. Sophie and Ian went to the hospital yesterday, the doctors did some scans, and it now looks as though their beautiful Brexit baby might be a couple of weeks late. 
Farage's new Brexit Party threatens the EU parliament as well as the Conservative party.Wake up you Tory Remainers, you are killing your own party!  
It’s not too late to stop Brexit. Saturday’s march will force politicians to hear us | Lara Spirit  
But in case of Britain, the history of Empire (and its end) has not only not been confronted but instead a kind of imperial nostalgia nurtured and stoked. And this collective delusion has crashed against reality in a rather spectacular way with the Brexit project. 
May has one thing right. Trying to deliver a softer Brexit will break her party. That wouldn’t matter except they are in office & it is hard to see how you enact a policy of this magnitude against wishes of govt of the day. Cannot see how a new policy does not lead to an election 
The top 100 countries contributing to the current total of 2,940,431 signatures in this #RevokeArt50Now Brexit petition.197 different countries in total.Very helpful having the json data available there., 
Guffaws as Andrew Slaughter Labour seeks clarity from Brexit minister Kwasi Kwarteng on next steps. "I'm tempted to ask what he had for breakfast today because it might be a question he can answer...." 
The Journey South with Captain Farage. Nigel's diary of the great March to Leave which will warm the hearts of every English ham. #MarchToLeave #Brexit #Satire via @wordpressdotcom 
PM cannot see the people behind the petition so it's time to march #RevokeA50 #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit @peoplesvote_ukPetition to cancel Brexit altogether hits 2.5m signatures and rising  
The petition to cancel Brexit has now reached over 2.5m signatures.The fact that people are signing this from all over the world tells you how important an issue it is.It’s time to LISTEN to the voice of the people and respect their views.#RevokeArt50Now #RevokeArticle50 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,940,431. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Have you seen the front cover of the @standardnews. Tomorrow we are marching to put an end to this impasse in Parliament and demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. Be there. #PutItToThePeople:  
Nearly 3 million people have signed this now. That is incredible. And my wife who hates Brexit hasn’t done it yet, so there’s at least one more to go  
Kwasi Kwarteng has been sent out again to do battle with the Brexit dragons in the Commons. No need for a detailed commentary - a summary follows:Can the minister confirm ...?Er, dunno. 
Brexit Outcome Probabilities:People's Vote: 33% (+8)General Election: 19% (-6)No Deal: 17% (-7)Soft Brexit / Long Delay: 16% (New)Revoke A50: 14% (+2)Mays Deal: 2% (=)Via @jonworth.Changes w/ Yesterday. 
MP @Anna_Soubry ‘can't go home’ because of death threats over Brexit. These threats of violence have been whipped up by the #Brexit press & politicians including May. This is state-incited terrorism. Brexit must be stopped. #RevokeArticle50 
Kwarteng, Brexit minister, just told the Commons that any indicative votes put forward by the govt would be free votes. 
The government minister just said if we have indicative votes on the options for Brexit it will be a free vote. Anyone want to take the bet that won’t be the case by midday? There’s some very agitated looking whips here.... #brexithaos 
Ok... I can’t watch the news, or read any more about Brexit. I need my mental health in tact for my children and myself. Today I will be mostly pottering, cooking and doing yoga.Have a wonderful day everyone. 
The referendum was not won or lost on facts. It was lost because Britain’s press and political class nurtured xenophobia. But that racism, xenophobia, hatred of the outsider was always here. At the heart of UK. 
Investor confidence soars to 10-month high despite Brexit uncertainty #DespiteBrexit #uk #brexit #FridayMotivation 
Just asked the Brexit ministers that if parliament votes to make decisions, will the government honour the will of the House. Apparently that’s too difficult a question for Kwasi Kwarteng... #brexithaos 
#Brexit slogans update2016Sunlit uplandsTake back controlHave your cake and eat it2017Strong and stableBrexit means BrexitCrush the saboteurs2018The will of the peopleNo deal is better than a bad dealLet's get on with it2019...We had worse humiliations  
LEAVE: Public opinion has shifted in favour of No Deal Brexit, poll finds. 7-point lead over delay/second referendum. The country wants out!  
Seeing folks share reasons why UK should #RevokeArticle50 and stop Brexit. Most of them are sound, based in facts, informed. I fear that they ignore the very ugliness the 2016 referendum and Leave campaigns channelled: racism, xenophobia, hatred of anyone considered ‘immigrant’ 
I’ll be in the Oxford contingent, London, Sat.  All indications suggest this march will be EVEN bigger than last timeLeavers, if you think The People want Brexit you’ve nothing to fear from People’s Vote. Between Remain & No-Deal-or-a-deal-if-one-emerges 
Brexit Explained  
1/4: French State violence...Brexit meltdown...'populism'...Israeli expansionism...Venezuela coup...demonization of Iran...new Cold War with Russia. This is not a collection of unrelated events. We are witnessing the systemic collapse of a 'global order' that's rotten to the core 
Urgent Question here in the House of Commons on Brexit and there is not a single MP here from any of the SNP, the LibDems, TIG or the Green MP. 
DUMBO BREXIT? - #ColinFarrell and #DannyDeVito share their views about #Brexit at the European premiere of  in London. 
Brexit: Macron revised chances of May winning vote to just 5% after hearing her at summit – Politics live  
other main issue for ERG is jurisdiction EU law - but it is not directly from European Court of Justice, its from intermediate court, also in Lux called the EFTA court - I visited a few weeks after referendum, when EEA still in play, before the red line:  
The European Council extends Brexit, with strings attached  
“It’s got fraud written all over it” Exclusive detail on customs requirements for goods coming into the UK post Brexit from C4 News business editor @siobhankennedy4 
Omg @MichelBarnier is doing a thinktank event on #Brexit ON MY BIRTHDAY   
Tory Brexiteer Sir Edward Leigh says Theresa May should resign rather than pursue a long Brexit delay with European elections 
How the one reporter at the BBC is “trying” to make the corporation aware that public opinion on Brexit has shifted.  
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,918,806. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Over 1 in 10 people reported that #Brexit had caused them problems with sleeping in the last year and almost two in 10 said it had caused them 'high levels of stress':  
Ha ha ha ... Article 50's author says that the revocation of Article 50 "isn't politically doable" without a general election or referendum.  
SKY NEWS BREAKINGSky News can reveal the armed forces have activated a team in a nuclear bunker beneath the Ministry of Defence to step up preparations for a 'no-deal' Brexit. UK VERSUS U.K. ? 
If Brexiters had been united on a realistic and practical version of #Brexit we would be leaving on March 29th. The fact that we are not is because the Brexiters are a squabbling deluded rabble united only by their loathing of each other's versions of Brexit.#RevokeArticle50 
To anyone who's planning to see the show in Cheltenham tonight: please plan ahead if you're driving! There's a  motorway blockade at 5:30 on the M5 in protest of Brexit. Allow extra time please to get to Cheltenham in time! Please share, details here:  
James O'Brien perfectly summed up his feelings on Brexit:Contempt for the conmen.Compassion for the conned.@mrjamesob | #Brexit 
The idea that we have "political chaos" over Brexit is ludicrous.What we have is a Parliament plainly refusing to implement the will of the British people. What we have is a pro-EU media spinning for all it is worth. In short, what we have is betrayal and it will not end. 
It's time to put a stop to #Brexit. It's wasted at least £4billion so far.  Sign up today, march tomorrow! 
Brexit debate kicks off in the Commons as @mtpennycook slams May's "divisive" No10 speech against MPs. “It is her intransigence, her pandering to the hardliners in her party, and her refusal to compromise that has brought us to this point.” 
"She says to people who are pro-Europeans, it's either my deal or no deal. She says to Brexiteers, it's either my deal or no Brexit."Ken Clarke says Theresa May doesn't have "any more idea than we do of where we go if her further attempts to get her deal through collapse".  
Brexit this week Theresa May wants another vote on her dealThe speaker of the House of Commons is becoming internationally famous.Oh, and Brexit's been delayedHaving trouble keeping up? This might help...  
Why do I think we should revoke Art 50?- The leave campaign lied to it’s supporters and the referendum was held on a false prospectus- The referendum was advisory but treated as binding- The result is not “the will of the people”, it is the will of less than 40% of electors > 
Can you please point out to Uk MSM that us British Citizens  who live abroad are allowed to sign , hence over 10k of us Brits who live legally in France have signed selecting France/Our French Postcodes. Many live in other EU countries & the RoW. Brexit affects us too. 
She called me and my husband 'Citizens of Nowhere'. She set her attack dogs on EU nationals in the UK. She persecuted British citizens of colour. @Theresa_may is a hateful, lying despot. I have no sympathy. She needs to go, and go NOW. 
Jacob, stop lying, this is Minford's discredited ramblings and you know it. We benefit from over 70 FTA's through our membership, you're talking rubbish. 
May's Withdrawal Agreement will definitely not pass.A WTO World Trade Brexit is by far least worst option.It ends uncertainty most quickly.It delivers UK from #EU lawmakers & judges.It gives £20 Billion #Brexit dividend.It fulfils Govt obligation to honour Referendum Result.  
"Brexit cannot be a distraction from the challenges facing our adult social care services which millions rely on every day." Happy to unite with @Car_Abrahams, @ProfMartinGreen & @LGAcomms in @Telegraph today to #fixdementiacare. Social care needs addressing *now*. #FutureofASC 
Calling it now. The Faux-fighting between May and MP’s, the delay, etc. is headed just one place. Repeal of the #BRExit vote. As w the gun ban in NZ, international globalists are demonstrating how to win, and it will come here to the US. Scary stuff.  
Scottish Tory MP Kirstene Hair just talked about in the chamber who should get a vote in the next Scottish Independence referendum.  Odd given Tories keep saying there won't be another indyref, are Tories coming to the realisation that there is indeed support for #indyref2? 
10 years since #jadegoody died. She'd definitely have done Strictly, maybe Dancing on Ice. I wonder if she'd be on @loosewomen panel yet? She would have been a millionaire with a chain of salons and defo done a Goody guide to #Brexit. I miss her. Get your smear. 
BREXIT: Ministers threaten walk-out unless PM allows votes on alternative deal /#EU #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
.@BoundaryBrewing & @YellowBellyBeer. Together again.We're heading to #Belfast next Friday for a #Brexit / #Extension session at the Boundary Taproom from 4pm - 11pm. Loads of beer, lots of love. Think this calls for an update of our 2017 platinum record, 'Co-perative of Love'. 
Lesson 3 of Eric Cantona's Brexit Survival Guide is especially for European footballers... #BrexitBunker 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,895,243. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Reporters track down the latest signatories to the #RevokeArticle50Petition somewhere on the Brazil/Peru border. "Nobody voted to be poorer", they said, "but Russian bots won Brexit".  
You may have heard of this thing called Brexit, the UK's version of Trump's border wall? We made @NYETfilm, a film starring Olivia Williams in response to it. Call it a Brexit UK Border Farce if you will. It's only 11 mins long and we'd love to spread it.  
"There can’t now be many in the country who think that Brexit hasn’t been a car-crash and a national humiliation" says Green Co-leader @jon_bartley. Agree? Join the #PutItToThePeople march this Saturday! 
I pretty much ENTIRELY blame the media and journalists for Brexit. Even those hacks who didn't openly lie to further their proprietors political ends, for not calling their colleagues out on this rancid  manipulation. Here's why Brexit happened:  
Brexit latest: UK heading for extra time, with a high chance of penalties and sudden death. 
Support for No Deal Brexit has increased, now has 7-point lead over delay and second referendum. 68% of Labour Leave voters now want No Deal. @BrendanChilton @mattzarb 
I really think the people who have signed the petition think if A50 is revoked everything will just rewind to pre ref times. It's never going to be the same. This whole thing has unleashed something that stopping Brexit won't solve. 
Now #Brexit isn't happening next Friday, what will you be doing? Mowing the lawn? Finally putting up those curtains? Sorting out your Tupperware drawer? Tweet us and let us know. #TheLastLeg 
Hard Brexit is ‘step closer’ if British parliament rejects deal again – Austria’s KurzInternet: Britain trying to exit EU be like... 
'Young people are too thick to be allowed to vote on their futures' they say, but then how do you explain this 16 year old talking far more sense about Brexit than you hear from most adults (on either side of the debate)? 
Brexit and live exports: while the UK parliament has been in deadlock, the European Parliament has actually been taking action #StopTheTrucks 
BBC BIAS AGAINST BREXIT IN THE SPOTLIGHT1) Why so few audience Brexiteers in the first place? A tiny minority, pitifully underrepresented.2) Why did Fiona Bruce feel the need to insult the support for a WTO Brexit with her clapping comment?3) Only 1 in 5 panelists a Leaver.  
Just a reminder that even if we get through the current impasse the real #Brexit negotiations are still to come and that the next phase is even more difficult  
Owen Smith - #Brexit in all forms will destroy jobs & opportunities for generations to come. Brexit is an introverted timorous process that will see Britain become a smaller & less prosperous country. This is why I'll be at the #PutItToThePeople march tomorrow.#RevokeArticle50 
It's what you've been waiting for since the #EUCO agreement on #Brexit! Yes, it's V21 of the diagram!  Major changes here No Deal 17% May's Deal 2% General Election 19% Softer Brexit / Long Delay 16% #PeoplesVote 33% Rescind 14%  
A snapshot from inside the Brexit talks captures the future of Anglo-European relations. Some thoughts on my (new) blog about *that* photo:  
16-year-olds just don't seem to have been taught sufficiently understand democracy. Guess what, kid... I didn't get a say in the 1975 referendum. Nor at any of the points there could have been a referendum on the treaties was I asked. Why does the BBC indulge this juvenile BS?  
If there is to be any respect whatsoever for our system of representative democracy it has to follow through on delivering Brexit:  
Birmingham Yardley MP @jessphillips will be on stage tomorrow at the #PutItToThePeople March to demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
Does the Cabinet have the courage to deliver a meaningful Brexit - or do they prefer to undermine and overturn the democratic decision of 17.4 million people?  
JC's comments about revokation of Art 50 have been blown up.A spokesperson said: “As we have always said, we respect the result of the referendum and will do whatever is necessary to prevent a no-deal outcome. We do not believe that revoking article 50 is in any way necessary.” 
Can we get this wonderful, articulate & eloquent young woman in charge of the Brexit negotiations as quickly as possible please. This is the true voice of reason we should be listening to not the incomprehensible ravings an utterly delusional Theresa May  
I’m not. I didn’t. 99.9% of my tweets have been about the recklessness of UKGov over Brexit and my deep concern for vulnerable citizens. But this from Mr Better Together shows that Labour are still obsessed with attacking anyone who supports Scottish Indy.  
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,866,811. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
#DominicRaab is absolutely correct I have said the same since we won, James O'Brien has been one, if not the best recruiting sgt for #Brexit. Please retweet so the sneering prat sees it because this reality is clearly a difficult thing for him to swallow. #LBC #OBINGO 
Tell me again why 16 year olds don’t have the right to vote? #Brexit  
Graham Brady has informed Theresa May this week that backbench Conservative MPs want her gone over her Brexit failings. The @Telegraph also reports the party has a cash crisis with "donors holding back donations due to the lack of unity".Top work, @BrandonLewis  
Farage desperate to deflect attention away from his own protest, the march of the absurd, which his organisation are having to employ people to make the number appear over 100 - he's a right shyster and the BBC love him. 
Leadership hiding in a nuclear bunker is a normal necessary step when enacting any good government policy. Hard Brexit Consequences:—Shortages of food and critical medicines.—Frozen financial markets.—Industrial work lay offs.—3,500 troops to respond to food rioting.  
More Britons to back no-deal Brexit after EU delay offer: Farage  
I've been out in Blyth this morning, speaking to the constituents of MP Ronnie Campbell.They want their say on the Brexit deal we just spent two years negotiating.Please let them have it. #PutItToThePeople 
This will pass 3 million signatures to revoke article 50 this morning. 50K votes in a half hour.What do we want?We want to stop Brexit.When do we want it?Next couple of weeks would be good. Ta.  
Labour’s most senior representatives at tomorrow’s march for a second referendum are likely to be two backbenchers  
The European Council extends Brexit, with strings attached  
If there is a second referendum, Remain should pledge to invest the money that will be saved in areas that originally voted leave 
The EU27 will have one more quick chat about #Brexit at their summit today. It's to approve the official legal decision to extend the Article 50 process which is currently being drafted by the lawyers. 
My husband, who is not politically minded at all, not as forthright as I am, but hates brexit as much as many of us...is taking his phone around his office of a couple hundred people, asking them if they voted for this chaos and would they like to sign the petition  #myhero 
If you actually think that the establishment are going to let us leave in a way that makes any of that possible, you are very naive. It's never going to end. If it does end, it'll end with us leaving in a way that results in us losing any of the benefits we could get from Brexit. 
John is correct. May must go. It's that simple. The dynamic would alter with a pro Brexit PM and a pro Brexit cabinet.  
My brain is melting with all this "brexit" stuff and making me feel quite ill ..yes i signed ..and now she is "Dismissing" it ..so today is just #FlowerFriday 
A petition is about to break three million people who want Brexit to be cancelled. Fastest growing petition in UK history. And they couldn't find one person to represent that view? 
One moment here which I was thought was quite striking: When we were talking about slogans etc to win a second referendum. 
#Brexit is not bad for everyone!Mr Ritchie at #Deutsche will receive  €250k monthly until November 2020 for dealing with Brexit. (Source : Deutsche Annual report just out) 
To all those who say 'I just want it to be settled',  #RevokeArt50Now, anything else, any kind of Brexit, will give us years or decades of tedious negotiation and compromise. If you want a swift end to all this so we can get back to real issues like the NHS, then choose Revoke. 
Sad state we're in. #MarchToLeave abandoned by Leave Leaders & march now down to just 15 people#RevokeArticle50 petition on track for 3 million and a huge rally in London, 1 Million?Yet, Tories still promoting No Deal Brexit as a valid option.It's not.  
European Union leaders have reached a deal on British Prime Minister Theresa May's request for a Brexit delay.  
Who are the people the Conservatives are selecting in their target seats, and what do they think about Brexit and Theresa May? Very useful and through by @EleniCourea: 
In other words the UK is broken for the foreseeable future. Brexit will dominate whether we leave or not. I understand if England stays in EU then its easier for an independent Scotland because of no hard border but i would rather have that than more of this madness.  
As Mayor of London, I’m clear we need to revoke Article 50 and end this Brexit disaster | @SadiqKhan 
Broke: TM is a terrible Prime Minister with no Brexit strategyWoke: she made a final attempt to put no deal back on the table to win over Labour MPs but she misjudged her messageBespoke: she has brilliantly made the inevitable longer extension Parliament's responsibility 
Let’s face it: Brexit had become a mental health crisis for all sides. What EU did last night was to buy some time in quarantine. For them 
Again:  The UK specifically agreed to a backstop in the event of No Deal more than a year ago.A No Deal Brexit means there is a backstop.Unless the UK breaks its commitment (which would not be very bright given they need to negotiate a trade deal).  
Tacitus is on cracking form today. Here he is again on the British."Now they are distracted between the warring factions of rival chiefs. Indeed nothing has helped us more in fighting against their very powerful nations than their inability to cooperate"#brexit 
You being shown up for the massive splash of pavement pizza that you are, is the only possible upside to #Brexit that I'm currently anticipating.  
If I was to deliberately endanger someone's life by restricting or stopping their access to the meds keeping them healthy/alive, I'd be a sick evil bastard undoubtably breaking a number of laws. BUT if I do it to MILLIONS of ppl, I'm simply 'the PM 'delivering' #Brexit'. Hmmm  
The Stark Realities and Legalities of #Brexit so Eloquently put by Elsbeth @snb19692#NoBorders #NoBrexit, Just Peace. #RevokeArticle50 @sabaitir1@Peter68328517 @rtenews @IrishTimes @leinsleadernews @peoplesvote_uk @peoplesvote_hq @theresa_may 
Seriously, if we’re thinking of our international reputation, blindly and stubbornly pursuing something that *everyone knows* is hugely self-destructive isn’t the best way to improve it.And yes, I know Trump etc *say* Brexit is good..... but that rather makes the point. 
A #Brexit based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesForeign InterferenceDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o ConsentThe Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the Ppl #RevokeArticle50 #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal & #Reform the UK 
Fascinating @RemainiacsCast with Tony Blair, discussing why Brexit happens, how he would fight a referendum:  
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,833,656. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Do folk think that the "dark money" that bought Brexit wasn't around just two years prior, for a vote that would have removed billions of pounds worth of Scottish assets away from grasping british hands? They'd have to be incredible naive. If it didn't matter then, why now? 
Will you be joining us tomorrow on the People’s Vote March? Our chair @CNagpaul will be speaking on why #Brexit is bad for health, bad for patients and bad for the #NHS. If you’d like to join us, meet at the junction of Park Lane and Curzon Gate, 11.30am 
On Wednesday, @theresa_may said the public is sick of Brexit. She was right. She also said we didn't want a people's vote. Let's show her she's wrong #PutitothePeopleMarch 
This video says a lot about Jeremy Corbyn’s character.Before heading off into important Brexit talks in Brussels he stopped and greeted a group of people waiting outside.He cares about people and wants to listen to us.  
Brexit’s getting all the attention, but next week’s vote on the #CopyrightDirective will seriously impact UK #freespeech online. Our MEPs have the numbers to stop #Article13 (now #Article17). Please write to yours today! #censorship 
@catherinemep  EU are open to revoking A50 or Ref, It wud give us time to decide. For me, #PeoplesVote is obvious way of doing that. #Brexit  
Recession is mostly created by expectations of Brexit. But I am afraid to say recession will be nowhere near as bad as the car crash awaiting the U.K. economy. Stay and change the EU for the better instead of mocking it. And by the way: It’s much more than just about money. 
Germany’s Spiegel magazine tries -a bit tongue-in-cheek- to clarify the ongoing non-clarity of where #Brexit is heading for its bamboozled readers  
Am I in a minority that thinks hey we’ve made our bed with the vote on Brexit now how about we get on with making the best of it. If a mistake has been made take it on the chin and move on  
As Mayor of London, I’m clear we need to revoke Article 50 and end this Brexit disaster | @SadiqKhan 
The people of Northern Ireland have a choice under the Good Friday Agreement to be Irish or British or bothThis is supposed to be a free choice with no negative impactHowever, with Brexit, it's clear that we have no choice at all #WeAreIrishtoo #Brexit  
The Brexit vote was largest mandate given by UK public in terms of # of votes cast for anything in history of UK92% of votes cast in 2017 general election were for a political party that acknowledged outcome of Brexit vote in their manifesto498 MPs voted for Article 50 
Dear John #Bercow..Mr Speaker...you have already ruled that a #Brexit unchanged or substantially unchanged may not be tabled.May's Deal IS UNCHANGEDAll that's changed is a Timetable.Reject Her Deal offer the chance of an amendable HoC vote to table the Deal + Amendments 
It's remainers not accepting the result of a democratic vote and Gov attempting to overturn it that's causing immense damage to this country, not us leaving the EURather than get on with it they've created a political cataclysmThey'd rather us burn than honour the referendum 
People are not so much sick & tired of Brexit - they are sick & tired of politicians going back on their word & refusing to deliver Brexit. If the referendum & democracy mean anything the W.A. should be rejected & we should leave on WTO terms. #Brexitbetrayal 
Brexit is a con. The referendum was proven corrupt. Key players referred to Police & National Crime Agency. If you cheated in an exam or a race, you’d be disqualified. Brexit needs to be stopped. #RevokeArticle50Petition #RevokeArt50Now #peoplesvote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Can't we just accept that some people are evil bastards? Not everybody who does bad things does so because of 'mental illness' - that's a cop-out and feeds into this age of nobody being responsible for their own actions. EVIL exists - and it's in charge right now. #Brexit #Trump 
Register to vote for #EUelections2019 and use your vote! #Brexit can be all-consuming, but don't forget to take part in democracy! #TellEUrfriend 
I am keen to talk to psychologists/ general public about how brexit has affected your mental health. Email me: sarah.marsh@theguardian.com 
My rare thoughts on Brexit as a neutral. Both campaigns told huge fibs. How did anyone think Brexit was going to be best negotiated by a Remainer? A lot of our MPs have been shown up as self serving and not constituency serving! A lot of people claim to know the future  
By distorting political reality in favour of Theresa May's bankrupt Brexit strategy, the Tory press share responsibility for the crisis that has enveloped Britain  
Remember folks, what @NickBoles and @YvetteCooperMP will try to do next week does NOT respect the Brexit vote. What they call Norway Plus means we STAY & PAY but have NO SAY. RT to tell them to #StandUp4Brexit or resign. 
Significance of result in a strong lab seat is huge. Ind candidate is ex @UKIP who left after Paul Nuttall debacle. Add the ukip 12% support to the Ind 40.3% & you start to see the anger in Brexit areas. Be warned, we must leave on 29th!! @Nigel_Farage @Conservatives @UKLabour 
It appears that the EU are now running parliament,brexit & the UK as a wholeOur sovereignty has been handed over to the corrupt EU by our own governments,not even the queen has any say in matters anymore,we are now ruled by a corrupt dictatorship. 
For Brits across the globe, this debate is a very important one. We need our vote back so we can have a say in future decisions like the referendum. Brits in EU27 have lived in limbo for over 1000 days yet most of us had no say and will end up with no vote anywhere after Brexit.  
The reviews are in! “Brexit will mark the end of Britain’s role as a great power” - The Washington Post 
Nigel Farage to Stand as Brexit Party Leader After May Brexit Betrayal  
And you're one of the main root causes of that humiliation, as the inquiry will show. 
The EU has agreed to delay Brexit. They are all TRAITORS!!! Next general election or a by-election do not vote for the same odd person like labour or conservatives or that’s a vote wasted on people who do not actually Care about you. We need change messge to gov all of you resign 
Luxembourg's PM Xavier Bettel says 'the best possible outcome would be a new referendum and to stay'. He puts the chances of the current Brexit deal eventually passing at 50/50. He adds the EU 'can't do more' and 'it is the best possible deal for the UK and for Europe'. 
Anyone else fed up with Labour using warm words to dupe Remainers, then seeing statements like this? Labour are a Brexit party now. Vote #StopBrexit. 
The petition to stop Brexit has exposed the lies of the People’s Vote lobby.For months and months they said they just wanted voters to have a say on the final deal.Now we know that really they want to block Brexit entirely.What a bunch of charlatans. pic.twitter.com/Xe2IayADYe 
BMW confirm they’ll start production of electric Mini in UK this year even after No Deal Brexit. They anticipate just-in-time supply chains to normalise within six weeks and tariffs ‘won’t change Mini’s business model’.  
Danish PM Rasmussen: 'We left them with opportunity to rethink the whole thing. So what we made gives UK best opportunities to decide their own destiny. if they don't want a hard Brexit & want to redefine their own red lines & negotiate a whole new package that's a possibility.' 
“Henry VIII’s break with Rome was the First Brexit. We should follow his lead: instead of playing Rome’s game, he rejected the validity of Rome’s power entirely.”David Starkey on the historical importance of Brexit 
Brexit is 517 hours away. #brexit 
Brexit comes with risks, but so do many things in life. It’s a choice the UK opted to back in the largest exercise in direct democracy in its history. We must respect the judgment the voters made & leave in the near term future -the electorate is fully free to opt to rejoin 22/22 
The reason I want to avoid a 2nd referendum is because I believe it would divide this country even more deeply, stir up violence, and even if Leave won it still wouldn’t stop attempts for a 3rd referendum. We need to get on with delivering Brexit & see where the chips fall 21/22 
They also assume that anyone - Leaver or Remainer in 2016 - who opposes a second referendum is afraid of a walloping majority for Remain. Far from being frit - I think the result would be an even bigger mandate to Leave if it was fought on straight Remain or Leave terms. 20/22 
Petition to stay in the EU signed by 2.8m people so far. Theresa May should never have adopted the "will of the people" propaganda for such a narrow referendum majority.  
The hourly Brexit countdown clock has just...  
#Brexit It’s all kicking off. Quite a few people calling @LBC saying we should just leave with no deal. 
Things we know.Brexit will NOT happen on the 29th March.Theresa May has failed to deliver on her solemn assurancesWestminster wants to ensure we never Leave.Now, what are WE going to do about it? 
Brexit: Macron revised chances of May winning vote to just 5% after hearing her at summit – Politics live  
This is EU minus - EU membership with no say. It is not Brexit & is a terrible alternative  
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,783,605. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
The British Ministry of Defence has put 3,500 troops on standby to “aid contingency plans” for a no-deal Brexit, a spokesman told CNN  
Oh dear @AdamBoultonSky you let Nigel Farage say this is a 'betrayal of democracy' you laughed along with his joke about his Brexit party's money being from 'UK registered' sources but you didn't mention Leave EU's £9m criminal overspending referred to the National Crime Agency. 
What I think...1) MV3 voted down/refused by speaker2) Vote of #NoConfidence, disaffected Tories vote with Labour and SNP3) #GeneralElection(I expect a Tory leadership contest in there somewhere)4) Labour negotiate Brexit and leave EU on better terms. 
Remember, when it all goes tits up in the event of a no deal Brexit, that it was irresponsible cretins like this, who will remain utterly unaffected by the fallout, who pushed it hardest.  
As the petition to #RevokeA50 surges to 3m, who does @BBCr4today invite on and spend the morning tweeting about?No, not a Remainer.Farage.Here he is with the editor of #R4today just after the referendum.Stop this shambles. Sign and RT the petition: 
How can anyone still believe Corbyn will solve Brexit? He couldn’t solve the activity sheet on the back of a Little Chef kids’ menu 
How MPs plan to take control of Brexit:* Letwin amendment enables backbenchers to take control of Parliamentary business* MPs vote on it on Monday. Expect almighty row as Remain ministers demand free vote* Indicative votes Weds - Common Market 2.0, 2nd ref, CU among motions 
They have done something much more important, they have listened and heard what we said at Uluru and they are following the sequence, 1. Voice, 2. Treaty, 3. Truth by backing a referendum to change the Australian Constitution to enshrine a Voice to Parliament @RomillyMadew 
If you enjoyed austerity Britain you're going to *love* Brexit Britain. All the same social problems,  many getting worse -- plus a few new ones -- and MUCH less tax revenue to spend on tackling them.Oh, and blue passports. 
I'd much rather referendum for voters to say if they still thought #Brexit was right choice, having more facts than in 2016. Time too short, next best is clean #RevokeArticle50 . Let MPs take responsibility, in natl interest. Voters can vote them out in next GE if they disagree. 
PS I am reliably informed that May has in fact skipped the EEA meeting to return home to work on her Brexit plan, which is almost good enough for an Aesop fable 
I Do Not Want Civil War Or Civil Rebellion Of Any Form.But I Plead To The Politicians To Please Resolve This Crisis & Respect The Result Of The Referendum & Deliver Brexit.For The Sake Of Our Nation, Please Do Not Let Us Sink In To The Hell Of A Civil War. 
@Andrew_Adonis - We shud scrap A50, pause for breathe, and right thing then would b for parly to call a referendum. #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
If I was PM, here's what I'd do- Announce No Deal Brexit, with a 20% tax hike for Leave voters, as it's what they wanted- Set up mandatory census where everyone reports if they voted leave or remain, to ensure right people are taxed- See how 'will of the people' looks then 
This is genuinely extraordinary - please keep on signing!  #Brexit #RevokeA50petition 
I do not usually comment or tweet on political matters. However Brexit (in particular no deal Brexit) looks to have deeply troubling implications for the healthcare of children in the UK. There are many paediatricians who feel likewise. I have signed this petition  
New post: Labour’s Brexit stance was a tragedy for Labour but not for the country. Brexit is an entirely Tory failure.  
On the summit: a message from EU direct to MPs and it says 'if you want a different Brexit situation send a different Prime Minister'  
If anyone wasn’t sated by May’s Brexit humiliation last night, this morning she must sit through... ...a celebration marking 25 years of the EEA.You just can’t make this shit up anymore 
If enough people do this we don’t need another referendum. Parliament will take the hint... the will of the people and all that.  
"£1,000,000,000,000 of assets shifted from London to EU ahead of no-deal Brexit" No that's not a joke. Put on your best Dr Evil voice, because "one trillllllion pounds" really went marching out the door. Oh, and all the tax we used to collect on the money!  
16-year-old on Question Time perfectly sums up why the Tories are to blame for Brexit  
The EU throws Theresa May one last Brexit lifeline | Analysis by @lukemcgee  
"The human story of those 1,000 days saw EU citizens become the voiceless targets of hate during the EU referendum campaign and remain so afterwards." Powerful writing from @cliodiaspora #migrantvoices #AlreadyNotFine #InLimbo 
Andrew Adonis on #SkyNews this morning: He wants to "scrap Article50, pause for breath and then call a referendum". And on Farage's claim that the #RevokeArticle50 petition is full of Russian names, he said "Nigel Farage is an expert in Russian bots". I can't argue with that! 
Can we borrow her first to sort out Brexit?  
Ffs It’s like a network long-runner:- Drop a bombshell & shake everything to shit- Turns out everyone is lying- Lead characters all leave- Try hopelessly to clean up the mess- Drop in a new lead no-one likes - Drag it on until no-one knows wtf is going on- Cancel#Brexit 
Just a friendly reminder that @Nigel_Farage is so sure about #brexit he has gotten his children German citizenship. So when we all leave the EU he will not. 
A petition calling for Theresa May to cancel Brexit by revoking Article 50 has passed two million signatures.Parliament's petitions committee tweeted that the rate of signatures was "the highest the site has ever had to deal with", after the website crashed.  
If we leave, every EU summit will be a group of people in a room making decisions about us without us. That’s still true with a hard-no-deal Brexit: the EU is a trade & regulatory superpower 22 miles from Kent.So outside the EU is an *inherently unstable* position for the UK. 
SECOND POLL: If a General Election was held 2019, how would you vote ? Please vote and RT for wider audience #Marr #Ridge #GE2019nb Brexit Alliance = Brexit Party UKIP ForBritain Sov TimeParty Vets SDP 
Being an American living in the UK during the era of Brexit shambles and Trumpian scandal is a depressing spectacle of watching two of the world’s great powers embarrass themselves every day as they jockey for position of which one is a bigger mess. 
Nigel Farage says he would be "very happy to take no future part in politics" if there was a no-deal Brexit.Read more about the two-tier extension to Aricle 50 here:  
EU27 leaders set 2 new dates. If May Deal passed by Commons next week Brexit Day is May 22, to give time to pass necessary legislation. If it doesn’t, UK will have til April 12 to come up with new departure plan — a long Article 50 extension and EU elections — or go to no deal. 
Momentum is building, nearly 3 million people have already signed the petition to revoke article 50 and allow the UK to stay within the EU. There isn't a form of Brexit that will be to our betterment, sign the petition today and let us end this madness  
Wonder how quickly the "this is grossly unfair on the Scots" crowd would suddenly not give a shit about Scotland again if Brexit was cancelled? 
#WorldWaterDay Thames water confirms no deal brexit will affect supplies of chemicals to keep our drinking water safeRefusing to rule out no deal is not an action of a responsible, democratic gov. Not a single constituency backs May’s deal #RevokeArt50 
Nigel Farage says that if the UK takes part in European elections, he will lead his new Brexit Party. When asked who is financially backing the party, he replies "don't worry, they're all UK registered"  
This has been inevitable since the 'red lines' met the Good Friday Agreement. May was so intoxicated by abolishing free movement, she couldn't see.Newspapers were so invested in Brexit they carried on reporting the fantasy. The BBC didn't have the guts to swim against the tide. 
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 22With #Brexit extended, I'll need to find even more #BrexitCatGIFs now! This is the moment I rallied the troops to go searching for more images...it's also the moment I told them all to go sign the #RevokeArticle50Petition#RevokeArt50Now 
"There are a lot of spaces [in hell]"EU Council President Donald Tusk jokes about what might happen to UK MPs if they vote against Theresa May's #Brexit deal for a third time... [tap to expand] 
A picture tells a thousand words. Radio 4 Today editor Sarah Sands with Murdoch, Liam Fox and Farage at the infamous garden party shortly after the referendum. The picture would be insignificant were it not for #r4today acting as a mouthpiece for the proto-fascist right. 
A prominent MP can't go home over fears for her life because of her opposition to Brexit, and Westminster is carrying on like everything is normal 
Spot on from @DavidLammy “A clear majority of my colleagues in parliament know Brexit will hurt their constituents, but they still believe it serves their own narrow self-interests to allow it. They are too afraid to tell the truth.”#RevokeArt50Now 
#Brexit has created new divisions, barriers & friction in N. Ireland. Any new border across the island would be a reversal of the gains of the peace process. A #PeoplesVote between May’s deal & staying in the #EU is the best way to unite Britain so we can move forward together. 
If I was advising the @CONservatives, I’d be telling them, now, to call a General Election. They’re going to blamed for Brexit, and all its ruinous mess, for a very long time. A General Election, with @Theresa_May leading, is the only thing that might help them in the end! 
The most upbeat #Brexit story I've seen this morning.  
Welsh Assembly, (voted for by just 50.3%) is spending a great wadge of cash celebrating itself & “democracy” despite rejecting the far bigger result for Brexit in Wales. Total hypocrisy. @LeaveMnsLeave 
What voters think will be short vs long-term economic effects of #BrexitIMPACT ON ECONOMY NEXT 5 YEARSBetter 27%No difference 11%Worse 59%IMPACT ON ECONOMY NEXT 10-20 YEARSBetter 49%No difference 9%Worse 34%Ipsos-MORI March 
Me at Ugandan embassy, Paris: I was born in Uganda, please legalise my birth certificate.Ugandan official: Brexit, right? Me:...Official: Loads of Brits born in Uganda are coming in with their birth certificates, trying to become French.#Brexitredtape 
Theresa May’s kamikaze plan for her deal or no deal has failed to convince either MPs or EU Council. Time for Parliament to take back control & put all Brexit options back to the people. Rather than repeated votes by MPs let us all have a say on our country’s future #PeoplesVote 
LISTEN: 16-year-old hailed for her eloquent, wounding Brexit verdict on Question Time /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
*17.4m people vote to leave in national referendum*“Wow that shouldn’t be allowed. No one knew what they voted for”*2.5m sign online petition*“Amazing! This is clearly what the public want!!”  
You know when you think of the best joke for a political event two days late? That just happened. When Corbyn walked out of the crisis Brexit meeting cause Chuka was there, we could say he was INVOLVED BUT NOT PRESENT I’ll see myself out 
This smart young woman on #BBCQT is right about Tories putting themselves above everything but she's wrong re. fixing Brexit via General Election. A GE would likely return same composition of MPs putting us back at Square 1. Only solutions: #PutItToThePeople or #Revoke 
As I look upon the grim, desolate, depressing landscape of Eternia I can at least take some solace and reassurance in the knowledge that it still looks better than the UK will after Brexit.  
I believe Brexit should end now. It’s an emergently Fascist fever dream, a toy of the wrecker right, and a lie. But if it does, that is the beginning, not the end, of the discussion begun in 2016. /ends 
Cracking detail from @MehreenKhn and @alexebarker on Viktor Orban at the #EUCO. That's one of Britain's supposed Brexit pals by the way.  
BREAKING: Brexit found dead in Miami hotel, authorities say  
Over 2 million signatures were collected in a petition to cancel #Brexit. Here's how U.K. PM Theresa May responded  
I think perhaps we oughtn’t Brexit 
#RevokeArt50Now Come on young people ... this is what social media is for! #Brexit #Nottingham #brexitpetition 
I do think Jeremy Corbyn should go to the @peoplesvote_uk march tomorrow.Labour have come out in favour of a second referendum with remain as an option so there’s no point backtracking or half-backing it.People won’t go ‘where’s Jeremy Corbyn’ and it could win people over. 
#DoYouRememberWhen we last had a functioning government that dealt with ANYTHING other than #Brexit? I don't! 
If Brexit talks are extended, taking part in EU elections would allow us to keep a seat at the table | @LaylaMoran 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,708,727. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
It's a bit rich to see British commentators referring to Brexit as if the UK were being colonised given that, well, you know. 
Looking forward to discussing with @MichelBarnier where we go from here with #Brexit on 2 April @ @epc_eu 
Brexit, the Fyre Festival of politics - enjoy and share and come to the march tomorrow  
A no-deal Brexit will hit women the hardest, especially those who are BAME. The economy will fall drastically as a result and women will have to pay for it as we’ve seen with austerity. WE can not allow this to happen, join us at the #PutitothePeopleMarch 
And it looks like the primary legislation needed to usurp the 29th is also being completely ignored? This is no longer about Brexit it's about democracy, or should I say - the illusion of one... 
I would much prefer a softer Norway-style Brexit or no #Brexit at all. But to the MPs who intend to vote down MV3 because they are hoping for an improvement: you better have a concrete plan how to achieve this. Hope that cross-party alliances will magically appear won’t cut it! 
I will never accept Britain being under the boot of an unelected EU which at best could only last until Islam forms another caliphate and takes over Europe which is not going to be long but for now I think brexit has been taken away from us by a corrupt EU & a corrupt parliament. 
#Brexit#BrexitBETRAYAL#LeaveMeansLeave#BrexitSURRENDER#WalkAway THERESA MAYHAS SUCCEDED WHERE HITLER FAILEDSHE'S SINGLE HANDEDLY MANAGEDTO SUBJUGATE THE UKTO THE EUWE WON THE RIGHT TO LEAVE FOLKSTHAT'S ALL WE WANTNOTHING MORENOTHING LESSSIMPLES REALLY 
So, #EUref was “the largest democratic event in British history”? Er, no. Here are the facts:Turnout:1992 gen elect: 77.7%2016 EU Ref:   72.2%Tot number votes cast:1992 GE:        33,614,0742016 EU Ref: 33,577,34292 GE wins on both counts.#Brexit(H/T @anthonypainter) 
Anyone going to the march tomorrow can you help me spread my chant it’s the last lines of one of my poems. It’s a sting statement but I think it’s justified. “If Brexit goes aheadDemocracy is dead” 
Delighted to have done a slot on @BBCRadioKent on Brexit developments. Reiterated that @theresa_may isn't up to the job of negotiating any further and needs to quit. 
Really important essay by Rowan Williams, taking us beyond the symptoms of our #Brexit crisis to some of the spiritual root causes: “The sense of a shared human project needs a lot more resource from the worlds of imagination, sympathy [and] faith“  
Brilliant comment on an FT #Brexit story: "Brexit: The undefined being negotiated by the unprepared in order to get the unspecified for the uninformed.  For some reason this hasn't worked out. "- Bookworm  
LISTEN If Article 50 is extended yet again, not all Brexit parties will be cancelled. @Nigel_Farage Takes Over As Leader of the Brexit Party  
#RevokeArticle50 Petition now at 2,668,994 signatures. A reminder that the most successful Leave petition got only 373,778 signatures. It is Remain that is the real grassroots movement.  #Brexit 
Sadly, I think we now have all the evidence we need to prove beyond doubt that May is neither fit nor honest enough to deal with brexit. As millions anticipated, the date of our leaving has been put back but this time we don't know for how long because its variable. Such bullshit 
I actually feel sorry for the dons that in 50 years time are sat in their history exam and have a 24 mark question on Brexit, shit is confusing as fuck 
So #Farage gets a platform again for his nonsense. There were not even hundred ppl at his ridiculously overhyped march for Brexit. Stop it, @BBCr4today 
Sign the petition. Come to the march.Tomorrow. London. Noon. Be there. Make sure Theresa May hears your voice. Loud & clear. #RevokeArticle50Petition #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote #NotOnMySide #RevokeArt50Now #Brexit  
Really important point about approaching complex negotiations. You actually need a good team thrashing out all the issues, not a closed team and mindset.(met a management trainer yesterday, said Brexit provides endless material. Of what not to do)  
What gets under your skin most about @theresa_may? I couldn’t list them all obviously. #MayMustGo #GTTO @Conservatives @UKLabour @jeremycorbyn #Brexit 
Brexit Party MEP @Nigel_Farage says he will lead the Brexit Party into the next EU elections, if Britain takes part #r4today 
Brexit Party MEP @Nigel_Farage claims 20 million people "in spirit" will have joined his pro-leave march by the time it reaches London next week #r4today 
If No Deal Brexit happens I’m taking the day off to watch the news, for gems like this during the KFC Chicken Crisis of 2018.  
At this time of national #Brexit crisis I hope the government will be putting up @theresa_may for proper interviews soon - and members of the cabinet. 
It's like Pete and Dud in their heyday.BBC News - Brexit: Three moments that raised a smile  
As we have been saying:'They were trying to come up with the very easiest timetable possible that would allow the House of Commons, finally, to take control of the Brexit process away from Theresa May and sort it out themselves.' 
Interesting to see lots of 'peoples vote' campaigners sign and sharing the petition. This was NEVER about more democracy for them. They just want to stop Brexit. 
Petition to cancel Brexit altogether hits 2.5m signatures and rising  
I abhor how @theresa_may attacked MPs over Brexit. How we politicians use language is so important.  
.@theresa_may goes begging to @Europarl_EN for more ridiculous can-kickingThis is a complete failure of governmentHer deal won't be passedBrexit will not be resolved by 12th AprilI call on the Queen to intervene! #RevokeArticle50#StopBrexit 
Nurse to warn march that Brexit will be 'last nail in NHS coffin'  (£) 
For the record:Turnout:1992 general election: 77.7%2016 EU Referendum: 72.2%Total number of votes cast:1992 GE:        33,614,0742016 EU Ref: 33,577,3421992 GE wins on both counts.#Brexit 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,668,994. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Really excited to see that, thanks to a petition with lots of signatures, MPs will be forced to debate Brexit. 
Last night EU split and shifted after taking prospect of No Deal Brexit seriously. UK could have secured a much better deal had we been far tougher negotiators. 
The reason why it was so important for this gov to turn the BBC was because it was the only media outlet that could inform everyone about the criminality behind the brexit coup.  The Right wing media will never cover it and Guardian readers are already aware of it. #FBPE 
@VeteransBritain the defence Minster on #BBCQT did not mention it and wants to support the EU treaty to give control of our armed forces to the EU @theresa_may WHY would you want to do this @leavemeanleave @Stop_The_EU and #Brexit next Friday @JuliaHB1 @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @BBCNews 
Revoke petition now at 2.6 million. This is a speech I made in the Commons when only 12 MPs backed the revoke amendment. I said it was probably the most popular Brexit option. It couldn’t be properly debated then. It must be properly considered now.  
Message from son in Doncaster, who fed Farage's marchers yesterday."There were 50 of them. Then another 20 of their “ops” team. It was brexit personified dad, no organisation whatsoever. Absolute joke."1/3 
Both the Westminster Parliament and Brussels are playing out an elaborate charade. Both Parliaments are packed with Remainers who are simply searching for the best way to deprive the British people of Brexit. 
When remainers want to distance themselves from the post Brexit, London centric, middle class remain campaign because its become synonymous with nastiness & condescension, you know you've got something wrong! If it alienates working class remain voters, imagine how leavers feel! 
That is a massive lie, in fact it is hard to find ANYONE supporting Leave this week.  People are fed up of brexit and MPs, they want to STOP it. They want to go back to the times before Cameron, May, Farage and Corbyn 
4. There is v real Q over whether PM could or would preside over process that leads to softer Brexit - do not underestimate how restive the Tory party is 
1/Brexiters - You think you are angry and are going to lay waste to the country if you don't get your 'precious'? You're not!Most of you are at best defensive. Deep down you know the referendum was a crime scene & that a mature western democracy does not decide its destiny... 
Brexit's delayed but what should Britain do next 
Brilliant - Gina Miller: Here’s the Brexit speech Theresa May should have given last night  
Incisive analysis here by @OleRyborg who knows Brussels & #EU machinations better than anyone & cuts thru noise w/ Danish sensibility. Nearly as important as #Brexit outcome is how it happens & who's held responsible / gets credit. In politics, process & results often inseparable  
Lord Adonis (@Andrew_Adonis) has announced that he will move in the House of Lords a motion to #RevokeArticle50 during Monday's sitting.#Brexit 
This is like the tanks at Heathrow in 2003 - theatre, an act of propaganda. There is no reason why Brexit preparations couldn't be done from an office building in, say, Slough.  
BBC News - 'Cancel Brexit' petition passes 2m signatures on Parliament site  
I am so done with Brexit so all my energy is focused on @BTCC and ready to make my debut with the @HPUK @TPCracingBTCC @AmDessex car... #brexit #btcc #focus @MBPartners #TeamMBP #WILLTOWIN 
2. So dilemma being talked about in govt is whether to lead a new process in Parliament to find what is odds on a softer Brexit which much of tory party will hate 
Cabinet ministers believe risk of no-deal Brexit now 'very real'  
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,640,377. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
EU referendum petition hijacked by bots - BBC News - hilarious   
Theresa May pushes Parliament into the corner of a binary choice between accepting her surrender document or extending Article 50 to April 12 and who knows what beyond. Neither are Brexit and May will never allow real Brexit.UKIP is ready. 
The Brexit slogans prove neither Brexit option is what people voted for:"Take back control"The deal means having less control than we do now"The EU need us more than we need them"The only point of arguing that is to say the EU will give us a good deal. No Deal isn't that. 
#Brexit What’s happened to  we’re a laughing stock around the world. Once a great nation not anymore. All down to our pathetic MPs fighting with each other trying to stop Brexit. 17.4 million voted leave the CRUMBLING EU. Wish turn back the clock bring back. The good old days.  
BREAKINGNigel Farage has just announced on #r4today he will stand as new leader of The Brexit Party. 
Look who I bumped in to ? Campaigning for tomorrow’s @peoplesvote_uk march in London at noon. Come and join us #PutitothePeopleMarch #FinalSay #Brexit  
Oh, I see that all British MEPs are banned from @BBCr4today with the exception of, guess who, Nigel Farage. #r4today providing a platform to a fascist to spread lies about Russian interference in the #RevokeArticle50  petition and hype up his failed #Brexit march. 
Anyone out there struggling with Brexit, round 24 debate with my 84 year old leave voting Mum. PHEW  
Compare and contrast the orderly, structured decision reached in a few hours by 27 EU leaders yesterday with the rudderless #Brexit cacophony  of Westminster. #grownuppolitics 
One of my NHS nurses asked me if I wanted a brexit plaster, then she said, I think I’ve got a bit of cello tape here! We only half laughed. The future looks grim from this chemo-chair.  
Nigel F*rage on the Today Programme calling Brexit a *national humiliation*. Yes, thank you SO MUCH for foisting it upon us, Nigel! A divided, fatigued, embarrassed, anxious nation thanks you very much. 
Brexit has thrown full light on educational inequality in Britain \ we hear much about what London wants but not a lot about the rotten deal for our left behind towns. My latest in @unherd 
#RevokeArt50Now If you are a UK resident now is the time to sign the petition and stand against what was a confusing, uninformed referendum. Our children will thank you if we #stay - - -  - - -  #Remain 
Irony overdose: the odious Farage on #R4today claiming the signatories to the #Revoke petition are Russian bots. Pot/kettle aside, the Russians WANT Brexit. But you know that full well, don't you @Nigel_Farage? 
SHAMEFUL: May and EU agree to delay Brexit until at least April. She had previously pledged UK leaving on 29th March, no delay. Trust totally broken.  
The government has taken out hundreds of gagging orders as part of its preparations for a no-deal #Brexit  
Passing May’s deception deal would mean Brexit is stolen from the British people.Eg. the UK would be pledged to all the pillars of the EU Defence Union, despite MPs never having voted on it.EU image:  
Wake up to the fact that the majority of people in the UK do not want to leave the EU. Stop ‘trying to “deliver” Brexit’. You are not a democrat: you are a tin-eared would-be tyrant. You are worse than a fool: to be blunt, you verge on psychopathy.  
The nurse is dishonest or is misinformed. The drug companies are diverting resources to highest bidders, but the  China market is the fastest growing and has affected supply chains. Has precisely zero to do with Brexit. Be better. 
Cabinet ministers believe risk of no-deal #Brexit now 'very real'. Sources close to cabinet say No 10 is ‘run by lunatics’ after May’s speech attacking MPs  
Chatted to Barbra Streisand. She was In bed in Malibu. I wasn’t. We covered dog cloning, art collecting, being a grandma, Michael Jackson, and why Brexit “ruined” her.  
'Hell is still empty ... there are a lot of spaces' @eucopresident Donald Tusk #Brexit |  
"Cave idiotam!"THAT BREXIT EXTENSION LOGIC IN FULLThanks to @RoxxWolf for spotting the joke!Book now only £6 inc UK P&P!  
Dear @theresa_may. It’s okay to make mistakes and to fail. We all do it. The important thing is to admit errors, to learn from them, and to change tactics and behaviour accordingly. And there is no shame in apologising and stepping aside. Brexit was set up to fail, & not by you. 
I must have a terrible memory. I can't for the life of me remember the bit of the leave campaign that mentioned hunkering down in a nuclear bunker while planning putting 3.5K troops on the street #Brexit #NoDeal #RevokeArticle50 
Surprise @kategarraway - there are 1.2 million BRITISH CITIZENS living in the EU. We might not have had the right to vote in the referendum but we sure do have the right to sign petitions! Nothing dodgy about it. 
So that's 29 March crossed out but 12 April and 22 May pencilled in my diary. Brexit's a national humiliation and personal inconvenience when you're planning your life  
The majority of Britons reject @theresa_may's assertion that she is 'on their side' over #Brexit, according to @SkyData poll 
Things to cheer you up: my 83 year old mum has proudly stuck a large "Bollox to Brexit" sticker on her front door.  She'll be matching with us in spirit tomorrow. 
Who's going to London and why? I'm on my way to take part in the #PutitothePeopleMarch because I want the next generation to enjoy the great opportunities I've enjoyed. Why do YOU want to stop #Brexit? 
Tory MP Nigel Evans: "Brexit has had more dates than a Turkish food market."@JuliaHB1 | @nigelmp |  
“The petition to stop Brexit has exposed the lies of the People’s Vote lobby. For months and months they said they just wanted voters to have a say on the final deal. Now we know that really they want to block Brexit entirely. What a bunch of charlatans.”Brendan O’Neill on Sky  
the only certainty of brexit right now is that we will definitely come last in eurovision this year 
EU law recognises #whales, #dolphins and other animals as sentient beings, aware of their feelings and emotions. Ensure UK whales and dolphins keep this legal protection after #Brexit. Join us and sign the petition to keep welfare on the political agenda: 
I'm starting to think this whole Brexit thing might be a bad idea 
Consumers shrug off Project Fear ...UK retail sales rise unexpectedly despite looming Brexit  via @FT 
*email ping*The deadline for Brexit submission has been extended until April 12th due to a high number of requests.Thank you for your continued interest in participating at the European Conference on Withdrawing from the EU.  
A television advertisement for a short-term loan company has been banned after it suggested people might need to borrow in order to stockpile food for Brexit.  
Allowing the U.K. to crash out of the EU with no deal would be an outrage. Neither side advocated it in the referendum - and business and unions are clear it would be a serious problem. It’s time to stop flirting with disaster. 
The EU has agreed to give the UK an extension from March 29th to April 12th to devise an alternative Brexit plan, which is, coincidentally, precisely the same extension I have granted my first year British History students for their 1200 word primary source essays 
PORTILLO: EU 'blinked' after taking No Deal Brexit seriously. “Had we made No Deal credible, we might now be looking at quite a good deal”  
Millions of voters were misled into believing an advisory referendum to be legally binding. But Farage, Redwood, Raab and others weren't duped. They were calling for a 2nd referendum if Remain won in 2016.#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit  
New: Sir Martin Donnelly, formerly head of Liam Fox's trade department, tells me any post-Brexit trade deal with the United States will require Britain to lower its food standards, and will produce no obvious benefits for the UK. 
Millions have felt ‘powerless’, ’angry’ or ’worried’ because of #Brexit. Read more about the impact of the political environment on how people are feeling:  
They're going to try to force through the same discredited Brexit deal a THIRD time.This time under threat from the EU.We're bordering on treason here. The deal makes us a vassal state. It was defeated TWICE via a massive margin.  
We're in this mess because Theresa May went behind the backs of her Brexit Ministers with a lousy 'deal' that's worse than our current EU membership. She keeps telling MPs to take it or leave it, refusing to change a word. She's lied, bullied & bribed to try to force it through. 
UK business economy is surging on  the prospect of a 'No Deal' WTO Brexit  
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,577,556. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Keep going. For what it's worth, this may be your last or only chance to have a say at the soiled dog-end of this discouraging process, especially for the millions of Brits living outside the UK who were excluded from the 2016 referendum.#RevokeArt50Now 
Where the fuck are @UKLabour? The #Brexit Titanic is sinking and they are below decks thinking about rearranging the furniture. @jeremycorbyn should go. Handling of Brexit - the most historic moment in British history post WW2 - has been unforgivable #LabourFail #CorbynOut 
Still ‘a lot of spaces in hell’ – Tusk during #Brexit press conference  
Time to Revoke Article 50.Brexit has collapsed into a mess. Just bin it.  
Building European unity: collective and permanent work! #Brexit #EUCO 
For everyone who has brexit fatigue Revoke Article 50 &remain in EU and then allow other priorities to receive govt attention & eu support #RevokeArt50Now . If we leave we have 10-20 years of brexit in negotiating future trade deals. Think about that 
A deadline, briefly extended at the very last moment? Amazing to see Brexit is being run along the same lines as an academic conference.Will there be a poster session? 
Of all my Brexit predictions to come true, this, from July 2016, was by far the easiest to make.  
So no end to the psychodrama - but instead two new dates w/ destiny, April 12th and/or May 22nd. Uncertainty continues for businesses and communities, as does the possibility of an unwanted messy and disorderly exit - whether by accident or by design. #Brexit #EUCO 
Brexit progress:▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓░ 99%…recalculating…recalculatingBrexit progress:▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓░ 97% 
Comment on the Best for Britain Facebook page: “In twenty years there'll be a sitcom in a Torquay hotel, when European guests stay the manager will keep telling the staff ‘don't mention Brexit’ “  
NUMBER 1 | @DominicFrisby's '17 Million F*** Offs' Brexit song is now charting at number 1 on Amazon Music. You can buy yours here:  pic.twitter.com/PzURPbMZVY 
Brexit: EU says UK must leave in three weeks with no deal unless MPs back May or decide plan B - Politics live  
The petition is now at 2.5 million signatures. This still gives @theresa_may room to ignore it, which she will likely do. We need it to be a *LOT* higher so spread it far and wide!  #RevokeA50Now #brexit #gamedev 
Petition To Cancel Brexit Gets More Than 2 Million Signatures, Crashes Parliament Website  
Superb article in by @MishaGlenny on #Brexit impact and "...the widely held English conviction that what really matters in our island histories is what happens in England."Could Brexit break the Union?  via @FinancialTimes 
Spot on. And it looks like the primary legislation needed to usurp the 29th is also being completely ignored? This is no longer about Brexit it's about democracy, or should I say - the illusion of one... 
If A50 is revoked will hard core Brexiteers feel betrayed? Of course. Brexit itself is built on a betrayal myth. The campaign specifically fostered that resentment. Even if Brexit happens the absence of unicorns will mean “true Brexit” has been betrayed. It can’t be avoided. 
Brexit voters have been stereotyped as thicko racists.Whilst Remainers are cast as intellectual progressive geniuses.Let's have a closer look at some of these Einsteins now.  
Dear @MarinaHyde and @JohnJCrace. When this is all over—assuming there’s still electricity to run the printing presses—please collect your Brexit columns into books and visit us in Paris to talk about them. They are among the few things keeping us sane here. x 
This is terrific reporting by @alexebarker & @MehreenKhn on how EU27 came to a decision at yesterday's Brexit #EUCO  
Let's be honest, the UK dosen't have the infrastructure to stay in the EU. We have no houses and services are too stretched to handle the EUs free movement policy. Even our trains are like something out of Victorian Delhi.  #Brexit 
Sturgeon announces indyref2 update ‘in next few days’ amid Brexit chaos  
Even more reason to sign! Keep the momentum for #RevokeArticle50Petition going#RemainInTheEU #BrexitChaos #Brexit #RevokArticle50 #REVOKE_ARTICLE_50 
The prime minister's mind is "closed... that is the story of the last 2 and 3/4 years" - chair of the Brexit committee @hilarybennmp says alternative Brexit options won't work if Theresa May is "not prepared to move an inch" #r4today 
This saturday, show your support for neoliberalism by marching to disenfranchise millions of people and blame the #Tory fuck up of #Brexit on Corbyn whilst giving corporate bitch Chucka Umuna the spotlight.*slow clap* 
Just muted the word ‘BREXIT’ and my entire feed was reduced to a single tweet photo of a half-naked Gregg Wallace screaming at a grizzly bear and some chip-fat. 
Chair of the Brexit committee @hilarybennmp says he would accept the PM's Brexit deal if it was put to the people - "that is showing compromise" #r4today 
How hard can this be. Referendum passed in favour of Leave EU. Government pamphlet was very clear in saying we would have to leave single market and CU. Mps passed triggering Article 50. Leave date enshrined in law. Now majority of MPs betraying the Country. 
‘David Cameron made the referendum policy because he didn’t want to risk losing 10 or 15 seats to UKIP & look where it has got us’We need to put this 16-year-old  in charge of  Brexit negotiations, and fast.#r4today #PoliticsLive #bbcaq @lbc #NewsNight 
Special podcast: TONY BLAIR of @institutegc on this week’s Brexit chaos, where Remain needs to try harder and tomorrow's #PutItToThePeople march with @pimlicat @IanDunt & @Dorianlynskey. Listen now:  
Shhhush Singh, let them think they'll win a second referendum.  
4. Producer: ‘Yes, we want to get into that. But what do you think about Brexit?’A couple of hours before the show, they want you to do a video of 2 minutes in which you have to summarise all your ideas. (‘And can you say something about Brexit please?’). 
My bit on May and Brexit  
Brexit Resistance ChecklistHere are a few things that could make a difference, if we all do them. A million little pebbles equal an avalanche!- Sign the petition to revoke Article 50- Write/email your MP- Join the People's Vote march in central London tomorrow, if you're able 
Welcome that #EUCO followed the advice of @Europarl_EN & has provided for an extension that will give the UK Parliament time to deliver a constructive cross-party majority for a positive future relationship. #Brexit 
BREXIT NEWS:Using the name ‘Operation Yellowhammer’ for a No Deal Brexit scenario is due to many of the Govt negotiators being birders. Simply, one 66 year-old mandarin blurted out that Britain was headed for “A little bit of bread & no deal” situation. Hence ‘Yellowhammer’. Fact  
Keep it going! “Revoke Article 50 Brexit petition hits 2m signatures - despite several crashes” - Mirror Online  
Hillary Benn is calling for a second referendum with Mrs May’s deal and Remain on the ballot, so, despite having voted to take back control, Benn wants our choice to be between May’s terrible deal or Remain. They really do think we’re thick don’t they? #r4today 
Can't shake the sense that the Brexit shitshow will end in ways no one predicted. Apart from the removal of our repellent Prime Minister. 
A petition demanding Theresa May revokes Article 50 and cancels #Brexit has passed two million signatures  
*calm rant* did anyone expect a 48% to 51% ballot to have a different result other than dividing the country. It was an 'advisory' referendum, not an election. Of course #Remainers are fighting and people are changing their minds now the full facts of economic effect are known 
“Theresa May has been told by Sir Graham Brady that MPs want her to stand down because of her handling of Brexit.“Meanwhile, the Prime Minister's public address on Wednesday is reported to have caused a major rift with Julian Smith, her chief whip” 
Just imagine waking up to the news that article 50 had been revoked, Brexit has been cancelled and we could all move on with our lives and focus on improving this country.  Just imagine how you'd feel.  What a massive relief it would be.#RevokeArticle50 
"Not ruling out" device has been the key to Corbyn's bid to be all things to all people on Brexit. A variant of May's approach of ruling out then ruling back in. Both characters deeply sub-standard.  
.@meadway, former economic adviser to Labour Shadow Treasury Team: “Remain is unambiguously better than what is on offer: better for democratic rights, better for economic democracy, better for sovereignty. If it takes a second referendum to defeat it,that option should be taken”  
Great piece of reporting from @FT Brussels team: How the EU leaders reached a decision on May/Brexit  
The Prime Minister who said she would not hold a General Elections, but did, has turned out to be the Prime Minister who repeatedly said she would deliver Brexit on 29 March 2019, and has not. 
The betrayal of the British people is taking shape. A two week delay which paves the way for a long delay of two years, a second referendum, and Remain. The legal position is still that we are leaving on 29th March on WTO terms. MPs should honour this. 
Extension negotiations are a sign of things to come under May's deal. Out of the room, each one of 27 countries will have a veto over what we want. This is not taking back control. Constant humiliation. Time needed for clarity on what Brexit now means & to work out where we going  
Before Chequers I personally would have liked to see Gove as May's replacement.Not now.Gove has turned out to be a weak, sniveling little rat who turned his back on Brexit, after previously stabbing Boris, in the back.  
The 2016 Referendum result was ludicrously close and that is why we are where we are today. It was always going to make trouble - and it has. No amount of strutting and posturing can hide the sheer stupidity and shabbiness of those whose job it is/was to know better. #RevokeA50 
Today we’ve published new research on how Brexit is impacting Scotland’s  mental health. I’ll be on @BBCRadioScot later to discuss. 
James,The French EU minister, Nathalie Loiseau, has called her new cat Brexit. “He wakes me up every morning meowing to death because he wants to go out,” she says. “And then when I open the door he stays put, undecided, and then glares at me when I put him out.” 
Corbyn won’t rule out revoking Brexit to prevent no‑dealBut the Hypocrite has been a Eurosceptic All his Miserable Life! 
Fucksake. Now I'm going to have to drink my Brexit wine stockpile this weekend. 
Brexit is not the cause of Britain’s political breakdown. It’s a symptom | Gary Younge  
Diplomatic notes show Merkel interventions were limited but when she did make them, it as a truth bomb to remind Ireland about the realities of a no deal  for the border #Brexit #euco 
Today’s Berliner Morgenpost: “This is how expensive Brexit will be” in the case of No Deal. €115 per head GDP loss on average, and as much as €170 in Hamburg, €126 Düsseldorf, €115 in each of Cologne & Munich.  
A group of the leaders - including Merkel, Macron, Rutte, Bettel -  rolled sleeves up and thrashed out the Brexit text in a huddle with the Council's sec gen. Feeling after May's evasive performance was that Brits laid a "trap" that would put no deal blame squarely on the EU side 
If Gove hadn't stabbed Boris in the back then Boris would have been PM and the Brexit negotiations would have gone much more in the UK's favour. Gove can't be allowed to profit from his damaging treachery. 
And this is the problem we have. One obstinate, obdurate, stupid woman.The real failure of ‘democracy’ has been to take a non legally binding, advisory (and ultimately corrupt) referendum and take it as an instruction, which it was not, for the sake of Tory party unity  
Every suit that sanctioned McLeish for Scotland should leave with him today. Also, fuck brexit, the union and people who don't pick up their dug shite. 
Opinion: Theresa May wants us to follow her down the rabbit hole of Brexit madness  
Worth recalling the valiant efforts of 47 Labour MPs who voted against triggering A50, unlike their titular leader who urged this course immediately after referendum.  
How does @MarinaHyde do it? I mean, we’ve all gone mad, but she at least manages to turn our lunacy funny and cogent day after day.She’s the spirit guide through my nineteenth nervous Brexit breakdown  
EU agrees to delay Brexit and sets UK new deadlines  
#RevokeArt50Now as my MP @theresa_may can I count on your support. Your constituency was pro-remain in the referendum, perhaps it’s time you represented them. 
The referendum was fraudulent, it was the result of targeted bespoke disinformation and foreign influence, it disenfranchised many, it was advisory.The result was marginal and the prospect of leaving without a deal was never, ever, seriously considered.Stop this coup. 
Portillo“For the first time in 1,000 days since the referendum, the EU blinked, there was a sign of disunity because suddenly they took seriously the possibility of Britain exiting with No Deal”Imagine if Parliament and government had credibly planned for No Deal all along  
TimesCorbyn won’t rule out revoking Brexit to prevent no‑deal 
Anyone who woke up worried Brexit is damaging Britain, feeling let down by the government, let down by Parliament, and determined to find a different way forward than the one offered by @theresa_may change your plans and join us tomorrow #PutItToThePeople 
brexit is a constant effort to keep up with what's happened but even when I find out what's happened I don't know what happened 
They know full well that EVERY form of #Brexit will make the country poorer than staying in European Union. @UKLabour leadership will share responsibility for the damage to livelihoods and cuts to public services that follow. 
#euref was not the 'largest democratic event in British history'. The 1992 elections, eg, had both more voters and a much higher turnout. So why is the PM allowed to recite it relentlessly? By the way, she could learn a lot from John Major. #brexit 
It appears Brussels taken over the Brexit process by setting the agenda last night. ..@theresa_may is way out of her depth 
Wonder how many people in Europe are following Brexit process in UK and wondering why they can’t have an independent Parliament as well 
This MUST HAPPENHer BAD Deal MUST NOT be allowed..it has failed TWICE.Parl MUST Take Back Control We MUST take part in the EU Elections.A means MUST be allowed to #RevokeArticle50 reverse #BrexitMPs MUST Change the Law to enable the aboveOR WE LEAVE DEAL/NO DEAL 
As expected, European leaders have concocted yet another stitch-up in Brussels, once again kicking the can further down the road. Our pathetically weak, submissive "leader" has graciously accepted.The battle is far from over. Help us save Brexit at  
All the details from last night on how leaders got to a decision over Brexit  - including a bizarre intervention from Portugal's PM and some shade from Viktor Orban  
A rare positive thought about Brexit: a whole generation of better, new politics is being shaped and defined as young people endure this absolute shitshow  
I find myself trusting The Sun’s Brussels Correspondent more on #Brexit matters than I trust *any* BBC journalist on it.Me? Trusting a journo from that rag? I find this a destabilising experience.But it’s also worrying how far the BBC has fallen... 
#DoYouRememberWhenThis island was gonna sink because of migrants.And the country would be £350m  better off.We'd get our country back?? Whatever that meant?Hello brexit my old friend, its been 3 years your still on trend#torylies 
A reminder:DEMOCRACYBreaking the law in a referendumRefusing to allow Parliament a sayLying to ParliamentTrying to turn people against MPsInsisting on a 3-year old result based on lies that no longer holds a majorityNOT DEMOCRACYAllowing people to vote on their future 
It is an accurate position. They did promise you brexit would improve your lives, and they are stockpiling body bags as part of no deal prep. You can still be annoyed if you like, but at least don’t pretend I’ve said something inaccurate. 
“Any extension would be an abject denial of democracy, but at least if the UK is forced into (one), then our country won’t have compromised its ultimate right to leave the EU. Any future govt must deliver Brexit and a far better outcome” @bernardjenkin 
Do you think it is possible to explain to leavers that Brexit has not happened yet and thst it is OK for Brits to travel and live abroad and still sign parliamentary petitions. 
Parliament has voted May’s deal down.Parliament has voted no deal down.Parliament has voted against a second referendum down.Now parliament MUST REVOKE. 
Revoke Article 50 petition calling for Brexit to be cancelled hits two million signatures   
On the plus side, Brexit has enriched our cultural lives in three important ways:1. @MarinaHyde in the @guardian 2. @Coldwar_Steve 3. #brexitcast with @bbclaurak @BBCkatyaadler @ChrisMasonBBC @adamfleming Cheers!  
Anyone in the front rank of politics want to tell us that if MPs fear attack, something has gone terribly wrong? To look at a country without a govt & no idea where it's headed & ask what  is going on? To actually speak to Britain? Or is it still "my Brexit would be better"? 
Have to agree with this. 2 years ago, I could have lived with a Soft Brexit that reflected the narrow win, one that allowed for access to SM to save UK businesses Now? Nah.They moved the goalposts to something that was never put to the electorate.  
We must always remember that this brexit plague was brought to our door by a small group of corrupt extremist politicians and fellow collaborators abroad. They are well funded and they pay for the machine that incessantly unleashes hate on our society. #FBPE 
Growing tired of the BBC’s poor #Brexit coverage. Not that it’s biased, it’s more that it’s not very good.Last night’s #EUCO clearly wasn’t  EU “doing a May” - they agreed a tightly defined delay with a plan. May has delayed abjectly *without* a plan. 
Favourite EUCO nugget from last night..At 1 point in EU27 leaders' talks Brexit Day could have been May 7, instead of May 22.Until someone realised it meant Britain could be leaving on May 8.Victory in Europe Day.(celebrated in both France and UK btw..bullet swerved) 
What kind of moron seriously thinks that an online petition trumps a referendum in which over 30m voted, the majority of whom supported leave?  David Lammy. That’s who.  
If Scotland’s farmers are not very careful their industry will be finished. It’s clear from remarks of US Ambassador to EU that after Brexit, the US do not want the UK aligned with EU standards then they can flood UK with cheaper hormone treated red meat & GM crops @BBCr4today 
We are now almost in a situation where the EU Commission is organising Brexit for the UK government 
The reasons why Lidington would be good choice to do next round of Brexit negotiations are that:1. he is only minister to had a "good Brexit" and has confidence of EU27 counterparts2. he already has mastery of current negotiation issues and we do not have time to begin again  
Great Britain Is Weeks, Maybe Even Days Away From A Civil War British Ministry Of Defence Preparing For A Civil War.British Troops Put On High Alert, Police Holidays Cancelled.Armed Forces Set Up Team In Nuclear Bunker To Prepare For No-Deal Brexit  
Not all the 'over 65s' are in favour of Brexit – Britain's wartime generation are almost as pro-EU as millennials | EUROPPMany of our generation acutely aware of the essential role of the EU in maintaining peace in Europe.We should speak of this more.  
Brexit made flesh. “Take back control” was always a massive lie. Now it’s there for everyone to see.  
We can all see what direction this is going. May's about to go nuclear - long extension/second ref/revocationBrexit MPs can't sit back anymore. The Maybot must be deactivated before she stops us leavingAre @SteveBakerHW and ERG ever going to do anything?Take her down 
Remain would win second Brexit referendum, polling indicates  
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,451,828. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
TM kept one promise; to be a bloody difficult woman. She's made life difficult for cabinet, MPs, voters, employers, staff, exporters, investors & allies but mostly for herself. Sign the petition to end  Brexit & goodbye TM. 
If you haven't signed this please do. Anyone in #Perth missed it? Het signing! If the site is down, please try again. It has crashed at times due to numbers trying to sign. #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
There is a generation coming through now that don’t take their news from MSM, they aren’t entrenched on one political side, and they are watching this horrific Tory Brexit shambles affect their future.They are going to boot the Conservatives into oblivion for decades. 
Theresa May does Right Said Fred and it’s a Brexit anthem for our times 
British Pound in limbo as EU gives Theresa May another 2 weeks to avoid a no-deal #Brexit. EU leaders told May that if UK lawmakers don’t endorse her Brexit deal next week, she’ll have until April 12 to decide whether to leave w/o agreement or request a much longer extension.  
'One last chance': what the UK papers say about Brexit delay  
No Deal Brexit! After that there needs to be a battle - to drain the Westminster swamp. via @telebusiness 
Just stop with the fucking Brexit stuff. It was a stupid idea in the first place. You can’t make a good deal because there isn’t one. And this story is boring as shit. 
Obvious inbound issue Klaxon:1) Any efforts to revoke Brexit in House of Lords confirms the “unelected lords” narrative.2) Revocation without a referendum confirms the “undemocratic” narrative.3) EU delay confirms the “take back control” narrative.Uglier is coming. 
Anti-Brexit sentiment is now becoming an unstoppable force. A tipping point has been reached, & there’s now literally nothing @theresa_may can say in favour of Brexit that will have any effect other than to drive more & more people to sign this petition. Brexit has become toxic.  
Good morning!I don't know if anything we do now to stop the runaway brexit train will make a difference but by God, we showed them how to do a petition.Tomorrow, let's show them how to do a demo!We've nothing to lose and we might just have something to gain.#RevokeArticle50 
What exactly just happened at the EU summit? My latest #Brexit thoughts from Brussels:  
If you’re getting disheartened by all the Brexit chat, just remember we’re still the only nation that can turn any song into a football chant, we smashed Cape Cod Kwassa Kwassa at @vampireweekend last night 
"I look at the facts and come to a view....Britain is more secure in the EU." ~ Theresa May (during the EU referendum campaign in 2016). 
Friday briefing: Europe takes control of Brexit  
Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU. - PetitionsWell over 2 million people have signed this petition in the past day.  This has never been seen before and it indicates the level of our anger with the government for the mess that Brexit is causing.   
So - March 29th has gone. The new #Brexit cliff edge day is April 12. The can‘s been kicked down the road again... but with some strategic maneuvering by  leaders at late night summit.Confused?#Brexplainer 8:30am today on @SkyNews TV #Sunrise - tweet me & @tamcohen your Qs 
PLEASE sign this, in the hope that we can forget about the whole thing, let out a sigh of relief, and just go for a pint.  #brexit #brexitpetition #RevokeArt50Now #uk #news #europe #eu #Article50 #BrexitExtension #BrexitVote #bbcqt 
New study shows pricetag of hard #brexit per person in the UK: 1k + per year. (London and South almost 3K). Switzerland? Some 150 p.p.p.a. Who profits from it? Russia, China, the US. "So teuer wird der Brexit für die Schweiz" (in German)   
Theresa May gets an extra two weeks to sort out Brexit, but the dilemmas facing the country’s political class haven’t gone anywhere  
The EU have granted UK more time to #brexitbecausea) Its full of jolly nice people who wish Britain wellorb) The last thing the EU needs is a £39B black hole and no preferential access to what will become its largest market?Hmm.  Let me think... 
4/ But nobody is really watching the masses. Useless journos are content to voxpop racist pensioners - but on Saturday the engaged, educated demos of Britain will be on the streets against Brexit... 
Revocation of Brexit Article 50 is now a distinct possibility. We were never going to be allowed to leave the EU. The Davos, Bilderberg and Bohemian Grove globalists have already decided. "You don't think you're living in a democracy do you bud?"  
Finally. Planning to watch @The_OA 2 on #Netflix all night? Remember to send in a juicy lie to work in the morning. Go big or go home: you...- were trapped in a basement in an alternative dimension- had an NDE brought on by Brexit/Trump woes- quit to join the circus#HapsHere 
‘The constitution will never be the same again. But Bercow’s task isn’t finished. The endgame of Brexit is being fought hour by hour on the floor of the Commons between an out-of-control government and an increasingly assertive parliament’  
BREXIT = DELAYED #BREXITCAST = EXTENDED Everything you need to know after another huge night in Brussels...  @BBCSounds | @bbc5live 
The US ambassador expressing his frustration EU won't accept US standards on food etc. Make no mistake Trump is waiting vulture-like to swoop in on the UK post-#brexit. #r4today 
On what weird planet is having a national referendum on a specific policy proposal considered to be a 'failure of democracy'? That's like saying, taking a deep breath is a failure of the respiratory system. 
Cllr. Brian SilvesterBrexit Spokesman. For The @ForBritainPartyJoin us Please follow @CllrBSilvester Please share 
I live in Italy. Every expat I know is against Brexit for obv reasons. Don't find this strange at all. There are 3m of us! 
More than 2 millions signatures so far #signandshare Let’s make clear on what side of history you are in. Let’s constrast the lies that made Brexit the worst political disaster of the last-hundreds years of UK politics. Be on the right side #RevokeArt50Now 
Brexit: in case it's not obvious... last night @theresa_may lost the last vestiges of control over the process. There are three agents now: the EU, parliament and the masses... 1/ 
If Theresa May had pushed for a soft Brexit Common Market 2.0 EEA/EFTA Brexit deal, she would have won an overwhelming parliamentary majority. Her mistake was to be trapped by the hard Brexiters in her own party and her anti-immigration red line of ending Freedom of Movement. 
Can someone confirm my understanding of Labour's preferred future:1. Delay of Brexit2. UK General Election (that Labour wins with a clear majority in HoC)3. Withdrawal Agreement scrapped4. Labour government negotiates new WA, PD and eventually FR with the EU275. Brexit 
Children are going hungry. So here is a helpful reminder:BREXIT IS AUSTERITY, AUSTERITY IS BREXIT.Brexit is where all the money that should be flowing into our poorest communities is going.  
As a businessman I've been planning in a No Deal #Brexit for the past two years. Which is what any halfway sensible business or public service has been doing. We will be just fine with a Deal or No Deal. 
A secretarial student is found starved to death following a no-deal Brexit. Suspicion falls on Burwood Mantle’s romantically unlucky lumberjack, angry that shady goings on in condiments factories might threaten to close the 160-year-old mustard factory. 
Trying to maintain certainty in uncertain times. If you place your @astonmartin order before 12th April 2019, Deal or No Deal, the original price on your Vantage, DB11, DBS Superleggera or Rapide AMR remains unchanged. #AstonMartin #Brexit  
The UK's net contribution to the EU was an estimated £9 billion in 2017. This graphic shows a breakdown of the UK's EU membership fee in 2017  #Brexit  
A lot of talk in the papers about Brussels “taking control of the Brexit timetable”. No they haven’t. They’ve made an offer. We can still leave on March 29th. 
The #euco has basically done what May was supposed to do:Show realistic and viable options out of this mess. Despite internal differences.To me it is absolutely clear who is serious about solving this chaos - and who isn’t.#Brexit 
I'm getting fed up of the scaremongering over this so-called Brexit crisis. This is only affecting the lunatic remoaners who can see their places in the project disappearing along with their EU citizenships. They're the ones having a crisis, not the leavers. 
Proud to have signed this letter alongside my fellow @TSDSU officers and proud to be marching again in London tomorrow. Brexit has the capacity to be disastrous for Wales and young people in Wales. It’s time we #PutItToThePeople and had a @peoplesvote_uk! 
Holier-than-thou May says that we ‘voted for pain’ and is obsessed with respecting a crooked advisory referendum.  She (& IDS, Fox, Jenkin, Davis) voted against the creation of a Welsh Assembly that had been approved by a referendum. Disgusting hypocrisy.#RevokeArticle50 
'MV2: Vote of Doom' was a classic, and built strongly upon 'MV1: Raiders of the Lost Referendum'.I think 'MV3: The Last Chance, Really' can't match the first two. It's time to put this franchise to bed now or we'll end up with 'MV4: Kingdom of the Empty Skull.' 
#Tory PM ‘David Cameron made the referendum policy because he didn’t want to risk losing 10 or 15 seats to #UKIP and look where it has got us’This 16-year-old says the #Conservative Party are responsible for #Brexit. #bbcqt pic.twitter.com/hEa8wrhTaC 
Ian this is why the country is divided. Remainers need to ACCEPT THE OUTCOME OF THE REFERENDUM #LBC Calling for it to be overturned is not helping 
Belgian MEP member of Brexit Steering Group Phillipe Lamberts @ph_lamberts tells us last night that the timetable is designed to give UK Parliament “space” to “take hold of process” and that the PM’s “running down the clock strategy has failed” 
Yesterday Remainers were telling us May's speech represented an existential thereat to Parliamentary democracy. Today these same people are claiming an on-line petition should take precedence over a statutory referendum which secured participation of over 30 million. 
Barclays: No-deal Brexit would 'significantly' hurt the EU  via @CityAM 
Nothing has changed paddy boy. Do you actually think Scots want another referendum,  the majority of us don't see it the way you and your wee ayrshire pal sees it. Back in your box plastic paddy.  
If the divorce deal isn't passed by the British Parliament next week, there are only two scenarios to avoid a disorderly Brexit on 12 April:-UK revokes Article 50-UK calls general election or second referendum, asks for long-term extension 
On No Deal BrexitIn a video interview with @vincecableMeeting with other leaders, May said"the people voted for pain"Close to the end of WW2Goebbels said something similar in the Fuhrer bunkerWe have an madwoman in No 10! 
Thanks to the European Council for a fair and clear message to our friends in UK: the games are definitely over. Deliver right now! #EU27 stands united. #brexit #BrexitExtension 
Editorial: Theresa May is irresponsible to scare people with the threat of a chaotic no-deal Brexit  
Theresa May is refusing to listen to any advice or move towards a consensus Brexit view. It is her way or the the highway - 3 years of Brexit and still no effort to heal the country. Just like Maggie, compassionless, parochial and a sociopath! #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 
Gina Miller: Here’s the Brexit speech Theresa May should have given last night . #RevokeArt50Now #BrexitShambles 
We've a clear way out of this #brexit nightmare at last! Leadsom said yesterday "Should it reach 17.4 million respondents then I am sure there will be a very clear case for taking action". Sign the petition & get every brit u know to sign #RevokeArticle50 
.@Banxcartoons's views on Brexit in today's FT. Seems about right...  
#Brexit by numbers: Macron told his counterparts he thought there was a 10 percent chance of the deal passing, then after hearing from May decided it was 5 percent. Tusk replied: I think that’s a bit optimistic.  via @bpolitics 
Anti-Brexit March  
Brexit from a Left wing perspective – ‘underlying this anger, we discovered, was a palpable sense of loss and lack. Their life-chances had diminished; the secure jobs they remembered or had heard their parents fondly describe had evaporated’ @tfbrexit 
You can find the article on @guardian's opening page, but BREXIT come first, and this article about extreme weather sees the writer channelling her inner @BBC - no #ClimateBreakdown context given. 
News Daily: Brexit delay and New Zealand marks week since shootings  
Meaningful Vote 3 next week.May almost certain to lose.But what then for her?Surely she’d have to resign, or at least let someone else run the fortnight to 12 April? May would have no trust left, or ability to seek an alternative way forward...#Brexit #EUCO 
Dear Mr Tusk, Theresa May is holding the UK public + UK in EU27 hostage. She is a psycopath with no sense of right or wrong. She will quite happily watch people die in her quest for #brexit. #RevokeArticle50 #RemainNotPain 
IN SUMMARY - JC did not refuse to take part in crucial Brexit talks. there werent any. it was a dressing down of parliament, he was right to walk." 
Michael Portillo on @bbcthisweek illustrates sheer delusion of Brexiters.The EU have calmly, gently but VERY firmly taken control of Brexit out of the hands of Theresa May, like an ever so patient parent dealing with a child having a tantrum, and he saw it as the EU "blinking". 
Now 2.3 million in two days. And Brexit delayed means there's time to get it to ten or twenty million. Get your friends and family and neighbours to sign too. Let Theresa May know what the People really want. Revoke belongs to all of us.  
A new dawn has broken at the European Commission. Brexit day will be 12 April 22 May sometime never  
Macron: "The British politicians are incapable to put in place what their people have demanded. Their people voted for Brexit". 
What #euro performed last night is what a political ‘family intervention ’ looks like#brexit@MarkJohnstonLD @ottocrat @guitarmoog @Sime0nStylites 
Brexit has more possible dates than Tinder... 
#RevokeA50Now The petition stands at over 2.2mill at 6am this morning!  It’s time for the government to admit that Brexit has failed, it can’t be done, and for Parliament to Revoke Article 50. 
‘The EU’s agreement with Britain is complex, carefully constructed & challenging’ (BBC)Stop wading through this treacle. Revoke Article 50 & be done with Brexit 
Tomorrow the GREEN LIBERAL DEMOCRATS will be marching for a final say on the Brexit deal - with the option to remain in the EU. Will you join us on the March?  @LibDems @YoungLiberalsUK @libdemlocalgov @LibDemWomen @LaylaMoran @EdwardJDavey @joswinson @ALDC 
Moment Of Truth Looms For Second Referendum: The Plan All Along Or A Head Fake?  
TONIGHT - I’m speaking in Grimsby - 6.30pm, Saint Aidan's Church and Community Centre DN35 7RR. All welcome! Exactly a week before Brexit Disaster Day  
SNP willing to compromise to see off Brexit. How many times? She can’t get independence through a referendum unless sanctioned by the UK government. Why give the impression she’s in charge? Obsequious Scottish press.  
The NSW state election is looking like a referendum on Alan Jones and the rest of the squadron of spivs who own the Liberal Party in this state.  
Morning interviews on #Brexit extension deal. My view - very clever, and achieves three things:1 EU-27 show patience, will not force UK directly into no-deal2 Puts the pressure on MPs - decide by April 12 for a way forward and commit to #EP2019 elections3 keeps EU unity 
This should be a wake up call for Brexiters. All international negotiations will be like this. On our own, we have no clout. We can’t set the agenda. We beg. We lose. We’re swapping strength for weakness. A rule-maker role for rule-taker. This is  #Brexit  
The signatures are from UK citizens living and/or working in the EU or elsewhere in the world who were denied a vote in the referendumYou should go back and live in your isolation  
Phelan: “That lad over there said we could follow the Norwegian model.”Dyche: “Brexit means Brexit lads, don’t forget that!”  
A coalition of women of different faiths brought peace to Northern Ireland decades ago — and now Brexit is threatening to ruin all of that @WomenWarPeace #WomenWarPeacePBS 
Personal view since the #Brexit vote in June 2016. The choice of leaving the EU is in many ways more significant than joining. Therefore the final choice, in a referendum, should be between the withdrawal agreement and continued membership. #PeoplesVoteNow 
We are frustrated that a party overruled a legal referendum who onlyhave  24% of Scotlands vote continue in the way they are you do not represent the majority in Scotland  
Chronology for next #Brexit steps agreed at #EUCO is the very smart part MV3 has to be by 29 March to get extension to 22 May that May wants When MV3 fails, MPs have fortnight - with May's Deal off the table - to decide what to do Option of longer extension still open 
"May and Corbyn have shown no real faith in Britain, no real interest in delivering Brexit and no vision for our country. Their egotistical approach has made Britain a laughing stock in Europe. Their lack of leadership is causing a national humiliation." Andrea Jenkyns MP 
Macron: "British politicians are incapable of carrying out what their people instructed. Their people voted for Brexit." Bit rich coming from him. But true. 
Last week we factchecked a viral post with a list of claims about the Lisbon Treaty, or "what will actually happen if we stay in the EU".Most of the claims are wrong. Read more:  #Brexit 
This is the only Brexit story I want to read, tbh  
TM keeps saying no Brexit would betray democracy and words to that effect. This is such nonsense. Let’s be clear. Brexit was voted for by only just a little more than voted against, with the help of illegal money and lies. So no. The “will of the people” is more to remain... 
Ministers in Theresa May's own government are trying to get her to change course on Brexit  
Sick of the honking fucking idiots with their 'What can Labour do' bollocks.Waving through Brexit, knowing full well that it will ruin the lives of the very same people they claim to give a voice to.They're as bad as the MPs who'll make themselves rich from fucking us over. 
Brexit: Theresa May to urge MPs to back deal as delay agreed  
This lying fascist works for the evil mastermind behind Brexit.. Matthew Elliott ( TPA/IEA/WTA )and his wife Sarah , who is the head of the far right US Republicans in the UK.. 
Government orders hospitals not to reveal Brexit impact assessments to protect 'commercial interests'  
Even now, with the #brexit date so close, The EU are bending over backwards to help the U.K. out. The Progressiveness of the EU, really does put the U.K. political class to shame. 
#Brexit is all about class. The majority of Remainers are middle-class cry babies. They can't bear the fact Leave winning is down to working-class voters from North of Watford. The liberal elite in their Islington & Hampstead homes are cocooned from the reality of the real world. 
Hilarious that the equalization system we have is the one you helped Harper create. Also funny that you think an Alberta referendum has the power to change it--or rthat you know it wouldn't but still try to dupe Albertans into thinking so. So many phoney tactics.  #cdnpoli 
I love checking up on the latest Brexit news and understanding everything that's happening  
Five percent? EU leaders doubt May's Brexit vote chances  
Problems facing kenyans:-High cost of living-Unemployment-Hunger in 23 counties-Huge public debt-Poor leadershipGovt efforts to find solutions:-Taking loans-Stealing and increasing taxes-Huduma namba-Referendum-Legacy agenda-Handshake#RedcrossTumechoka 
EU leaders agreed to postpone Brexit day, imposing two new dates — April 12 and May 22 — that will determine the course of the U.K.'s departure  
"As Brexit looms, financial services businesses in the UK have begun initiating no-deal contingency plans, shifting an estimated £1trn in assets out of the UK to Europe. The figure has increased roughly £200bn since last quarter" Real money, fleeing.   
EU's Tusk says all Brexit options still open until April 12  
Dollar holds gains, sterling up on Brexit deadline extension  
Theresa finds yet another way to survive. This time, by taking her own ineptitude, and bludgeoning everyone else to death with it.Sketch on yet another wild day and night of Brexit here. 
Can anyone explain how Theresa May can possibly remain as British Prime Minister given she has been repeatedly humiliated by her own parliament and the EU, bungled the entire Brexit process and led the nation to its worst constitutional crisis in decades?? 
#Brexit has another unintended consequence: Britain's beer industry  
Why is Assange complaining? I thought he supported #Brexit.  
I’m tired, 5,500 miles from home and reading constant abuse in my timeline. Screw #Brexit and all the anxiety, anger and vitriol it has inspired. But love to all those that still want it xxxxxx  
That’s bollocks this is live action footage of Brexit and you know it.  
Britain granted a short Brexit delay and won't be breaking with the European Union next week  
'Bad boys of Brexit' were guests at Trump's Mar-a-Lago club || Via Guardian  
I may regret saying this but I have a feeling that tomorrow may be such a big news day that Brexit won’t matterOK I said itZero sourcing, just a guess. (I think the significant stuff already happened, in private, the Friday before last, but the mood music here is hopping) 
A 16 year old just aced this entire Brexit issue from end to end.  
This mini-thread really made the logic of Brexit (and in particular, May’s bizarre behavior) snap into focus for me.  
this is the adult equivalent of "I'm taking my football and going home" and everyone else laughing at him. a referendum to end equalization is the stupidest, most meaningless idea yet. but the election period just started, so....  
#Macron on #Brexit deal: 'We can't pretend after 3yrs that the British people didn't vote to leave'  
UK risks no-deal if parliament votes down #Brexit plan again - French President Emmanuel Macron  
Another  week is over I think we are still in Brexit Mode I have stopped listening  More interesting things to think about like June  5th That day cant come soon enough for us all...  
A British petition to cancel Brexit is drawing too much support for the U.K. government's website to handle — with the petition site crashing repeatedly on Thursday.  
Jason Kenney told reporters Thursday if a pipeline isn’t built or under construction by 2021, he would hold a referendum in Alberta on removing equalization from the Canadian constitution.   
17,410,743, Brexit is dead. Theresa revokes Article 50. 
The EU throws Theresa May one last Brexit lifeline | Analysis by @lukemcgee  
Petition to cancel Brexit crashes UK Parliament website due to high number of signatures  
15 million, and some leave backing politicians say they will consider having another referendum but only if the petition is shut down. 
Revoke article 50 and stop Brexit! 2,281,326 signatures and rising. If you're a British citizen or resident, this may be your last chance to get your voice heard.  
Brexit: and finally - If Anna Soubry is unable to go home because of death threats, she'd better get used to the idea of booking long periods away. If MPs want to inflict pain on UK citizens, they can hardly expect an easy ride when they do.  #Brexit.i  
BulSU Student Elections was basically:"Absolutely not""Ah ok""Exactly""Referendum vs Consultation""Student leader vs leader student" (fave ko 'to)"Magna Carta BulSU vs Magna Carta of UP""STTUUUDEEENTT GOVEEERRRNNMENTTT"*an open letter to*"Are you kidding me?"And 9-0  
3.9 million, the magic number. It’s perfectly possible to get another referendum with this number if it is being pushed by a party with a leader that has been on Question Time every sodding other week. (Bad luck Remainers) 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,281,326. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
It would be fascinating to have a Question Time follow-up program, like Extra Gear or Extra Slice, where the audience members who say "no deal Brexit will be fine" get quizzed on exactly how they expect it to be fine. 
Ministers in Theresa May's own government are trying to get her to change course on Brexit  
Europe offers Britain more time to resolve Brexit plan  
How would you describe @theresa_may’s premiership? #Brexit 
This perfectly encapsulates how I feel about Brexit.  
Brexit has led directly to the humiliation of this country because it was a foolish exercise cheer-led by incompetent non-nothings and blowhards who persuaded a slim majority of the public with lies and misrepresentations about what could be accomplished that the EU was the enemy 
If we can get over 4,150,260 signatures this would make it the biggest UK petition ever! It is already the 2nd biggest. #brexit #RevokeArticle50 
You know what cracks me up about Remoaners? They're happy to ignore a referendum where 17.4m people voted to Leave. A online petition with 2m signatures that ANYONE can sign, means Article 50, should IMMEDIATELY! Be revoked. Or we'll stamp our feet & have a Tiny Tears tantrum 
#Brexit uncertainty forces European company to stockpile toilet paper  
Our Prime Minister, in WM's Hell.Shallow is thy name.Thy kingdom is done, As your party is done.Give us this day our daily #Brexit.Forgive our occasional wins,As we forgive those who plot against us.Lead us not into subjugation,Deliver us from evil.#NoDealNoProblem  
Jason Kenney told reporters Thursday if a pipeline isn’t built or under construction by 2021, he would hold a referendum in Alberta on removing equalization from the Canadian constitution.   
I am going to vote for a Brexit party, that is willing to put country above party. A party that reaches out to other parties, of like, and suggest an alliance for seats right across the United Kingdom..Oh! That's @ForBritainParty Where Anne Marie has asked others to allign. FB. 
Indeed. Not only did the Dutch reject the EU constitution (Treaty of Lisbon) in a referendum (by 62% to 38%) now a 2 year old party promising to leave the EU has just won the largest share of the vote in their Senate elections.  
The Tories made the UK a global joke before Brexit.  We're a supposedly wealthy liberal democracy who elected a govt that systematically violates the human rights of disabled people, and forces the poorest into absolute poverty. A govt that has deprived people income for food. 
School indoctrination. Even my 12 year old niece was told that Brexit was about racism, by her Citizenship teacher in school no less. I put her to rights, obviously and explained how wrong it was to manipulate kids. She understood, thankfully. 
Special UK armed soldiers in ‘NUCLEAR-PROOF BUNKER’ have been ‘activated’ to prepare for Brexit  
#ICYMI “City of Miami wins lawsuit challenging referendum on Beckham soccer stadium.” via @MiamiHerald 
We need every patriot in London on  March 23rd. CBI & TUC are right: this is a national emergency. May must go. A better deal agreed without her Faragist red lines. A referendum held on that or Remain. This right wing coup must be stopped; Tories split. Our numbers really count. 
The chickens vote by referendum is genius 
Brexit: what next? New cliff-edge of April 12. Anybody would think EU was picking up can-kicking tips from somewhere   
Funny, the Brexiters we know voted for shite like this.....not a glimpse of pain here...just lies, treating the electorate with contempt and sunlit uplands. pic.twitter.com/7SRfJKckKs 
Brexit: Hundreds of gagging orders taken out by government  
Revoke Article 50 petition calling for Brexit to be cancelled hits two million signatures, only 15.4 million to go! Stop undermining democracy, the people of Britain and the UK Parliament voted to leave the EU, time now to deliver - deal or no deal..  
"As an Aboriginal lawyer, I welcome the endorsement of Australia's leading law firms for a referendum enshrining a First Nations voice in the constitution," - Prof Megan Davis, @UNSW Law. 
Don't forget she wasn't elected by the Tory party, her position was a gift of the '22, she wasn't elected by the people, her position is a gift of the DUP who are up to their necks in referendum fraud and now the '22 are again telling her what to do....it doesn't take a genius!  
You know where it comes from Carl? It comes from Brexiters like Redwood being allowed to repeat these lies in Parliament and on TV platforms unchallenged and then low information voters repeat it parrot fashion, it's a very effective method of spreading misinformation... 
EU27 unanimously agreed on its response to the UK’s requests on #Brexit. Watch the summary of the first day of #EUCO and find out more about the outcome of the meeting here:  
Isn't it funny how a majority of people coming out of our left-wing educational establishment all endorse left wing pro-EU politics and have a rabid hatred for anything to the right of Joseph Stalin.Majority of people polled before 2015 General Election wanted a EU Referendum! 
Despite the @UKLabour leader stating Labour is concentrating on agreeing a #Brexit deal with the #EU, some MPs are instead campaigning for the @Peoplesvote_UK organisation.If Labour’s deal is agreed it will be thanks to Mr Corbyn. The success, the victory, will be entirely his. 
Incredible. More than 2.2m people have now signed the petition to Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU.Keep it growing to keep up the pressure on MPs to #StopBrexit.Brexit is not the will of the people.Please sign, share, retweet and tag a friend.   
Brexit has not so much created the rupture between the people and the political class as it has illustrated it.  
I'm from the NI border - those communities have been rendered voiceless in Brexit by DUP working against their interests and Sinn Fein abstentionism, even though they'll be disproportionately impacted. #RevokeArticle50 
She is anti-democratic then isn't she. Anybody who supports ignoring the 2016 EU Referendum result is by definition autocratic and anti-democratic. 
What a crass & very offensive thing for @theresa_may to say. We need a Brexit Reset - let’s stop this madness now. Sign the petition & join more than a million others marching in London this Sat  #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeopleMarch #RevokeArticle50Petition 
The ref. was advisory. The decision to follow it was purely political. Politicians make many election promises, often genuine, which prove undeliverable in office. Brexit as promised is undeliverable. Face facts - it needs serious rethinking. Meanwhile.... 
I stopped watching #bbcqt a few weeks into Bruce's stint.She should never have gotten the job. She actually worse than Dimbleby.How can this sort of reaction be right? #bbcnews #skynews #Brexit #bbctw #Newsnight 
It's not even about Brexit anymore. It's about the treachery. You know, only 30 years ago, we had no evidence of the treason happening right under our noses. Today we have the internet. They are even trying to shut that down as we speak. Check out article 13. EU Comms act. 
56% of people want to #Remain - a huge 12-point lead, and growing.It’s time to Revoke Article 50 and stop Brexit: 
This was not some small operation, it was a full-on sophisticated campaign. And b/c of the Mueller investigation - and in contrast to the UK where Russian interference in Brexit is still a question - we know that Russia attacked our democracy. 7/ 
Brexit delayed: UK gets two new deadlines after midnight crisis talks  
Stop talking nonsense, Nick!Recent polls show there's a HUGE majority in favour of staying in the EU over her deal OR No Deal!And the #RevokeArticle50 petition now stands at 2.23 million!Most people DON'T want to "get on with it"!Most people want Brexit STOPPED! 
The majority vote was LEAVE. All this f*****g fuss!This Country can stand on its own two feet!All these folk that now say they didn’t understand what Brexit meant is talking B******S...... it’s like me saying I voted for the Conservatives but then changed my mind  
No. We voted for Remain or we voted for "easiest deal ever."  We did not vote for two years of tortuous politics followed by an estimated ten to fifty years of economic suffering.  Time to end Brexit madness  
Both Trump's election and Brexit will go down in history as moments of intense reactionary idiocy from which both countries will one day make a full recovery. They were built on the same lie: blame liberals, only conservatives can put things right 
And in a soft Brexit, this will be true for every summit forever more. A group of people making decisions about us, without us. It’s why it’s inherently unstable.  
One of the most vital things about this petition is that you do NOT have to be over 18 to sign it. Right now this is the only even vaguely official way for under 18's to express their opposition to Brexit to the government.   #RevokeArticle50 #VotesAt16 
EURef was a cry of help from people suffering the consequences of UK government policies & incompetence. They didn't vote for a damaging hard brexit wanted only by a small number of far-right MPs. Time to give the government another message: #RevokeA50Now 
Know what... let's just let England have their #Brexit. Feck them, we tried tae help and they didn't let us. That's the game.But we want out #IndyRef2 Have fun England And good luck  
Lots of constituents have signed this which is the fast growing parliamentary petition in history. 2 million people and growing, so far it’s about 7% of total voters at last referendum, I wonder if it can get to 10%  
I wrote this two years ago. My views haven’t changed as disabled people’s fight against welfare cuts slips further into a brexit oblivion and off newsfeeds. I will not, never, go quiet you effers! #DisabilityRights #thenakedpunk #BrexitChaos 
Portillo says: "if you do a petition the other way around, you get the same result". Well a poll was up for several months calling for a No-Deal Brexit. The #RevokeArticle50 Poll surpassed this 'No-Deal Brexit' total in the first couple of hours. #bbctw. 
In the light of what has transpired tonight Everyone who wants 100% Brexit needs to get behind UKIP 
My remarks after the European Council meeting (Art. 50): #EUCO #Brexit  
Today Leavers have told me they’ll deport me to the EU I love so much & that if I get my way we’ll all be governed by Merkel.As threats go, right up there with May’s “we may get no Brexit at all”. #RevokeA50 
This is a sad day.I have some BAD news.The United Kingdom assumed it had friends in Europe.We have NO friends in Europe.All EU 27 countries voted to delay Brexit until the 22nd May.We only needed ONE friend to veto.Our TRUE friends reside to the West of us. 
Even a long delay, a softer Brexit or a Customs Union, I asked May? She denied none of them: "What the Council has done is very clearly frame for people the choices that will be available to them”. So where are we now? Right back at the beginning of the week again (3/3) 
With every Brexit article I read, I understand the situation worse 
Before the Good Friday Agreement was signed they sent a copy of the full deal to every household in Northern Ireland & the Republic of Ireland and had a referendum on it. I know, right. A referendum where people get to see the deal BEFORE signing! #bbcqt 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,232,118. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
We could have spent the last 3 years fixing our broken politics, economy and society.Politicians should have the honesty to say Brexit fixes none of the real problems - we should #RevokeA50 and solve the real issues: 
Today Corbyn is developing a consensus across political parties in the Commons & has the EU agreeing with his Brexit policy......the mainstream media continue to get it soooo wrong #BrokenMedia 
1) OK this is going to get rantyThere's many things in #Brexit that are an absolute disgrace, but the bleating of those who laid the UK low with their arrogance complaining about the weakened position *they put us in* has to be up there #RevokeArticle50 
The EU just offered the U.K. an extension for Brexit. But just because the deadline is extended doesn't mean you should stop paying attention. On this week's #MakeMeSmart, we talk about why Americans should care about Brexit:  
No wonder Brexit is such a shambles, these people don't even know that you walk toward oncoming traffic so you can see cars coming at you.  
putting aside the fact Zuckerberg testified to@SenWhitehousethey received legal certification from Cambridge Analytica when really they received a legally useless document 16 months later after Brexit and after US election.@AGKarlRacine 
Both Trump's election and Brexit "will go down in history as moments of intense reactionary idiocy from which, we hope, both countries will one day make a full recovery," writes @mtomasky 
Brexit in a tweet.  
No one could have predicted how passionate Brits would become about UK EU membership almost three years after the 2016 Brexit Referendum which was supposed to close down further debate and become a permanent settled issue. I take huge comfort as a Remainer Tory that this is so.  
“David Cameron made the Referendum policy because he didn’t want to loose 10 or 15 seats to UKIP and look at where it has got us.”Incredibly eloquent 16 year old calls out the Conservative Party and holds them responsible for #Brexit. #bbcqt 
Straight off the bat with a lie.It wasn't the biggest democratic exercise because:1. the 1992 general election was bigger, and2. the referendum was defrauded so it is not even democratic. 
Maybot in full flow at the EU, "We gave the people the choice....they voted to leave...at the last general election, 80% of votes were cast for MPs who respect the referendum... AFTER ALL THE LEAVE GUILTY VERDICTS, WHERE ARE THE RESULTS OF THE POLICE AND NCA INVESTIGATIONS??????  
It's time 'centrist' Remainers stopped falling for this right-wing tabloid narrative placing the blame for everything on Corbyn's Labour and started to concentrate fire on the real Brexit culprits.Theresa May. The Tories. The Right. They own Brexit.Before it's too late. 
Brexit means Breakfast.Specifically Shredded Wheat.And not the bite-size ones either.Proper obnoxiously big ones.The British way.Pack after pack.Eaten dry.Crumbs spray the kitchen floor.The debris of progress.Each bite a triumph for democracy.Not a croissant in sight. 
Hilariously, the Daily Mail manages to frame this evening’s events, in which the EU wrested control of the Brexit schedule from Theresa May, as a victory for her  
I’ll be joining @chrislhayes on @allinwithchris on @msnbc live around 8.40/8.45pm to talk...Brexit madness in the UK! 
Brexit: Britain will not leave the E.U. next week after European leaders allow a short reprieve  
#RevokeArticle50Petition is easy to sign at  - only 15.3 million more votes required to pull back this country from the brink of a generational catastrophe that will not solve the problems the referendum brought to light. 
I remain unconvinced that #RevokeArticle50 or a #PeoplesVote are the best way forward, especially given the cunning plan that the EU has drawn up to help facilitate the removal of May and a softer #Brexit. But I fully understand why good people (as well as some bad) support them. 
This 16-year-old girl cuts to the core of the Brexit issue. The whole thing was a selfish ploy by Cameron and the Conservatives. Our Parliament remains the heart of our democracy. Feeling motivated on my journey back to London to support votes at 16 at General Elections. #BBCQT 
So much for Brexit being anti-establishment uprising!  
It's sad but they're going to be even more f***ed now, Lisa. Many of them voted for their own P45. It's a shame that Labour have persisted in pretending that they could deliver a 'better' Brexit instead of being honest with them. 
'Centrists' who took over the Remain campaign made a huge mistake. They didn't realise the people most likely in large numbers to support Remain - or change from Leave - are on the left. Many Corbyn supportersBrexit is a right-wing movement. 
Not good enough. Next week is too late. As long as May remains, she's a main threat to Brexit. One day Brexiteer MPs will be asked: why didn't you bring her down on a no confidence motion? It won't be enough to say: we were afraid of a Corbyn government.  
It's hard to really express the despair you feel when people who have been utterly destroyed by Tory policies back a Tory policy like Brexit to turn it around. 
Has anyone asked Theresa May recently whether Brexit still means Brexit?  We need to know. 
Here are just some of the ways that a 52-48 referendum which was called to keep the Tory party together, is set to undermine a 71-29 referendum which was called to put a cap on decades of terrorism & bloodshed. #BBCQT 
@eucopresident @JunckerEU @MichelBarnier @guyverhofstadt please understand that @theresa_may of @10DowningStreet is lying through her teeth when she says #Brexit is the will of the people. Only 26% of the British population voted #Leave in a criminally procured referendum result. 
Says everything it needs to. There aren‘t many positive stories out of Brexit. When history is written, one of those stories will be how 26 stood unwaveringly with 1.  
Brexit is 191 hours away. #brexit 
German Chancellor Angela Merkel supports European Council President Tusk's offer of short #Brexit delay  
Friday’s Guardian: “May’s appeal falls flat as EU seizes control of Brexit date” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (Via @AllieHBNews) 
Seems to me if EU can just change date we are just wasting our time the establishment can do what they like anytime they like .handing brexit over to our traitorous parliament is the last straw 
Let not underestimate the importance of this threadThe Ukgov is now forcing people against speaking out about Brexit. This is truly an awglful government that's gagging everyone who will be damaged by Brexit in order to the public from knowing.  
A Labour MP launched an extraordinary attack on Theresa May following last night's Downing Street statement in which she blamed MPs for the delay on Brexit  
29 March update.We are sorry to announce that the 11 pm Great British train to Brexit has been delayed. This is due to waiting for a driver to become available.We apologise for the inconvenience caused. We are sorry to announce Delay Repay does not apply to this route. 
Watch this lady tell it is like it is - if we get NO DEAL. Venezuela, Yes Venezuela folks!! (Don't even go there).Fortunately Tobias Ellwood gives her the nod of approval. He really is a terrible Brexit-hater.  
Dear FBPEers,Even 16-year-olds understand the people responsible for Brexit are the Tories, so why can't you?Stop falling for the tabloid anti-Corbyn narrative. Stop letting Tories and DUP off the hook and make them realise THEY will be held responsible for the Brexit mess.Tom  
Parliament has no duty whatsoever to deliver a deal that it clearly regards as not in Britain's best interests. Furthermore, May has no right whatsoever to defy Parliament's clearly stated wishes and take the country through no-deal Brexit. She has no right even to threaten this.  
Nigel Farage tried something like 7 times to get elected as an MP (failed). Tried to turn UKIP into a viable party (failed) trying to set up Brexit Party (failing) organised an iconic protest march ( failed laughably). The man is a joke propped up only by the populist media. 
She has a duty to investigate alleged crimes committed during the 2016 referendum.She has a duty to investigate Arron Banks. She has a duty to prevent foreign interference in UK Democracy. 
The Brexit can is kicked down the road again. @theresa_may said it OVER 100 times that "we are leaving the EU on 29th March 2019" #Article50 is now delayed. The new date is 12th April for a even further delay to come. Total stitch up in Brussels. 
No. This was very generous of them really. Brexit is broken, Iain. They are just giving us a bit more space. Why should they have their discussions about our future in public? That would be far more humiliating I’m sure. 
"#XREarthMarch has reached #Mortonhampstead", @XrWest"Hugely inspiring #ExtinctionRebellion NVDA", @livingprocess"Day 6... #EarthMarch see you soon @XRCardiff", @ExtinctionW"Forget #Brexit and find out why we need to do something about #climatechange - urgently!", @spride7 
One of the extraordinary things about euroscepticism is that across the EU it is fueled by the energy and enthusiasm of the young. But in the UK, the university-educated young are largely pro-EU. It has to be asked: What on earth is going on in our universities? #bbctw #Brexit 
The people in the U.K. chose BREXIT but weak leadership continues to fumble the execution. Let’s hope for Britain’s sake that our allies “across the pond” can find a strong and decisive leader like @realDonaldTrump to repudiate the EU Globalists and to get this done!  #MAGA 
@IanCLucas then really goes for it, "I think Facebook concealed the truth from us" "You are doing your best, but who does the buck stop with?" "The buck stops with Mark" 2/2 
I've turned off the telly. Sick of #Brexit and its malevolent hijacking of the agenda of our EU. Work for the 27, and leave the one to its own fate. 
The good news in delaying Brexit judgment day to April 12 is that John Major and Norman Tebbit, who respectively turn 76 and 88 on March 29, can now go out for a birthday dinner together and the conversation over the côte de boeuf won’t be too awkward. 
A lot of people havent grasped what happened in Brussels today.Theresa May basically revealed she was resigned to no deal #brexit - so the EU took back control and created a road out of this mess if...parliament takes it. 
It’s as if we live in a parallel #Brexit universe !!Nowts changed today absolutely nothing she’s failed again @jeremycorbyn @UKLabour attempt to reach out across the house to find a majority Brexit position is what @theresa_may should have done 2 years ago!  
Shocked #BBCQT didn't give any time to talk about the impact of  terror attack last week. 50 Muslim worshippers murdered. Today 5 mosques in UK were attacked with sledgehammers.The entire show was about Brexit (incase we haven't heard enough about it.). Appalling 
Soon as we leave the EU any French fishing boats in our territorial waters, the Royal Navy should torpedo them. Instead of going to Spain on holiday, pick the Isle of Wight, Devon, Cornwall etc. Instead of French wines buy scrumpy from the West Country. And so on #Brexit  
Why didn't Anna Soubry simply tell Farage to shut up, rather than let him talk all over her. People are far to kind to Farage with his rudeness and dishonesty. 
Schrodinger’s cat could be the answer to #Brexit Let’s be in and out of the EU at the same time. Just don’t open the box to see which it is so everyone is happy. Cats have all the answers @Number10cat @TreasuryMog @PalmerstonFOCat @HMCabinetCat @PanfurSquad 
.@theresa_may, take us out of the EU with #NODEAL & you can save your Premiership & the Conservatives! You will become a national treasure and coins minted in the future will have you face engraved! History will judge you, let’s hope it’s for the right reasons#brexit #eu 
Revoke Brexit 
.@JohnODowdSF speaking on #bbcqt tonight “The DUP don’t represent the north when it comes to Brexit, the majority of the people of the north voted to remain. Sinn Fein have made our voice heard in London, in Dublin and most importantly it's been heard in Europe”  
BBC Question TimeVerified account @bbcquestiontime ‘David Cameron made the referendum policy because he didn’t want to risk losing 10 or 15 seats to UKIP and look where it has got us’This 16-year-old says the Conservative...  
If you’re in a prison cell , u get fed , u get a bed , u get a roof over your head , u get privileges as long as you abide by the rules .Once you are released u aren’t guaranteed food , u aren’t guaranteed a bed or a roof over your head ...BUT you are happy to be free #Brexit 
Macron gives MPs both barrels: 'EU has responded to Brit political crisis. Brit politicians are incapable of carrying out what their people instructed. Their people voted for Brexit. Parliament has voted against the agreement & no deal. It's a true democratic & political crisis.' 
PAP's @kstrzepka & @LukaszOsinski reporting Tusk said a bit more on Brexit (a briefing with Polish journos?):Tusk: I would really want the Brits to take part in the EP elections and to seriously consider withdrawing from Brexit; the chances of that happening are still very low 
Tory idea of #democracy: keep raising the voting age until only Tories are left to vote.What should the voting age be?#GeneralElectionNow #bbcqt #Brexit 
Scratch 29th of March - there’s now two new dates for your Brexit diaries:22nd May - the day the UK will leave the EU if the Withdrawal Agreement is passed  12th April - if the agreement isn’t passed, Parliament has until this day to decide what happens next. 
hope that petition is a success so Britain can put this brexit thing behind them and get back to its glory days of killing people in Ireland 
I'm more convinced than ever that opposition to Brexit is about an elite political & cultural class trying to cling to power. The fundamentals are clear: we are a uniquely strong country; world leading.Yet Remainers are determined to stop us moving on. This is about them, not us 
The best reason for a no deal Brexit, apart from immediate British independence, is that it would probably destroy the Eurozone. Value added on a mega scale. 
Jo, I got bad news for you....An online petition calling for a second EU referendum has been hijacked by automated bots adding false signatures. @Me72Bite @GerardBattenMEP @ukip @SupportOurLefty 
When Mark Zuckerberg declined the invitation to answer questions from the @CommonsCMS and sent Facebook executives instead, lawyer @IanCLucas was like a dog with a bone, and rightly so it would appear...1/2 
3987 signatures from Spain, huh? How could there possibly be so many British voters in Spain with an interest in Brexit? Explain *that*, Remainers!  
May's most recent "meaningful vote" was last Tuesday.It's now Friday (in Brussels).Which means it's taken her nine working days to get a two week extension to the Brexit deadline.Superb. 
You and your Brexiter friends did this to us, Iain. You sold us a Brexit with no plan or understanding of negotiating. You left us supine to foreign powers. It’s on you 
So potentially a new #NoDeal #Brexit scenario on 12th April. There is no way a UK PM could oversee an abrupt exit from EU during the school Easter Holidays when many families are abroad enjoying a spring break. It would be electoral suicide. 
When Brexit finally happens, I wonder if Remainers will hire a bus and write on the side of it:"Let's send £350 million to the EU instead of funding our NHS!"And can we call them liars if their suggestion doesn't immediately become government policy? 
Everyone needs to calm the fuck down . Revoke article 50.  Take a break from Brexit and revisit this thorny issue once the construction of  HS2 is complete . 
"I know MPs are frustrated too"UK PM Theresa May says she is grateful to all MPs across the House of Commons who support her #Brexit deal as well as those with concerns about it 
If you signed @revokeA50. All you need to do is get nine aquaintances to sign up and the numbers will exceed those in the referendum. That couldn't be ignored. #RevokeArticle50 
Fuck Brexit. Just occurred to me that I’ve never tweeted that. So, yeah. There we go. 
John Bercow needs making a ruling TOMORROW on whether #MV3 can go ahead.There's no point wasting time until next week if it can't be brought.#MayMustGo #Brexit #NotOnMySide #bbcqt 
I got divorced in 2014. We got a date. We showed up in Smithfield with all the documentation and it was done. I didn't ask for an extension - because adults plan ahead. #Brexit 
Theresa at the podium saying the referendum was "the biggest democratic exercise in our history".Just a reminder that turnout was 72%.But Scottish Ref was 85% turnout. 1950 General Election was 84%.May's "biggest" claim is only trivially true, because of population growth 
Journo reminds PM A50 petition has reached 2million, asks.. "Are you sure #Brexit is still" will of the ppl"PM - Biggest decision blah blah  
Once, in Nottingham, I saw a drunk guy shout "FUCK YOU, WATCH THIS!" at a woman and then run into a wall and knock himself out.I don't need to go much deeper into this Brexit analogy, do I? You get that we're the guy. 
Fiona Bruce is like a fucking parrot on @bbcquestiontime . Every week she grudgingly asks the Labour Party rep what is Laboutr's position on Brexit. The Labour rep explains - as they have week after week. Bruce says  the same thing again. It's bollox. 
By automatic operation of I'm sorry BY THE POWER OF GREYSKULL, Brexit's off for a bit.  
In the coming weeks, you are going to see hit piece after hit piece on all brexiteers, mps and anyone that wants brexit as radicals. She has extended it to finally kill of the will of the people.. SEE YOU ALL ON THE 29th at DOWNING STREET ITS TIME TO SHOW OUR ANGER! 
BREAKING: Britain granted a short Brexit delay and won't be breaking with the European Union next week  
This P always difficult to read. But on Weds she said UK would not hold elections to EU parliament while she is PM. Now she simply says holding those elections would “not be right”. She is opening the door to long Brexit delay on her watch. Brexiters in her party will go bonkers 
Interesting! Islington North voted #Remain by 3:1. Jeremy Corbyn's continued support of any form of #Brexit could therefore put his position as an MP in jeopardy if there is a General Election.  
Theresa May asked whether she's still confident that #Brexit is the will of the people, given 2m signatures on the #RevokeArticle50 petition.She blathers about "the biggest democratic exercise in history".As if the wholesale criminality & foreign interference never happened! 
The EU know Theresa May is belligerent, obtuse, ineffective and deluded; just look at this... They are under no illusion, Theresa can't formulate a plan to fight her way out of a paper bag let alone this #Brexit madness of her party's own making. (Full: ) 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 2,138,983. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
For all the talk of EU splits,a classic the good cop/ bad cop routine from Merkel and Macron. The interests of the 27 on Brexit are more or less aligned, after all.  
ANOTHER extension? Oh yeah, let's just keep having extensions and hope people forget about the Brexit thing...  
Opinion: There is a way to topple Theresa May and stop a no-deal Brexit – this is how it could be done  
Sinn Féin’s @JohnODowdSF says the DUP have a responsibility for the current Brexit situation. #bbcqt 
Theresa May AGAIN lies that the 2016 referendum was the 'biggest democratic exercise in our history.'IT WASN'T. More people voted in the 1992 General Election.Nobody calls her on it. 
"I do not believe that we should be revoking Article 50"UK PM Theresa May speaking after the EU agrees a plan to delay #Brexit beyond 29 March  
May on the petition to revoke article 50. She says that is the duty of the government and parliament to deliver the result of the 2016 referendum. 
Right. Next stage now clear. We either vote for the Brexit Withdrawal next week (I will), and it it falls, take control, switch to PlanB and get Agreement to join #EFTA @EFTA4UK by April 12th. With or without this PM. 
May holding door open to softer Brexit if her deal rejected again? Tells @tnewtondunn if MV3 fails "we need to work with the House to decide how to proceed" 
If nothing else, this crisis has put a pin to the balloon of Britain’s puffed up sense of superiority - the very arrogance that helped fuel Brexit in the first place. 
After a petition to cancel Brexit reached more than two million signatures, the Prime Minister said: "I do not believe we should be revoking Article 50." 
2million in 24hrs petitioning to stop Brexit! As EU offer 3 weeks for MPs to reject Govt’s #Brexit & change course, please join us at Saturday’s #PutItToThePeopleMarch to tell MPs: end this fake ‘jobs-first’ Brexit nonsense & give choice to #StopBrexit 
Prime Minister Theresa May says the plan outlines the "importance of the House of Commons passing the Brexit deal next week so we can put an end to the uncertainty" 
Brussels has taken back control of the Brexit process.Dictates terms of Brexit delay. Even effectively dictating the timing of arguably the most crucial vote of May’s premiership.Total humiliation. 
Parliament delegated the decision to a referendum. The fact 17.4 million people gave 500 remain MPs a decision they dislike is not a valid reason to turn the United Kingdom into a tinpot dictatorship.Parliament vs People#bbcqt 
There should be a general election to allow political parties to put their Brexit policies to the people, according to this young audience member. #bbcqt 
Nice effort @jamesmatesitv  - tries to get PM to rank her Brexit choices. She even laughed at the idea she might answer a question. 
The leaders of 27 European countries spend one evening in a room together and thrash out an agreement on Brexit. Meanwhile, the leader of 1 country spends three years failing to get her own party to agree on Brexit. #EUCO 
I’ve just switched off #BBCQT... this woman just said No Deal Brexit  would be like a Venezuela situation.OMG this is an illness 
BloggedBrexit and the extension of EU membership: the legal issues:  
As expected, European leaders concoct yet another stitch-up in Brussels, once again kicking the can further down the road and our pathetically weak, submissive "leader" graciously accepts.The battle is far from over. Help us save Brexit at  
oh i'm in the mood now! and i am PUMPED for the march on Saturday!! will you join in our crusade?who will be strong and march with me?somewhere beyond the Brexit mess is there a world you long to see?then join in the fight to #RevokeArticle50!!  
French President Emmanuel Macron says UK risks no-deal if parliament votes down #Brexit plan again  
I hate Brexit SO much 
'The cliff edge dates will be delayed'Donald Tusk sets out the EU's newly agreed Brexit extension plan  
I mean to have you, Brexit, even if it must be burglary  
When will the Labour Party leadership get it through their thick heads that the vast majority of LP members and voters and a significant majority of the British people do not want Jeremy Corbyn's version of #Brexit. We want to #Remain. 
‘It just makes you lose the will to live’@pollymackenzie says Brexit should be taken out the hands of MPs.  #bbcqt 
It's bonkers that anyone who doesn't have millions and a hedge fund would still think a hard Brexit is a good idea. It's not unlike Stockholm syndromeEither that or dippy dangerous @theresa_may is listening to Russian bots and #bbcqt stooges 
The EU agreed to extend Brexit to May 22, but only if UK parliament backs Theresa May’s deal in a vote next week. She has lost 2 votes so far. If it doesn’t, a no-deal Brexit could occur on April 12 unless the UK agrees to hold EU elections.  
Wording of these extensions very uncomfortable. 'Indicate way forward' sounds like more extensions, more compromises. April 12th feeling like a new set of cans to be kicked to delay Brexit day. This will not bode well with Brexit voters. Or tired ppl (i.e. everyone).  
In the end todays #Brexit discussion was all about history.Theresa May showed EU-leaders that she was prepared to accept a hard Brexit - if just the EU was to be blamed for it.EU-leaders responded by leaving it to the UK to decide between hard and soft Brexit by April 12 #euco 
This is the most sense I’ve heard about the Brexit shambles, funnily enough it comes from our youth.- Party politics - direct and representative democracy - extension of article 50- call of a general election- taking responsibility of generational decisions - votes at 16/17  
As I predicted there has been a stitch upMarch 29th is now meaninglessEven when May's treaty fails again we stay until the 12th of April.This is the start of the disintegration of democracy and law in this once great country#Brexit#BrexitBetrayal 
But they were on same side during referendumWhat I don't get is why TUC isn't saying to Labour to back the deal and therefore secure an orderly exit  
Applause at audience member on #BBCQT, when he says we should go to WTO #Brexit.Immediately host says "I should point out, that's only a handful applauding, it just sounds like a lot".*turned back off*#PropagandaPoodles.BBC is rotten, it needs to end. 
So Brexit will be the end of May. It could be in April. Or she could go on forever. 
The EU has agreed to delay Brexit until the 22nd of May - IF Theresa May's Withdrawal plan is passed in parliament next week.If the Prime Minister's deal fails for a third time - the EU says an extensions until the 12th of April would be put in place - on certain conditions. 
Breaking News: The European Union approved a short extension for Brexit in hopes of averting a chaotic departure from the bloc next week  
the biggest betrayal with brexit is the lies they told to get votes. The Brexit that was sold is not available and under the consumer rules of agreeing to a deal that doesn't live up to what was promised, I reject Brexit in every shape and option. I will not entertain it. 
I cancelled my Next account after watching him support Brexit.  I think I'm responsible for this Next profits fall but boss says Brexit not affecting spending  
In sad news for television stations everywhere: the Brexit countdown clock has been dealt a hammer blow by tonight's arrangements. 
BBC piece on the #RevokeA50 petition: ‘political suicide for any prime minister to overturn a referendum result... Remainer MPs are now calling... for the govt to do just that’. Except that referendum was advisory, as defined in the law, so not ‘overturn’.  
I think the good news about the Brexit fiasco is that it has established beyond reasonable doubt that 1) karma is real and 2) god is watching 3) bigotry is self-defeating. 
Revoking Article 50, passed overwhelmingly by parliament consequent to the largest vote in British history, endorsed by both major parties in 2017 General Election, will shatter for ever faith in democracy in Britain and risk social peace in the country. #Brexit #BrexitAlliance 
The #Brexit extension to 12 April still requires a change in UK law which will need to be approved by both the Commons and the Lords 
Donald Tusk has just implied (in a response to a question) that there is plenty of space in hell for MP's who refuse to pass May's deal.He's got it dead wrong.MP's blocking the a Tory Brexit are doing ABSOLUTELY the right thing.The deal won't pass next week.GE on the way. 
European Council President Donald Tusk tells media that EU leaders agree to delay the #Brexit process- 22 May, if MPs approve UK PM's withdrawal deal next week, or- 12 April, if the deal fails 
No.The call for a referendum on EU membership started long before cameron.We voted.The people spoke.We're leaving.Get on board.#Brexit 
JUST IN: EU offers Brexit delay to April 12, postponing no-deal risk. European Council President Donald Tusk says UK Prime Minister Theresa May has accepted the delay offers at a joint press briefing with European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker in Brussels 
I'm anti-Brexit and disagree fundamentally with Theresa May's politics while also not respecting her at all as a statesperson or a human being, but in the interest of unity I will acknowledge that "the people voted for pain" is a metal-as-fuck thing for a PM to say.  
A slightly teary eyed fuckity night to the two million people who appear to be at least as fucked off with #Brexit as I am.  Everyone else, get it signed.  
I voted RemainAccepted the vote, believe in upholding democracyAm in favour of May deal believe it’s soft #brexit aligned with vote marginEU attitude REALLy pissing me off. Thinking bollocks, go for no deal. 
On the issue of Brexit, the British Prime Minister Theresa May invokes only her own blank sense of obligation, of continuing with something no matter the cost:  
Dead. #Brexit  
Brilliant contribution from this young woman. Young people will face the consequences of Brexit for longer than many of us and they had no say. Their voices should be heard now - they are talking sense!  
We don't. The public are ready for WTO. Delay is a trap to take WTO off the statute books so that they can drag out BrExit chaos until they find a way to keep us in or under the control of the EU. 
Press conference with Tusk + Juncker ends in laughter after journalist asks Tusk if the special place in hell he said should be reserved for chief Brexiters without a plan should be expanded to incl MPs who don’t vote for #Brexit deal. Tusk said hell still had lots of space left 
A Scottish National Party MP has described the DUP's influence on the government over the Brexit deal as "incredibly unhealthy".  #bbcqt 
I get that Parliament have handled Brexit atrociously, but I'm unsure of the purpose of this 'Revoke Article 50' petition. Is the idea to disregard democracy entirely, or are people hoping to reach more than 17.5m signatures and call it a 2nd referendum / 'Peoples Vote'? :S 
MV3 on May plan no longer on Her Brexit deal; it is confidence vote in her premiership.  EU Extension of deadline to April 12 recognises this #BrexitVote 
He’s right.How stunning that the EU, with the unanimous agreement of 27(!) countries, bails us out with a decisive, fair and well communicated plan in 24 hours. Meanwhile those who promoted Brexit 3 years later...  
“If the British government would come back to us saying… we need to go back to the people, either through elections or a new referendum... we cannot possibly stand in the way of a democratic process,” says Belgian MEP Philippe Lamberts#newsnight  | @ph_lamberts 
European Union leaders have reached a deal on British Prime Minister Theresa May's request for a Brexit delay.  
"According to our Pope, hell is still empty. So there is a lot of space..." says Donald Tusk when asked about the Brexiteers."This is an appropriate time to end the press conference" says an aide... #Brexit 
Tusk says hell is empty and lots of space for those who promoted Brexit without a plan 
JUST IN: EU Council President Donald Tusk outlines the 2 Brexit extension options:1. If withdrawal agreement is passed by House of Commons next week, EU agrees to extension until May 222. If House does not approve withdrawal agreement, EU agrees to extension until April 12  
BREAKING: If British Parliament approves Brexit deal next week, EU has agreed to extend deadline to May 22. If Parliament rejects, the deadline will be April 12.  
I mean good luck to the petition signers, but presumably the government are aware that loads of people are against Brexit as there was a fairly well publicised vote about it a few years ago. 
So emotional Donald Tusk says he's personally satisfied that so many #Brexit options remain open. Thought before the meeting it could be uglier. 
Tusk says “so many options are still open” Says he’s feeling “much more optimistic” #Brexit 
'This all goes back to David Cameron...I'm 16 years old, I didn't get a say in Brexit' This #bbcqt audience member thinks Brexit was born out of party politics. Do you agree? :  
The Prime Minister gambled and it didn’t pay off. She didn’t speak for two million people and rising. Incredible democratic moment in the Brexit saga. I expect the signatures to keep on coming too.  
It looks like Corbyn will now lead the betrayal of Brexit. People will have to know and understand this. He and his party must be made to pay the political price of their perfidy. 
.@eucopresident and @JunckerEU asked how long a long Brexit extension would be.  “Till the very end” says Juncker. And Tusk keeps schtoom. 
The DUP's Brexit spokesman Sammy Wilson says his party will not be "threatened" into voting for the government's deal.  #bbcqt 
And when you can have a workable solution to the Northern Ireland border you can have Brexit... 
European Council Conclusions on an extension of Art 50 #Brexit.  
EU removes Brexit “cliff edge” to ensure that a rejection of PM’s deal next week doesn’t automatically lead to No Deal  
A petition calling for Theresa May to cancel Brexit by revoking Article 50 has passed a million signatures, causing the UK government website to crash.  #bbcqt 
This means that a long extension is on offer for a referendum - & maybe something else which isn’t a unicorn, but those creatures don’t appear to exist  
Tomorrow bitch I'm drunk rn x #Brexit  
‘David Cameron made the referendum policy because he didn’t want to risk losing 10 or 15 seats to UKIP and look where it has got us’This 16-year-old says the Conservative Party are responsible for Brexit. #bbcqt 
If Brexit is not delivered, there (may) be civil war.  Reasonable opinion.  If the Leicestershire Constabulary would like to discuss the idea with me, please give me a call.  
Juncker says EU did everything possible to get a #Brexit deal - now “closes and completes the package” with the extension . EU can do no more he says 
Keep tweeting this and retweeting it, every few minutes. We need to make it impossible to scroll more than one screen without seeing a link to it. Let's hit 3m signatures TONIGHT #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
Demos Chief Exec @pollymackenzie says Theresa May has been too focused on her own party over Brexit. #bbcqt 
Alright, alright, I signed the petition - not because I believe it will actually achieve anything, but because Brexit is an absolute disaster and May should see that a large chunk of the public is NOT with her over her intention to follow through with this shambolic travesty. 
BREAKING: Donald Tusk says EU has agreed to a Brexit delay until 22nd May if parliament approves the deal next week. The delay is until 12th April if it does not. 
BREAKING: EU offers U.K. Brexit delay, postponing risk of no-deal 
Brexit extension dates agreed by EU and the #Brexit clock still ticks down. We must all be clear that Ireland will not be collateral damage in Tory Brexit. 
Tusk confirms 2 new Brexit dates. May 22nd if PM deal passes. April 12th if MPs reject. Now over to Mrs May1) For MPs, space to come up with an alternative plan (& put it into law?)2) As for for PM, less incentive for MPs to agree her deal. And will party now try to remove her?  
European Union leaders have reached a deal on British Prime Minister Theresa May's request for a Brexit delay  
Revoke Article 50 petition calling for Brexit to be cancelled hits two million signatures  
Labour MP @NickTorfaenMP says Theresa May has been ‘entirely reckless’ on Brexit.  #bbcqt 
Live: Donald Tusk and Jean-Claude Juncker give EU Brexit update  
BREAKING: EU approves to delay BREXIT:- March 29 exit called off- If British MPs approve a deal next week, Brexit happens on May 22- If no deal is reached, UK has until April 12 to indicate a way forward(BNO) 
Public Blame MPs More Than May For 'Brexit Situation'  
#EUCO Press conference by EC president @JunckerEU and @eucopresident Tusk on #Article50 #Brexit  
Nicola: a coherent voice in the Brexit shambles. Willie Rennie gets telt.  
LIVE NOW - my remarks following the #EUCO working session on #Brexit  
BREAKING.... Petition To Revoke Article 50 And Remain In EU Hits TWO MILLION . #EU #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
I demand we abolish Article Pluto and demand a new referendum!   
So a 2 week extension to decide whether or not to cave in and back the ‘deal’ or defeat it again and have a longer delay to work out what to do. In that event would mean holding Euro elections. Could hold a general election while we are at it. No time to make it a referendum. 
‘With the clock ticking down, what is best for Britain?’Conservative MP @Tobias_Ellwood on Brexit. #bbcqt 
EU's Brexit delay.If MPs do not approve Prime Minister's withdrawal deal: 12th of AprilIf MPs approve Prime Minister's withdrawal deal: 22nd of May 
Correction, over 2 million have signed and growing minute by minute. On Saturday hundreds of thousands will fill the streets of London calling for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit. The Brexit campaign can only muster a couple of thousand on a good day. 
The European Council has confirmed EU leaders have agreed a plan which would delay Brexit from 29 March to 22 May on the condition that MPs approve Theresa May's withdrawal deal next week 
European Council conclusions on Brexit now published. Explanatory blog post on the legal issues of extension of membership up soon.  
Watching the EU tonight never loved Brexit more! Honestly, what an appalling bunch. 
Confirmed: #euco EU27  agrees…- Brexit delayed until May 22 if the  House of Commons backs the Brexit deal at third attempt next week - Brexit delayed until April 12 if it does not; door not closed to further talks about what happens in that case  
27 (!) countries manage to define clear options in 1 (!) evening! Pretty pragmatic compared to the UK drama. #brexit #euco 
Or perhaps no Brexit? 
Two million signatures & rising. #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Petition 
Hundreds of thousand will fill the streets of London on Saturday calling for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit. At the same time 2 million have signed a government petition demanding A50 be revoked. We don’t want Brexit! 
UNITED KINGDOM: A petition to parliament to cancel Brexit reaches 2 million signatures 
If #Brexit succeeds all those Remain extremists in media & politics  are finished & they know it. What credibility can the likes of Adonis, Lineker, Cooper, Esler, Cox, Grieve, Boles, Soubry, Maitlis, Peston etc have in a post Brexit world. 
EU OFFERS BREXIT DELAY TO APRIL 12, POSTPONING NO-DEAL RISK 
So, looks like if May gets her withdrawal agrrement approved by MPs next week then Brexit is delayed until 22 May. If she doesn't, then Brexit is delayed until 12 April - unless there is a request for another extension (may require participation in EU Parliament elections). 
The anti- #Brexit petition has reached 2 million, despite repeated site crashes..  
Full story of today's rather lively Brexit #EUCO 
'Kenney vows to hold referendum on equalization payments, challenge Bill C-69'  
UK media really cranking up the propaganda.They fear the #Brexit endgame is here & this is the last push.Nauseatingly deceptive today, markedly worse even than they have been.We need to teach these feckers a lesson, UK.UK Media should NEVER receive a penny from a UK citizen. 
If you lost the Referendum and then lost the election reaffirming the Referendum result and then spent the next three years trying to overturn the will of the people I'm afraid you're the fucking extremists. 
Gina Miller: Here’s the Brexit speech Theresa May should have given last night  
European Council (Art. 50) conclusions, 21 March 2019 #Brexit #EUCO 
Scotland’s gammon Tories want to gag our democratically elected Parliament in Edinburgh(Holyrood) to prevent them talking about #Brexit from the party that Turned their back on their constituents against the wishes of 62% of our country & wanting no deal!  
You don’t hear much about Brexit nowadays. 
Which means Brexit delayed until May 22 - if May’s deal passes. If not MPs have two weeks to take control of process. Then PM has to decide/ will be told to take part in EU elections (long delay) or not (crash out).  
May's appeal falls flat as EU seizes control of Brexit date  
Those serial losers, the CBI and the TUC, are trying to reverse the EU referendum result. If these self-serving corporatists succeed, there is no point ever allowing anybody to vote ever again in this country. #StandUp4Brexit 
i sat down with an authoritative old source of mine to explain brexit.  
Guardian front page, Friday 22 March 2019: May’s appeal falls flat as EU seizes control of Brexit date  
If you think a #nodeal brexit would be disastrous for UK, & if you believe (as I strongly do) that the negative economic effects would disproportionately impact on those communities already struggling with austerity cuts, please sign #RevokeArt50 petition 
Now it looks like the Brexit the British people voted for (no deal) is  looking possible again & time is running out - watch the MSM empty their armoury. We’ve already seen the nuclear threat today but worse is to come. Project Fear to become Project Threat. 
27 (!) countries manage to define clear options in 1 (!) evening! Pretty pragmatic compared to the UK drama. #brexit #euco 
Sign it, bloody sign it. What else can we do at this point? It's a lie to say the people voted for this mess, they didn't. The Brexit that people were promised is not going to happen and none of us want to be worse off.    #RevokeArticle50Petition 
In all the pro-EU petitions I've seen, former mining area are notable for showing very little support. The EU had no role in ending coal-mining and has been instrumental in trying to bring new development to such areas. So why are they so anti-EU?#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit  
Listening to the news that the EU27 now accept that May isn't bluffing about a No Deal Brexit. What must they think of her, that she'd rather risk lives and peace and consign the country and her neighbours to economic ruin, than to compromise. She must really hate foreigners. 
We don't care a toss what "kind of #Brexit" MP's want, @BethRigby.We've all SEEN what they want, and it's capitulation & deceit.UK voted to leave, not to be scuppered by lying self-enriching thieves & charlatans in Westminster.#NoDealNoProblem. 
Unlike US convulsed partisan politics, or Brexit-paralyzed Britain, New Zealand’s response has been marked for the unity it has sought to foster: local communities have honored the dead while Ardern has taken on the role of national healerBy @kcalamur 
Sir Graham Brady has delivered the Prime Minister a message over her handling of #Brexit - time's up 
EU leaders have made a unanimous decison on a Brexit at the Brussels summit  
BREAKING: EU prepared to delay Brexit until the 12th of April 
Theresa May is not only pouring billions of YOUR money down the drain for #Brexit - she’s spending it on targeted @facebook adverts trying to influence MPs to vote for her dreadful deal!!! RT if you object to your taxes being used in this way! Time for #FinalSay @peoplesvote_uk 
Almost two million people have signed an online petition calling for the British government to cancel Brexit by revoking Article 50  
Breaking: Theresa May set to ask the Scottish national football team how to leave Europe quickly. #Brexit #BBCQT 
2016: "There will be no downside to brexit only considerable upsides"2019:"The people voted for pain"  
Time to chat to @raziaiqbal on @BBCWorldTonight about the Brexit roadmap for the next week. Remember, though, that politically we are in the pre sat nav era. And no one is much cop with a compass. 
This gives MPs space to vote down May deal & then hold votes on an alternative Brexit proposal, which they presumably could then try to turn into a statute? (Assuming an majority for something can be found?)  
EU27 unanimously agrees on its response to UK’s requests. I will now meet PM @theresa_may. #brexit #euco 
MY GOD I'm sick of your lies! This is only the beginning! No deal brexit then get on with our lives? What when we start facing the consequences of it and you sit in luxury? Twat!We WERE getting along with our lives before you came along like a f**king cancer in the arse!  
It is easier to imagine the end of the world than the end of Brexit 
Reporting on Brexit finally broke Laura Kuenssberg & the news at 10  
"There are no ninjas. There is no door" is my full summation of why Brexit is and was always going to be a disaster. 
Exclusive: Theresa May told by chairman of 1922 committee that Tory MPs want her to quit over Brexit  via @Telegraph 
EU to offer Britain Brexit delay to May 22 if parliament approves withdrawal agreement. If it rejects, extension granted to April 12 -- then it's either no-deal or agree to hold European elections to allow further extension. 
Friday’s GUARDIAN: “May’s appeal falls flat as EU seizes control of Brexit date” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 1,902,969. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
funny, how the neighbors Norfolk Terrier will bark whenever i so much as close a car door, yet is wholly silent on Brexit 
Heading toward two million. #Brexit  
The unnamed Cabinet minister is right "We can't be the party of Remain. [May] will face Cabinet resignations but that won't matter. The only way we can survive as a party is by delivering Brexit."  via @Telegraph 
Katya Adler is the MVP of Brexit broadcasting. 
Tory Laura kuenssberg when Theresa may lost last weeks Brexit vote. #bbcnews @bbclaurak 
BBC News losing the line to Brussels as they cover the Brexit shambles is about as symbolic as it gets. 
The problems behind Brexit is that the EU has been used as a scapegoat for years by MPs for their own failures. Brexit isn’t sticking it to the Elite its what they want. They’ve been scamming us for year and EU want to put a stop to it.Brexit will only benefit the Elite 
May today claims ‘Brexit is the decision of the British people’. But she hasn’t got sufficient respect for the British people to ask them in a #PeoplesVote whether, knowing what they know now after 3 yrs of her Brexit mess, they want to #ExitFromBrexit and say #LetsStay 
Every citizen who is worried about #Brexit should sign this.  @theresa_may won’t listen to Parliament.  Perhaps she’ll listen to the people #RevokeArt50 #ConstitutionalCrisis 
This is what Brexit has unleashed. So sad. Mike used to be a friend, but now threatens me with the guillotine. For the sake of our democracy & society we have to rediscover the political ability to disagree politely.  
I guess the best we can hope for is:1) Government falls2) Corbyn gets in, negotiates a deal, which is unanimously rejected by everyone, Corbyn falls3) Brexit is cancelled, Corbyn becomes a recluse, The Tories all take a crowdfunded one-way trip to the moon on Virgin Galactic 
Exclusive:Eight Remain ministers *today*  warned chief whip they could quit if she blocks free vote on new bid to stop no-deal BrexitCross-party group of MPs to table amendment that could force PM to accept longer extension to A50 if her deal fails 
Why doesn’t Theresa May invite Alex McLeish to lead her Brexit negotiations? He has just managed to get Scotland out of Europe in 90 minutes. 
"John Bercow is one of the few heroes of Brexit. He has made it possible for parliament to do its job of holding the government accountable to the people"  
The #RevokeArticle50Petition has 1.8 *million* signatories. That’s absolutely crazy. Sure, it’s a fraction of those that voted in the referendum, but when you consider that the petition to leave the EU without a deal has only 375 thousand signatories it seems significant. 
How's the whole "they need us more than we need them" and "taking back control thing" going lads? #bbcnews #Brexit 
“#BREXIT has driven people on both sides crazy, or at the very least into behaviours of which they would, in their right mind, feel somewhat ashamed “....More terrifyingly wonderful,scintillatingly depressing prose from Marina Hyde |Opinion | The Guardian  
EXCLUSIVE:Sir Graham Brady, head of 1922 committee, told PM on Monday that Tory MPs want her to quit over Brexit during meeting in No 10He told her a growing number of MPs think the time has come for her to go amid fury over A50 extension 
#RevokeArticle50 petition now at 1,830,692.  #Brexit 
A short extension isn't about giving Parliament a final say. It's about taking a WTO exit off the table and blocking BrExit. It's a trap by your REMAIN politicians to deny you what you voted for. We must get MPs to ensure we LEAVE on March 29th. #BBCNews 
Jeremy Corbyn opposed Theresa May’s deal from the start.Jeremy Corbyn is backing a second referendum.Jeremy Corbyn hasn’t ruled out revoking Article 50 to prevent a no deal Brexit.Jeremy Corbyn is offering pro-EU activists a lifeline.Join Labour:  
To be honest, could rUK have afforded to Brexit without NS oil? Not to mention if we had won, Cameron would have resigned. It's very sad to think how much we lost on that day. Just because our opponents lied. 
This is now the petition with the second highest number of signatures ever! Second only to one calling for a second referendum.  
The structure of the short extension means that we will either have a long extension or no-dealWith no-deal, no-Brexit and soft Brexit all still in play, there is no chance that May’s deal will pass the House of Commons.There is no incentive for any faction to fold next week. 
On #Brexit day I'm going to get completely pissed, give all my money to a Nigerian Prince and then set fire to my house. I call it "taking back control". 
Brexit: EU leaders prepare to decide Britain's fateHow Humiliating!  
Former Channel 4 editor Paul Mason breaks down why the UK media has lost it over Brexitby @wrightismight 
Today on the Daily podcast: One million people sign petition to cancel Brexit.The petition has had the highest volume of signatures on record - and at one point, it caused the official petitions website to crash. Listen to the full episode here:  
 Please, please, please could you include a "revoke Article 50" option next time you get your guests to do a "what do you think will happen next with Brexit" exercise on the magnetic whiteboard? Timely given petition. Many thanks!@maitlis @KirstyWark @Emmabarnett @BBCNewsnight 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 1,830,692. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
You need to sign and RT it right now. It will take you three minutes but it will have a real impact on the courage of MPs wrestling with what to do. Your audience isn’t May. Your audience are the MPs who oppose Brexit but lack the courage to stop it.  
After a day of acrimonious debate in her Cabinet, the Prime Minister decided that she was willing to take Britain out of the EU without a deal.If she cannot secure her Brexit deal she is determined the UK should embark on a no-deal exit. 
French @EmmanuelMacron presser @EUCouncil #EUCO just confirmed:BREXIT EXTENSION TIMELINE:If May’s MV3 is approved next week, the UK will have an extension until May 22.If May’s MV3 is rejected, the UK will have an extension until April 12. 
Privy Councillors have been summoned to the Cabinet Office for a meeting tomorrow at 2pm for a briefing on Operation Yellowhammer, reports @DArcyTiP. This is about last minute No Deal Brexit planning. 
Excellent from Rowan Williams on Brexit, the radically undemocratic nature of our system and the search for the common good  
PM has lost itParliament in chaosBrexit job losses over 200kMillions of people in crisisNo “good brexit” possible#VoteLeaveLies exposed#RevokeA50 petition: HIGHEST RATE OF SIGNUPS IN HISTORY#LetUsDecide #PeoplesVote #OptionToRemain 
The emerging extension plan is quite clever.  Avoids cliff-edges. Extension till May 22 if Withdrawal Agmt passed.  If not passed by April 12th, either No-deal Brexit, or UK can go for much longer extension.  Would require fighting Eur Parl elections. 
The country rightly judges that the time for half measures - and any form of Brexit - is over. It has been tried & collapsed. It needs to be ended, completely & immediatelyArticle 50 should be revoked by next Thursday 
Brexit: May sitting outside the room where the heads of 27 other countries are determining our fate. A strange definition of ‘taking back control’! We should be in the room, sitting at the top table, an equal partner! 
Nigel Farage held a poll on Brexit and it backfired badly  
So the #EUCO provides three options for the UK:1. Agree to May’s deal next week and leave the EU on 22nd May; or2. Reject May’s deal next week and request a long extension before 12th April; or 3. Reject May’s deal next week and crash out on 12th April in a no-deal Brexit. 
In all fairness, the EU sorting out Brexit on behalf of the UK is quite literally the most Brexit thing that has ever been Brexited in all of Western Brexitdom. Or something. 
Keeps the Brexit jeopardy of next week’s Brexit vote. Gives MPs till 12 April to launch and complete coup against @theresa_may. Completely effs up Easter holidays 
If you haven't seen this - it is Theresa May's lawyer, Sir James Edie, telling the Appeal Court that she knows all about the Brexit corruption but has decided to carry on anyway. 
So it seems the EU will give UK an extra two weeks to avoid a no deal Brexit. Imperative now that Parliament takes control away from PM and uses that time to agree a way forward - preferably asking for a longer extension to put the issue back to voters.  
There's a shock. Mairead McGuinness, Ireland's only MEP since Brian Hayes handed over his crown, is on #rtept discussing #brexit.Nobody else counts. 
Dear @theresa_may. Please try to accept this: if you extended the deadline by a century, Brexit would still be a disaster.It’s just not possible to leave the EU without hurting millions and millions of people, here and abroad. Please stop. 
Tories 2015 to 2018: "Brexit will be the easiest thing in the world, there is nothing to worry about plebs, go back to sleep!"2019: Activates a team in a nuclear bunker and puts in place a plan to rescue the queen from braying mob  
I signed this. I don't expect to change anyone's opinion on the matter.I'm telling you this because I don't want there to be any doubt as to my opinion.I've seen nothing to change this. opinion since the referendum. I want us to stay in the EU. 
In your judgement, if MPs don't deliver a true Brexit, do you then consider them traitors? 
Wonderful news. This will really annoy Remoaners who hate Israel. Israel to hold referendum on replacing Britain in EU | Jewish News  
UK Happiest Ever Despite Brexit  
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 1,753,194. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
This is very clever. It gives May a chance to get her deal through. When that fails (as they know it will) she has two weeks to work out what to do next. It basically takes No Deal off the table and opens way to softer Brexit. But of course she has to say yes first.  
The scare stories coming about No deal again .. I realise it sells papers and gets online clicks but let’s have it right .lets be honest nowNo one will notice one iota anything different in the days after a no deal BrexitEveryday life will be exactly the same#scaremongering 
"Can't believe UK gov has allowed country to find itself in similar position to Greece. Now Britain finds itself without respect." #Brexit  
There's only ONE Plan B that's fool proof which'll avoid the worst disaster in modern British History & that's to #RevokeArticle50 Stop #Brexit & #Remain in the EU with our current Best Possible Deal.Anything short of that is FANTASY.We are in a Natl Emergency just STOP IT!! 
Am at my mum's and I swear a No Deal Brexit ain't gonna be a problem cos a regular Asian shop is basically stockpiling anyway #BulkBuyingAtAldi 
Forgot tae mention a bit o guid news fae the fitba the ither nicht at Tannadice. Run intae an auld neebour wha confessed tae votin naw in 2014, but Brexit has chynged him intae a convinced Yes voter. Jalouses he’ll hae the opportunity tae richt the wrang an mak siccar gey suin. 
LATEST: EU 'draws up own plan' after Theresa May's 'unconvincing’ Brexit extension plea 
A senior EU official tells me that on the basis of what has been decided, "in agreement with PM May":- either WA approved by UK MPs next week, then orderly Brexit on 22 Mayor - 12 April disorderly Brexit, or request for another extension 
UPDATE: An agreement on the Brexit extension is imminent, reports @tconnellyrte in Brussels, as EU leaders continue discussions 
all brexit has done is proved that brits are little freaks 
Leaders agreeing to unconditional extension till 12 April unconditionally. If MPs approve the #Brexit deal next week, there’s a short extension till 22 May. If UK wants more time will need to tell EU by 12 April (so as to be able to take part in elex for European Parliament 
I sincerely hope this is going to happen.  We need a VONC pronto, a stay on Art. 50 while we have a GE and a new administration that has what is best for the people of this country at its heart, not what's best for the carpet-baggers making a mint out of Brexit. 
Brexit hasn’t even happened and I’ve been contacted by bank to check I’m legally resident in the ‘UK’ because the Irish passport they have on file is ‘foreign’. Christ the night, if no deal happens we’ll all be F-ed if this stuff is happening already. 
If Brexit was a computer game, you’d hit quit and load up a save point from about three years ago. 
BREAKING: Theresa May rushes to appoint Alex McLeish as new Brexit Secretary as he will guarantee being out of Europe in March 2019 
I don’t trust May one inch. If (or rather when) her useless deal is rejected again by MPs, I’m sure she will connive with the EU to delay Brexit and sell us out. If she had an ounce of political sense or courage she’d just get no deal across the line.   
She was not speaking for me. My frustration is mostly due to her appalling handling of Brexit. Followed by my frustration with a weak Opposition. 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 1,688,600. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Leave voters across the country find it hard to believe that Remain MPs, Ministers or even the Prime Minister ever really intended to deliver a meaningful Brexit.  
While uncertainty continues to loom over Brussels summit... Tory grandee Oliver Letwin has put down an amendment to the government's Brexit motion, for vote on Monday, which would allow MPs to take control of the order paper on Wednesday to forge a way forward on Brexit  
MPs have done little other than lie & try to cheat the electorate since #Brexit became a thing in 2016.To now blame @theresa_may for the disconnect THEY have caused with the General Public is simply another lie.These clowns couldn't lie straight in bed.#NoDealNoProblem 
EU27 locked in discussion over how long to allow the UK to delay Brexit. Meanwhile the UK Prime Minister & several hundred journalists wait outside to hear the upshot of their deliberations. I'm guessing the rest of you are agog with apathy. 
Brexit has had online competition from #WorldDownSydromeDay today.#Brexit is a soul eating, negative, avoidable, divisive, headline grabbing boil of pointlessness & #WorldDownSydromeDay is a joyful, proud, marvellous, celebration of utter bloody brilliance. Bugger of Brexit 
We can’t wait to re-join the #MarchToLeave tomorrow Mansfield here we come! @LeaveMnsLeave @BeatriceGrant_ #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit #LetsGoWTO #LeaveMeansLeave 
You know, I don’t think I could have been clearer or more consistent since early 2017.I’ve done my level best to help inform and prepare as many people as possible for a no deal Brexit.Whatever comes, I tried. I really did.  
“How’s Brexit going?” “You know, so/so”“What stage are you at now?”“Ah, you know, activating our secret nuclear bunker under the ground stage”.  
Whoever you are, wherever you are, come to London on Saturday to put Brexit out of its misery once and for all!You will be welcomed by hundreds of thousands of kindred spirits!#RevokeArticle50 
If this is true this is both generous and clever from EUCO. Makes ‘wild Brexit’ (as the Spanish call it) a UK decision, but one that takes the pressure off (a bit). 
The FT still struggling to come to terms with the referendum result.  
This is enjoyably fierce - David Hare on the Brexit debacle ... (David Cameron and George Osborne should look away)  
Brexit talks are in turmoil as British PM Theresa May fails to win over European Union leaders  
UNITED KINGDOM: A petition to parliament to cancel Brexit reaches 1.5 million signatures 
The irony of it all is that Farage and co always told us the EU was cooking up decisions for the UK behind closed doors. It’s taken their sodding Brexit for it to actually come to pass. 
And this is not the benefit of hindsight.At every *single* step of Brexit, the government was told of the mistakes it was making, of the errors which have led directly and naturally to this almighty Clusterfuck.Every single step.They were told.  They did it anyway. 
Petition to cancel Brexit crashes UK Parliament website due to high number of signatures  
⁦@sammywilsonmp⁩ says Brexit is going to be ‘slow and messy’ but it’s what people voted for. So that’s ok then.  
Brexit news:#MarchToLeave now working out new daily routes so they still arrive in London on the eve of Brexit, that’ll be May 11th or May 22nd or June 29th or never.What to do? 
#Brexit #RevokeA50Now BREAKING TONIGHT:Sources are reporting that May has privately concluded that she WILL PUSH AHEAD with #NoDealBrexit if her next attempt to get her deal voted through failsThis is brilliant newsShe would instantly go from ZERO to HEROBring it on!  
"Well, the ppl voted for pain".. Even If those exact words didn't leave PMs lips, I think its obvious it was what she was implying. #Brexit  
I know it’s a disaster for my mental health but I’m pondering watching #bbcqt tonight on the basis that any Brexit question is going to release mind-bending levels of audience batsh*ttery. It’ll be the shouty, foamy equivalent of the last 10 mins of 2001 A Space Odyssey. 
UK could not be in a weaker position about Brexit.There has been complete policy failure.UK so weak EU is sorting out the exit for us. and will let us know.PM has destroyed her position in Parliament.The shambles is absolute.This is what a Clusterfuck looks like. 
anyone else struggling to get Expressing gratitude daily from their pharmacy? think it might have something to do with brexit :(  
Theresa May lost power in the 2017 General Election, with it she lost her mandate to deliver Brexit. Instead of reeaching out for consensus she has dictated the disastrous path and driven UK to the cliff... #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeA50Now #PutItToThePeople 
May"hem" in Brussels tonightBrussels CHAOS: EU27 unity FINALLY breaks on Brexit – leaders row erupts over delay  
Mrs May is to be congratulated she has managed to piss off the EU, the #CBI ,the #TUC, her own MPs, parliament and the British public. She said she would unite the country and she has. #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
"Revocation – cancelling Brexit – returns us to where we were before we triggered Article 50. All of the special benefits – the rebate, the opt-outs, the derogations – that we had negotiated for ourselves over the years are ours to keep. And the immediate outcome – remain –" 
A series events protesting Brexit are taking place in the coming days  
4. Some 300 trucks a day carry all of Gibs imports. Many perishables come from the UK on 40 trucks a day.5. Delays of 7 hours can happen at the border when things get messy. This would be the norm after Brexit, thus crippling Gib.6. Delays at English Channel make it worse 
Ok,now I am free to talk about Gibraltar, here's some hard Brexit facts;1. Approximately 9,000 people cross the border from Spain DAILY.2. Of these, many are Brits including MoD staff who can't afford/find housing in Gib.3. Many Brits in Spain send their kids to school in Gib 
As #Brexit talks continue late into the night, join @SophyRidgeSky,  @faisalislam & @Stone_SkyNews for all the twists & turns - live on @SkyNews 
Latest attempt to seize the Order Paper away. If no approved Meaningful Vote before Wednesday:Precedence for backbench #Brexit Business & Substantive MotionsIf there’s more than one Business Motion, Speaker chooses If Business Motion approved, indicative votes.  
I have to agree with @simon_schama on this. There is nothing close to a majority for "no deal" Brexit at Westminster. Yet the game of chicken now being played between London and Brussels is not guaranteed to end with one or both players swerving.  
I'm worried about Theresa May stuck without food whilst the EU27 are having a working dinner.Can someone Deliveroo her some Nando's or something #EUCO #Brexit 
The will of the people was the actual referendum 
We’re also in this mess due to the intransigence of @jeremycorbyn 
They say time flies when you're having fun but, if the 1,000 days we've had since the Brexit vote are anything to go by, it also flies when you're in unimaginable pain.Here I take a look into how it's all gone for us.SPOILERS: Not very well: 
Sky News can reveal that the government has taken out hundreds of gagging orders as part of its preparations for a no-deal #Brexit  
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 1,552,836. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
A brilliant anti-Brexit account that’s worth following: Hats off to the magnificent @antic2000 
New song: YOU HAD YOUR CHANCEBrexit has failed; time to put it out of its misery. Sign the #RevokeArticle50 petition: Join the #PutItToThePeople march, London March 23rd:  
The way "older" people (and their Brexit votes) are being spoken about is awfulThey've worked; managed household budgets; raised families; paid taxes; shaped a free society and experienced hardshipIrony being, respect for elderly is something many European nations DO have 
'Go-slow' protest planned on the M62 motorway over Brexit  
#BREXIT May is clearly not rational. She's quite happy to let the country go to the dogs as long as the Tory party survives. May makes Trump look like a truly magnificent leader. -JO 
Print journalists now seriously stressing about deadlines. Overheard in Brussels: “I’ve tried writing it in a way that doesn’t need much fucking around with” #Brexit 
A reminder that May's deal is illegal.In 2011 Cameon passed the "referendum lock", that any new EU Treaty or transfer of powers would need approval at a referendum.May's "deal" is an EU Treaty. It transfers powers. It has not been approved by a referendum. 
This your moment. Speak for the decent, the hesitant, the reasonable, the vulnerable, the confused and the fearful. Save our country. We will support you. #Brexit 
Any suggestion of a referendum at this juncture is ridiculous. The mechanisms to get us there will absolutely not be put into place and even more to the point, there’s nothing to keep corruption away from the result. It’s time to revoke. 
If Brexit is betrayed, at least we Leave voters will have been vindicated in our decision to reject the establishment. We have seen up close a political class whose contempt for us is matched only by its own incompetence, writes @Tom_Slater_ 
My guess on the sentiment inside #EUCO session is that EU-27 leaders have concluded that May is headed for a no-deal #Brexit, so they will come up with a reply & dates that could enable the HoC to take control of Brexit and possibly strike a cross-party deal. 
Brexit is 194 hours away. #brexit 
Feeling helpless at Brexit? Here's something you can do which will literally save lives, many many lives. Take that churning in your stomach, and anger at the government, and turn it into something good. Please give generously - people aren't noticing this disaster.  
Keeping people in the dark about impact of no-deal Brexit on jobs & businesses is reckless, shameful & sadly, totally in keeping with Ministers’ behaviour to date  
ResignI'm working on Brexit disaster planning for an industry where 115,000 jobs are at risk. Corbyn's failure, your abject failure to oppose Brexit will stay with me for the rest of my life, I will never forgive you#RevokeA50Now 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 1,503,966. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
Forget all this Brexit dross .. we now have a 23.19 level emergency to deal with ...   
They’ve been so worried about the Brexit mob that they haven’t counted on the Remain one. 
Diplomatic sources told that the 7 May deadline proposal was binned.Now they're discussing a double deadline:-22 May, if the deal will be approved next week by the #UK Parliament-if not, the Britons should say what they want to do no later than 11 of april.#EUCO #Brexit 
Never thought I’d live to see the day the West Ham fanbase took to Twitter to defend an IRA sympathiser. Thanks, Brexit Britain. Thanks.  
I spoke to Terry Gross @nprfreshair about my @newyorker profile of Arron Banks. Russia, Brexit, and Dijon mustard all covered.   
Brexit not as stressful as Fleabag 
“You’re an absolute disgrace!” A Brexiteer felt the wrath of Iain Dale when he said it’s “not a bad thing” if Remain MPs are a “bit scared” for their safety @IainDale | #Brexit  
Not really; being outside the room where the adults are making the decisions is a pretty perfect metaphor for Brexit in its entirety. 
It’s not remotely extraordinary. This is what Brexit means - ceding control and being outside the room when the decisions are made. It’s only news to the hard of thinking.  
As Churchill said ‘we are fighting by ourselves alone, but we are not fighting for ourselves alone’ The EU is a failed project and WILL fall. Again, the British lead the way for hundreds of millions of disenfranchised Europeans #brexit 
#EUCO Brexit update: discussions ongoing, so this hasn't been finalised, but I'm told option under consideration is an extension until May. If the deal doesn't pass, UK has until 11 April to say what it wants to do. i.e. exact wording will be key but seems like onus will be on UK 
For #Brexit Republic podcast listeners, @tconnellyRTE & I will be putting out this week's edition tomorrow. What can we say? We needed a short extension... 
Glad to see Arron Banks keeping it classy, looks like he's smelt the scent of defeat in the air...his masters won't be too pleased, hope they don't want their money back  
Anna Soubry 'can't go home' because of death threats over Brexit  
We used to wonder how a civilised European country could rapidly descend into the madness of Nazism. Brexit is not Nazism, but it is a lesson in how quickly an apparently stable country can sink into political madness. 
2nd referendum will rip the UK apart No matter what side ur on with Brexit Just look at the state were in Even on twitter, @UKLabour voters r turning on each otherI have been arguing & unfollowed by other @UKLabour voters I use 2talk22nd referendum would b poison 4 UK 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 1,478,382. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
When are these Cabinet ministers going to fund principle and courage and force her to change tack. Which they could —- ministers believe risk of no-deal Brexit now 'very real'  
Don’t be put off I tried to sign the petition this morning at 9am I got the confirmation email 30 minutes ago. By my reckoning there should be a surge in numbers for the next 12 hours! Keep going #RevokeArticle50Petition #brexit  
Petitions are a million a penny.  This one is a phenomenon!1.4m signatures, up 40% in just a few hours.Sign and help get it to ABOVE 17.4 million and send the world message!Democracy isn't just one moment in time!#Brexit #RemainRebuildAndReform 
As #JohnBercow made clear today, “The sole duty of every MP is to do what he or she thinks is right.” Please support your #MP to do what they believe is right for the country regarding #Brexit. That’s their first duty. Read @Jon_Danzig’s commentary at:  
Thank you and the staff who must be working under enormous pressure from people up and down the country who simply want their voices to be heard on Brexit - and also want the best for their communities and their children.  
Stop Brexit: A million people sign UK petition to stay in EU  
Kenneth Clark (C4 news)“The referendum should never of happened “Opinions? 
Interesting that the national mood has switched so suddenly and markedly away from second referendum to revoke A50... I suspect a lot of politicians are scurrying around trying to figure out what’s going on. May’s TV Special has spectacularly backfired.  
When historians look back on Brexit, a key part of the analysis will centre around the fact that the EU had a political class expertly schooled in administration while the UK suffered from an almost unbroken chain of rule by aristocrats who governed based on birthright alone 1/ 
Scotland’s Tories want to gag Holyrood to prevent then talking about #Brexit From the party that Turned their back on their constituents!  
Brit in #Spain here. And yes, I signed the #RevokeArticle50 petition.I'm here partly BECAUSE of #Brexit, hold a British passport and retain a right to vote in UK general elections for (I believe) 10 years.#LEAVE claims are anti-democratic as it seeks to remove my voice. 
Am I wrong or wouldn’t the first thing you would do after the Brexit vote is get the civil service to draw up a huge document on all the potential consequences. Did this happen? If not, why not? London asked this about Scottish independence! 
Labour MP Lloyd Russell-Moyle grabbed by Brexiteer who branded MPs traitorsThe Labour MP says the man tried to hit him and bent his glassesIncident occurred just 24 hours after Theresa May blames MPs for her own failure to deliver Brexit 
What can you do if you're hacked off with the way that Theresa May and her Government have been handling #Brexit?You can march for a #PeoplesVote this Saturday and demand that Parliament #PutItToThePeople! 
As an Aboriginal lawyer who often feels like I have to fit a mould to fit into the profession, I am proud that 18 major law firms accept the invitation in the #UluruStatement as a ‘historic mandate,’ for a *Voice* referendum as a national priority, towards treaty & truth.  
I’m done with Brexit for tonight. It stinks! Our Prime Minister is an embarrassment. By way of changing the tone slightly I simply ask.....What is you favourite word ending in ‘ion’? Any language! Let me know 
Jeremy Corbyn to meet Theresa May on Monday in bid to stave off no-deal BrexitSpeaking in Brussels, the Labour leader said he will sit down with the Prime Minister ahead of her third attempt to get her Brexit deal through the House of Commons   
Looks like EU27 structuring a UK "flextension" departure, just as it structured the negotiations.Brexit by timetable continues.Control of process and exploitation of negotiating strengths and weaknesses.Like the Greek bailout.Every Brexit turns into a Grexit in the end. 
Macron: If May’s Brexit Deal Rejected Again ‘It Will Be a No-Deal, for Sure’  
BREXIT: "I fought in the Second World War, now I am fighting for a second referendum"/#Brexit #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Please please sign this petition. If you care about this country #brexit #RevokeArticle50Petition #RevokeArticle50 #remain #thinkofthechildren 
Perhaps the only good thing about this whole #Brexit shitshow is that’s its inspired ⁦@MarinaHyde⁩ to still new heights. She writes so well it seems unfair. This is outstanding commentary and absolutely on the mark.    
Two representatives from Ireland attend referendum trial, while mayor of Naples signs manifesto calling for release of Catalan proindy leaders.   
 No Deal?Brexit: Military steps up preparations in case of no deal.Operation Redfold will direct some 3,500 military personnel who have been put on standby for a no-deal scenario.The MoD already had 100 military planners helping with no-deal Brexit 
Another EU diplomat, asked about the many possible Brexit extension dates floated by leaders, quipped: “So many dates. It's like Tinder.” #euco #POLITICO 
Let's check in on how things are going in the UK with that whole Brexit thing... 
When is May going to realize that nobody in the UK wants her stupid deal ! N O B O D Y !!!!!!!! #brexitpetition #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE #Sodem 
Maybe Leadsom is hoping it does get to 17.4 million so she can forget about Brexit and get back to hating on gays  
I've remembered the UK's safe word. Its "Revoke"  #FBPE #Brexit #Populism #BrexitVote #PeoplesVote #ExitBrexit #BrexitDeal 
If you are a Brexit supporter, I’d still like you to come and watch our gigs and buy our records. Don’t worry about that daft stuff I’ve been saying : / Thanks 
The #RevokeArticle50 petition is up and running again, and at 1.31m.The largest Leave petition got a mere 375,654  signatures. Remainers are the real mass movement, and we are the people who really care about the country.#Brexit 
Brexit is like agreeing to go on a night out and then being told it’s in Wakefield and you can’t back out. #RevokeArticle50Petition  
The coordinated Number 10/EU pantomime about May considering No Deal has been given up on already after seeing it won't work and MV3 will fail They're back to trying to get Brexit delayed/cancelledI'm sure more performances will be put on shortly, really isn't great acting 
Twitter are now verifying parody accounts. SKY now saying killer robots are being sent back from the future jn order to kill members of the ERG and prevent no deal Brexit wch ruins the economy of the #EU and Germany over thext 25 years 
The ‘Cancel Brexit’ petition has hit one million signatures. That represents 16.4 million fewer people than who voted to Leave. It’s quite amazing that in a mature democracy these bad losers can hope to overturn the will of the people with a petition. 
This amazing photograph of EU officials comtemplating the Brexit deal is like something out of Caravaggio. 
Crunchtime in #Brexit discussions at late night #EUCO meeting 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 1,411,867. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
The political illiterate and innumerate, AC Grayling:1. Doesn't understand ANY of the root causes of Brexit2. Is in such a privileged beyond belief bubble that he thinks all Labour supporters are just like him3. Doesn't understand the concept of 'government' and 'opposition'.  
Today on the Daily podcast: One million people sign petition to cancel Brexit.The petition has had the highest volume of signatures on record - and at one point, it caused the official petitions website to crash. Listen to the full episode here:  
Theresa May's choice:No deal brexit & be hated for ever & go down as the PM who self inflicted serious harm on this country that took decades to repair if ever repaired at all.OrRevoke article 50 and be embarrassed for a few months. 
John Bercow escalates his Brexit war with Theresa May with furious slapdownSpot on from the Speaker & @DianaJohnsonMP 
11 things politicians said about Brexit which now look very silly  
How Theresa May decided she was willing to accept a no-deal Brexit -  
A no-deal Brexit is back in play. Here's how it could happen  
So the #EU are taking control of #Brexit because the #UK won't 
Brexit Truckers set to ‘bring the country to its knees’ by BLOCKING major transport links!  via @UnityNewsNet 
2016: "There's no downside to Brexit. It will be the easiest deal in history."2019:  
Brussels CHAOS: EU27 unity FINALLY breaks on Brexit – leaders row erupts over delay  
Jesus, some guy just called in to @IainDale and said that MPs deserve to feel a “little bit scared”. Theresa May has so much to answer for beyond her Brexit shambles. 
40+ people were killed in NZ and every media outlet in SA broadcast it daily and 1000+ people died in #MozambiqueFloods and all I see on news channels is #Brexit in  Europe and Trump#PrayForMozambique pic.twitter.com/G5t4Sz23eA 
negotiated or no-deal Brexit, MPs and ministers would have just under three weeks to decide what kind of Brexit (if any) they want, when they would want it and whether Theresa May should be evicted from 10 Downing Street before all the daffodils have gone. This is a Brussels... 
who view that prospect as trumping party loyalty. Civil war could break out in Labour and Tory parties. And remember May has said a long delay would be over her political dead body. So if the EU finally announces this complicated formula for a short or long Brexit delay, and a... 
May’s elections to the European parliament, or else leave the EU on 7 May, WITH OR WITHOUT A DEAL, sets up the debate in parliament @theresa_may was desperate to avoid. It tells MPs of all parties they have 20 days to decide whether to opt for a long Brexit delay, a delay that... 
The Brexit postponement plan being discussed here in Brussels - for hours longer than expected - has the potential to tear apart the government and Tory party, and Labour too. Because its explicit proviso that the UK has to decide by 11 April whether to participate in... 
UNIT. phone the Doctor guys. The Doctor can stop brexit.  
Let the record show that the @Telegraph liveblog of March 15 made reference to "flextension".... does the fossil record show any earlier example? If not I'll gladly take my seat in the first circle of #Brexit hell. 
Graham from Reigate just suggested that some MPs should be made to feel afraid, so they bow to Theresa's brexit.Well done @IainDale for cutting him off. 
We have MP's who can't make their minds up on #Brexit & then we have amazing heroes like those on #diysos who get off their backsides & actually make a difference to people's lives...I know who I prefer  
No such thing as a jobs first Brexit, Keir. You know that. So why not be the one to cut through all the crap and save us all? #RevokeArticle50 
Sources saying May would prefer No Deal to a longer extension.She would prefer what she knows, as fact, would be a national catastrophe, and may lead to deaths, to a later date for Brexit to happen.This is, genuinely, deranged. 
No Deal Brexit is gaining support. It would mean that we can get on with the rest of our lives.  
If Theresa May loses Brexit MV3, and Jeremy Corbyn were to come out loudly and clearly for revoking Article 50, I believe that would hand Labour the next election. 
how can anyone be this wilfully ignorant of what the public want?we don't want Brexit.we don't want Lexit.we want to stay in the EU.i don't know how to make it any clearer.#RevokeA50Now#RevokeArticle50#RevokeArt50#RevokeArticle50Petition 
One website.One measly website...But hey... Govt says we’re ready for no-deal Brexit (and we have Grayling)   
Capitalism: Most people have high welfare.Socialism: Everyone has low welfare. What do Labour want? Extreme Socialism... Look at history, it has a tenancy to repeat itself. #Brexit #Politics 
ICYMI: the leader of Nigel Farage’s Brexit Party resigned after we turned up loads of racist tweets from her account.  
French President Macron says Britain risks no-deal if parliament votes down #Brexit plan again  
Sheer damage of a crash-out no-deal #Brexit is so obvious - yet still some MPs prepared to contemplate it! If we can’t get proper A50 extension at EU Summit, then MPs must consider #revoke for a #PeoplesVote Look at massive public concern about this! 
A petition to cancel Brexit drew the most online support the U.K. government has ever seen, causing the Parliament-run website to crash repeatedly. The petition's organizer hoped the 1 million signatures would be a "slap in the government's face." 
Today the CBI says that only 4% of firms are ready/could deal with a no deal Brexit, the fall out will be catastrophic and jobs losses will be just one result and yet I’m the one being told I’m the thick fuck for not wanting a no-deal-Brexit. Go figure. 
Waiting on Brussels to determine Brexit. Taking back control.  
Our government is not carrying out the "will of the people", it is carrying out the will of Vladimir Putin.#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit  
International derision happened back in 2016. Number 3 is the only sane option. Are we really going to go through with Brexit because we’re scared of a bit of embarrassment?! 
After Treeza decided to go all Tommeh Robinson last night I can’t say I’m surprised this happened. Brexit is getting uglier everyday and needs to Stop !  
In other words, unless the EU is as mad as we are, there is no path now to harder Brexit than May's deal, and lots of paths to a softer one. So what's the ERG strategy? Is there one? 
Dear @andrealeadsom I am unable to attend the march in London on Saturday, owing to medical conditions whose treatment is now jeopardised by your own hard Brexit obsession. Be aware that there are well over 17.4 million of us who refuse to stand by while you wreck this country. 
This evening is just a taste of our future if Brexit happens in any form. We will have to have a relationship with the EU even after a no deal. That relationship like the terms of an extension to Article 50 will be determined by 27 EU leaders. We, the UK won’t even be in the room 
A day after the PM blamed MPs for failing to implement the result of the Brexit referendum, ⁦@Anna_Soubry⁩ told reporters: “I can't go home this weekend, I'm not able to go home this weekend, I am not safe.”What a disgrace ⁦@theresa_may⁩ is 
Whatever happens in the coming days, one thing is clear: the Prime Minister has no mandate and no right to threaten our country with a no deal Brexit. If she is unwilling to show leadership at a time of national crisis, then Parliament must be given the chance to do so. 3/3 
So if MV3 happens and fails, then it's in the EU's power and interest to offer another conditional extension so that MPs can take control. This would make Brexit softer, which should mean the ERG supports MV3 so none of that happens. So why don't they? 
Hate to repeat myself. But the @BBCNews channel and @SkyNews has given the Revoke Article 50 petition 24-hour long free advertising every 60 minutes.How anybody on the Remain side can claim that the press is in favour of Brexit after this showing is baffling?! 
No review. No plan. No preparation. No dialogue. No respect. No courtesy. No diplomacy. No expertise. No judgement. No realism. No integrity. No teamwork.No Brexit? 
Pro-Remain Highlanders to join Scottish invasion of London for anti-Brexit march Welcome all! #PutItToThePeopleMarch #RevokeArticle50 #StopBrexit  
Only 4% of members of #CBI and @The_TUC members are prepared for #NoDealBrexit. @AlexChalkChelt are you seriously proposing economic collapse to 'honour' a flakey referendum?  
Enough. You know who’s being betrayed?The nurse I spoke to yesterday whose GP can’t get her a new Epipen for her 4 year old with anaphylaxis. Why? Because Brexit’s buggered the supply chain. Can you even imagine the stress of that? Do you even care? #PutItToThePeople 
EU splits as soon as No Deal Brexit is seriously on the table. Imagine what could have been achieved if this had been pressed home far earlier.  
Friend who works for the EU: "All Brits in EU Delegations are now being brought back to European External Action Service HQ by 1 April because of #Brexit! Europe has decided that they cannot be in EU posts abroad..."#EU27 isn't waiting around.#Article50 
Listen, I don't care about #Brexit, I don't rate Politicians as leaders. I don't care about what other Countries are doing or what they intend on doing!But if one thing is certain and that is if you come between me and my family, you will get my full attention  
No seriously, why is Parliament voting on the May Brexit deal a 3rd time reasonable but the public getting a 2nd vote is an affront to democracy? 
Brexit dinner menu - I wonder what Theresa May is eating in the delegation room  
Here’s latest we have on EU leaders Brexit discussions which are *ongoing* so things could change considerably again before they come to unanimous view. - extension until early May (no longer conditional on TM deal passing)- extension until end of year if UK commits to EP elex  
ok it looks like britain is going to 'get on with it' with 'it' being #brexit i believethis looks official my frens this is the real deal i am serious i mean has this person ever steered people wrong before 
Bercow defends Parliament after Brexit delay: ‘None of you is a traitor’ Hang on for a moment they are traitors they going against the 17.4 million.We voted in 2016 yet you the remainers are holding it back why? Because you can’t accept that you lost and that you won’t gain!!  
“The Brexit deal has been rejected again”Theresa May:  
Brexit is 195 hours away. #brexit 
The German Chancellor supports Donald Tusk's offer of short #Brexit delay  
Article 50 author Lord Kerr talks to Sky News about the UK's options in the last remaining days before Brexit is scheduled to happen.Get the latest #Brexit news here:  
Tonight's Reporting Cringeland was shocking even by its standards. A total Londoncentric report from Campbell on the Brexit disaster followed by Taylor bigging up Rennie's horseshit ref independence today and finishing by telling us that Jackass Carwash has ruled out Indyref2! 
NOBODY WANTS A F**KING DEAL!Brexiters want NO DEAL!Remainers want NO BREXIT!You absolute useless excuse of an opposition leader! 
Ms. @VeraJourova , PLEASE look at those judges... Laughing... Meanwhile MY government faces serious sentences in jail for organizing a referendum. No words, just sorrow and a feeling of danger in #EU#MakeAMove#giveyourselfaribbon 
MPs and big businesses have NO  right to stop #Brexit. We were promised it was our decision. Please RT to show @theresa_may and @Conservatives they have 17.4 million ppl behind them. They need to #StandUp4Brexit and deliver 
"Meanwhile the 2 party landscape that once dominated our First Past the Post system has frayed. In 1950, Winston Churchill won 38% of eligible votes & still lost. The year before the referendum, the Tories got a majority with just 24% of the eligible vote"  
Developing: The EU is debating an unconditional Brexit extension to May 7 that would remove the threat of a no-deal exit at the end of next week  
Theresa May has decided she is willing to go ahead with No Deal Brexit. 
Out in Aveley, getting out the vote for our local Conservative by-election candidate David Van DayMore Police0% council tax increaseProtect greenbeltClear response on the doorsteps - Conservatives deliver quality local services - nationally we must deliver Brexit next Friday  
Gave a lecture today on social media data mining. Started off by doing some live collection of #Brexit related tweets and was slightly surprised by one particular word in the word cloud I generated, and projected at the front of a full classroom.  
#LordKerr stating the case for a second referendum to #RevokeA50Now on @BBCNews at 5pm #brexit “Public opinion polls show that among the under-50s there is a huge majority now in favour of having a 2nd referendum” #peoplesvote 
Ever heard of 1 million Brits abroad about to lose their rights & freedoms?Any idea how real the Russian interference was/is? Or what Putin's motives are to boost the extremes?Get a life. #Brexit is a crime.#StopBrexit 
The #Brexit talks have overrun massively. Each of 27 national leaders are speaking in turn outlining their views on an extension - long, short, conditional, unconditional. From several sources now it’s clear that there is an acceptance in room that her vote next week won’t pass  
Blimmin' Theresa May and her #Brexit delays.  What are we supposed to do with this now?  
3500 Military on standby for #Brexit with Army Reserves being called up. MOD stepping up a gear for #NoDeal Emergency Planning. Failure of dialogue in #Westminster leading to biggest National Emergency in peacetime history @peoplesvote_uk @A50Challenge 
Liz Truss is urging May to go for No Deal on 29th March instead of delaying Brexit."I believe No Deal is better than a long extension."Well said @trussliz  
One day in the future... hundreds of thousands of you.. maybe millions will proudly tell your children, or your Grandchildren..that you marched in London on Saturday March 23rd 2019 and changed history by stopping Brexit.History will be made. Be a part of it. 
This is just sickening.Home is the one place that you're supposed to feel safe.This is what #Brexit has unleashed.  
The salvation of this country requires a government of national unity. And that means a vote of no-confidence in which at least 20 Tory MPs ditch the government and Corbyn to step aside and allow someone else to serve as temporary  PM. #RevokeArticle50 #Brexit 
Nobody voted for a no deal Brexit. 50 million people did not vote for Brexit. This is a minority government out of control. It has also used corrupt methods to stay in power. #StopBrexitSaveDemocracy 
Wonderful sense of the corridors of decision-making at EU summit #Brexit  
The petition to revoke #Article50 hasn't quite gone viral in #Walsall North yet. So far it seems 0.28% of my constituents have signed it. When it gets to 52% I'll be worried #Brexit  
For brexit gang messaging me. Q. Are you sure the majority of people would still vote leave now we all know the facts?If YES then you should have no problem with a vote. It ends the argument. Job done.If NO then you are saying you think people may have changed their minds 
Back in the saddle on @bbcthisweek⁩ tonight to round up all the Brexit action from Wild, Wild Westminster. (Sorry). See you in a few hours when everything will be much clearer   
“Brexit & my father's election are one & the same." Yes, An Ethno-nationalist project of exclusion headed by a President whose campaign manager, NatSec Advisor & personal lawyer have all been sentenced to prison.Manipulated by Cambridge Analytica.Aided & abetted by Russia.  
Farages tactics is to talk over people.To say his lies and BS with conviction and get louder and louder to stop the other person responding. If that doesn't work and the person starts to get their point across his next tactic is to laugh over your statement. 
On C4 News, now, the head of the CBI: "Only 4% of British businesses are prepared for a no-deal Brexit. It will be chaos. It will be about people's jobs and lives." We have eight days to go. Sign the petition:  
So good to have Macron on board for a no deal Brexit.   
I think  brexiteers and remainers as well as EU politician have one thing in common and that is their opinion that Theresa May's incompetence is evenly matched by her arrogance.   #Brexit 
Update: Short break and then Art. 50 #euco on #brexit continues over working dinner. 
A cute thing about me is that I think a no deal Brexit is the stupidest most pointless fuck up in decades. 
Looks like EU leaders are softening position - the short extension may no longer be conditional on the #Brexit deal being approved by Parliament next week 
One lesson of Brexit is not to put commentators in charge of *anything* - Milne, Gove, Johnson, Hannan...  
Hugh Grant: ‘It Looks Like Every Sane Person’ Wants British Government to Cancel Brexit  
'Bad boys of Brexit' were guests at Trump’s Mar-a-Lago club  
EU offers Brexit delay until May 22 - draft statement  
Aus top law firms accept Uluru invite & endorse referendum on Voice to Parl @ABLLaw @ashurst @BakersAus @ClaytonUtz @Dentons @DLA_Piper @FisherDore @gtlaw @HoldingRedlich @jacmacwa @kwmlaw @LanderandRogers @minterellison @NLawGlobal @RussellKennedy_ #Corrs #HSF @markdreyfusQCMP 
A government in chaos. A crumbling social contract. A Brexit without end. In our new series, @DMiliband, @Elif_Safak and @yanisvaroufakis explore how a country renowned for its diplomacy and pragmatism became a byword for political disorder. 
Interesting piece of context: The number of signatures on the #RevokeA50Now petition has now surpassed the difference between Leave and Remain voters in the 2016 referendum.  
2/2 I wish the marchers well on Saturday (tho won’t be there). But proper course is not a second referendum. It’s for MPs to acknowledge what they collectively know - viz. Brexit is preposterous act of national self-harm - & hence wrest control from HMG & vote to rescind A50. 
Attacks on mosques in Birmingham, physical attacks on Remain MPs, an increase in hate crimes against ethnic minorities and immigrants. THIS is what #Brexit has unleashed: racism, xenophobia, aggression. Now is the time for a call for peace and unity, @theresa_may . 
brexit is stupid 
Project Fear becomes Project Terror.The final play in the anti-Brexit PR playbook is set in motion just as real Brexit becomes a real possibility.The British people will not be fooled.  
A lot of people have old grievances here in Wales and they're justified.Wales is one of the poorest countries in Western Europe and one of only 2, in _all_ of Europe to not have electrified railways.Westminster has failed us: Barnett, Brexit - whatever.Time for us to do it. 
"Cabinet ministers believe there is now a real risk of a no-deal Brexit, with sources close to them describing the mood in government as depressing and No 10 as 'run by lunatics'." Timely reminder that even the Cabinet don't run the country.  
EU leaders are locked in discussions over a possible Brexit extension, after rejecting Theresa May's original request.A statement was expected to be made over an hour ago  
1/2 This whole fiasco is textbook case (and will be in textbooks) of distinction between direct & deliberative democracy. Most MPs know Brexit is mistake in any form yet can’t stop it. It’s example of what James Madison termed “mischief of faction” in Federalist Papers No.10. 
From brexit to Jealouxit 
the website with the blocking brexit petition has been down for 7 hours and if that’s not a government conspiracy idek what is 
Today has proved yet again that if a group of people had sat down and worked out how to destroy Britain from within and utterly humiliate our country, they could not have come up with a better plan than Brexit. #RevokeA50Now 
Watching media this evening and TV news still seem obsessed still with Westminster soap-opera and #Extension of A50  .. But the idea that gets little oxygen is #RevokeArticle50 despite the record growth petition today #Brexit could end in an afternoon with Revoke. 
Something to keep in mind during the next few days. #Brexit(source: ) 
In a way, Brexit is like a bad software project.Lot's of people said "we want this". The Government did <something>.Everyone is like "wtf is this, why did it take 2 years?"Now we just need the "shelve it" step and we're good. 
The armed forces have assigned a team in a nuclear bunker to deal with a no deal Brexit. Who are these heroes? Lord Lucan? The scarlet pimpernel? Ted Bundy? All we know is @Coldwar_Steve it's over to you. 
One EU diplomat has conceded the unity of the EU27 has started to disintegrate for the first time in the Brexit negotiations 
Exclusive footage of Irish PM Leo Varadkar getting the news a No Deal Brexit is looming closer by the hour..  
Stark warnings about Brexit & the effect on UK science from Sir Paul Nurse, Director @TheCrick, previous President @royalsociety & Nobel Laureatecc @sirfrasersays @andrewcopson @Scientists4EU @sophiescott @mikegalsworthy @david_colquhoun @peoplesvote_uk 
What has Brexit done to Britain? This country used to be civilised.  
Conservative Britain:NHS winter crises now lasts all year roundNational debt has increased by over 50%214k jobs lost due to mishandling of Brexit120k deaths by Austerity£2.7bn blown on Chris Grayling 4m kids in poverty1.9 pensioners in poverty #GTTO 
This is by far the worst Brexit in my lifetime. 
Ch4 news doing the usual anti Brexit rubbish with the CBI and the TUC telling us 60% of in work people in North voted remain. We know that's not true. The lies continue. 
Ministry of Defence sets up operation room for no-deal #Brexit in Whitehall bunker  
Quite amazing to watch the heads of the CBI and the TUC @Channel4News together pleading for a veto on No Deal Brexit. Not sure I’ve seen that cooperation before. Both women btw. 
This is interesting in the @FT tonight: How Theresa May decided she was willing to accept a no-deal Brexit  via @financialtimes“The mood has hardened on no deal,” one person close to the prime minister. tells @GeorgeWParker @Laura_K_Hughes @alexebarker 
She needs to admit her failure to herself: “I tried my best, I have not been able to deliver Brexit despite my best efforts. I will not allow the risk and uncertainty of a No Deal Brexit, so I will revoke Article 50 unilaterally and render my resignation with immediate effect”. 
The Case For An Independence Referendum  
Jeremy Corbyn has never explicitly supported the 48% or the 52%. That's because he wanted to unite leavers & remainers. People may criticise him for that, but I admire him because he's putting what he thought was right before being lauded as the saviour or sabateur or Brexit. 
Theresa May encouraged this. Even when her divisive Brexit scheming has resulted in unprecedented chaos and uncertainty, she still resorts to rabble-rousing and divisiveness.  
Interesting to see Gibraltar's Chief Minister .@FabianPicardo insist that Gibraltar is better off INSIDE the EU and that he hopes the UK may decide to abandon Brexit. Just another socialist globalist shill who disrespects the 17.4m Brits who insist that we LEAVE!  
I think I know why the petition website can't cope. They're hosting it on WOPR and someone ran a scenario of all conceivable forms of #Brexit."The only winning move is not to play."#RevokeA50 is our tic-tac-toe. 
It’s the greatest bloodless overtaking of a country ever. They’re so caught up Brexit that we have lads singing rebel songs on the BBC and IRA supporters infiltrating their national football team. Before they know it they’ll be sending The Wolfe Tones to the Eurovision... 
ha... brexit is easier to understand if one sees that the ERG and their collaborators as daleks going around the country shouting "BREXTERIMINATE!...  BREXTERMINATE!"    #FBPE 
All that shows is that you don't understand what No Deal Brexit means 
Doug missing the entire premise of Brexit. It is the perfect example of English jusrisdiction over this part of Ireland. It is enforcing the will of England against the expressed wishes of the electorate here. Sorry @BeattieDoug but you are clearly and demonstrably in the wrong 
HEALTH WARNING! Dates floating around on extension still bit of a moveable feast ... #Brexit Sounds quite messy inside the EU27 meeting 
You read it here first (or maybe not): Why A No-Deal Brexit Is Now Theresa May's Fallback Plan To Save Her Party – And Herself 
Watching the Brexit news, can't help feeling we didn't take back control.  
Cabinet ministers believe risk of no-deal Brexit now 'very real'  
POLITICO summit live blog has *full wording* from the latest draft of EU27 conclusions. May 7th for Brexit Day, unless Britain agrees to hold Euro elections and extend further. Could still change...   
Brexit derangement syndrome #BDS @Peston all the remoaners are going mad ..... 
Sick of Brexit? Together we can make this the BIGGEST anti-Brexit march yet. When: 11am this Saturday Where: Outside the Dorchester, 53 Park Lane, London, W1K 1QA.  
Eighteen of Australia’s leading law firms have declared their support for the Uluru Statement from The Heart and have endorsed its call for a referendum for the establishment of a First Nations voice in the constitution. ⁦@FinancialReview⁩ 
CBI and TUC bosses warn UK faces national emergency over Brexit  
Calling all Gammon - stop pratting about with Brexit and get your work boots on #RevokeArticle50Petition #RevokeArticle50Now 
I’m hearing the short extension offered will be till 7 May unless by 11 April the UK signals to EU that it is willing to take part in European Parliament elections in which case extension lasts till end of this year #Brexit 
Terrifying intro to this story from @rowenamason and @dansabbagh: Cabinet ministers believe there is now a real risk of a no-deal Brexit, with sources close to them describing the mood in government as depressing and No 10 as “run by lunatics”. 
Nicola Sturgeon has said she will set out her plans for a second Scottish independence referendum after “this phase of the Brexit negotiations”  
The Human Rights Act isn't safe after Brexit.Here's why we all need to fight to protect it.   
It's not the fact that you're uneducated and have little understanding of what you're talking about Darren, it's just that you're a criminal involved in stealing people's rights, freedoms and protections and despite being found guilty you show little contrition. 
Please RT .@eucopresident .@ConHome .@UKLabour #brexit #extension #TheresaMay #remain The #UK want to #Remain in #EU we are sending you an urgent message #Tusk and it's getting louder, louder and louder 
Resign now and call a General Election.  Your referendum.  Your negotiations.  Your Brexit.  Not Parliament's. Yours. Every last snivelling one of you in the Tory Party. 
I'm bored by brexiteers telling me it is the will of the people, I was part of the 68% who wanted to be in the EU in the previous referendum. If that one can be overturned so can this one. #RevokeArticle50Petition 
BREAK: Op Redfold was announced to military in a letter from MoD’s top civil servant Stephen Lovegrove and CDS Gen Sir Nick Carter and is signed off with the thoughtful and very British:  “please do keep taking breaks and look out for each other at this busy time.” #Brexit 
If we crash out of the EU those editors who campaigned for Brexit are as responsible for that as those (like Boris) who lied and lied.... this is serious, unbelievably disastrous for their readers. 
Donations to Theresa May’s Conservative Party are drying up 
And this is EU27 playing hardball.Every Brexit ends like Grexit.And with the trade agreement, they will stop playing even this nice.Welcome to being Third Country.  This is our Brexit future.(And why one should want EU negotiating for you, not against you.)  
. @AnnieLennox joins host of celebrities urging support for campaign to reverse Brexit 
UPDATE: EU27 leaders discussing changing the date and conditionality in #EUCO Brexit conclusions, I’m told 
I have just watched Peter Lilley spouting utter sh*te on France 24 - he said that the UK is absolutely ready for a no deal #Brexit . Thank goodness for @SebDance for calling out his lies. We need to #RevokeArticle50 and #StopBrexit 
If BTs ruled the world,We’d have Brexit on the run,And all sorts of extremists Would get bitey on the bum!We’d have extra nomsAnd extra toysFor all our furry friendsAnd tummy rubs and tickling earsOn loop that never ends#BTposse forever #WorldPoetryDay 
We live in a very cruel country. You are meant to be running it @campaignforleo You'll do it after #brexit  
Given the number of times that petition site has crashed, I’m not sure the government are that prepared for Brexit. 
My son took a look at the stash and expressed concern that in a no-deal Brexit he would be eating beans, tuna and home-made bread for weeks.I told him that he would be eating it anyway. It's not going to waste. 
Should have written Corbyn does not rule OUT revoking article 50 to avoid no-deal Brexit.But of course - as I've been pointing out to FBPEers for months - Corbyn doesn't have a majority and cannot stop Theresa May if Tory rebels and DUP support her.BLAME TORIES FOR BREXIT. 
Watching EU leaders talk about Brexit over-riding sense is that they are very fed up with it and, consequently, might do something rash just to have the whole thing over. UK likely to severely underestimate this danger 
Say you sign up for male sterilisation. 6 months down the line you arrive at the hospital, they pass you a pen to consent whilst revealing the procedure involves no anaesthetic, 2 house bricks and a rusty bread knife, would you still go through with it?#Brexit #RevokeA50Now 
Crowds to welcome the Brexit marchers getting bigger every day. March 29, Parliament Square, will be epic.  
BBC reporting Theresa May will be making a statement in Brussels.Groans all round #brexit 
EU officials have removed 22 May as a proposed #Brexit extension date and are redrafting the summit conclusions, reports @tconnellyrte |  
Big ramifications if this ends up being the agreed position.Kills a March 29th no deal and likely means MV3 is the last MV on May's deal.Then what? MPs pivot to softer Brexit? New PM?  
You're Brelcome: Portugal ensures the rights of British citizens are safeguarded even in a no deal Brexit 
'Special place in hell, squandering Churchill's legacy': Watch the nastiest things the EU has said about Brexit 
Brexit is 196 hours away. #brexit 
UK PM May says short #Brexit delay will give Britain time to make final choice  
EU leaders have discussed whether to keep the May 22 date for a short extension .. or not. Will they offer a longer extension with option to shorten? They’re drafting now I’m told #Brexit 
spare a thought for the people on the palace waiting for brexit to be over so they can announce the queen died 
Everybody should be reminded nobody voted for a No-deal brexit  
The EU will agree to extend the Brexit process until May 22, according to a leaked draft statement from an EU council meeting in Brussels. Prime Minister Theresa May had requested a delay until June 30.  
So would a May 7 brexit extension mean1. One more MV3 next week2. MV never coming back again after this3. Britain must find new PM and possibly new brexit deal4. New PM gets new deal over line - or doesn't  
There you have it, FBPEers.Corbyn today does not rule revoking article 50 to stop no-deal Brexit.Theresa May says she "will never countenance" revoking article 50.Now will you for once start attacking the REAL people responsible for Brexit - THE TORIES.#RevokeA50Now 
"It sums up what Brexit is all about."Nasty, vengeful and without any logical arguments.”  
the liberal democrats when you point out that their support for a conservative government in 2010-2015 directly contributed to brexit and ultimately caused their complete downfall  
How on earth can people still claim Brexiters knew what they were voting for, when we are one thousand days into the process, eight days from the end of the process, and nobody but nobody has the foggiest clue what Brexit we are actually going to get? 
The European Union offers #Brexit delay until May 22 - draft statement  
The length to which the UK Conservative Government will go to to hide it’s plans (or lack thereof) for Brexit is actually thwarting those very plans It’s hard to see how they could make any more of a pigs ear of this. 
Top marks to the long term Brexit minded follower who has tried to blame No Deal on me.... I'm almost flattered 
If you're planning to take a driving holiday in the EU over Easter remember your car insurance and driving licence will not be valid. And you'll need holiday insurance that isn't backed up by your EHIC and to ensure your passport has at least six months validity too. #Brexit 
I hear EU27 leaders are now discussing a #Brexit extension that ends on 7th May, whether the deal passes or not. Macron playing a big role, apparently. 
The 2016 referendum was unsafe; the margin just 4%. There are numerous versions of #Brexit. There is one version of #Remain.Three years on, we are more informed.All we're asking is a chance for people to reaffirm their decision or change their mind.Is that unreasonable? 
"Gentlemen, you can't fight in here! This is the Brexit Room!" 
May yesterday, & Macron today, both said No Deal could follow rejection of her deal again. The only sure way of saving Britain from Brexit is thus to revoke Article 50 - key argument I will make for revoking Art 50 in the House of Lords on Monday 
Opinion: There is a way to topple Theresa May and stop a no-deal Brexit – this is how it could be done@julie4nw @bremaininspain 
“Sky News can reveal the armed forces have activated a team in a nuclear bunker beneath the Ministry of Defence to step up preparations for a 'no-deal' Brexit”Sorry, but if you respond to this news by saying ‘we knew what we voted for’ then frankly, you’re a prat. 
This has to be stressed to the public. Many people think that if the WA passes, then Brexit is sorted and done with  
I have just watched on the Central line as a grown man (60ish) got out a pencil, leaned over me and scrawled WELL, WE ARE on that bank advert that says We Are Not an Island. Anyway, not long til Brexit. 
Brexit Crisis: Scotland didn’t vote for this Prime Minister, didn’t vote for her party, didn’t vote for Brexit and didn’t vote for this crisis. It’s time for Scottish independence. #BrexitChaos 
Labour MPs being told by whips to make sure they are around on Friday 29  in case last minute legislative action needed on brexit 
EU SAID TO MULL 9- MONTH BREXIT DELAY IF MAY'S DEAL DEFEATEDBloomberg 
Even though legal and historical Twitter provided a host of examples of international agreements without exit clauses,@FraserNelson continues to contend that no unilateral exit clauses are against "international norms".And that is why we are where we are in Brexit discourse. 
What is it they say about imitation being the sincerest form of flattery? @theresa_may has taken a kicking from @realDonaldTrump over #Brexit handling. But her address to the nation could have been written by him. My thoughts on it.. 
I had to swap my British driving licence for a Finnish one this week. I work in both the UK and Finland. As a result I’m not insured to drive my employers vehicles in the UK any more. The first of many Brexit inconveniences I imagine. 
Breaking: EU considering 9 month delay if May's Brexit deal fails for a third time in parliament next week  
By voting Leave, I cancelled out Cameron's Remain vote at the EU Referendum. I voted in Brighton in Sussex. Cameron voted in Witney in Oxfordshire.That was the beauty of the Referendum. We voted as one people. Counts made at counting stations, but the vote was a national poll. 
Isn't it mad that the 2% who swung the vote for Brexit to happen are probably dead now? Like, saying that in the least offensive way. And a bunch of remainers will now have turned 18 and able to vote. 
United Ireland and Independent Scotland walking into the Sunset when Brexit destroys the UK  
What do y’all think? If @theresa_may subverts democracy in the UK  and doesn’t opt for a No Deal #Brexit, should we Americans pledge to never spend a tourist dollar there? Should we start a petition? I stand with the *people* of Britain. Damn the leaders! 
Bob Moran on  #TheresaMay #MV3 #Brexit #BrexitDelay #BrexitShambles #Brexitdeal #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #brexit #Bercow  #1604 #Brexit - political cartoon gallery in London  
So it now looks like we are heading for a no deal Brexit next Friday. So everyone, what are we all stockpiling?Let’s start a hashtag of #StockpilingForBrexit and post photos of what you are stockpiling up for a no deal Brexit. Here’s mine so far...  
Isn’t it great to be lectured at by @HackedOffHugh on what’s right and wrong #RevokeA50Now #Brexit #NoDeal 
One and a quarter million votes @theresa_mayNOBODY WANTS YOUR BLOODY BREXITNOBODY WANTS A BLOODY NO-BREXIT. STOP IT FFS 
Breaking: officials are drafting a new text at the #EUCO. I understand the Brexit A50 extension date of May 22 has been removed and replaced by “another configuration”. 
AN IMPORTANT MESSAGE TO THE EU!Dear Monsieur Macron Please veto any attempt by our country to extend Article 50 and delay Brexit.  If you do, all will be forgiven and we’ll even buy your cheese again. Yours sincerelyThe UK 
Automated Update: The Revoke Article 50 #petition has now hit 1,251,555. This is an automated feed so that checking the website doesn't crash it. #Brexit #RevokeArt50 #RevokeA50Now #NotOnMySide #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeArticle50Now 
We need clarity from the #UK on what they want to achieve with #Brexit. Watch my interview with @CNN @richardquest in the #EUCO today. 
"MPs advised to travel in groups to avoid abuse and violence over brexit"I will never forgive the people that turned our decent country into this.I will always vote for a party that has rejoining EU as its policy. 
EU leaders still discussing three options: no deal, short extension conditional on parliament approving the PMs #Brexit deal next week and a long extension /2 
Exclusive: The armed forces have activated a team in a nuclear bunker under the Ministry of Defence to step up preparations for a no-deal #Brexit  
Brexit: Hundreds of gagging orders taken out by government. Why all the secrecy? 
Breaking: The EU is considering a 9-month Brexit delay if Theresa May's deal is rejected in Parliament for a third time, a source says  
I’m hearing from sources close to the talks that the PM ‘didnt perform very well’ while addressing EU leaders on #Brexit this afternoon. I’m told she didn’t add anything new to the debate /1 
So can we all agree that we will never  ever have another referendum on anything at all, ever ? 
This grossly irresponsible bullshit is whipping up an army of thugs who don't know the first thing about how the EU works, but have been told to feel angry and betrayed. It has to stop, and when seen, fully decried by those on the same side of the Brexit fence. 
I have one question to ask you ALL now.Remainers, Leavers or don't care about Brexit! I'm sure you can agree this is the worst set of politicians this country has seen in a long time, maybe ever?WHY IS SPITTING IMAGE NOT ON THE TELLYBOX AGAIN? 
Not just Yang,  the very bad boys of #Brexit Andy Wigmore and Aaron Banks were spotted at Mar-a-Lago in April scouting locations.  
EU said to consider 9m Brexit delay if May loses vote, BBG reports.  
Why is Brexit and its implementation entirely up to Theresa May? Do we live in a dictatorship? No we dont, so why are there no other options? 
#RevokeArticle50Petition #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeA50NowThis is from 2016 and there Petition that got over 3m signatures for a Second Referendum! It was fake and corrupt! 
MPs have been advised to share taxis over fears we could be attacked by angry voters over the Govts’ handling of #BrexitHow can @theresa_may blame Parliament for this #Brexitmess of her own making simply to save her own skin, despite ignoring us at every opportunity! Outrageous 
My take on #TheresaMay’s latest #Brexit speech, via Louis Bonaparte, Schmitt, dictatorship in the Roman republic, the roots of fascism in the crisis of liberal parliamentary democracy and more...  
Birders getting blocked and removed from birding groups for sharing this. Beggars belief that anyone interested in birds can't see how this could be used to tear up wildlife protection laws. #Brexit 
The betrayal narrative, and promotion of the idea that the referendum was the only embodiment of democracy that counts, has to stop now. Public figures and newspapers promoting this are going to be responsible for something terrible happening.  
How did May do today, I asked a #EUCO insider. "Stiff, teflon, same style as her speech last night." #brexit 
Think about all the kids whose dads never came back from Iraq and should never have been there in the first place.Meanwhile, Ellen and Michelle O are hugging Dubya, Tony Blair is giving us lectures on Brexit, and John Bolton is the national security adviser.  
Preparing for a no deal Brexit by gagging the relevant parties from communicating on how to prepare for a no deal Brexit.Makes sense.  
Theresa May does Right Said Fred and it’s a Brexit anthem for our times 
BREAKING NEWSOVER 3,000 troops being prepared incase of a No DEAL Brexit. The operations room is being set up in a Nuclear Bunker. Whichever way it goes the shit will hit the fan and this country is going to go BOOM. 
How hard could a hard Brexit really be?  
A ridiculously narrow vote decides on Brexit: "The people's decision is final and any attempts to vote again would undermine democracy"A government proposal suffers the worst defeat IN HISTORY: "Let's just keep voting again until I get what I want"Oh OK. 
I don’t know what’s been happening with Brexit as I’ve been off social media all day but I’ve been thinking about starting a petition to revoke article 50.Who’s with me? 
As both parties are refusing to back a proper investigation into illegalities during the referendum can one of them at least have the balls to investigate which MP's are making money out of economy disruption that they are fuelling ? 
Not at all Andrew.  Scottish independence is an option for people living in Scotland. With independence, we don't have to choose any of the Brexit bad choices!  
1 million Brits signed a petition to halt Brexit and broke Parliament’s website  
#Brexit @Coburn4Brexit @Nigel_Farage  Nigel Farage announces nondisclosure agreements is are being signed throughout the government indicating that we are preparing for a no Deal Exit. 
Delighted to hear Macron state the UK is heading for a 'No Deal' Brexit unless we accept May's dreadful plan. March 29th delivers ALL we need if we simply LEAVE. We don't want a deal, we don't need a deal. We just need OUT. 
"Sky News can reveal the armed forces have activated a team in a nuclear bunker beneath the Ministry of Defence to step up preparations for a 'no-deal' Brexit"  
May has gone from "my deal or no Brexit" to "my deal or no deal (and it's parliament's fault not mine".   So MPs who are overwhelmingly opposed to No Deal have to wrest control from the executive. How? 
What are you stockpiling for Brexit? 
The widely-held view that the UK is ‘not ready’ to leave the EU on World Trade Organisation (#WTO) terms is wrong. In fact, such an exit would now be perfectly viable thanks to preparations and agreements made over recent months. #brexit 
May says she’s got Personal Regret. Is it for the homeless, working poor, disabled, deaths caused by Tory Austerity or UC? Don’t be silly. It’s about saving her own snake skin because of her Brexit failure. 
Brexit: Hundreds of gagging orders taken out by governmentThe Department for Transport told us it had 79 separate NDAs by the end of February. Of these, we understand that around 50 had been signed in the preceding 3 months, an average of ~ 4 per week.  
If May fails to get her Brexit deal passed next week and there is no extension beyond the 29th we will crash out of the EU. Something MPs have said they will refuse to allow. In those circumstances we have to revoke A50. What other choices do we have? 
1) She blocked an investigating into Arron Banks. 2) Louise Mensch reports that MI5 and MI6 told Theresa May the referendum was not "free or fair" due to Russian interference. May took no action and Govt is falsely reporting that it has seen no evidence of successful interference 
The one joy of Brexit.@MarinaHyde's columns. 
?? “Government orders hospitals not to reveal Brexit impact assessments to protect 'commercial interests' - The Independent  
BREXIT: @LBC ENGLISH BLOKE ON RADIO: "We won the war. After the war we were still on rations and the Germans were smashing it. We need to break free and then we can smash it." A special kind of stupid. They walk among us.  
We would like to reassure the marketing public that we are stockpiling supplies of end lines, metaphors and comedic devices to ensure that we can continue crucial brand repairs, in the event of a no-deal Brexit. 
And on the day after #Brexit ... 10,000 troops from 13 countries arrive in the UK for major exercise  
My bit on all the latest Brexit triumphs   
Those forced to sign them by Govt claim they have stifled their ability to prepare.Road Haulage Association told us: “It’s not fair and it is simply wrong to use them in this way. They are gagging trade associations like ours from telling our members about the effect of Brexit” 
Stop Brexit - A million people sign UK petition to stay in EU - Reuters  
Why do media & other Tory cheerleaders insist on calling it a 'short technical delay'?Why not call it what it is?A catastrophic failure of Theresa May & this Tory Govt to deliver a workable Brexit, on time, after 2.5 yrs of botched negotiationsYou had one job, PM #MayMustGo 
MERKEL LATEST ON BREXIT: "fucked if I know" pic.twitter.com/Veb0NyPkHF 
The CBI and TUC have united to condemn Theresa May's irresponsible gamble of My Deal or No Deal. Where are the Remainer ministers who should be speaking up for the national interest ie taking hard Brexit off the table or supporting Kyle-Wilson confirmatory vote? #BrexitExtension 
Of course if there’s more time Corbyn could ask EU for long extension. But if there’s hours to go it would be only option left.Corbyn could do so saying it was the only way to avoid no deal but Brexit isn’t necessarily cancelled forever. But first he’d say, has to be election. 
Article 50 author Lord Kerr talks to Sky News about the UK's options in the last remaining days before Brexit is scheduled to happen.Get the latest #Brexit news here:  
Edmund Sides who is refusing to take the easy way to London. Instead, he is walking to the march from Swansea, a city that also voted for Brexit. He left Swansea on 7th March 
As the crisis over #Brexit grows - and more than a million people signing a petition breaks the UK parliament's website - here again is our story saying 111 out of 121 UK opinion polls since the start of 2018 have favoured remaining in the EU. 
Messrs Corbyn & Starmer come to Brussels to negotiate or offer an alternative to BREXIT - like ‘M Hulot’s Holiday.’ It isn’t BREXIT. Customs Union & Single market is worse than membership. Apart from muddying the waters what is their role? They are not the government! Help me! 
Sadly Brexit has completely divided the nation and this will last decades whatever the outcome. One half of the nation pitted against the other is the legacy of Cameron and May. No longer a United Kingdom. 
Right so Theresa May can get an extension on her Brexit deal because she left it til the last minute but when I did that for my uni essays I was being “underprepared” 
Hundreds of gagging orders imposed by govt in run-up to Brexit  
Court confirms  cheated in EU Referendum. Ignore spin from the cheats & their followers.  
Exclusive: Sky News can reveal that the Government has hundreds of gagging orders as part of its preparations for a no-deal.Home Office has signed over 100Dept for Transport has signed 79Dept of Health has signed 26Brexit Dept has signed 7 
There is an extremely active British in Luxembourg community which is being shafted by Brexit.So it’s not really surprising.#RevokeArticle50 
No deal brexit is the true brexit 
Breaking news:  @SkyNews reporting on 200+ gagging orders taken out by govt over Brexit.This is political corruption in action. 
Brexit.  
If anyone thought people in other countries signing the anti-Brexit petition was "suspicious", I've got a fair percentage of them on my timeline politely explaining they're Britons on holiday/work abroad, etc. 
Brexit: Hundreds of gagging orders taken out by government  
I am sick and tired of the Scottish Conservatives alarming the farmers in my constituency saying they won't receive their payments. They will be paid and were always going to be paid. This is their chaotic Brexit. Their campaign must cease now.  
Absurd letter: everyone has known for 2 years a WTO Brexit is the base case, the default case. No excuse if you are not ready. The EU is ready for no deal & our Govt is much more ready than they say. Mood of country is just Leave, save £39bn & take control. 
The PM wants her rejected proposal to be voted on a third time but the public must be happy with just the one referendum no matter how many demand another one  
Financial Times reporting that Theresa May has decided she is willing to go ahead with No Deal Brexit. Independence, on time, next week. 
The PM does not live in a dictatorship. Please do remind her of this.Would you remind her also that the 2016 Brexit referendum was proven corrupt, with key players referred to Police & NCA & some fined already. #RevokeA50Now #RevokeA50 
Revoking Article 50 does not mean pausing Brexit, it means cancelling Brexit. We would not be able to restart Brexit negotiations. It would mean overturning the vote of 17.4 million people.  
Don’t bother delivering it for me. Brexit was sold on a false prospectus and will cost us all dear if you ever do it.You cannot “honour” a referendum won through lies, foreign money and stolen data. 
“I’m on your side” (T May). D’you know, I think she honestly believes it. It would explain a lot. She honestly believes “The People” want Brexit. It would totally explain her stubborn pig-headedness.If she’s right, she & Leavers have nothing to fear from a new referendum. 
Today on the Daily podcast: One million people sign petition to cancel Brexit.The petition has had the highest volume of signatures on record - and at one point, it caused the official petitions website to crash. Listen to the full episode here:  
Court finds  Leave EU committed MULTIPLE OFFENCES in the referendum!!This is OUR democracy, it’s time to #RevokeA50Now#RevokeArticle50#RevokeA50#RevokeArticle50Petition 
Spare a thought for Britain which is now a laughing stock. It has a leader who has lost all authority. An Opposition leader the people are scared of. Political parties divided into subdivisions over an issue the people don’t understand: Brexit. Nowhere cool. 
We are edging closer to a no deal Brexit. #FarageOnLBC 
The⁩ ⁦@BBCPolitics⁩ getting very excited about a petition to@cancel Brexit. Was the same level of coverage given when nearly 400,000 signed a petition for a no-deal Brexit?  
“back to the PM’s speech, which she really ought to have delivered in a yellow vest. If you’re keeping track of the various lunacies, please note that parliamentary sovereignty is no longer the glorious destination of Brexit but its evil enemy.”  
Coming up on @SkyNews Government has taken out hundreds of gagging orders over no-deal Brexit... 
‘I can’t go home because of death threats,’ says anti-Brexit MP Anna Soubry  
This last year or so of discussing Corbyn’s Brexit positions has been somewhat ridiculous. It’s not complicated. He’s doing what he thinks best in terms of getting into office. He’s avoiding anything consequential and waiting for the opponents to commit to something shite. 
Handy hint: treat Brexit like coffee. Take it twice a day, max. If you end up having it after 5, then make sure you do something relaxing to counteract it, or you won't sleep. 
Theresa May’s shameful response to Brexit mess | Letters  
Please RT if you feel @bbclaurak, @BBCNewsnight, @bbcnickrobinson, @Peston & others have a duty to tell the public clearly:We can #RevokeArticle50 It could be done in an afternoon We'd keep our rebate, no euro, no changes at all#Brexit would be behind usEvery MP knows it 
Are you now ready for a no-deal Brexit? @Nigel_Farage is live from Brussels #FarageOnLBC 
Well over a million Brits live in mainland Europe alone. Millions more spread around the rest of the world. And many, if not most, were outrageously denied a vote in the referendum. So hardly surprising that they are making their voices heard now. 
“Theresa May is in fact an extremely dangerous individual whose priorities are now so far out of whack she shouldn’t be anywhere near the controls of this particular automobile.” #brexit #RevokeA50Now #RevokeA50  
Beneath all the Brexit fog is a draconian social security system costing lives and causing hardship -  Mum's heartbreaking last words as she took own life after DWP stopped benefits  
“I want this to stop. We need to revoke Article 50. “This is now an embarrassment”SNP Euro MP ⁦@AlynSmith⁩ as petition to cancel #Brexit gets more than 1 million signatures  
‘Racist, stupid and uneducated’ – Civil Servant reveals what Remain bureaucrats really think of Brexit voters 
We voted to leave. Now they are trying to betray Brexit - that's why hundreds of us are on the #MarchToLeave. If you've had enough of the establishment then join us in Parliament Square on March 29th:  
Brexit is 197 hours away. #brexit 
Former Channel 4 editor Paul Mason breaks down why the UK media has lost it over Brexitby @wrightismight 
'Cancel Brexit' petition passes 1m signatures on Parliament site  
Took an hour in the end. An hour isn’t life and death but on top of a five hour commute it’s enough to piss me off. One of the delights of cross-border travel pre-Brexit was how hassle-free and seamless it was to drive onto and off the Shuttle. Brexit degrades all our lives. 
#Brexit: Draft plans propose UK to get delay to 22 May  
This is British politics today... The Speaker has to tell us we are not traitors. #Brexit  
MPs advised to travel in groups to avoid abuse over Brexit  
Maybe Brexit will be cancelled because too many people are just laughing at it now 
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 21As Theresa May is on holiday in Brussels today, here's a look back at a critical moment in #Brexit history - the moment Boris Johnson & David Cameron found out the would actually have to deliver Brexit and ran for the hillsSign the #RevokeArticle50Petition 
You disingenuous corrupt lying toad. The Referendum was choc-full of RUSSIAN INTERFERENCE. See the official Congressional Record of @congressdotgov, the U.S. 'Hansard'. #RevokeArticle50 
If #China's people "long for" the social credit system, why not hold a free and fair referendum? Wouldn't that be the "non-imperialist" thing to do?  
CBI, TUC say 'national emergency' demands Brexit plan B in strongly worded joint letter. MPs and ministers must heed it  
The EU are putting the squeeze on our MPs and there are faint-hearted Remainers aplentyBut Brexit is about the long term future of our country. Not the next few weeks, months, or even years. But decades!Do we want our country governed by the unelected Politburo in Brussels? 
You are NOT DELIVERING WHAT THE PEOPLE VOTED FOR #Brexit  We voted LEAVE We did not vote for a deal nor any extensions 
May we set up a Brexit debate with you  in your constituency? 
This is extraordinary. The TUC and the CBI and united in their joint intervention against @theresa_may's reckless Brexit approach. Any Prime Minister concerned about the national interest would stop and listen.  
Not everyone agrees with you Theresa. The fastest rate of signatures for a petition online in the history of the Parliamentary website so much so it crashed a couple of times & it’s still going strong. Nearly as many as the majority of the Referendum have now signed this petition  
In the end, whatever happens next week ..Brexit can't win because the overwhelming majority of the young are against leaving and if forced to, without getting a vote, will make it their life mission to reverse it and will damn those who brought it about 
It's all about Brexit here in the Cooleys. Real anxiety among small business owners and farmers here around impact of a crash Brexit and hard border. Also a lot of confusion around insurance green cards. Thanks to Cllr Antóin Watters for hosting discussion #brexit  
On this day of successful petitions, please also consider signing this one:   German language Wikipedia and others are on strike today - this is another political emergency that doesn't get as much press as Brexit but has deep implications for the net. 
What? 2 updates in one day...it’s going well I think (plus drawing takes my mind off the Brexit fiasco) I’m pretty happy with the texture I’ve created on both Rufus’s coat and breeches so it’s the vest next #workinprogress #benedictarnold1780 #Timeteamfashion #og3 #TimeIess 
THE TRAP IS SET!Short extension so we don't take part in EU elections (no #BrexitParty  walkover). Then, miraculously, they'll allow a long extension, i.e. Remain.#brexit #ERG #DUP 
Hello. I’m sure you’re probably aware of this petition, but if Theresa May doesn’t speak for you on Brexit, please do sign it if you haven’t already.  
Thank you @AlynSmith @RHBruceCrawford for the letter received today. At 1000 days (& counting) of #Brexit uncertainty around my rights as a EU citizen, your unequivocal support means so much. Scotland has been my home for half my life. My life and heart is here. #RevokeArticle50 
I have UK resident friends who are taking last minute holidays before Brexit who are signing this.  Currently Italy, France, Eygpt and China.Is there something wrong with that? 
A no-deal Brexit will create a hard border between London's stock market and the rest of Europe (via @bopinion) 
Our MP's duty to carry out the 'democratic will of the people' from the ref is less important than protecting their wellbeing & the prosperity, security & stability of the country.If it's no deal or no Brexit their duty is to prevent an economic & political disaster. RT  
There’s no such thing as ‘No Deal’: a WTO Brexit is the only rational choice  
Today in Brussels I met with liberal leaders from across Europe and updated them on our fight for a People's Vote during the height of the Brexit chaos. Please join us to march against Brexit this Saturday. Details here >  
The Government that should be requesting at least 22 weeks - five months to allow time for a referendum. The gov cannot put this off any longer!  
‘The constitution will never be the same again. But Bercow’s task is not finished. The endgame of Brexit is being fought hour by hour on the floor of the Commons between an out-of-control government and an increasingly assertive parliament’  
Sky News can reveal the armed forces have begun training a ragtag but lovable team of oil drillers for space travel to step up preparations for a 'no-deal' Brexit 
Brexit: Draft plans propose UK to get delay to 22 May  
Hans ... is Brexit a bad idea  
Workers and businesses are rightly calling for Theresa May to change her approach to Brexit.Labour's alternative plan would protect jobs, the economy and living standards. It could win the support of parliament and the EU, and bring the country together. 
He’s a historian of the Tudors, he’s being saying misogynist and racist things for years, he isn’t an expert in Brexit or modern British politics or culture or any of it, you’re only asking him because you hope he’ll say something ~shocking~ 
Worth remembering that basically Theresa May's only job as PM was to guide the country through Brexit and she's spectacularly fucked it. 
Didn’t realise that these “no downsides to brexit only considerable upsides” would take place in a nuclear fucking bunker if I’m honest 
Who gives a monkey's about Newsnight? Seriously? The only people who watch it are so heavily involved in current affairs and politics that their opinions are firmly formed anyway. Kind of busy with Brexit to waste time on a Labour-hating politics show, I would have thought.  
we have reached the moment where EU is becoming more scared of an unconditional Brexit extension than a no-deal Brexit. I don’t think Macron is bluffing. Even in Germany the mood is shifting. 
On behalf of @PlaidArfon I support application under SO24 for a debate on revoking Article 50 put forward by my colleague @AngusMacNeilSNP to push for a Commons vote. #RevokeA50 #Brexit 
Cabinet minister: "Her deal is a compromise everyone feels uncomfortable with and no-one likes. We will lose the meaningful vote, probably by an even bigger margin."Big read on disastrous response of MPs to PM's Brexit statement. With @Steven_Swinford  
Over 1,100,000 people, including some British celebrities, signed a petition calling to cancel #Brexit  
We're very pleased after securing major wins against the biased pro-Remain Electoral Commission in court today.We're fighting tooth and nail against the Establishment forces trying to undermine and stop Brexit. You can support our work at  
 Take a look back over the last two years to see just how much Theresa May's Brexit plan has unravelled.@euronews | #RawPolitics 
As an outcome of Nordic Irish collaboration myself, one of the few happy outcomes of Brexit has been the deepening of Ireland's ties to the Nordic Baltic states. We have so much in common, including our commitment to the EU!  
“After we went off-air last night, I heard from someone very concerned about Brexit. I won’t use her name, but it’s a woman in her early 60s who feels very let down…” @eddiemair | #Brexit  
Absolutely.  Let's have a full public enquiry into all aspects of the #Brexit adventure and see where the evidence leads.Are you up for that, Nigel?Nigel?Are you there?Where did you go?Nigel?Hello? 
We are witnessing the last dying breathes of our treasonous #euNationalistic #Remoaners in the form of a corrupt #RevokeArticle50 petition. At the same time confident forward looking Brits are moving towards a #NoDealNoProblem #brexit.  
With Govt Websites crashing due to the 1m+ petitions to revoke Article 50, the highest rate of petition ever........... No-one voted for 10 years of pain #RevokeArticle50     BBC News - 'Cancel Brexit' petition passes 1m signatures on Parliament site  
Crooked Nigel is rattled   wait til Saturday 
Why is #bbcpm inflicting on us at length the views of two random people on #Brexit, neither of whose opinions have much basis in fact, with Evan Davis just chuckling along like a hospital radio DJ on diazepam? 
Brexit update: the EU look set to offer the UK an extension until 22 May. But it's conditional on the PM's deal passing the Commons next week.In other news, it's looking pretty unlikely the deal will pass next week, but a lot can happen between now and Mon / Tues. 
Please note there has been no indication of Brexit affecting the safety of the United Kingdom's nuclear deterrent; this is probably for the purposes securing a location for command and control efforts regarding civil contingency plans. 
Idk what I'm doing x #Brexit 
"Fashion retailer Next says a no-deal Brexit could save it up to £15m thanks to lower tariffs and that it would pass on "modest" savings to shoppers." 
Behind closed doors EU leaders are also discussing possibility of longer extension if #Brexit deal rejected in Parliament again next week /2 
To all those who are sick & tired of #Brexit, please be aware that if May's deal or a no-deal go through, then we will have many more years of chaos & division as the UK attempts to reconstruct its relations with the EU and tries to do deals with big players like the USA.#FBPE. 
Kent pupils could be left stranded by no-deal Brexit gridlock, warns council  
Just for the day that’s in it: a brand new working paper looking at Brexit’s implications for Irish security and defence. An early contribution to new @ucddublin Institute for British Irish Studies (IBIS) research programme. @ucdpolitics Thanks @everytreecat! 
What if Kenya simply implement its laws /chapter 6 of the Constitution would we need a referendum? Or assuming @UKenyatta drops 50% of his cabinet & give the positions to #NASA while the speaker of @parliamentkenya changes to woman? would that solve our problems? @RobertAlai ??? 
I haven't really been following Brexit news. Is this a bad sign, or...  
Brexit: Military steps up preparations in case of no deal  
As the vote was illegal, it is only right that the result be voided on the basis it was unlawful. Article 50 should be revoked on this basis and a new referendum held. 
Draft EU summit conclusions (only draft -EU leaders now discussing)  say PM May will get a short extension - if #Brexit deal is passed in Parliament next week. But short extension is only until 22 May not 30 June as PM requested because European Parliamentary elex start 23 May 
#Brexit: Extension length not issue, but it must be useful. For @Europarl_EN it should factor in: 11 April (deadline for UK declaring potential participation in European elections) and 18 April (last day of final plenary session of EP term) #EUCO 
Sky News now reporting the British Ministry of Defence has activated a nuclear bunker underneath its headquarters in preparation of a 'no-deal' Brexit.  
A petition demanding Theresa May revokes Article 50 and cancels #Brexit has passed one million signatures  
It’s clear the players don’t want to play for him. His methods are outdated and he is bereft of ideas. McLeish needs to go, Grant needs to go, McFadden needs deported as part of Brexit somehow. 
Fingers crossed we get a no deal Brexit, collapse of the British economy, and I can raid @Turnbull_Asser with a favorable exchange rate 
#Brexit gets to 6pm on Thursday next week, 28.3.2019MV3 hasn’t happened or failed. UK offers no plan or purpose for a long Art 50 ExtensionMPs look over the cliffIt’s NO DEAL vs. UNILATERALLY RESCIND ARTICLE 50What would they do? 
I'm glad Corbyn played such a blinder on Brexit otherwise we'd be royally fucked roundabout now. 
In short, the EU27 have had enough. Macron and others need all their energy to fight the Russian-backed far right in their own countries now. The EU elections are incredibly important this time, and EU27 citizens deserve a clear campaign, uncluttered by Brexit.#RevokeArticle50 
Today I met party leaders and prime ministers from across Europe.I laid out our alternative plan for Brexit that would secure a close economic relationship between the UK and the EU.  
I’m not always a ‘petition guy’ but this one is specific, and on fire  The ‘Will of the People’ is not a set in stone thing and those so confidently asserting it should put the Brexit question back to the electorate.   
Up till now in #Brexit negotiations, European Commission has been less hardline than leaders like Macron. BUT as possibility of no deal looms, the Commission is now tougher - worrying about EU law (eg legitimacy of EU Parliament) while leaders focus on politics: avoiding no deal 
From an American colleague: “Brexit is like cricket. You have no clue what is going on or when it is going to end.” 
I'm going to put my own #Brexit situation into really simple terms - ppl are breaking into my house and stealing, amongst other things, my daughter's med supplies, mostly because they hate foreigners. DON'T ask me to be ok with that. #RevokeRemainRebuild #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
BREAKING: UK military has activated team in a nuclear bunker under the @DefenceHQ main building to step up preparations for a no-deal Brexit, @SkyNews can reveal. The crisis management operation – dubbed Operation #REDFOLD – began on Monday 1/ 
Looking forward to seeing The North, Wales, Ireland, Rural areas etc get their dues post #Brexit.  Instead of  propping up EU countries and using our funds to relieve their economic and youth unemployment woes. We’re gonna be so strong & a more united nation.  Bring it on  
So true..... #RevokeArticle50 #brexit #EUCO #RevokeArticle50Petition 
#BREAKING UK armed forces have activated a team in a nuclear bunker beneath the Ministry of Defence to step up preparations for a 'no-deal' #Brexit: Sky News 
I think all the cabinet should now set out their views on Brexit in the form of a code related to local constituency landmarks.  
WATCH: Here's what the First Minister had to say about the timing of a new independence referendum – and it can't come soon enough  
LISTEN: @prafulnargund was on @bbcasiannetwork earlier today discussing why neither Parliament nor the country want the Government’s broken Brexit deal.Praful will also be coming to the #PutItToThePeople March this Saturday. Come and join him!Sign up:  
"It's not like I can afford a blowout, I'll take some carrots home." People who say Austerity & Universal Credit are not linked with Brexit, should listen to Charlie talking about his situation. After bills he lives on £10 a week.Watch the film in full:  
Same Kenyans facing hunger were supposed to register for Huduma number & then census & then line-up for a referendum.While those in charge of the country are busy looting in Nairobi, as they prepare to celebrate 56 years of selfish-governance.So disgraceful 
#WriteAPoemAboutToriesThey fuck you up, the Brexiteers They really mean to and they doThey'd push your family of a cliffThen devour the lot of youBrexit only benefits vulturesIt won't stop different culturesMigrants didn't cause us painThe far-right virus spreads again 
Great to be co-author with @labourlewis. Watch this space for weekly @LoveSocialism articles in @LabourList If a deal is passed, Brexit never ends. We must put a stop to it - 
I voted for Brexit but was not influenced by the brexiteers speil. I honestly  beleived the UK government could forge something beneficial out of the opportunity. How mistaken was I!! If given another chance I'd vote remain. 
Bercow defends MPs after May blames them for Brexit delay  
Nearly 2,000 people are signing the revoke Brexit petition every minute, according to the House of Commons petitions committee.  
BREAKING: The EU has offered Britain a Brexit delay until May 22nd according to a draft statement that has just been released. 
French President Emmanuel Macron is taking the hardest line against the British at the summit. He also failed to hold a meeting with Theresa May there 
British Members of Parliament have been advised to take taxis over fears that they could be attacked over the handling of Brexit  
Earlier on Radio heard a leave voter discuss collective direct action that is being planned shld Brexit not happen. Blocking motorways, go slows at work etc. That's why I've always believed in Labour's compromise position. This is one geni we are never going to stuff back in! 
Petition to cancel Brexit crashes UK Parliament website due to high number of signatures  
 Why is it Ok 4 #UKParliament to vote 3x on same #Brexit deal, but asking public opinion 2x #PeoplesVote is denied? @CarolineLucas @davidschneider @nickreeves9876 @SadiqKhan @HackedOffHugh @briancoxlive @JimMFelton @JoJohnsonUK @NiraabRaab @AkwyZ 
NEW: Military no-deal Brexit planning has been codenamed "Operation Redfold" by the Ministry of Defence.The planning, which is part of the wider Whitehall no-deal prep known as Operation Yellowhammer, oversees 3,500 troops on standby to help.h/t @DavidWilletts3 
Here the full take of the 30mins. version of #ZDFzoom documentary Attack on Democracy: Was the Brexit bought? - Film by Dirk Laabs @YouTube @mrjamesob @EmmaKennedy @UKEUchallenge@Suewilson91 @c_anne_richards@abcpoppins @RobertCPalmer13 @eyejosh @JMPSimor 
I want a People's Vote at the very least.During the 2016 referendum I was 2 years too young to vote (alongside many other 16 year olds).Almost 3 years later, I now have the ability to vote and I want to use my vote to have a say about MY future.#RevokeA50Now #PeoplesVote 
Breaking: According to draft conclusions, the UK will be granted an extension in order to delay #Brexit if @theresa_may's deal is approved by MPs.Follow the latest Brexit news here:  
At this moment (Thu 21/3) the most likely outcome is no-deal #Brexit on Friday midnight.A lot of things need to happen in order to have another outcome (extension, revocation, cross-party new deal, whatever) 
EU Draft Conclusions Approve Brexit Extension to 22nd May, Longer Extension Rejected  
Theresa May's message to Britain over Brexit? Don’t blame me, blame Parliament.  
Read that for a second as ‘Toilet paper maker stops piles in case of no-deal.’ Would have been a first real Brexit positive...ah well.  
BREXIT: Revoke Article 50 petition to cancel Brexit soars past 1 million signatures /#Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
U.K. to boost Russia, U.S. trade post-Brexit to offset risks  via @YouTube #OANN 
How many million more times do we have to tell you, we don't want your CRIMINAL Brexit? We want to #RemainInTheEU.Who are you working for? There must be a trial once we stop you. 
i feel like when the inevitable brexit movie is made, Theresa May should just be played by a bunch of angry, squawking seagulls wearing a coat made from old couch upholstery 
Never has it been so CRITICAL that we have a MASSIVE turnout this Saturday protesting FOR a PEOPLE’S VOTE with REMAIN option. We must show Parliament’s wavering MPs that there is NO APPETITE for BREXIT and that WE WANT A PEOPLE’S VOTE ! Please retweet! @peoplesvote_uk 
Billy from Belfast on @LBC. Asking what’ll happen to him in Spain after Brexit passport wise. He’s asked why haven’t you applied for an Irish passport as you’re entitled to one. Billy didn’t like that. “I’m quite happy with my British one thanks”. Wonder who Billy votes for. 
Piers Morgan more popular than Theresa May’s brexit deal  
MP's are urged to take taxis home and not travel alone as tensions rise over crunch Brexit votes.Only Theresa May could be incompetent enough to create a hostile environment for MP's. What an absolute monster she is. #MayMustGoNow 
Today's #MarchToLeave saw hundreds of supporters come out for WTO Brexit. Want to join the Brexiteer rally on March 29th? Click here:  
May's latest strategy is not workingMost Brits, including 56% of Tories, say that when it comes to #Brexit neither parliament nor Prime Minister May are on their side ... YouGov, today  
Despite Brexit.  
Brexit is 198 hours away. #brexit 
BREAKING: EU summit draft conclusions say EU can agree #Brexit extension until May 22, extension conditional on Withdrawal Agreement approved by parliament next week  
 We want a #FinalSay referendum. Voting is undemocratic. We will attend the #PutitothePeopleMarch in London to demand it. Protesting is undemocratic. We will never stop expressing our opinion on the matter. Freedom of speech is undemocratic. 
May says she ‘will not countenance’ revoking A50. Why does someone who has made such an unholy fuck-up of the whole thing think that she gets to be so categorical about it now? Hang your head in shame. Just go. And bin your miserable Brexit on the way out. 
My company is not ready. How can I be, I have NO IDEA WHATSOEVER of what my trading conditions will be next week....#brexit 
Every day in Frankfurt this week I’ve chatted to the barmaid at my hotel. She’s just given me these flowers to cheer me up about Brexit! This one act of kindness alone should be reason enough to #RevokeArticle50 & remain. #vielDank #EuropeanFamily ⁦@guyverhofstadt⁩ 
Dear @jacindaardern, I've been really impressed by your leadership and dignity over the past week.I have a favour to ask, would you please consider an extremely short-term secondment (48hrs would do it) over the next 9 days and sort Brexit out for us?Please.Kind regradsUK 
Funnily enough, a march of 200 or “twitter polls” wasn’t what excited me about the Brexit side, it was their ability to win the referendum despite a remain political class (which was responsible for taxpayer funded propaganda leaflets to every household, costing us £9 million).  
"The government's lack of clarity over how the UK's immigration system will work after Brexit could leave the NHS spending up to half a billion pounds per year on international recruitment" - Dr Andrew Goddard. Nigel Mills on Conflict Zone 
Full details of EU27 draft Brexit conclusions from top colleague @jacopobarigazzi 
Another version of the doomsday 'rogue May' no deal #Brexit scenario that I woke up fretting about this morning.  
PS @AlbertoNardelli has draft European Council conclusions and confirms that EU leaders have confirmed Brexit delay to 22 May, subject to meaningful vote passing next week - which no EU leader expects to happen (that scepticism won’t be in published conclusions!) 
EU agrees to agree #Brexit extension until 22 May by 29th March according to draft EUCO conclusions 
I'll try and explain it to Remainers one last time.If you want to stop Brexit, you have to change millions of minds.If you want to change millions of minds, you need them to listen to you.If you want them to listen to you, you have to stop being a nasty twat.Do you see? 
After Brexit, nobody will ever be dumb enough to leave the EU again. Instead we now have "Remain Eurosceptism". Me @FT  
The County Court has today rejected ’s appeal of the Commission’s findings in relation to their EU Referendum campaigning activity. See our statement below  
I see he’s deleted it, but we’re at the “at least it’s not the Rwandan genocide” stage of Brexit  
BBC News - Unprecedented drug shortage linked to Brexit, NHS bosses say  
The insane & unreasonable Tories seem to think we’ll just back down & shut up if they force Brexit upon us.They don’t realise we won’t surrender our values or roll over easy.  In fact, we’ll band together to oppose their toxic worldview and fight to overthrow their Brexit hell 
'Silent assassin' about to strike: Why Michael Gove is tipped to replace Theresa May #Brexit #leadership ⁦@Telegraph⁩ 
St Patrick's DayMary LouMichael ConlanAlan PartridgeDeclan RiceBRexit ShamblesTory MeltdownAnd it's only Thursday 
Remember when 2 million people marched in London to stop the Iraq War. Did the UK government listen to the public? Do you honestly think a petition with even 10 million signatures is going to sway THIS government. #Brexit #NoDeal 
Brexit is happening in like 8 days or so and this is what you're worried about ??  
Well-connected fellow journalist who specialises in politics and global finance tells me senior Tories now believe chance of a no-deal crash out is 80 per cent. Get scared people.... and also March on Saturday #PutItToThePeople #FinalSay #brexit 
POLL:  Theresa May's worst ratings as PM and her lowest for Brexit handling.  Public's verdict revealed by @IpsosMORI in tonight's @eveningstandard 
Theresa May’s European counterparts have lost faith in her just when she needed them most 
The EU knows MV3 won’t pass.So is EU just not talking about longer extension to allow MV3 to happen and crash, then step in with a longer extension?Or is EU manoeuvring UK into a No Deal vs. Rescind showdown for end of next week?#Brexit #EUCO 
Short Extension + May's Deal, orNo Deal on 29 March, orLong Extension + Labour's Deal, orLong Extension + General Election, orLong Extension + Second Referendum, orRevoke A50 + General Election, orRevoke A50 + Second Referendum.What have I missed out? 
May is insane. Brexit itself is a failure of democracy.HER OWN BARRISTER ADMITTED THE REF. WAS ILLEGAL, ON CAMERA, FROM THE HIGH COURT JUST 2 WEEKS AGO ...WHY ARE YOU NOT REPORTING THIS? 
1M+ people signed a petition to cancel Brexit. The amount of signatures — up to 2,000 per minute — caused the government’s official petitions website to crash.Parliament is now legally required to consider holding a debate on the issue.  
Polls suggest:1. Voters see Brexit negotiations as a national humiliation.2. Voters blame the Govt/the Tories.3. The Tories still have a GE poll lead. 
17.4 million did not vote to remain in the EU17.4 did not vote to delay Brexit17.4 did not vote for deal17.4 million did not vote for second referendum 17.4 million did vote for Borders, no deal, freedom back and just basic sovereignty!You’ve been betrayed.. 
I’ll say this in the safe knowledge that nobody who its intended for will take a blind bit of noticeRevoking A50 doesn’t have to mean no BrexitIt’s just means not now, not this wayYour 52/48 winning mandate from 2016 is still thereIt’s not been overturned 
“ministers had banned NHS hospitals from publishing risk assessments about how Brexit might affect them, allegedly because doing so could “put public wellbeing at risk”Meanwhile Theresa May says “I’m on your side.”The hypocrisy.#RevokeArticle50Now 
#Brexit  Dosen’t beat 17.4 million that voted Leave the CRUMBLING EU. What a load of bollocks, Remoaner crybabies    . Everyday trying to stop Brexit. Shut up FFS, your boring 17.4 million people that voted leave EU to death.  
Please RT, email your MPs & support what now seems the only sane proposition after the PM has pushed us to the edge of the cliff edge, & Labour’s front bench won’t shift us back towards a viable referendum option...We need to take a collective deep breathe. #RevokeArticle50 
U.K. petition site crashes as more than 1 million demand the government cancels Brexit  
Brexit: MPs urged not to travel home alone as tensions rise  
Look, nobody believes Theresa May is actually going to cancel Brexit because of a petition, but at least we can have fun looking at the maps, says @jonnelledge 
I know "I told you so" isn't such a great look, but didn't we keep telling you that voting to give the malicious and incompetent Tories a green light to conduct a "make it up as we go along" Brexit in for their own self-interested objectives was always going to end in disaster? 
It looks like the Federation have finally intervened in Brexit in another one of those time travel episodes.#starbrexit 
Rolling Brexit Update Macron says a) Theresa May’s or b) piss off with No Deal TM says NO WAY she will revoke Article 50. Remain petition people clicking through their blisters and tears. 
NEW: #EUCO Brexit draft conclusions state: ‘The European Council commits to agreeing to an extension until *22 May 2019*, provided the WA is approved by the HoC next week. Given that The UK does not intend to hold elections to the EP, no extension is possible beyond that date' 
Theresa May is facing demands to change course over Brexit from the CBI and TUC   
Remarkable numbers now support WTO Brexit  
The failure of democracy is May's refusal to note that the majority of the British people oppose her deal, reject #Brexit and want a #PeoplesVote. Her attitude is that of Goebbels not of a democrat. 
Now: EU27 Art. 50 meeting on #Brexit starts. #EUCO 
As I said in my acceptance speech at the General Election: Bristol North West reflects the mood of the nation. Oh, and it really doesn’t like Brexit at all.  
After Gove stabbed Boris in the back and then repeatedly flip-flopped between Remain and Leave positions, he would not persuade me to vote for the Tories, even if they hadn't made a mess of Brexit.  via @Telegraph 
So 2/3 of Labour Leave voters back No Deal - how will they react at the polling station when Labour's Londoncentric elite tries to thwart Brexit? @labourleave 
'Go-slow' protest planned on the M62 motorway over Brexit - Manchester Evening NewsMake it big people!!!!!!!  
'Bad boys of Brexit' were guests at Trump’s Mar-a-Lago club.Still no word from the Met Police or National Crime Agency? @ukeuchalkenge  @bremaininspain 
In 44 years of EEC/EU membership before invoking Article 50, we secured... 5 treaty opt outs, more than any other member state.In the 2 years since we triggered Article 50, we secured... total humiliation.Ask yourself if it's #Brexit, or membership, that takes back control. 
We do not live in a dictatorship. Brexit has failed, TM refused a People’s Vote, therefore the only option left is to revoke Article 50.#RevokeA50Now#RevokeA50#RevokeArticle50 
This is a disgrace.  Not that they are travelling in groups.  That they have to.Make no mistake about it.  This is a legacy of Brexit, the way it has legitimated physical threats, mental abuse and the far right  
Exactly, like myself signing from Ireland but I am a British Citizen and have rights. I was unfairly denied a vote in the referendum because I was abroad at the time back then as well. 
Seumas wants Brexit..  
'One of the most ill advised and graceless speeches ever made by a British Prime Minister' - our commentator @joycemcm was scathing about Theresa May's speech last night. More from Joyce McMillan and @alexmassie on tonight's programme at 10:45pm #Brexit  
That's Theresa May arriving in Brussels. Her bags and latest Brexit deal are being unloaded now. #Brexit  
is no alternative to a no-deal Brexit. So if MPs don’t get there Brexit shit together next week, with or without the cooperation of PM, and unambiguously say what future relationship with the EU a majority of them would back, it will be the most abrupt rupture between UK and EU. 
...EU leaders start discussion about what happens if, as expected, come next Thursday we are looking at no-deal Brexit 24 hours later. Stop the clock to draw breath? Formalise lengthy Brexit postponement? Prepare for a no-deal Brexit 2 months later. Jump over no-deal cliff... 
It seems all @theresa_may will get here in Brussels is a conditional delay in Brexit to 23 May - 5 weeks shorter extension than she wants - and only triggered in the unlikely event she wins meaningful vote at 3rd try next week. Big question is whether 
Forget #Brexit: #Venezuela's unraveling is THE political shitshow | Venezuela's Corruption Exposed  
It’s coming. If the Tories betray Brexit, there will be hell to pay among the membership. And when May resigns, which I expect in the next 6 weeks, the party membership will vote a Brexit supporter in as PM.At last. 
Remarkable how many UK commentariat are missing the small-print in what Tusk/Macron and others are saying. Lots of breathless claims about this now being May's Deal and Short Extension OR a No Deal Brexit. That's a false binary.  
The last few participants on the #MarchToLeave are staying at the Unicorn Hotel and Brexit has now imploded   
@DominicRaab  The Brexit Secretary who hadn't read the Good Friday Agreement.  (It's 35 pages long)  
2. For May, legitimacy comes from (her interpretation of) the referendum. So it was simply an irrelevance when MPs refused to endorse her deal. For Corbyn, "the mandate" comes from Labour members. So when MPs voted "no confidence" in his leadership, that, too, was an irrelevance. 
The more we understand how a group of rich hedge fund owners made millions out of Brexit the more we realise that we are going to pay for it! Find out more @BylineFest 23-26 August - book now save 25-50%  
UK General Public - "Brexit is our biggest humiliation in Europe in living memory"Scotland Football Team - "Hold my beer...." 
If @theresa_may loses another vote on her deal in the House of Commons, EU leaders will hold an emergency summit next week, @JunckerEU tells @Stone_SkyNews. #brexit #EUCO 
The PM has said many things many times, and has rarely “been clear.” The truth is that she has wasted time, wasted taxpayers money, deepened divisions and made the U.K. look ridiculous. Any MP who now supports her botched Brexit won’t be forgiven by history. Or by voters.  
Idea: devise elaborate legal scheme which depends on a further Bill being enacted for Brexit to still take place, else Article 50 is revoked.Put it before Commons.Chope objects.Brexiteers can all then blame Chope. 
Why Brexit can & must be stopped. Revoke Article 50! Now!   
So the simple crofter thinks a no deal Brexit will be a threat to foodbanks. Well I suppose the future of Foodbanks is under a greater threat from Brexit than it would be from any policy of Nicola Sturgeon's social justice warriors.   
Michel Barnier: "We have done our best. Now the solution is in London"EU's chief negotiator says short #Brexit delay requested by Theresa May "should be conditional" on MPs passing her deal next week 
Please sign this petition. This #Brexit madness has to stop; it is an act of national self-harm that was sold to us on a pack of lies. Prove to @theresa_may that democracy wasn’t set in stone in 2016. #NotOnMySide #RevokeA50Now #RevokeArticle50Petition 
"It’s footballing Brexit. No leadership, no ideas, no courage. Their passive attitude stinks. It’s been inept." @TEnglishSport on @BBCSportsound. 
"This is a full scale national emergency."The CBI and TUC unite against a possible no-deal #Brexit. They are demanding an urgent meeting with Theresa May over her Brexit strategy:  
Brexit simple truths:"it's the entire British establishment that's trying to reverse the people's vote - that's the problem at the heart of this""still, even now there's a possibility of leaving without a deal which is in fact the real implementation of what people voted for"  
The fact that these two organisations have come together to write such a letter says everything about where this Prime Minister has led the country and why she must honour and act upon the express will of Parliament to prevent a 'no deal' #Brexit.  
#Breaking: Just in - French president "Emmanuel Macron" is saying that he won't give Britain a extention date of #Brexit until June the 30th! That will mean the #UK will leave possible with a #NoDeal agreement. 
#Revocateurs!! Friends!! Countrymen/women!!We came here not to praise Brexit, but to bury it!!The #RevokeRemain petition is now at 1,080,000.@andrealeadsom has mocked us today in the HoCI do hope it doesn’t make even more people sign up & share it! 
This is a national emergency, firms of all sizes are telling us they are not ready for a 'No-deal' Brexit, we have got to find a way forward that protects livelihood and jobs of ordinary people.  
Corbyn not ruling out revoking article 50 to avoid no-deal Brexit  
Petition asking the government to halt Brexit reaches a million signatures. Awww, bless. 
Sadly Scotland are doing our very own brexit , painful viewing sadly  
Alright, here's the plan:We lure Theresa May out to London Bridge, then one of us crouches down behind her, then the other pulls out a rubber snake, which startles her, she steps backwards, trips, and falls into the Thames, and Brexit still happens but at least we have a laugh. 
"One thing that Britain’s media have routinely glossed over are the considerable levels of support for a no-deal Brexit among voters who will be central to determining the future fortunes of the Tory Party." - Tories will reap the Brexit whirlwind  @unherd 
I’m going for the triple whammy of revoking Brexit, Theresa May *and* the GovernmentAim high kids  
I’m British, my husband is American. Between Trump and Brexit there hasn’t been a day in the last three years that one, or both of us hasn’t said “WHAT THE FUCK!?”Our 3 year-old daughter has dual U.K./USA citizenship. She could probably say it in both accents if she tried. 
Piss off Putin. Exit Brexit.  
Fully agreed. This is why we must create the biggest voting block our country has ever seen! We need to come together to avoid splitting the Brexit vote. Keep up the followings and retweets beautiful Brexiteers. 
MPs have been told to consider travelling by taxi or with colleagues in the coming days over security fears. Deputy Speaker Lindsay Hoyle wrote to all MPs ahead of potentially crunch Brexit votes next week, reports @nickeardleybbc 
Brexit has taken Teresa May 3 years and counting.Scotland have managed to exit Europe in 45 minutes.McLeish for Prime Minister 
There was a time for compromise. 52-48 was an irresistible case for Norway+. Most Leavers & Remainers could live with it. But May pursued a course that moved Leavers via Hard Brexit to No Deal and Remainers via People’s Vote to Revoke. FURTHER APART.Now, its Winner Takes All. 
The ultimate hypocrisy from Leadsom. You want to see our 17.4 million, give us a referendum.The hypocrisy further compounded given the express reason for no referendum is that REVOKE would win.  
Brexit is a rupture within the establishment. I never thought I’d see a letter like this.  
It took a carefully argued case presented by @AdamRamsay to drag me reluctantly round to the idea of another referendum. It took @theresa_may 180 seconds to persuade me that we just need to revoke the f*ck out of Article 50 & deal with nascent fascism in Number 10#RevokeArt50 
The disgusting reality of #Brexit...@SayeedaWarsi @miqdaad @catherinemep @campbellclaret @ShehabKhan @mrjamesob @Femi_Sorry @mikegalsworthy @acgrayling @LaylaMoran @joswinson @IanDunt 
We’ve joined forces with the @The_TUC to make it clear that a new Brexit approach is needed – one that protects workers and the economy, read our full letter here, 
Pharmacy managed to get drugs in and apologised for the shortage. Apparently they are not being allowed to stockpile anything because of Brexit. 
Downing Street in the ‘Revoke Article 50’ petition: “The PM has long been clear that failure to deliver on the referendum result would be a failure of our democracy. It is something she would not countenance.” It may not end up being her decision, of course. 
Brexit is 199 hours away. #brexit 
"Ever louder voices in Germany are denouncing the Brexit Withdrawal Agreement as a fundamental failure of European statecraft that can lead only to a diplomatic debacle and festering animosity." 
The Referendum was done LEAVE won, stop being a turd wanting the will of the people overturned, Do you really like the idea of being controlled by an UNELECTED #EUHITLERDICTATORSHIP - If you do, perhaps you should B.O.G.O.F. to FRANCE so you can #REMOAN all you want over there! 
German TV now covering #Brexit election crime & fraud including Russian payments to Arron Banks.The world knows.This wont be hushed up.If you are patriotic you really dont want to do something that was bought by Putin, do you?  
Except.It's not another referendum, it's a petition.Show me a petition for No Deal with 1m signatures and I'll let you crow  
TUC - "The Owen Paterson's of this world might be fine and relaxed, but workers at Honda and Nissan certainly aren't." #EU #Brexit  
New #BenGarrison #GreatBritain #UK #cartoon #NOExitBrexit @Nigel_Farage #Brexit #Britain ’s Prime Minister #TheresaMay claims she’s on the side of the public when it comes to Brexit, but nothing ever seems to happen. #TheresaMayResign  Read the post at  
Barclays Chairman: No Deal Brexit will hurt EU ‘very significantly’. “On 30th of March, whatever happens, the European capital market will be in London.”  
“About £1.5bn has been allocated to Brexit planning, with three departments getting an extra £25m for Operational Yellowhammer.”...We could've just saved all this money to fund the NHS and other services. #PeoplesVote 
3 - Scotland haven’t been embarrassed this much in Europe since the UK voted for Brexit 3 years ago. Borat. 
Fighting for the remain cause is like trying to score goals when the match is over. The final whistle's been blown.  I appreciate it's a disappointment but we must all now put it behind us and take advantage of all the opportunities that a post Brexit world offers. 
"This is a full scale national emergency."The CBI and TUC unite against a possible no-deal #Brexit. They are demanding an urgent meeting with Theresa May over her Brexit strategy:  
Indeed.  The only people who want a no deal are those set to benefit from it, the exact same people who instigated brexit in the first place, a small group of bankers and billionaires who want to trash and pillage the country.  Parliament can not allow that to happen. #FBPE 
“Revocation – cancelling Brexit – returns us to where we were before we triggered Article 50. All of the special benefits – the rebate, the opt-outs, the derogations – that we had negotiated for ourselves over the years are ours to keep.” @JolyonMaugham 
Dear @eucopresident @MichelBarnier @guyverhofstadt It is in the interests of the EU to allow the largest and most passionate pro-EU movement in Europe to complete its work of kicking #Brexit into the dustbin reserved for delusional national projects. #RevokeArticle50 #FBPE 
'Bad boys of Brexit' were guests at Trump’s Mar-a-Lago club  
Bercow defends MPs after May blames them for Brexit delay  
.@timfarron’s face pretty much sums up what people think about Corbyn’s #Brexit “policy” (providing he has one).  
"This is a significant move by the biggest voices for business and workers in our country" says @johnmcdonnellMP on @TUCnews and @CBItweets call for #Brexit Plan B 
Realistic currencies for Scotland post-Indy:•Scots Pound.•Euro.Currencies that we’d be daft to use:•Post-Brexit GB Pound•Venezuelan peso •Skittles we found down the back of the sofa...both worth about the same amount at that point. 
Except.It's not another referendum, it's a petition.Show me a petition for No Deal with 1m signatures and I'll let you crow  
When I backpacked round US years ago, white South Africans, embarrassed by apartheid, would pretend to be Brits. I find this #Brexit process so humiliating that, from now on, when travelling, I'm going to pretend to be South African - it's the best accent! 
May is determined to force the UK to accept her Brexit deal and refusing to listen to anyone. You could do worse than use this petition to show she doesn't speak for you and you want to see parliament considering all options for dealing with this...  
Brexit - not as bad as WWII or the Rwandan genocide. Put that on the side of a bus.  
Over a million and now the fastest growing and most popular Brexit option. When we first introduced it in Parliament only a few MP colleagues supported it. It must come back as the main way forward to end the Brexit madness.  
May is determined to force the UK to accept her Brexit deal and refusing to listen to anyone. You could do worse than use this petition to show she doesn't speak for you and you want to see parliament considering all options for dealing with this crisis... 
BREAKING: Theresa May rushes to appoint Alex McLeish as new Brexit Secretary as he will guarantee being out of Europe in March 2019 
"While everyone promised that citizens’ rights were the first priority, our rights continue to remain part of the negotiations while a no-deal Brexit now looms larger than ever before." writes @cliodiaspora about our uncertainty for the last 1,000 days 
MASTER: I propose one, we revoke  Article 50. Two, we reconfigure our two TARDISes into time-cone inverters. Three, we create a Brexit safe-zone by applying temporal inversion isometry to as much of space-time as we can isolate.  
The #ScottishSix made it possible for UK to unilaterally #RevokeArticle50 by fighting UK Govt all the way to #CJEU. We couldn’t have done it without support of @JolyonMaugham @GoodLawProject & 1000s of small donors. Thank you. #Brexit #ConstitutionalCrisis 
Gibraltar's chief minister believes revoking the UK's Article 50 notification is the only way 'to take back control' of #Brexit  
The UK votes to leave the EU.Remainers try to overturn the result.Brexiteers insist on upholding the result.Remainers blame Brexiteers for the 'impasse'.Remainers declare that Brexit has proven 'disastrous'.This is political deceitfulness on a dangerously epidemic scale 
.@theresa_may in the room with EU leaders: A shrug, a pout and some nodding. #brexit  
It's so weird the the media are portraying #UK as being in a total "crisis" because of some difficulties negotiating #Brexit, whilst #Macron is presented as a voice of reason, despite months and months of riots tearing his country a part. #GiletsJaunes 
"Parliament can't revoke #Brexit!""Yes it can, Parliament is sovereign & could simply pass a statute conferring authority, on behalf of the Crown, to authorised person to deliver revocation of article 50 notice to EU."It simply needs a vote by parliament.MPs need to know. 
The Brexit infighting is not as bad as the Rwandan genocide, a Tory MP helpfully points out  (h/t @RKWinvisibleman) 
Brexit is not the cause of Britain’s political breakdown. It’s the symptom | Gary Younge  
One million people sign petition to cancel Brexit. 
Your #ThrowbackThursday #BenGarrison #Cartoon from 2016  #Brexit #EU abandon ship!#StayTooned For A NEW Cartoon Launching in..3..2...1... 
Willie Rennie says Scotland will just have to put up with the chaos of BREXIT. What a thing to say about his nation @theSNP @Always_a_Yes 
What's your best guess as to what happens next?Vote and retweet. #Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn is backing a second referendum.Jeremy Corbyn has refused to rule out revoking Article 50 to stop a no deal Brexit.Yet no doubt second referendum FBPE  Twitter will say he’s ‘facilitating Brexit’.Jeremy Corbyn is giving their cause a lifeline. Give him credit. 
SCOTLAND HAS FRIENDS  cross-party group – including MEPs an MPs from Germany, France, Italy, Spain, Belgium, Portugal, Sweden, Greece, Hungary and Malta – argued that Scotland would be “most welcome” as a full member of  European Union if it breaks away from UK after Brexit 
"80 or 90% of people in the UK feel that you've now got a diminished country in the eyes of the rest of the world. That will accelerate to 100% if there is a hard Brexit."Dutch PM Mark Rutte says a hard Brexit would drastically affect how the UK is seen by other countries.  
Post-Brexit we can boost wages further by slashing unskilled migration. Bloomberg: “UK wages pick up as fewer Eastern EU workers fill jobs” What a shame Trade Union leaders choose to largely ignore this. 
Opinion: As the Article 50 petition hits 1m signatures, could it really save Britain from Brexit?  
If only there was someone speaking to kids in gangs in the same way, maybe there wouldn't be so many deaths. It's so easy for these things to turn ugly. I don't know the man but I respect what he's saying. Spoke with knowledge, power and sincerity! Dean Whyte to sort Brexit!  
Public Blame MPs More Than May For 'Brexit Situation'  
 I just experienced a bit of the bitter taste of #Brexit during my lunch in Brussels. Any suggestions what I should have said to this gentleman? pic.twitter.com/XQGQCntWib 
I fear the EU now sees a no-deal as a way of dealing a brutal lesson to an arrogant deluded, chaotic, irresponsible and disruptive country, knowing full well that it will have total control when the UK comes crawling back begging for a deal.#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit #FBPE 
LATEST: The petition urging the U.K. government to cancel Brexit has passed 1 million signatures  
“Let Parliament make the decision next week to honour the Brexit referendum by making a binary choice: her deal or No Deal. And then I will be going for No Deal because I think it’s infinitely preferable to yet more grief. Let’s get on with it” @CrispinBlunt#StandUp4Brexit 
The Brexit petition now has over a million signatures. We should break off and form our own society, where foreigners are welcome and we don't have to fight over toilet rolls and body bags. 
"Theresa May is the author of her own misfortune", says Brexit spokesperson @Anna_Soubry on #PoliticsLive today. Support us here:  
In between being preposterously rude and arrogant, Starkey managed to reveal that he doesn't understand (a) that parliamentary sovereignty has a political as well as a legal dimension; (b) the constitutional status of the referendum and (c) the Fixed-terms Parliament Act.  
Reminder: the UK EU #Brexit referendum took place 1,001 days ago but the first clue about the government’s plan came with the Chequers Plan about 100 days ago.  There was very little detail to allow any coherent business planning.  Businesses and labour organisations: ignored. 
Poor Nigel. Half way through this clip, even he realises he's lost the argument...#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
May has bloomin’ cheek accusing MPs of game-playing: she’s manipulated Parl for 4 mths, incl stalling for 2 before putting deal to a vote; her Brexit Sec voted agst the 14/3 ext motion he urged support for; & her action now contravenes that motion which implied longer ext now 
Forget #Brexit,  instead here’s some photos of the forgotten French  4x4 supercar designed for Dakar, the Mercedes V12 powered Aixam Mega Track. Your welcome!  
EU27 leaders discuss #Brexit, including a possible extension under #Article50, as requested by PM @theresa_may.  Check out our timeline for the key moments in the Brexit process... 
The Yes campaign for an Independent Scotland needs to incorporate the Led by Donkeys mobile and static signage campaign against Brexit. Not sure of the cost. Thought we missed that in lead up to 2014. 
Theresa May's Brexit deal would be disastrous for a future left government  
Devastating piece on Brexit as show business by @brooks_bonny 
Corbyn not ruling out revoking article 50 to avoid no-deal Brexit  
 Leavers of Scotland! In #Glasgow on the 29th March? Then you might like to RSVP to this #Brexit #Lexit @Leavers_Britain event. Lots of great speakers and then, for a bit of contrast, me.  Hope to see you there! RSVP  CC @tfbrexit 
One of these is an excerpt from a Brexit “lines-to-take” paper prepared for Brexit minister ⁦@KwasiKwarteng⁩ and the other what ⁦@Jeremy_Hunt⁩ said on Today 
BREXIT IN: 8 DAYS. 8 SECONDS.Theresa May is running out of time... and so are we!  #EUCO #Brexit  
TUC and CBI issue joint statement saying UK faces 'national emergency' and May must embrace plan B. It is very unusual for the main employers’ organisation and the body representing trade unions to unite in this way. #RevokeArticle50 #Brexit 
we're already derided internationally, we've lost every scrap of soft power. we're utterly risible.  Revoke A50 and investigate the referendum. 
The fight between Theresa May and MPs is really a fight over how best to betray Brexit, made interminable by their shared incompetence:  
For those not in the UK, a quick update on things.The UK gov't has a website where people can petition the government. At 10,000 votes, the gov't has to respond. At 100,000, it will be considered for a debate.A petition to cancel Brexit reached 1mil just now. 
The video below shows a crowd protesting outside a postal service being searched by Spanish police for referendum material. A Guardia Civil testifies that the protesters insulted and threatened them - "I had never seen anything like it." This video is not allowed in court either.  
Watching Sky News coverage of #Brexit and gobsmacked at the insanity that has engulfed the British establishment. Theresa May now in full kamikaze mode, a PM desperate to salvage a semblance of legacy and failing badly. If I were you I’d be keeping a wary eye on the generals. 
A. The vote was not to leave on the 29th of March, there was no set date on the referendum. B. Are you surprised that the 16 million people who voted remain are still fighting their cause? It was only 2% either way after all. 
Short #Brexit extension should end by April 18th - the date by which U.K. would have to notify participation in European Parliament elections, says @Antonio_Tajani 
European Parliament President @Antonio_Tajani says he told EU leaders any extension should be no longer than 18 April - the latest date by which the UK could organise an EU election in time for 23 May.This is even earlier than the shortest date floated by Juncker. #Brexit #EUCO 
So, “No Deal Brexit” is the only scenaruo where the UK’s 0.01% aren’t subject to “Stop Hiding Your Taxable Income, Fuckers” laws.Suddenly explains a fuckload, this needs more broadcasting.Hey, @CaseyExplosion 
European parliament president Antonio Tajani said Brexit extension should not go beyond 18 April, the last session of the current EP before elections. 
Very good piece by @meadwaj: ‘Remain is unambiguously better than what is on offer: better for democratic rights, better for economic democracy, better for sovereignty. If it takes a second referendum to defeat it, that option should be taken.”  
The chairman of Barclays, John McFarlane, says that London will remain a global financial centre and warns a clean WTO Brexit "would hurt the EU very significantly" and force them to the table. So much for Project Fear!Support us at  
Corbyn not ruling out revoking article 50 to avoid no-deal Brexit  He has the chance to go down in history by pushing this through the House and then proposing how we use our membership to reform the EU for good 
At 8.30pm @theresa_may went on TV and said that the public want parliament to get on with brexit. It seems that triggered a reaction #RevokeArticle50 (For the record still think #PeoplesVote followed by Revoke is the better approach for closure) 
Am I the only one who doesn’t know what the fuck a brexit is? I couldn’t give a shite!Timeline is just rammed with brexit shite and detectives talking shit about maddie. Can everyone just start calling people nonces again please. Thanks 
1/ It's transparency time! On Tuesday the CJEU ruled against the appeal of Harry Shindler and others, who challenged the legality of the Brexit negotiations. The court hasn't published its ruling, but here it is. (I was asked to omit the names of the other applicants).  
Storming out of crisis Brexit meetings because your ex was there: the electoral strategy  
Article 50 site appears to be hosted on two single instances of @awscloud.  Simple.  Over 1,000,000 votes and only a little bit of outage. #cloud #devops #brexit #article50 
Boris Johnson has received another £15k from the pro-Brexit JCB, figures show, part of a mass of donations to potential Conservative leadership contenders Our democracy is massively corrupted by big money. This must end.#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit 
Ach well let's take a quick break from Brexit and check in on the OH FOR THE LOVE OF  
One of the sweetest consequences of a "No Deal" Brexit is knowing the EU will have a £39billion sized hole in its budget! I wonder where they will find all THAT cash? 
Just 16,400,000 more needed! #brexit  
The Dutch PM was noticeably less cocky today when talking Brexit. Has there been some kind of election in the Netherlands?... 
Ladies and Gentlemen, buckle your seatbelts. We now have just 200 hours until we crash out of the EU with a no deal Brexit.#RevokeArticle50 
Corbyn not ruling out revoking article 50 to avoid no-deal Brexit  
Breaking News: Petition calling for Brexit to be cancelled passes one million signatures. @AdamBoultonSky 
Memo to Jeremy Corbyn.You are not Prime Minister.You are not in Government.It doesn't matter what you are "not ruling out"BTW - I wonder how the millions of Labour Brexit voters feel about your casual dismissal of what THEY voted to enact? 
So, as @JeremyCorbyn demonstrated last night, he is unwilling to sit down with @ChukaUmunna in an attempt to resolve Brexit, however he is clearly far more comfortable sitting alongside antisemites campaigning for the release of convicted terrorists who have murdered Jews..... 
I want a #PeoplesVote but Theresa May won't call one.If she is going to run the clock down and risk a no deal Brexit, then the time has come to #RevokeArt50. Over a million people have signed. Please, join them. 
I'd be raging if I ate that continental muck for breakfast too. You need proper Brexit breakfast, mate.  
A lot of people saying they've been waiting 3/4 hours for confirmation email for the anti-Brexit petition, so that 1m total might be on MASSIVE time-lag. 
I'm rather optimistically making gifs for my Big Brexit Knees Up next Friday....  
Whatever is happening with Brexit, there’s human & climatic catastrophe happening right now in southern Africa affecting millions of people. We are providing vital life-saving UK aid for now but this also shows why long term solutions to climate change are essential  
Utterly shocking that an advisory referendum on a binary question voted for by 26% of the population should have brought us to this disaster zone #RevokeArticle50 
I get it, you're anti-Brexit.I get it, you really want Brexit.I think we need to move beyond this conversation now... 
Brexit: don’t you just hate it when the thing you’re working on starts buffering at 98%? 
Petition to cancel Brexit quickly blows past 1 million signatures and crashes UK Parliament’s website  
For anyone that missed it. A nice little moment in a sea of chaos. #brexit #RevokeA50Now #Petition #onemillionsignatures #remain #RevokeArticle50Petition 
More than a million people signed an online petition urging the government to cancel Brexit  
Petition asking the government to halt Brexit reaches a million signatures   
I mean, I’m sure there are some people who genuinely want a No Deal Brexit, but then there are some people who genuinely enjoy having their balls nailed to the table. 
Let’s face it; the elephant in the room right now is that NEARLY EVERYBODY wants to #RevokeArticle50, ESPECIALLY most of the Brexit cheerleaders; that way they’ll never have to put their (non-existent) money where their (lying) mouth is and get back on the Europhobic gravy train. 
I’m an ardent remainder, but if they’d have respected the 52/48 result and gone with a soft Brexit, I’d have reluctantly supported it. Instead, the way we’ve been dismissed has made me into a practically militaristic remainer. 
 @NicolaSturgeon: “The frustration people feel right now at our country, Scotland’s future, being determined by the DUP and a cabal of right-wing Tories is understandable, and I share it.”Westminster cannot protect Scotland from the folly of Brexit. #FMQs 
OVER 1M #RevokeA50Now #RevokeArt50 #Brexit #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
Theresa May is right to say parliament is defying the people. But so is she. The fight between the PM and the Commons is really a fight about how best to betray Brexit — and the public knows this, writes @Tom_Slater_ 
A petition on the UK Parliament website demanding Brexit be stopped has passed a million signatures. The petition calls for Article 50 of the Lisbon Treaty which triggered Britain’s  withdrawal from the European Union to be revoked.  
Brexit is 200 hours away. #brexit 
The biggest petition in the history of YouGov is the one from *before* the referendum where 4,150,260 signed to say, whoever won, if they had less than 60% of the vote they should do it again. They ignored that. 
Capital and labour joining together to yell "STOP IT, STOP IT ALL OF YOU" is like the perfect illustration of how Brexit broke the party system 
Petition calling for Brexit to be cancelled passes one million signatures  
When will MSM get the message that they no longer have great influence on voters perceptions on Brexit and that the ppl may want information but they don’t want the presenters biased opinions.Just report the news and allow the individual to make up their own mind. 
Having meetings all day and realising how many people are uniting as one, for the 29th of March in London is truly astonishing The public, Political parties & organisations putting all their differences aside, to stand united as one. #WeAreThePeople #Brexit  
Your occasional reminder: the withdrawal agreement is supposed to be the easy bit of Brexit. 
"What's-a the matter you? Hey!Gotta no respect?What-a think you do?Why you look-a so sad?It's-a not so bad, Border's-a nice-a placeBrexit, shaddap-a you face"  
"The snobbery and elitism of the Remoaner lobby is alarming. It’s like a boil has burst and all this Victorian-style contempt for the little people has poured forth. Chattering-class disdain for Brexit voters is such an ugly prejudice."- Brendan O'Neill 
THAT'S IT, 1 MILLION SIGNATURES, BREXIT IS CANCELLED, bye 
Petition to cancel Brexit hits 1 million signatures  
BREAKING: Revoke Article 50 petition to stop Brexit hits 1,000,000 signatures 
Addendum: a no-confidence vote won't change things. a) Brexit date has to be changed in law - no time if govt opposed.  2)  Defeated govt has 2 weeks to secure a new majority, so clock still runs down, and no Tory cand who wants to win likely to support delay 8/7 
FROM VILLAIN TO HERO IN ONE EASY LESSON IF SHE DOES  #SupportMayWithNodealBrexit LIVE: May to 'BEND to her party' and back NO DEAL - PM will REJECT long delay  
Brexit more like Brmaywestayaroundabitlonger amirite haha America is dying let me have this 
Wow.....not seen this before....TUC and CBI  in joint plea to May over Brexit...  
No Keir. What the government should be doing is delivering on the people’s vote in 2016, and on its own manifesto, with a WTO Brexit next week.  
Around 40,000 signatures on the Revoke A50 petition are from non-UK countries.For 3 years, I've heard so much nonsense about Russian interference in Brexit, but suddenly FORTY THOUSAND signatures from outside the UK in 24 hours are not even slightly suspicious?Hypocrites. 
Significant joint TUC-CBI plea to avoid no deal brexit  
It's time to end the Brexit embarrassment. It's time for a People's Vote. Join our campaign now   
With almost weekly attacks on DFID from Tory MPs, and the Department losing 170 staff due to Brexit chaos, it's difficult to know what would be a bigger danger to UK aid – a No Deal Brexit or a Tory leadership challenge.  
petitions are good and all but I’m sceptical that they will change minds, if remainers really want to win the argument then they have to make their message reach the communities that voted for brexit, not the people who already voted remain 
A petition to cancel #Brexit gets a million signatures, crashing the UK Parliament's petition website  
How about a compromise solution to Brexit?We deliver on the votes of (all) the British people, by letting 17.4m of them leave the country and 16.1m remain.To quote our Prime Minister - 'Simples' 
PETITION TO CANCEL #Brexit quickly blows past 1 million signatures and crashes #UK Parliament’s websitecelebrities like #AnnieLennox and #HughGrant endorsed the petition, 870,000 people signed on demanding that the government cancel Brexit#MOG#MAGA 
Brexit just visibly feels like every member of parliament holding a gun to their feet and screaming they don’t know what to do 
Petition approaches ONE MILLION signatures as anti-Brexit campaigner slams PM as ‘danger to democracy’ #RevokeA50Now 
There is one possible insurance measure. If the Letwin/Cooper plan to take control of the Commons timetable succeed in doing so, they could use the time to delete the scheduled Brexit date before the summit, stopping the clock until a new date is agreed. 6/n 
About to do a podcast on Brexit - what do you think is missing from media coverage so far? What hasn't been discussed? 
The largest ever petition, which reached more than 4 million signatures, called on the government to run a second referendum if the winning side received less than 60% of the vote. It was originally created by a leave supporter before the EU referendum. 
Just some of the UK's burning issues to be overlooked on tonight's #BBCQT to make room for Brexit talkDoctors taking on cleaning roles to save money100k fewer nurses over the next 10 yearsHomelessness Wages now +£300 less than they were 10 years ago. 
'Both government and parliament have failed every Brexit test so far placed before them. It would be a brave person who assumes they cannot fail again' – Robert Shrimsley  
Brexit. I am trying to follow along, but this is like a choose your own adventure without page numbers... in Greek. 
So, (Brexit permitting) I'll be at the @londonbikeshow on Sunday 31st on the  @CasquetteCC stage from 1.30 - 2.30pm, doing a Q&A with @BeccaCharlton, talking about inspiring female cyclists from my book Queens of Pain. Come and say hello!! 
Amidst the unfolding #Brexit chaos, some MPs might have been edging towards backing May’s rotten deal. Not after the prime minister’s speech last night, a grotesque bid to pitch people against Parliament. This is what losing control looks like. 
WTF??Did .@andrealeadsom really say they'll look at Revoke petition once it reaches 17.4m?,Who does she think she is?1 MILLION signed a petition in less than 24hrs. 24 HOURS!!Staggering arrogance by a failed wannabe PM#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit#MayMustGo #LeadshomMustGo 
 @MichelBarnier at #Brexit #EUCO:  Endorsement of legally binding assurances agreed in Strasbourg. Should not be a problem.  Short extension should be conditional on positive vote in @HouseofCommons next week. We have done our best. Now the solution is in London. 
As the EU summit gets underway this afternoon here's my message to European Leaders from yesterday's debate. Theresa May does not speak for the elected parliament of the UK. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
France's Emmanuel Macron says if MPs reject UK PM Theresa May's #Brexit plan "it will guide everybody to a no-deal, for sure"[tap to expand]  
Can't imagine what irks @Nigel_Farage so much about 'New Labour' and @campbellclaret .....sounds a little desperate from the man beaten by a dolphin....not the big data variety of course! 
From the tone of the PM's statement in Brussels, I think the trajectory is now fixed: if the House rejects her Withdrawal Agreement again, we will leave the EU at 11.00pm on 29th March with no deal (ie a clean, global Brexit on WTO terms). She will be lauded; her legacy assured. 
May’s toxic speech looks like massive own goal  It was also a delusional attempt to absolve herself of any blame for the worrying Brexit stalemate we find ourselves in. #StopBrexitSaveBritain@InFactsOrg  
.@pamela_nash of Scotland in Union said: “@NicolaSturgeon is behaving irresponsibly and treating the Brexit crisis as an opportunity to promote her divisive agenda, rather than behaving like a First Minister prepared to bring the country together.” 
NB It's not just the PM who makes #Brexit statements to the cameras here with the audience back home in mind. EU leaders do that too. Worth bearing in mind when listening to their forthright #Brexit statements on their way in to the summit building today  /4 
#UPDATE "Our country is facing a national emergency. Decisions of recent days have caused the risk of no-deal to soar" - British business and union leaders warn Britain faces a "national emergency" from a no-deal Brexit 
God I can't go into Brexit arguments in my lunch break. It's supposed to be a BREAK, Ellen... 
I’ve signed this open letter from SU sabbs on behalf of CUSU after Cambridge students voted to back a second referendum. With Brexit just 8 days away young people will be marching on Saturday to call for a people’s vote!! #PutitothePeopleMarch @FFSake_ 
Let's just give up on the Brexit stuff and get this protest going instead...It's the right thing to do.  
Spot the difference.After the referendum, David Cameron called it "one of the biggest democratic exercises in our history", but under Theresa May, this has somehow become "the biggest", despite this not being true either in terms of turnout or number of votes cast.  
If 18 million people were to sign this (17 million voted to leave), maybe we could end this Brexit torture?Then in my dream reality we'd have a general exlection, get rid of this bunch of imbeciles, and have @CarolineLucas for PM 
BREXIT: Daily Mail readers begging President Macron to help them get the no-deal implosion they want is the last straw for the irony meter. The irony meter is now dead.  
EU sees no 'ideal' solution here. They don't like idea of a long extension or rolling short extensions with permanent threat of a no deal #Brexit round the corner ("We've had enough drama" one EU diplomat told me) BUT leaders will want to avoid a no deal Brexit if they can /3 
Brexit is a mess. It's time for a @peoplesvote_uk 
17.4 million electorates have been betrayed.We voted in 2016 yet the government doesn’t know what they are doing.It’s catastrophic that our MP are trying to make a disaster of Brexit as they do not care for our future.We must act before it’s too late as same with countrysid 
"She has signed the death note on meaningful vote three" - Deputy political editor, @BethRigby explains that Theresa May's Downing Street statement has left MPs 'furious' and created more division. Get more on #Brexit here:  
"No Deal #Brexit will lead to massive price increases"Oh wait... #NoDealNoProblem. 
EU leaders reject narrative that there's only 2 options now: Theresa May's deal or a no deal #Brexit . They will also debate option of a longer extension if the deal is rejected again by parliament next week /2 
Here is @C_Kay who voted leave in 2016, but given the fact far more about #brexit ramifications are know now, has reassessed & is another #RemainerNow Respect , so many in the same boat and their stories are told her @RemainerNow. It's time MPs  #PutItToThePeople 
"What we've seen is a Leave-voting country more resolute in that view than it was at the time of the referendum, and a Remain parliament trying to frustrate it every inch of the way."-  Nigel Farage 
Watch the 1st six minutes of this and try to still tell me that the referendum must be respected folks!   Seriously.   Revoke A50 now and let the investigations finish! 
Which is why Alastair this previously Labour supporting No voter from 2014 will now vote Yes in the next referendum. The UK is finished. 
Petition to cancel Brexit crashes UK Parliament website due to high number of signatures  
How come the French President gets it that we've already made our decision but the @theresa_may and our own MPs don't? “Brexit was not a choice made by France, it was a choice made by the British.” #NoDealBrexit 
Brexit poses a huge risk to the NHS, as it opens us up to trade deals with other countries who may want to get their hands on our healthcare.Signing this petition tells the govt that we won't stand for an NHS sold off to the USA in a post-Brexit deal. 
Theresa May 'not on public's side' over Brexit - Sky Data Poll  
Listen to this....and weep#Brexit  
Celebrities including Hugh Grant, Annie Lennox, David Mitchell, and Brian Cox are among those who have endorsed a petition to cancel Brexit  
Farage saying revoke A50 or leave with no deal. Ok then. 
“Millions are clamouring to sign up, and MPs should listen carefully to the mood of the country. We need a final say. But if the government insists on toying with no deal, it’s no Brexit at all that should be the default." - @eloisetodd 
No surprise Dulwich & West Norwood has 8th highest number of signatories to article 50 petition Reflects my inbox entirely. My commitment is to keep representing the views of vast majority of my constituents on Brexit. The PM does not speak for them, I do!  
A quick reminder of the first 5 ProBrexit Go-Slow protests that will take place tomorrow (22nd March) around the UK. Please try and get to your nearest event and cheer from any safe position you can #GoSlow #GoWTO #Brexit  
For you Nigel, the war is over! 
Jean-Claude Juncker on his relationship with Theresa May: ‘I didn’t even know I had this much patience.’ #Brexit 
Petition to cancel Brexit quickly blows past 1 million signatures and crashes UK Parliament’s website  
BREAKING: President Macron insists that if MPs reject May’s deal again, it will mean a No Deal Brexit. Independence is in sight!  
Doesn't this tell a familiar story?On the left, No Deal petition: Broad support across the UK.On the right, No Brexit petition: London, Cambridge and Oxford. Support us at  
Voting against May's deal "will guide toward a no-deal #Brexit." Macron says an extension is possible, on the condition MPs vote for Theresa May's deal in parliament. EU leaders are gathering in Brussels today, follow live updates here:  
And...Carry on up the SpeakerUnhinged and Brexit. I think we might have to do a Twitter poll to decide... 
Today I’m proud to be responding for @UKLabour on the debate ‘Services for people with Autism’. I’m so pleased this has been accommodated but it’s important issues like this that are being squeezed out due to our obsession to profligate on #Brexit 
It's perfectly possible that PM will try to take country to No Deal if MV3 failsWill Parliament allow her?This is becoming a game of chicken where MPs are raising the stakes to the *entire country*All MPs who want an orderly Brexit need to think very carefully before MV3 
Skynews stop lying.A no deal is NOT crashing out. Report the news. Cut out the anti Brexit rhetoric. You are an utter disgrace. 
One Tory Cabinet minister who is himself terrified of a no deal Brexit said he couldn’t nonetheless vote for a long extension because he would be “burnt in effigy” forever across Tory Britain.Read the latest @GaryGibbonBlog here: 
Digging a HoleJCB, one of the independence referendum English-based companies to think it has a right to tell Scotland to vote against its interests, backs Boris Johnson's leadership bid with a further £15,000 gift. 
Tomorrow,  we stop in Ft William and increase our Brexit supplies from 4 months to 6 months. We'll be jist fine. It's others I worry about. PS...Soup pot is aye on if you come to Skye. 
Who sounds the more rattled, Nigel 'Rambler' Farage or Anna Soubry? Watch as @Anna_Soubry asks poor old @Nigel_Farage 'how's the march going?' 
#EU stands ready. #UK has to make up its mind. #EUCO #Brexit  
European Parliament’s Guy Verhofstadt tells me “it’s not our problem” if Mrs May is not prepared to move her red lines to avoid a No Deal Brexit. Asked whether patience is wearing thin, he replies: “A little bit, yes”. 
Rolling Brexit update - Macron says he will veto TM demand for an extension - Remainers self-soothing by clicking repeatedly on a petition.  In all cases, one of their wrists (usually left) has been curiously well prepared for repetitive activities such as this.  
An issue as big and important as Brexit should not come down to petitions - that said, if you are frustrated that the PM is just not listening, you can sign here.   
Emmanuel Macron:If MPs don't back May's deal then we're headed for no dealIf MPs back the deal then a short extension is easyBUT if UK needs a long extension there must be "deep political change""Deep political change"= general election? second referendum? New leader? 
 "How's the march going Nigel?" "Oh - very well indeed" @Anna_Soubry and @Nigel_Farage clash on #Brexit and political elites #politicslive 
So @theresa_may - you say delay to Brexit is a 'personal regret' for you - not deaths of disabled people due to the 'human catastrophe' you created, not lives ruined by Universal Credit, not the rise in homelessness. No regret from you on that. Speaks volumes as to what you are. 
Leo Varadkar being extremely frank, a no-deal Brexit would be a choice taken by the British Government as the option is there to revoke Article 50 at any moment.“They do not need permission to do that so no-deal, if it happens, will be a British choice." 
BREXIT: Could Article 50 be revoked? A growing number of MPs think so /#EU #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
A poll by @SkyData suggests 24% of people think Prime Minister Theresa May is more to blame for the Brexit situation while 36% think MPs are more to blame and 33% believe both are equally responsible 
Accumulative probs & some adjustments... #Brexit diagram V20.1 - pre-#EUCOComparison to Monday:No Deal 24% General Election (needs ext.) 25% May's Deal 2% People's Vote 25% Rescind Article 50 12% Long delay 12% Hig res images:  
Sacré bleu. The great hope of the dying centre-ground, President Macron, says MPs either back Theresa May’s shambolic Withdrawal Agreement or its a No Deal Brexit.Can’t for the life of me think why the French can’t stand the Poundshop Blair. 
As a British person, I appreciate Donald Trump Jr. fighting for the Brexit vote - unlike the government officials themselves - than I do you with your lack of... I don't even know what you do. Who the hell are you?  
Permit the Chancellor to apply some German logic. Frau May has negotiated the hardest possible Brexit the EU can accept. If this is still not hard enough for her extreme Brexiteers, the only option is moving to the centre with a softer Brexit. How is this so hard to understand? 
imagine the poor english lit students who are going have to write about undertones of brexit in literature in 50 years 
Brexit is a complete and utter mess. We're now days away from falling off a cliff edge with catastrophic consequences. With Parliament in gridlock - it's time to stop the clock and give the British public the final say.  
Barclays Chairman: - No Deal Brexit will hurt EU ‘very significantly’ - EU ‘closed system’, London ‘evolved’ - ‘On 30th of March, whatever happens, the European capital market will be in London.’ 
Thank you @rickyolgiati for speaking up for the EU citizens in the UK & @BritishInEurope. People, we, must not become the collateral damage of a no-deal Brexit. Please help us to #RescueOurRights by committing to ring-fence #citizensrights should Brexit negotiations fail.  
Emmanuel Macron says that if Parliament rejects the Brexit deal again next week, "we are heading towards no deal".   
I would urge the First Minister to heed his own advice and put country (Wales that is) before party by supporting @Plaid_Cymru’s call for a 21-month Article 50 extension with a #PeoplesVote at the end, rather than facilitating Jeremy Corbyn’s scorched earth Brexit strategy.  
WATCH:  Go behind-the-scenes with @bbclaurak in a one-off special for @BBCTwo as she reports on the twists & turns of Parliament as the UK negotiates to leave the EU. More info The Brexit Storm: Laura Kuenssberg’s Inside Story, Mon 1 April, 9pm   
There was a time when we'd never heard the word Brexit n we didn't fully appreciate how braw that was. 
According to #CokeHeadOsborne the #EveningStandard  says that Theresa May Yesterday, threatened to resign as PM if her MP’s insisted on a Brexit  delay longer than June.  They should have called her bluff the WIMPS 
Farage says he will tear Tories 'limb from limb' if Brexit is delayed  
Future German TV remake of Fawlty Towers:"Don't mention the Brexit!" 
Here is more truth on Heidi Allen.She has previously said.I accept the referendum result.I want a 2nd Referendumand now the truth finally she wants to revoke Article 50.But she doesn’t want a by-election in South Cambridgeshire.  
A court has already ruled that the referendum was corrupt but because it was advisory couldn't cancel it. A responsible government would abide by the letter of the law and revoke A50. 
Let's be absolutely clear @theresa_may, if you opt to drag the UK out of the EU without a deal that will be YOUR choice. YOU don't have to do it. The referendum was advisory and all the evidence points to a #NoDealBrexit being an unmitigated disaster. You could #RevokeArticle50 
President Macron  warns if PM's brexit deal goes down next week  ..."it will guide everyone  towards No Deal. This is it" 
Wales  can leave the UK.We can join the EU We could join the Eurozone.We could also not join the EU but we could stay in the EEA.61% of Welsh exports go to the EU.Cymru  has an alternative.#Brexit #Remain #Leave #Wales #Cymru #Britain #UK #EU 
Opinion: By revoking Article 50 and forcing the PM out, we can save Britain from Brexit  
Anna Soubry saying she has never voted to stop BrexitAnna Soubry last week VOTED to take no deal off the table Anna Soubry last week VOTED to extend Article 50 Anna Soubry last week VOTED for a second referendumAnna Soubry voted 3 times last week to stop Brexit.  
Now is the moment for Brexiteers in Parliament to stay true and be brave  #brexit 
Great Stop Brexit rally in Brussels with @SHKMEP, @SebDance, @RCorbettMEP @MadeleinaKay 
BREAKING: Emmanuel Macron says that if Parliament rejects the Brexit deal again next week, "we are heading towards no deal" 
Having a vote with all people eligible voting is by definition democratic. You might say unnecessary, not wanted but it isn't undemocratic. I rely on the words of ex- Brexit Secretary, David Davis -'If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy. '  
Anyone else ever deep out about all the OTHER things the government could have discussed and implemented and done by now if 3% more people voted no brexit. Think of all the important things that have been ignored in favour of fuckin pointless brexit talk for THREE YEAR S T H R E 
I’ve signed the petition to #RevokeArticle50 because I never got a say in the first vote and I don’t want adults to make a decision that will dictate my future. The government have proved that they are simply not capable to navigate the brexit proceedings  
MACRON SAYS BREXIT DEAL CAN'T BE RENEGOTIATED 
Can you imagine if  #RevokeArticle50 petition got more signatures than votes in the referendum .  
It's been five years since Russia's referendum by gunpoint and occupation of Crimea. On a special @gaslitnation, @AndreaChalupa breaks down the crisis, the role of Paul Manafort, and attempts to fight back 
Just turned on Radio 4 to hear Renaud Camus ('the great replacement') given ample space to talk about how Paris and London are turning into 'slums'. Quickly followed by David Starkey ('the whites have become black') on Brexit. What the fuck is going on? 
I am aghast at how John Bercow misuses his position of power in such a partisan way, in what, in my view, amounts to an attack on Brexit voters and their totally valid criticisms of MPs.  
The P.M. is taking a page from Trump’s playbook.Pathetic.By blaming lawmakers for 'blocking Brexit,' May risks violence and loses even more allies @CNN 
Is it too late to send Lorraine Kelly's lawyer to Brussels to negotiate a Brexit deal? 
I think you might have fucked it PMMy leadership? Brexit? The country?All of it PM pic.twitter.com/Sd6RiO4lDc 
When I hear politicians saying we had a referendum 3 years ago, I feel aggrieved that a political class is telling the people that it can only speak when spoken to. 
"What did you do to stop Brexit?""I signed a petition a week beforehand." 
Ok I decided it was time for me to stop Brexit so I signed this petition.  
Luxembourg PM Xavier Bettel asked to define "the bad guys of Brexit"."The people who told the voters that Brexit would be something that could happen... [with] no consequences.. all the people who lied are responsible." 
Last night @theresa_may made it about her & the people versus Parliament - get ur signature on this, it takes 30secs, should reach 1 million by end of the day to get a vote on staying in EU & revoking article 50 #Brexit  
REVOKE is a spontaneous, unscripted surge of anger against brexit and optimism for change that the Establishment - e.g. Farage - just did not see coming. They are blindsided.  
Meeting with my colleagues from the Nordic Baltic Group of EU leaders to discuss #Brexit and this week’s ⁦@EUCouncil⁩ meeting. Its good to meet up with Ireland’s partners again in these challenging times 
So...in popularity terms we are in a strange situation where both the government of the day & the opposition leader are extremely unpopular by historic standards. But with the public set to blame the govt most for a no deal Brexit its not clear any deadlock breaks their way ENDS 
....when asked who would be to blame for a no-deal Brexit, the public are most likely to say the government and Tory MPs. That is ominous for a government that is already very unpopular by historic standards...  
THREAD. New @IpsosMORI Political Monitor out today.  In public opinion terms, Britain faces a choice between Major's government and Foot's opposition as a no deal Brexit looms on the horizon. Here is why...(feat some VERY bad numbers for May and her government) 
Xavier Bettel has some choice Brexit one-liners."I have the feeling that I am in the waiting room for Godot and Godot is never coming.""The normal door to get out the situation is really gone. We are more [at the] fire exit looking for a solution." 
Brexit reminds me of some relationships I had. I was always Britain. 
"The mood has hardened here in Brussels" @tconnellyRTE with the latest on #Brexit |  
The truth is that the EU has negotiated to try to force us into a second referendum from the outset.  They have been assisted - sometimes unwittingly - by UK civil servants and Mrs May.  
Brexit. Gender nonsense. Trump. Know what would have stopped all these dreadful things before they happened? If everyone had equal opportunities to access a decent education. Most of what's wrong with the world at the moment is down to ignorance. 
Dutch prime minister Mark Rutte: "I believe 80 or 90 per cent of people think you've got a diminished country in the eyes of the rest of the world, and that will of course will accelerate to 100 per cent if there's a no-deal Brexit " 
My mates are the type of people who make Brexit memes from lads’ holiday photos  
People who spent months coming up with dubious arguments as to why a Second Referendum was democratic. Now changing their stance to “revoke Art50”.We see you hypocrites. 
are we at the "you are valid" stage of brexit  
Every week, we'll be writing a column in @LabourList. Here's our first, from @KateOsamor and @labourlewis. We need a socialist Labour government. This never ending Brexit is a threat to everything we want to achieve - and if a deal passes, it never ends 
There is no jobs first Brexit.  
U.K. petition site crashes as more than 850,000 demand the government cancels Brexit  
Bercow defends MPs after PM blames them for #Brexit delay  
Home Secretary Sajid Javid has spoken to @BBCEssex in #BasildonWhen asked if the PM had been wise to set herself against MPs in her statement last night, he said "I've just come from Westminster to get away from Brexit, so I don't think it's appropriate to answer that question" pic.twitter.com/048j5Pwjjt 
I’m sure that if this petition reaches high numbers it will send a huge message to the EU27. So keep signing. Brexit was always about creating a dictatorship - it’s a power grab by the executive and as Jeremy Corbyn would also like same power, it’s gone unchallenged by labour. 
The most clever thought I've seen about Brexit in the last two years.  
Fed up to the back teeth of shouty Anti Brexit  Remainers ?? @afneil Puts gobby Anna Soubry in her rightful place..‘This is not the Anna Soubry hour’ #PoliticsLive #BrexitBETRAYAL #WTOBrexit @LBC @SkyNews @SteveBakerHW @StandUp4Brexit @Nigel_Farage @LeaveMnsLeave 
Even Brexiters don't want Brexit now.In 2016, Grimsby voted 70% for Brexit.Now Grimsby is seeking exemption for itself from Brexit. #RevokeA50Now 
So we take Jeremy Corbyn & Chuka Umunna and add the two most requested #NotOnMySide #PutitothePeopleMarch #RevokeA50Now #FBPE #JC4PM #Brexit Who would you rather see as Prime Minister? 
A quick reminder of the first 5 ProBrexit Go-Slow protests that will take place tomorrow (22nd March) around the UK. Please try and get to your nearest event and cheer from any safe position you can #GoSlow #GoWTO #Brexit  
Stop Brexit: 700,000 sign UK petition to stay in EU  
No-deal Brexit is "catastrophic" for the UK, for the economy and the standing in the world, says Dutch PM Mark Rutte, Cites BBC poll saying 80-90% UK ppl feel standing in world diminished. "That will accelerate to 100% next Friday if there is a hard Brexit." 
Not in Our Name!26.5%IS NOT THE BRITISH PEOPLE NOTHING LEFT TO RESPECT of a #Brexit based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesForeign InterferenceDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o ConsentThe Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the Ppl#RevokeArticle50 
#BREAKING Britain faces a "national emergency" as the risk of a no-deal #Brexit soars, business and union leaders warn in an open letter to Prime Minister Theresa May  
BREAKING: Brexit - Revoke Article 50 petition crashes Parliament website.The FBPE loons are panicking Quick, quick sign it, we're leaving in 8 days #NoDeal #WTO #Brexit 
LISTEN: @SamGyimah: The Prime Minister's #Brexit deal settles nothing.Join us on Saturday at the #PutItToThePeople March to demand a #PeoplesVote:  
Bank of England reveals economy is strengthening."Around 80pc of British businesses believe they are ready for a no deal Brexit as the Bank of England revealed that the economy is accelerating ahead of the UK's scheduled departure from the EU."(Paywall) 
Today is #WorldDownSyndromeDay! To mark the occasion, I pay tribute to my brother Declan - who is much cooler than me (but equally dismayed by #Brexit).  
Please, peeps, if you've already signed, follow this live feed for the petition - don't clog up the petition site itself. 
Celebrity Remainers Hugh Grant, Annie Lennox and Professor Brian Cox sign petition to CANCEL Brexit  
I see old Bercow standing on his pedestal telling all the treacherous MPs that there not traitors! "There There" Don't you sewer scum lowlifes feel better now? There's a reason why may and the eu wants to hold Brexit off till after the eu elections.  You loyal MPs find out!! 
Good chat with ⁦@GlennBBC⁩ on the latest brexit nonsense. This is just an embarrassment, revoke Article 50 now.   
Imagine Buhari is the British prime minister with this brexit negotiations wahala 
Government website crashes after more than 500,000 people demand Brexit is cancelled  
Only 59 of the 650 MPs were elected on manifestos opposing Brexit. Only 59! The level of political disconnection & dishonesty is off the scale. Westminster Villagers need to get a grip.  
Help me on this, someone. How can almost 900,000 signatures petitioning for Brexit to be cancelled, mostly in the space of less than a day, be reconciled with May's claim that the country just wants her to "get on with it?". Oh wait, "fake news" I guess!  
Whilst Britain focuses on Brexit, Yemen, the world’s largest humanitarian crisis, is entering its fifth year of war. 80% of the population need aid. Our government is complicit in this, and the war could be stopped tomorrow if the UK & US decided to.  
Two Tory MPs say PM's Brexit statement has cost her support for deal. David Jones: Spoke to 2 MPs who backed deal, now "so incensed" they will vote against.Nigel Evans: MV3 may be "worse than last time" and "reading the WhatsApp group... I think the answer has got to be yes”. 
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage: "What we've seen is a Leave-voting country more resolute in that view than it was at the time of the referendum and a Remain parliament trying to frustrate it every inch of the way." Support us at  
100% agree. The electorate was manipulated and lied to during the referendum. Brexit was never going to be what they said it would be. Time to acknowledge that remaining in the EU is the best solution for business and the people.  
Whatever Theresa May hoped to achieve from her address to the nation, it’s unlikely she expected a slew of celebrities to urge their social media followers to oppose her plan.Now a petition to cancel Brexit is closing in on a million signatures  
Scotland, this is pointless..1. May resigns, an idiot replaces her, Brexit.2. General Election, an idiot wins, Brexit.3. Revoke A50, it's all good then they decide to declare war on UNICEF or invade Jupiter, or some other mad post-imperial delirium tremens inspired bollocks. 
More than 800,000 people have signed an online petition urging the government to cancel Brexit  
Can Brexit be stopped? 800,000 people are trying so hard that parliament’s website is broken.  
Today the dam has burst. The move towards revocation of Article 50, rather than a referendum or an extension, among people who had hitherto backed compromise solutions, is substantial and tangible. 
'In the 2016 Brexit referendum, there were 700,000 British citizens who were not entitled to vote. That’s the combined populations of Exeter, Oxford, Norwich, Watford and Wigan.' 
Strong performance as always from @M_AndersonSF There is no good #Brexit, the Good Friday Agreement provides a Democratic and sensible way forward.Why should we sit on a train that is about to crash?#irishunity #thesolution 
No Deal Brexit next Friday increasingly likely. Well done to those who had bottle to vote down deal second time round. One more rejection and we could be out on WTO terms.  
The PM planned proper meeting on arrival in Brussels with @EmmanuelMacron - probably most important encounter because of reports France sceptical about granting any Brexit extension. That meeting now replaced with hopes for a chat “in margins of the summit” - whatever that means 
If you love someone let them go to the UK, and you take French citizenship, wait for Brexit and then break up with them afterwards saying "It's not me, it's EU." 
Robinson ignores the tsunami of petitioners who want ART50 revoking. Fastest growing petition ever. And as for Remainers wanting Brexit sorting? Bollocks.  
#DictatorMay needs to go away Listen to the people, listen to MPs Brexit is dead #RevokeArticle50@MHookins @StopBrexitMarch @LoubinWally @RemainerCreates @RemainingKind @RestoreHope_20 @spaceangel1964 @fish_in_a_hat @fascinatorfun @nickreeves9876 @nickynoo007 ,@mikebutcher 
‘@theresa_may: Brexit must be delivered. Then let’s leave next week on 29th as promised, Prime Minister. #NoDeal 
Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU.. 874k & going up in leaps & bounds..#Brexit #PeoplesVote #nhs @theresa_may @Nigel_Farage @BBC @bbcnickrobinson @AFNeil #Marr @BorisJohnson #PoliticsLive @BBCr4today 
"Scotland needs the freedom to take a different direction, leave behind this chaos and find our own way out of the crisis" - @patrickharvie on #indyref #brexit at #FMQs 
This is getting ridiculous now. How many times have MPs accused May personally, and the government collectively, of ignoring the will of the people over Brexit. Yet as soon as she accuses them of doing the same, there’s outrage. 
Don't you think some of the 17 million people who voted for Brexit, wouldn't have done so if they thought it was for a #NoDealBrexit or a deal that meant less sovereignty? Two MASSIVELY different outcomes.If your answer is 'yes', a new referendum becomes a democratic necessity. 
“How’s the march going Nigel?”Independent Group’s Anna Soubry and ex-UKIP leader Nigel Farage on #Brexit and the #RevokeArticle50 petition 
SMR: This is the #Brexit #EndGame and THAT petition is now approaching a phenomenal 900,000 signatures after just one day!It is a DIRECT RESPONSE to the appalling speech from @theresa_may last night.Fancy being the MILLIONTH NAME on it?  #RevokeArt50  
BREAKING: "Our country is facing a national emergency" CBI and TUC send joint letter to PM telling her to change Brexit approach and asking for urgent meeting @CBItweets @The_TUC 
Would you prefer May's deal, no deal or no Brexit? 
Walk away now!We voted for a #NoDeal #BrexitPlease sign and retweet this petition #Brexit #StandUp4Brexit #Conservatives#politicslive@Nigel_Farage @Janice4Brexit @JuliaHB1 @afneil 
Our country is facing a national emergency. Together @CBItweets & @The_TUC representing millions of workers and tens of thousands of businesses have written to @theresa_may demanding urgent change in her Brexit approach.  
The establishment promised we would leave on March 29th. Today Theresa May is begging the EU to delay Brexit. Join the Brexiteer rally in Parliament Square, March 29th, 4pm to tell our leaders we want to just leave.  
Dear Brexiteers,You might "win", and impoverish yourselves.You might "lose", and Brexit might be cancelled, much to your dismay.But you can not actually "win". There is no possible outcome which is positive for you. Ergo, triumphalism from you is quite pathetic. 
Great to hear @NicolaSturgeon tell Scottish MSPs and public she will be at the Put It To The People march and rally on Saturday. My Scottish Labour friends don’t like me saying so but she and @IanBlackfordMP have shown real consistent leadership on Brexit and @peoplesvote_uk 
Brexit blockade: Latest as lorry drivers threaten to SHUT DOWN British motorways if Brexit is delayed.  
Whether we now Brexit or not, the fact that we've been taken to the brink and told in no uncertain terms that we CAN be forced off ANY cliff edge at the whim of the English electorate & their parliament, is in my opinion reason enough to prove the point of Indy is necessary. 
Independent Group’s Anna Soubry: Theresa May "is more willing now to leave without a deal than ever before" and again calls her "delusional"#Brexit #politicslive  
Trump sees Brexit day March 29th as Britain's Fourth of July - and Theresa May as Britain's Mueller: the deep state trying to reverse 2016. Bannon calls it "the nullification project".  My column on why Trump is so visceral about a no deal Brexit.   
Contrasting earlier  ‘unity’ on #Brexit with  ‘split’ on Art 50 extension misunderstands what EU is. It does not exist in a state of ‘unity’ with occasional departures from that. It consists of 27 independent countries with individual views from which they forge agreement 
Jeremy Corbyn refuses to rule out revoking Article 50 to stop no-deal Brexit  
Lets hope it is enough to clean up the #Brexit sh*#%  
I've had enough of Anna Soubury's nonsense. I am sick of the arrogant political elite like her frustrating the Brexit process! #PoliticsLive 
Jeremy Corbyn doesn't rule out revoking Article 50 but says it's not his 'focus'  /#EU #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
"#Brexit is the decision of the British people, we need to deliver on that"UK PM Theresa May arrives at Brussels EU summit to persuade other 27 countries to delay UK's exit beyond 29 March 
FM calls out W Rennie's "deeply inconsistent" position. He wants 2nd Brexit vote so people have chance to escape Brexit but if it goes ahead, he wants Scotland to "grin & bear it & put up with devastation of Brexit" instead of having choice to escape Brexit thru 2nd indyref #FMQs 
This statement brought to you by the same people that have spent the last two years yelling ‘but what about Brexit???’ whenever Corbyn/Labour tried to talk about these issues in PMQs etc  
So, Jeremy is in Brussels. He’s just of his meetings with EU Commissioners & PMs. And guess what? They love his Brexit Plan.  
Sole duty? Surely one of the duties of MPs is to stand by the manifestos they are elected on. And surely another one of their duties is to uphold the democratic decision of the British people in a referendum that MPs voted to hold...  
The decision of the people in the referendum was made in good faith the politicians failed to give all he facts or pose the correct question they failed to work together in the interests of the country we need to go back to the start before they throw our futures away. 
So I’ve never wanted to endorse this position, but I think it is now time to revoke Article 50. There is likely no time for a referendum. Revocation means Parliament is settled to remain. Gov must then hold new referendum to place May’s deal to people to see if they prefer that. 
A sad state of affairs when SNP MP @PeteWishart has to ask the Speaker just now about protection & security measures for MPs being threatened during the more darkening mood of #Brexit following @theresa_may's speech last night. #RevokeArticle50 
And finally, its a record in history that Brexit was NOT the will of the people, that May was NOT 'on our side' and that dissenting opinions were voiced. It might be pissing in the wind, but it's all we've got now. Nothing left to lose. Sign it, share it, be counted. 
Government Prepares to Put into Action Clean, No Deal Brexit Plans  
Of course @afneil wants to hear what @nigel_farage thinks.Again. Of course he does. Ask Nigel why he isn’t on his march, Andrew. Ask Nigel why he’s on camera thanking Steve Bannon for delivering the Brexit result, Andrew. 
Brexit  is  a  mess Theresa May is not on the public’s side. She has proved she’s incapable of getting any deal that parliament and the public would be happy with. The only solution is a second referendum – sign the petition now:  
"What matters is we recognise that Brexit is the decision of the British people," says @theresa_may as she arrives at the European Council 
Almost by definition, the thing we'll be short of post-brexit will be something we didn't quite forsee pre-brexit, and so won't have put in place emergency arrangements for. So I'm staking my flag in the ground and randomly declaring we'll be short of protein powder. 
Point of Order #SNP's @PeteWishart over May's divisive Brexit statement last night - asking about member's security arrangements  
"A short extension would give parliament the time to make a final choice that delivers on the referendum." @Theresa_May has arrived in Brussels for talks with the EU where she will ask leaders for a #Brexit delay. Follow the latest on #Brexit here:  
'All forms of Brexit are bad for health, but some are worse than others.' 
Theresa May seems to be heading towards favouring a no deal Brexit.She must be stopped. 
Things to come in 2019Avengers EndgameJohn wick 3Toy story 4Stranger things 3Spider-Man far from home Things not to come in 2019Brexit 
“I’m on your side,” she pleaded, but the people are not on hers, as only 12% support her plan. Referendum or an emergency revoke: my column today.  
UK's biggest toilet roll supplier stockpiling in case of no-deal Brexit  
“The DUP are the umbilical cord for this govt”“The DUP are gonna call the shots?”“That’s the reality”Conservative Nigel Evans, Labour’s Baroness Smith and Independent Group’s Anna Soubry on the PM and DUP's relationship#Brexit #politicslive  
Parliament revoking or extending Article 50 to prevent Brexit really is "Parliament vs the people" and that is a far, far greater threat than a WTO exit. WTO is just short term disruption. Destroying trust in politics will last decades. #PoliticsLive 
People ask what the point of the #RevokeArticle50 petition is. I don't think any of us are naive enough to think it will magically stop Brexit. BUT...  
@SebDance  "You can't have a deal 'that's been rejected twice', and no-deal.. Those two choices are quite frankly absurd." #EU #Brexit  
"If parliament and the government wanted to, they could certainly hold a referendum in a few weeks." - Tim Bale, professor of politics at Queen Mary University London.  
If this is true, then we really are heading for an unparalleled emergency. Parliament will either need to vote for a referendum in the next couple of weeks, or decide to revoke A50 altogether. 22 May might not even be enough time to ratify the deal.  
How is Brexit going to fix those problems? It's going to make it worse! It's time for Lisa to start being truthful about that. 
The right course for the country now is to revoke Article 50 immediatelyParliament should then call a referendum on its action to end Brexit.  
The point of the petition is not to invalidate the 2016 referendum - the Electoral Commission has already done that. The point is to give the lie to May’s claim to speak for “the people”. #MayDoesNotSpeakForMe #RevokeArticle50Now 
"Prime Minister Theresa May might be the last person in Britain to think her Brexit deal isn’t dead. But, evidently, she thinks it might not be a bad idea for someone to call it an ambulance." | Analysis by @lukemcgee 
Watch the number of signatures rise on the petition to cancel Brexit  
"Bad Gateway": a suprisingly apt description for the Blind Brexit that Theresa May is attempting to ram down the unwilling throat of our once sovereign Parliament.  
Advisory sure, but a referendum that Parliament voted for and agreed to enact. Parliament voted to put into EU law (A50) and voted to put into UK law (EU (Withdrawal) Act) with 2 legal outcomes - deal or no deal. Endorsed by GE & manifesto. Some still wish to subvert democracy..  
He couldn’t be clearer, no talk about a public vote, it’s all about going ahead with Brexit. Thereby ignoring the wishes of party members and supporters. Are you happy with this @Keir_Starmer ? 
Do YoonScots SERIOUSLY think Scotland in a post Brexit UK won't just be a punchbag, testing ground & target for all the Brexiteer spite every time anything doesn't go their way?Because it WILL.After it's asset stripped!If you think it's bad now - you ain't seen nothing yet! 
At #FMQ today Shifty Willie makes himself look plain silly by wanting the UK to escape #Brexit, but he does not want Scotland to be independent to escape it.Willie thinks Scotland will just have to put up with WM decision & do nothing!  
FM: "If it comes to it, Scotland choosing independence is a much brighter future than remaining part of Brexit Britain." #FMQs 
FM: "The inconsistency is Willie Rennie standing up here, rightly spelling out the disaster that Brexit will be, but then saying if all else fails, Scotland just has to put up with it. I don't think Scotland has to put up with it, and I don't think Scotland should have to." #FMQs 
As @NicolaSturgeon outlines the extraordinary #Brexit failures of Teresa May the Scottish Conservative MSPs study their phones, or their desks, intently.  They are , rightly , ashamed but surely they should now say so - publicly ? #FMQs 
The UK Government is spending taxpayer money running Facebook ads of Theresa May's address to the nation last night, captioned "Brexit: Let's get on with it." This isn't some shadowy Russian group. This is our Government, actively engaged in propaganda!  
.@patrickharvie says Brexit chaos is driving the need for independence and asks FM when she will update any plans for #indyref2@NicolaSturgeon says she is waiting to see what clarity may emerge in the next few days and then set out her viewsLIVE:  #FMQs 
On a day when even @Carlaw4Eastwood managed to seem calm & reasonable (even if he did studiously avoid mentioning Brexit) @willie_rennie still manages to have me shouting at the TV with with his incendiary arrogance & his insistence that Scotland should suck it up. #FMQs 
FM: "It is outrageous that we are having to expend time, energy and resources in preparing for a No Deal Brexit. The Prime Minister really must, before any more time passes, before it is too late, change course. Take No Deal off the table completely." #FMQs 
Actually Willie RenniePeople are scunnered that the Lib Dems would let Scotland sink with a very English Brexit it did not vote for 
‘Brexit is imploding; put this behind us.’ ⁦@RCorbettMEP⁩ at the Stop Brexit rally in Brussels  
"There was a confusion over that meeting" - Jeremy Corbyn on why he walked out of cross-party talks on #Brexit yesterday 
Can we make a rule?If you're an MP and an ex-minister of the oldest party in the UK, which has been in power for 10 years, called the referendum, ran both sides of the debate and is currently holding the country hostage...You don't get to call everyone else "The Establishment".  
Voting on the Brexit deal over and over  
Yes, think so, but can't find latest data.The irony Is that most signed petition was 4m leave voters before the referendum saying that unless it was 60% one way with 75% turnout, there should be a second referendum. They keep quiet about that now. 
#BREAKING Bank of England fears impact of further "uncertainties" caused by "cliff-edge" no-deal Brexit  
‘We have got to stop this dreadful catastrophe.’ The wonderful ⁦@SebDance⁩ at the Stop Brexit rally outside the European Council in Brussels  
Speaking at @BritAmBusiness on what a future UK - US Free Trade Agreement might look likeA huge opportunity for the UK, as we go forward post-Brexit. @liamfox 
A Brexit thought: A normal PM and a normal opposition leader in these circumstances would have thrashed out a compromise deal months ago. It is our unique misfortune to have two leaders totally unsuited to compromising at the same time, *just* when it’s needed. 
Tory benches with their heads down as FM talks about May’s misjudged comments and actions over Brexit shambles. #embarrassedtories 
If you ever wondered why BBC is so pro Brexit, this letter to Lord Hall from Lord Adonis explains it  
Before going into #Brexit talks ⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ & ⁦@Keir_Starmer⁩ stop to meet ⁦@UniteWales⁩ members #ForTheMany ⁦@UKLabour⁩ 
things Jeremy Corbyn isn't ruling out, one week from Brexit day:- revoking Article 50.- general election- second referendum- customs union- Common Market 2.0 
The Tories are no longer the party of business but the party against business. Not for the people, but against the people. #Brexit is damaging our economy, damaging businesses, damaging jobs, damaging public services & wasting Govt. time and money. #StopBrexit #ExitfromBrexit 
During the Coalition, the UK was one of the best performers among advanced economies. Now it’s one of the weakest, despite rock-bottom interest rates that still prop up our economy a decade on from the financial crisis. This #Brexit loving Tory Govt is plunging us into recession. 
Me on @BBCNews about the viral 800K #RevokeArticle50 petition.Theresa May has made a pig’s ear of this whole #Brexit joke.Time to take Article 50, bin it, set the bin on fire, kick it over and nuke it from space — we’re done.  
2 Brexit options:A sovereignty-trashing dealBecoming the only major economy with no trade deal with its neighbours.We can't do either without public *specific* consent.The #RevokeArticle50 petition just shows why a ratification referendum is needed 
One of the few things we have to thank Brexit for is unrivalled writing from Matthew Parris. #everycloud 
Jeremy Corbyn says he has held "positive" talks with EU leaders in Brussels, aimed at avoiding a no-deal #Brexit and finding a "constructive alternative" to Theresa May's deal 
MPs have been advised to travel home by taxi out of fear they will be attacked over their handling of Brexit. And yet Theresa May used a prime time address to the nation last night to explicitly foment hatred against Parliament. We live in the end times.  
"Make love, not Brexit"That is the message @Avaaz campaigners are telling people this afternoon as they tour Brussels on their tour bus, with just eight days until the UK is scheduled to leave the EU.Our correspondent Meabh McMahon (@Brusselsness) caught up with them earlier. 
What happened to putting it to the people? Surely the 2nd referendum campaign was not a cynical attempt by people who lost the 1st referendum to overturn a vote they didn't like? I suppose this cuts out the middle man if your belief is the 2016 referendum should be ignored  
Theresa May has managed to negotiate a deal that is so beneficial to the EU - and so harmful to Britain - that it is regarded by many in Brussels as better than reversing Brexit altogether.  
This Saturday the Smith Family will be marching in the #PutItToThePeople March with thousands of other families from across Britain, to demand a #PeoplesVote on this terrible #Brexit deal. Take back control and join us:  
Irish PM @campaignforleo says Ireland might need to hold a referendum in order to decide whether the UK is obliged to hold EP parliament elections after June. Because it requires treaty change #EUCO #brexit @euronews 
Please take a look at this @johnharris1969⁩ film about Wigan after Brexit. It perfectly captures the pride, spirit and frustration I see and hear everyday. So proud of these amazing people who feel, rightly, that they still aren’t being heard  
My suspicion is that any delay to Brexit is a plot to stop Brexit. This would be the most grievous error that politicians could commit.#MoggMentum 
From the leader supposedly 'on your side', we bring you the 5 biggest Brexit flops from yours truly...  
Petition to revoke Brexit gains more than 800,000 signatures  
Parliament fully justified in rejecting a Backstop that locks UK in Customs Union against its will.“No sovereign nation could agree to such terms lightly"It's a constitutional absurdity to imprison a large military power without #EU voting rights#Brexit 
Government website crashes after more than 500,000 people demand Brexit is cancelled  
Loathsome sinks to new depths..... 
Dick Leonard just asked "Why there is a staffing crisis in the NHS?"Fascinating, coming from the branch office manager of a party sitting on its hands rather than putting a stop to the Brexit madness, which has put off so many needed workers from coming to Scotland. #fmqs 
World asking: Brexit, are we nearly there yet? 
Ironic that a referendum to bring back control can result in the Speaker having to defend parliament against the executive? Not really. Brexit was a populist movement until the point they got their result, and since it has had no interest in what the will of the people might be.  
Theresa May thinks she knows exactly what we want on Brexit. Let’s tell her on Saturday’s Final Say march | The Independent  
Mike Galsworthy - Theresa May's speech was the thing that kicked off the #RevokeArticle50 petition. We would like to see #brexit ripped up, throwing in the bin, set on fire, the bin kicked over & then nuked from space... we're done with this. @mikegalsworthy #PeoplesVote 
So, Theresa wants the Brexit deadline to be extended to June 30th, while most of us would rather it be the end of May... 
This petition won’t change anything... nor should it. I voted remain, and struggle to believe in Brexit. That said, the EU needs enormous reform, that’s clear... But the only thing this will demonstrate is that the margins in such important votes MUST be greater. 
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn says he has had constructive discussions after meeting EU chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier in Brussels and is considering what proposals to put before Parliament next week 
Reporter said: “In spite of this petition there are still some people who want #Brexit”. Like there were a couple of old colonels in Tunbridge Wells who were the last two people who wanted to leave the EU. 
DUP reject May's Brexit deal as support for the PM falls away  
"Bercow is growing in stature with every passing day."  - comment on this from @JohnStanners.    Agreed, and quite possibly, if Brexit is defeated, we will have this one man to thank above all others.  #RevokeArticle50 
Brexit deadlock shows 'democracy all but dead' - Donald Trump Jr - BBC NewsWhat are this guy’s qualifications again?   
Please please please do yourself a favour and have a look at this, it’s a MUST WATCH! So clever, the will of 17.4 million people conveyed with hilarity, style and precision!17 Million F*ck Offs - A Song About Brexit  via @YouTube 
Labour leader @jeremycorbyn says he's had "positive" talks with the EU in Brussels looking for a "constructive alternative" to the PM's #Brexit deal. Follow the latest on #Brexit here:  
1. The EU Ref was advisory.2. The Leave campaign narrowly won on doping.3. Manifestos were made unaware of the crimes committed.4. That undermining of British democracy has been ignored.5. How can a request for a #PeoplesVote ever undermine dem?#Brexit is a crime. 
2015 - “You have to talk to people with whom you may profoundly disagree” - Jeremy Corbyn in 2015 on why he met Hizbollah2019 - Brexit: Jeremy Corbyn walks out of crunch talks because Chuka Umunna was invited: 
Listen to this: a long Brexit extension would be to hold a second referendum, says a former EU Commission President to the BBC. The contempt for democracy by these people is truly terrifying. Let's get out!  
#Brexit..talk now of ‘revocation’ of Article 50. There is something very ‘Vatican’ about that word! 
I certainly would agree to a real WTO Deal terms exit from the clutches of EU. Just asked a dozen people at random in the shopping centre and they all agree with us having a proper 'No Deal' / WTO Brexit. It is what they voted for, not some May Con-trick. 
Well said, Peter. There’s way too much bad news buried by #Brexit#MayMustGo#GetTheToriesOut 
On the one hand, this petition will likely not make much difference. On the other, the more pressure on @theresa_may to abandon her misguided Brexit policy, the better:  
#BBCNews showing great excitement about an online petition  that has allegedly collected 800k signatures in favour of revoking Article 50 & abandoning #Brexit. Yet a real life verifiable vote of 17m people wanting to leave is meaningless to them. Impartiality pretence abandoned. 
The #RevokeArticle50 Petition is approaching 800,000 signatures, this is fantastic, fabulous, magnificent, people are rising up against #Brexit, let's get this Petition  into the millions, come on folks, get your friends, family signing, she can't ignore this #StopBrexit #skynews 
Had enough of #BrexitImagine if I had ripped someone’s boiler out in 2016 and still hadn’t got the heating back on in 2019!Now a petition to halt it has gone VIRAL, but we couldn’t get 100,000 people to sign a petition to protect hard working trades  
Think you can't do anything about Brexit? Reach out to those around you to sign this Revoke Article 50 petition until your neighbourhood goes dark red on this map. (link to petition on the map)  
I usually focus on keeping my Twitter work-related and a politics free zone. This is too important. Brexit is having a deleterious impact on my career, on the careers of thousands of my colleagues and on the country as a whole. Cancel it now.  
#RevokeArticle50 just broke 800,000 at midday. Thanks to the comments on @mikegalsworthy tweets even more data. is working again!#StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50Now #RevokeA50Now #Data #Graphs #Maths #UK #Britain #news #politics #Brexit #Remain #Europe 
On Saturday we will be marching at the #PutItToThePeopleMarch.We've taken a look back at events since the last march. Time wasting and indecision has been May's main #Brexit strategy.May claims the public are on her side, but the opposite will be demonstrated this weekend.  
37% of 2017 Con voters say that 'any Conservative politician who wants to be the next party leader shd oppose T May's deal and support no-deal #Brexit'; 31% disagree @ComRes for @LeaveMnsLeave 
Here’s my daughter, Dolly, 5, making more sense of Brexit than almost all our elected MPs. She says “this is how you guys sound when you talk about boring Brexit” (me & missus voted differently). She was barely two when we voted Leave   
Breaking: Irish PM @campaignforleo says UK WILL have to hold EP elections if they stay beyond June. ‘It’s in treaties, and you’d have to change the treaties - which might require a referendum in Ireland...’ #euco @euronews #brexit 
Reform the calendar - bring the end of May fwd to next week. Failed Remainer MPs have kept May in office to frustrate Brexit. Tory Brexiteers in #NewportWest can trigger her exit by voting UKIP on 4th April. That's the earthquake we need to enforce the People's Will on Brexit. 
Brexit is 8 days away. #brexit 
Labour chairman Ian Lavery: ‘We want Brexit, but we want the Labour Brexit.’ 
No Lisa, parliament has pitted itself against the people by refusing to implement the result of the referendum. Westminster is packed out with dangerously undemocratic MPs, and is no longer fit for purpose.  
Finally the U.K. has woken up to the reality that voting for #Brexit was a really bad idea. Time to stop #DictatorMay#RevokeAndRemain #revokeArticle50 #BrexitBunker 
.@theresa_may claims the only way to exit this stall is to vote for her deal.Not true. This is scheduling a divorce in 2 years and further endless negotiations.The right way to make #Brexit go away is to revoke Article 50. #PutitothePeople @ProEuropa_GB @MadeleinaKay 
Government website crashes after more than 500,000 people demand Brexit is cancelled  
Since the referendum, Britain has been moving up the league table as one of the happiest countries in the world Imagine how happy we'll be once we've actually left the EU  
So some time ago I posted how all the workmen at my work were Brexiters and shouting me down. Well it turns out one of them has just stopped me to talk about Brexit. He voted remain, and just signed the petition. Time for remainers and regretters to stand up and be counted  
Cable Slides As Civil War Looms - 17.4 Million Voted For Brexit & Are Being Denied It  
The right course for the country now is to revoke Article 50 immediatelyParliament should then call a referendum on its action to end Brexit 
.@OliverNorgrove has been one of the most informative and realistic Brexit commentators in the past year, and has shown a remarkable ability to admit when he's wrong, and adapt his arguments accordingly. Here's a great piece he's written in the IT:  
Even if the #RevokeArticle50 petition doesn't affect the Brexit proceedings one jot, at least it's showing our European friends that we're not ALL deluded morons. Sign for that reason, if nothing else 
BRITISH TWITTER: OMG the Brexit petition website is down. IT MUST BE A CONSPIRACYWEB DEVELOPER TWITTER: Oh FUCK OFF with your nonsense. This shit is hard. 
Any unionists want to explain to me how scottish ondy will ruin brexit when scots have been told they are subsidised by 13BN PER YEAR.How is saving 13 BN going to ruin brexit?Unionists KNOW scots are being cheated. 
A week after the referendum I took part in a Channel 4 panel. I was told by Remain activists that I was "uneducated" and would regret my vote.I don't regret my vote.I do regret not seeing then that these people would do all they can to overturn a vote by people like us.  
At least we know two things from the last 24 hours of political stupidity :Theresa May isn’t on our side, Neither is Jeremy Corbyn.Looks like we’re going to have to stop Brexit without them.And we can start my signing this  
We want the entirety of Brexit in the bin. It's dead, we need to #RevokeRemainRebuild 
To conflate them in this way is a massive category error. Yes, no Leaver explicitly voted for no deal as a long term state - because the referendum was not about trade deals. It was about EU membership and leaving the EU’s institutions. 
Spare me the crocodile tears of MPs today. They voted overwhelmingly for both the referendum and Article 50: the logical consequence of both was a commitment, endorsed by the public, to leave the EU on March 29th. 
May's Brexit Statement: The More Honest Edit(reuploaded after fixing audio for mobile apps)  
Here's the link to the Hari Kunzru essay on Brexit: 
Remember, the Withdrawal Agreement (May's Deal) was the EASY part of the Brexit negotiations. However we end up leaving, Brexit is still going to dominate everything for years to come.  But if we just forget the whole thing... #RevokeArticle50 
At least the UK government is now getting a direct understanding of the impact of Brexit on just-in-time logistics. 
The referendum wasn't a big deal. Nobody died excercising their right to vote. A tiny majority half-heartedly wanted to leave. We tried, it doesn't work, sack it off. Sorted. 
If you want to read the Brexit mess briefing notes prepared for the DExEU minister @KwasiKwarteng, they are attached here and... 
"A request for a delay to Brexit until June 30th is something the EU will discuss intensively."German Chancellor Angela Merkel is confident that the EU can reach an agreement to delay Brexit but is adamant that May's deal must pass through Parliament.  
'Hard Brexit would be costly chaos, says former head of WTO''Pascal Lamy says May is playing chicken and Corbyn’s plan makes no economic sense.'Damning analysis of Brexiters, May, Corbyn and Brexit in general.  
The levels of hate and vitriol that’s surfaced since this Brexit shit show began just shows you what was lurking in the shadows of this country. I fear the damage is well and truly done and for what? To wave a flag and sing Rule Britannia! Nar  
A petition asking the government to halt Brexit has gone viral   #StopBrexit 
To those arguing that there won't be enough time to pass legislation to avert a no-deal Brexit next week:Since 1979 UK Parliament passed 9 Acts that received 1st reading & 3rd reading on the same day (marked by *). 
Here is the final minute of the interview...Margaret Anne "we should have another referendum" #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote 
judging by what @hackedoffhugh says about a referendum there is an awful lot of mentally ill [people in Britain. Around 17.4 million to be precise  
Government website crashes after more than 750,000 people demand Brexit is cancelled  
“They got angry and all jumped on me saying ‘you Polish cunt, you deserve a lesson’. They hit me with fists and knees in my face and head telling me to ‘fuck off to my country’.” - Brexit's unleashed hell and @DenisMacShane's right it needs exposing fully  
Gordon Brown managed to navigate a worldwide financial meltdown. Theresa May is being “tested” only because she ignored half the country in order to appease the far right wing of the Conservative party. She is destroying Brexit as a result. #unforcederrors #RevokeA50 
You mean the one the Courts have agreed would have been declared void had it been binding, in accordance with the Venice Commission? That referendum?You're no democrat.  
Andrea Leadsom actually still trying to flog the dead horse "Prime Minister's deal". A deal that has been historically and overwhelmingly rejected twice already by MPs on both sides and all Parties. Astonishing. #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote #BrexitChaos #BrexitShambles 
Here’s my blog on the excellent work across Govt Depts on preparing for Brexit @ukcivilservice 
The latest What the Fatah!!  Thanks to @anitajoshua @ZaffarBaloch @FarahDidi #dailyworldbriefing #brexit 
May blames Parliament for not expressing its own wishes. But she has done everything in her power to prevent a mature and reasonable debate in Parliament, and has used her position as Tory leader to shut down any alternative to her plan.#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit 
A petition calling on Theresa May to cancel Brexit by revoking Article 50 has attracted more than half a million signatures and crashed Parliament's petitions website.  
Leave won the referendum by a small margin but this country belongs to all of us and we cannot just ignore the legitimate concerns of remain voters. Our leadership (on both sides) has let us down severely. 
New Column: Shorter 21st-century conservatism: Let's ruin the economy; prevent liberals from fixing it; blame immigrants and leeches; give the people Trump and Brexit.  via @thedailybeast 
As the #RevokeArticle50Petition spirals ever upwards, it would be great to see it exceed the referendum majority of 1.27 millionStill not being reported on @BBCNews or @SkyNews but picked up by @itvnews 
Christian Adams on #TheresaMay #BrexitVote #BrexitShambles #Brexit #Tories #BrexitShamble #BrexitShambles #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #TheresaMay  - political cartoon gallery in London  
Revoke article 50 now. The will of the people is quite clear. The majority want to stop Brexit.Why on earth would be continue with Brexit? It harms the UK. It will ruin us.Why would we continue with corruption and fraud. That is your Brexit. 
DUP reject May's 'toxic' Brexit deal as support for the PM falls away  
"MPs have been advised to travel home by taxi when they leave Parliament over fears they could be attacked by angry voters over their handling of Brexit, Kevin Schofield"Entirely Theresa Mays fault. #MayMustGo 
What a silly thing to say for an MP who gets 70 grand a year plus expenses because of a majority vote, when the majority of Brexit voters have already shown what they want. Majorities only count if they relate to him eh?  
I agree with @10DowningStreet. Parliament IS trying to block the mandate. If MPs are furious with the PM, I am NOT one of them, and I am frankly fed up with those MPs trying to block #Brexit. ! 
#PoliticsLive Anna Soubry on TV again. On everywhere TV & Radio shouting & screaming. One of the worst MPs ever. Trying to stop Brexit all the time with her new  Party, The Independent Group. Biggest bunch of losers of all time. Led by Chuka Umunna look at me FLASH GIT.  
The snobbery and elitism of the Remoaner lobby is alarming. It’s like a boil has burst and all this Victorian-style contempt for the little people has poured forth. Chattering-class disdain for Brexit voters is such an ugly prejudice.Brendan O’Neill responds to @mrjamesob @lbc 
Ministers still plan to ask MPs to vote on Theresa May's #Brexit deal for a third time, says Commons Leader Andrea Leadsom, but "precise nature and timing" depend on outcome of EU summit in Brussels 
Whole range of attitudes to the Brexit petition on my timeline. Valid points. Lots to think about.  
It happened in 2016 after the referendum, and it's probably some of the reason many don't want another referendum know, as they believe probably quite rightly that it will be rigged. 
I will be on BBC Radio 1 @BBCNewsbeat programme at 12:45 talking about the shortage of nurses & the impact of #Brexit on EU health workers. Let’s stop this madness!!  
Stella Creasy left banging her head on the desk during a Brexit debate with Tory MP  
Reminder.  Right Wing nut jobs assisted by useful idiots in #labour are using #Brexit to turn the clock back onGay RightsDeath PenaltyHuman Rights#leadsome  let the cat out of the bag yesterday. The #EU is the ultimate Guarantor and they want rid.#revokearticle50 
1000 days to stop this madness and the great British public produces a petition 9 days before Brexit 
What a Brexit minister @KwasiKwarteng was instructed to say about the Brexit mess  
Europhile civil servants are doing everything within their power, subtly and under the surface, to frustrate Brexit and talk it down at every opportunity:  
BREXIT: Theresa May is meeting with EU leaders in Brussels after she requested a 3-month Brexit delay. Follow this thread for the latest updateHere are some anti-Brexit protesters outside the EU Commission (: @NatashaBowler) 
In a way, though, this renewed Brexit fervour may be my brain coping with the fear and anxiety as an EU citizen. Just be aware that it's perfectly okay to feel anxious and nervous. Take care of yourself first and foremost. I may need you all if I ever have a nervous meltdown  
MAY WORKING `INCREDIBLY HARD' TO GET BREXIT DONE: SPOKESWOMANBy submitting same proposal for vote over and over and over again 
"We always looked up to Britain as an example of how a country could be ideally run. All that has gone up in flames." - horrifying how Brexit and plastic patriots destroyed Britain's reputation  
#Article50 petition now is at nearly 750K - I have signed. We need this as a backup option with clear, strong support. As the #FinalSay referendum has - the march on Saturday will be big!   
1. Look at the ratio on this tweet, Nick. 2. Then look at the numbers signing the REVOKE petition. Nearly 700,000, rising sharply after PM speech.3. Finally, track down March for Brexit and count them. 40? 50?Then reflect on who the PM is speaking for.Feeling any doubts yet? 
Now I am become Brexit, destroyer of countries#TheresaMaystatement 
It is my belief that a GE would have a cleansing cathartic effect.Everything on the table - domestic policy - fiscal policy - Brexit - the whole shebang A fresh Government - a fresh start - a sense of renewal.#ImADreamer 
I voted leave but sometimes you have to stop and accept that your plan isn’t working the way you thought it would. We have to stop and assess what we’re doing. If that means revoking article 50 I’m for it. Nobody, leave or remain, can afford a half baked Brexit.  
BREAKING: Hearing reports filtering in that any tweets beginning with "Brexit is like..." are now to be charged a non-negotiable 100 euro fine each 
Just read a brilliant essay by @harikunzru on the folly of Brexit, which ends with these lines from Auden:“A backward and dilapidated province,Connected to the big busy world by a tunnel,With a certain seedy appeal,Is that all it is now?”It is, indeed. 
*Actual Footage* Of me discussing Brexit with Theresa May  
If I were a British member of parliament, I would simply solve the Brexit crisis ... Can't believe no one has thought of this before me 
Help us make this the BIGGEST anti-Brexit march ever. When: 11am this Saturday. Where: Outside the Dorchester, 53 Park Lane, London, W1K 1QA.  
It is so telling that the Germans covered the cheating during the Brexit referendum better and more thoroughly than Sky News and @BBCNews. Why? Because Britain has a problem within its media establishment. They are too scared to fight the status quo, or inform the public. 
the Brexiters have 100% lost it. we'll have "cities burning to the ground" if we #RevokeA50Now apparently they talk tough, but look at the March To Leave and you realise it's all empty threats from keyboard warriors and very few people actually care if Brexit's cancelled!!   
It is a lie that there is no cliff edge in Brexit, only the cliff edge is not a WTO Brexit, the cliff edge is this COUNTRY’S DEMOCRACY. 
There is No Compromise..all versions of #BrexitRemove Rights w/o Consent & leave us Poorer 26.5% of the PeopleIS NOT THE PEOPLENon-Binding IS NOT BINDINGThere's no valid democratic reason to deny a Confirmatory#PeoplesVote with an option to#RevokeArticle50 & #Remain 
I don't want to magnify the problem. But we need a second referendum. There is no way out. No matter how much they scream and shout. Europe is not about us and them.#vss365 
Rather like the 2nd Referendum strategy: "I need the support of the people, most of whom are clearly idiots"  
One day there *will* be a public inquiry. If you’re fed up with Brexit now just imagine how you’ll feel as that enters its third year  
damn right i am!  in all the excitement of the #RevokeA50Now petition, don't forget to write to your MPs asking them to!! and to vote DOWN the Brexit deal & support Kyle/Wilson!!this pre-written letter does it all for you, it takes seconds! DO IT NOW!! 
Don’t know why @theSNP is so involved in #RevokeA50 to keep UK in EU. England will never settle in EU& it removes SNP’s mandate for #indyref2 . SNP should concentrate on gaining #indy while helping to keep rUK in CU/SM (soft Brexit)to maintain open border when Scots Indy. 
If, as the Speaker has ruled, the PM's motion must be substantially different before coming before the House again then surely another Cooper-Boles amendment would have to be substantially different too. (My Point of Order to the Speaker just now.) #brexit  
Typical #Globalist. His criminality was exposed the day he bribed his bank to not foreclose on his delinquent mortgage. #Murphy is simply no good, a con artist. Only difference between this idiot & #Hussein is he WAS born in the USA. #Brexit 
Yup - because brexit is bad news for the NHS! The govt want to sweep it under the rug! Don't let them get away with it demand a #PeoplesVote.It said releasing the details could cause trusts “premature financial harm, and...public wellbeing at risk”. 
Compare no deal petition with revoke art 50 petition. What do we do with urbanites?? #Urbanites #Brexit  
A nice staffer at Venice’s airport is standing at the passport queues patiently reminding every British traveller they can join the EU passports queue.Brexit has not done continental impressions of our intelligence any good, has it? 
Theresa May blames MPs 4 Brexit crisis then asks them 2 back her deal. Nice. Now numbers building on #RevokeArticle50 petition - only possible cos of legal action by 6 Scots parliamentarians fm different parties working TOGETHER #differentpoliticalculture 
I am utterly sick of Pro-Brexit MPs telling this filthy lie. There are other options. We can Revoke Art.50 unilaterally. We can hold a second referendum. We can have an election. It's a bad deal and it's been rejected TWICE. Nothing has changed about the deal. 
'Special place in hell, squandering Churchill's legacy': Watch the nastiest things the EU has said about Brexit  
Fantasy: if only labour had chosen Yvette Cooper over  Corbyn, we could have stopped BrexitReality: (h/t @lowpoint) 
Nick. Most people want it finished-just in different ways “Get it over with”. For many it means I want the WHOLE Brexit project done. Ended. So be careful what you say.The #RevokeA50 petition is going so fast it crashes.  Vertical trajectory in 1 day. c700k & Rising 
When someone tells you they still believe in Brexit.  
I see Bad Gateway is now trending as well as Revoke Article 50. Brexit IS a Bad Gateway.  Let's stay on the right side of the gate and #RevokeA50Now. Petition heading for 3/4 million despite the overload. Fantastic to hear the people speaking despite being denied vote. 
Nick, you’re away with the fairies if you think ‘get on with it’ means a Brexit. The majority in the country is for getting on with cancelling Brexit. Trollbots have masked that, but not any more. The message is now clear:#RevokeReviewRecheck. 
After Theresa's pathetic 'it wisnae me guv" speech last night, in which she seemed to know what "you" want, let's tell her what you *actually* want. Sign the petition to Revoke #Article50 #RevokeArticle50 #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
RIP Labour support for a second referendum, we hardly knew ye.  
Theresa May goes from MAYBOT to MADBOT @THERESA_MAY #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
Dear @Number10cat Larry last night on the steps of No10 in complete despair as May is inside holding a press conference blaming everyone except herself for the Brexit meltdown. Time for a new house mate.  
So I’m not one to get political on here very often, but if leaving the EU really is “the will of the people” then why not have a second referendum?If it’s the will of the people, the outcome will be the same, right? So why are you so against it? 
‘Racist, stupid and uneducated’ – Civil Servant reveals what Remain bureaucrats really think of Brexit voters.  
I know many people who are now feeling the worst of Brexit fatigue. Weirdly enough, however, I'm feeling what can only be described as Brexit vigour - I've never felt so energised to get shite done, to fight back harder than before, and to make the case for Scottish indy  
BREXIT ULTIMATUM: Furious Merkel demands UK pass May's deal or GET OUT of bloc NEXT WEEK. The fact is May has pissed off the cowboys and the indians and we the people are once again going to pay through the nose as well as getting screwed. 
Fascinating to get the full story from Christopher Wylie - didn’t get through a fraction of what I wanted to ask and we had 30 mins #datatogether #datafest His comments on Brexit shocking  
In the 2017 General Election I promised to respect the 2016 Referendum result, oppose a second referendum and support a deal which would allow for easy trade, protect workers’ rights and end freedom of movement. This deal isn’t perfect but it does all that. I am keeping my word.  
‘John Bercow is one of the few heroes of Brexit. He has made it possible for parliament to hold government accountable to the people, after decades when the subservience of the Commons to No.10 became the first article in Britain’s unwritten constitution’  
If you were are reporter if any integrity you would apologise for this tweet and point to the opinion poll stating the 90% of the population think her handling of brexit has been a national humiliation. She speaks for almost no one. 
"That kind of smug, 'I know it all, you're all daft', arrogance is why we won the referendum.And it's why, if there was a second referendum, we would win even bigger again.The number one reason people voted to Leave was to take back control."Well said @DominicRaab  pic.twitter.com/yNmf8RdWAa 
What if Theresa May loses the vote again next week, and then refuses to resign or ask for a long delay, saying it would be better to have no-deal Brexit? Can parliament actually do anything to stop it (in the time available)? 
BBC 'unable to find' anyone who supports Theresa May's Brexit statement  
If you're sick and tired of Theresa May constantly kicking the can down the road on Brexit, sign up now to demand a People's Vote  
“We don’t want in the coming months, coming years to be busy with Brexit,” says European Parliament Brexit coordinator Guy Verhofstadt  
54% of Britons backed the invasion of Iraq. A decade later - no-one would admit it. Will the Brexiters ever accept they were conned by the Brexit Ponzi scheme? Me for @bylinetimes 
Unfucknbelievable extraordinary BBC “No deal Brexit something that the Prime Minister Theresa May has insisted she doesn’t want” FFS!!! She voted for it last week and was defeated!!!! Give me strength  
“You may have to fight a battle more than once to win it” Margaret Thatcher first  woman Prime Minister. Compare and contrast to Theresa May second woman PM. #Brexit #NodealBrexit #LetsGoWTO 
Facing the future is always more difficult than looking in the rearview mirror, but in the long run, it is the only way to prosper. - Damon Albarn talks #brexit in a new interview with French magazine Télérama.  
What are SMEs thinking about current Brexit mess? Am just going through our most recent business survey, & clear is causing, not just widespread despair, but also lost business, fraying relationships with European customers & investment held or cancelled.Some quotes below: 
The idea that there is a "cliff edge" if we leave the Customs Union and Single Market is a lie.My new blog post analyses trade data which shows that the Customs Union provides no benefit to UK trade.#Brexit#LetsGoWTO 
Brexit VS Fyre Festival.Great work from People's Vote ahead of Saturday's march#PutItToThePeople 
This is spot on, I think. From what I hear May is increasingly resigned to accepting no deal. She'll refuse to ask for a long extension. Parliament cannot agree or work out what to do about it. Cabinet won't remove her. Tory MPs can't. Brexit... in eight days.  
Keep Calm and Carry On. This mass hysteria is unbecoming and un-British. Stiffen your lip and straighten your back. Don’t be herded you are not sheep. #Brexit is coming. T’were better it was a clean break. Let us build a Britain to be proud of. #BrexitAlliance 
Rolling Brexit update: - EU rejects Theresa May’s request for extension. ‘Impossible’ to go beyond 23 May (due to EU elections)- Parliament’s Wombat-In-Chief, Bercow says PM Deal cannot be re-presented for 3rd time - as it stands in law - No Deal Exit 29 March #Brexit 
Government website crashes after more than 500,000 people demand Brexit is cancelled  
Being quite vocal about Brexit I get a lot of abuse lol ..The telling ones are “ go pull some pints “ ... or “ What would someone from Essex know “That’s snobbery and it’s everywhere in Brexit debates either online or in real life 
ABSURD: Department of Health hits back after Brexit is blamed for drug shortages. “No evidence to suggest that the current small number of medicines supply issues are related to EU Exit.” 
If 17.5m people sign this petition, Brexit will automatically be cancelled. I assume.(No surprise that the servers are struggling to cope with demand. Keep refreshing until you get through.)  
"Attacking parliament" over the #Brexit delay is "an odd form of populism". The man who designed Article 50 says the UK is in a "weak position" in negotiating a short extension with EU leaders. Follow the latest on #Brexit here:  
Piers Morgan brands Hugh Grant ‘sneering liberal’ celebrity after signing #Brexit petition to revoke Article 50   
Incase you all missed it on the state funded, state controlled BBC news - The UK has lost £1 TRILLION in assets because of Brexit. 
“I’ve always believed May would do the right thing, and reach a consensus across the house.“What she did last night destroyed all that confidence”Independent Group MP @angelasmithmp wants a second referendum #VictoriaLIVE 
“It’s time we conclude this whole negotiation,” says European Parliament Brexit coordinator Guy Verhofstadt  
Agree - where would Brexit ever have been if it had not had such a cheerleader in @BBCr4today? 
Let's deliver #Brexit certainty at last.  Do something today.#GoWTO 
Brexit bred racism is so devastatingly sad. Feeling helpless about fighting it is the same feeling. We have 115 people in Elite Bistro & the only thing I think I can say is we fucking hate it as a group. We have zero tolerance to even a fucking sniff of discrimination or hate. 
"The European Union should at last admit that they are responsible for Brexit also."German MEP Hans-Olaf Henkel says Britain leaving the EU is "as if 19 smaller medium-sized countries leave at the same time" and "really hurts" Europe.  
I know it keeps crashing, but thats Brexit all over...Keep trying, your voice is valid and hugely important. 
EU is external manipulation by unelected officials.EU is the enemy of democracy. Brexit saves us.EU has torn communities and politics apart across continent.Brexit is about leaving fortress EU and reopening UK to the world. We know there is another way. We voted for it.  
SMR: This is the #Brexit #EndGame and THAT petition has now reached a phenomenal 700,000 signatures in just one day!When you get there, check out how many others from your constituency have signed it.We'll keep you posted...  
My interview on Sky News with Adam Boulton on latest #Brexit developments.  
This whole perception in some people’s heads of Brexit voter = scumRemain voter = nice person Is down to mainly class perception & stereotypeBrexit has shown up many so called educated folk as being utter snobsShown the childish manner people behave when don’t get own way 
Says something about the state of our media and our democracy that the Germans know and care more about the corrupt and illegal practices in our referendum than we do. 
Where next in this Brexit crisis? May seems to have blown it on any chance of squeaking her deal over the line. So:1. No deal2. Revoke A503. Longer extension - for something or EU won't give it (& might not anyway)both 2. and 3. need UK to take part in EP elections1/4 
Today Jeremy Corbyn is in Brussels to meet•7 PMs of EU countries•EU Chief Negotiator•Sec Gen of the EU•2 EU CommissionersLabour has a credible Brexit PlanMay has nothing - she needs to move aside and make way for someone who will put the needs of the UK first #JC4PM 
You don't have to believe in a 2nd referendum to march on Sat. You may or may not want to revoke article 50. You might just believe in trying for a softer Brexit or avoiding no deal. Whatever your reason, let's show Theresa May that she needs to find a new way. Cos this ain't it. 
The Independent Group might not be a party yet but @ChukaUmunna has shown more leadership over Brexit in the weeks he’s been @TheIndGroup spokesperson than Corbyn has in the years he’s been ‘leader’. #ChangePolitics 
Snapshot pollOn 29 March, what happens with Brexit?As always, not what you want to happen but what you think *will* happen. 
Don't worry @BenAskren, we're all just as confused as you on #Brexit!?   
"It's impossible to have an extension that goes further than May 23." The European Parliament's Brexit coordinator @guyverhofstadt says a long #Brexit delay would cause "enormous problems".Follow the latest on #Brexit here:  
That was my dog  Lola. She is a voice / bark of sanity in this crazy #Brexit world   
Very pleased to announce that my research article "Global Britain™: The Discursive Construction of Britain's Post-Brexit World Role" has been accepted for publication and will be out soon in Global Affairs @tandfnewsroom.@DrEuniceGoes 
Brexit: EU poised to insist on withdrawal no later than 22 May  
There is no doubt #MayMustGo.There is no doubt that the PM does NOT speak for most voters.There is no doubt that @bbcnews & @BBCPolitics is propping up a failed Govt.There is no doubt that 90% of voters think @theresa_may's Brexit negotiations are a "national humiliation".  
Today Jeremy Corbyn is in Brussels to meet•7 EU PMs•EU Chief Negotiator•Sec Gen of the EU•2 EU CommissionersLabour's Brexit Plan•A Customs Union•Single Market Access•No Backstop•No Hard Border•Frictionless Trade•Workers Rights•EU Co-op on Crime Sci & Env 
And so the @EUCouncil summit begins in Brussels and with it opposing thoughts on a #Brexit extension. First up, @guyverhofstadt claims any extension beyond May 23 would be “impossible”.  More on @SkyNews 
Next says a tariff boost following a no-deal #Brexit could lead to cheaper clothes  
A German TV reporter appears at @guardian for an interview. "You're doing a whole hour on Brexit crimes?" I say. No British broadcaster has done that. "In Germany, we think this is a v important topic. It affects the entire future of Europe. People really need to know the truth."  
Yep it's the same thing we saw when Tusk said the Brexit leaders have a special place in hell.... Members of our press and politicians intentionally misrepresented that as attacking all Brexit voters.Your tweet couldn't have been clearer, yet Raab did the same. 
Not converted, just wants the result of the referendum carried out - that's democracy  Deliver the vote - leave! 
Unnamed friend: Theresa May's approach to Brexit = going into the Mass Effect 2 suicide mission without upgrading the ship or completing the loyalty missions.  
Latvian parliament has unanimously adopted law on  protection of citizens' rights after #Brexit .Today we still don’t know when and under what conditions UK will leave the EU but it is our responsibility to protect  citizens and to guarantee rights of the citizens in Latvia.  
The BBC are scaremongering about Brexit as per usual. Remainers just hate facts it seems...  
I’m speaking at a Stop Brexit demonstration outside the #EUCO (EuropeanCouncil) meeting in Brussels today. A short extension of Art50 is useles for anything other than approving #TheresaMay ‘s bad Brexit deal or accepting a no-deal BrexitVital to have a long enough #Extension 
One of the least conducive things to stopping Brexit is pretending Theresa May's theatrical meeting of party leaders where she just restated her deal again with no offer of compromise, was done in good faith. Criticise it for the absolute circus it was. 
MPs have spent nearly 3 years arguing about Brexit so there is no chance that they will agree on anything in the next week.Looks like it's no deal WTO by default next week.Furious Merkel demands UK pass May's deal or GET OUT of bloc NEXT WEEK  
Julia: "Who do you blame for the Brexit mess?"John 'Boycie' Challis: "I blame Del Boy."@JuliaHB1 | @BeingBoycie |  
The VP of the European Parliament, Heidi Hautala has said this morning that she considers the Brexit Referendum was just an ‘Opinion poll’I mean really who do these EU officials think they are.Talks about revocation as the next step.Democracy is in a fight for its life. 
Christ on a bike. This is some proto-Kristallnacht bullshit. I know this won't get much attention amongst the Brexit chat but really, this is what needs a 8:30pm public address from the leader of our country going "bin your hammers dickheads, we all need to live together" pic.twitter.com/XEmcphbLCN 
It's an emergency. The EU says it won't delay Brexit unless May’s deal passes. But neither MPs nor the public accept the deal.Unless a referendum is called, revoking Article 50 might be the only way to avoid No Deal.Use our form to write to your MP 
Been in touch with Speaker at #Commons Next week i will, with other MPs, apply for a Debate under Standing Order 24 to push for Commons vote to #RevokeArticle50. Revocation ends #Brexit in an afternoon & requires only one letter to EU .Tweet/email your MP to support this. 
This day next year, the UK will be Europe's most pro EU country & its most proactive member, supporting others to secure their elections against attacks.The global fascist-led coup, called Brexit, will fail.WE ARE WIDE AWAKE NOWWE WILL WIN#Brexit is a crime.#StopBrexit 
If Brexit is revoked the no IndyRef as no mandate.  So folks what do you want? 
A referendum is either democratic or irreversible, but it cannot be both.Just as no Parliament can bind its successors, no one electorate on one day can bind a democracy forever.A democracy can always change its mind and at any time.  
UK retail sales unexpectedly rose in February, defying ‘Brexit uncertainty’ narrative.0.4% monthly growth, 4% year-on-year growth. Value of online sales up 9.4% in 12 months.  
Yet again our healthcare authorities have to correct really irresponsible scaremongering over Brexit. Last one I saw was Gary Lineker. This time it’s... the BBC.  
The worst part of literally everything is that even the word “Brexit” is just bad horrible grammar cobbled together in a rush and just knowing such a horrible cringe word exists but is said 10,000 times every day just is awful 
My general take is that right now people in Britain don’t care what Trump thinks about Brexit. He rarely comes up in conversation - a curiosity, not an influencer. They simply want the US-Britain relationship to survive Trump.   
A thought/question, oh #Brexit Twitter about what happens if the Withdrawal Agrement is voted down again next week.How does @theresa_may get sent back to Brussels to ask for an extension she says she will not ask for? 1/Thread 
It's Lesson 2 of Eric Cantona's Brexit Survival Guide, and it's time to face some grim realities... #BrexitBunker 
The simple truth is this. She is the most incompetent, arrogant, and divisive Prime Minister in history. Her failures stretch way beyond Brexit negotiations, and that is why we need to end this now. #MayMustGo 
When Theresa May looks into the camera and declares "I am on your side" what she MEANS "I am on the EU side"She was a Remainer in 2016 and has spent her entire period in Downing St working to subvert Brexit. What a scandal.She must go, 
Theresa May’s Deal is finished & her premiership in tatters.Only Labour’s Brexit Deal will allow us to accept and deliver on the referendum result of 2016 whilst maintaining the strong economic relationship with our European partners our country needs. 
Brexit is shitWe should stop it#WorldPoetryDay 
“She is on my side… she might not know it.”Remainer Andy West thinks "human mothball" Theresa May is sincerely trying to get Brexit through - only problem is, "she stinks". Thoughts?@AndyWestTV | @TheJeremyVine | #jeremyvine 
Will a no-deal Brexit inflict substantial economic damage on the UK and the rest of the EU? Yes, according to a recent study. And, Britain and Ireland will be the hardest-hit countries in such a scenario.  
What could a no-deal Brexit actually mean for YOU? Watch our animated explainer:  
We were lied to. It is no longer the will of the people, and it's doubtful that it ever really was. Revoke Article 50, and stop Brexit.  
Leader of Nigel Farage’s Brexit party resigns after exposé of tweets showing racist views  
Brexit: May's appeal to nation backfires as MPs accuse her of stoking hate - Politics live  
If #theresamay calls a snap General Election, to try to solve her problems over #Brexit , should the @theSNP use it as a substitute #IndyRef2 ?  Please retweet for larger sample. #BBCQT 
If Parliament & the govt are unwilling to see us leave the EU, they shld revoke Art 50. Holding a Kangaroo Vote 2nd referendum wld waste more time & money, be politically toxic, encourage violence, & enrage Leavers thro the pretence at legitimacy. If you must cancel, just cancel. 
Remainer commentators rage against public-school Brexiteers. But Brexit was the work of the masses, not Tory MPs. Those who think a cabal of posh boys hoodwinked the masses are the real snobs, writes Neil Davenport. 
Forget Brexit. Go outside, embrace the Springtime and click your heels in the air like Mole!  
I’ve ordered a litre of gin. Brexit stockpile. I’m ready for whatever comes. 
It’s bizarre to suggest a People’s Vote would be anti-democratic. It is a democratic process in itself. It is an entirely different vote to the first referendum. 
Brexit: EU rejects May's request for three-month delay  
Had a lot of questions this morning about this petition asking will it be debated? Petitions over 100k get debated. Petitions over 600k need to be urgently debated. #brexit  
Always worth remembering that before the Gina Miller case, May was planning to just rubber-stamp her Brexit deal through cabinet. Simpler times. 
Mrs May you did a deal with the fanatical, homophobic, anti-Irish, climate change deniers in the DUP who are pushing for a hard Brexit despite the wishes of NI voters, businesses and farmers. You are most certainly #NotOnMySide 
BREXIT is in total confusion and is now a bore. Better to bring things to a head on 29th March and I further delay! If it means No Deal it will concentrate minds - business will immediately solve any problems and politicians will be forced to agree the way forward. 
Last nights horrific Brexit it’s not my fault it’s MPs Reminds me of when Theresa May told the police to stop crying wolf as she cut 20,000 Coppers.. them lies about it.. FFS!!! Theresa May is deceitful dangerous and a threat to this country watch remember this   
I wasn't allowed a vote. Nor were millions of other most affected by the referendum. We may never get another chance to express our disgust at this whole sorry episode. #RevokeArticle50#PeoplesVote#PutitothePeopleMarch 
Always had or just starting to have doubts #brexit is such a good idea..make sure you get your say by:1) signing this petition2) joining the #PutItToThePeople march on Saturday.  
There once was a girl called TheresaWhose ministers failed to please herShe went on the attack:'The UK's got my back.'But it's holding a knife, and she's Caesar#WorldPoetryDay#brexit 
Theresa May blamed parliament last night for her Brexit deal not getting through. Who controls the parliamentary agenda ? You’re right, Theresa May and her govt. 
Astonishing that tinpot dictator May has the nerve to blame MPs for delaying Brexit, after wasting months running down the clock. The first Meaningful Vote, scheduled for 11 December, was delayed for 5 weeks because she withdrew it arbitrarily. She's barking mad. #MayMustGoNow 
Government: "BREXIT IS THE WILL OF THE PEOPLE"British people: "The majority of us don't want this anymore"Government: "SHUT UP" 
BREXIT CRISIS: Black Thursday - Britain humiliated on global stage as it begs EU for more time/#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
Everything you need to know about stopping Brexit and revoking Article 50  
Consequences of any #Brexit extension beyond European Parliament elections?Twice in last hour, EU sources have told me to expect serious legal challenges if UK does not take part. 
M1 set to be hit by nationwide Brexit ‘go slow’ protests  @BrandonLewis 
Perhaps while we wait for the Petitions website to be fixed as a result of #RevokeArticle50 demand - we should email the many good MPs to remind them we don’t want May’s botched Brexit - and remind wavering MPs we will also remember  if they support her in making the U.K. poorer  
Bloody fucking Brexit has just pursued me to France. Booked hol in Mar to avoid Brexit probs in Apr & just spent hrs rebooking tickets to avoid being stranded in France by Eurostar strike. Gnash!!!!! 
Let’s fuck this brexit shit off. Sign this below and we might have a chance of survival  
Will whacking your name on the petition lead to Article 50 being revoked? Probably not.Does adding your name to the petition make every remain leaning/soft Brexit supporting think twice about backing May's dog dinner deal? You betcha. 
Put up or shut up time for MPs as kamikaze PM shamelessly tries to pass the Brexit buck. She's not on anyone's side but can progressives in Commons act together by Monday to stop her? Today's @ScotNational column 
MPs voted to let the people decide in a once-in-a-lifetime referendum. All the issues were fully debated, and the people voted to leave the #EU. Parliament’s job is to deliver what was voted for and leave the EU. It was never dependent on any trade deal. 
Brexit is 205 hours away. #brexit 
Have seen quite a lot of Labour MPs tweeting the petition calling for Article 50 to be revoked (thereby cancelling Brexit without a public vote.)Last time I checked, that was definitely not Labour Party policy. 
An indictment of our media that it takes German TV to do this and of our politics that Canadian MPs doing more than ours on the crimes and misdemeanours at heart of Brexit campaign  
Analysis: Trump’s advice on Brexit may be useless — or worse  
AMAZING: Petition website crashes after more than 600,000 demand Article 50 be revoked /#EU #Brexit #RevokeArticle50 
And the problem is the dark world of"PROFESSIONAL'S MEETINGS"The dark enclaves that forbid parental attendance or input.Where decisions are made in which the parental voice of experience are so clearly needed.Brexit is a more transparent process!  
Options for remainers facing a No Deal Brexit: 1). Sign petition. Until it reaches 17.4m, dismissed by leavers. 2). Revoke A50. See earlier tweet. Corbyn won’t support.3). Tory remain MPs abstain in vote of confidence next week. Govt falls. Election called. Long extension. 
So many people wanting to sign this #RevokeArticle50 #Brexit petition that the site has temporarily crashed! Please keep trying if you want Mrs May to get the message.  
In case you think I'm being all cynical or nihilistic and I'm saying negative things just to have a moan, let me give you some constructive advice regarding Brexit. I've said it before, but I'll say it again... Learn how to throw a knife. 
Given #Brexit's based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesForeign InterferenceDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o ConsentThe Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the PplIt should be bloody compulsory!#RevokeArticle50 #Remain in Control in the EU.#Brexit Britain 
Meanwhile remainers are targeting Brexiteers children for attack.Brexit supporting MPs have been subjected to death threats by Remainers. But you don't take any notice of that do you? It's all "them against us" as far as you are concerned. 
Twitter in the morning isn’t what it used to be, #brexit mess taking up a lot of the feed, the parliamentary petition site conveniently going down, a guy shooting a sleeping lion for ‘sport’ and no sign of anyone shooting him, thank heavens it’s interspersed with lad bible videos 
We set off from Ackworth on the #MarchToLeave against the Brexit betrayal!  
What a day to be teaching this Mass-Observation book! While I am not sure how apt analogies with the Munich Crisis have been in illuminating this accelerating Brexit Crisis, M-O reminds us how it has ever been thus that politicians are totally deluded about public opinion.  
French friend is heading to London from Paris.“Madness at checkin!”French customs staff are rigorously checking passengers‘ details, to demonstrate what will happen with stricter border controls after Brexit. This is project reality, Brexiters.  
So the “no Brexit” brigade make a petition go viral and it’s big news , yet when the no deal petition got to 350k in two days it was never mentioned a few weeks ago...The level of “ yeah buts “ in this Brexit times is hilarious 
How can the Government revoke Article 50 with this Remainer petition gathering speed going around. Are these people thick 17.4 million won a referendum vote to Leave by Law on the 29th of March. This is Fact the petition of 600,000 to revoke is a farce, let Democracy happen idiot 
Roses are red, violets are blue,I'm tired of Brexit,I think you are too#WorldPoetryDay 
Initially I thought that the timing of Saturday's march was hopelessly late and close to the wire.Now I think it's pretty smart. There is nothing like imminent doom to focus people's mind. We can see the whites of Brexit's eyes.NOW we charge. 
.@MaireadMcGMEP tells @adamboultonSKY: “EU elections could be a moment for remainers to take back control.”Exactly. EU elex when they happen in Britain will become a de facto referendum on our membership. Whichever side wins, (leave parties or remain), will claim a new mandate. 
Morning everybody! All aboard today’s version of the Brexit rollercoaster. Yesterday the Prime Minister inflicted a ritual humiliation on herself. Today, it’s the EU’s turn.  
UK citizens and residents against Brexit, sign this petition now! Server is currently crashing due to high volume, was gaining signatures at a rate of more than 1000 per minute...  
Who can smell brexit dying today?#RevokeArticle50 
ICYMI: Brexiters are stopping Brexit because they need to believe in the fantasy of Global Britain  Read this to see how stupid May was to go for a short extension. She is the ERG's useful idiot. 
Excellent metaphor for Brexit when it went down!  
Do you remember straight after the Brexit result there was a huge petition for a second referendum or similar which grew at hundreds of signatures a minute, crashed, and was then dismissed by the government because the system was targeted by bots to boost the numbers?That. 
Put the kettle on and pray for Brexit and what happens next. 
That petition, the reason it's going viral, and the reason why our sign-ups for our march on Sat have had a boost, is because of PM. #Brexit  
Let's be honest here, I'd rather use the Euro than the pound post Brexit. 
The 'Revoke Article 50' petition crashing the website is somehow everything about Brexit in one sentence. 
revoke A50 site has crashed, but keep trying the link and send a message that we want to stop the brexit national embarrassment #FBPE #StopBrexit #RevokeA50 here's the link: 
BREXIT STATUS:Reached the point where we’re hoping Dr Sam Beckett quantum leaps into Theresa May... #OhBoy 
A GOOD TRADE DEAL IS THE REAL PRIZE1. If we start post-Brexit trade negotiations having signed May's WA then the EU will take a decade to dictate the poorest possible deal to us.2. We will get the best trade deal by leaving on NO DEAL & negotiating as equals, not beggars. 
So May has hectored, scolded, run down the clock, blamed parliament. ... She has played chicken with the House of Commons and, momentarily, lost.The Little Napoleon of Brexit | Richard Seymour on Patreon  
Wages and living standards lower than in 2008. The Brexit crisis. Climate catastrophe looming. The racist right rising around the world. The increasing threats of wars for oil and influence.To face these challenges, we need a socialist Labour Government. 
But what do you want Sammy, what are your #Brexit solutions? This deal isn’t as good as the UK staying in the EU but it’ll protect the #GFA, protect peace, protect the economy and protect livelihoods across our islands. 
This morning Jeremy Hunt said no deal would be better than no BrexitWhile PM has been telling her ministers this in private, she will be acutely aware that it risks incentivising Eurosceptics oppose her dealThe refrain was notably absent from PM's public address last night 
What's the opposite of a Brexit Dividend? Tory MPs were warned last night that donors have gone on strike in protest at the party's splits.  
#Brexit will not affect European security cooperation, say intelligence chiefs.  
For the European Parliament EU citizens in the UK and Brits abroad is the "priority" in the #brexit process. Deal or no deal, says @Antonio_Tajani. @BritishInEurope @the3million 
Government website crashes after more than 500,000 people demand Brexit is cancelled  
We need more voices that haven't degrees, and who come from outside the London bubble.Not sure we need opinions from participants in an attempt to throw a referendum, funded by shady money...  
.@HicksPolitics and Carl Benjamin (Sargon of Akkad) discuss Theresa May and the latest developments in her Brexit betrayal. WATCH:  
Always love people using sporting fixtures as a metaphor for Brexit.  'What so, if Manchester United won by like, one point, would we have to question the result?'  No, but you might, I don't know, RE-RUN THE WHOLE COMPETITION AGAIN THE FOLLOWING YEAR. 
Due to this Parliament's deliberate sabotage of Brexit with support of the media, we, the people, have been denied the opportunity to organise a national celebration of Freedom from the EU!We must never forgive those who stole our joyful day. We must flush out this parliament.  
Website hosting petition to "Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU" is very unstable and keeps crashing (insert Brexit metaphor). But please, please,  please keep trying.  
I’m from Peckham Dave. If I believed leaving the #EU was good for the long term interests and prosperity of the UK and our children I would support #brexit We are just much better in. Ps be polite, don’t swear at me.  
OMG, This explains *everything*!(Hint: it’s the translated script of that “Downfall” scene, applied to Brexit …)  
 @NicolaSturgeon shows leadership amid Brexit’s surreal circus – read this fantastic article by @lauraewaddell.  
You've never been on my side. Nor have any of your Tory predecessors. Your party has treated Scotland with utter contempt & disregard for decades. They've kicked us in the teeth so many times I've lost count. The charm offensive isn't working. #Scotland  #Brexit  
“The fact that Westminster has made such a godawful and disastrous mess of Brexit simply proves that you’d be just as incompetent. But don’t go. We love you and want you to stay.”  
As we #Brexit we are most vulnerable to cheaper farm products coming in that are illegal here, so we're pleased that @tradegovuk have agreed to enshrine in law we will keep our higher standards in the UK as we seek new trade opportunities  
First they wanted Brexit. Then they wanted a hard Brexit. Now they want a no-deal Brexit. Next they will want corporation tax cut, a bonfire of environmental rights and worker protections, the return of corporal punishment, gay marriage repealed ... YOU DO NOT GIVE IN TO THE ERG. 
Whatever else that petition does or doesn’t achieve, it at least immediately gives the lie to May’s insinuation that “the people” have become a kind of nebulous blob glooping along unstoppably towards Brexit, and hell mend any MP who resists. 
Brussels bound this morning for EU Council where @campaignforleo & EU leaders will discuss #Brexit aswell as jobs growth & competitiveness, Climate Change & External Relations.  At home we continue to get #BrexitReady 
I fear Downing St has made tactical blunder: Tories were switching when faced with the choice of PM deal or no Brexit . No10 has allowed No Deal to sweep back in as an option, and a fair few Tories believe that’s ok. By pressurising Labour MPs she’s lost Tory Eurosceptics - again 
Chief Minister of Gibraltar @FabianPicardo tells @adamboultonSKY revocation of A50 should be on the cards: “If on Tuesday MPs do not back the Withdrawal Agreement then the only way for the UK to take back control of the Brexit process is to revoke the Article 50 notification” 
Brexit: May's appeal to nation backfires as MPs accuse her of stoking hate - Politics live  
NEWS! Instead of telling us what we think about Brexit maybe you should try asking us, nation tells Theresa May  
Ashamed of Corbyn after last night. Can't believe he walked out rather than Stone Cold Stunnering Chuka, Rock Bottoming Vince Cable, putting the Sharpshooter on May and then climbing the ladder to his magic stop Brexit button and saving the nation. Cutting up my membership card. 
Allow us to address your confusion Dave; you can thank us later  
Thank you to everyone for being so polite, there has been lots of #Brexit related abuse over the last 3 years (it is very nearly 3 years which is why I believe it is not undemocratic to see if people still feel the same) but today, on my feed at least, everyone is civilised. 
The "Bad Gateway" error message on the Revoke Article 50 petition can signify the collapse of infrastructure which is unable to support such a large and fast increase in network traffic. Just like Dover after a no-deal #Brexit. 
98% of political reporting is now journalists just speculating and trying to present themselves as well briefed and hyper-analytical. They base most of it off gossip they heard from some drunk/disgruntled/loyal mp and present it all as fact & you wonder Brexit is fucked. 
#Brexit was a carrot dangled in front of a small group of pencil-necked, needle-dicked right-wingers to fulfil their masturbatory fantasies of a return to the days of the Empire, when they could bat away foreigners with a blue passport. Don't fucking fall for it. 
It isn’t the British people’s fault that our politicians have cocked up negotiations. Revoking article 50 is an assault on democracy . The British people were asked to vote in a referendum- and they did. Do not trash their vote  
"There are only losers when it comes to Brexit, Brexit is awful... a historic mistake" - German MEP @davidmcallister says if the UK is "determined to leave" then it must be done with a deal. A no deal Brexit is the "worst possible outcome of all" #r4today 
.@IanDunt: We are living through history - and not the good kind. We're living the kind that even in 20 or 30 years' time, people will say: 'Well this is bad, but it's not as bad as Brexit.'  
And the further reason why it has to happen - why May's lunacy and tyranny has to be stopped? I respect Brexiteers and their reasons for still supporting Brexit. I don't and cannot respect No Deal. And No Deal is what, I think, some of my followers chronically underestimate. 
Well I'm trying to sign this apparently popular petition on a government website to get article 50 revoked and it isn't working! Talk about a good metaphor for Brexit!  
Petition to #RevokeArticle50 has suddenly become unavailable. It was heading for a million by lunchtime.Very suspicious. Looks like government censorship to me.#Brexit #StopBrexitSaveBritain #SackMay 
Revoke Article 50 petition to cancel Brexit signed by more than 600,000 in a day 
Begging for Brexit: James Forsyth on a national humiliation   
It's had 3 years now: the referendum campaign, and the entire period afterwards. It still doesn't have a clue - and the reason for that is the worst, most divisive, most incompetent, most plain dishonest governance of my lifetime. Of anyone's lifetime. 
"Toxic, delusional" - UK PM Theresa May is heading to Brussels to ask EU leaders to approve a #Brexit delay. But as @bbclaurak explains, her biggest challenge is back in Westminster[tap to expand]  
Bottom line for EU leaders when they meet today - aside from all their #Brexit frustration/irritation/fatigue is they hope to avoid a no deal Brexit if possible but they don’t intend to throw Ireland under a bus to try to ensure a deal by offering something new on backstop /2 
If she refuses to seek a much longer extension, the only option left is for Parliament to force a unilateral revocation of A50. Ideally to be re-invoked at a later date if the public will, measured in a 2nd referendum, is there; and once the UK figures out what the hell it wants. 
Today on the #MarchToLeave we started in Ackworth and are heading down to Doncaster. Let's march for Brexit!  
Is there really such a big difference between France + Germany over #Brexit extension and way forward over next days? Not really. There are big differences in Merkel/Macron political styles. Big differences in message they want to send own domestic audience when talk Brexit /1 
Hiding from Brexit  
Johnny do you not appreciate that what you call “beyond #brexit” will be years of negotiation with the EU, after we have lost our negotiating leverage? #RevokeArt50 
Today is a reminder of the reality of Brexit: It is a patriotic outrage. It has turned us from a leading country into a national beggar, sitting outside meetings while other leaders decide our fate. 
Dear EU leaders, with respect, allowing Britain to leave will not end Brexit.  It will be the beginning of the relentless right-wing assault on the EU. Please help us, and we'll return the favour.  #RevokeA50 
Brexit has moved the Overton window on what is normal in politics, but to see Theresa May - who is completely responsible for the mess because of her impossible red lines & dreadful negotiating - blaming & endangering MPs was one of the most cowardly acts ever done by a UK leader 
Good to hear remainer Justine Greening confirm that Brexiteers did know what they were voting for, after all #Brexit  
#ThursdayThoughts #Brexit Out of interest (seriously) all 'anti-capitalist' 'progressives' who are supporting the 'Revoke Article 50' petition:What do you intend to do about the hyper-corporatist capitalist EU that's imploding on itself upon staying in it?SQ.  
'It's not my fault' – what the papers say as May blames MPs over Brexit  
She also promised she wouldn't delay #Brexit 108 times – her spokesman's word means nothing.  
No Deal Brexit may be unlawful -- a view from Rose Slowe  via @AdamWagner 
FREEDOM: WTO Brexit tariff slashing 'could save Next £15m', ‘better pricing’ for customers. Let’s take back control next Friday! #NoDeal 
No crisis at all. Would take maybe 30 mins to revoke Article 50, and cure every Brexit problem. It's the perfect silver bullet... she just won't use it. no 
Maybe the site can't cope with the demand - garnered over 400,000 signatures overnight, got hacked or taken down as too embarrassing for HMG.  Message '502 Bad Gateway' - should read 'Brexit Room 101'  
This wasn't a tweet about losing the referendum, it was about a PM of a deeply divided country deliberately choosing language that alienates & disenfranchises half of the electorate #NotOnMySide 
We are not on your side Tearezza 90% of the country says your Poxy Brexit has brought shame on us all!!  
Our government took the most stupid, idiotic approach to the negotiations; and applied the most stupid, idiotic interpretation of a narrow 52-48 result, in which Brexit voters voted to Leave for all sorts of reasons. 
A petition for a second referendum on the UK government's web site has gone offline, just as it was heading toward 1 million signatures (only 100K needed to trigger debate).Overloaded or taken down?  
RT if @theresa_may is wrong and a second referendum is what you want!!!  
It's crashed at 600,000. God, imagine if we DID just give up on Brexit, and went back to talking about hospitals, schools, mental health, jobs and clean air. Imagine the relief.  
May requests #Brexit delay. How much longer? Who can say. Off out tonight with my mate Ray. Ooh I get the shivers. 
Petition to revoke Article 50 and stop Brexit passed 600,000 signatures, having added 100,000 in just over an hour. Then the site crashed under the volume of traffic... What's the betting the Government won't be in too much hurry to get it back up again? 
Piers Morgan SHOCK Brexit rant ‘Bloody LEAVE EU with no deal - Anything better than this!'  
The Tory Brexit mess is so serious, the MSM will now lash out at anyone else they think they can blame for May's catastrophic failure, a few days ago Bercow, today Corbyn. Why? because the end is nigh for them & the Tory gravy train is imploding before their eyes. #MayMustGoNow 
'Now we've got the MPs being cast as the enemy of the people." Remain supporter @DrPhillipLeeMP and ERG's Mark Francois react to @Theresa_May's speech which blamed MPs for delaying #Brexit. Follow the latest here:  
After voting to trigger Article 50 in 2017, MPs have since been unable to agree on how to implement Brexit. So Mrs May goes to Brussels yet again today to EU Council summit to request extension of Article 50 until 30th June.A week and a day is a long time in politics. 
Oh look, a Brexit metaphor.  
And of course revoking Article 50 is a nuclear option, which'd go down like a lead balloon with millions of Brexit voters: not least in how it'd be portrayed by much of the press. "Evil, tyrannical Parliament ignores democracy and conspires to keep us in the EU". 
Jeremy Corbyn in Brussels to progress talks on credible alternative Brexit plan -  via @uklabour 
I've signed this petition because:  Brexit is giving courage to hate-filled racists, leading to a rise in hate crimes. Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU. 
That's why, despite voting Remain, I do have some sympathy with Brexit. Many left wing Remainers do. It's also why in any second referendum - should it happen - Remain cannot allow the same clueless centrist elitists to run the show. The message has to be totally different. 
The UK Parliament petions site has now crashed under the load of people trying to sign a petition to cancel Brexit. Shows the importance of peak load testing!  
Everyone - everyone- admits May’s deal is just about leaving. Nothing is agreed re the future direction. So the idea of backing it or not for most MPs (let’s leave the ‘purists’ out) is whether you want Brexit or not. Even Labour admit they’d keep the WA 
The "Revoke A50" online petition on the government website appears to have crashed, as the number of signatories was at almost 700,000 & increasing at 200,000 per hour.Entirely symbolic of Brexit Let's see if it comes back up again. 
The other key difference: At the time, Brown was derided at home and applauded abroad. And derided by all the people and media outlets who would later think Brexit is a great idea. And who now, obviously, won’t accept any of the blame for being so very, very obviously wrong. 
I've written many times about the underlying causes of Brexit: the betrayal, abandonment and impoverishment of so many millions of people by both the Tories and New Labour. People left voiceless and kicked out of the democratic process altogether. 
Theresa May and the Tories Brexit is a National Crisis!! Is there now only one way out? Revoke article 50?  
The state the UK Government is in now resembles the final scenes of the movie "Downfall". Theresa May has lost on every single front, she's blaming everyone but herself for the clusterbourach we're in, and the madness of the entire Tory cabinet is in full display. #Brexit 
Brexit is 206 hours away. #brexit 
Some genius has written a "Brexit Megillah" in impeccable Biblical Hebrew, casting @BorisJohnson as Mordechai and @jeremycorbyn as Haman. #HappyPurim 
If it is achievable in Parliament and under Treaty, I am more than happy to see us leave the #EU next Friday with “No Deal” but cushioned by all the legislation and preparations made on both sides of the channel. We would then be finally free and delivered on the #EU Referendum.  
It’s so obvious that Brexit ends with May hooking up with Corbyn 
MPs from across the political spectrum - and both Remain and Leave supporters - condemned the Prime Minister’s “arrogant”, “toxic” and ”irresponsible” late night address to the nation from inside Downing Street. 
Getting great response at #Sheffield station this morning handing out leaflets for #FinalSay referendum march on Saturday with Sheffield for Europe. Lots of "I am already gong". The only democratic way forward. @peoplesvote_uk 
Today Jeremy Corbyn is in Brussels to meet•7 EU PMs•EU Chief Negotiator•Sec Gen of the EU•2 EU CommissionersLabour's Brexit Plan•A Customs Union•Single Market Access•No Backstop•No Hard Border•Frictionless Trade•Workers Rights•EU Co-op on Crime Sci & Env 
Remember when people thought we had a competent government and Brexit would be signed off by last October so the EU could ratify it? 
Possibly a worse idea than Brexit. 
SAD: 90% of Brits think UK handling of Brexit is 'national humiliation'.MPs must reject the surrender document and ensure we leave next Friday, as promised!  
The political chaos over Brexit reminds me of the rollercoaster week before the Good Friday Agreement. Amid all the frenzy, one key player whispered to me: “The darker the night, the closer the dawn.” 
The Government and opposition playing fucking  Poker with BREXIT and both getting caught cheating !! We voted Out it’s meant to be a Democracy ! Remainders can fuck right off ! Going cap in hand to the regime we want to leave embarrassing 
I’ve signed this petition & I’ll be marching on Saturday with my wife and kids.  In years to come, when future generations look back on Brexit and how this country was taken over by fanatical ideologues, to the left &  to the right, they’ll ask “where were you? What did you do?”  
If I was a poet I'd write about petty ragesPeople who say they'll be ready in 5, then take agesCloggers of aisles,slow walkersPeople who say 'holibobs' incessant talkersGreg Wallace, Mrs Browns Boys, people who smellOh & Brexit can fucking fuck off as well.#WorldPoetryDay 
Dictator May is hardening in favour of no-deal to save her premiership. She reassured Brexit Cabinet minsters that even if Brexit were delayed she was serious about no deal. She also told them she had no intention of resigning. She is talking up no deal 
Thanks to the UK government developers for real-time JSON data on their petitions !#RevokeArticle50 #NoDeal #Brexit #WillOfThePeople 
I don’t hate the English I hate and detest Westminster and the tories! #IndyRef2 #awfultories #ToriesOut #SNP #brexit #MayMustGoNow #handsoffourcountry #scotland 
Do you feel that the UK has been humiliated by the PM’s/Parliament’s handling of #Brexit ?**Please retweet after voting for a wider audience **#Conservative #Labour #LibDem #UKIP #ForBritain #SDP #Time #Sovereign #DUP #RespectDemocracy #WTOBrexit #BrexitBetrayal #Green #Plaid 
If you succeed in your quest to Revoke article 50 do you all really expect divisions in this Country to heal. Do you all really expect Brexiteers to accept it just as you all haven't accepted the result of the 2016 referendum? 
Not usually a fan of sharing articles, but this captures the trouble I’m having picking my jaw up off the floor this morning:With the single worst speech she has ever given, Theresa May shifted all the blame for the failure of #Brexit on to herself  
Wow, it's incredible just watching the numbers rise on the petition by the minute. Please sign and help bring this #Brexit shambles to an end.  
Good!!! If it's blocked then surely it reverts to default position of #NoDeal #Brexit #BrexitWe leave as written in law in 8 days time #BrexitBETRAYAL 
Featured in @FT today: Our new @BertelsmannSt study shows effects of a no-deal #Brexit for #Europe's regions. If you want to know how your country/region will be doing, check out the full study here:  
Given where we are with Brexit, if you’re already booked to travel soon after March 29 it’s essential to take out travel insurance that includes travel disruption cover. Take it out now, rather than from the day of travel. 
Something that people need to learn about Brexit, and this is something I learned from the indyref, is that if you lose, you lose. Doesn't matter if you lost because of their deception or half truths or lying by omition or overspending - none of it matters.Winner takes it all. 
The @theSNP did not shrink (Quantative easing) the pound in my pension fund and in my pocket. You stinking calamitous Tories did that and are preparing to do it again as the pound devalues further with every Brexit day. Can't trust a Tory.  
Lots of Remainer MPs having a go at Theresa May for "pitting Parliament against the people".Yes, May has behaved disgracefully. But it is REMAINER MPs that are refusing to implement Brexit, pitting Parliament against the people.1000 days since the vote! Get on with it!  
Today's twitter poll:  Who do u trust more Theresa May or Parliament? The PM yest blamed parliament for Brexit delay saying "Ur tired of infighting, of political games, arcane procedural rows, tired of MPs talking about nothing else"  If u HAVE TO pick one who do u trust more? 
Theresa May’s ‘coup’ broadcast against Parliament only makes sense, as a political strategy, as the opening salvo in a referendum appealing over the head of Parliament, de Gaulle style. But she knows she would lose a referendum. So you are just left with the coup 
Kevin Maguire is a Corbyn lackey who you have to wonder how on Earth they got into journalism in the first place.Who are these women MP’s Kevin or did you just make this up on the spur of the moment!!Brexit mobs? What about that pillock Steve Bray.Away with you you fool.  
The UK is in shambles Brexit betrayal “Knife crime” — could anything sound more crude and like children running a country? Lowest IQ problem ever!No go zonesPolice investigating tweetsWhat an absolute Shithole 
More than half a million sign petition demanding Article 50 is revoked and Brexit is cancelled  
Mrs May is not right to blame pro Brexit MPs for the mess. She forgot to specify those who actually deserve it:> Remain MPs> House of Lords> EU stooges like Soros and Blair> Corbyn electioneering> BBC, Sky, Remain media> Ireland> EU harassment> Mrs May 
Jacob Rees-Mogg on the failed European economic model...#MoggMentum #Brexit 
Hello, like most of us in the UK I have been swinging between a debilitating fear of Brexit drawing near and an exhausted apathy about what else to do, as one person. The temptation to turn towards my own projects and away from the bin-fire outside my window in palpable. 
Jeremy Corbyn will meet the EU's Chief Negotiator Michel Barnier to try to “arrive at some clarity” about what would happen if Parliament takes control over Brexit should Theresa May’s deal be voted down again says Labour's @BarryGardiner #r4Today 
For me, it’s been happening in slow motion, because we lost our main contract pretty soon after the referendum. Theresa May has never understood or acknowledged that foreign companies immediately started restructuring, and saying goodbye to old relationships and arrangements. 
I hate to bust the Brexit fun balloon when it’s all going so well, but might be worth pointing out the WA is the easy bit. Trade negotiations along with vetoes are the fun part. 
The Brexit editors have let the country down by telling their readers week in, week out, what is not true: that leaving the EU is easy and even in the interests of their readers. They will have to live with that legacy. 
183 hours until Brexit. We have:- no viable plan- no real leadership- no credibility- no consensus- no clue about our future relationship with the EUIt's high time for the 4Rs of Brexit sanity: Rethink, Revoke, Remain and Reform! 
Jeremy Corbyn in Brussels to progress talks on credible alternative Brexit plan via @uklabour 
Look, whatever your opinion of Brexit is, I think we can all agree on one thing - It's extremely fucking stupid  
It really is remarkable that we are now so close to freedom given the establishment have thrown everything possible at stopping Brexit, including a Parliament overrun with those whose loyalty is to the EU rather than their own country. Leave & keep our £39billion. #Brexit 
Sorry for politics, but I think this is worth sharing as widely as possible. It's long past time to end this madness and to tell the PM what many of us are actually thinking, esp after she was so presumptuous about public views on Brexit yesterday.  
In the Herodotus version, David Cameron consulted the Delphic Oracle. “If the UK holds a referendum to leave the EU, this will create unprecedented unity and greatly augment power, sovereignty and influence.” 
How would you be affected by a no-deal Brexit? The EU has measures in place to help mitigate the impact: Aviation Rail Erasmus+ Social security Fishing Road transportCheck out our overview   
Colin Clark says MPs need to represent their constituents and back Brexit ... Hayley Millar missed the glaring open goal. Not surprising since there was, yet again, a complete absence of any Scottish specific line of questioning. GMS is genuinely Good Morning North Britain.  
‘L’etat, c’eat moi’ is now Theresa  May’s only claim to power. In her ‘coup’ broadcast last night she denied the legitimacy of both Parliament & the people in deciding on her Brexit deal. That just leaves her as sole decision-makerTheresa XIV. We don’t do that in Britain 
The good thing about Brexit is that we still have our dignity...   
Whatever your Brexit views, we can all perhaps agree that there's something odd about a flagship BBC radio news show managing to discuss the subject without once referring to a parliamentary petition that garnered 175,000 signatures even while it was on air. #R4Today 
People to blame for the brexit shambles, according to Theresa May:MP's.Jeremy Corbyn.The Labour Party.The EU.Your mum.A butterfly beating its wings in China.People definitely not to blame for the brexit shambles, according to Theresa May:Theresa May. 
Theresa May's deal looks pretty dead as DUP Brexit spokesman Sammy Wilson @eastantrimmp tells @TalkRadio: "I neither want the toxic deal nor the extension" - without DUP, at least 25 Tory MPs set to oppose deal next week, Labour MPs like @lisanandy seem against it = big defeat 
Remain MPs - including the Prime Minister - are not keeping their promises on Brexit.  
DUP MP @sammywilsonmp tells me @talkRADIO that he won’t be threatened into backing Theresa May’s Brexit deal: “I don't want this toxic deal or the extension either so there's no pressure on me to vote for it.” 
Theresa May blames MPs for Brexit delayThe buck stops with you, May tells MPs. Like anyone with their fingers in the Brexit pie, she won't take responsibility.Brexit means never having to say you're sorry.  
EU leaders  meet in Brussels to talk about #Brexit, relations with #China and the strengthening of the European economic base. We need to defend the EU's economic model & values in a changing world.   Read more about the European Council #EUCO 
Hello, I'm Paul. This is my 4-point manifesto for the Come the Fuck On Party:1. Cancel Brexit2. Wheel May, Cameron, Boris, JRM and Farage to Brussels in stocks3. Cancel austerity4. Work towards building a fairer society within a capitalist systemI thank you 
the very people she needs to woo if she is to have any chance of securing her Brexit deal. That was utterly clear on  show last night from savage critique of how @theresa_may frames herself as parliament’s enemy by @lisanandy and @DrPhillipLeeMP. See @itvpeston for clips. 
“Our political class is pathetic. We voted to take back control and yet they have ceded control to Brussels. Now we have the unedifying spectacle of Theresa May going cap in hand to the EU to beg it for a Brexit extension. What an anti-democratic farce.”Brendan O’Neill on @LBC 
Great illustration of the gravity theory of trade:New research shows how impacts of a No Deal Brexit would be felt around Europe.UK obviously hardest hit, but next hardest is Ireland, and then decreasing waves of damage ripple outMap by @theboysmithy  
Jeremy Hunt rules out indicative votes because he says it is up to governments to put forward worked up plans and parliament can’t negotiate international treaties. Yet asking the public to decide on an international treaty with no worked up plan in a referendum was just fine. 
Late stage Brexit is like one of those viral videos where a lad is shoveling snow and then hilariously slips and takes a long time to fall 
A toilet paper manufacturer has stockpiled an extra 600 tons of toilet paper in case of supply problems after a no deal Brexit. Sounds prudent, but that's only 3.5 million rolls, or about 1/20th of a roll per person. Are we looking at our new currency?  
This is on absolute fire, do sign if you haven’t yetBrexit is a national humiliation for the rich, by the rich 
Theresa May faces furious backlash after blaming MPs for Brexit crisis - follow live updates  
A rare moment of candour from Jeremy Hunt on #r4today who admits Brexit has "sapped our national confidence". The British public deserves a chance to scrap this failed experiment and get our confidence back. 
"Toxic, incendiary..." Theresa May is trying to undermine our 400 year old parliamentary democracy for the sake of her rubbish deal. Get on the streets this Saturday to demand we, the people, decide the outcome - either via an election or a second referendum...  
RevocationRevocationRevocation - that's what you needIf you wanna make the bestOf this bloody Brexit mess Revocation's what you need  
Thousands of people every minute are signing this petition to revoke article 50 and cancel Brexit. You know what do  
LABOUR PARTY STATEMENT: Should @theresa_may’s #Brexit deal go through-the skies will darken, the rivers will run red, locusts will eat our harvests, there will be a plague of frogs, and the first born will die. 
Same patronising nonsense from Jeremy Hunt on Brexit as tin-eared May comes out with...forgetting that May threw away her majority... a prisoner of her own stupid red-lines #r4today 
Not so. The Brexit process has exposed our leaders as charlatans and our confidence as over-confidence.  
Jeremy Hunt tells #r4today that ‘people don’t want’ a long Brexit extension but are happy with a short one. How does he know this? 
''90% of Britons agree - Brexit is a national humiliation'' I mean, France, Italy and Germany are all doing so well eh? Don't listen to this neo-liberal self-loathing media BS! We can still be a GREAT nation if we take the opportunity to be liberated from an unelected cabal!! 
Theresa May has, at long last, brought the country together - against Brexit. #revokea50 
For those MPs who believe the referendum result should be respected then vote for the current deal...for many of those who were leavers its a compromise...for those who were remainers its better than no deal...the UK is not faced with best of choices but least worst alternatives 
Cancelling Brexit is "possible" but "highly unlikely" - Foreign Secretary @Jeremy_Hunt #r4today  
Hunt says - ‘Brexit process has sapped our national confidence’ 
As chaos reigns in No10, more important than ever that #Labour MPs unite behind party policy to back a #PeoplesVote.The #KyleWilson amendment gives the country a choice to settle the #Brexit question: May's deal Vs #Remain.It is the most responsible route out of this crisis. 
Dame Margaret Beckett is furious with Theresa May: "Utter despicable. Contemptible. I have never been more outraged by the behaviour of any Prime Minister."@TomSwarbrick1 | #Brexit 
From “Brexit will improve your lives” to “there’s a small chance you might have to clean the shit off with a flannel”  
'It's fairly juvenile from a leader of the opposition.'MP Chuka Umunna reacts to Jeremy Corbyn walking out of a cross-party Brexit meeting yesterday because Independent Group MPs were invited.  
Despite the political mess, Brexit means -1) We will no longer be governed by the unaccountable, uncaring Eurocrats in Brussels, and2) Though we will continue to be ruled by MPs, we the British people will be able to kick them out when they screw up, as they have done royally 
Don’t tell me nothing positive has come out of #Brexit. We got a new dance craze...Do the Backstop!Doo-doo-doo-doo-doo-doo-doo-doo-doo  
What about it @BBCPolitics @BBCNews @BBCr4today @BBCNewsnight And 3 bloody years & not once have you interviewed Prof Michael Dougan..You have not entirely served the public well.#RevokeA50 #RevokeArticle50 Stop #Brexit  
This is the best analogy of #Brexit I've ever seen.  
My P.A.has a window this afternoon so is going to have a go at Brexit, She is very good at dealing with silly people and doesn’t stand any messing about when it comes to what’s best for me so I think she will make a good job of itLet’s be honest she can’t make a worse job of it  
It’s not rubbish. It literally has happened for me. I have epilepsy so I need anti-seizure meds. I usually pick up a months pack at a time. Last week I was only given a week’s worth because the producer of the meds are rationing them in case of a no deal Brexit. 
Petition to revoke Article 50 and call off Brexit has now passed 500,000 signatures, the vast majority in the last few hours. Theresa May's dangerously intransigent, bullying brinkmanship is a recruiting sergeant for sensible voices.  
Am a Bruges Speech era Eurosceptic.I do not object to Brexit in principle, though after Maastricht it was always going to be more trouble than it was worth.But the current go at Brexit has been botched as badly as it could be.Article 50 should just now be revoked. 
Next reveal that No Deal Brexit could save them £15m due to lower tariffs. They could then pass on ‘cost price improvements to customers’. Let’s take back control next Friday!  
Cooper has the same stance on Brexit as Corbyn (for a compromise 'soft ' Brexit, even less keen on a 2nd ref than Corbyn) , but she is otherwise more right wing & less green than him. It's a shame when leading  Greens   react to Corbyn by moving away from radicalism. 
Footstamping from Remainers til the bitter end. Another pointless petition that prolongs their anguish. It’s been like a three-year toddler tantrum. Difference is, my toddlers are bored of Brexit   
Revoke that mofo. Damn the consequences. The fash are on the streets anyway - called out by the Tory Brexit Taliban - so let's just have it out.#RevokeArticle50 
#r4todayCover this #Brexit option:#RevokeArt50 6.59am 414,000 7.10am 430,000 7.20am 443,371 7.30am 458,090 7.40am 473,279 7.50am 488,832 8.00am 505,725 8.10am 524,117 signatures  and now rising by 1,500 a minute.@BBCr4today@MishalHusainBBC#RevokeArticle50 
Over half a million signatures already and growing fast. If you agree that #brexit is a disaster, if you feel there has been utter lack of leadership then sign & share. Together we can change where country is heading but we all need to get our voices heard  
Brexit was a vast Ponzi scheme - and one day - nobody will admit having fallen for it. My piece on the mad F*cktastrophe    @bylinetimes #Brexit 
Telling reactions from some MPs, on both sides, who have brought us to the brink. Many of their constituents will have seen PM's speech & agreed with every word. MPs are active players in this, not commentators - deal with it.Don't want No Deal? *Then vote for deal* #Brexit  
Who’d have thought that a referendum won by lies and fraud would turn out like this? 
The economic pain of a no-deal Brexit - region by region. New study from Germany's @BertelsmannSt (and a lovely map by @theboysmithy)  via @financialtimes 
Brexit was supposed to be about @HouseofCommons reasserting sovereignty & taking back control - so it’s a bit rich for PM to blame MPs for impasse caused entirely by her refusal to listen to Parliament.  In Scotland the people are sovereign & we will have our say #BrexitShambles 
This time Bob outdid Matt@Telegraph #Brexit  
Day 1001 in the Big Brexit House. Theresa May blames all the house mates for being nominated - and faces eviction on Friday. Meanwhile Corbyn will only talk to the chickens having refused to meet with rest of the housemates to discuss the impending no deal rations. 
Hope to see some of you at the demonstration on Saturday. Until then, if you share the view that Brexit is an avoidable disaster for us and our children, please sign here. #PutitothePeopleMarchRevoke Article 50 and remain in the EU. - Petitions  
Following Theresa May's commitment to see Brexit through, a petition to halt the process and revoke article 50 has gone viral.  
They tell me people voted for #Brexit because politicians were letting us down. I have news for those people. Politicians will always let you down. The two main parties are clearly not fit for purpose. My advice: Don't vote for the Tories and don't vote for Labour. 
Controversial argument klaxon: Brexit shows British democracy is actually working. May, don’t forget, fought tooth and nail against any meaningful vote on her deal. She wanted to push her will through Parliament unopposed. Like an autocrat  
The scale of UK public international humiliation over Brexit is the real discovery. 19th century ideas of sovereignty and of national escape from interdependence have been exposed for what they are: nostalgic nonsense. It has been true for decades: maybe now it will sink in. 
Don’t misread Tusk’s statement: EU highly unlikely to agree long Brexit extension unless Commons first vote in favour of 2nd referendum. Not going to happen. -  
Theresa May said last night she knows the public is sick of #Brexit, & the only way to make it go away is to vote for her dealThat's not true. This is scheduling a divorce in 2 years. Next comes years of negotiatingOnly way to make Brexit go away is to revoke Article 50 #EUCO 
Great clarity from @KeithBrownSNP. It’s not @theresa_may deal v #NoDeal. Thanks to #ScottishSix, @JolyonMaugham & @GoodLawProject UK can unilaterally #revoke #Art50 & start again. That’s the option @theSNP MPs favour. Scotland voted #Remain. #Brexit  
At least the entire Brexit crisis can serve as the ultimate cautionary tale of the abject stupidity of a government allowing the anti immigrant narrative to escalate so far beyond its control. 
Another stupid BBC vox pop with one of those elderly Brexit voters, completely detached from reality, whose only argument is 'Why can't they just get on with it?' Oh wait, it was the Prime Minister ... 
Brexit is 207 hours away. #brexit 
We're standing alongside 35 other UK animal welfare organisations to call for a #BetterDealForAnimals as we leave the EU.Sign our petition and help us to ensure that animal sentience is recognised post-Brexit   
If I hear the BBC say “Nobody wants a no-deal Brexit” one more time...  
Universal CreditAusterity BrexitGrenfellPovertyFoodbanksHomeless WindrushWASPI #MayMustGo#MayMustGoNow#GeneralElectionNOW#MayMustGo#MayMustGoNow#GeneralElectionNOW#MayMustGo#MayMustGoNow#GeneralElectionNOW#MayMustGo#MayMustGoNow#GeneralElectionNOW 
#NotOnMySide Theresa. You never have been and never will be.Your Brexit is a national disgrace. And a friend sums up the mood of those you’ve so dismissively and petulantly ignored....  
Dear @stephenfry I would be very grateful if you could retweet this petition to your followers. It seems as though it is one of the few ways that we can make our feelings known now about this awful act of national self-harm: Brexit.#RevokeArticle50 
A tiny English town held a week of relentless partying when the UK 'joined Europe' in 1973. It was the only one that did. The enthusiasm didn't last and locals are now planning bigger celebrations for #Brexit. I went there to find out more for @EURACTIV 
If you’re sick or bored of Brexit (SIB or BOB) sign this This petition for Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU has had 78,211 signatures in the last hour.Time to stop the madness.RT #BrexitBunker #BrexitShambles 
Dutch PM Mark Rutte was slagging off Brexit the other day. An anti-EU, pro-Nexit Party has just surged and is big winner in latest Dutch election. Where Brexit Britain leads, others will follow. Let’s have courage to get out next week.  
The Guardian view on Theresa May and Brexit: a prime minister gone rogue | Editorial  
The whole Brexit machine follows this principle:“The most brilliant propagandist technique will yield no success unless one fundamental principle is borne in mind constantly - it must confine itself to a few points and repeat them over and over.”Goebbels. 
We are sending an update on Brexit to our supporters this morning from @ChukaUmunna and @Anna_Soubry. To receive it, and get news and updates from The Independent Group before anyone else, click here: 
I suppose the country is now at the point at which, were it a Brexit Secretary, it would resign.How can a country resign? 
This is why no deal is so likely (the failure of so many UK politicos to see this is strongly redolent of collective group think that failed to see Brexit itself or Trump)  
Our Parliament is full of pro-EU remainers who have plotted, connived and conspired against Brexit from day one. They hate us and they hate our decision. 8 days to go. It's not over yet. 
If you had a choice of the following #Brexit options tomorrow, which would you choose? 
You should be ashamed. Your endless attempts to wreck Brexit and undermine the UK have been a disgrace for a long time.  
Also we need to make this Saturday's march against #Brexit MASSIVE(Meet Park Lane, central London - next to Hyde Park from 12pm)  
Thanks @Daily_Express @ChrisMRiches @g_maynard this page says it all, look at the faces of the children whose lives are being limited because @NHSEngland @VertexPharma can’t negotiate a deal.  Come on this isn’t #Brexit surely u can sort this today. #LifeSavingDrugsNow 
There is nothing in the way that the Prime Minister has acted over Brexit that comes as any surprise to police officers. 
Time for those Government Ministers who say they could never contemplate a no-deal #brexit to act. If they don’t, they & the Tories will never be forgiven. My brief speech in yesterday’s emergency #BrexitShambles debate. 
If anything sums up Brexit it’s this compulsive liar.A handful of people turns into “hundreds” and one car beeping its horn becomes “deafening horns of support”.What is it with these high profile Brexiters?Why do they *all* lie?  
I found this information from office for national statistics...In the middle of 2017, there were 766,000 people in the UK aged 18.Using this figure there are now almost 3 years since the referendum about 2 million people aged 18 to 20 who were unable to vote in it. #RevokeArt50 
What’s one of my conclusions from doing 150+ constituencies? Give members much more of their deserved say; democratise more; widen the issues and give the party a real chance to change beyond BREXIT. Change the rules: give them four, not just two options.   
Read today that May has banned hospitals from discussing the risks of no-deal because it might harm ‘public wellbeing’. Is she insane? Public wellbeing? Has she any idea of how unwell the public being is already? If hospitals collapse with #Brexit they must give us all the truth. 
@DominicRaab Shame on you! @mrjamesob literally said "if you don't do this stuff for a living, there is absolutely no shame in having believed that Brexit was a good idea". Not sure how that's calling leave voters stupid. It's those like you who sold them an undeliverable dream. 
Brexit Minister Kwasi Kwarteng has told Sky News he believes more MPs will back Prime Minister Theresa May's deal and she has a "good shot at landing the deal and winning a vote next week" 
People say "respect the referendum" - WHY? Our country is being driven off a cliff. Brexit failed because it was intrinsically rotten from the start. I don't respect the referendum nor can I respect anyone clinging to it while the country is being destroyed. #RevokeArticle50 
Just think 3 out of 4 people walking around Britain today didn’t vote for Brexit.  Any politician with an iota of political sense would stop talking about ‘the will of the people’. 
MPs voted 4 referendum on EUMPs voted 4 A50 to leave EUMPs rejected govt’s dealMPs rejected opposition dealMPs rejected No dealMPs rejected back bench dealMPs rejected people’s voteMPs vote 4 ext 2 come up with deal in 3mths not been able 2 agree in 3yrIncompetent? 
Despite being constantly rudely interrupted by Tory puppet & #r4today presenter John Humphrys Labour’s Shadow Brexit Secretary Barry Gardiner came across extremely well. Meanwhile Tory MPs are almost always allowed to give a monologue, alongside being given a very easy ride. 
Remain or remain. It’s like a referendum Stalin would have offered  
That's probably why JC had a 20 min, 1 on 1 phone meeting with May last night. The other meeting with non-parties was the joke. #Brexit #NotOnMySide #MayMustGo 
If a majority of MPs cannot decide on a way forward for Brexit "we're headed for a no deal exit" from the EU which would be an "unwise decision to take" - Tory MP Oliver Letwin #r4today 
‘Sign the UK surrender treaty and then you can stay in longer’ - What the EU said yesterday.A quick summary from the #Brexit Facts4EU team : #GoWTO 
Brexit looks cuter than I’d imagined  
Jon Danzig in the @independent on Monday 13 June 2016"You won't 'get back your country' if you vote  for a Brexit - you'll give it to the most right-wing UK government in recent history" 
Next sees ‘no evidence’ Brexit angst affecting consumer behaviour  
"THE FINAL DAYS OF NATIONAL HUMILIATION?  May re-presents three choices, only one of which is viable" - Simple summary by #Brexit Facts4EU team : #GoWTO 
Through this #Brexit pandemonium & anxiety-inducing uncertainty, we all need moments of tranquillity and serenityI offer you these:  
Petition: Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU. Parliament has to consider all petitions that receive 100,000 votes and this one has already received 444,000 votes. Please consider lending your voice.The true cost of Brexit has been £500m per week. 
.@Nigel_Farage: If Theresa May buckles and delays Brexit, I will do my best to tear her party limb from limb  
This is a Brexit voter. She voted to leave the EU because she was sick of going to the supermarket and finding that the "bananas were straight"Don't be like this moronSign the petition to #RevokeArticle50: #r4today @LBC #newsnight #PoliticsLive #bbcqt 
You’ve all spent two years flinging faeces at one another like chimps in a zoo, claiming you want to avoid a “no deal” Brexit while either rejecting any potential deal or seeking to overturn the 2016 referendum entirely. You deserve every bit of opprobrium that comes your way.  
.@SteveBakerHW: We must stand firm and reject Theresa May's Brexit deal or we will live to regret it  
If you sign just one #brexit #petition in your life make it this one: *#RevokeArticle50 and #Remain in the #EU*Gone up another 100k overnight, let's keep this baby flying and see you at the #PutItToThePeople march this Saturday  #StopBrexit #FBPE  
Has anyone heard about this ‘Brexit’ thing that’s happening? 
Brexit isn't working - get your copy of The New European this morning for just £2.50  
This is about more than BrexitIt is about the future of democracy in the UK 
Here's my answer. Bet you don't read it out –   If Brexit happens the US will take over the NHS and you won't get your hip or knee replaced unless you've private health insurance. So it's actually a trick question. 
£1,000,000,000,000 of assets shifted from London to EU ahead of no-deal Brexit  
The government never expected nor wanted a Leave result. They thought that a referendum would keep the uneducated northerners quiet. Therefore they have never prepared for Brexit. They have threatened us with shortage of foods and medicines. They are ruining UK. 
In case it's not already clear: division and turmoil is the point of Brexit, in the same way that it is the point of Trump. It's where this type of politics lives and thrives. 
.@Jeremycorbyn in Brussels today to progress talks on credible alternative Brexit plan  
Though >6m old, it's worth recirculating - "the politicians driving a ‘Brexit at any Cost’ agenda with talk of sovereignty, self-determination and freedom masking their real agenda of achieving a low-tax, small state, deregulated economy"  via @brexit_sham 
I'm not sure if this covers everything but this is a long Channel 4 News article and video about Aaron Banks and Brexit  
If remainers had voted LibDem in last G.E. this would have been all over a year ago with what ever result of fair vote implemented. Time to dump main parties who serve their dogmas and not the people of U.K. I joined LibDem after referendum I support a party for all the people.  
I've never heard @mrjamesob call leave voters stupid in my 3 years as a listener. He does however point out your failings and stupidity @DominicRaab in a fair and succinct way. I'm marching on Saturday for a Peoples Vote, brexit is a huge mistake! 
The people don't want another referendum.  
Oliver Letwin is wrong. There was a vote on a second referendum last week. The second referendum campaigners told MPs not to back it. 
If the UK can seek to become more competitive in the world (like Brexit promised do), why wouldn't the EU have the same right?Why would the EU want to give UK businesses advantages over EU businesses?We chose to turn our allies into rivals, and accuse them of 'punishing' us. 
Following the PM’s inflammatory comments blaming MPs for Brexit deadlock last evening, John Humphrys use of the phrase “you people” to an MP on @BBCr4today this morning is ill judged at the very least and at worst downright irresponsible. 
It is clear that Brexit cannot be implemented by our government without causing damage to our country. Brexit is an act of self harm. The only good deal is the deal of EU membership. Sign the petition to revoke Article 50 and join the 440,000 signatures. 
This is not a joke. If you are still supporting Brexit please, think again. Join us on the #Remain March on Saturday. 
Since the ref Corbyn had a choice, he could collude with the Brexit narrative that the EU causes our problems or he could have spent the time travelling to leave areas informing people austerity, inequality etc were home grown. Tragically he chose the former 
Crunch time today.  Don't play to the establishment agenda.  #BlockDontBicker & keep getting our message out.  Jeremy can save the Brexit situation today. You just needed to hear the Tory jeering at PMQs when he said he was on his way to Brussels. They're toast. #WeAreCorbyn  
In Brussels there is disbelief - and some anger - at the state of Brexit from MEPs. Elmar Brok, who has served in the parliament for nearly 40 years says if Theresa May just wants more time then ‘let’s finish it’: a bad decision (ie no deal) would be better than no decision 
On @GMB Kwasi Kwarteng says if MPs agree to pass Theresa May’s deal, "life will be a lot easier". Of course it will for MPs, because all the power and decision making will be in the EU’s hands. How any politician can support her deal which isn’t #Brexit is beyond me. #MayMustGo 
Jeremy Corbyn will be going to Brussels today to discuss alternative Brexit plans with EU leaders. 
So, Oxford, Cambridge, Cabinet Minister, and yet you're absurdly trying to assert that you aren't a part of "The Establishment"? Your "answer" - a string of cliches - proved the essential flaw with Brexit: once you write it down, it falls apart. Thus the lying and empty slogans. 
#Brexit Theresa May one useless Prime Minister got worst Brexit deal ever. Queen  of DITHERING, loves sitting on the fence waving the white flag  to EU. No backbone hasent got a clue. One worst Prime Ministers of all time HOPELESS, HORENDUS, PATHETIC all 3.  
The one thing Theresa May is not is on your side. The only side the Weasel is on is her own. She has done nothing but sow hatred and division.90% of the country says her Poxy Brexit has brought shame on us all!!  
I've genuinely felt depressed this week because of Brexit. It's grinding me down. Heaven knows how awful it must be for small businesses and EU nationals in our country. 
Theresa May argued people have had enough of Brexit &want it to stop. Any Brexit will take yrs of further negotiations. Revoke Article 50 & it all stops. Brextremists will complain on TV for a few wks, then it'll stop! #RevokeArticle50 Sign the petition:  
Occasional reminder there’s no magic democratic mandate for 29 March 2019. It wasn’t on the referendum form or anything. Anyone basing their argument on that date being sacrosanct is talking utter guff. 
I've interviewed #fishermen in #Whitby and opinions on #Brexit were divided - hardly unanimous. More to the point, the lack of #fish quota in the town has much more to do with UK government decisions than the EU. Why is this story still being misreported? 
Dear friends, we must send out a message of peace to Leave voters. They are not our enemy. We've all been lied to. It's time to call time on brexit. It makes fools of us all. Instead let's commit now to addressing the issues that made voters think brexit was the answer. #FBPE 
Theresa May was pitching last night to the one group she refuses to let influence Brexit: the people. 
3 suggestions for taking back control:1) launch Muller style investigation into referendum. 2) revoke article 50 until results are in3) put forward package of democratic reform (PR, house of lords reform, written constitution Lots more to do but this is a starting point. 
Every single one of us coming to the march must sign this petition. We may not get a new referendum. We need our MPs to do the right thing and REVOKE ARTICLE 50. #RevokeArticle50 
“Despite Brexit” Britain is getting happier — at number 15 of 156, we are one of the happiest countries in the world.   
With the single worst speech she has ever given, Theresa May shifted all the blame for the failure of Brexit on to herself  
Brexit has caused no where near the division in Scotland that the indyref caused, and is still causing 
Appalled that Theresa May is pitting “Parliament against the Public”. The reality is that it’s the Conservative party who is against the public with its cruel austerity policies and cuts to public services, & its clear focus on self-preservation over the national interest#Brexit 
Every single leaver and MP who doesn’t actively oppose Brexit should hang their head in shame at what they have done to our country 
I'm coming from Swindon.   I'm a nurse and on duty the night before, so I'll be absolutely knackered, but I'm coming because Brexit will cause terrible damage to the NHS.   I'm also coming to represent a friend with MS who can't be there herself.   My banner has her name on it. 
Remainers:Remind me, with actual evidence, why you are so scared of a Clean WTO 100% Brexit.What consequences do you foresee?The floor is yours! 
Last year the #ScottishSix fought the UK Govt to get #CJEU ruling that #Art50 could be unilaterally #revoked . Thanks to us the UK has a lifeline.Sign this petition & tell ⁦@theresa_may to take it ⁩ #Brexit #ConstitutionalCrisis 
This is serious. Hospitals across England reportedly experiencing medicine shortages due to "stockpiling & price pressure as the Brexit deadline approaches” [NHS Providers]@theresa_may - how can this be justified? #RevokeArticle50 
Three years and a limitless budget couldn’t make Brexit work. Only Mrs May could seriously believe it can now be fixed in three months. 
Want Theresa May to hear your voice, oh “tired” public?  Please consider signing. There is choice in all this. #Revoke#Brexit #BrexitVote #RevokeArticle50 
Brexit has revealed the UK’s blindside: that Westminster just isn’t as good as it made out.  
Time to reread Pankaj Mishra’s essay about Brexit and how the British elite is simultaneously demonic and fucking incompetent.  
Honestly, every time I see the PM now, I see that scene in ‘Sunset Boulevard’ where they come for Norma Desmond. “Ready for my Brexit now, Mr Barnier....”“I’m STILL big, it was the politics that got small....”  
This is a deranged prime minister. Questioning the very structure of our democracy. We should all be terrified #Brexit #MayMustGoNow 
“Well, you had all the cards, but you got greedy and hard Brexit’d.  Tough luck, my dear!”  
8 days from ‚Brexit Day‘ and no deal in sight. When in Doubt: Ask Switzerland.  
This is literally the talk of facism. Parliament’s job is to scrutinise and debate and to act in good conscience. You are behaving like a deranged despot in front of a global audience. The British people deserve better than anything you have given them so far. #brexit 
We don’t want your fantasy Brexit either. Please get behind your own members and supporters, support a public vote. 
Brexit: Toilet paper maker stockpiles in a case of no-deal  
We voted to leave the EU. Parliament is intent on not allowing it. The gloves are off now as this is way bigger than Brexit. The entire social contract is on the line. 
The “offensive” tweet  that triggered a home visit by 2 police officers was “if Brexit is not delivered there will be civil war” Meanwhile, 2 out of every 3 burglaries are not investigated due to “pressure”.  You couldn’t make it up   
There isn’t an alternative to Theresa May’s “bad deal”. The withdrawal agreement is not open for renegotiation. No, not even if we change our “red lines”. May’s deal doesn’t rule out a softer Brexit in the long term – if Labour wants that it begins with voting for the WA.  
Fantastic! Revoke Article 50 Petition just passed 400,000 votes!Imagine there’s no #Brexit!It’s easy if you sign!Now let’s tell all our friends.#Revoke_Article_50#NotOnMySide 
If you feel that our deranged fascist Prime Minister is 'not on your side' -come to the March of your life on Saturday in LondonLets get way over a million to show these fascists that BREXIT MUST BE STOPPED!REVOKE ARTICLE 50 NOW! 
How hard is your Brexit? My Brexit is so hard it shits diamonds and causes FBPE to spontaneously combust. 
We're already a laughing stock. And would face even more derision if we pursued #Brexit. We need to Take Back Control from the loonies & #RevokeArticle50. 
We need another referendum or to revoke. Brexit is dead. 
I’m glad May slagged off Parliament and MPs. Parliament (ie. most of the MPs in it) have shown themselves to be full of crap working for remain and AGAINST the British people they serve. But, don’t worry, May, we know you are too. You’re not as smart as you think #R4Today #Brexit 
So 2 possibilities, revoke Article 50, May resigns & a General Election OR No deal Brexit, State of Emergency declared, troops on the street, all devolved legislatures closed, power centralised to Westminster. One means mandate removed, the other means @scotgov removed.Or? 
Theresa May's speech blaming ALL MPs for her Brexit woes was truly one of the most disgusting inciteful things we've seen in Westminster..  
#Brexit to lead to a shortage of 70,000 nurses and 7,000 doctors unless it can attract more overseas recruits.#Brexit is the gift that just keeps taking. 
The most important thing about May's speech is that she is saying to the people - "It's Parliament's fault -  I'm on your side - I want Brexit as much as you but..." History tells us that the first thing a populist does is turn the people against their own government. She is mad. 
This was at 359K at 5am. At 6.30am it has reached 388K as people have woken up.What do people want? They want to stop Brexit.How do we know? They are telling us.Join me in London for the march of your life. At High Noon at Park Lane we will march.  
I’m honestly so done. I’m here stressing about passing my alevels when my country has gone and fucked me over by forcing me to leave the EU. This WILL affect me and I wasn’t even able to vote.There is no point just leaving now for pride. Revoke article 50 or we’re fucked #brexit 
ANY MP who thinks voting for Mrs May’s surrender Withdrawal Agreement is the way out of her gigantic & costly mess, needs to resign. It’s not a deal, no one can name one benefit for the UK. It fulfills 0% of the mandate to #Brexit. She’s negotiated BINO. #VoteNo #LetsGoWTO 
Other questions you might consider: How can we protect EU against foreign-sponsored operations like Brexit? How can I help the majority of UK citizens who now want to stay in the EU? Can I help achieve the incredible boost to the EU that stopping Brexit would represent? 
It frustrates me no end when I’m lumped I’m with statement like these: ‘we the people don’t want a second referendum’. I, as a Briton, absolutely do. 
Think of all the information that one has processed, all the decisions that you’ve taken in 3 years. To hold up a glorified opinion poll from that far back as having meaning is nonsensical. The referendum is irrelevant now. 
Two massive errors in Brexit:• Referendum before we knew what the leaving terms would be• Compounding first error by triggering Article50 before we knew what the leaving terms would beLook before you leap 
Theresa May's authority is already weakened by her failure to seal the Brexit deal. But her decision to create a dividing line between the people and parliament could be her undoing | Analysis by @janemerrick23 
Two MPs have recently made or shared the claim that all EU countries will be forced to adopt the Euro after 2020 (if they don't use it already).It's incorrect.  #Brexit #EU 
No @jeremycorbyn Our conference policy is now to campaign for a referendum and not to do a deal with the Tories.  
There is a Prime Minister (who I didn’t vote for)...trying to take us out of the EU (which I didn’t vote for)...on terms (that Parliament didn’t vote for)...claiming to be ‘on my side’.In what world does that make sense?#Brexit 
Dangerously reckless May built a wall between herself and and blamed MPs with her Trump trick. Discussing Brexit May-hem on @GMB in a mo 
We're still fighting for this Brexit. I've got to go to Brussels and get something."  
After Promising Brexit on March 29th 108 Times, May Delays Again  via @BreitbartNews 
#Brexit today- May in Brussels pleading for more time to get her deal through, after attacking the MPs she needs to vote for it- Corbyn also in Brussels, saying MPs need to work together - after walking out of a cross-party meeting last night because Chuka Umunna was there 
Labour's masterplan for avoiding No Deal, with eight days to go, is not to support a referendum or revoke but to ask the EU to rewrite the Treaties to accommodate his desire to do away with the same state aid rules that forced Apple to cough up €13bn in dodged corporation tax.  
None of the swamp are on our side! I tell you what we want ⁦@theresa_may⁩ we want you to resign! Theresa May attacks warring MPs over Brexit stalemate and tells voters ‘I’m on your side  
EU readies short Brexit delay - if May wins  parliament over  
Don't be ashamed. You were conned. Brexit is a bait-and-switch con trick. They promised one thing and delivered something completely different. 
Theresa May is heading to another EU summit, no longer as a negotiator but as a supplicant (via @bopinion) 
No BBC bias there then.  Perhaps the options to #RevokeArticle50 or hold a #FinalSay referendum just slipped your mind, or you ran out of letters in your tweet.  Something like that happened, yes?#BrexitBroadcastingCorporation#PutitToThePeople 
Letters: Bercow has shown up Brexit for the farce that it is – I’ll be marching on Saturday for a Final Say  
$1.3 trillion and 7,000 finance jobs are leaving Britain because of Brexit  
Brexit is 209 hours away. #brexit 
No we don’t want this stage of the Brexit process over and done with, we want the whole bloody absurdity over and done with #RevokeArt50 and #Resign 
Farage's March for Brexit; Sunderland to London.  77 marchers plus photographers showed up, then Farage left.  
Another dreadful speech from Theresa May. Another flip-flop. Another betrayal. Another humiliation of our great country. Delaying Brexit is treacherous when we can just Leave on WTO rules on 29th March!  
Just out of interest.... RT if you can...#brexit....should we 
*Brexit Explained by a Rabbit*  
Talking @GMB @susannareid100 @benshephard about @theresa_may blaming MPs for Brexit shambles. Err. It’s MPs she has to woo 
What a stupid statement. A good many remainers may have died too. Not to mention those crossing the fence as they now see the EU bureaucracy for the unaccountable mess it is, or those who just simply accept the result of the referendum 
GO BOYS GO = Brexit Truckers set to ‘bring the country to its knees’ by BLOCKING major transport links!  via @UnityNewsNet 
I SEE THE FAKE NEWS CHANNELS ARE IGNORING THIS NEWS - I WONDER WHY ? Toyota Producing New Hybrid Car Model in UK Despite Brexit  via @GuidoFawkes 
We need to get this over a million #RevokeA50#brexit#remain 
You do not speak for me and 48million others who didnt vote for brexit Tricktator May  .. the contempt you have shown to the queen parliament and the people of Britain is disgraceful. Stop the lies and tricks - RESIGN NOW 
"The PM's conduct puts parliament's long-term vitality in peril".Brilliant piece from @lewis_goodall who has been consistently impressive throughout this whole Brexit process.   
Only reasons to favor Brexit: Wanting to weaken the UK and the Western Alliance.  It is insanely bad idea that only an enemy could love. 
What kind of prime minister blames everyone else for every cock up she oversees? Blaiming 'parliament' is outrageous. She clearly cannot accept responsibility for anything, from hostile environment policies to the balls up that is Brexit. She's unfit to be PM 
What Referendum? Florida GOP Set to Exclude Up to 80% of Felons From Voting || via: thedailybeast  
"In a way, you could say that Brexit and my father's election are one and the same": Donald Trump Jr. weighs in on political battle over the U.K.'s looming departure from the E.U.  
#Walkaway #Brexit #JexodusFrom the Dems Anti-America and  freedom destroying agenda“We reject the hypocrisy, anti-Americanism and anti-Semitism of the rising far-left,” said PipkoElizabeth Pipko Leading The ‘Jexodus’ Movement  via @dailycaller 
Join the only Brexit movement that currently makes sense! Petition: Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU.  
I don't generally use this account to share political views, but I'll make an exception this time, as we have reached a national and parliamentary crisis. Please sign and Revoke Article 50 #brexit #Article50 
If no deal is better than a bad deal, surely no Brexit is better than a bad Brexit? #brexit 
Latest Points of Return: Powell Bends to Economic Reality, Not Markets. Plus yet more Brexit.   
Jeremy Corbyn walks out of crunch Brexit talks because Chuka Umunna was invited. Hardly leader behaviour is it?   
Sovereign wealth funds cut UK investment ahead of Brexit  
Forcing Parliament to choose between no-deal Brexit and May's deal is not the only option. What about revoking Article 50 and cancelling Brexit altogether? The only drawback is that the British Army would have to patrol the streets to maintain order and prevent civil unrest for a 
She could say:DONALD,YOUR DEAL WHICH WAS WRITTEN IN GERMANY HASN'T GOT THROUGH PARLIAMENT & NEVER WILL.THEREFORE THE UK WILL LEAVE #EU ON 29 MARCH WITHOUT A FORMAL DEAL.THIS IS IN LINE WITH OUR REFERENDUM.IF YOU WANT TO DISCUSS ANY (eg) TRADE ISSUES COME TO LONDON.  
"Trump", "Brexit" and "Florida Man" are the top-three trends right now and I'm pretty sure we're one horseman short of an apocalypse. 
5. EU Flag6. 'Bollocks to Brexit' sticker sheet7. University Diploma 8. Andrew Adonis poster and pen for the little fellow's autograph9. Super Dry hoodie10. Anna Soubry incontinence pants 
Theresa May's request to delay the U.K.’s departure from the EU will only be granted if the House of Commons passes the Brexit deal agreed between London and Brussels, European Council Donald Tusk said Wednesday  
Brexit: time to decide - even if the action has been transferred to next week, the can taking one final kicking before it comes to rest against the Brexit buffers. I wonder if Mr Tusk will make a sign for his desk saying "the can stops here"...  #Brexit.  
Tues night proved:.@theresa_may is NOT a Prime Minister..@jeremycorbyn is NOT a Leader.Both are DELUDED.Both act like DICTATORS.Both behave like STROPPY TEENAGERS.Both scored OWN GOALS.WE'VE.  HAD.  ENOUGH.#MayMustGo #CorbynMustGo#NotOnMySide#RevokeArticle50 #Brexit 
Brexit won an election  
UK PM Theresa May: "I am not prepared to delay Brexit any further than the 30th of June."  
Theresa May mandate was to sabotage the #Brexit and she succeeded in doing just that.Rothschild Goldman Sachs are pleased. #TheresaMayStatement #TheresaMayResign #TheresaMustGo 
Do you want #Brexit?If no, you don't want Brexit, then sign this petition, you lovely caring person.  
Nine days before Britain's scheduled departure from the E.U., European Council President Donald Tusk said an extension for Brexit is possible – but only if U.K. parliament members approve Theresa May's terms.  
Leader of Farage-backed Brexit Party resigns after anti-Muslim tweets are revealed where she says Islam is 'incompatible with democracy' ...  via @MailOnline 
Brexit  
Mrs May never spoke for our country Wes; claiming the marginal result of an advisory, thresholdless, referendum which was purloined through lies, cheating and law breaking, was somehow 'the will of the people' begs only one question, which people? Brexit is a crime, cui bono?  
The clue is in the word 'party'. You're not in one. You're a business set up by Gavin Shuker.Who funds you?#TIG#Brexit  
If you’re gonna call babies ugly your own looks cannot be more uncertain than the Brexit negotiations. 
UK #Brexit Vote as a whole.Leave- 17,410,742Remain- 16,141,241Didn't Vote- 12,949,258Couldn't Vote- 18,604,470Scotland voted 62% to RemainThis is just madness, there is no "will of the people". @theSNP need to #UseTheMandate for #IndyRef2 now!  
Flint still doesn’t have clean waterPuerto Rico is still in shamblesBrexit is still a disasterRussia is still targeting our electionsWhite Supremacist terrorism is still risingNew Zealand is still in mourningAnd our President is...attacking dead American war heroes. 
More lies!! Professor James Muir calling out Kenney for his lies on a potential equalization referendum.  
I went to work happy that i had coronation street recorded. I came home to find that Teresa May's meaningless speach had completely fecked up the sequencing. Enough is enough of this Brexit bullschit ! I want a boder poll on irish unity and i want corrie back to normal, NOW! 
This. Trending: Brexit, Trump, Boeing 737s, celebrity births and....Trudeau hiding a bagel. I can’t, Canada. #CDNPoli 
So, just to confirm, your previous statement, 'people come up to me on the tube' was another one of your exaggerations; you're now claiming it was just one person, who, for some as yet unclear reason, gave you his card? When you're in a hole Owen....... 
The most important thing about May's speech is that she is saying to the people - "It's Parliament's fault -  I'm on your side - I want Brexit as much as you but..." History tells us that the first thing a populist does is turn the people against their own government. She is mad. 
James Muir taking Kenney to school: "The referendum would have no legal effect and his reference to the Quebec referendum either suggests he doesn’t understand constitutional law or he’s using it to essentially lie to people,” said Muir”   
Ohhh Hillary???#MAGA#WWG1WGA #Brexit #TWGRPS #PatriotsUnited #Tbt #WeAreTheNewsNow @realDonaldTrump #WednesdayWisdom 
Then there were over 4,500,000 EU residents here and UK residents in other EU countries who were denied a vote. More than 54% of UK are now remainers while the leavers can't agree on WHAT they want! Brexit as promised was never deliverable. Time to -  
The year is 2046 and the Fed is being patient with rate hikes, the US is being patient with China, Great Britain is being patient with BREXIT and the $SPX is being patient with breaking 2850 
The world needs less Hold The Line For Brexit, more Shadow and Shepherdess.  
Did Chuka actually say that:‘Jeremy will have to explain his actions?’ Has this guy learnt nothing about the person who was his party leader for a few years?Jeremy doesn’t explain himself to anyone undeserving of his respect.He never will. #Brexit #VoteLabour #JC4PM 
Love @SuellaBraverman  Hoping all ERG members will stand firm Suella! Thank you for all your hard work & support for a true Brexit!  
The scale of this natural disaster and the humanitarian crisis unfolding makes the time and £4bn + squandered on Brexit feel dreadfully self indulgent.Why are we doing this to ourselves instead of doing something useful in the world? 
I haven't read the news recently so I'll assume that #brexit thing worked out okay and everyone's happy. 
UK PM Theresa May: "Some have suggested holding a second referendum. I don't believe that is what you want, and it is not what I want. We asked you the question already, and you gave us your answer. Now, you want us to get on with it. And that is what I am determined to do."  
At this point, most of us would sit down with an axe-murderer if it meant stopping Brexit. You and Corbyn seriously need to have a word with yourselves & get your priorities straight. Petty ideological idiocy, both of you! #BrexitShambles #RevokeArticle50 
If you have ever uttered “Fuck Brexit”, then at least sign & share this: Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU. - Petitions cos it’s the very least you can do right now.  
Brexiter MPs. Voting for May's abysmal WA, because you think it's the best Brexit Parl't can deliver, won't wash with the electorate. You won't be forgiven for a fake Brexit. We didn't fold in the face of scaremongering, nor should you. 
My pharmacy is having difficulty in getting my heart medication whether this is due to Brexit or not - I am f**ked if they can’t get it in. 
Note: if you are a British citizen, even if located outside the UK like me, you are eligible to sign this should you,  by any chance,  feel that Brexit is a horrible mistake.  
Upper class snobs who never accepted defeat getting over-excited by a Government Petition which unless it polls above 17.4 million is utterly meaningless.If you want to remind all that you can't stop having temper tantrums about losing the Referendum keep up marches/petitions. 
Brexit ist mein Game of Thrones. 
i know what will help everyone put their differences aside, get round the table and try sort this whole leave/remain snafu out: chuka umunna wearing a comedy sized wire under his shirt that leads directly to every newsroom in the country primed to print 'CORBYN'S BREXIT BETRAYAL' 
Belize Referendum Q on @CIJ_ICJ:  “Do you agree that any legal claim of Guatemala against Belize relating to land and insular territories and to any maritime areas pertaining to these territories should be submitted to the Intl Court of Justice..." 
you have to be a uniquely credulous dipshit or else a complete liar to think that the farcical sideshow of TIG is anything other than a totally self-serving hindrance to any potential brexit negotiation process 
@ChukaUmunna had more loyalty for @UKLabour than useless @jeremycorbyn ever has. Corbyn voted over 600 times against Labour and challenged every Labour leader! Corbyn has been betraying Labour for over 36 years and is betraying members by supporting #Brexit. Dam him  and Dam you!  
I have every sympathy with ppl who want to make Brexit go away, but I won't be signing any petitions calling for Art 50 to be revoked. 17.4 million ppl voted leave. Unless more sign that petition it has no weight. I'd rather everyone signed a petition calling for a GE instead! 
I know this is a very privileged complaint and there's much worse going on with Brexit but... like... it's the year 2019 and no one has any idea if it's gonna be remotely possible to fly between London and Dublin next weekend. Let that sink in. That is BONKERS. 
Isn't it fun that in the year 2019, I can't attend a convention planning meeting because I've no idea if I'd be able to fly to/from Dublin on the weekend when Brexit might happen but also might not because who knows, it's not like it's ONLY EIGHT DAYS AWAY! 
ICYMI: Another day, another Leave campaigner fined for breaking law over referendum  
Can you please show the video of the other guy that Matt Frei interviewed in Brussels please? The man who blamed the EU for Brexit as the EU has changed from a trading entity to a federalist state! Many thanks! 
Three panel discussions, a radio interview, a newspaper report, a lecture, an SSA talk, ten Gurdwaras, five veggie burgers and three museums later ... THANKS CANADA !! You've been awesome. If Brexit Britain becomes too much of a sh*tshow, I know where I'll want to head ... 
Trump Jr. and John Bolton both took to British media this week to push for Brexit."The effort by presidential surrogates is aimed at amplifying the pro-Brexit message among Britons even though the United States has no say in the matter." 
I do not mind! I think brexit was a hack job, designed to prey on people's fears and manipulated the public. But what do I know...  
Sums up #Brexit beautifully  
Frankly, the majority of the ‘public’ don’t give a shit about being tired of your shenanigans, we have been clear for nigh on 3 years that we do not want your Brexit or any version of Brexit. So #StopBrexit  
Secret Civil Servant hits out at the Remain supporting bureaucrats fighting to undermine Brexit and labelling the 52 per cent as racist and uneducated, says Anonymous Civil Servant  
Dang, over 330k signatures on this petition to keep the UK in the EU.Maybe #Brexit wasn’t such a great idea after all..?  
It's clear that ALL versions of Brexit will make us worse of for decades to come. Do the right thing and sign this. Petition: Revoke Article 50 and remain in the EU.  
Tell me how a non leader of a non party is going to resolve Brexit.Leader asked to discussion with other leaders, turns up, terms of discussion changed and a non leader ex-Labour MP who consistently undermines is there.Too bloody right he walked, what sort of game is that FFS. 
So that speech in Downing Street was aimed square at the public not MPsIt was a don't blame me guv'Can't help but think there was a shade of thinking that we MIGHT be on the cusp of a general Where she says: I want to deliver Brexit but this Parliament won't let me  
An interesting poll.Looks like leavers want no deal, remainers want to revoke article 50 and/or have a referendum.No surprise there!  
How is history going to remember May and Corbyn if the UK just crashes out in a unprepared, hard Brexit?  May as the one of the worst PMs in modern history, and Corbyn as literally the only human alive incompetent enough to keep her in power? 
#Brexit Metaphor Number 8 via youmuppet_ #travel 
Watch #CBCTheNational LIVE for Wednesday, March 20, 2019 — Liberal Quits Party, Brexit Delay, New Zealand Burials  
EU readies short Brexit delay - if May wins  parliament over  
Hard-right Brexit vultures, who have the money and insider knowledge to exploit carnage, tell us that no-deal is "the legal default".NO, the default is we are a democracy with elected MPs. Tories can be pushed to a #PeoplesVoteor to Revoke Article 50 
Jeremy Corbyn has been attacked – and praised – for refusing to remain in a party leaders’ meeting on Brexit when Blairite MP Chuka Umunna turned up. Here is what happened - and what the press is not telling you   
why didn't corbyn want to be in a confidential brexit talks meeting with chuka umunna - an mp who literally formed an entire breakaway non-party specifically to undermine him as labour leader, and specifically on brexit - i wonder 
"Prime Minister Theresa May might be the last person in Britain to think her Brexit deal isn’t dead. But, evidently, she thinks it might not be a bad idea for someone to call it an ambulance." | Analysis by @lukemcgee 
Fellow citizens of the United Kingdom whether you voted leave or remain do you feel our prime minister @theresa_may represents the will of us the people that parliament is frustrating or do you feel otherwise please retweet for a wider sample #Brexit #TheresaMay 
MPs on both sides need to grow upThis isn't just Theresa May's dealIt's the only deal which has been negotiated with the EUAnd it leaves option a whole range of options for the futureIf you don't want it, then be honest about the fact that you're opposing Brexit  
Theresa May says the delay to Brexit is a matter of 'great personal regret'. Well don’t do it then, leave as promised on 29th March - “no deal is better than a bad deal”. No more excuses, just get on with it..  
Theresa May very likely to be ousted by the summer, Tory MP Robert Halfon suggests Tories warned that disunity over Brexit is hurting donations and could spark redundancies at party HQ#BrexitCrisis  
'Toxic, arrogant, disgraceful': MPs of all parties are furious after Theresa May blamed them for her own Brexit crisis #BrexitCrisis  
One thing which seems to be the case is that there are now a lot of people around who are furious over the treatment of brexit by the government. Some of these people are real headbangers - as bad as many of the MP's. It's going to hit the fan people. . . . . 
Toyota is to build its new Suzuki in Derby—despite Brexit of course! 
Brexiteers to ‘bring country to its KNEES’ by blocking M25 after Brexit delay. All so unnecessary. All the ⁦@Conservatives⁩ had to do was deliver on their own manifesto commitment - to leave the EU, deal or no deal, on 29th March.. 
This is what the weather will be like for the Put It To The People Brexit march  
Peston's followers are remainers, now let's show him what Leavers would have voted for! Pse vote and Retweet!Peston's results39%No Deal Brexit03%PM's Deal14%Another Referendum44%Revoke Article 50 
Let’s be clear here ! If #TheresaMay goes then what ? Jacob Rees Moggy gets the PM gig ... and fasts forwards to a No Deal Brexit.   
Update: Brexit.  
I still cannot fathom how anyone in Labour can think a Fantasy #Lexit doesn't= #Brexit= Tory Brexit & Respect a Ref based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesForeign InterferenceDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o Consent &The Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% Ppl 
Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn have both decided they alone speak FOR the people of the UK without speaking TO the people of the UK.A pair of narcissists dragging us over the Brexit cliff.#StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 #PutItToThePeople #PutItToThePeopleMarch 
Well I for one can't possibly begin to imagine why someone who constantly undermines the leader of the ONLY party which can possibly resist or even avoid Brexit altogether would be retweeted by Brexiteer Tories.  
You’re not on our side. You’ve shown that over and over with your policies that have plunged millions into destitution and poverty. The disabled dying in their thousands. You’re a cruel disgusting excuse of a human being. Brexit is a farce because to you it’s just a power play. 
Incredible. Such outrageous views helped turn majority in the UK off the EU.I'd hoped Brexit would be a wakeup call; a chance to save EU project before it went too far.EU and its cheerleaders in our media are still not listening, and haven't learnt why they really should be.  
Newspaper headlines: May's 'blame game' Brexit speech to nation  
I’m gonna pin this on here... watch the numbers roll - signed sealed & shared  #RevokeArticle50Now #Brexit #revoke 
Deeply depressing & having been a lone voice in the wilderness as a strong Remainer back in 2017 I feel more sorry then angry that there was never much effort to compromise over a soft Brexit or failing that putting HMG deal to a #PeoplesVote with a Remain option. Whatever next? 
We are in a through looking glass Brexit worldBrexiteer MPs are voting against deal which delivers Brexitand Labour is committed to a second referendum but votes against it in Parliament, and also says they have no issue with legally-binding bits of PM's dealIt's mad  
Corbyn would never in a million years speak with this clarity and passion on anythingBlair has it right, and can articulate #BrexitCorbyn has it badly wrong, and can barely spell Brexit  
This is the most signed petition to Parliament ever.Let's make the Revoke Article 50 petition even bigger. Worth bearing in mind that #Trump, #Brexit and the crooks who bankrolled & promoted them are intimately connected.#RevokeArticle50 
also, and i know this sounds stupid, but watching Brexit becomes a whole lot more manageable if you pretend it’s a piece of performance art. honestly, try it! 
Watching the numbers go up and up on this petition is probably the first time I’ve felt anything positive in regards to the whole Brexit shit show.  
May blames Parliament. Corbyn refuses to engage. They are both complicit in this Brexit madness. Their stubbornness, inflexibility and refusal to put the national interest first has bought us to this crazy point. Perfect storm of two party leaders incapable of leadership. 
of course @theresa_may is #NotOnMySide.it's not just the horrendous way she's handled Brexit, it's the very core of who she is; a xenophobe, a woman who hates women (she ain't no feminist bruv), and increasingly, a dictator. she is the opposite of everything good & progressive. 
#peoplesvote now argue in favour of revocation of Articke 50. the mask slips. the truth outs. They want to stop Brexit 
Imagine spending over three months holding a gun to the head of your entire country, let alone its elected representatives (despite Brexit supposedly being about reasserting Parliamentary sovereignty!), and as the clock ticks down, doubling down on threatening to pull the trigger 
Brexit: Toilet paper maker stockpiles in a case of no-deal  
At this point - it’s not a second referendum; it’s a confirmation vote. If the majority of people in the UK still want to leave the EU armed with what we know now - then leave we will. Albeit with no plan and no leadership that knows how to navigate it. 
But what about the legal position of Brexit voters like me? Is my vote meaningless and void? If A50 is revoked, such will be the rancour and hatred against the EU and politicians. Brexit voters will not take this lying down. 
Paul, I find your comment really puzzling. If Labour was really an insurrection against neo-liberalism, why has Jeremy Corbyn failed to be a staunch opponent of Brexit (a tainted project for the few at the expense of the many)? 
Imagine being so delusional that after completely screwing up a snap election, leaving yourself with a minority government, then completely screwing up the Brexit negotiations and being crushed, twice, in Parliament, you still think you're right and everyone else is wrong. 
We are in a classic 2-part EU squeeze: squeeze 1 - vote for the deal or you leave with No Deal; if that doesn’t work they’ll go into squeeze 2 - vote for the deal or you’ll get No Brexit and we’ll keep you in a very long extension. It’s all out of a playbook. Stand firm: No Deal. 
Psychologist brilliantly skewers far right hate to #Brexit ways of talking about migrant invasion, traitors etc. Oh, did I mention she's my sister? #Perth #bbcdn @perth4europe #proudbrother 
Theresa May's Downing Street statement was divisive & deliberately incendiary- We will not be bullied or threatened. I will continue to stand up for the interests of my constituents by opposing this Brexit deal & securing a second referendum on a deal with the option of Remain. 
Incredible, impassioned piece by ⁦@SkyNews⁩ political correspondent ⁦@lewis_goodall⁩, explicitly blaming ⁦@10DowningStreet⁩ for imperilling democracy in the UK. Whatever your position on Brexit, this is a sobering worrying read.  
The Brexit vote from 2016 should be nullified, just as 2016 US election should be nullified - both were manipulated by Russia 
True patriots believe we are strong enough to make our voice heard in the EU, I'm not scared of Germany or France. Brexit = Big fish small pond. 
Only 14% of voters think May’s deal delivers Brexit. Still, hundreds of Tory MPs will vote for it in the hope of getting any deal through.But it will be no quick fix. It provides for two more years of negotiations during which we will be at the EU’s mercy.And it costs £39 billion 
#Brexit isn't yet a victory for our enemies. We have the momentum and can and will win this fight if we are given enough time. 
No. What advocates of a 2nd referendum are saying is that the 45m+ voters deserve the right to decide if the Parliament that those same 45m+ voters elected only in 2017 cannot itself decide. Nothing to do with “establishment” (many of whom are Leavers anyway)  
Top story: BCC comments on latest Brexit developments , see more  
May's #Brexit statement: #TheresaMayStatement 
RT staringatclouds: AND YOU FUCKING HELPED THEM DO ITEVERY TME IT LOOKED LIKE BREXIT COULD BE STOPPED YOU WHEELED OUT ANOTHER 3 LINE FUC… 
Beside Brexit has anything at all been done in parliment at the moment. 
Wrong. It leaves open a longer extension for a substantive purpose ( referendum, g.e. renegotiation) or to revoke. 
No deal Brexit leave on the 29th March 
Is the #Brexit mess history's way of making Britain pay for the horrors of Colonialism ."The empire on which the sun never -used to- set" . 
8 days until Article 50 deadline #Article50 #Brexit ⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣇ 
RT willchamberlain: The UK government has failed to deliver the democratic mandate of BrexitIt’s time for the US Military to intervene a… 
Brexit is 215 hours away. #brexit 
Trillion pounds of assets leave London ahead of Brexit: EY#Trillion #Pounds #Assets #Leave #London #Brexit #Britain #Exit #EU #EuropeanUnion #Bank #Banking #WednesdayWisdom #WednesdayWork #WednesdayMood #JobSearchWednesday #WednesdayMotivation #HumpDay 
For those following #Brexit (or at least trying to), you may be wondering what it means for Australia @MonashPolsIR Senior Lecturer @wellings_ben says Australia 'is more than just an observer'Read more here  #MonashLens 
#Brexit: Financial services companies in Britain have announced plans to move £1 trillion ($1.3 trillion) into the European Union, according to consultancy EY. That's up from an earlier estimate of £800 billion ($1.1 trillion). - Bloomberg 
"All the Brexit fatigue is increasingly visible, and justified. We cannot give up seeking until the very last moment a positive solution — of course without opening up the withdrawal agreement." 
Hundreds of finance companies leave UK to cope with Brexit chaos   
'Vote Leave’ have just been fined £40,000 for sending out nearly 200,000 unsolicited text messages. Now it’s clear that the #EU referendum was illegitimate, given the Leave campaign’s illegalities, the fairest thing to do is call a #PeoplesVote to finally settle this #Brexit mess 
In May 2016, David Davis described the Brexit negotiations as a chessboard where the final checkmate is inevitable."My first trip would be to Berlin..."  
“I've started to get this feeling that I'm totally, totally fucked. You know? Everything's fucked.” #brexit #PMQs pic.twitter.com/f6uEwHmuE7 
Nicely sums up #Brexit  
2nd Referendum Voting Intentions:•Remain Vs May DealRemain: 61%May Deal: 39%•Remain Vs No DealRemain: 57%No Deal: 43%Via @YouGov, 14-15 March.That’s the reason neither May nor Corbyn want a 2nd referendum: they would lose, their cherished Brexit would lose.  
So Colum thinks it's "stupid" & "nuts" to call for Border Poll … back in '03 Mark Durkan (then SDLP leader) called for Border Poll in 4yrs time- that would've been a Referendum in '07 … we're now 12yrs on from that! When will it ever be the right time for the SDLP? #SpotlightnI 
Something shocked the #EU 
Bloody hell. Damian Green blaming 'the whole political class' for #brexit clusterfuck. Mate, this entire shit storm has been created by the Tory Party to pacify the Tory Party only succeeding in ripping apart the country and the Tory Party.Your party owns this.#newsnight 
Wednesday's Mail: "1,000 wasted days" (via @AllieHBNews) #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday #Brexit  
All these MPs want a 2nd Referendum because they argue that would be the democratic way to break this impasse on the EU but they don't honour democracy when it comes to their own seats!  
So on the day that Jeremy Corbyn had a meeting with other opposition leaders to try to break the Brexit impasse, this is the extent of the BBC reporting of it on BBC1 6pm and 10pm news shows. Warning: don’t blink, you might miss it..  
The collective failure of leadership over #Brexit isn’t just the short-termism of @theresa_may or @jeremycorbyn. It’s a symptom of Britain’s broken politics. Our main parties have been captured by ideologues. And too many MPs are too frightened to stand up and demand better. 
Post-referendum and pre-Brexit deadline day cover art from @NewYorker #Brexit  
After over 2 wasted and costly years of Tory Brexit chaos - our media now spend a lot of time reporting what Mrs 'Windrush's cruel, incompetent, racist and corrupt Govt - 'HOPES'.  
The UK has fallen.The Police now visit you if you express concerns about Brexit being denied.  
Whatever else Brexit is, it is not remotely the will of the people.  
Richard Dawkins on Brexit  
The stolen referendum!  
Voters had become used to being ignored by the establishment, but the 2016 referendum gave them a chance to roar. Sadly, too many on the Remain side have chosen to just carry on ignoring them.  
Everyone with half a brain knows brexit has failed and is finished. Everyone. It's enormously cruel/disappointing/corrupt that our politicians won't just tell the British people the truth 
Tony Blair was wheeled out on #newsnight to talk some sense into us all. Because you know, the man who made such colossal misjudgements on the Iraq War, PFI, tuition fees, financial regulation, council House building, & NHS privatisation, must be the voice of reason on Brexit! 
There's no appetite for Brexit anymore.#NobodyWantsBrexit#StopBrexit 
The Disaster Capitalism Club Part 2: Sir Paul Marshall and Michael Gove. The head of the second biggest hedge fund to cash in on Brexit also played a vital role in the EU referendum.  
HELLO CHILDREN! Now you listen to me you thick chav. I am the boss. Got it? I represent the Establishment. David Cameron and the Euligarchs are pulling my strings and scripting my speeches.We won't allow Brexit.We are the masters.You are slaves.Our coup is nearly done.  
Dear @theresa_may You tried your ‘meaningful’ vote in the Commons twice and lost.You then set about bullying your own backbenchers and trying a second billion pound bung for the DUP.  I’m not surprised Becow called time on your chicanery.Are you?John 
The slogan contest is over #Brexit #Raaaaaaaaab 
“We are now ten days away from the Brexit date and now to look at the EU and say, you have to come and save Brexit, is a bit strange” – Sophie In’t Veld tells #newsnight “we urgently need clarity”@SophieintVeld | @maitlis | #newsnight 
Me there now solving Brexit tonight  
Love it! Go home UK, you’re drunk! #brexit  
The real referendum  
Sickened by #Corbyn's inactivity? Feeling let down?#Brexit  
Brexit means Tightrope  
EXC: Donald Trump Jr has written an excoriating piece on Theresa May’s Brexit plan calling on her not to delay March 29 exit.Floats the idea she is sabotaging departure and says UK democracy is “all but dead”.His @Telegraph op-ed here: 
“Not THAT water; that water’s for Brexit”  
After 45 minutes discussing Brexit on #TyskySour, @PaulMasonNews explains Posadism and clarifies his views on the Worker's Bomb.Watch the full show here:  
Not all heroes wear capes  I salute John Bercow. Blowing apart the will of the people and doing what is right for the country. I love this man. John Bercow our saviour slaying brexit one handed   #IStandWithBercow 
How dare @jeremycorbyn start calling a General Election the real #PeoplesVote.  Move over you old commie b@stard. 
bts as different types of brexit - a thread  
“Two thirds of the MPs of the Prime Ministers own Party voted last week that we would not seek an extension past the 29th March. She has said 108 times, in the House of Commons, that we are coming out on 29th March” @PeterBoneUK#StandUp4Brexit 
Sigh. I know Brexiters can't count, but some centrist Remainers seem mathematically challenged too.Maths:Seats in Commons=650Tories+DUP=327Labour=257ALL OPPOSITION PARTIES TOGETHER CANNOT STOP BREXIT. Only Tory rebels or DUP can. And they refuse to. Capiche?  
Brexit: Angela Merkel vows to fight for orderly process  
Maddening to hear suggestion that SF didn't campaign in Brexit Referendum... it's lazy journalism... 1 week before the vote Martin McGuinness flew to London to speak at TUC & highlight SF's concerns surrounding the impact on the GFA & Border (if only people had heeded his words!)  
Best #brexit #broadcast #BBCNewsTen #bbcnewsnight #BBCWorld #NEWS #radio #television #scotnight @BBCNews @itvnews #JohnBercow #TuesdayMotivation #Tuesday #TuesdayThoughts #RevokeArticle50 #bbcpapers #Remain #remainernow #CommonSense #EU #EuropeanUnion 
It's sophisticated because he's offering wine #Brexit  
How about: 
memes in general aren’t great. this is tongue-in-cheek, and also for the most part, true. Corbyn is a farce, but brexit isn’t his shit pile pic.twitter.com/5ZkZV0jrBT 
“The people of Britain have voted, when is the political class going to give effect to that vote?”Q: Do you think a trade deal is still in the offing between the US & UK?A: We are ready to go; we can do these deals quickly. We want to partner with a newly independent Britain. 
#brexit simplified  
The front page of tomorrow's Daily Telegraph 'This used to be the Cabinet that would deliver Brexit... now it's not' #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Shame Corbyn always wanted Brexit ... click pic for his track record  
Cracking day in A&E with the human money box  Good news it was 2 euro coin... Voting with his actions! #jani #brexit  
I have 0 clue about anything political but this helps #brexit #brexitfordummies 
BBC staff room notice#bbcbias #toryshills #Brexit  
#Brexit explained #BrexitForDummies 
Don’t worry! The cavalry is on its way to save the Brexit day! #MarchToLeave Day4 
Donald Trump Jr. has an op-ed in Britain's The Telegraph in which he argues that the Brexit process should've been fast and easy but became a mess because "Mrs May ignored advice from my father."  
This is unacceptable ! Crabs , lobsters and other decapod crustaceans could be omitted from critical animal welfare legislation after Brexit . Tell your MP you want crabs and lobsters included . @crab_welfare .   Please RT . 
Want to know what your future holds after Brexit ? Date for the diary !! One of Devon's biggest psychic fairs with alternative treatments - workshops - retailing -food for the soul … 
I’d rather the Government was to work harder on mental health than this shambolic Brexit deal no one gives a fuck about. 
Hiding behind a parliamentary vote of just 4 to overrule 17.4 million as justification for an extension is at best deceitful but a deliberate attempt to mislead the electorate and undermine Brexit. 
Brexit  
Fair play to ITV for giving it some decent coverage, albeit on a tweet and not on air: Corbyn on recent Brexit developments and says if the government doesn't 'get a majority for its way then it is 'time for a general election' … 
What ever your thoughts/beliefs this is the best analogy I’ve seen ... either way we are fucked #Brexit pic.twitter.com/Kcy9UgzyOt 
. @andrealeadsom @LiamFox and Grayling threatened @theresa_maythat they would consider quitting if a long #brexit delay - and the downside is....? 
How about some Irish Brack-stop? 
This is truly brilliant #Brexit  
We've heard some bollocks spoken about the EU and our position in it, but this is in another league. From 2015, here's Paterson telling viewers of the formation of a new EU nation, that we won't be part of, how good WTO is and how only a madman would leave the 'market'. 1/2 
Thank you for that Piet. We can only hope here in Britain that we get an A50 extension very soon indeed. Most people in Britain hate Brexit and want it to stop. We have the most reckless Tory government in power currently, that does not represent us 
The strongest argument against Brexit has proved to be Brexit. 
Time to retweet that pie chart that some find offensive - ! The Result of the EU Referendum  
It seems that some dont like to be reminded of the result of the EU Referendum - (bearing in mind 4 million of the most affected did not get a vote - or anyone now aged 20.5 & under) but lets retweet it to remind everyone out there -  
Gove central part of the Brexit Bullshit Factory- my toon pic.twitter.com/RuxufQBrKf 
Kay Burley is either ignorant, devious, or both.She's spreading major porkies on an international TV news network. #indyref2 #brexit #DissolveTheUnion 
Anna Soubry, Is there any Brexit you’d accept? ‘No!’ #guardianlive 
Good news and bad news:Saturday's huge London protest demanding a Brexit vote could be the biggest in British historyBut then we might just be in the 'biggest crisis since the Second World War'#PeoplesVote #PeopleVoteMarch #PutItToThePeople #StopBrexit 
High noon for Brexit.March 23rd. London. Park Lane.One million people.This could be the biggest march in Britain ever. Be there. Be part of history. I want to Stop Brexit. Do you?#PutItToThePeople 
Wheels up soon to the UK and Ireland to discuss Brexit and its implications for the United States with local leaders. What is Brexit and why should Americans care about it? Let me break it down.  
Important information for Cicero residents!!!Listed are the 3 referendum that will be on your April 2nd ballot.  
Cheeky Prosecco win at @shoutcomms Big Talk tonight. Chat wasn’t bad either! #broadcastPR #brexit  
It is being reported that Theresa May will hold her Meaningful Vote 3 on her Brexit deal on the 28th of March - one day before Brexit. This is disgraceful brinkmanship. MPs shouldn’t have to put up with this crap any more. There should be a cross party motion of no confidence. 
As per last time.  Getting ready for Saturday. 
waiting for brexit....  
New:Steve Barclay has written to Cabinet announcing Operation Yellowhammer - worst case planning for no deal - will be implemented on *Monday*In event A50 extension not agreed over weekend Op Yellowhammer  command and control will be 'enacted fully' 
9 sleeps to Brexit & 3 sleeps to when I pick up my New2Me Car  
If MV3 happens next week a confirmatory referendum will have to be bolted to it.Get ready for action, we have European Elections and a referendum coming up. Lots of campaigning to do!  #Bercowbombshell 
Shit just got real #brexit pic.twitter.com/wdVAELadoj 
Best Brexit analogy yet  
Void Voices is a lot of things, one of which is a howl of protest at the disastrous absurdity of #Brexit and the self-serving fuckers who are trying to inflict it on us. @H_G_Press pic.twitter.com/s6Apa1VzYT 
When the #CarryOn team try to go Continental, will it all end up in an embarrassing withdrawal?(No, *you* spent too long thinking about how you'd cast this movie).#Brexit  
“The argument for a People’s Vote is one that around two thirds of Remain voters are willing to buy into, but Leave voters remain unpersuaded” Sir John Curtice#StandUp4Brexit 
Brexit shambles and Scotland's voice has been totally ignored.Well,we have had enough!Highlanders,organise and get marching.Don't sit back,stand up and & March with us Saturday 23rd  Scotland stands strong with Europe. Solidarity with ALL our citizens.Please RT#ScotlandCan 
Add bizarre colonial shit to the list. Im begging the PM of to use his role as privy councilor to fuck over the UK during Brexit. pic.twitter.com/MT9X7iQKWw 
Flight delayed in #Lisbon? Just negotiate your way into the cockpit and share your chocolate with the Welsh pilot of course. When you think about it, I should be handling Brexit really. ;) #TravelTuesday #flying pic.twitter.com/WgeVqW5cw3 
Today the #MarchToLeave went from Ripon to Knaresborough. We continue to march for a real Brexit!  
After the complacency we felt with Hillary Clinton and the EU referendum, I’m very much adopting a Bird Box approach to any polls that put Labour in the lead and/or Remain winning a second referendum  
Marko Arnautovic: "I don't know anything about Brexit. But neither do the English."   
When I gave advice to the Speaker Rt Hon John Bercow, I was only joking. Didn't think he'd do it. Brexit means Shat App Bastard. ORDER ORDER. #IStandWithBercow pic.twitter.com/QegB4VNanp 
Dominic Grieve & Nicky Morgan  collectively voted to destroy our public services & force millions into a life of poverty. But thanks to their 'sensible' Brexit views, our media can ignore all the nasty stuff to allow them to portray themselves as human. 
It all makes sense! #brexit  
The people of Britain have voted, when is the political class going to give effect to that vote" - US national security adviser @AmbJohnBolton tells Sky News that the White House is "ready to go" on a trade deal with the UK post-#Brexit.Read more here:  
German, French, Italian, Austrian TV News treating Brexit as a British problem. Little regret. No fear. A lot of contempt and references to Monty Python.The British still haven't realised that almost all bridges have been burned and they face crossing a last one as it crumbles 
Breaking News...Prime Minister just realised that Parliament had become a laughing stock...#Brexit #BrexitShambles pic.twitter.com/BrgAXUpqDf 
This is the issue. There's never been a majority for any Brexit: Leave means Leave Without A DealLeave means EFTALeave means Leave with May's DealLeave means Remain I Got It WrongWe need a People's Vote to sort it: Remain v a clear, deliverable Leave 
France ready to veto any meaningless Brexit delay: Elysee official  
Watching the sad fuckers on TV look like a bunch of cunts on the #gammonballrun2019 while I enjoy a few barrels of beer with their £50 from the comfort of my own home. @Nigel_Farage #LeaveMeansLeaveTheMarch pic.twitter.com/wqrA3i16pK 
I am depressed by the smear politics of The Independent Group.also they have no mandate & should hold by-elections. 
The British police force is a joke! Here you see the Police in Britain visiting a British citizen posting on social media "If #Brexit would be stopped there would be a civil war" this is how far the UK #Thoughtpolice are going... 
And 'currently turning from a Haiku into a Greek epic tragedy'...  #BrexitShambles #Brexit  
Tomorrow's @Independent cartoon... #TheresaMay #Bercow  #1604 #Bercowbombshell #GunpowderPlot #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
A brexit supporting MP said: “I believe in brexit but I now wish remain had won. This is such a hassle. We could be talking about other things” 
3/ Placard for today: "When there is #Brexit there is mayhem #WithdrawArticle50"  #Brexut doesn't work! #StopBrexit #EUsupergirl 
We all know that #Brexit is no longer the "Will of the People" (whatever that means).#Article50 can be revoked right up until the day before #Brexit is due in 10 days time. Let's send Parliament a message to #RevokeArticle50 & #StopBrexit#FBPE #FPHD 
Theresa is appealing to The Scots to save her brexit deal...that’ll be the same Scots she has mocked, ignored, lied to...the arrogance of her knows no bounds...she can Dance her way back to Westminster  
Revoke A50.Start again with a fresh referendum that requires a prescribed majority if the UK is to leave. If the people still want to go, then work out the terms of leaving and get it passed by parliament.Then trigger A50 again. 
Fascinating insight from @DonaldJTrumpJr on the Brexit debate: "What we’re seeing now in Washington, London and Brussels is the desperate, last-gasp attempt by those previously in power to cling on to what was once theirs in the face of an overwhelming mandate for change."  
If politicians are unable to deliver Brexit, it doesn't mean that Brexit is impossible - it isn't - but rather that those politicians lack the will to deliver it.  
THERE IS ONLY ONE WAY OF STOPPING BREXIT!!!!MAKE SURE YOU TURN UP FOR THE #PeoplesMarch THIS SATURDAY.IF WE GET OVER ONE MILLION IT MIGHT JUST BE ENOUGH FOR THE GOVERNMENT TO  GIVE UP ON BREXIT...WE NEED THE HUGE NUMBER WE REALLY DO... 
Tonight @BBCNews tried to scapegoat the Speaker for the failure of the @BBC's pet brexit project. We're not going to forget the @BBC's betrayal of our country. 
The Westminster leader of @Plaid_Cymru has expressed “disappointment” following a meeting with Jeremy Corbyn on a “Peoples Vote” on Brexit. @LSRPlaid  told @bbc5live: “We were there to talk about a Peoples Vote… what Jeremy Corbyn wanted to talk about was his vision of Brexit.” 
The Brexit mess won't solve itself, Parliament must come to a majority view bhind a proposition. Let's hold indicative votes to whittle down the options, and get some much needed clarity. #ChangePolitics 
I want @jeremycorbyn's brexit plan. What say you? 
It’s really funny how in like 20 years kids are gonna have to learn about Brexit and have it possibly come up in exams when we’re living it and half of us don’t even understand it ourselves 
Nigel Farage's Brexit Betrayal March hires 200 Polish walkers after finding Brits are not willing to do the job -  via @newsthump #BrexitBetrayal 
“Last week, eight Cabinet Ministers and two thirds of the whip’s office, on a free vote, went through the Commons against the idea of an extension and that was only for 3 months. The idea of a two year extension would be absolutely catastrophic” @BillCashMP#StandUp4Brexit 
When did I do that ? I am drawing attention to the nonsense you lot talk and the false claims you make for your support. Like the false claims you made in the referendum. Plenty of them. 
Huge London Brexit vote protest set to be 'BIGGEST' in history /#Brexit #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
“On whose authority is the PM asking for a delay? In the free votes last week an overwhelming majority of Tory MPs voted for no extension. & we know from our National Convention last month, the Voluntary Party voted by 80% to leave on 29th March with or without a deal” @ABridgen 
Here are experts from the Law Society of Scotland telling Tory MP John Lamont that the Scottish Government already has the power to keep making farm support payments after Brexit. I hear tell that Tories have been telling Scottish farmers the opposite. #Shameless 
I have more to add on this about how this donor sent his lawyers to try and discredit me through Matthew Elliot. It’ll be available on my column for the @BylineTimes: Race & Rebellion. I gotta go do work now but you can support me here: 
"I am going to fight for an orderly Brexit."#UK leaving the #EU was another topic German Chancellor Angela #Merkel discussed at the @glob_solutions summit today. 
Hoot for Brexit! The #MarchToLeave is receiving immense support from passers by. 
The @BBC has been seen to be one of the handmaidens of #Brexit. Every pointless Vox Pop goes to a Leave area & mainly interviews staunch Leave voters. @BBCNews never reports that a 3 figure number of constituencies have now flipped to #Remain I'm now appalled by BBC News. 
Brian is relaxing on the balcony, he can't handle any more Brexit nonsense.  
Excellent by ⁦@DonaldJTrumpJr⁩: “Theresa May should have taken my father's advice on Brexit”  
Once again the commentators & reporters on TV and radio are talking about “hardline” Brexit MPs who won’t “compromise”.The hardliners are the Remain MPs who refuse to respect the EU referendum result. The Brexit MPs are simply standing by their own party’s manifestos. Sigh. 
Organisations that I myself have gone after, yet are still platformed by organisations like the BBC and Sky News despite their funding being totally unknown or obscure. 
Today, #MarchToLeave went to Knaresborough, Harrogate. The area has:23 EU doctors21 EU nurses + 105 other EU NHS staffEU citizens staffed 17 hospital bedsAlso, EU invests:£14m in farming£14m in young people£1.6m in jobs and research  
Hearing rumours that the #marchtoleave has given up for the day in #Knaresborough, 10 miles short of their destination of #Wetherby. Now their “battle bus” has broken down so they are stranded - in limbo. #Brexit in a nutshell!  
Michel Barnier: "Everyone should now finalise all preparations for a no-deal scenario"EU's chief #Brexit negotiator says leaders are ready to consider a delay to Brexit, but MPs "voting against no-deal does not prevent it happening" 
Big message of @MichelBarnier is the EU is ready for no deal Brexit. Big message of @theresa_may is UK is not ready for no deal. So who has the power in these last minute talks between UK and EU? 
‘@DonaldJTrumpJr: “March 29 is supposed to be the British people’s Independence Day. “But because the elites control London from Brussels, the will of the people is likely to be ignored.” 
Article 50 extension latest:Germany: We're "really exhausted", this is "not just a game", we need "precise proposals”France: We need "something new", can't be extension to "remain in same deadlock”Barnier: "Why do you want an extension? What for?" 
Finally I understand #Brexit  
Woooooo!!! (Not the brexit bit - but my biscuits are on the front cover!!)   
It beggars belief that Ministers in the government voted last week against an extension of Article 50, knowing full well a no deal Brexit would put people with epilepsy and other illnesses requiring daily medication at risk. It is shameful!  
“Labour must stop prevaricating, start fulfilling their duty as official opposition & prioritise a second EU referendum, with the option to Remain, before it is too late”SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP after meeting Jeremy Corbyn on the way forward from the Brexit crisis pic.twitter.com/eRzSuYnj0t 
#Brexit shopping done. Just have to strap myself in and kiss my arse goodbye. @Coldwar_Steve 
Through gritted teeth and not without a great deal of anguish, I have come to the view that the alternative to the PMs turgid deal is no Brexit. Here is the letter I and 49 other Conservative Brexiteers had published in the Telegraph this morning.  
Don't know who did this, but it is superb!#IStandWithBercow #ErskineMay #MemeEnvy 
sounds about right 
Coming home, I’ve caught up with 2 favourite magazines. Prospect says Brexit has broken the BBC (not true, but disturbing) & explains how France no longer envies British  stability.  NY Review of Books calls UK ‘a backward & dilapidated province’. What have we done to ourselves? 
Hello @theresa_may . I’m one of many Maidenhead constituents who will be at the #PeoplesVoteMarch on Saturday. I won’t be voting Conservative again.In case you’ve forgotten, Maidenhead is a Remain constituency. Your QC admits that the referendum was unsound; another is needed 
Day 4 of the #MarchToLeave has finished for today in Knaresborough. The Westminster establishment are betraying Brexit, that's why we are marching back!  
 1 million more children growing up in poverty than in 2010. Among the highest income inequality in Europe. 6 million UK jobs pay below the “real" living wage. UK manufacturing is down 600,000 jobs in a decade.  Brexit will make it all worse.  
this is an A+ specification in a Brexit job description  
Defra advertising (yes, now) for staff to work on Brexit might include my favourite euphemism yet  
#BrexitShambles #Brexit Some BREXIT cartoons, enjoy!  
Opinion: As a law professor, I’m convinced John Bercow’s Brexit decision is correct  
The first referendum was a criminal referendum, won by criminals for criminals. Time to have a referendum with new laws and regulations that protect British democracy from the likes of Boris Johnson, Vote Leave & Nigel ‘Faux’ Farage. 
If Theresa May gave a rat's arse about what the British people think of her Brexit deal, she would put it to them in a #PeoplesVote. 
"We're at five to 12. As things stand we're supposed to be leaving Europe next week. If now is not the time, I'm not sure whenever it will be"SNP's Ian Blackford urges Labour's Jeremy Corbyn to back a second referendum on #Brexit, now 
As @gdgunster writes in @DailyCaller, a second referendum would be painful for the British electorate and there is no appetite for it.  
Chair of the Right to Vote campaign @DrPhillipLeeMP tells @Sarah_Montague that a second referendum “isn’t as far away as people think”  #bbcwato #Brexit. 
Nearly half of the #British public is confident that the #UK will ultimately thrive if it leaves the #EU without a deal, according to a new poll. #business4brexit #brexit 
Pro-#Brexit group Labour Leave fined £9,000 over referendum donation errors  
"The statute law is there that we're leaving on the 29th March"Conservative MP Andrew Bridgen says it's the PM's choice whether to request a delay to #Brexit - irrespective of what MPs have voted for 
#NHS Chief Exec - "We've seen a five-fold increase in the number of hard to get drugs, I don't believe that is not a direct link to #Brexit"  
The press has got to stop portraying Theresa May's stubbornness as if it were a virtue when it's just  a symptom of her arrogance, narcissism  and ineptness. #Brexit 
#Bercow asking the MP’s to hurry up as there is an #Arsenal match on the TV soon .  #brexit  
“I received emails constantly from members & constituents telling me how unhappy and angry they were with the way the Govt is dealing with Brexit. I implore MPs to vote Theresa May's deal down again, so that we can leave the EU on 29th March to trade on WTO rules” @paulettefurse 
We’re not gonna Brexit. Just suck it up and #RevokeArticle50 pic.twitter.com/o8Hq6CvtfR 
FOUR DAYS TO GOThis is your march. Let's make it loud  #PutItToThePeople 
But maybe this is why I *really* like Mr. Bercow, @HoC_Speaker_MP... #Brexit needs some Order!!!  
Valuable exchange of views with @simoncoveney on #Brexit. On behalf of the @Europarl_EN, I reiterated our solidarity with the people of Ireland at this time of uncertainty. 
@theresa_may you know what is damaging to democracy? The persistent lie that an advisory referendum, fought and won on proven lies and illegality is in any way democratic. Repeating a lie doesn’t turn into the truth. #RevokeArticle50 
I asked you whether you could be sure that 17.4 million people all voted for the most extreme version of Brexit (No Deal) and you refused to answer.Therefore you can't say people prefer No Deal to simply not doing Brexit at all. 
Civil servant at heart of Brexit process: ‘Far from “No-Deal” being a disaster or “cliff-edge”, a deal based on WTO rules looks more and more like the best deal on offer. MPs and public have been deliberately kept in the dark; country is well prepared’. 
The Information Commissioner's Office has fined 'Vote Leave' £40,000 after an investigation found it sent more than 196,000 text messages promoting the aims of the campaign ahead of the 2016 EU referendum and was unable to provide evidence recipients had given their consent 
Exc: 60% of People Think BBC is Biased Against Brexit  
Yet more law breaking by Vote Leave. Now fined a further £40,000. How much more is still to emerge? What a sewer that referendum was!  
Dear Lexiters,This is how the EU works. Every 5 years it holds elections. Candidates stand, and the head candidate of each group is their a candidate for Commission President. This is the Socialist group's head candidate. If you want a more social EU, you vote for him. Simples. 
Reasons to go on Saturday’s #PutItToThePeopleMarch: Brexit will affect everything. March for what matters to you  
Peoplewatching outside Parliament today. All the black cabs and white vans are honking at the Brexiteers, all the cyclists and scooter-drivers are honking at the Remainers. The #Brexit divide writ large! pic.twitter.com/PH2BkKgahP 
Vote Leave fined £40,000 for sending spam texts before #Brexit referendum  
The British public are crying out for an investigation into corrupt Referendum.  
Brexit shd’ve been an opportunity for many things: to hold our institutions to account, decentralise power, & more There’s still opportunity, and need, to break down old barriers & fight against the injustices of technocracyMy thoughts for ⁦@CapX: 
It’s radio silence today from our incompetent U.K. Govt so far as MPs are concerned but it seems journos are being briefed. Interesting thread below #Brexit #ConstitutionalCrisis 
Brexit Quiz.What language was Mrs May's Withdrawal Agreement originally drafted in?a. Germanb. Germanc. German 
Theresa May admits country is 'in crisis' with 10 days to avert no-deal Brexit  
Even the suggestion of a TWO YEAR Brexit delay shows how some in Westminster have completely lost the plot.  
The case for a World Trade Brexit on 29th March is now stronger than ever. Our @StevenEdginton on how MPs are ignoring the public who now demand we leave on No Deal according to new ComRes polling. 
Brexit is 250 hours away. #brexit 
The government has exploited a loophole in the law that means an advisory referendum cannot be declared void because of electoral crime. Exploiting loopholes is the behaviour of criminals & con-tricksters. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
PM now saying Scotland needs to come together to get her deal done.she knows that without Scotland`s huge resources brexit and in fact England is screwed.It`s too late though,,the damage is done.YOU did the damage. 
3. Leadsom said to 'tear into' colleauges, saying 'this is now a Remain Cabinet, not a Brexit Cabinet' - and argued for leaving without a final deal at end of June 
Superb explanation by @LauraPidcockMP of why No Deal had to come off the table... No deal just removes all frameworks for collab - business & otherwise. To leave that hanging would be irresponsible.[I’m also fully with all the replies saying all Brexit deals are bad.]  
I see no distinction between Brexit and the rise of the far right. Lexiters can argue otherwise until blue in the face, but the fact remains it is largely an English nationalist project, backed by dodgy money, cheerled by criminal types, and enabled by a failed political class. 
"Honest commentators don’t make predictions anymore, but stare at the wreckage with slack-jawed disbelief."@NickCohen4 on the bleakness of Brexit:  
If only the New Yorker were right that Britain is wracked by “widespread fears” of foreign interference in Brexit, and investigating urgently. There have been tireless voices but response of most of establishment has been resounding indifference  
The idea that Brexit is only now a constitutional crisis & only created by Bercow is absurd. Looked at from Scotland, there's been a serious, multi-faceted constitutional crisis ever since 23 June 2016   
#Brexit is starting to bite at my local supermarket, with only 10 days to go.  
those bloody Remainers, using the LAW!! if only the referendum hadn't been FULL-ON ILLEGAL and Vote Leave hadn't BROKEN THE LAW, they'd never have been able to use the law to block Brexit!! you couldn't write a more perfect & painful parody.  
Bloke outside Parliament with a WTO Brexit sign is gonna go nuts when he learns it’s an unelected supranational body undermining Parliamentary sovereignty that’s run abroad and far less democratic than the EU 
A spokesperson for the Prime Minister just admitted the country is in crisis. A crisis entirely caused by #Brexit.The only way out is a #PeoplesVote, with the country given the chance to #Remain.We can only deliver it with #Labour votes. Join us. 
Between 1394 and 1535 seven Speakers in Parliament were executed by beheading. Some in Theresa May’s government who joke that such a fate is too generous for John Bercow 
Germany's Merkel ready to fight to last minute for orderly Brexit  
JUST IN: Vote Leave campaign group fined £40,000 for sending out thousands of unsolicited text messages in the run-up to the 2016 referendum  
If the Brexit has demonstrated something, then it is how the sovereignty of a vulnerable country like Ireland is protected by the solidarity of the other EU states. 
Global Britain, sovereignty and the Irish border as perceived in the international comment pieces on Brexit: 1. Journalist and author Carolin Emcke writes in @SZ:  
Does @jvn know something we don't about the border arrangements post-Brexit  
Thread. (What does "Brexit" mean, anyway?)  
For information on #Brexit training programmes, including on customs and supply chain, check  for more information. #BrexitReady@EnterInnov @Entirl 
Brexit is destroying this county @theresa_may. Stop Brexit now. It is NOT the will of the people and it is certainly not democracy in action.  
No one voted for no deal - it wasn't even backed positively as an option during the referendum by Leave or remain. I originally voted leave and have felt utterly lied to - I just want to #remain now. I hate no deal. #NoToNoDeal 
twitter account that's nothing but an image of two kids in the back of a car asking 'is it brexit yet?' every day 
She should have shared her BREXIT secrets much earlier with Parliament...her arrogance is unbelievable. 
Constitutional crisis??  No. Don't think so. Logjam - yes. Deeply divided - of course. But the simple truth is the speaker is bound by the majority of the house. Brexit is a political crisis.  
NEW #TouchlineFracas !! 201 - MEEDS VS BREXIT SHAUNft.@mrmeeds@shaunypizzle@svndombele@lewbob91APPLE  - SPOTIFY - SUPPORT -            SUBSCRIBE - USE - #TouchlineFracas 
I still can’t get over the blatant hypocrisy of the DUP when they say there must be “no difference between NI and the rest of UK” when it comes to any Brexit-related issues, but when it comes to abortion rights or same-sex marriage they’re quite happy to be chalk to GB’s cheese. 
Saturday will be our opportunity to show the strength of feeling not only against the madness of #Brexit but the idiot politicians who took us on this journey of self harm. I hope this ensures Britain stays in the EU, more committed with a population more politically engaged.  
Meeting this morning with @DLidington to discuss the latest #Brexit developments.  
The great English pride doing what we do best #chelseafc #racist #racism #Thuglife #Violence #Brexit  
"Hannan Started It And Then Too Many People Joined In: A Brexit Memoir" 
Theresa May to ask for one year Brexit delay after smug Speaker John Bercow torpedoes third vote on EU deal 
A French minister says #Brexit needs some humor — so she named her cat Brexit  
Good work. Hold strong against this rotten deal.In fact, there’s no Brexit deal that should be passed by the House without confirmation by the public. 
10 days to Brexit: what happens if the UK does not leave on 29 March? Once Brexit is delayed, anything is possible.Only 10 days till we don't leave. 
First toilet paper. Now Swiss watches are being stockpiled for Brexit  
GAC:Will we make marriage btw.climate change&industrial policy happy&competitive?Balance&flexibility=key.Also need 2improve convergence of direct payments,imbalances&unfair compet.of farmers.Single market, #Brexit on our menu too.Disinformation=real threat 2democracy,institutions  
Did you know the CLA has a #blog page populated with articles covering everything from mental health to Brexit, #BPS, #sustainability and more? Click here to read all our blog posts in one place. Make sure to check back each week to find more. #Brexit #Farming #Landowners #Rural 
WATCH: How did you vote? Part III - #Gwinnett County MARTA expansion referendum -  #BestFriendPark 
Brexit LIVE: Downing Street concedes UK now in 'crisis' as PM prepares to ask EU leaders for delay Brexit  
Exactly. The BBC coverage, toadying to this decrepit government becomes more absurd by the day.Doorstepping Bercow this morning on his way to work asking inane questions to the effect of  "why is he dredging up 'ancient' rules 'to thwart Brexit?"Give me strength. 
We voted to leave the #EUWe didn't vote for a #Brexit betrayalPlease retweet if you believe in #Brexit and back Democracy.#politics#politicslive#TheresaMay#ConservativeParty#StandUp4Brexit#Bercow 
My interview with @BloombergTV at the #GlobalSolutions Summit on #Brexit #EU’s economy and #Italy 
"Please can we extend Brexit as our bungs to a minority party and some MPs and other intended corruption has been thwarted by our own parliament's process and we need a bit longer to in-fight and abuse other EU (and indeed UK) nations. Cheers. 
Brexit's supporters in Parliament voted twice to reject Theresa May's negotiated deals to leave the EU—meaning their distrust of Europe might actually stop Brexit from happening. @YasmeenSerhan reports: 
Henry VIII abandoned rubbish negotiations, we should do the same! (my speech in the EU parliament during Brexit debate)  
BREAKING Downing Street admits Britain is in 'CRISIS' after Brexit deal scuppered 
If we are sold down the river by the govt ,  ignoring their own manifesto and ignoring 17.4 million result in referendum,  it will cause the degree of anger in this country at present, to erupt.  People will be injured or worse.  Does she care ?  Doubtful !  
A majority of Brits think that our politicians want to delay Brexit to overturn it.  Sun Comres poll released 190319Please RT 
2nd Referendum Voting Intentions:Remain Vs Govt. DealRemain: 61%Govt. Deal: 39%Remain Vs No DealRemain: 57%No Deal: 43%Via @YouGov, 14-15 March. 
A new leader won't help the Tories if they don't deliver a clean Brexit."Voters will turn on the Tories if Brexit fails... the party needs a new leader, fast"  
May can cancel the whole farce and tell the Brextremists they can have another referendum sometime in the future IF they ever come up with a plan that doesn’t involve unicorns, trade deals with remote, uninhabited islands, and doesn’t involve NI, Scotland or Wales! 
NI fishermen say it's ironic the Government is opposed to a hard border after Brexit, but has "imposed a hard sea border" due to a legal anomaly  
There’s nowhere better to be ten days before the Brexit deadline, than in a northern English town making theatre about breaking bread with and by migrants and refugees.  
Pro-#Brexit activist James Goddard denies harassing MP Anna Soubry  
How many years has she had to help steer brexit? All she has left is blaming everyone else. 
Thanks to DUP MP @CStalfordMLA for meeting with @Stephen_Eliz and myself today to catch up on Brexit and NI politics  
#BREXIT:  BBC POLITICAL EDITOR SAYS CABINET SOURCES SAY PM IS WRITING LETTER TO EU TODAY ASKING FOR EXTENSION  BUT THERE IS FRUSTRATION THAT SHE IS GOING TO ASK FOR END DATE OF JUNE 30TH, WITH PROVISO OF DELAY OF UP TO 2 YEARS 
Sam Legare & Makoma Makgopa from @DAFF_ZA explain details of SACU+M-UK roll-over trade agreement during technical session of this morning’s #brexit readiness seminar @Wesgro. With him, Niki Kruger, Chief Trade Negotiator at dti, Alex Lau, UK Trade Policy Adviser & @DenanKuni1. 
Join me, @tvkev Harry @Redknapp @MBrundleF1 comic @stevefurst and Rochdale abuse whistleblower @MaggieOliverUK as we talkd #brexit, #viagogo rip off, cannabis tourism, water shortages and fake news  at 1pm RT Puhleeeze 
Philip Hammond's claim of economic boost if MPs pass Brexit deal rejected by his own watchdog  
Their stealing are brexit 
Taking back control lads. You lost. Brexit is over. You get Zippo. You should have stepped up instead of running away when you won.  
The "stab in the back" theory starts here: Believe me, the Civil Service is trying to sink Brexit. I have seen it from the inside  via @Telegraph 
Thrilled to be speaking about #OurOcean at the EU Parliament today!This may be the last time an Englishman can walk through these doors...#Brexit  
If you’re interested in #Brexit and don’t follow him already, do follow @NvOndarzaThere’s no think tanker in Berlin who knows more about Brexit, and he can explain it with a calmness and level headedness 
BREAKING.. Downing Street admits Britain is in 'crisis' after Brexit deal scuppered /#EU #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Fascinating start to the day. ⁦⁦@navltd⁩ @mccarthy_ca  and ⁦@McKinsey⁩ host a bfast panel to try and make sense of #Brexit  
Incredibly accurate when it comes to the PM's #WithdrawalAgreement  #Brexit  
The DUP and the ERG now that Theresa May is delaying Brexit  
do not give in to May, if she brings the same rubbish back again, NO VOTE on it... we need to remove this control freak.... Brexit must be deferred. 
As #Brexit #uncertainty continues firms are meeting additional demand by investing less and hiring more. As a result, #pay growth has been strong and now appears to be stabilising at around 3.5% per annum - Read our latest #NIESRWage Tracker out now: 
I wonder if Theresa May might come back from the European Council summit and try to bluff MPs by not immediately disclosing how long an extension the EU agreed to? It would be weird - but Brexit creates new and unusual situations daily. 
Hi Sianna, what does this bit mean? "In case of a hard “no deal Brexit”, the national Belgian Brexit law protects the rights of beneficiaries of Belgian invalidity benefits residing in the United Kingdom till ultimately 31/12/2020." 
She organises a withdrawal agreement with brexit in name only and is confused why it isn't passed. She should have stepped down a long time ago 
Election day is here: Polls open for Gwinnett MARTA referendum  
Fred: That’s true in Fulton, Clayton and DeKalb. They also don’t realize that now if this referendum happens you will have an increase in police presence because of MARTA’s own internal police force. 
Nigel Farage’s Brexit Betrayal March hires 200 Polish walkers after finding Brits are not willing to do the job  
Hammond's claim of Brexit 'deal dividend' rejected by watchdog  via @NewsNowUK#BrexitLies #BrexitShambles #RevokeRemainRebuild #PeoplesVoteMARCH #FBPE #Sodem 
Some think if brexit is a disaster we can just rejoin the EU.I think the EU will run a bloody mile before they take the UK back.And being honest,who can blame them! 
Latest salvo in Trump v #Brexit debate: “I have no wish to diminish seriousness of criticisms against Trump or suggest he’s fit to govern. But he’ll be gone by 2020 or, if Dems mess up, by 2024. Brexit will paralyze Britain for a generation.”  
Having witnessed her behaviour over the last 3 years, nobody can be naive when it comes to Theresa May. She undemocratically tied us in to the Far Right Brexit supporting DUP, after her error of judgement in calling an election 2017, lost her party their majority. 
Surely the idea of another referendum needs a mandate tested in a GE? Nobody has a mandate to hold one in this parliament.Which party would make that a manifesto promise? Lol 
Parliament voted last year to deliver Brexit on March 29th.This is the law.At this late stage, everything else distracts from that.  
No chance, we will elect Brexit backing MEPs and the gloves will be off. 
German EU minister: expect clear & precise proposals [on] extension..it’s an extremely serious situation not just for the people in the UK but also for the people in the EU & for my government it’s the key priority to prevent a no-deal Brexit"  
Latest on our #Exports report - #Advertising growth points the way to rebuilding Brand Britain after #Brexit via @gideonspanier @EveningStandard  @The_IPA @tradegovuk @ad_association 
UK GOVERNMENT SOURCE SAYS THEORETICALLY POSSIBLE THAT WE COULD ASK FOR A LONG BREXIT EXTENSION, BUT LEAVE THE EU BEFORE THAT RUNS OUT 
Adam Schiﬀ, the Democratic chair of the House Intelligence Committee, said that there were “parallels and interconnections in abundance” between the apparent Russian eﬀorts to inﬂuence Brexit and the Russian eﬀorts to inﬂuence the 2016 U.S. election:  
Theresa May admits UK in ‘crisis’ over Brexit  
Brexit and other portmanteaux might be a scourge of our times, but still, our cockles are warmed by this from @visitportugal #brelcome pic.twitter.com/H4TCDzGWkh 
Can #Brexit still happen on 29th March?[tap to expand]  
Best Brexit analogy ever. #Brexit  
Theresa May admits UK in &apos;crisis&apos; over Brexit as she begs Brussels to postpone departure – with just 10 days left  
Merkel ready to fight to last minute for orderly Brexit  
My latest in @SurvivalEditors: How Brexit might result in a (slightly) more substantial agenda for EU external action. Somewhat proud of the fact that I got away with quoting Sir Humphrey Appleby in a serious journal... via @IISS_org #EUGlobalStrategy 
MAY: I want A50 extendedEU: What's the good reason?MAY: A50 extensionEU:  MAY: Extend it 3 MonthsEU: MAY: So 3 months then?EU: MAY: "EU AGREES 3 MONTH A50 EXTENSIONEU: We didn'tMAY: You didn't say NoEU:  Get Out you crazy bitchMAY: EU CAUSES NO DEAL BREXIT 
Why march for @peoplesvote_uk on Saturday?@mode7games makes a great sweeping case for why the industry stands against Brexit. 
Brexit pic.twitter.com/mSeuHJHXdc 
How fine are we cutting it on Brexit? Well, I popped out at lunchtime and bought some milk...  
Brexit solution is like asking for the moon- 
Look at the sign in the back & the one in the front. A picture that sums up UK Politics for you. #Brexit V #Remain  
New Blog Post! "The Fate of the Withdrawal Agreement and the Extension of Article 50" by Charlotte Sieber-Gasser from the @UniLuzern. Read the blog here:  
Imagine the frantic desperation going on behind the scenes, the deals, promises, threats, favours being called in, the private bank accounts being swollen, etc, etc, to get all member states to agree an extension of Art50? It just needs one to veto and..we're home and dry BREXIT! 
Reuters: UK PM May's spokesman says Cabinet discussed Brexit for 90 minutes No extra time and penalties, then?  
And in today's morning business news confirming £1.2 trillion already left the financial sector due to Brexit. Living in cuckoo land if people don't realise the severe economic impact this will shortly wreck @EuroMove_MK 
But I thought #Brexit was all about parliamentary sovereignty? #IStandWithBercow 
2/ now that we know what the impacts of Brexit are (terrible for jobs, manufacturing, the NHS, the music industry, science, agriculture...in fact just about everything) it is time to stand up and say that actually we got it wrong. People were lied to and there is no good brexit 
I hope you all appreciate that I am learning an entire sketch in a new fucking language for this show, and I don’t mean Brexit, though I am learning that too. Get your ticket for @GlasgowComedy ‘s satirical, bilingual, Brexit spectaculathon @ambushthesalon  pic.twitter.com/UAyathi8c9 
#Brexit Pass it on...  
Want to see a country bitterly divided? Pop down to Westminster right now. Tension is building...#Brexit #TuesdayThoughts #Westminster pic.twitter.com/jgQ6e8XkcU 
Sorry you are inept to discuss Brexit  
hello, I've been making placards. If you only go to one big march in your life, make it the #PutItToThePeople march this Saturday. Let's fight this shitty shitty Brexit.#PeoplesVote #brexit pic.twitter.com/whcPnM251L 
Oh Jacob knew exactly what those HMT reports said....unfortunately for him, we know exactly what Jacob said about them in the past!!! 
Dermot O'Leary, Chief Economist of @Goodbody_AM starting his presentation now on #Brexit and the UK economy  
So we cannot entertain the idea of a second referendum as that would be undemocratic, but it is fine for May to put her deal up over and over? #IStandWithBercow 
Busy day in Brussels continues - meeting @MichelBarnier with Tanaiste @simoncoveney to discuss latest on #Brexit ahead of Article 50 General Affairs Council later this afternoon   
Brexit news: ERG threatens to ‘finish’ Theresa May Government if she delays Brexit | UK | News |   
Only had FORTY FOUR years to come up with one workable #Brexit plan. Like a lazy procrastinating student asking for endless extensions & STILL not doing the essay.#Remain 
Theresa May, though...#Brexit  
Fall in car sales shows extent of Brexit Damage  
Meeting with Taoiseach @campaignforleo in Dublin to confirm full EU unity on #Brexit, discuss latest developments and uncertain political situation in London as well as preparedness for a no-deal brexit.  
#MarchToLeave participants stayed in ‘The Unicorn Hotel’#brexit #ComedyGold 
Shares gain as Fed looms, pound rides new Brexit twists  
Top 10 cross-border VAT issues when trading with the UK here:  #brexit  
EU expects swift info from Britain on next steps in Brexit  #topNews  
Think about the poor staff at the Royal mint.They make a 50p coin with  March 29th -Scrapped.Then 30th June -ScrappedThen another June 2022 ?#Brexit@10DowningStreet@theresa_may > 
John Bercow having a laugh over Brexit.  
It's now as clear as day, that its either a no deal Brexit on 29th March or No BREXIT at all for the UK 
Well the govt could allow brexit to happen as currently legislated. Unfortunately they don't have the balls to do that. Or the desire. 
#IStandWithBercow is trending. Your opinion of the big fella? #poll #BREXIT #Bercow #Bercowbombshell #polls 
I seriously hope Britain goes on a rampage if we're not out of Europe by march 29th.We voted for leave, that's what we expect you to deliver.What a joke of a government.#brexit #voteleave 
I'll assume your legal training didn't include constitutional law. 
@PhilipHammondUK, we know you're incompetent and corrupt. Stop doing politics.Stop #Brexit.  
Welcome to Osakwe Michael's Blog: Brexit crisis: PM May plots new course round Speak...  
Good !! Brexit is just another disastrous Tory policy and needs to be overturned along with all the others.  
At least ⁦@NathalieLoiseau⁩’s cat called #Brexit has nine lives, the British Brexit is struggling to get a third...  ⁦@JmBoutin⁩ 
With #Brexit fast approaching, what's it like to be an EU student in the UK? MMU student Rachael Enwegbara gives us her opinion More:  
Leadsom to cabinet: "This used to be the cabinet that would deliver Brexit and now from what I'm hearing it's not." 
Prof Vernon Bogdanor discussing the constitutional implications for Britain and Europe of #Brexit at a packed meeting hosted by @HJS_Org. 
Week Ahead: FOMC, (another) Brexit Vote and Key Data  
Every form of #Brexit makes us poorer, weaker and reduces our security, does it not ?? No possible deal is better than the one we have now as a leading member of The European Union, is it ?? #EUExit 
Shares gain as Fed looms, pound rides new Brexit twists  
Did you know 27.8% of eligible voters DIDN'T vote in the #Referendum.Results for #Brexit vs Remain were: 51.9% vs 48.1%:England 53.4% vs 46.6%Wales 52.5% vs 47.5%Scotland 38% vs 62% N.Ireland 44.2% vs 55.8%I wonder how the 27.8% would've voted? Would you change your vote?  
BEGGING LETTER: May To Write To Tusk Asking For Brexit Delay  
Brexit crisis: PM May changes gear, tactics  
Think we now need a moratorium on Foreign Office ministers till Brexit achieved. No point sending people abroad just to be laughed at. 
EU impatient with Brexit, but resigned to delay  via @Reuters 
Brexit barely spoke after it. Rattled the whole episode 
Brexit will bring back those empty streets and cool trucks 
Brexit date pushed back to 3019 -  via @DailySquat 
No jobs will be lost as a result of Brexit. ......  
May: To hold a second referendum would be to undermine democracy.MPs: We've voted down your deal. May: Do it again.MPs: No deal.May: AGAIN.Bercow: There's democratic precedent about this--May: WHO CARES ABOUT UNDERMINING DEMOCRACY? 
We want it back joking apart I spoke to a citroen dealer about brexit he reassured me that a 3% levee would apply on all European good with oops deal believe it or not that is what all the fuss is about so poor people non property or bond holders your safe 
Theresa May admits country is 'in crisis' with 10 days to avert no-deal Brexit - The IndependentA crisis, be it noted, entirely of her own making!#RevokeA50 
Hearing in Brussels that Theresa May might send a letter asking for an extension today. EU official tells me it would a good sign. #Brexit #EUCO 
250 hours before the UK implodes with an explosion of confusion .... yeah brexit .. ? 
New poll: what’s a messier mess, Brexit or British ice hockey? 
Is it #GameOver for #Brexit? If so #Bercow was the nail in the #DoDo ‘s coffin that was May’s deal. Good for him, We’ve had enough of #Theresa’s Groundhog Day claptrap.  #Bercowbombshell 
Let’s start with Johnson, farage, Fox, grayling, that dick head from weatherspoons, redwood and mogg. They should survive the carnage they will have created and be forced to spend time with one another #BFF #brexit 
Brexit ends in no deal. Scotland goes independent. We apply to be back in the EU. En say FUCK OFF BYEEEEE to england, am tellin ye 
Brexit? Jobs? Incredible that the UK is at the highest level of employment since 1971! Read the full story via the @BBCNews >  
"If the EU was focused on promoting service exports our service exports would be closer to 80%". Utter nonsense. There is zero basis to this assumption. 
Amidst all the “outrage” today is historical truth - it is the job of the Speaker to defend the rights of Parliament against an over-reaching Executive (or Monarch). His decision was cheered by both pro + anti #Brexit backbenchers. This is a MINORITY government abusing its power. 
It seems to me that May's deal is the only one compatible with her own red lines and our obligations re the Ireland / UK border. This is why it was developed. It was defeated twice, therefore she must change her red lines if Brexit is to proceed. Isn't that obvious? 
So that’s judges, civil servants, companies, remainers, soft Brexiters, opposition parties, economists, The Treasury, companies, the EU, the Germans, the French, George Soros, diesel, and the Speaker you’ve blamed for Brexit being shitHas it occurred that it might be Brexiters? pic.twitter.com/g5eU2Jwih2 
“Why should the EU27 even consider a Brexit extension if the UK parliament's vote on the deal is cancelled? Where are the cross-party talks? A minority of Right-wing populists cannot be allowed to drive European citizens and businesses off a cliff.”  
The deals that has been done? The one that the government has negotiated? The one that got defeated by the largest vote in parliamentary history?That Brexit deal? 
Brexit is a Russian Intelligence Operation.    
So many fantastic good MP’s in Parliament with their hands tied because of Corbyn to stop this suicide mission of Brexit. When he retires ( May ) he will be remembered as the man from @UKLabour that pushed Brexit through. 
Seeing hard-right press in full tantrum mode, is extremely satisfying. Read this headline with pride, Mr Bercow.. you've earned it. #Brexit  
To blame if Brexit doesn't deliver the promised unicorns, in ascending order.ExpertsRealityRemoanersImmigrantsMetropolitan eliteTraitorsMutineersEnemies of the peopleThe IrishJohn BercowNot to blame:People who made a unilateral declaration that unicorns exist. 
If you want a second referendum, who do you think you are winning round to your cause by sneering at the #MarchToLeave? When did people forget politics was about persuasion? Being dicks to Leave voters doesn’t help the pro-European cause. It just makes you look like a dick. 
We are in this mess because of David Cameron who called a referendum in a GE for a few grubby votes from racist ukip kippers. #skypapers #brexit #brexitshamles 
CNN host says #Brexit is transforming #Britain into a ‘banana republic’  
Apparently Roman is waiting for the outcome of Brexit before making his decision on Chelsea. That would explain why we've gone to shit lmao 
I just know it's going to take me until that Brexit march is down to its final 2 until I'm able to work out which one's the murderer 
That's a shocking headline. The BBC is reaching new lows in its kowtowing to Brexit propaganda. It is May who has been abusing executive power -breaking the constitution? 
The Disaster Capitalism Club Marshall made the top ten “Hedge Fund Rich List in 2018”, with an estimated net worth of £520 million and gains of up £15 million. Over the same period... the cost of Brexit to UK finances has been £320 million a week  
10 days until #Brexit, and still no deal in sight.For all you Tory voters out there, I just want to extend my heartfelt thanks for fucking this up beyond belief.You epic wallopers. 
Why does this consistency matter?@wallaceme is on point again, it matters when we see how Bercow approaches all the Amendments those who wish to thwart #Brexit present.His closing summary is chillingly accurate. #SkyPapers 
49%/41% of voters believe the decision to #Brexit was a mistake, while 57%/ 43% support a #PeoplesVote. 
ERG gearing up to blackmail May on Brexit by going on "vote strike" to stop her getting a long Article 50 extension.At the end of every Brexit road, you have wild-eyed Brexiters chewing up the scenery and trying every trick in the book to crash us out.  
Where does Theresa May go now she's become the Benny Hill of #Brexit?@wallaceme takes no prisoners.Seems a P45 is the correct approach. #SkyPapers 
"I was wrong."Seems odd to see a politician being honest. Imagine Corbyn saying he was "wrong" to call Hamas and Hezbollah "friends". Or May saying she was "wrong" that Brexit could ever work in any sort of feasible way.  
Reclining airplane seats is one thing. But boosting Ted Cruz’s digital guy who also works for campaigns in Ukraine and partnered with AggregateIQ, the weird Canadian shop at the center of the Brexit electoral spending scandal is also arguably a monstrous act.  
"I made the point that, had he made such a statement after the first meaningful vote, it would have informed the decisions of how some MPs voted." James Cleverly:This MP wants to carrying on until he gets a result that he likes.He would deny this option for Brexit voters.  
It is entirely the choice for Government & Parliament over the next 11 days whether to leave with No Deal or to delay Brexit for 2 years+ going on infinity. Not the Speaker. #RevokeArticle50Now 
Yep, that's the problem with the #torylies Brexit deal, it's all Bercow's fault.   I did not know delusional behaviour could get this extreme. #bbclies just STOP spreading your muck, the mob is coming down your street. Might be an idea to attempt impartiality while you still can! 
Isn't it shocking that 10 dup mps are invited to the discussion table of Brexit through bribery of money and the Scottish and Welsh govts are casted to the side 
You do realise that this is just the very beginning? If Brexit goes ahead we will have years and years and years of this chaos. 
Perhaps if 3 years ago the remain crowd had accepted the referendum result and the PM, Parliament and country had united behind Leave and viewed it as the opportunity it is - - we’d be in a very different place today. #brexit #Newsnight 
The Westminster elite will make a massive miscalculation if they think they can get away with turning "No deal is better than a bad deal" into accept any deal EU gives us in order to ext #Article50 or get no #brexit. #Bercow motives are for 2nd ref & 2 yr extension #Newsnight 
UK reaches post-Brexit trade agreement with Iceland and Norway | Reuters. Congratulations to ⁦@tradegovuk⁩  colleagues 
Meanwhile 48mn Brits are reduced to being spectators of their own country's decline as MPs, the #BBC & pundits bang on about what the other 17.4mn of us voted for nearly 3yrs ago, which none of them knows 'cos they chose to put words in voters' mouths rather than ask them.#Brexit 
" Leave MPs must take responsibility for the horrors of a long Brexit delay "... No Mr Hague, the responsibility lies with Parliament & the Govt denying the people their democratic Mandate ..May's deal does not deliver that mandate  via @Telegraph 
is this about Brexit  
People get annoyed about the SNP talking about Independence at this time, but they need to understand that is a crucial issue here when something is being imposed on Scotland which we nearly all voted against. Plus it's only recently that SNP have foregrounded a referendum. 
There was only one version of Remain to chose. There were two Leave campaigns, with endless variants. Now we know there were 17.4 million versions of Leave. It was never going to work. It was the stupidest referendum since the 1930s 
If we’re starting to name those ‘sabotaging’ May’s #Brexit deal, Theresa May (due to intransigence) & Boris Johnson (ambition) would be at top of list.John Bercow is simply doing his job as Speaker, a role he was elected to by the House of Commons.It’s time for a #PeoplesVote 
In honour of the utter madness that is Brexit:  
Olly Robbins made a big mistake taking on the Brexit negotiations. Another victim of a revolution that devours its children. My advice to civil servants: keep clear of Brexit. Simply decline to take Brexit- related jobs  
Brexit latest: Theresa May drawing up letter to Donald Tusk to formally request one 9-12 month Brexit delay, but with an escape clause if Meaningful Vote is (ever) passed 
I was going to keep my mouth shut tonight But!! The @STVNews bring on to discuss Brexit Kirstene Hair MP (@Kirstene4Angus) Jesus H Christ !She didn't vote in Brexit she's just a Brit Lacky or voting fodder for the Toriesand they give her a Voice !!The Brit Media are Wankers 
Jeremy Corbyn, Official Opposition Leader, refused his invitation to cross party talks in opposition to Brexit (which is still officially only 11 days away) but he's managed to get to the British fucking kebab awards.I despair.  
“You’ve got a parliament that kind of looks out at the public and thinks they made a mistake (on Brexit),” says Claire Fox, director of the Academy of Ideas@maitlis | @Fox_Claire | #newsnight | #InsideThePapers 
This is a reminder that as the referendum wasn't binding, MPs had to vote to leave. Deal and no deal were voted down - by MPs - because both options are awful. Now MPs should vote to #RevokeArticle50. It's called Parliamentary sovereignty - which the UK never lost as EU members. 
Finishing by telling the only real Brexit voice to ‘shush’ - a sign of the times perhaps? #Newsnight 
*POLL* Who is to blame for the complete dogs breakfast of Brexit negotiations? The Prime Minister who negotiated such a terrible deal? Or the Speaker, doing his job and  ensuring rules are followed? 
Of all Brexit options, the one the UK media is least interested in is #RevokeArticle50 ...No wonder Brexit got to the catastrophe it has, with media oxygen focussed on crazy soap opera only.Hopefully WTO evidence this week may help them think again. But don't hold breath  
You r part of the most incompetent Government everRise in homelessness Rise in numbers of working poorUCCuts 2 benefits Brexit And you think you can brag You are a fool, a cruel foolOn the other hand, thanks to your austerity We will have a @UKLabour Gov next GE 
REMAINERS: If you didn’t vote to leave for what the EU is today, be glad we saved you from what it seeks to become. May MUST deliver complete #Brexit  
“I’m just shocked that hard-line Brexiteers seem to think this is somehow a route to a harder Brexit. Theresa May’s Brexit is the hardest on offer” – Open Europe’s Henry Newman@maitlis | @HenryNewman | #newsnight | #InsideThePapers 
Eleven more days to go.  If the establishment decide to cancel the referendum result, it will be on them 
Hearing wazzocks cry foul over John Bercow's decision & claim inconsistency.Utter BS! He has been ENTIRELY CONSISTENT...everything he's done has favoured PARLIAMENT not GOVTWHICH IS HIS JOB!If he's Thwarted this Autocratic PM & bought time to Rethink #Brexit - he's a hero 
Using her EU passport whilst supporting a No Deal Brexit in the hope it reduces immigration from Muslim lands.Can't even make that up. 
Disappointing: "Labour’s position on Brexit was further clouded when the leaders of four opposition parties seeking a second referendum were left waiting after Mr Corbyn failed to turn up to a scheduled meeting."  
The large number of pro-Brexit MPs expressing their outrage about Brexit had two chances to vote for May’s deal—and chose to grandstand instead. They have no one but themselves to blame. If they wanted May’s deal they should have voted for it. 
Founding member, Dominic Grieve appearing on @BBCNewsnight saying: "the Speaker's position is unassailable but a convention can be overridden...the reality I think is that the Government is most unlikely to get its Meaningful Vote through this week." #Brexit #righttovote #timeout 
I don’t get these Brextremists whinging about Bercow. If they’d backed May, they’d have got disastrous Brexit they craved. They’re to blame. 
Andrea jenkyns just said ' if the result had been 52% remain you would not be doing this'. Well no- there would be no brexit deal. Ffs #newsnight 
Remoaner @dominicgrieve tells @BBCNewsnight Bercow ‘reinterpreted’ rules on his Brexit amendment & resorted to 400 yr old rule to thwart it 
So half a dozen Yellow Vest hooligans. 60 die-hard Faragiste Leavers. And yet @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @Nigel_Farage and @darrengrimes_ all tell us there will be tumultuous violence if a pure absolute #Brexit isn’t delivered! Wake up Britain.  You’ve been had.  
Remainers had no idea what they were voting for. They were tricked by lies. #Brexit  
British consultants Cambridge Analytica worked for Trump and Brexit, boasted they could twist democracies all over the world without the risk of detection. Its secrets are now covered up by Rebekah Mercer, Jennifer Mercer, Alexander Nix, Julian Wheatland  
On #Newsnight, @nadhimzahawi says Speaker has made it difficult to deliver Brexit. Not Leave‘s undeliverable promises, not the UK’s GFA obligations, not a bungled negotiation, not a disastrous GE, not DUP intransigence, not ERG fanaticism, not the PM’s tin ear. No. The Speaker. 
It was Theresa May, not John Bercow, who torpedoed her Brexit deal in June 2017. As @patrickkmaguire explains here, lack of a parliamentary majority is the biggest problem, not Bercow. 
At the heart of the Bercow saga is that a Gov’t with no majority is trying to ram through an unpopular Brexit deal. Backing MPs into a corner by offering artificial choices, limiting scope to debate other options and running down the clock. This is not in the national interest. 
Guy, the overwhelming majority of the British people oppose May's deal, and the majority want to stay in the EU, but the political elite prefer to 'respect' a criminally corrupted vote rather than listen to the people. #Brexit is a coup. 
If minister on Newsnight reflects No10’s thinking, Govt appears to be seriously considering trying to have Parliament vote to overturn 1604 convention so it can keep having votes on its wretched Brexit deal over and over again. While denying people any say on what happens next 
If the EU insists (and they can) on a long extension to #Article50 (probably to the end of 2020), the UK will have to hold elections in May 2019. This will in effect be an EU referendum as Remainers will vote for pro-EU candidates and Leavers will vote for Farage and his mates. 
Can we please not forget that May's deal was defeated by the biggest majority of any parliamentary vote ever.Then badly defeated a 2nd time.The 2016 referendum result was 52:48 - very close.If anyone deserves another vote it's the electorate!#PeoplesVote now please#Newsnight 
Remainers.Haven't spotted that May's "Brexit" deal is Remain on steroids.Believe they lost the referendum because of Russian Facebook ads.STILL can't tell the difference between the EU and Europe.And THEY call Leavers stupid... 
I’ve written in some desperation to my M.P. tonight. I feel our only hope is a General Election. Surely there can be no confidence in this government left? @BorderIrish @Rachael_Swindon @Sarah_C_Church #Brexit  
Tuesday's Times: "Bercow is sabotaging #Brexit deal, says No 10" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
The Brexit Secretary who spoke in favour of an extension of the Brexit deadline then voted against the extension he just spoke in favour of is the man charged with negotiating the extension that he voted against but spoke in favour of and what could possibly go wrong? 
Is Labour boycotting #newsnight after @maitlis side eye last week? No one from the party (despite invitation) on the programme to talk about Bercow ruling on Brexit. 
“What Speaker Bercow has done has made it much more likely that we don’t deliver Brexit” – Conservative MP Nadhim Zahawi tells Emily Maitlis, adding that that “worries” him@nadhimzahawi | @maitlis | #newsnight 
By law - the EU Withdrawal Act - Brexit occurs this 29 March; it takes a deliberate act of the Prime Minister to change that, so she can still honour the referendum. Not to means our democracy is being disrespected and denied - the executive and legislature are playing with fire.  
Massive if the Speaker actually does this, it could help start to break up the log jam. But we all know what the single cause of the Brexit log jam is, Theresa May. Senior Tories really need to put the pressure on her to go and go very quickly. The shambles needs to end.  
This isn’t a spoof, Jeremy - this is Guy Verhofstadt MEP, the man who leads the European Parliament’s Brexit team. He is articulating the policies and ideals of the Remain campaign which many people unwittingly voted for, believing it was “the status quo”  
Getting ready for a trip to Ireland and the U.K. to talk Brexit and protecting the Good Friday Agreement and all I can think about is the Red Sox still don’t have a closer.  
Having had time reflect, it strikes me & I admit I'm allowing my diseased ridden mind to work overtime, that Speaker Bercow & his duplicitous conspirators may have pulled off a major coup in their clever attempt to stop BREXIT. But I suspect the public at large will be horrified 
I am not immune from media grooming. I realise that now. It was the Scottish independence referendum. They absolutely (the media) did paint it as hostile to English ppl. It never was. It was about self determination. All I've seen since the 2016 referendum 1. 
Brexit ANGER: Tony Blair has made the UK a 'JOKE' and handed the EU 'confidence' He Needs Locking Up!  
No bias there Laura eh? The Constitution was broken when an illegally won advisory referendum was taken as a mandate but don't let illegalities crowd your judgement will you? Bercow is standing FOR the constitution. 
Absolutely stunning piece by @RVAwonk for @BylineTimes - and this on the night @SkyNews platforms Robert Mercer's 'honey badger' Stephen K Bannon promoting @BorisJohnson as the next UK Prime Minister....Mercer >> Bannon >> Cambridge Analytica >> Brexit >> Trump#Gatestone 
Oldham and Rochdale are bigger, in population terms at least.Maybe a new deal for Oldham and Rochdale would actually address some of the economic and social tensions which lead to people saying they’ve had enough and the Brexit result in the first place.  
Why didn't you report from the high court a few weeks ago when Theresa May's OWN BARRISTER admitted.. ON CAMERA.. that the Brexit Referendum was ILLEGAL , Laura? Do you realise what a disgrace you are to journalism? 
The massive poll conducted by Wakefield Official News has ended. With over 8,000 votes cast the result is an overwhelming 2:1 in favour of Remaining in the EU. An extraordinary but hugely encouraging result from a former Leave heartland! #Brexit #Wakefield #YorkshireRemain 
Tuesday's Mail: "Smirk that says: #Brexit be damned" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Yes. Anna Soubry acts with such integrity:- Campaigned for referendum- Told her constituents she’d respect their decision- after she’d won campaigned against Brexit- called for a second vote- resigned the whip and refused to call a by-election SUCH  INTEGRITY   
Tuesday's Guardian: "#Brexit chaos as Speaker stops May in her tracks" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Hardline Tory Brexiteers threaten to go on strike if Theresa May carries out vow to delay Brexit by a year  
It is pure hypocrisy of Tories to speak of Bercow causing a constitutional crisis when they have treated a criminally corrupted advisory referendum as if it were a divine mandate for #Brexit, cynically exploiting a legal loophole that prevents an advisory referendum being voided. 
This is very good by @RVAwonk. Who funds Islamaphobic content worldwide to the tune of hundreds of millions of $? The same man whose data machinery underpinned Brexit & Trump. Step forward Robert Mercer... 
Brexit destroyed itself, crushed by the weight of its own arrogance and stupidity   
France's European Union minister names her cat "Brexit" because when she opens the door to let him out "he stays put"  
The political classes are showing huge arrogance in denying the people the #Brexit they voted for : No #SM No #CUPerhaps they believe having denied us we will go about our lives and accept itIf so they are making a massive & dangerous miscalculation 
Nearly $3billion AI company moves to London - remind me again how Brexit is hurting the economy?  
Doing @BBCNewsnight on #bercow #brexit & more importantly for me, the fate of parliamentary democracy if we continue to see every rule & convention bent and broken to  ensure popular vote thwarted #newsnight 
Excl: Tory Brexiteers threaten to go on "vote strike" and paralyse the Government if Theresa May delays Brexit by a year 
#Brexit is not a glorious liberation from the EU. It is a shambolic retreat from Europe by a criminally misled country being dragged to ruin by an alliance of rampant greed and an atavistic fear and loathing of the modern world. #PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
UK reaches post-Brexit trade agreement with Iceland and Norway  
While the esteemed Mr Bercow is working his socks off holding the government to account, Corbyn is necking glass after glass of tasteless ice cold lager at the kebab awards. Try attending the Stop Brexit awards mate, not like you'd win anything. 
IThe irony being ghastly Bercow pushes Brexit over the line.  
Tomorrow's front page: Speaker John Bercow torpedoed Theresa May's EU deal - and stuck two fingers up to 17.4million Brexit voters  
Another extraordinary day in Westminster. And why a long delay to Brexit now beckons.  
EXPRESS: The Brexit Destroyer #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Farage said he'd organise a 200+ mile march in protest over Brexit. Thanks to @adamhillscomedy people have been pledging a donation to @AsylumAid for every mile Farage fails to walk. Strong statement that we value a country where people can feel they belong. Join us! 
Biased Speaker Bercow is refusing another vote on Mrs May’s Deal but will of course accept anti-Brexit motions that have already been defeated. This is what we’re up against folks. #Switch4Brexit 
COURT CASE ON 22nd HAS BEEN POSTPONED.PLEASE INSTEAD JOIN TOMMY ON FRIDAY 29th IN LONDON FOR THE BIGGEST PRO BREXIT DEMO LONDON HAS SEEN  
May’s deal isn’t Brexit. No. You’re mistaken.  
With seasonal workers disappearing, British farms to face one of #Brexit's first tests  
The terrible disservice Theresa May has done to comity in the UK  is embodied in her insistence on talking about the (will of) "the British people" as if it were monolithic when Brexit is in fact the will of only half of those who voted. 
Thank you @Andrew_Adonis for such a clear exposition of the utter bankruptcy of #brexit & why #EuropeanUnion membership is emphatically #bestdeal, which we must protect. Pleasure to meet you & MPs - members of the public - from across region. Sensational evening @peoplesvotelich 
Speaker Bercow stops May bringing back her failed Brexit deal again and again despite historically massive defeats. It’s time for her to change her blinkered approach so we can end this damaging Tory-inflicted national crisis 
10 days to go, Guy!The world is watching a hidebound EU stuck in the mud unwilling to be reasonable and neighbourly.I will keep saying this; it is time to put Britain's National Interest first - clean WTO Brexit now!  
I’m at the event now. Sad to report that Corbyn is touring the room taunting people with his magic STOP BREXIT button. It’s fully wireless so it’s operational but he keeps moving his finger towards it, then not pressing it, going “Ahhhhhhh!” and laughing maniacally  
No deal Brexit plans get MAJOR BOOST - UK agrees £30bn agreement with Iceland and Norway  
It has now been 998 days since the Brexit referendum. Since 2017, it was known the leaving date would be 1009 days after the vote, on March 29th. So Britain is 98.9% of the way through its self-imposed timetable and no-one knows what the plan is. Simply astonishing.  
Speaking of Bercow “His enemies will come for him again, and he doesn’t have all that many friends.” He does. He has millions of friends who will forever be grateful for his defence of democracy and the country, when the opposition was ineffective #brexit  
The Kremlin's campaign of disinformation influenced our 2016 election and Brexit. At the center, is a network of corrupt cronies like Arron Banks, Steven Bannon, Donald Trump, and Boris Johnson, designed to wreak havoc and cause chaos and disruption.  
Great meeting in Lichfield this evening - more than half the crowd will be in London this Saturday & virtually everyone in favour of votes for 16 & 17 year olds in next referendum!  
#TheresaMay has failed to deliver #Brexit 17.4m people voted for.#WithdrawalAgreement is not #BrexitPlease retweet if you agree @theresa_may should 
You do realise that the UK is NOT a country which is why Brexit is such a shambles. Scotland Wales NI and England are completely different in needs and requirements - There is no one Brexit for all 4 countries 
I'm just imagining the street parties back home as we speak - with rapturous souls hearing the joyous tidings that Brexit means GB will be allowed to roll-over the very same trade deal it had in the EU with ... Liechtenstein !"Fabulous" doesn't even begin to cover this !!   
Let's start with Jacob Rees-Mogg.He's changed his tune his tune. In 2016 he said leaving was better than staying. In November, he said the Brexit deal was worse than staying. Now he's saying the Brexit deal is better than staying.He's changed his mind twice!@Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Have MPs become so binary in their thinking that they would vote for a Brexit which even under their own ideology is worse than staying in the EU, just because they can technically call it Brexit? 
The deep state at workBelieve me, the Civil Service is trying to sink Brexit. I have seen it from the inside  
We're getting hyped for the #PutItToThePeople march.March with us on the 23rd if you think young people deserve better than Theresa May's terrible #Brexit deal.@OFOCBrexit 
Buddhist monks draw mandalas in the sand to meditate upon the impermanence of all things. I just make Brexit predictions.  
Trade deals signed by Britain to maintain after Brexit the same conditions it already has as a EU member:— Liechtenstein— Papua New Guinea— Fiji— Faroe Islands— Israel & PA— Chile— Switzerland— Madagascar— Mauritius— Seychelles— ZimbabweRuling the waves indeed  
At airport on way home so catching up with news. I see nothing changed -Brexit still a shambles, LC still a shambles, @MelJStride & @PhilipHammondUK have their murky hands in both. Good work gents. Takes a special level of incompetence to screw over the U.K. on 2 seperate matters 
Don't worry! I have the perfect solution to our #Brexit problem. A solution that will satisfy all those people who want it sorted ASAP. It will satisfy a significant majority of the population. And it will satisfy all those who want certainty. Just  #RevokeArticle50 now. 
Despite all the Brexit shit that’s going down, if these wonderful, articulate, intelligent, compassionate children are our future, I’ll stay optimistic #ChoirKAA #TheChoir 
Large parts of the Remainer-dominated Civil Service are systematically working to sabotage Brexit.  
Tuesday's Independent: "Bercow's hammer blow for May's #Brexit deal" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
#UKIP are the only serious party standing in #Newportwest that want to deliver #Brexit. Vote UKIP on the 4th of April!  
For the first time in my life, what with the state of our politics, Brexit betrayal, the latest hypocracy and the cowardice of elected people, the state of our welfare system, our poor, our forces.. etc etcI am feeling ashamed to be British! Christianity is now a prisoner. 
WELL DONE TO EVERYONE who signed the"Hold an #InformedConsent Referendum on EU membership" Petition & got it to 100,000 signatures.People MAY want to SEND A TWEET together with the Petition TO THEIR MP TOGETHER WITH A MESSAGE asking them to SUPPORT the Petition's objective!! 
Is it time to implement the ACTUAL result of the Referendum?  
Phrases not heard for a while @theresa_may "Strong and Stable""Coalition of chaos""Best Brexit deal""Certainty and stability""Brexit dividend"This is or favourite - "I believe it is clearly in our national interest to remain a member of the European Union"#PeoplesVote 
Thank you for the supportive email and messages you’ve sent since I came out for Mrs May’s God-awful Deal. It’s now the only way we can save Brexit from the Bercow-led Establishment! I found this harder than coming out as gay to my family! Delivering Brexit is so important to me! 
The pro Brexit forces massing on London have created a frenzy of fear and anticipation in the beleaguered capital  
You know, it really doesn’t matter anymore how Brexit plays out. It will only ever go very badly wrong. Just degrees of bad now. 
On the day history - 1604 to be precise - bit Brexit in the butt, what better way to spend the evening than by having a little laugh! @NyetFilm is exactly what you need. It's a #UKborderfarce and you can watch it here. I love it.   1/ 
The Trump administration has made the USA a laughing stock in world were Brexit exists. It takes a special kind of awful to out stupid Brexit. 
Once the Brexit endgame been and gone there needs to be an Independent enquiry into the actions of @theresa_may and her agents to discover if there has been any wrongdoing 
As an ex-Labour voter who has known many of their senior figures and even their Prime Ministers I cannot help but feel they have let Britain down over Brexit and opened a path to the wild ideologies of the extreme left. Most are EU millionaires now or fearful of Corbyn. Sad. 
Dear me, the truth hurts. @danieljhannan has taken his ball, and is running home to Mummy #brexit  
Hear bloody hear!Now it's broke..let's #Revoke#RevokeA50 Stop a #BrexitShambles based on LiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesForeign InterferenceDisenfranchisementRights Lost w/o Consent & The Non-Binding opinions of Just 37% Voters 26.5% of the People#Brexit Britain FUBAR  
Those MPs railing against what they perceive to be Bercow’s meddling in the Brexit process should take a step back and ask themselves - what the hell have you been doing for the last 2 years? 
After #Brexit has been stopped or abandoned, there will eventually be a Public Inquiry at which I've no doubts you'll be asked to give evidence. I hope you've got your excuses sorted out as to why you've totally failed your job of being politically impartial. Can't wait.#Bercow 
The Swiss are holding out against the hegemony of the European Court and an EU attempt to gut their national sovereignty:  #Brexit 
Iceland: population 338,349Liechtenstein: population 37,810You've basically enabled trade with a customer base smaller than an average UK city...What next - an Ebay shop? Brexit car boot sales?Laughable that you still have a job!  
In the latest example of Brexiter lunacy, Dan Hannan (apparently a History graduate) tries to explain how the EU went back in time to 1604 creating a Parliamentary clause to stop Brexit.It’s the shittest reboot of ‘The Terminator’ franchise ever. pic.twitter.com/Vv7nk1ErYx 
One thing that's got to be very near the top of the post-Brexit to-do list is making sure Bercow never becomes a LordIt'll destroy him. There's nothing he wants more. For him to be shutout from politics his ego simply won't be able to take itWe've got to see that it happens 
The past few chaotic weeks have shown that there is no way of leaving the EU without:a) Causing damage to the economy.b) Upsetting somebody as it doesn’t match their vision of Brexitc) Puts the whole Irish peace process in jeopardy by going against the Good Friday Agreement 
A Brexit extension would threaten the future of Brexit. By far the best outcome would be a no deal WTO Brexit on March 29, which would ensure that @guyverhofstadt would no longer have any say over Britain's future. 
So pleased to hear @Lord_Bilimoria promote immigration as the future of Britain:  “ This (room) is #GlobalBritain” and “we are #GlobalBritain”.The #BritishKebabAwards is this surreal mixture of politics, food, culture and Brexit. This turns out to be the #AntiBrexitKebabAwards. 
James cleverly as constitutional class Dunce is made to write out IT'S A FOUR HUNDRED YEAR OLD RULE 400x #Brexit  
Will a five year extension be long enough for the police and NCA to complete their investigations into Leave's law breaking? Perhaps not  
If only Femi were knowledgeable about the EU, he'd know the UK & EU have a large list of 'no-deal' agreements in the works to maintain the status quo until a full deal can be negotiated.It's a shame ppl like @Femi_Sorry don't keep track of EU business. 
Thank you for this thread.This actually sums up the madness that was the initially idea of the referendum in the first place.  There never was a clear plan for leaving the EU. 
Bercow pulls the rug from MaySays, "you cannot vote again"Besides, the #WTO is coming soonIn days, it's only tenAnd now 368,000 folk with large amounts of common sense have clicked here ....why not join them in support of a proper #WTOterms #brexit 
TONIGHT: The Speaker John Bercow threw a spanner in the prime minister’s Brexit works today - her deal must change before it can be voted on again. What does this mean for Brexit? We’ll discuss with politicians and pundits from 22:30 on BBC Two@maitlis | #newsnight 
Brexit is 266 hours away. #brexit 
New:Whips are tonight alarmed about *this* exchange involving John BercowThe Speaker hints he could enable votes on Brexit alternatives such as Customs Union by allowing neutral motions to be amended so they are substantive'It's massive,' a source said  
“Britain, famous for its prudence, propriety and punctuality, is suddenly looking like a banana republic.”- The Washington Post on global laughing stock Brexit Britain   
So Jeremy Corbyn, a teetotal vegetarian, is now presenting an award at #BritishKebabAwards  as he celebrates falafel & diversity, and I no longer know if I’m trapped in Brexit or an alternate British reality. 
FT: May’s Brexit hits block #tomorrowspaperstoday 
The only way I'm going to starve to death after Brexit is if the fucking Remoaners have stockpiled all the food resulting in a food shortage.A no-deal Brexit survival guide: what food to stockpile  
Hilarious seeing Brexiteers who’ve spent the last few years complaining that Parliament isn’t sovereign suddenly frothing because Parliament turns out to have been sovereign all along...Will irony finally be what kills Brexit?#StopBrexit #BitchesVBrexit 
Part two of your Brexit update Walthamstow for today Monday 18th March - now speaker Bercow has said we can’t have the same vote what might the government do in response! #brexithaos 2/2 
@CarolineLucas This is a straw man argument. No-one is asking for a re-run of the EURef 2016. We accept that Leave won that by a very small margin. We want a #PeoplesVote in 2019 to see if the British people want to accept or reject TM's deal. It's a referendum on the deal.  
Serious question: If May goes to Brussels to request an extension, could they make it conditional on a second referendum? 
We already have the Brexit 50p, it's currently called the pound 
No, the exact opposite. Chances of a EURef2 has now risen sufficiently. If Mr Bercow was in front of me now, I'd buy the man a pint. #Brexit  
Imagine being so fucking desperate to hide your singular failure to achieve anything of note for three fucking years after declaring Brexit to be a piece of piss that you’d pull fucking Liechtenstein whose annual imports are like the turnover of a Shell garage out of your arse.  
In less than 2 weeks Scotland will be taken out the EU against its will. BBC Scotland has yet to broadcast a single documentary about the impact brexit is going to have on Scotland.One of the biggest single event in post-WWII Scotland history and the BBC is nowhere to be seen. 
At primary school, I won £1.00 in a packet of crisps, although I mistook it for saying £100. I was over the moon through lunchtime, until a dinner lady corrected me. The dismay has never left me. I imagine that's how the DUP feel with MV3 officially off the table #Brexit  
Brilliant from @fionafof and other conference delegates who wrote Labour’s #Brexit policyLetter sent to ALL @UKLabour MPs with a worksheet asking those considering backing May’s deal to indicate which Labour anti-austerity policies they’d forego to get Brexit  
After another mad day in #parliament, @heidiallen75 ran out of the chamber to join students from @SawstonVC for a #digitalsurgery to get them up to speed on the news and talk women in politics, #TIG and, of course, #Brexit.  
Another referendum? We had a ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ in 2016. MPs should carry out the People’s instruction not make them vote again. BBC Wales Live 
“Brexit is a national tragedy” says the founder of the kebab awards, as Jeremy Corbyn, sat directly in front of him, suddenly hunches down to look at his phone 
Constitutional chaos after third vote on Brexit deal blocked  
Nearly 3 years of this Brexit shit and we've gotten nowhere. Abuse and division. Cameron cleared off with his tail between his legs and May has made a complete balls of it. Why on earth do we keep voting for these second rate 'car sales ppl'? We need drastic change and quick 
Walthamstow! Today’s Brexit update on what happened today in parliament part one ...the one about what john Bercow ruled on being repetitive.... #brexithaos 1/2 
From now on, whenever a Brexiteer says anything about the glorious post-Brexit future, I'm going to add "and this is on top of the deal we've signed with Liechtenstein" in my head. 
So the PM is prepared to go to extreme lengths to repeat a vote until she gets the answer wants, but talk of another referendum is an affront to democracy. The irony. #Brexit #MV3 #Bercow 
See JHB has given her answer to perceived sabotage of Brexit......  
It has never served the interests of the British people to placate those who threaten democracy like Theresa May is doing now.If she can’t cancel Brexit slyly with her ‘deal’, May’s threatening to cancel Brexit openly with delays.MPs must face down this impetuous autocrat.  
Why is the marginal result of an advisory, illegally interfered with referendum STILL being upheld, as the country haemorrhages businesses and jobs. #brexitcast 
Liam Fox, the MP who said that a Brexit deal would be the “easiest in history” to get, is actually showing off about a trade deal with Liechtenstein. With apologies to the 37,810 Liechtensteiners, this is probably not what Britain had in mind when it came to leaving the EU. Clown  
John Bercow just made Brexit all about him... and he couldn’t have looked happier. Sketch by @MichaelPDeacon 
Interesting discussions at public meeting in Elgin tonight, where @ScotRuralAction launched its report on #Brexit and people of Moray had their say on how EU exit will affect them  
Support for a People’s Vote surges as public reject the Brexit alternatives  
Words cannot express how angry I am having this Brexit  dangled in front of our faces for almost 3 years Will they, won’t they? And for those who say “it’s more complicated than we realised”Trump would’ve had this deal signed, sealed & delivered by now!  
Democracy is being betrayed in the UK. The contempt Europhiles have for democracy is laid bare again. #Brexit #Irexit #IFP 
How is it possible to keep banging on about Brexit without facing the unassailable fact that Theresa May is so huge she has to stand outside the TV studio and conduct interviews through the window?  
I’m very proud to be done a few designs for the oh-so-cool Bitches Against Brexit set up by ⁦@EmmaKennedy⁩Give them a follow if you haven’t already ⁦@BitchesvBrexit⁩ and check out the website Bitches Assemble!#BitchesVBrexit #StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/Sh70IhhdKC 
If a client of mine turned in a book that had the plot of Brexit, I'd be asking for a massive revision, focusing in particular on the last 10% of the book, where FAR TOO MANY UNBELIEVABLE PLOT TWISTS COME OUT OF NOWHERE and maybe my client should rethink the ending entirely. 
We should use “brexit” as a general term for when someone says goodbye but then doesn’t leave. 
So ... #Brexit has just been put in check by a rule to keep James VI of Scotland in check when he became James I of a newly united kingdom created to ensure a Protestant succession to Elizabeth. Never thought we +62% of Scots might be so grateful.  
STOP THE PRESS: After Brexit we can continue trading with Iceland (population 338,000), Liechtenstein (population 37,000) and Norway (population 5 million) - all of which are already trading partners. This changes everything.  
Want to see the young break the social contract, riot on the streets then take us back into Europe? Then plough ahead with Brexit. None of us are scared of fat, past it football hooligans 
Have they ousted Theresa May  yet?  The idea that May should be allowed to deliver Brexit then quit is flawed. She’s like a drunk driver behind the wheel. You’ll keep on ending up in ditches until you ditch her.  
The media turn the New Zealand white supremacist terrorist attack into a referendum on Trump, Kirsten Gillibrand experiences failure to launch, and Trump goes wild on Twitter.The @BenShapiro Show!WATCh ==>  
Great video from @OFOCBrexit showing #Brexit is the #FyreFestival of 2016.It's time to #PutItToThePeople:  
It’s not like there is anything else he could be doing. Like working on a Brexit policy. Or campaigning for a second referendum  
Donald Trump RTed this folks. Reminder that Trump is NOT Britain’s friend in #Brexit or in anything else  
I no longer blame Brexiters for this mess, as we are where we are. I now blame Theresa May entirely for this mess. She’s managed to achieve the impossible - she’s united Brexiters and Remainers in agreement over what an appalling mess she has made of the Brexit negotiations. 
Remainers liked to claim that the referendum was a choice between staying in the EU and the uncertainty of change after Brexit. In truth, staying in the EU is the more uncertain future. 
Firstly, the story is absolutely nonsense and has been called out by a Labour spokesperson.Secondly, Labour under Corbyn are literally backing a second referendum with remain as an option.Corbyn could be singing ‘Ode to Joy’ wrapped in an EU flag and this wouldn’t be enough..  
There is a Friends GIF for every Brexit occasion. I almost think I can prove this.  
No deal Brexit plans get MAJOR BOOST - UK agrees £30bn agreement with Iceland and Norway  
70.6% of my followers would vote to remain as a first preference in a multi choice 2nd referendum, with No Deal being the 2nd most popular first preference on 12.7%. See full results below.Moral of the story = Twitter is not an accurate representation of public opinion!  
wants backbench MPs to usurp her on Brexit. 
“you to believe what he really wants is a longer extension, where Parliament will take over the process and force a softer form of Brexit. But anyone who thinks that this makes no deal more likely is mistaken — the Speaker wouldn’t have done it if it did”. ie PM thinks Speaker... 
#Brexit: Bercow chucks a hulking great spanner in the works  
Those poor remainers; they had no idea what they were voting for. #StandUp4Brexit #Brexit  
In recent days @GuidoFawkes, @matthew_elliott & @wallaceme have all backed May's deal. They've acknowledged its imperfections but decided to take the prize on offer rather than wallow in pursuit of unattainable Brexit purity. Wise heads. If only ERG had come to same conclusion. 
Hundreds of Scottish police on standby for Brexit fallout  
it’s you who doesn’t like democracy. Referendum was biggest democratic exercise in our history. weasels like you can’t accept  it  
Herself, of course, has recognised this from the outset: that Theresa May, whatever else you might say about her (& who hasn’t?), understood that the type of democracy manifested in the Referendum vote was irreconcilable with the democracy operated by parliament. That’s why she.. 
Commons speaker, John Bercow cited a more than 400-year-old rule that blocks parliament being forced to vote on the same issue repeatedly in a short space of time.Get the latest on #Brexit here:  
#IsItOkay that with less than 2 weeks until #Brexit... #EUsupergirl has never been on @TheLastLeg Surely a little #StopBrexit sing-song on 29th March would be an excellent addition to the show?  #EUrockNroll RT if you agree!  
We need to #RevokeArticle50 first. Hit the reset button, hold a public inquiry into the massive corruption around the last referendum, and not let this government get away with a rush-job half-arsed referendum. 
IF we get another referendumIF remain is an optionWe must fight hard and cleanWe must not take ANYTHING for grantedzero complacency We must do our best and be cleanLeave will break every single law, may even use violence Be prepared !#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Politicians must implement the referendum vote, or else the disconnect that already exists between themselves and the electorate will widen further.  
Tonight’s topics. 1. Terrorism. 2. Bercow and Brexit  
In the face of #Brexit uncertainty and division: The Church of England says it will encouraging parishes to hold 'informal cafe-style meetings,' on the weekend of March 30 to promote unity  
Prediction: Article 50 is extended by three days at which point Brexit is revealed as the most fiendishly astounding April Fool the world has ever known. 
Can't wait for Brexit to die this week so I can make this account all about Pugs and Retweeting Fake Taxi videos. 
When a retweet speaks volumes. #Brexit  
Home office are prepping another referendum.Rumours reach us. 
Well done Speaker Bercow. I'm enjoying the anguish of Brexit MPs who've been waiting to trade their votes for a peerage. 
Brexit is 267 hours away. #brexit 
Atlanta’s Big Transit Vote Is a Referendum on Race  
It has taken the government more than four hours to give this response to Speaker Bercow’s ruling that the PM cannot bring back her meaningful vote on Brexit deal unless the substance of the motion is fundamentally changed. Where there was darkness  
I voted Remain. I did not celebrate leaving the EU. Nor did I think it was the end of the world. I think that's why I can empathise with Remainers who wish Brexit never happened & leave voters who fear it won't. I think Corbyn is very similar, which is why he can unite the 2! 
If you pass the deal , then Theresa May is stronger and ready to move to the next Brexit sell out. This is not Brexit & will destroy any competitive advantage for the UK. I know you are a soft Tory but we need stand up to EU bullies and develop backbone  
No deal Brexit plans get MAJOR BOOST - UK agrees £30bn agreement with Iceland and Norway  
We regret to inform you that Brexit has been lost during a server transition 
Meanwhile, March 29 is next week. #Brexit 
I was going to write this as a Brexit Tape.But I am GENUINELY scared that would make it happen now. 
Ireland and France vying in Brexit mocking tonight   
#brexitcast Why are the industrial scale illegalities surrounding the Leave campaigns not being discussed at all by the #bbc ? Why must we respect the result of an advisory referendum when, had it been binding, it would have been declared unsafe and voided? 
If we exit the political institutions, paying in, the CFP, CAP it will be remainers crying. If we delay and stay to fight another day for a pure Brexit we'll rue it. You think it is easier to get out if we go back to square one? I'd rather be half out and fight from there. 
@DanielJHannan are you declaring the 2016 referendum null and void because we already voted remain in the 1970s then? 
Poor old Dan, you almost feel sorry for him...... almost. 
"What would a long Brexit extension be for?" isn't hard question to answer. And it is only three days till @theresa_may is likely to be asked just that by EU27 leaders. Yet the government in the shape of poor @KwasiKwarteng could not bear to address it. Not a great look 
Bloody EU coming over here, travelling back in time to 1604 and creating this parliamentary procedural rule just to obstruct #Brexit.  Is there no end to the powers of these ‘undemocratic’, malevolent bureaucrats?  
I will be marching in the People's March this Saturday.I will be marching because I think Brexit is a monumental act of self harm.I will be marching for all the EU citizens living in the UK.I will be marching to ensure that the Good Friday Agreement remains honoured. 
 France has best line in #Brexit mocking as ...France’s EU minister names her cat ‘Brexit’ because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but won’t go through the door’   
What has John Bercow done now? Today's Brexit news in a nutshell  
Brexit STALEMATE: Theresa May warned no deal Brexit is now ONLY option  
That's nothingDuring the first Scottish Independence Referendum, the Labour Party were out campaigning with the National Front and the BNP  
Cynical humour aside, I am just appalled by the damage this whole #Brexit business has done to representative democracy & parliamentary sovereignty in . What many leavers and remainers now have in common is that they look upon Parliament with incredulity & disdain. Tragic. 
'#Brexit is going to be terrific' - veteran investor Mark Mobius  
no & sadly, I would not bank on Brexit happening anyday soon. UK is having trouble. 
I'm a bit bemused by the notion it'd be unthinkable for the Queen to intervene on Brexit with personal game-changing judgements & blockages on the basis of centuries old precedents, despite a theoretical power to do so, but it's fine if John Bercow does it. What's *that* about? 
Nigel Farage on John Bercow’s Brexit ruling: - A no-deal Brexit moved a “little bit closer” today- The EU27 won’t offer any concessions on Thursday - Extension is the most likely outcome, but not a given @Nigel_Farage | #Bercow 
What's the worst possible outcome …?Ah, I know.We'll end up with a hard Brexit, Chris Grayling as Prime Minister (with a remit to fix the damage), and Boris Johnson as Chancellor of the Exchequer.Then a meteor swarm and a Martian invasion to finish us off. 
Thanks to @jonworth for this #Brexit diagram outlining the possible options and outcomes for the UK.  
»Brexit, Europe, and the Left« #Brexit blog launch event in #Brussels, organised by @RosaluxEuropa in collaboration with @Another_Europe. Brian Carty: »Brexit is bad, let`s be clear.«  
It has now reached the stage where it is impossible for any UK minister to speak in the commons promoting the government position and actually appear competent. The fundamental problem is the incoherence and incompetence of their #Brexit policy.  
Taylor Swift does Brexit.  
Tomorrow we have an opportunity to move Gwinnett forward by voting YES to a historic transit referendum that will spur economic development and reduce congestion for decades to come. I will be voting YES, and I hope you do too. Polls are open from 7am to 7pm. #VoteYes #gapol pic.twitter.com/ilW3SQUcKm 
James Gray is characteristic of Tory MPs who have changed their minds on May's 'obnoxious' #Brexit deal but refuse to allow the public the opportunity to change theirs.#PeoplesVoteNow  My interview on @sun_politics_sw 
Lane: Endless Voting on Brexit Is Absurd. So Why Are Politicians Pushing to Make Britons Vote Again?  
Yes I’d be voting UKIP / Brexit party As Tory and labour manifesto is a piece of toilet paper now.The trust has gone.All we done was voted to leave on a vote given to us, on a promise to enact the decision.Yes a promise. 
On the night of the Brexit referendum the British pound went into free fall.While many watched with horror, a handful of hedge funds were making staggering profits  
If the Monarch intervened to stop Brexit being cancelled what wld Remainers say to object? "But that wld be undemocr..."? "She might theoretically be able to do that but if she did so she'd lack legitima..."? "We can't be ruled by laws & institutions over which we have no s..."?  
Breaking! I have decided to add “Conservative Government” to “fun run,” all-day breakfast,” “jobs-first Brexit” and “American cheese” in my official list of top five oxymorons 
Constitutional crisis as Speaker tells MPs he could block third Brexit vote. 
Americans are often baffled you can play ANY sport for five days and still end in a draw. But Brexit has played out over three years and it looks like both sides will lose. 
“The recent death toll of Christians in Nigeria has reached 120 with this week’s slaughter of more than 50 by Fulani Muslim militants in the Kaduna state of NigeriaI think Hoey could be Prime Minister material, she also backs Brexit. 
In 2011 Cameron passed the referendum lock, that no new EU Treaty could be passed without a referendum.May's deal is an EU Treaty. This means it is illegal, because it transfers power to the EU without our permission in a referendum 
France’s EU minister names her cat 'Brexit' because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but won’t go through the door’  
"Allies of @theresa_may have long talked about how she wants her legacy to be about more than Brexit. But the brutal truth is that there is no such legacy available to her," writes @JGForsyth 
BREXIT: John Bercow’s ruling has breathed new life into the people’s vote | Polly Toynbee /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
BREXIT: Hats off to Bercow @InFactsOrg /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
I’d prefer WTO Brexit then punish the duplicitous MPs at the ballot box. 
You know that joke about how it is almost impossible to explain the rules of cricket to a foreigner, well what happened in parliament today on Brexit is far far more impenetrable. But the difference is that cricket usually endears us to the world, rather than humiliating us 
Chemotherapy costs roughly £2k per cycle. With 4.2 Billion being spent on Brexit it equates to cancer treatment for... 2.1 Million People!I've got to ask if you voted leave is that money well spent? Esp since you campaigned on NHS money. 
If we had a government it would now prorogue parliament and leave #GoWTO on March 29th. If we had a real democracy we’d have a #GeneralElectionNow #Brexit #BrexitAlliance 
Delicious this evening to observe so many Brexiters in an absolute rage. Yet, like Brexit itself, none of them seem to be able to agree why. 
Do you support Non Payment Of Council Tax if Brexit isn’t delivered on 29/3/19 ? 
Provided that it "is on top of the agreement we've signed with Liechtenstein" then that swings brexit for me. Are we targeting the Vatican City next? 
Continuity Remainers & pro-Brexit advocates of May's deal share the same error: they both believe Brexit can somehow be prevented. It cannot. The qstn is not whether we leave. It is what relationships we hv with the rest of the world & the EU after we've gone. 
EU say no extension to article 50 unless there’s another referendum Bercow says no 3rd parliamentary vote on basically the same dealGovernment voted for no second referendum Face it people we’re leaving with #NoDeal #BrexitChaosThis is what we call a #stalemate 
UKIP backs their own referendum and it makes the newsI propose a referendum to strip Gareth Bennett, handcuff him to a lampost in Queen Street and throw cat shit at himLooking forward to the @WalesPolitics headlines 
Hey @IainDale. Theresa Mays deal is not 70% of Brexit, as you said. It is a deal that sees us having to ask permission to leave. You may be comfortable with the UK being held in a never ending subservient nightmare, but most Brexiteers aren't. @LBC 
Brexit: Irish blockchain community wary of political and economic crisis amid a national economic boom 
Healthy Soils must be included in the environmental services that benefit from public funds after Brexit. Special thanks to @pow_rebecca + all of our speakers today. This event has been an important step forward in putting #soilhealth on the political agenda. #SustainableSoilsNow 
What’s with our broadcast media tonight? Almost every news report is literally saying “how dare John Bercow deny the Prime Minister and her Brexit deal”. But at the same time, conveniently overlooking that he was just doing his job. 
"It would be difficult" for the PM to bring back her deal for another vote this week, meaning that Theresa May might "have to ask for a longer extension" to the #Brexit Article 50 process, says the Institute for Government's Hannah WhiteUpdates here:  
Contains all the classics: “Baby back me or no Brexit tonight”“Amendment to my heart defeated”“I’m a fool for deselection”“Coup me, coup me, til I want lose control”“No deal, no cry”“Baby got backstop”  
Not the village idiot Owen Paterson who wants pensioners to pick fruit after Brexit, out of touch tory idiots. #c4news #brexit #brexitdeal 
No. Remainers had no idea what they were voting for. #Brexit 
#NATO Eastward expansion:NATO: Legitimate, countries join NATO of their free will (no need even for a referendum)95.5% of voters in #Crimea have supported joining Russia in referendumNATO: Illegal! Annexation!  
Brexit is being betrayed. RT if you want to just leave with No Deal! Join the historic rally in Parliament Square to protest against the establishment:  
British MEP Daniel Hannan writes in the Telegraph that Fianna Fáil "won every Irish election since 1932" (it actually lost 6) until it was destroyed as a result of rerunning the Lisbon Treaty referendum (nothing to do with an economic crisis then)  
Don’t forget to make your voice heard at the #PeoplesVoteMarch this Saturday!The public deserve a #FinalSay on #Brexit, with the chance to stay in the #EU.I will not give up the fight for our country, people’s jobs, our NHS & future generations! #PutItToThePeople 
Thanks to all attendees for today's parliamentary discussion on soil. Delegates asserted an urgent call for government to invest in healthy soils post-Brexit. We need to unite for flood prevention, biodiversity, food production + carbon sequestration. #SustainableSoilsNow 
The report found Brexit would make some rural areas "unviable" 
Just how could Brexit be more of a shitshow? One crappy deal on the table that no-one likes. Bigots and profiteers shouting for No Deal. Labour still incoherent.10 days to go. Time to #RevokeA50 and take a very long hard look at our own government. 
Grinly amusing that Justine Greening is arguing that  Brexit secretary Stephen Barclay should not be negotiating an extension to Article 50 because he voted against the idea last week. Poor old Barnier, his head will explode if we land yet another clown on him. 
.@KwasiKwarteng #Brexit Minister very offended at being patronised by MPsTo avoid it, a few simple words of advice1.  Come to the despatch box properly briefed2.  Answer the most obvious questions including, what would be the purpose of seeking a long extension to Art50? 
Theresa May apparently stopped the British secret services from investigating Russian financing of Leave. Foreign funding is illegal in the UK. Time we paused Brexit and investigated yet more crimes that led to the Leave win. #BrexitFraud 
Bercow not content to write footnotes in history of Brexit. Wants his own chapter. My slightly short-notice microcolumn:  
6) Kyle-Wilson= other PMs might seize it as the last option standing and best chance of delivering Brexit and dividing Labour but can’t see May having the political agility to do  it.Everything points to long extension.(3/3) 
Isn’t it ironic..... her mantra for 2+ years has been respect the result of the referendum etc but she can’t accept the two hidings she got with the votes on her deal. 
What is happening only makes sense when you realise there are TWO huge issues in play 1. Brexit2. The Establishment is determined to stop a Socialist taking power 
She is in full existential panic now that the Brexit cash bonus she sold her soul for will not be coming, and she will be thrown onto the scrap heap blogging for Yayley Lennon when the grown ups take back control of the BBC. 
Brexit is 268 hours away. #brexit 
Donald Trump's former chief strategist has told Sky News that Theresa May is "not terribly sophisticated" and failed to listen to the US president on BrexitRead the full interview here:  
However it finally plays out, Labours Brexit policy has always been one of common sense and compromise.  The grown up amongst a room of children.For a party that is all too often dismissed as ‘too radical’,  people really should remember that. 
Shaping up for #Brexit   
This is the best thing I’ve read all day. France’s EU minister names her cat 'Brexit' because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but just stands there when I open the door’  
Bercow has some appalling little plan up his sleeve, no doubt about itBut him blocking MV3 throws it all wide openBefore we were being railroaded to TMs deal. Now it's deadThere's all to play for and Brexit MPs need to start playing for keeps 
John Bercow, the @HoC_Speaker_MP, is right to say the prime minister can’t just keep bringing the same #Brexit deal to MPs again and again. It’s time for Parliament to move on - ultimately to a #PeoplesVote. 
Once again I’m so relieved we hold all the cards otherwise, with 11 days to go, we’d really be in the shit over Brexit. 
Whilst the country spends all its time, energy & every spare penny it can find on Brexit the UK working poor increasingly rely on charities for basic needs. We’ve lost all perspective  
ITV Brexit number crunchers (and top producers @MariahHedges @Dominique_ITV) have been contacting Tory MPs who voted against the PM’s deal. They found 28 who are never likely to vote for it. So even if she is allowed a third go and the DUP back it, PM is still going to struggle. 
No, it’s time MPs fixed the mess they created and revoked article 50.  Another referendum would be a mistake for lots of reasons, not least that adequate safeguards haven’t been enforced since the last one. 
Glad to sign this open letter to all #labour MPs from delegates who wrote #brexit policy asking them to follow policy & #PeoplesVote. To those who do want #Brexit, it'll wipe £24bn off spending for a future labour Gov. This handy form helps them decide policies they want to drop  
#JohnBercow #Brexit #ErskineMay Not all heroes wear capes...but some do. 
I believe John Bercow will go down in history as the man who saved our country, it's economy and more importantly it's people from a disastrous tory #Brexit his heroic stance in upholding Parliamentary sovereignty is humbling to watch, he deserves our gratitude, as for May resign 
Dear Mr Tusk, This whole Brexit thing has quite taken me by surprise. I can’t believe you are asking us to sort this thing out at such short notice. Give us more time or we will refuse to let you import our Melton Mowbray pies. Yours, T.May. 
I don't want to be alarmist but Brexit panic-buying at my Waitrose has cleared the shelves of Heston's pan-seared wigeon breast with game jus, Pecorino al Tartuf and Louis Latour Aloxe-Corton Premier Cru Les Chaillots Burgundy 
Hearing that, in some better Brexit news for the Government - a rolled over trade deal with the EFTA-EEA nations (ie mainly Norway)  has been initialled today for signature next week... 
Opinion: John Bercow’s Brexit ruling is mistaken, but Theresa May’s deal is doomed anyway."I think we are heading for a new prime minister & never leaving the EU". 
A new vote on May’s Brexit Deal has been ruled out if it remains "substantially the same" due to this rule of May 19, 1604: “Rule agreed, No double Questions upon the passing of a Bill, though sometimes upon the committing it is double, if the Voice or Question be not clear.”  
Remainers explaining Brexit again. One of the many reasons I no longer rely on the BBC for news and current affairs  
Can't agree with this. If they all thought they were just "playing" before, then what does that tell us about the playground politics that dominates the whole Brexit debate?  
There were always going to be clashes between a govn and a pro parliament Speaker in a hung parliament. The clash deepens because T May convinced herself that the 2016 referendum, and her interpretation of the result,must prevail..whatever it takes.Bercow remains pro parliament. 
From my Brexit Blog of 13/10/16: Just saying.2/2 
Is John Bercow right not to allow Theresa May to bring back her deal for a 3rd meaningful vote? Please vote and retweet #Brexit #Bercow 
Veterans of the 1979 Scottish devolution referendum discussing its legacy 40 years on at a @LabourHistory event at #westminster #constitutionalhistory #scottishpoliticalhistory 
Well... Brexit seems to be doing what Guy Fawkes couldn't do 400 years ago. 
Remember when Brexit was all about the magna carta and various other british/english notions of times gone. Suddenly, enforcing a peice of parliament from the 1600s is 'obscene'. You would think a 400 year old 'constitutional' law would be absolute porn to a brexiteer 
Recommendation has been made, for Scotland’s Parliament to vote to approve The Constitution and Corpus of Law, prior to the UK Brexit deadline of 29th March 2019. Specifically, this is recommended in the first instance, to protect all of the legal powers of Scotland’s Parliament.  
Speaker John Bercow rules out a new vote by MPs on Theresa May's #Brexit deal if the motion is the same or very similar to last week's one that was defeated by 149 votes.  
Hardly the first to point this out, but the Govt & MPs being outraged at not being allowed another opportunity to vote for a Brexit outcome that's already been decided (TWICE!) is an almost-lethal level of hypocrisy. Maybe this is their way of trying to cull the electorate? 
France’s EU minister names her cat 'Brexit' because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but won’t go through the door’  
Plans for special Brexit 50p coin put on hold after the original design referenced March 29th.  
Does anyone wonder if this is part of a plot to allow parliament to destroy #Brexit altogether, and allow those who lost the referendum to win by stealth?The W/A isn't Leaving, anyway.There's NO REASON to defer our departure; we can negotiate later. 
Impressively quick of the mark analysis of today's Brexit drama  
Everyone: ...Narrator: the United Kingdom has officially entered what is technically termed the ‘fuck knows?’ stage of Brexit 
Government know they probably need a longer extension but have no idea what for. They don't know what they are doing #brexit 
The most ironic moment today was seeing Conservative MPs in the House of Commons complaining that they might be denied a THIRD vote on Brexit when they themselves have spent almost 3 years saying that the British people can't even have a second vote on Brexit! 
The speaker of Britain’s House of Commons dealt a potentially fatal blow to Prime Minister Theresa May’s ailing Brexit deal on Monday, saying the government couldn’t keep asking lawmakers to vote on the same deal they have already rejected twice.  
Remainers crowing at their upturning of Brexit should be careful what they wish for. They seemingly have no idea how disgusted decent Britons - Remainers and Leavers alike - are by this grotesque betrayal of democracy. 
Today's decision from Bercow makes these proposals from Alyn Smith all the more relevant. We need to activate the Smith Plan immediately! Revoke Article 50 and have meaningful debate & wide-ranging consultation. Look before we leap. #Brexit 
perhaps some friendly and sane country might like to come and invade us and sort out the Brexit fuckery once and for all? Hello, Netherlands? 
Brexit: Full text of John Bercow's bombshell statement blocking third deal vote  
Had it been clear in 2017 that a Tory government would cause tens of thousands of deaths, force millions to foodbanks and make a catastrophic shambles of the Brexit negotiations, it might have informed the decisions of how millions voted.It will this time...#GeneralElectionNow 
U.K. speaker says lawmakers can't vote on Theresa May's Brexit deal for a third time  
People may forget that @theresa_may was held in contempt of parliament. I'm grateful that we have checks & balances in place to uphold our democracy.  #Bercow #brexit 
Or confusing “constitutional crisis” with “I am not going to get paid my cash Brexit bonus by whichever offshore creep has been sponsoring me to shill this crapola”. 
Anyone who thinks 'Bollocks to Brexit' Bercow is actually trying to help engineer a No Deal is going to be in for a nasty surprise...  
Guy we want to #emain please, by referendum or #RevokeRemainRebuild 
Speaker John Bercow has given the prime minister "an opportunity" to abandon her red lines and to avoid "more humiliation," says Labour MP Stephen KinnockUpdates here:  #Brexit  
 Revoke #Article50 Cancel #Brexit.  Call for a Public Inquiry into how the country was led so disastrously astray. Read and share @Jon_Danzig's summary of the obvious. Link:  
Congratulations to Speaker Bercow for instilling some common sense into the #Brexit fiasco the PM and her Tory cohorts have created. Well done sir. 
Good old Mark Francois MP. What’s his single biggest concern about the current Brexit bourach?“If we do leave on 29 March can we get Big Ben to chime?” 
A rule going back to 1604, which is so well established that Ministers do not breach it is expected not to be applied because this is about Brexit. Says it all really. #brexitkillsdemocracy 
This is the moment John Bercow scuppered hopes of a fresh vote on Theresa May’s Brexit deal before Thursday's EU summit - citing a convention dating back to 1604  
Not all heros wear capes..Oh.. Wait.#brexit #johnbercow 
I just asked Ireland’s Deputy PM his thoughts on Speaker’s comments. Response:Yet another problem. My question:Is a deal still possible before 29 March? His answer: Yes but not before EU summit. Q: Will Ireland come under pressure to give st on backstop? A: EU has said no #brexit 
Poor Brexit minister @KwasiKwarteng, now uncomfortably delivering a statement from the Despatch Box on how HMG will apply for a long Article 50 extension if MV3 falls - which he personally voted against last week too. 
Brexit: Bercow chucks a hulking great spanner in the works  
'Brexit will not now occur.'Ardent Leaver and Conservative MP James Gray gives his reaction to the speaker's decision on a third meaningful vote. More:  
So, with this timeframe, we should revoke article 50, given that everything else has been rejected. Then, if there is still an appetite for this internationally ridiculed parody of democracy, we decide whether a second referendum has any point or we just forget the whole thing  
The 2019 Indian election will be a referendum on Prime Minister Narendra Modi's economic policies and nationalistic agenda that helped give the BJP a majority in 2014.  
For the one and only time in my life I'm in danger of feeling sorry for Kwasi Kwarteng as he stands in Parliament and tries to put a gloss on the Tory Brexit shitshow. Then I remember he's Kwasi Kwarteng, trying  to put a gloss on the Tory Brexit shitshow. The moment passes. 
That #17thCentury precedent referred to by the Speaker earlier today. The question concerned the election of the Sheriff of Buckinghamshire.From the House of Commons Journal, 2 April 1604 (via British History Online)#Bercow #Brexit #history 
Looking forward to joining the brilliant @robertjensen in studio tonight.Talking Brexit, the killing of white farmers of South Africa and the madness of Britain. Join us  
And @KwasiKwarteng who is making the statement as a junior minister on how the PM plans to delay Brexit also confirm he opposes that extension. You couldn't make this stuff up  
So we now have Version 19.1 of my #Brexit diagram - with a little more thought post-Bercow, and some adjusted likelihood.Also some options discussed are mentioned, but ruled out.#MeaningfolVote #Bercow #ErskineMay As ever high res on my blog:  
One of those rare moments when Brexit seems a pretty good idea. #goaway 
Listening to some euro-bod on BBC radio it was clear that EU were pursuing a tactic which hopes Brits will turn against ANY form of Brexit. Sadly, much of the UK media supports this strategy as it supports Remain. Brexiteers must now step forward & demand democracy is respected. 
FYI none of this would be happening if Corbyn wasn't our leader. Another leader would've given May her majority in 2017 and a tory Brexit would've been completed by now. 
UK speaker deals potentially fatal blow to Theresa May’s ailing Brexit deal  
Has John Bercow made a no deal Brexit more likely? #FarageOnLBC 
May banned from another commons vote on same #Brexit dealWow! Bravo Mr Speaker & I should bloody well think so...She has been contemptuous of Parl for far too long!Take back Control from HER!#RevokeA50 & #Remain in Control in the EU. 
Ouch. @JustineGreening says @SteveBarclay vote against Brexit extension last week means "it’s simply not appropriate or credible for him to be the lead person negotiating on this country’s behalf". (New readers: they are in the SAME party). 
Has John Bercow made a no-deal Brexit more likely? @Nigel_Farage gives his verdict live on LBC 
"We’re due to leave the European Union in 11 days and there is no plan" says @Anna_Soubry. The Independent Group will keep doing all we can to make sure that, whatever the terms of #Brexit are, the British people get a final say through a #PeoplesVote. 
According to a report by New Financial think tank, over 275 financial firms are moving $1.2trn (£925bn) & thousands of staff from Britain to the #EU amid #Brexit uncertainty.This is not Project Fear; this has already happened.#ProjectReality #StopBrexit 
Brexit minister Kwasi Kwarteng says the prime minister will write to Donald Tusk setting out the possible extensions that the UK is seeking at the EU council, it will be either the technical extension or the longer one. 
Today I met with opposition party leaders at Westminster to discuss the Brexit crisis. We are clear and united in our view that the best, most democratic way forward is to put the decision back to the people in a second referendum - with Remain on the ballot. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Editorial: Bercow’s glorious revolution scuppers May – and edges us ever closer to a Final Say referendum  
Bercow detonates May's third vote with dramatic Brexit intervention  
Speaker John Bercow Has Told Theresa May She Can't Have Another Vote On The Same Brexit Deal - BuzzFeed UK  
One of the few positives for me of Brexit has been that it led indirectly to getting to chat with Bernie, a guitarist most of us could only dream of being able to play like, about Guitars a couple of times here. Very sad. 
I understand Kinnock (Welsh MP) pushing for a cross party Norway + deal. He says it honours the referendum result. It all appears quite sensible and pragmatic until you consider the damage any Brexit would do to Wales. That's a strange kind of Welshness he's displaying. 
"John Bercow has done parliament and the country a great favour."@Kevin_Maguire gives his verdict as Theresa May is blocked from bringing her Brexit Deal to a third vote.  
House of Commons Speaker John Bercow rules out a new vote by MPs on May’s Brexit Deal if it remains "substantially the same" — Conventions dating back to 1604 meant MPs could not be asked to vote on precisely the same subject twice in the same session 
Kyle Wilson = Referendum choice between May’s Withdrawl Agreement and Remain. no No deal Brexit option. 
The Prime Minister should advise Her Majesty the Queen to prorogue Parliament suspending the current parliamentary session until 2nd April 2019 & prevent any attempts by parliamentarians to thwart Brexit on March 29No-deal/WTO preparations will continue 
i'm off for drinks with my Finnish friend  hit me up if Brexit gets cancelled so i know to get royally drunk lol   
Remainers believe they can unite the Country if Brexit is reversed.How can the Country unite if the referendum result of 2016 is reversed chiefly by the establishment & political elite?Many people will be angry & very upset.Their distrust of politicians will remain for years. 
Overhyped. Overpriced. Undeliverable. Brexit is the Fyre Festival of 2019.March with us this saturday for an actual crowd  #PutItToThePeople 
John Bercow has seized his Brexit moment – and now all bets are off | Rafael Behr  
I keep thinking the Brexit story can't get anymore extraordinary .....and then....well.......it does. 
Attach the Kyle-Wilson amendment to the motion. That will make it different. It will ensure the deal passes, subject to a referendum and it would, even better, mean we don't have to hear any more from Owen bloody Paterson. 
So great great grandfather of PM's husband - via the agency of Speaker Bercow - has just kiboshed PM and her Brexit plan (I am relying on the normally reliable @NickGoodway). 
Re Bercow:No third vote on deal means no deal.No deal means no extension to June.EU can now decide to either (a) extend Brexit deadline, say to 2021, or (b) insist on March 29th exit.If (b), Commons will have to either revoke Article 50 or leave with no deal.Game on. 
i can't be bothered following Brexit vote news, but I look forward to one day reading a scathing review of a David Hare play about it all, and deciding not to see it 
Brexit could deliver a final irony: an extension could mean British voters may, for the first time, have to pay attention to the European elections   
Look, even Remain’s very own @NickBoles would vote for the deal. Last week a senior ERG source told me s/he would vote for the deal. Where does #Bercow get off putting his personal views in front of a #Brexit compromise both sides can reluctantly deal with?cc @jeremybrier 
NEW #TouchlineFracas !!! 201 - MEEDS VS BREXIT SHAUNft.@mrmeeds@shaunypizzle@svndombele@lewbob91APPLE  - SPOTIFY - SUPPORT -              SUBSCRIBE - USE - #TouchlineFracas 
Fun fact for Sci Fi nerds who are following Brexit.In an old Star Trek: TNG episode (The High Ground), Data looked back at the history of terrorism and observed that Ireland reunified in 2024.Ain't that serendipitous?  
The Brexit mess is mired in complexity and ambivalence. But it seems to me the one clear option we have is to turn out this Saturday to say No to this absolute madness, built on lies and recklessness. 
Sneering Guardian journo looks down on passionate Brexiteers who are willing to walk hundreds of miles to stop the Brexit betrayal. Keep it coming. 
Taz flew in all the way from Thailand to participate on the #MarchToLeaveHe, like millions of other Brits, is fed up with the political establishment betraying Brexit. RT if you agree!  
I really don’t think that John Bercow, who volunteered—entirely unnecessarily—that he had voted Remain, is trying to usher in a no deal Brexit 
Unless somebody decides the same rule means there can’t be another vote on a second referendum, or a Labour brexit, or indicative votes, or taking control of the timetable  
The public have had their say on Brexit, it's just that MPs like @CarolineLucas won't accept it.Keep pushing the people of the UK and you will end up with a right wing party in power.That would really give someone like Caroline Lucas something to moan about. 
Brexit chaos as speaker rules May must change her plan to get another vote  
Well done John Bercow. It would have smelt very suspicious if a deal that a massive majority of MPs have rejected twice suddenly got through because of financial bungs or offers of career progression or threats of no Brexit. Brexit now means what Parliament decides it means... 
Government desperately trying to figure out how to force deploy Brexit by EOB on the 29th despite CI consistently failing 
Amazing, Bercow has shot himself on the foot and if he follows the new rules he's suddenly opposed on the Meaningful Vote, he can't bring back anti-Brexit votes either.  
You were telling people to vote this deal down earlier today because it hadn't changed.Now you're annoyed at the Speaker for applying the established rules of the sovereign Parliament that *checks notes* you said Brexit would restore authority to. 
For this reason, a very senior Conservative tells me "Bercow has f***ed himself" - says he'll kill off all the Brexit ideas he might like as well as the ones he might not  
I certainly don’t - it would look ridiculous & just give opponents just more time to sabotage Brexit  
 This is a constitutional crisis. Theresa May must call a meeting of all opposition leaders and meet with the First Ministers of Scotland and Wales to discuss a way out of this Brexit mess.  
Following a meeting of the Westminster opposition leaders, the SNP, Lib Dems, Plaid Cymru and Greens have released a joint statement agreeing a second EU referendum, with Remain on the ballot paper, is “the best and most democratic way forward” from the Brexit crisis #PeoplesVote 
It would mean a lot to me if we could get this petition pass 100000 before 10pm tonight"Hold a second referendum on EU membership" 
I know I shouldn’t laugh, but...I can’t help it France’s EU minister names her cat ‘#Brexit’ because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but won’t go through the door’.   
Brian Monteith: We need to shut down the Withdrawal Agreement and reboot Brexit  
The timing of Saturday's Put it to the People march could not be better. On the back of the European Summit, government, Opposition, all MPs, EU leaders, all need to see the country is not buying this dog's dinner of a Brexit deal, and any outcome now must go back to the people 
Yeah, the EU travelled back in time 400 years and inserted this rule solely to frustrate Brexit.  I must have missed the bit where Barnier got hold of a Tardis. 
They should try resubmitting the same Brexit motion in Irish. 
A long delay to Brexit means the EU gets a lot more of our money.  
Mine does that too but I can't even utter the word Brexit without feeling deeply depressed so I won't be doing that!!  
Committed British migrants in Spain flying to London to join huge Brexit protest March this Saturday. 
Brexit takes years  
On a very strict interpretation of what Bercow has said, Kyle-Wilson (approval of deal conditional on referendum) is all that's left standing. A more politically nimble PM would seize on it as the best chance left of delivering Brexit, put Lab in bind etc. But nimble she is not. 
I was always of the belief that this would ultimately be the choice.“hard Brexit” and “soft Brexit” were always fairly meaningless terms, we are either in or out. And I want out. 
So @theresa_may doesn't like it because the Speaker didn't give notice regarding a 3rd Brexit vote, the irony that 3.7m #50sWomen feel exactly the same about the LACK of notice when our pensions were sneakily filched TWICE!#BackTo60 #OneVoice #ShoulderToShoulder #JudicialReview 
Now it seems the only way to achieve #Brexit & deliver on democracy is with No Deal which is in effect a multitude of deals & a stepping stone to a future EU free trade agreement. It means also spending the bulk of £39 billion at home on public services & tax cuts to boost growth 
Quite rightly, the Speaker won’t let @theresa_may bring back the same deal to Parliament! This would be highly undemocratic & a waste of time. Parliament has spoken (multiple times), the Govt have failed (multiple times), Parliament must take control of this #Brexit car crash.  
10 days to go.We are nearly there folks.Keep Calm and Brexit!  
In my time I always found #Bercow a robust and fair #speaker.  The only reason the UK government can be unhappy, is because they wanted to abuse their power. It is a colossal mess, but of the government not the speaker's making. #Brexit 
The prime minister’s beleaguered Brexit plan faces a new snag as Parliament’s speaker rejected a third vote without major changes to the proposal  
Brexiteers ought not to be scared of an extension. It allows time for reflection, a new strategy and dealing with Brexit calmly. If one party to an ‘agreement’ is desperate to pressure you into it by creating various threats and deadlines, you should always question why. 
If this government was in anyway serious about #Brexit then @Jacob_Rees_Mogg would've been at the very heart of these negotiations, or at least in the cabinet.The very fact that he wasn't raised eyebrows and spoke volumes. @theresa_may 
Loathe it though I do, the choice has been changed - instead of Deal or No Deal, we're forced to choose between Deal or No Brexit. I'd rather fight my way out of a bad deal, from outside the EU, than start the 40-year fight to leave from scratch.  
Parliamentary machinations made simple : Theresa May hasn’t got a majority for her or any other Brexit  deal. If she did it wouldn’t matter what the Speaker says (or the ERG or the DUP or ...) 
Bercow will defo be killed off. After today he’ll never make it into Series 2 #Brexit 
The #PeoplesVoteMarch on Saturday turns out to be great timing! Let’s show May we reject Brexit! #PutItToThePeople 
Thanks to John Bercow standing up for parliament, May's #Brexit is even less likely and the #PutItToThePeople march even more important.**We're ordering our @Remain_Labour materials for the march tonight, please chip in with anything you can** 
Not a single word on the number 1 reason why people voted to leave.  Sovereignty.   Shows how out of touch some are.  #Irexit #IFP #Brexit  
NEWS! Theresa May’s latest Brexit deal ‘substantively different’ after being converted to Comic Sans  
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 18Mr Speaker John Bercow blocks Theresa May's last minute continued attempts at #Brexit #MeaningfulVote3 sending her into a spin! 
Exactly. I’m struggling to understand why some ERG ultras are so chuffed. A longer Article 50 extension and softer Brexit are both more likely as a result of Bercow’s ruling.  
One more optimistic high level EU diplomat told me: “I can’t believe I’m saying this but there are still a couple of days to go till the summit and 11 days till 29 March .. the way the Brexit process has gone so far - that’s a lot of time and a lot can still happen “ 3 
I wonder if @YesThatsTheJoke has a special Brexit file.  
One thing Brexit has done is show that an awful lot of rich elitist parents “spaffed” an awful lot of money up the wall on expensive education for their runt kids to absolutely no avail whatsoever. Unless you count ruining and breaking up the United Kingdom of course. 
Last week I asked PM why she expected MPs to change their minds, but won't let public change theirsShe said: "So you'd have another referendum & there's a different result & then everybody says 'let's have a third one'?"My thanks to Mr Speaker for exposing her hypocrisy today  
Delighted that @UKIP has endorsed calling for a referendum on scrapping the Welsh Assembly as party policy. Indicators show that Wales' performance has got markedly worse since 1999. It's a waste of taxpayers money & the people deserve to have their say.  
The corruption of the BBC during the 2014 Scottish Independence referendum has gone global. The world is watching the unfolding fiasco that was meant to have been a democratic referendum.  
1604 was a mighty fine year.- First recorded performance of Othello- Kepler’s Supernova visible to the naked eye (marked N is Kepler’s sketch below)- Parlimentary convention established that denied modern day government a third “meaningful” vote on the #Brexit deal.  
If Bercow is using English Law, to prevent a "British Brexit" - how does that affect Scotland one should be asking, when the law predates the act of union, effectively breaking it.Does that mean Scotland has been freed by breach of contract? 
EU had been trying to coordinate a reaction to an anticipated request by Theresa May for an extension to UKs leaving process but EU now believes everything is up in the air again ..with 11 days to go till Brexit day 2 
IRONY ALERT:Brexiteer MPs up in arms because they’re not allowed a 3rd vote on the Brexit deal, while being vehemently against a People’s Vote!  
Maybe the real Brexit was all the friends we made along the way. 
EU reaction behind closed doors to Speaker ruling out another meaningful vote on Brexit deal unless there are substantial changes: “Again we thought we could see a way forward. Now it’s confusion once again.” 1 
Given that the EU has said the negotiations are over, by ruling out another meaningless vote, the Speaker of the Commons has effectively made a no-deal Brexit a certainty. 
On the night of the Brexit referendum the British pound went into free fall.While many watched with horror, a handful of hedge funds were making staggering profits  
Former Brexit minister Suella Braverman: Speaker Bercow has ensured the Government now has to improve its Brexit deal -  via @Telegraph 
Hats off to John Bercow. He’s basically torpedoed Theresa May’s Brexit deal.  
France’s EU minister names her cat 'Brexit' because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but won’t go through the door’  
do better, there would be a reckoning, in even greater erosion of respect for Parliament and Parliamentarians. All current Brexit outcomes carry risk. The question is which do least harm to confidence in our most important structures and institutions, those which underpin... 
alternatives are worse. The history of the UK is not one of a nation settling for mediocrity for fear that it does not have the resource and will to do better. And if MPs were to face the accusation they approved a thoroughly bad Brexit simply because the time ran out to... 
Pleased that @AmberRuddHR said she would meet with me about helping to advance my Bill on helping terminally ill people access benefits. Even though so much parliamentary time is taken up by Brexit, I'll do what I can to push my Bill forward.  @mndcampaigns @mariecurieuk 
Bercow: “I treat the House with respect”Speaker and Commons Leader Andrea Leadsom clash over #Brexit vote ruling #Brexit  
Parliament voted in a landslide against a 2nd referendum. Surely  this means no further votes on a 2nd referendum and thus it is decisively sunk.How will the democracy-denying, metropolitan-bubble-dwelling ultra Remainers cope...  
For once, Speaker Bercow does the right thing and block a third vote on the awful 'Withdrawal Agreement' without significant changes. Now let's have a full and proper WTO Brexit! #NoDealNoProblem #LetsGoWTO 
If we think about how much damage the Establishment has done to the Brexit cause in the last 30 months, imagine how much more they can do if Parliament and the EU bounce us into a 21-month extension.  
obviously this is about a fortieth of the £4bn being spent on Whitehall planning for Brexit 
Interviewed today by @adamboultonSKY of @SkyNews #AllOutPolitics. On #Brexit: Stressed #Cyprus goodwill on #A50extension; requires #EU unanimity; have opinions but no say; vibrant British democracy decides; affects  ties & #ourCommonwealth too, hardly mentioned in debate. 
Interesting instant reactions to Bercow's statement, some thinking it scuppers Brexit/makes referendum more likely; others that it's a gift for the Ultras/makes no-deal more likely. Truth is, it's impossible to know - all chips now thrown in air and no telling where they'll land. 
IMPORTANT ADVICE. Following speaker Bercow's announcement, it looks like hard Brexit will happen. Please stay away from all supermarkets whilst panicking remainers stock up.  
1/ Lots of people noting that Speaker John Bercow is relying on a 1604 precedent to prevent May from putting the substantially same Brexit package up for another vote.  
I spoke to @BBCNews welcoming the decision that the same deal cannot be voted on for a third time. It will concentrate minds and encourage MPs to consider Malthouse Plan B to deliver Brexit on time and in full.  
And again. The British people will wake up tomorrow to see their chance of moving forward on Brexit has been vetoed by the Speaker of the Commons citing a precedent from 1604. This can’t go on much longer. 
Senior Tory MP: “The House is on fire and John Bercow has just locked all the exits - the logic of his statement is that he’s blocked the deal, he’s blocked no deal and he’s blocked a second referendum as the house has rejected all of them” 
Bercow will be torn apart by Brexit-supporting papers tomorrow, but, to be honest, he's spared us a further national humiliation. Also I don't like sequels - MV2 was bad enough, MV3 would have been up there with Jaws 3 as a really rubbish sequel that damages the whole franchise.  
a second referendum would be sooooo undemocratic not like the cold hard democracy of theresa may calling a new vote on her unchanged deal every 4 days 
John Bercow, today very clearly & eloquently articulated his judgement on the rumour, May might return to Parliament a 3rd time, with her rejected Brexit deal. It was a warning shot, delivered without ambiguity. An injection of sanity & authority, to protect democracy. Thank you. 
Well I for one could not be more pumped for the Real Brexit Has Never Been Tried vs Real Socialism Has Never Been Tried Election.  
Here is my statement in response to Commons Speaker @johnbercow1 ruling out the government holding another vote on its previously rejected #Brexit agreement if the motion remains "substantially the same".@Peston@BBCPolitics@SkyNewsPolitics@guardian@LeadNotLeaveUK 
Wonderful Brexit vignette outside Parliament - a Leaver with a sign saying 'Clean the Augean Stables' patiently explaining to passers-by what exactly the Augean stables are. 
UKgov's current status with 11 days to go till Brexit:  
Respectfully disagree with Mr Speaker: I myself submit lectures to my students year after year without making substantial changes! #erskinemay #Brexit #analysis #TEFbronze 
Ok, we're done here. Just a smouldering wreckage of Brexit and the British constitutional arrangements left now. Points of order over. 
In light of this latest major #BrexitChaos an application to hold a vote under #SO24 #RevokeA50 would be wise to be held a week Wednesday at the lastest 2 days before #Brexit Well done @CMonaghanSNP asking the question on Revocation. 
I'm sensing this will be John Bercow and Theresa May later now he's not allowed a third meaningful vote on her #Brexit deal.  
Bercow is about the only politician in Britain coming out of Brexit with his reputation enhancedBrexit: John Bercow rules out third meaningful vote on same deal 
James Cleverly: "People would have voted differently if we had known the facts". Also James Cleverly: "There shouldn't be another EU Referendum even though people didn't know all the facts". 
BREAKING: General Election looms as Theresa May’s Brexit deal ruled ineligible to be voted on for third time  
Delighted to be in Edinburgh today with the Standing Council on Europe, at a critical time, with only days to go to the end of the art 50 process. #Brexit  
pro-Brexit MPs: 'The UK voted to leave the EU! we should all respect the result of the referendum, even if there were irregularities.'also pro-Brexit MPs: 'We should have been told that the vote last week was binding before having it! We might have voted differently!'#brexit 
"John Bercow was the man responsible for No Deal Brexit" is a headline no sane person would have ever written. Today, I'd give my right kidney* for it to come to pass... * it hasn't had a very careful owner, but point stands  
The pantomime of Westminster will not survive Brexit.I am delighted. 
Bercow is advocating now that Remain MPs use an emergency debate to revoke Article 50 under SO24. This is what we're up against folks. This deal might be terrible, but my God it's clear these politicians don't give a damn what the people think, as long as they can stop Brexit. 
Bercow pointedly leaves open the suggestion that Mrs May's deal, if made subject to a confirmatory public vote in a referendum, would constitute the 'demonstrable change' in substance that he is seeking to allow a further Commons vote 
Who would win a #Bercow vs @andrealeadsom wrestling match? My money is on Leadsom... #BrexitShambles #Brexit 
You've had two chances Theresa, so a big thank you to Mr Speaker himself, John Bercow for stopping you from embarrassing us all further. Meaningful Vote 3 is dead.  Only a General Election or 2nd referendum will see your deal through now. I'll take an Election please!  
The government is playing Brexit football against a 12 player team including the referee. 
In between everything else going on today with Brexit, don't miss this:  
This new bollicks coming from parliament I don't understand a lot of it as many won't. You can bet your bottom dollar its designed around delaying Brexit. They say IF the eu gives us more time!! Of Course their give us more fucking time.It means £39 billion to them  WANKERS!! 
Labour MP Helen Goodman says that blocking further meaningful votes will also block the power of MPs to attach amendments to it on, for instance, a second referendum.Bercow says MPs can gain that power by taking more advantage of Standing Order 24 (adjournment) motions. 
No 3rd Meaningful Vote ... Erskine May has the rule so that members cannot be bullied, blackmailed or bribed into changing votes ...was there anybody being offered bungs ?? #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
We should thank Mr Speaker for finally outing Brexit for what it really is: a constitutional crisis of the first magnitude #1604  
Brexit: John Bercow rules out third meaningful vote on same deal  
Erskine May is trending thanks to John Bercow's #Brexit vote ruling What is it?   
France's European Union minister names her cat "Brexit" because when she opens the door to let him out "he stays put"  
Speaker of Britain's House of Commons deals potentially fatal blow to Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal, saying the government can't keep asking lawmakers to vote on the same deal they have already rejected twice.  
Gov - 'Can I have a Brexit Deal?'Parliament - 'No'Gov - 'Can I have a Brexit Deal?'Parliament - 'No'Gov - 'Can I have a Brexit Deal?'Speaker - That's enough! Go to your room.  
Thanks to whoever came up with #erskinemayhem. A perfect chapter title for Brexit Book 3 
Bercow asked by Kate Hoey why he allowed MPs to table multiple amendments attempting to rule out a no-deal Brexit, but he won't allow the government to table multiple motions on May's deal.Bercow says that nobody complained to him about those amendments at the time. 
According to Number 10 the cost to taxpayers of having European elections in Britain this summer - because of a long Brexit delay - would be £108m 
1604 - work begins on the King James Bible, Shakespeare premiers “Othello”, Spain captures Ostend, Kepler spots a supernova - and the speaker of the HoC makes a ruling that screws up #Brexit in 2019 
Commons Speaker John Bercow says Theresa May cannot hold a third vote on her Brexit deal if her motion is the same, or very similar to, the one that was heavily defeated last week, citing 'convention' dating back to 1604.  
Logically.The Withdrawal Agreement is closed. The Political declaration is not.To pass Bercow tests, we therefore need to change PD (CU, Norway) and test majority. The EU is clear it's happy to expand PD; fair to presume they will accommodate? #brexit 
Brilliant parliamentary trolling by The Speaker, John Bercow, who has just announced that he will not allow Theresa May to bring her Brexit deal back for yet another meaningful vote unless there are substantial changes as per House of Commons rules.  
James Cleverly basically says if MPs knew it was the last chance they'd get to vote on the #brexit deal they'd have voted differently. Bercow replies to Cleverly like he's a child, pointing out it's not Speaker's job to hold MP's hands. Which is entirely understandable really. 
John Bercow blocks Brexit Meaningful Vote 3 in blow to Theresa May - she will NOT be allowed to keep trying to force Parliament to back her pitiful deal  
Brexit on Bits. @WINDOWKID 
Imagine the Tories who consistently ignored parliament over the last term (not publishing brexit advice when paiament voted to, for example), and who bribed the DUP to give them votes, lecturing on "breaking the constitution". What a laugh!!  
Taxi for Brexit 
Government can't bring the Withdrawal Agreement back to the House.But Speaker Bercow doesn't rule out bringing back yet more votes on holding a second referendum. That's how it is in a parliament of pro-EU politicians that are in cahoots with a disgracefully partisan Speaker.  
Tory minister after Tory minister asking Bercow to outline in what way a revision of a Brexit deal might practically differ from previous drafts, is reminiscent of when students try to wrangle out of you what they should write in their essays. 
Speaker John Bercow Says PM CAN’T Ask MPs To Vote On Same Brexit Deal Again  
Dear @theresa_may I stupidly voted for you because you promised to deliver Brexit. I am paying for you with my taxes,So can I return you under the sale  of goods act as being unsatisfactory or unfit for purpose for a refund or exchange. Do trading standards apply to you? 
MUCH hilarity as #Bercow reminds the House of the time he told Tory Brexit ultra Mark Francois he thought him to be "intellectually knee high to a grasshopper"  
If EU27 now refuse any Article 50 extension, the UK has a simple hard choice: revocation or a Hard Brexit.And the UK is not prepared for the latter. 
The view from my business colleagues here in Frankfurt:1. They are preparing for hard Brexit2. They do not want UK to have an extension 3. They cannot believe what has happened to their British friends4. They are dismayed by the lies about the EU & its benefits. #BrexitDeal 
Does this mean Parliament can’t have another vote on a second referendum because it’s substantially the same as the previous one? Or does it not count if #Bercow agrees with it? 
I love you John Bercow.Theresa May warned she cannot hold another vote on same Brexit deal   
James Cleverly tells Bercow that he should have made his intervention before allowing the second meaningful vote so that MPs knew it was their last chance to pass a deal before Brexit day. 
Season Finale of Brexit turning out to be a belter. 
Thanks to Bercow, the chances of May's deal passing before Brexit day have now massively reduced and the chances of the UK either: 1) leaving the EU without a deal, 2) agreeing to a lengthy extension of Article 50 3) holding a general election.have all shot up. 
The Speakers ruling that a motion already put and defeated cannot be asked again is surely the end of any second referendum or @peoplesvote_uk given the motion put and defeated last week? 
For the love of God, please someone in Westminster just call it, Brexit: time of death. 
UK Gov caught in a pincer-movement between Speaker and the EU27 in #BrexitChaos#RevokeA50 is now the only escape #Brexit 
Brexit: As John Bercow rules MPs can’t keep going over the same things again and again, many wish he’d thought of this two years ago. 
BREAKING: General Election looms as Theresa May’s Brexit deal ruled ineligible to be voted on for third time  
Dear people who voted Leave, if Brexit doesn't happen it will be because the likes of Jacob Rees-Mogg and Mark François voted against Brexit in the commons. TWICE. 
Theresa May banned from another Commons vote on same Brexit deal  
Extend article 50, arrange second referendum in which Mays deal or staying in EU are on ballot. Crisis over.Where do I send my invoice? 
House of Commons Speaker John Bercow has ruled out another vote on Theresa May's Brexit withdrawal agreement if the motion is substantially the same as last time.Read more:  
Brexit: John Bercow rules out third meaningful vote on same deal  
Outraged at 1604 law being used to stymie May's 3rd Brexit vote? We only got tuis vote at all because of Edward Coke 1610 ruling on proclamations. Jacobeans teaching modern Tories the time-value of democracy! 
Has Bercow just increased the chances of a no deal Brexit? If May can't hold a third vote on her deal, the EU could refuse an extension on the basis that May has no plan. That would mean a no deal Brexit. 
me following british news:"wow these latest brexit developments ar....LOOK AT THESE GOOD CHONKS" 
Speaker rules out Brexit vote on same motion - got to admire Mr Bercow! #StopBrexit 
“The Brexit deal remains flawed. I intend to honour Article 50 by voting against it again”.  Quite tight, although it now looks like it won’t even come back to the Commons. We just need to leave, a managed No-Deal is the best option..  
Government planning to table a lufgninaem etov this week. #Brexit  
This is a major move that throws even further chaos into the Brexit shambles. The only people to blame for this is the government. They haven’t listened, they haven’t adapted, they haven’t respected what we’ve told them.  
 First Minister @NicolaSturgeon has written to Theresa May over serious concerns regarding the continued failure of the UK government to seek a broad consensus on #Brexit.  
So far Brexit has been a politial crisis Bercow seems determined to make it a constitutional crisis 
In the normal course of events, as the speaker says, parliament says no, and the issue is dropped. But in this case, this is not an option, because these votes respond to an instruction in a referendum, endorsed by parliament, which rules out dropping back to the status quo. 
What a brass neck this bloke has, as the consequences of his failings in office mount up. Failure to plan for losing referendum, policing cutbacks, housing market, and the small matter of the garden bridge funding scandal.  
Theresa May wants to keep asking the same Brexit question again & again & again...With a #PeoplesVote, we just want one shot at whatever crazy mess she & the Parliament cooks up. 
Bercow has just gone even further - He suggests he will not allow another Brexit deal vote unless EU agrees further changes -  
Any MPs complaining of the pressure they are under re Brexit should be reminded of the words of the great Aussie cricketer (and Second World War pilot) Keith Miller, asked about the pressure of playing cricket: "Pressure is a Messerschmitt up your arse, playing cricket is not". 
imagine having a 415 year old precedent in your pocket and actually finding a use for iti mean seriously brexit is insane 
Bercow decision today to finally block another “meaningful vote” is one step closer to the final “do not resuscitate” we have all been waiting for, when it comes to this ridiculous horror show called Brexit  
OK its more complex but basically in the last 7 days Parliament has..1. Voted down May's deal2. Voted down No deal3. Voted down a 2nd Referendum4. & now the Speaker dissalows a 3rd Meaningful voteWhats open now?Literally no one knows.Nobody. Not a scoobie. 
Bercow further raises the bar for any MV3. Any new Brexit deal would have to include more than an agreement with the DUP. It wd , for example, have to include new deal with EU. 
BREAKING: Nadine, Nicola, Sarah, Cheryl and Kimberley have arrived at Downing Street to sort out British politics #Brexit  
Brexit is only 11 days away. What an utter shambles. We must put it to the people or revoke A50. 
When are we going to be allowed a referendum on leaving John Bercow?  
JK Rowling reveals Harry Potter voted against Brexit  
Hilary Benn asks whether there must be negotiations with the EU to make TM’s brexit deal to be “sufficiently” different to be voted on again.John Bercow says: “In all likelihood the answer is yes.” A change to legal opinion not enough  
Blimey. Bercow just blew up the Attorney General plan to clarify his  govt advice on Brexit: "Simply a change in an opinion about something wouldn't in itself constitute a change in the offer'  
BREAKING NEWS Bercow sabotages May's Brexit deal: The Speaker says the PM can NOT keep bringing her plan back to MPs for votes until it passes leaving her strategy for leaving the EU in tatters 
The utter mess the govt finds itself in, & has thrown the country into, is a result of its evasive, secretive, dishonest & divisive approach to Brexit from the start. May never sought to consult or to unite. The state she, & we, are in now is in large part because of that. 
Theresa May is running out of options.The best way out of this mess now is to give the British people the final say: the Brexit deal on the table or staying in the EU. Agree? Back our campaign >  
Meanwhile solicitor general, Robert Buckland says Parliament night have to prorogue - ie pack up and start again in another session - says speaker is ‘interventionist’ and ‘tensions of brexit’ are starting to bite 
Parliament being forced to obey a UK law made in 1604 is the most Brexit thing ever. 
*checks quietly in on the latest brexit news**checks quietly out again* 
Bercow says the Government cannot hold vote after vote on a #Brexit deal already rejected twice by MPs.It's only right that the public now have their say with #PeoplesVote.If they too reject it, we must remain in the EU and heal our divided communities. 
Anyway, it's officially 11 days to go before Brexit, and the House of Commons is arguing about precedent from 1604 on whether a government deal resoundingly rejected twice can be put to MPs a third, or even fourth, time.Global Britain. 
I guess Bercow's decision now rules out any further motions on*Customs Union*Single Market*Second Referendum*Norway*Cooper/BolesThat leaves No Deal then. 
Given Parliament has voted against -Brexit deal2nd referendumEEACustoms Union Indicative votes etc *On multiple occasions*Mark Francois point absolutely killer. How can Bercow reject MV3 but take votes on those options ? 
Speaker John Bercow rules out #Brexit vote on same motion rejected by MPs last week  
I wonder if Bercow will also ban MPs from voting on a second referendum again...! 
Theresa May can't bring her deal back for a 3rd time, Italy will stop an extension to Article 50, there isn't time to change the Law to revoke Article 50.So only 1 option left - No Deal Brexit next week.John Bercow blocks 'Brexit Meaningful Vote 3'   
The face of a man who has just lobbed a giant firework into the political chaos of Brexit. pic.twitter.com/0gxCXGcEvU 
BREAKING: UK House of Commons Speaker John Bercow rules out another vote on Theresa May's Brexit deal 
You 'think most people in Britain' want a 'no deal' Brexit that precisely nobody voted for? That's not really how democracy works, J-Dog.If only there was some way to ask them... #PeoplesVote 
"1604" is trending on Twitter, as the date of the piece of legislation relied upon for the latest twist of Brexit.  This is not a parody. 
Government's Brexit deal needs 'substantial changes' before MPs can vote on it again, House of Commons Speaker John Bercow rules 
So Theresa May's deal is officially OFF the table. The great people of the United Kingdom took Remain OFF the table when they comprehensively voted against it in 2016.So a clean, WTO Brexit is the only way forward. Pop the champers open, it's party time   
House of Commons speaker John Bercow says Prime Minister Theresa May cannot bring further meaningful votes on Brexit unless there's a substantial difference in what she is offering.  
House of Commons Speaker John Bercow rules out a new vote by MPs on UK PM Theresa May's #Brexit deal if the motion is the same, or very similar, to last week's defeated oneUpdates:  
BREAKING... Speaker Has Ruled Out Another Meaningful Vote On PM's Deal If Motion Is Substantially Same As Last Time. #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Another bung to the DUP doesn't count as a meaningful alteration to the meaningful vote motion.  Brexit permashambles goes nuclear.  
Wow. John Bercow, the Commons speaker, has just thrown a huge spanner in the works for Theresa May's Brexit plan. He has said he won't allow a third meaningful vote if it is substantially the same proposition. 
He's not allowed Meaningful Vote 3!So May has two choices:Request an Article 50 extension from the EU subject, probably, to a General Election/Second ReferendumOr leave with No Deal It's just got about as serious as it can getShe has to leave with No Deal 
BREAKING: John Bercow rules Theresa May is not allowed to hold another vote on her Brexit deal unless it has changed  
Holy Moly! May's Brexit plan banjaxed by the Commons Speaker ruling she can't have a third bite of the Parliamentary cherry unless her deal's substantially changed 
What @BorisJohnson said was: “If NHS services continue to be free this way they’ll continue to be abused like any free service... if people have to pay for them they’ll value them more.” They won by promising to protect an NHS they’d dismantle & your Brexit sign can’t change that  
John Bercow has (almost) gone and done it. Government cannot bring forward a 3rd vote on Brexit if it's substantially the same proposition as before. It would be the first use of this power of the Speaker since 1920 
Bercow says he will block the government from making MPs vote again on May's Brexit deal if it is "substantially the same" as the deal rejected in last week's meaningful vote."Decisions of the house matter. They have weight," he tells MPs. 
John Bercow blocks Theresa May from holding further “meaningful votes” on her #Brexit deal unless PM brings forward a new proposition 
Think it’s fair to say the Speaker has taken back control. #Brexit 
Speaker making a statement & issuing a ruling on the ability of the Conservative Gov to keep bringing the same Brexit deal back to @HouseofCommons (we’ve said no twice already). He’s essentially ruling that they cannot and they are wasting Parliamentary time. #Brexitshambles 
Now summarises chronology with Brexit deal. Published Nov 14th. Was supposed to be voted in Dec. But it was postponed, after over a 100 speeches made in debate. 
Bercow is slowly lacerating Theresa May’s entire handling of the Brexit parliamentary process. 
Me: brexit cant possibly get more complicatedJohn Bercow:  
Bercow is sounding like a man who is about to say, in Parliamentary language, p**s or get off the pot. #Brexit @LBC 
Because the good and decent people of the UK are fighting #Brexit with everything they have. WE are the Opposition now. The tide has turned. The march on Saturday will be the biggest in a generation.We will never give up on the EU - the EU must not give up on us.  
If as reported DUP leader Irlene Foster gets a seat at trade talks after Brexit when leaders of devolved parliaments don’t, that will be enough in my book for Nicola to call Indyref. I am in support of waiting until Scots know the Brexit outcome but patience is running out fast 
Says he's been asked to pronounce on it by both sides of House and Brexit debate. Quotes the relevant section of Erskine May 
The speaker is about to make a statement in the House of Commons. Watch LIVE:  
No deal, no problem. A Brexit on WTO means next week we take back full control of our fishing waters, control immigration immediately, EU fees stop this month & there’s no £39bn brexit bill, EU courts lose all authority over the UK, we decide on tariffs & we can sign trade deals.  
1. Before speaker statement and any big fuss...he has power to say govt can’t hold another vote on the same proposal - with another vote on the same Brexit deal 
Ourselves and @Nigel_Farage are the two most viral political Facebook pages in Britain at the moment with an eye-watering 4.9 million engagement last week alone.The British people are bypassing conventional media and are up in arms at this Brexit betrayal. Join us today!  
So one of these individuals has a twitter account  - active for 6 years. No tweets prior to 2016 and then from 2016 to late 2018 it's entirely taken up with cat memes and stuff about The Beatles and Pink Floyd. Suddenly in November 2018 she starts going tweetastic about Brexit. 
Why should the EU27 even consider a #Brexit extension this week, if the UK Parliament vote on the deal is cancelled? Where are the cross-party talks? I will keep saying this; it is time for country to come before party!   
Putin's in Crimea today, 5 years on from the referendum. Responding to a member of the Jewish community, he says "So, the Jews have problems with finances: Only in Crimea could this be possible.” (everyone laughs) Putin then says "thank you" in Hebrew.  
Hoot for Brexit! "Nobody needs a lift?" "No!!!" We will keep on going on the #MarchToLeave 
It's a dereliction of duty that the Government has not prepared Britain for a no-deal Brexit. Philip Hammond and Theresa May have deliberately sought to prevent the legal default option and should be sacked for it..  
NORMAN LAMONT: If Tory MPs kill off Brexit, they will NEVER be forgiven  
To all those lying MP’s who think when Brexit Is over the heat will die down.Wrong!!Prepare for war, all those that betrayed your constituents, we know who you are and you are going to be hounded out of Parliament.Start looking for jobs because you have no future in politics. 
I don’t know how many times this needs to be said SNP have not wavered an inch since June 2016 ‘once the terms of Brexit are known we will make our position on Constitution known’The terms are still not known because of F’n Tories not because of SNP 
I disagree. The PM’s deal isn’t a version of Brexit, it’s a version of Remain - but worse.Brexit can be stopped by Remain MPs *for now* but we will fight on and win Brexit all over again. It may take a couple more years but we aren’t staying in the EU. That ship has sailed.  
If you want to know just how much danger Brexit is in, let's watch the statement by the disgracefully partisan Speaker Bercow at 3.30, and remember whilst watching it that has already refused to accept a cross-party vote against a second referendum. Odious man. 
You couldn't make it up Leave groups salivating at the thought of a foreign Deputy prime minister subverting British interests so they can win their precious Brexit  
Scottish FM @NicolaSturgeon letter to PM re concerns over role of DUP in Brexit process  
"They are betrayed by those politicians who were recklessly promising things that they were not able to do, and probably they knew that."Latvian Foreign Minister Edgars Rinkēvičs says Leave voters were told "empty lies" during the referendum campaign.  
The German government presented its draft budget today. There was no planning for #Brexit; a senior official said that such planning was not needed since Brexit had been postponed. Make of that what you will. 
The @GOP will be defending 22 Senate seats to keep their majority in 2020. Do those 22 senators really want their careers to come down to a referendum on Trump? Impeachment might not seem so divisive a short time from now.  
For Northern Irish farmers, no-deal Brexit would be a calamity | Ivor Ferguson  
We’ll be standing in the smouldering wreck of a no-deal Brexit and a useless Corbyn premiership, and in the distance we’ll just hear Matt Zarb groaning “but Frances passively-aggressively liked a tweet. Like a child. LIKE A CHILD.” 
I’ve never met a pro-Brexit teacher who believes that children should have their political opinions foisted upon them. Met plenty of anti-Brexit ones. See the link?  
The movement against Brexit says to 17.4 million voters: your voice means nothing, your vote means nothing, you are nothing, don't bother. My entire family and millions like them believed that, for the first time, their vote meant something in 2016, we mustn't let them down. 
France’s EU minister names her cat 'Brexit' because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but won’t go through the door’  
A flotilla of fishing boats sailed up the River Tyne on Friday to protest against @theresa_may's #Brexit plan.  
Hey everyone...If you're not sure about coming on the People's Vote march on the 23rd (because reasons) then come to our Stop Brexit march instead, which is happening in the exact same place at the exact same time. (Everyone else will be.)Problem solved. 
Olly Robbins resigning is not enough.He has carried out the wishes of the Prime MinisterMay has presided over this Brexit mess. The buck stops with her. It is her that needs to go.Trust in the Brexit process will only be restored by her departure. 
Jacob Rees Mogg this morning.“No deal is better than a bad deal, but a bad deal is better than staying in the EU."Not only putting ideology before the well being of the Uk people also before his own principles.How very Brexit 
Olly Robbins the latest victim of Brexit - a revolution that devours its children  
Just 292,316 people in the UK voted for the DUP.  The SNP got 977,568. DUP leader Foster isn’t leading Northern Ireland and Nicola Sturgeon leads Scotland. If Foster gets a seat at trade talks after Brexit when leaders of devolved parliaments don’t,it will be a democratic outrage 
No excuses everyone needs to get to London to Stop Brexit. Let’s bring London to a complete standstill. See you on the march. Love Betty xx#FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Trump Ambassador’s Message of Goodwill to Britain Ahead of Brexit Crunch Week  
If May's deal goes through, we will be trapped in subjugation. People will blame "the botched Tory Brexit ". Tories chances diminished in the next election.  
While #Brexit drags on, children's health is taking a back seat.This is the first generation of children that will live shorter lives than their parents.Govt need to implement their child obesity action plan & implement a 9pm watershed on junk food adverts #AdEnough 
Hey @ScotTories - judging by your timeline, I think your party is still stuck in 2014, because every single tweet is about #indyref, whereas the silence on the calamity of #Brexit is deafening.Just a reminder that we're in 2019 and your party is plunging us into complete chaos. 
Double trouble for Brexit's biggest bullshitters(Billboard location: Trinity Way, West Bromwich) pic.twitter.com/ckmP4SHeNJ 
After The Who’s Roger Daltrey rages at journalists over Brexit, some suggest the UK won’t get fooled again. 
Sod Brexit, @michaelgove is going to kill thousands more Badgers before @Conservatives are done ! We'll remember this at the ballot box @10DowningStreet 95% against in the attached poll.  
At Brexit Coordination Centre receiving updates from @policescotland on Brexit No Deal preparations. 360 Public Order Officers have been stood up to respond to consequences of No Deal Brexit. Let's be clear, despite our best efforts No Deal risks cannot be eliminated entirely.  
Should yesEngland push for an English Independence Referendum @theSNP @UKLabour @LibDems 
So my MP, @MarcusFysh is a signatory claiming that remainers introduced ‘hard and ‘soft’ Brexit after the vote to leave.  Yet before the referendum he tweeted this (since deleted)  
Since no one has any idea how Brexit will pan out, fiscal forecasts are barely worth the paper they are written on   
This story has been slightly lost in all the Brexit chaos. But it's so very revealing of Corbyn's total lack of sincerity  
My cat's name is Brexit“He wakes me up every morning meowing to death because he wants to go out, and then when I open the door he stays put, undecided, and then glares at me when I put him out,”  
Amber Rudd and her team of ministers currently facing DWP questions in the Commons. Err, despite still not having a Minister for Disabled People... after Sarah Newton quit 5 days ago to rebel against a No Deal Brexit.  
Theresa May is trying to run down the clock on Brexit, forcing MPs to back her broken deal.That's why it's more important than ever that the British people make their voices heard. Demand the final say on the Brexit deal, and the option to remain  
We all know MPs invoked Art 50 without a plan to show we were delivering Brexit. Are we about to make the same mistake again - leaving without a plan for the future. This helpful thread walks through some of the implications of the Withdrawal Agreement.  
Watch Jonathan Edwards MP talk about what to expect this week in Westminster as the Brexit mess continues and the need for a #PeoplesVote 
When you’ve spent three years saying any compromise on Brexit is a betrayal, don’t be surprised if you’re called a traitor when you decide it’s time to compromise. 
Is Brexit now at the stage where everyone wants to go home, but no-one wants to be the first to say it? 
Doesn't look like the @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and his ERG will be backing Theresa Mays deal so the only option now is WTO or Parliament cancel Brexit.I think it might cause a little bit of trouble if they cancel Brexit  
John Baron MP: The Brexit deal remains flawed. I intend to honour Article 50 by voting against it again  via @Telegraph 
If someone powerful were to say "let's all forget about Brexit for now and perhaps do it another time" is there anyone - at all - who would seriously object? 
I'm wondering if there will be any British person living in the EU or non-UK EU citizen in the UK, whose rights are directly affected by Brexit, speaking this time around at #PeoplesVoteMarch? 
Retweet before voting. Which #brexit option would you prefer MPs voted in favour of in the coming weeks? #PeoplesVote #WTO #NoDeal #RevokeA50 #MarchToLeave #EU 
Help UKIP fight the next European Parliament elections, or any election which may come first. Let's fight back against the Brexit betrayal and make Brexit happen!Donate at   
UK - rising hate crimes and Brexit and RUPERT MURDOCH USA - rising hate crimes and Trump and RUPERT MURDOCH Australia - rising hate crimes and the #NewZealandTerroristAttack and RUPERT MURDOCH A white supremacist controls the media in these 3 countries. 
Boris: May’s Deal Does Not Deliver Brexit, ‘We Simply Become Non-Voting Members’ of EU  
Just leave this here...#brexit #smokescreen #climatechange #climatedisaster #ClimateBreakdown #ExtinctionRebellion 
“The deal is still a very bad deal. It doesn't deliver on the promises of the Conservative Party manifesto and it doesn't deliver on the referendum result in full...I think a two-year extension is basically remaining in the European Union” @Jacob_Rees_Mogg#StandUp4Brexit 
Not acceptable. Voting for her withdrawal deal is not going to get us Brexit either, but you all know that. 29th March 19 written into law, get rid of May and run the clock down and #WTOBrexit 
Dear @theresa_may as a @Conservatives Member, I didn’t want a Remain Leader but I trusted you when you said we would leave on 29/3 & when you said “No Deal is better than a bad deal”. Now you threaten us with NO BREXIT unless your traitorous WA goes through! I’m just horrified! 
Brexit Can Be Stopped, No Deal Brexit is Unlikely, So Take the Certain Choice  
French European affairs minister Nathalie Loiseau says she named her cat Brexit because "He wakes me up every morning loudly meowing because he wants to go out, and when I open the door he stays put, undecided, and glares at me when I put him out”  
"An opportunist politician conceived a scheme that was undeliverable... And when it failed he simply walked away. The #MarchToLeave is just a 14 day metaphor for Brexit.” 
I’m told by 2 EU sources that following the summit of leaders later this week, a further summit (next week) would not be needed to formalise an extension to #Brexit (long or short). It would be done using ‘written procedures’.And that could take things right to the wire next Fri 
Spent the morning discussing #Brexit with Foreign Ministers in Brussels. General curiosity and concern about Brexit votes in Parliament. Like us though they want it resolved and fear Brexit paralysis  
There can be no compromise on anything so fundamentally racist and corrup as Brexit. You're either deluded enough to overlook the insanity of it, or you aren't. For those of us who believe in common sense and expert opinion, compromising with such idiots makes everyone a fool.  
This is incredibly bad form: @OllyRobbins has behaved like a true public servant throughout Brexit, in the face of nasty unwarranted attacks. He has been a human shield for the prime minister.And in return, No.10 seem to be hanging him out to dry.  
If 20% of Leave voters are already planning to vote Brexit Party/UKIP at a General Election now, what will numbers look like after farcical set of European Elections? 29th March promise should have been kept, Deal or No Deal.  
Eurocrat: Farage Working with Italy’s Salvini to Block Brexit Delay  
The Who singer Roger Daltrey was not impressed when Sky News asked him about Brexit.Read the full interview here:  
Passing this Brino deal will mean the Conservative party will go into the next election claiming to have delivered Brexit.THIS POTENTIAL DECEPTION IS WHOLLY UNACCEPTABLE 
People of Newport West, note that the people behind this impressive looking piece do not have a candidate in the Newport West By-election. Only 4 out of 11 of your candidates support #Brexit, one of which is myself, representing @ForBritainParty 
We believe #Brexit is bad for health, bad for patients and bad for the NHS. This Saturday our chair @CNagpaul will be addressing the People’s Vote March - will you be joining us? Meeting point information to follow soon 
Esther McVey backs May's 'bad' Brexit deal in a boost for the PM 
After the 2016 EU ref I didn't think I could be angrier at govt. It's now 10 days to Brexit day and no-one - not business, not EU citz in UK (& vice versa), not I - have any idea what's going to happen nor any indication of how to prepare.I'm outraged. 
‘If capitulating MPs back Theresa May's deal, it will destroy Brexit and the Tory party”⁦@Telegraph⁩ 
France’s EU minister names her cat 'Brexit' because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but just stands there when I open the door’  
Once seen as the brains behind Trump - my interview with Steve Bannon on Brexit, the wall, Russia and if he’d go back to Trump for 2020.  
17 October 1978: Chuka Umunna is born.1983 Labour Manifesto: We will leave the EU without a referendum.What an utter imbecile. 
The Disaster Capitalism Club Part 2: Sir Paul Marshall and Michael Gove... @peterjukes investigates how the second biggest hedge fund to cash in on #Brexit also played a vital role in the EU referendum.  
Theresa May makes a pledge to the nation "When I've left you in a worse place than I found you I'll fuck off and leave you in the hands of someone even worse #Brexit @theresa_may pic.twitter.com/cpzosXR0Lt 
Brexit-backing MP says 'a lot of people' still oppose May's deal  
Still can’t believe we’re two weeks away from Brexit and we don’t even know if we’re two weeks away from Brexit 
In a curious way, on #Brexit at least, politicians represent the British people quite well, because the British people are profoundly divided says @anandMenon1 on @theJeremyVine @BBCRadio2 @DawnHFoster 
#FrontBench eml fm @Telegraph#quote "20 Tory Brexiteers have written a letter..say they will NEVER back the deal..Meanwhile, @BorisJohnson uses his column to urge MPs to reject the deal + accuse the Govt of collaboration in 'the final sabotage of Brexit'" 
BREXIT UPDATE: Everyone agrees May’s deal is dreadful but there’s a chance it goes through anyway. Corbyn says he might vote to leave in a second referendum, but still doesn’t want one. 11 days to go... 
Can't help wondering what Monty Python team think of inadvertently creating one of the most useful tools for understanding Brexit process. 
 In ten minutes: @benjaminhaddad talks to @florence_parly to discuss counter-terrorism, #Brexit, strategic autonomy, and China.Stream event here:  
Always narrow my eyes when I see woman-focused organisations using the word "bitches". First "bitches win pitches" now "bitches against Brexit". Genuinely: do any women really like this approach? 
WARNING: Tories down with 20% of Leavers backing Brexit Party or UKIP in latest poll. An establishment Brexit betrayal will have huge electoral consequences!  
BUSINESS4BREXIT | ABE supporter, @adrianhuston, talks about why he believes that a #WTO Brexit is now the best option, and what that will mean for Northern Irish businesses. #NoDealReady 
They resigned asTheresa May’s Brexit deal was so terrible for the country. But now they will vote it through for leadership ambitions. Has there ever been a more despicable attempt to put career politics over country ?  via @LondonEconomic 
Pound falls as lawmakers challenge May's Brexit deal before third vote  
Suggested question on the ballot:Would you like to stay in the EU?OrLet a bunch of regressive bigots and tax-avoiding charlatans decide on a Brexit that suits them, but definitely not you? (They will wrap it up in a  flag for you and claim it’s what you voted for.) 
Geoffrey Cox's ACTUAL response to Theresa May dragging her dead deal back to Parliament again, and indeed her entire cackhanded mismanagement of the whole Brexit process...  
Nine-month Brexit extension?It will be May/June before anything new will be proposed.Then summer holidays.Then the barmy days of Party conferences.The a couple of months of indecision and delays.Then December distractions and Christmas.And then another extension. 
'People hate EU!' Juncker warned to 'think carefully' or RISK Brexit catalyst across EU  
Doing @BAHFest London, a history as told via how locals feel about Brexit.Year 1: What's Brexit?Year 2: Ha ha, BrexitYear 3: For God's sake, Brexit.Year 4: Please, please do not say the B-word. 
BREXIT: From 29/03 00.00, HVs drivers: for a rapid transit, those documents will be needed on the port of Calais:  International consignment note (CMR) The Master reference number MRN (barcode) If you are transporting sanitary or phytosanitary goods: the pre-notification document 
Ed Caesar uncovers yet another variation on the story concerning the £40,000 Banks paid to UKIP to pay Cambridge Analytica for the work they didn't do....if you get my drift. 
We're in Catch 22 Brexit now. If Mogg and co back May's deal they'll be branded hypocrites and traitors by the hard core - if they don't they won't get their precious apocalypse (checks notes) ... sovereignty back. 
Can’t believe we could be voting again on the PM’s scrappy Brexit Deal. What part of NO doesn’t she understand? Anyway here’s a helpful @FT map of who is voting for what and who the PM has to convince  - @theSNP are rock solid as “parliament’s most clearly anti-Brexit wing”  
The Chaotic Triumph of Arron Banks, the “Bad Boy of Brexit”  
There can be no compromise on anything so fundamentally racist and corrup as Brexit. You either overlook the utter insanity of it, or you don't. Compromising on common sense and expert opinion makes you a fool. 
Dear @theresa_may, at the #EUCO, with no-deal Brexit not off the table, we are urging you to make good on your commitment to ring-fence our #citizensrights. Almost 1,000 days of uncertainty is enough. We, together with @BritishInEurope, cannot go on like this.#RescueOurRights 
This referendum is part of the history of student engagement with slavery on campus. Georgetown students used enslaved persons to pay tuition, to cook for them, and as personal servants. They also discussed slavery in Philodemic Society debates. To learn more visit @GUslavery 
Dear @theresa_may Here’s your threat, ‘No Brexit At All’Here’s our threat, No Conservative Party Votes Ever Again In Any Election Ever! 
If capitulating MPs back Theresa May's deal, it will destroy Brexit and the Tory party  via @Telegraph 
Eleven days till B-Day(or Bidet as I like to call it)Is this when Her Majesty's Government finally shows the filthy foreigners what's what and mighty Brexit Britain begins its inexorable ascent to Imperial glory?  
We are glad that you have finally accepted this.UKIP is ready to fight the European Parliament Election which your Party Leader will force us into after she delays Article 50 and betrays Brexit.  
Any form of positive action is good... from boycotting EU goods, stay home strikes and go slows to marches, protests and civil action. This will be the Year of Discontent if Brexit is denied.  
And the French EU minister named her cat 'Brexit' because... well...  
Six months ago now...."SNP MP tells May to come clean over secret meetings with Brexit data firm"  
So my MP @Huddlestonnigel has blocked meSo much for being my representative. To my shame, I even voted for him in 2017!I’ve never been rude to him, just asked him to justify voting for any form of Brexit when he knows it will harm his constituents.Please RT this tagging him  
I am going to say something controversial here: Yes, I disagree with [insert US TV star name here] providing his musings on UK politics. However, UK citizen or not, never  forget that Dominic Raab never read the Good Friday Agreement & negotiated Brexit.  
The next issue is taking on a (more than usual) Monty Python theme. Perhaps reflecting the increasingly surreal nature of Brexit?  
Jeremy Corbyn #Ridge 'We don’t want sweetheart trade deals with USA, nor do we want to become a tax haven. We want a Customs Union & Single Market Access to the EU. And a deal that protects workers’ rights' pic.twitter.com/F5WvuLXn3k#GTTO #brexit #JC4PM #Corbyn 
Another week another batch of dullard interviews with Tory MP's umming & ahing over a dead Brexit deal, which is great for them because lets face it, it's not like they have any policies to sing about, is it? Lets see how chatty Mr Hunt is in the next GE. 
These stunning pictures of our staff have been taken by Gianluca Agati, a photography student at @inspiredAUB. He wanted to document our EU colleagues at work in the run up to Brexit, and we thought this provides a great opportunity to say just how much we value all our staff 1/2  
The #Leave  amp reckoned that by the time the #MarchToLeave got to London there'd be 300,000 marching. The reality is there's around 50. The numbers who still want to leave the EU is just a handful. #Brexit has fizzled out like a damp squib. It's over. #BrexitHasDied 
Informative thread on current EU thinking re Brexit:  
As things stand, we’re leaving the EU under a No Deal Brexit *next Friday*. If that doesn’t scare the bejesus out of you, you don’t understand the situation.  
ICYMI While Americans talk about a new party system - under the impetus of Brexit the British are already building one  
YOUR DEAL VERDICT: “You cannot vote for this rubbish May has ‘negotiated’. It’s not Brexit”“It’s time for politicians to fight for what they believe in not just give up” ”The deal effectively means no Brexit”  
Italy to BLOCK Brexit delay: Salvini plans eurosceptic favour to Farage.Time to stand strong, @EstherMcVey1 & @Jacob_Rees_Mogg. Vote down the WA and let's leave on WTO terms!  #LetsGoWTO 
Apparently.... France’s EU minister ⁦@NathalieLoiseau⁩ names her cat 'Brexit' because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but just stands there when I open the door’ | The Independent  
MPs got elected after the referendum. Therefore the MPs mandate is newer and overrides the referendum mandate. They were employed to think about and not just wave through the Brexit vote. 
Minister tells me @theresa_may expects EU to grant nine month Brexit delay. What would that mean for when (or indeed if) we leave the EU?  
Dbl standards for TM who says it's OK to re-run her deal past HofC until she gets result she wants but not to ask the ppl if they want to remain now they're aware of facts around lunacy of #Brexit. Sheer hypocrisy. No wonder she has little or no cred inside or outside her party 
for those wondering why Labour refers to a ‘public vote’ rather than another 'referendum'  
“Brexit has made no difference to my financial situation”  
If capitulating MPs back Theresa May's deal, it will destroy Brexit and the Tory party  via @Telegraph 
22 courageous and principled MPs are defying tremendous pressure to buckle and vote for #BRINO aka The #WithdrawalAgreement.They’re not just standing up for #Brexit, but defending democracy itself.  You have our full support!   
Millions of working-class people voted for Brexit because they have the most to gain from Brexit. The reason the elite hate Brexit so much is that it has given ordinary people a voice, writes @jowilliams293 
NEWS: Churches to hold 'tea and prayer' Brexit drop-ins  
Some Brexit commentary from over the Channel...  
Do you support bringing the country to a standstill with blockades of wagons if Brexit isn’t delivered on 29/3/19? 
Brexit is about being global. It's about saying goodbye to the shackles of the EU and FINALLY being able to deepen friendships with countries which aren't in it, including those in Commonwealth. How are those who express a preference for 27/195 countries calling us the racists?! 
There are arguments to grant a long extension straight away to a) put pressure on MPs who hate the idea to vote for PMs Brexit deal b) avoid the distracting drama of rolling 3 month extensions with the ever-present threat of no-deal 14 
And here's today's 2 minutes hate and death celebrations from the ever charming #FBPE folk. Just the nicest goddam people... #brexit  
If you have been too scared to admit your support for Brexit because of the sneering & the misrepresentation coming from the well oiled Remain PR machine & the Guardian commentariat then its time to say **** this, nail your colours to the mastAt its  Brexit is about democracy  
Rupert Murdoch poisoning our society and inciting hate and violence against Moslems. We don't need independence from the EU. We need independence from Murdoch. #Brexit  
Irritated, frustrated and fatigued as EU leaders are with Brexit, it's still likely they will end up granting an extension - even a long one - to try to avoid a no deal Brexit and the political blame game that would inevitably follow 13 
This was the moment when the govt started to work on #Brexit process. It seems like a parallel universe now. #BrexitBetrayal #StandUp4Brexit 
Some stories that Olly Robbins could go as the price of passing Theresa May's Brexit deal. Imagine explaining that one to your constituents. "Yes, it's a bad deal. Probably the worst possible. But because this chap you've never heard of will be made to step down, I've backed it."  
Telling that the Brexit Party (founded 2019) already polling same level of electoral support as the Remainfest Green Party (founded 1990).  
Parliament voted last week 334 to 85 to not having a “People’s Vote” on #BrexitIt seems for once it reflected the view held in the #UK generally.  52% to 38% reject another Referendum.  
MAYDEAL yes it's a Crock of shit but then so is #Brexit @theresa_may pic.twitter.com/dytADButlJ 
Another important NB: As long as the UK remains an EU member - as long as Brexit is delayed - there can be no negotiations on the future UK-EU trade relationship. Under EU law, these talks can only start once the UK is out of the club 9 
Not to worry anyone, but we are now at the "praying" stage of Brexit negotiations. This is fine.  
.@Sherelle_E_J: If capitulating MPs back Theresa May's deal, it will destroy Brexit and the Tory party  
This is my understanding of brexit right now.   
How easily the man who was prepared to topple his PM over her atrocious Brexit deal, sheds that skin and is now prepared to back her. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
They are giving long, hard thought to costs to the EU of delayed Brexit. The effect of uncertainty on business, investments and citizens rights. Plus idea of recalcitrant UK still EU-midst, influencing next EU budget and helping choose next presidents of EU council + commission 7 
So far, there have been 9 polls in 2019 which asked voters if they support or oppose a 2nd EU referendum that included an option to Remain.9 out of 9 polls have shown that voters oppose a 2nd referendum.  
The French minister that named her cat 'Brexit' because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but just stands there when I open the door’   
The usual pretence that Labour's Brexit policy is too complicated to understand. I hope these people never try to get to grips with the offside rule or indeed try to operate a modern washing machine. #PoliticsLive @BBCPolitics 
Number 10 has said that it won't call Theresa May's Meaningful Vote 3 this week unless it has 'prospect of success' - there are 11 days until Brexit D-Day!  
“Brexit is breaking our politics. Let’s find a new way forward now, before Brexit breaks Britain.”Bang on from @peterkyle & @MPphilwilson on their amendment which would give U.K. public the final say on any Brexit Deal. #Putittothepeople#FFS 
Completely tone deaf from @Jacob_Rees_Mogg on @LBC - he might not have felt the impact of Brexit, but millions of people already are.  
Italian + Greek PMs hijacked proceedings - demanding more EU solidarity over migration crisis and Greek debt crisis – before they would sign up to the EU position on David Cameron’s reform request. Donald Tusk is keen to avoid similar dramas at EU leaders Brexit meet on Thurs 5 
According to the Brexitshambles leaders even Brexit has “nothing to do with Brexit.” Not any lost jobs, travel disruption, chaos at Calais, queues at Eurostar, stockpiling of medicines. Maybe it’s time to wake up and smell the coffee. While we still have coffee...  
Back Theresa May's deal, then put it to a public vote - Labour's Peter Kyle sets out his plan for "a binding, final end to the #Brexit nightmare" 
This conjures up horror visions in EU leaders’ minds over being held to ransom by one of their ranks keen to use this leverage over Brexit to win a concession from Brussels over a separate issue. Remember 2015 when they were finalising their EU reform offer to David Cameron? 4 
If true, this is deplorable. Civil servants involved in trying to make the best of the Brexit fiasco can't be blamed for seeking to make the best of what they've been instructed to do by politicians. It should be resisted fiercely by the Cabinet Secretary  
Today Tusk is in Berlin and Paris – the EU superpowers. But when it comes to delaying Brexit, any one of the EU’s 27 leaders has a veto. The decision must be unanimous 3 
Tories down 5 points over 10 days in latest YouGov poll. 20% of Leave voters now backing either Brexit Party or UKIP. A clear warning.  
The U.K. is in a panic over Brexit. But the pugnacious millionaire whose donations—and Trumpian scare tactics—helped sway Britons has no regrets:  
Reminiscing about first Brexit meetings with UK Govt in autumn 2016. ‘How much notice will businesses need to prepare for Brexit deal? 12 months? 9 months?’ Strangely nobody mentioned 1 week.... #brexit 
EU has almost given up trying to understand what’s going on in UK.Dutch PM Rutte compares Theresa May to Monty Python knight whose limbs get cut off in a duel but insists the fight was a draw. Elsewhere in EU, mood is darker esp with the prospect of a lengthy #Brexit delay 1 
You'd struggle to find anyone among the dozens of officials and diplomats working on Brexit on the EU side in Brussels and beyond who consider Olly Robbins to have been the problem. 
Best print media on Brexit have been #WashingtonPost, @NewYorker & @IrishTimes, @FT & @guardian Seems overseas media owners have less invested in the asset stripping of the UK. 
Theresa May tells MPs back my Brexit deal or "we will not leave EU for months, if ever". Should that not read, "Sack me or we will not leave the EU for months, if ever."? @DVATW @ConHome @BorisJohnson @goddersbloom 
In 1967 Australians had a referendum to decide whether or not Aboriginal Australians were human beings. 
Like a referendum?Thought we did that? 
New Yorker cover pretty much sums up the “decline and fall” coverage of #Brexit in ⁦@nytimes⁩ ⁦@washingtonpost⁩ ⁦@TheAtlantic⁩ ⁦@NewYorker⁩ via ⁦@benrileysmith⁩ 
The perfect metaphor for brexit.  
Mrs May blocked investigations into him when home secretary, she triggered A50 in full knowledge of electoral fraud, she knows he was the financier of that fraud yet she continues to keep silent and push brexit.We MUST now question her integrity and motives 
On whether there "should or should not be a new referendum held on whether Britain should leave the EU or remain a member":There should: 38%There should not: 52%via @YouGov, 14 - 15 Mar 
A Government that has made a complete hash of Brexit, alienating opposition MPs and proving too weak to stand up to the wreckers on their own side are now throwing civil servants under the bus. This is the opposite of leadership. Pathetic.  
EU trying to agree a united front on #Brexit extension ahead of EU summit on Thursday..  Difficult with so much confusion in Westminster. My latest thoughts from Brussels:  
As you can see, I'm facing lots of pro-EU, anti-Brexit parties in the looming Peterborough by-election which I shall fight for @TheSDPUK on a WTO Brexit platform. All support gratefully received.  
May repeatedly promised to honour the referendum and get us out on March 29. Now she is going to Brussels to beg the EU for a "long extension" to our membership. What does a PM have to do to get fired these days?  
You don’t have any class whatsoever you had to stoop that low and comment without any empathy for cancer patients who will suffer as a result of brexit. Shame on you.  
John Oliver - Come join me in my #brexit turd menagerie, select a turd that suits your fancy, so we may ride that turd into a bold new era an era of turds. #PutItToThePeople #FinalSay #RevokeA50 
Britain should just get on with Brexit."Once you've made a decision, once the vote is done, it's time to roll up your sleeves and get the work done."You can't just keep voting until you get the result you want. pic.twitter.com/JY2IjsBha9 
Send this to every MP who's thinking of voting for the Brexit deal.#BrexitVote 
This superb @newyorker article makes an overwhelming case against  @arron_banks: his wife a suspected Russian asset, his business littered with ‘red flags for money laundering’. 11 days to Brexit. And govt maintains TOTAL silence. Britain is so very lost 
« These are unprecedented times » says Eurostar which simply advises its customers to give up travelling to Britain for the next few weeks. #Brexit 
*BREAKING*Statement from the PM."Look plebs, we simply don't want to deliver #Brexit. You may well see EU as sucking all your cash, but us lot have our future wealth to consider."Unconfirmed sources who definitely should be believed have told us, promise.#Brexit in 11 days  
Theresa May could sack Remoaner Brexit negotiator @OllyRobbins to save her withdrawal treaty. Here's a better idea: sack Olly Robbins now & ditch the horrific deal he negotiated too. We voted to leave the EU, not to be shackled to Brussels!Support us at  
Brexit STALEMATE: Theresa May warned no deal Brexit is now ONLY option  
It's just one poll, but knocks casual assumption that Ukip would return 73 MEPs in European elections, if UK takes part.Ukip came top in 2014 and were the original Brexit party, but could lose more than half their seats.  
"She's not terribly sophisticated."Donald Trump's former chief strategist says Theresa May failed to listen to the US president on #Brexit  
Theresa May could sacrifice her chief Brexit negotiator Olly Robbins to try and save her #BrexitDeal. Remainer Olly Robbins shouldn't have be anywhere near #Brexit from the begining. Getting rid of him is a good move but again, too late. #BrexitBetrayal #BrexitShambles 
MARCH 22 - HULL - 15:30GO SLOW Event for BREXIT PROTEST & DIRECT ACTION GROUP UKHosted by Angie Shearsmith Meeting Asda car park, Hessle Road  
No 10 says it won't call Brexit vote this week unless it has 'prospect of success' - Politics live  
What might happen next in the Brexit process? On Saturday’s #bbcsevendays @nick_sheridan bravely attempted to explain the options. Watch the whole show on @BBCiPlayer  
Brexit is 275 hours away. #brexit 
Brexit is 11 days away. #brexit 
For all our sakes: Theresa May’s Brexit deal must be voted down | Simon Jenkins  
The Second Referendum campaign has spent millions on engineering ambiguous language for their voodoo polls to come out with the answers they want.Don't believe them for a second.  
May now offering Olly Robbins up as a sacrificial lamb to try to save her own skinBut it wasn't Olly Robbins who gave himself the authority to run Brexit as his own private fiefdom behind the backs of the Cabinet and even the Brexit Department itselfIt was May  
@GavinWilliamson, does the army have the resources to contain this level of civil unrest if Brexit doesn't happen? 
My name is Laura, for the past five years my job has been supported by EU funding. This has allowed me to keep my family in the #scottishhighlands please don’t let us crash out with #nodeal next week. #revokearticle50 and end this #brexitshambles or #peoplesvote #brexit #nobrexit 
DUP backing will not secure May's Brexit deal, says Jim WellsMy sort of headline. Hope he's right. 
France’s EU minister names her cat 'Brexit' because ‘he meows loudly to be let out but just stands there when I open the door’ 
Theresa May's #Brexit negotiations have been likened  to the Black Knight from Monty Python  
It’s nearly one week till brexit day, and we still don’t know what’s happening. Am confident that things will still be this way in a week. I mean nothing really changed in nearly three years 
Manifesto set out what Lab wld do in govt if it had won that election. Now in a different situation,facing a job-destroying Tory #Brexit. That’s why #Labour Conference adopted new policy explicitly including option of a public vote. Opposing that contradicts Lab policy. 
"They are betrayed by those politicians who were recklessly promising things that they were not able to do, and probably they knew that." Latvian FM Edgars Rinkēvičs tells @cathynewman Leave voters were told "empty lies" during the referendum campaign. 
. @PeterBoneUK "The British people voted to come out of the EU - we can't have an extension that would take us to five years past when the referendum was. Just not gonna happen."  
If electoral laws were broken those responsible should be prosecuted. The idea this means the EU referendum, in which Remain vastly outspent Leave, was “stolen” is irresponsible nonsense. Sadly, it’s unsurprising from @tom_watson. 
In 2011 the Tory / LibDem coalition worked together to pass the AV Referendum legislation and afterwards campaigned on different sides of the debate.We need that same spirit of compromise and creativity to solve today’s challenges too.  
Great summary from @jamiepow & John Garry @HAPPatQUB on NI public opinion:- Clear majority for Remain in NI- Clear (x-community) majority for a soft Brexit outcome for all UK, if Brexit happens- Polarisation btn unionists & nationalists re: #NoDeal & NI exit on different terms 
NB Tories re threat of "No Brexit". No Brexit will not be the end point to this story. Just the end point of the Tories. 
We speak to @lara_spirit, co-founder of Our Future, Our Choice (@OFOCBrexit) – a campaign by young activists pushing for a People’s Vote on Brexit – about why young people are campaigning for a second EU referendum: 
Thousands of children 'could become undocumented' after Brexit 
Daniel Kawczynski called on another EU member state to act so as to frustrate the possible will of the UK parliament and the potential policy of the UK government.And did so "formally".A low-point of Brexit. 
Important article. Britain’s private schools and the unjustified self-confidence and sense of entitlement they confer crucial part of the Brexit story.  
This is simple psychology! The best, most simple solution is to Leave with No Deal on 29/3. But @theresa_may is threatening no Brexit at all if her deal doesn’t go through as she knows that delayed gratification is one of the hardest things to do. I prefer to WAIT for true Brexit 
This detailed @NewYorker investigation into Arron Banks, his Russian connections, and his opaque funding of the  campaign makes an unanswerable case for a Mueller-style inquiry into whether the EU referendum was stolen. 
Criminal May has a whole team of people working to buy votes for her deal. Bribes, honours, favours, promises to be broken. A Brexit bought by lies and money.#FBPE #PeoplesVote 
#Brexit legend #NigelFarage  cuts through the #Tory spin and explains why @theresa_may's #FakeBrexit deal has to be rejected. This treaty is the modern day equivalent of the #TreatyofVersailles. It will solve nothing & cause years of agony!  #StandUp4Brexit 
"We can't have an extension that takes us to 5 years past when the referendum was. Just not going to happen"Brexiteer Peter Bone says both Conservative and Labour MPs would refuse to back a long delay to #Brexit 
About a year ago I said to a Downing Street person that fulfilling Brexit was May’s best chance of having a half-decent Wikipedia page in 100 years’ time. The response was a somewhat huffy: “Well, I think we can aim for more than that.” Their problem is this: they can’t.  
Norman Lamont: History will never understand Tory MPs if they kill off Brexit:  
#Brexit: EU battles divisions over UK delay  
They have taken the country to the very brink in pursuit of their clueless Brexit but it never stops being about the Conservative Party.  
... So, am I the only getting mildly concerned that it's 11 days until Brexit, and nobody has any idea what's actually going to happen?In particular, how if a single EU member doesn't want to cooperate, we leave with no deal by default...? 
Brexit is the kind of stupid scheme, guaranteed to end in failure that would be cooked up by working group containing David Brent, Alan Partridge, Rigsby and Alf Garnett 
France's Europe Minister names her cat Brexit 'because he is reluctant to leave'  
Some hard truths for @UKLabour MPs planning to vote for May’s deal: If it passes, May will be ditched, replaced by a hard right Tory who will then be in charge of Brexit negotiations. So forget about a soft Brexit you will be handing power to the zealots. 
Th biggest worry about Brexit is not, for me, the consequences for the UK (though that comes a close second), but the very possible wider consequences for Western cooperation and stability.  
I’ve never been on a protest before but I will join the #PeoplesVoteMarch on Saturday. It’s partly that I want a 2nd referendum but more to have it formally logged for my kids that I was against this bullshit Brexit our self-serving political leaders served us up 
The final part of @EU_Commission & @theresa_may ‘s Plan:Wear down Leave MPs & voters until they are SO terrified of losing Brexit; that they will choose May’s traitorous deal over fighting for true Brexit!May’s WA is an Intl Treaty; we’ll remain under EU control indefinitely  
Sub-plot to Brexit shenanigans: what actually is Davis up to? Does even he know anymore?  
Today's @standardnews #Brexit #cartoon #illustration 
In a curious way, leaving with the Deal to a permanent state of Brexit-in-name-only is fulfilling the referendum mandate.The referendum was on the narrow question of membership, and made no mention of single market, customs union, etc.Well, UK will not be a member of EU. 
Will Theresa May deliver on any of her Brexit promises?  
One Brexit hardliner who spoke to Theresa May on the phone this morning told her: "I won't budge" and told her to go back to Brussels to request more concessions on the backstop. The MP said May "accepted" his position and signalled she'll pull this week's vote. 
It certainly looks like Jeremy Corbyn would vote Leave in a second vote on Brexit.Remainers across the country deserve better. Liberal Democrats have been fighting this catastrophic Brexit for nearly 3 years. Help us stop this madness now >  
 Scotland’s future must not be dictated by Tory extremists and the DUP. Brexit has shown the price we pay when decisions about our future are not made by us - one way or another, Scotland will get the chance to make its own choice. 
His Disciples did ask, "Are you the Second Referendum?"And Jeremy Said"I AM THE FATHER, THE SON, AND THE ABSOLUTE BOY"And they did repeat, "Amen. But are you the Second Referendum?"And Jeremy Said"I AM THE FATHER, THE SON, AND THE ABSOLUTE BOY"And they supported Him anyway.  
Every single MP should be voting down MV3 because, regardless of their Brexit stance, they all agree Theresa May's deal is rubbish. Killing MV3 stone dead offers the maximum chance of a long A50 extension. That gives both sides a renewed opportunity to fight for "their" Brexit. 
Brexit  
A WTO Brexit will begin the process of rebuilding a once thriving British Fishing industry. #WTOBrexitNOW 
The UK wants a second #Brexit referendum, writes @emcmillanscott:  #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople #FinalSay 
If there is to be a #BrexitBetrayal on the 29th March and we remain trapped inside the EU would you support direct action protests?@ActionBrexit #Brexit#StandUp4Brexit 
Her "legacy"?! Only someone with zero emotional intelligence could fail to appreciate that is already set in stone. Mrs May appears to think she can magic up an initiative to counterbalance what she has done on and to Brexit. Unbelievable.  
How the hell does security minister Ben Wallace know that the security services "want us to get on" with Brexit? And since when did we make national policy on the basis of what the security services want? #PutItToThePeople #NotSmileysPeople 
Don’t know about you but I’m sick to the back teeth of the #EU The sooner we #Brexit the better. Any club that would have them as leaders no-one in their right mind would want to join #BrexitAlliance 
So first they're saying that we would lose the second referendum and now they're saying it's all to do with right-wing fantasies and using Britain as a playground.These individuals are deluded, they need to be ousted from government. They do not represent us!!!#Brexit #29th 
There may be a silver lining. Brexit is a larger disaster than the Suez crisis. But just as Suez was partly responsible for social progress in Britain in the 1960s so, too, Brexit may galvanise the young to reject an old elite that made such bad decisions.  
Et tu, Jacob?The deal isn't just much worse than remaining, it makes impossible any plausible route to a meaningful, successful #brexit@Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Femi (@Femi_Sorry) is a law graduate who took to Twitter to express how he saw #Brexit. His idea was to keep it entertaining and easy to understand. Almost 140k followers later this is how he did it.  
Our #MarchToLeave is a truly epic journey from Sunderland to London against the Brexit betrayal.Our marchers want to tell the establishment they've had enough of the lies and deceit from politicians in Westminster.RT if you just want to leave on March 29th!  
With the European Parliament voting that Russian State actors ‘interfered in the Brexit referendum campaign' and now the Swedish Security Service reporting that Russia is the main threat to their national security, why is Brexit Britain so silent?  
Ignore the nay-sayers – here’s why we’re still on course for a clean #Brexit on 29th March  
Ieri sera Florence ha detto che "we're British but we're also Europeans" BREXIT: CANCELLED 
“The rise of ‘mini-Trumps’ in central and eastern Europe is more of an existential threat than Brexit. We now face a battle for Europe’s soul.” @guyverhofstadt on Viktor Orban 
“If anybody thinks if this deals go through in March, that is Brexit done… that is not true”Conservative MP @SamGyimah has voted twice against May’s deal.He says he would vote against it again #VictoriaLIVE 
BBC headline: Travelodge targets parents to fill post-Brexit staffing gapSecond line in article: It plans to open 100 new hotels creating 3,000 jobs by 2023They aren't even pretending to hide their anti-Brexit bias at this point. 
Italy to BLOCK Brexit delay: Salvini favour to Farage, warns Brok | UK | News |  
'"soft" Brexit'' didn't seem that bad to you during the referendum...  
"During our meeting, Banks spoke scathingly of the Web site Open Democracy, which has published detailed articles on Banks’s business dealings and political activities." Fantastic! @openDemocracy in @NewYorker on #Brexit and Arron Banks by @edcaesar 
The senior German MEP Elmar Brok is absolutely terrified that Italy's patriotic government could veto a UK request to delay Brexit. The peoples of Europe are waking up, and could act decisively to stop Britain being caged by Brussels! Support us at  
This should be made as plain as can be.The Deal is a Brexit in name only from which the UK may never leave.Some of us do not mind this, but any committed Brexiteer should be aghast. 
BREXIT ALGEBRAIf May wins over x Tory rebels, plus the whole DUP, then the number of Labour MPs she needs to win over (excluding those who voting for deal last week) is 64-x.So if 50 Tories switch side (out of 75 rebels from last week), PM needs 14 more Labour.Hope that helps! 
#NoDeal #Brexit would hit N. Ireland first & hardest.@bvaughan44 & I did a trawl to find out what it would look like for those on the island of Ireland, particularly crossing @BorderIrish.We found a mixture of reassurance, omissions & worrying unknowns. 
Parliament has already voted down Theresa May’s #Brexit deal twice, each time by historic margins. The idea that an agreement this tarnished, pushed over the line on its third attempt by weary and browbeaten MPs, provides the basis for a sustainable settlement is for the birds. 
Breakfast with @HuwMerriman and the chance to talk about #KyleWilson and the need for imagination and #compromise to break the Brexit deadlock.  
Brexit was one huge error of judgement after another - 1. Cameron’s fighting his right wing with appeasement2. Parliament supporting a referendum 3. A binary choice offered as  advisory was turned into an claimed instruction for major constitutional change on a tiny margin 
"I have become brexit, destroyer of sovereignty". 
'No Deal' Brexit zealot John Redwood wants us all to ignore the terrible Brexit economic forecasts and be optimistic. Yet, he advised investors to take their money out of UK. Redwood is a self-serving Tory who wants to collapse the UK - for profit...  
If May was as brave as she thinks she is, she'd #RevokeArticle50, quit the job to spend more time with her husband's money, and tell the ERGs to see if they can get anyone to vote for #Brexit.  
"Parliament has expressed a clear opinion with a massive majority against holding a second referendum," says Sir @JohnRedwood 
"The issue is not yet settled." @Jacob_Rees_Mogg says the "only reason" for supporting the PM's deal would be if the only "alternative was not leaving the European Union". Read the latest #Brexit news here:  
Cox encapsulates UK ruling classes' inability to grasp that the 2016 referendum has changed politics.Possibility that Leavers might value some things more than money is dismissed.But disrespecting their views risks bringing the dangerous populism now tearing the EU apart.  
When the bullshit bubble bursts (excuse my French)  #Brexit  
If nobody is doing anything about the corruption surrounding the first referendum, what on earth is the point of having another one. Brits just love being ripped off. 
Current topsy turvy Tory state of play has the likes of Dan Hannan arguing to stay in the EU for longer and fight on for a purer Brexit. Former remainers are arguing to get out now and stop paying EU billions. Privately most say May has to go ASAP. What a mess May has made. 
Disgusting foaming at the mouth, swivel-eyed loon & Brexit supporting nut job Julia Hate-Spewer who has called every Brexit issue wrong casually dismisses an NHS doctor's concerns that lives are at stake.  
“Breaking international treaties unilaterally is seldom possible – as I know from personal experience”. Expert take on #Art62 #ViennaConvention from @philippesands. Essential reading before U.K. Govt try to justify #MV3 #Brexit  
Just 5 days left till thousands of people from across UK descend upon Parliament to demand that we #PutItToThePeople.Meaningful Vote 3 (4, 5?) or not - the Brexit thats being delivered is a million miles away from what was promised. That's why we need a #PeoplesVote#FFS 
WATCH the Tufton spin machine shamelessly recycle its old revolving door strategy of forming doltish politicians and interchangeable clones into multiple on-message 'lookie-likie' groups designed to mislead unwary members of the public and the media; who's paying for all of this? 
The WA is a deliberate expensive delay. It means we do not take back control of our laws, our money or our borders for at least 21 mos & probably for 45 mos under the extension built into it taking us well beyond the next GE meaning no Brexit for 6 1/2  years from the referendum! 
No more need be said - about Johnson or #Brexit.  
A very foolish thing to say , which excludes values and outcomes from the assessment.  Farage backs a right wing , economically damaging and anti immigration #Brexit   ; Adonis passionately espouses co-operation , integration and social justice - and no #Brexit.  
Another powerful international law voice @ejiltalk: relying on Article 62 Vienna Convention to get the PM’s Brexit deal through would be “an obvious, exam-failing, non-starter”.  
NORMAN LAMONT: If Tory MPs kill off Brexit, they will NEVER be forgiven - Daily Mail: NORMAN LAMONT…  #Brexit #News 
Monday again. The start of another week where hypocrisy, ignorance & careerism collide with truth & transparency. Another week in Brexit. This time with 10 working days to go & yet no humility or lessons learned from almost 3 bleak years. 
Told Ya days ago ! Jacob Rees Mogg is going to back Theresa May Brexit Deal  
Read my comments in: The Chaotic Triumph of Arron Banks, the “Bad Boy of Brexit”  
Attn Mr Rees-Mogg!I have just wasted 30minutes of my twilight years listening to you on LBC waffle and spin on how you might vote for May’s awful Brexit Deal!You disappoint me sir!I do believe you are going”Milky”in order to save your beloved but doomed Conservative Party. 
We are marching for a WTO Brexit!#MarchToLeave 
UK - rising hate crimes and Brexit and RUPERT MURDOCH USA - rising hate crimes and Trump and RUPERT MURDOCH Australia - rising hate crimes and the #NewZealandTerroristAttack and RUPERT MURDOCH A white supremacist controls the media in these 3 countries. 
Sent an email last night..."Dear Mr Bercow,I hope you will not allow Mrs May to have a third vote on her "deal". She knows the referendum result was not honestly gained. She refuses to let us have an honest second vote on whether to leave or remain. Why should she get three 
Democracy in the UK isn't dieing, it's already dead.Over 400 MPs represent constituencies that voted leave. Those MPs are in affect, telling those constituents their vote is meaningless.They may as well stuffed the ballot boxes with remain votes during the referendum. 
My painting currently at #Rubenshuis, Antwerp is having to return one week early to avoid any potential #Brexit nonsense. Here are the brilliant guys who installed it there. They shook my hand and said “very nice to say hello. The artist is normally dead!” (Show ends 23/3/19)  
Powerful analysis from leading international lawyer @philippesands: any attempt by govt to rely on Article 62 Vienna Convention to break Brexit deadlock would be “entirely without merit”. 
What pisses me & millions of other people off so much about the government & the treacherous MP's attack on Brexit is that in almost 3 years they have not come up with a single truthful reason as to why we should not leave. You would think that some some  Remainers would notice. 
Lewis during Meeds vs Brexit Shaun #TouchlineFracas 
Brexit’s most disturbing aspect is the casual adoption of extremist views  
FOR SALE - An entire political party. For £1 billion we can change our minds on absolutely anything. Voted twice against @theresa_may Brexit shambles, no worries, show us the money , we will show you the votes. Our beliefs will go to the highest bidder. "Hello, is that Theresa.."  
As the march to leave stumbles on, I'd like to point out I got this press release through under embargo which claimed that "hundreds" of Brexit supporters had tipped up in Yorkshire on Monday, almost 24 hours before it took place.  
What does Brexit mean for Scotland? Next Monday Scotland's Brexit minister @feorlean will be discussing this with us @instituteforgov - join us or tune into the livestream 
Tory MP tells me: "the thing stopping the PM giving a commitment to leave is her Legacy. She's desperate for more time to show she can deal with something other than Brexit". 
Indeed @KateHoeyMP is doing a brilliant job fighting for the sort of Brexit we all believe in. Wish there were more MP’s like her.  
If the UK #economy is to have a shot at escaping a Brexit-induced black hole, practical #growth issues here at home need to be tackled urgently says @BCCAdam  
It's a dereliction of duty that the Government has not prepared Britain for a no-deal Brexit' | via @telegraph 
Have you stockpiled anything ahead of Brexit? 
“Brexit is breaking our politics. Let’s find a new way forward now, before Brexit breaks Britain.” Spot on from my 2 brilliant colleagues @MPphilwilson & @peterkyle 
Theresa May has made the UK a laughing stock across the world with her personal Brexit failure because of HER red linesIt's beyond funny. It's tragicAnd it's time this Tory Govt was despatched into history, where it belongs#GeneralElectionNow 
You can have another referendum once the result of the last one has been enacted. To overturn the result of a democratic consultation because you don’t like the result sets a dangerous precedent: the idea that the establishment knows best and should only ever do what it wants.  
UK Prime Minister Theresa May will be hoping the third time's the charm when she tries to get the House of Commons to back her Brexit deal this week, after two previous defeats | Analysis by @janemerrick23 
DUP backing will not secure May's Brexit deal, says Jim Wells  
Important thread.Article 50 was triggered when it was to show the UK was getting on with Brexit. Look at the mess that followed.Now the pressure is to do the same - last minute pressure to agree WA, but MPs don't understand implications.  
We want all the bitches and all the Man Bitches. Come join us. Let’s make fighting Brexit fun. First event: People’s Vote March this Saturday. Bitches ASSEMBLE!#bitchesagainstbrexit 
WATCH | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg condemns the Brexit betrayal from Parliament last week as an "extraodinary disconnection between our elected representatives and the British people. The Labour Party and the Conservatives both said they'd respect the result."  Vote down the deal, Jacob!  
Having a Brexit vote every week isn’t a substitute for a personality. 
Iain Duncan Smith was on the radio the other day going on about the glories of a No Deal Brexit, so we took some of your cash and shoved this up in his constituency. Always remember, they ruled out No Deal before the referendum(Billboard location: Old Church Rd, Chingford)  
Tories pull to the Right, Labour pulls to the Left. Society falls down the huge gap in the middle.Whatever you think about Centrism, there wasn't this much hate 10-15 years ago.#JustSaying#Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
How much will we have to pay for a Brexit delay?  
Don’t listen to lobbyists. Listen to REAL British businesses. #NoDeal = no problem.#Brexit Tory donors warn Theresa May Brexit delay will leave lasting damage to businesses, more so than no deal   via @Telegraph 
5 years ago, #Russia annexed Crimea in a murky referendum whose results the majority of the world still doesn't recognize. It sparked the most severe tensions between Moscow and the West since the Cold War. Last October, I went to see what had changed 1/2   
Met up with a leave-voting friend yesterday. Feared the worst, but he had nothing to say about Brexit except how completely, utterly sick of it he now was. I asked if he’d like things to just go back to how they were – answer was an emphatic yes. 
If May was as brave as she thinks she is, she'd #RevokeArticle50, quit the job to spend more time with her husband's money, and tell the ERGs to see if they can get #Brexit done. 
It is a democratic outrage that #Brexit means @theresa_may can contemplate flogging her deal a third or fourth time while denying the voters even one rethink, and that the fate of our country depends on the likes of Arlene Foster, Jacob Rees-Mogg and John Redwood 
It is not just failure to understand the other side. No attempt has been made to do so. Brexit is a product of an Anglocentric arrogance which assumes that foreigners will fulfil their allotted roles in facilitating English desires when urged to do so with sufficient conviction. 
If you’re suffering a bit of Brexit fatigue, it feels like it’s getting too much, it’s affecting your home life or relationship? Take a step back and do what you have to. Your health and your family are more important.We got this while you’re gone  
Another big Brexit week begins. What's expected?  
Brexit is stressful. Especially now. Encourage your favourite #Brexit MP and send them your good wishes. Let them know you appreciate their hard work & that you're still routing for them.  
One thing to remember about Labour MPs in heavy Leave constituencies. Up until now they have been able to use the ERG as cover. "See, even the hard-Brexiteers oppose this". But if someone like JRM comes out and says "we have to back this to save Brexit" that position changes. 
It’s absurd that May is now scrambling to secure the support of 10 MPs from the regressively anti-feminist DUP to avoid securing the support of the people. This #Brexit shambles is not ‘taking back control’ - it is anti-democratic. Time for a #peoplesvote 
Like the #windrushgeneration many young persons born to EEA nationals may already be British or have a right to register as British citizens. Many are wrongly and negligently being advised on #settedstatus#lookedafter #Brexit #windrush #belonging #children #citizenship 
We will be paying for years for Theresa May’s betrayal of Britain. Brexit lies - Brussels is offering us a false choice, says NIGEL FARAGE  
Verhofstadt makes no secret of it. They want & will have a United States of Europe. This is our last chance to escape it. Leave on 29th March with #NODEAL . #brexit  
Do you think Conservative Party is betraying The people vote for Brexit? Vote and retweet 
It's a dereliction of duty that the Government has not prepared Britain for a no-deal Brexit  
Me walking around my house listening to meeds & Brexit @touchlinefracas 
On our facebook page today we ask how on earth BBC Wales producers selected Torfaen based far right thug Dave Simpson to ask a question during last night's brexit debate?  In the process allowing him to blatantly try and intimidate 2 Welsh politicians 
This is awful - clearly an intelligent young person - she and thousands like her deserve a better life than that and a better future. How many good quality council houses could we have built in the last three years with all the money we've wasted on Brexit? 
So Brexit is now down to a game of chicken between an obstinate PM and a group of backbenchers who (with some exceptions) have never been allowed NEAR office (with good reason). Oh, and a few ambitious Tories burnishing their d̶i̶c̶k̶s̶ leadership credentials. 
A Ref based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesForeign InterferenceDisenfranchisementRights to be Removed w/o ConsentThe Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the PplIgnored by Govt & LabourThere is NO LEGITIMATE #BREXIT#RevokeA50 #Remain in Control.#FinalSay 
2017: an election takes place 2 years after the last one. The result is different. No-one calls it undemocratic.2019: a referendum would take place 3 years after the last one. The result will probably be different. Voting can’t be undemocratic.March for a #FinalSay on Saturday 
@thecarolemalone Travel lodge have said due to lower numbers of  Eu nationals they are going to put people on perm contracts rather than zero hours. Also going help parents trying to return to workplace.  Brexit bonus.  Who knew. 
Deeply unpleasant feeling. Watching Brexit loons basically decide the fate of the country by whether they'll opt for hypocrisy or consistent idiocy. 
I actually think people would be better informed about brexit if we brought back town criers 
Tory MP Esther McVey: "75% of MPs in the House either are Remain or voted Remain and they are frustrating Brexit every step of the way. To think you're going to get some miraculous vote - that is for the birds."@JuliaHB1 | @EstherMcVey1 |  
Do you remember this quote @johnredwood? Seems to me that the #Brexit supporters still have no plan - no ideas - no clue and are leading this country to disaster in their #BrexitShambles 
The #Brexit deal on the table does not deliver on the promises made in 2016. Whether you voted Leave or Remain, you deserve the right to a #FinalSay in a #PeoplesVote  @Jude_KDJoin the #PutItToThePeople march at  pic.twitter.com/T0wC9Bud2h 
Damning indictment of UK handling of Brexit from @seanwhelanRTE: "The celebration of the unlearned by the unprincipled, the elevation of dogma over fact, the rewarding of bullying over brains - all have led the British political class to where they are now ...." 
Looks like the Appeaser’s WA will be again defeated if she triesTo move the Amendment again this week.Must say I have no confidence we will get to Brexit without anoutbreak of Civil disobedience.So many ppl  have betrayed our democracy and they must not go unpunished.  
Only 2 days until #BlasCymru #TasteWales. An event that brings global buyers and Welsh producers together. A fine showcase of our quality food and drink and an opportunity to develop new markets and international trade deals ahead of #Brexit. #MondayMotivation#PreparingWales 
THIS HAS BEEN DONE BY DESIGN. Offer us a deal that is much worse than what we have or stay as we are. WELL, call her bluff. DONT VOTE FOR THAT TERRIBLE DEAL. Try to drift out on the 29th, or at worst stay in, get shot of May and the Tory's and bring a Brexit Party in.  
If Theresa May’s last-ditch tactics succeed, it will be the most instantly toxic triumph in modern British history  via @bopinion 
Brexit is scheduled for Friday next week. 
Greece is the word this summer and you need to be prepared! Brexit or not you'll want to hop over to Corfu and spend sunshine days with Alex Hallas! Pre-order One Last Greek Summer today!  @Aria_Fiction @HoZ_Books #MondayMotivation #TheDurrells #Corfu 
#Brexit will mark the end of Britain’s role as a great power - The Washington Post  
Proposal: A 9 month Art50 extension for a binding Ratify vs Remain referendum.As someone who doesn’t just care about UK membership of the EU, but also about the EU itself whatever the Brexit outcome, here are, respectfully, arguments for agreeing this from an EU27 perspective.  
Esther,PM's Deal will keep us under the control of EU dictators for evermore, with no exit door.How can you support that?It is not #Brexit.It's WORSE than our current membership of EU.No MP in their right mind would vote for that.It keeps us under EU control in perpetuity.  
Hi Charles, no that's his first point. And I agree unity is a challenge. His second is that "the causes of Brexit were not in general anything to do with the EU". That is simply not consistent with the empirical evidence that we now have from approx. 15-20 studies. Best, Matt 
She was a successful actress on a successful TV show, in what world does that constitute 'failure'?Andrew Morton is useless a man with 90% of his books sold at £1 per book at poundland.U people at d Sun should go & focus on #Brexit useless newspaper 4 wrapping fish & chips.  
Why does Boris keep disappearing and then pops out of nowhere trying to claim leadership? If he'd been more consistent, #Brexit could have turned out a bit better. #mondaythoughts 
ICYMI: a brilliant piece by @peterkyle & @MPphilwilson on how their compromise can break the Brexit impasse. Please RT:  
As an academic I know you prioritise evidenceAlmost every study we now have on the Brexit vote shows that (1) wanting a return of sovereignty and/or judicial independence & (2) to end free movement were the two major drivers, both of which have everything to do with the EU  
New #windrush warningsThousands of children 'could become undocumented' after Brexit  
I'm old enough to remember when Brexit was about political freedom and the trade implications were a regrettable sideeffect the UK was hoping to minimise.Now I hear it was about getting an FTA with New Zealand on slightly different terms than the one the EU will get.  
Theresa May is trying to force her Brexit deal on the country. It's a mess, and Britain deserves better.Let's send Theresa May a message next weekend and make this the biggest protest against Brexit yet 
Four of my Irish friends, living in London, are moving back to Ireland this year because of Brexit. Maybe sort that out first.  
Why won’t the right wing media tell the truth?Theresa May’s Deal is not Brexit...Theresa May’s Deal is utter capitulation.... Patriotic Surrender!!!  Once it’s Signed We’ll be trapped in an EU limbo Vassal State Zombie Forever.. FOREVER!!!  
One key to understanding Brexit so far is that EU27 has not dumped on Ireland in the way the UK would have done had the roles been reversed.This is what London finds hard to comprehend. 
Brexit has failed. It’s not deliverable. The best choice for Britain now would be to #RevokeArticle50Now Second best choice is long delay and referendum. Worst choice to pass the deal. This will trigger legal action in Dublin.  
Stop the #Brexit Countdown and Think Again. @bopinion share their support for a #PeoplesVote: 
Amidst all the Brexit nonsense, the Overseas Electors Bill comes back to the Commons on Friday 22nd for the Report Stage. Brits abroad have been disenfranchised long enough - time to give us back our democratic rights & #VotesForLife@BremainInSpain @InLimboBrexit @BrexpatsHOV 
Utter Cowards The Mail advising this but taking no comments; Now have YOUR say! Tell your Tory MP to to back Mrs May's Brexit Deal  via @MailOnline 
Hearing about all the Tory infighting over who will be the next leader makes me feel ill.Their passion is not spent on the suffering of citizens or fixing the Brexit mess... but on knifing each other to climb the pile....as the country descends.I want them all out. 
This powerful piece from Fareed Zakaria shines an unsparing light on Britain’s loss of international reputation and influence as a result of Brexit. He sees it as marking the point where the idea of the West begins to crumble. Sobering.   
No @BorisJohnson - your party failed to deliver Brexit and there is no going back for the Tories. It is institutionally Europhile and unreformable, just like the EU.You have zero credibility while you stay in that tired, old establishment party. 
My views after almost three years since Referendum haven't changed about Brexit particularly hard Brexit.  
We are only now, in March 2019, focusing on what was agreed, in principle, by UK and EU27 in December 2017.This by itself shows the slow speed of international agreements, and UK and EU27 have hardly started on the trade and relationship agreement.Brexit will never go away. 
Give it a few years - the Brexiters will be comparing Mv3 to the Lisbon treaty and complaining how it was passed by Parliament without a referendum... 
Am conflicted, as I have read and digested the Deal, and I would support it as the basis of a long-term Brexit-in-name-only sustainable UK-EU Association Agreement.But there is a lot there which Brexiteers now switching votes on MV3 will loathe once they realise. 
So the people can't have a second referendum because we've made our decision already.... but Theresa May can hold a vote on her deal ....for a third time ...makes sense  
Security minister Ben Wallace trying to play the security card re @theresa_may deal claiming police and security services want MPs to vote for it. Absolute nonsense. Security is weakened by this blind Brexit and it is a scandal he claims to speak for them all. 
Hey @MaryLouMcDonald @sinnfeinireland, I fixed that banner for you.... #Brexit  
Even I doubted hugely that it'd happen. I doubted Corbyn hugely too. Mea culpa, given what we all know occurred in 2017. An election which proved that Brexit hadn't been about 'racism' at all; it was about austerity, and its disastrous consequences for so many. 
12.74% of our electricity this morning is coming from the EU - just a thought for you "we don't need anybody" Brexit isolationists  
I’m so happy how Brexit is really enhancing our standing in the world.*scratches needle across the record*Hang on. What?  
 On #Brexit... @mrdanwalker: "What happens next?"@ChrisMasonBBC:   
I am going on the #PutItToThePeople March because I want to show Theresa May that there are millions of us who don’t want to “just get Brexit done” and to show our European friends that millions of us love the EU and want to stay.  
So, nearly three years since the Brexit referendum all Parliament needs to do - by Thursday this week - is come up with a credible plan which it’s in majority agreement on.Can’t foresee any problems at all with doing in 3 days what has been unachievable in a couple of years. 
Instead of analysis we get political games. Last chance for Brexit, or turn down and hope for no-deal? For remainers, best Brexit they could have, or turn down and hope for referendum?Better question, are MPs prepared to honestly say this is a treaty the UK should sign?10/ 
We have been humiliated on the world stage for the past two and a half years because you sold the country a fantasy you knew it was impossible to deliver. We don't just need to resist this deal, but Brexit entirely. We need to return to leading in Europe again.  
The Sunderland Echo: Farage is not your friend, he is a member of the elite, a conman, who has hijacked the memory of the Jarrow march.  #MarchToLeave #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
In fact he doesn't want Brexit to happen at all. If it doesn't happen, he'll be entirely in possession of the betrayal narrative, as was his original plan when he decided to side with Leave.  
From the PM who gave Britain an impassioned speech to rid the country of “burning injustices”, we have a naked effort to bully & blackmail her unpopular deal across a line, knowing that the Brexit logjam will mean injustices remain unaddressed, unresourced & unresolved for years. 
Are you hungry?“Let me help you”.... said no @Conservatives ever...Are you Homeless?“Let me help you”...Said no @Conservatives ever....Are you poor?“Let me help you”..said no @Conservatives ever..& This all happened long before Brexit #ToryHungerCrisis Join @UKLabour 
Voters will turn on the Tories if Brexit fails... the party needs a new leader, fast  
Brexit’s irrevocable consequences - striking high value manufacturing & services - brilliant by @FareedZakaria ... Why aren’t students, workers, entire population screaming against this utterly pointless & destructive lunacy? 
So the DUP are reviving demands to align Air Passenger Duty with Ireland but oppose the Brexit deal because it could force alignment of some regulations with Ireland. Cakeism Northern Ireland style... 
The Brexit twins, Farage + Johnson, increasingly desperate for someone else to blame for damage they’ve done to their own country. Anyone will do: Their own PM. Their own parliament. The EU. The ‘elite’. The civil service. Remainers. The media. But history will know who to blame. 
We need to rebalance the economy. If wealth is not shared more evenly across the country, it is inevitable that we will become more divided. As government impact assessments show, Brexit will only make this worse. 
Poor Norman Smith, having to report that today Corbyn will hold cross-party Brexit talks. That pesky Marxist ideologue, doing the very thing the public always say they want politicians to do! #bbcnews #r4today 
It’s a(nother) huge week for Brexit, but this morning we’ve decided to devote our splash to this fantastic piece from ⁦@AasmaDay⁩, who spent one week reporting from one bed in Royal Blackburn Hospital, because it illustrates a story just as important 
Dear @guyverhofstadt. You said young Brits could reapply to the EU, but we older Brits are still fighting Brexit - with considerable success. Please don’t write us off!In a poll of almost 6.5k Remainers, 88% were 35+. The EU’s in our hearts and bones. We didn’t betray our youth  
Latest from me: on Brexit & why Britain's future was lost on the playing fields of Eton. Includes Rees-Mogg, Johnson, Cameron... & Paul Weller. Plus Radstock, Somerset. (And a modest proposal for calling time on the power of private education) 
I simply don’t understand how we got into such a mess on Brexit when we had decisive, principled people like this doing the negotiating for us.  
Ps..He would also have sacked @KateHoeyMP if he was a leader and wanted to stop Brexit. 
Thousands of children 'could become undocumented' after Brexit  
Some lorry drivers have threatened to hold UK-wide blockades if Brexit is delayed. "Brexiteers all over the country are planning to bring this country to its knees by blocking the main arterial routes" - perculiar definition of 'patriotism'...  
The surprisingly simple arithmetic of the next Brexit vote – my article from yesterday  
Why did Government and MPs invoke Article 50? Because they were under pressure to show that ‘Brexit is being delivered’What is the main argument from switchers to supporting the deal now? To show that ‘Brexit is being delivered’2/ 
Wise words from @Alicegast "British science needs to remain open to the world after Brexit".  Sadly another instance this morning of a critical research partner from West Africa working on Ebola with UK Research Teams denied a visa for the UK.   
As nation is distracted by Brexit, CEO Badger Trust claims ⁦@michaelgove⁩ is planning systematic destruction of badgers in England as 14 new cull licences await his approval ⁦@PeterEgan6⁩ ⁦@BadgerTrust⁩ ⁦@BornFreeFDN⁩ ⁦ 
We have been warning of this for months. Make no mistake: this will happen if #SettledStatus is implemented as planned. And it won’t just be children either.  Thousands of children of EU citizens 'could become undocumented' after Brexit.  1/ 
Enjoyable to see Leavophiles trying to spin this as Remoaners’ fault despite the two main parties in parliament backing Brexit. 
A little tip:If Corbyn was a Leader and wanted to stop Brexit he would be screaming it from the rooftops24/7The fact that he isn't proves how incredibly gullible and misinformed his supporters are.He is NOT a leader and he WANTS BrexitHe is no better than May 
What is more important to you 1.Brexit 2. Labour governmentplease retweet for wider reach 
NO!  We need a new PM and a new approach. May’s deal is not Brexit. It’s a repudiation of Brexit.  
11 days until Brexit and the future of the UK hangs on the opinion of a party who opposed the Good Friday Agreement.  
Threatening no Brexit at all against a no Brexit withdrawal isn't #Brexit and wasn't on the ballot.#BrexitBetrayal 
do u really believe May's deal is better than staying in the EU, do u not have the faith to continue to demand the Brexit result ... this is not going to go away ... all hell will break loose and the political parties in Westminster will be eviscerated ... I am sure u know that? 
My #tftd:John Oliver has done another Brexit bit.Theresa May's deal is a dog's dinner.1/3@LBC #r4today #c4news #PoliticsLive #newsnight #bbcqt #bbcaq 
As we stumble this week through the fog of Brexit, wondering whether a short or long extension offers the better foothold, our journey still can only have one of three ultimate destinations:Deal, No Deal, or No Brexit.Do not confuse means for the ends.  Many will. 
Just ignore Brexit and the tantrum-like threat for a second, and try to ignore "SATERDAY" if possible.This made me wonder something a bit bigger.When did the English "gh" turn into "f", and why?  
Why would anyone believe long-term pension policy promises of the British state when it is trashing Brexit promises made only two years ago?  
McVey now says she’ll support Brexit plan she resigned over  
Whatever view may be taken on Brexit, relying on an international law argument of fundamental change of circumstances to avoid the backstop would not be successful.  
maybe finding 50 people in the North East who still support Brexit is actually quite an achievement?#MarchforLeave 
This is the situation we are now in and  the options we Brexiteers face. Clinging onto what choices we had before last week’s votes in the House is not going to get us Brexit instead it will see us remaining in the EU    via @Telegraph 
Day after day broadcast media, which hyped economic challenges of Brexit for month after month, is now failing to cover the trashing of democracy inherent in the beach of Brexit promises by Govt and Opposition.A monumental failing born of overwhelming Remain bias of personnel. 
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you.  
It is major news, think about it @SkyNews @BBCNews  et al. are all on the EU side, why would they shine a light on the truth?We all suspected the EU are in charge of our exit, they have been in charge of us since the EU was formed. May agreed from start. No Brexit team in charge  
Do not put your name to the WA, MPs. You will be held accountable. Do not sign the UK up for toxic Brexit. We did not have the facts in 2016. We do now and you are responsible. #PutItToThePeople Please RT to your MP.Their twitter handles here:  
Britain’s Brexit crisis is rooted in the power of our public schools | John Harris  
“The deal does not deliver Brexit except in name. Not only does in not deliver Brexit, it also makes it impossible for a future Prime Minister to deliver a real Brexit as well, for many years to come or indefinitely.”  
“Now is not the time to lose our nerve and back a gravely damaging deal which would betray Brexit supporters and be very bad for the country” Martin Howe QC#StandUp4Brexit #NoChangeNoChance 
So ...erm ... have I got this right? Theresa May is forcing MPs to vote a third time on Brexit (in case they changed their minds) in order to prevent the public voting a second time on Brexit (in case they changed their minds)?#thoughtso 
I don't expect that from you, I expect you to void the 2016 EU referendum result stolen by Leave's £10m criminal electoral fraud that has been referred to the police and the national crime Agency.  
Brexit leads to abolition of zero hour contracts, more flexible working and better training at @TravelodgeUK - because 27% workers currently from EU: so British workers getting a better deal from Brexit. CEO interview on @BBCr4today 
#MondayMotivation better get through ports this week as truckers planning another #FailingGrayling brexit practice next weekend @RHANews Must be very angry about future queues & so few permits issued - under 1000 when 11000+ needed so they’ll be out of jobs or sat in queues. 
Resign,You organised GO Home vans! Deported British Citizens,Created a truly hostile environment for all minorities,the homeless&people trapped in poverty by greedy low paying “employers”you’re responsible for cuts to all public services,&we haven’t even got to Brexit yet!Resign. 
If Tory MPs kill #Brexit, they will NEVER be forgiven  
Thousands of EU national children, including many vulnerable ones in care or foster homes, are at risk of becoming undocumented after Brexit. A new Windrush scandal, but one created consciously with eyes wide open. Theresa May, this is on you. 
NORMAN LAMONT: If Tory MPs kill Brexit, they will NEVER be forgiven  
Only our compromise can break the #Brexit impasse say @MPphilwilson and @peterkyle 
Before the referendum, Yvette Cooper was asked if MPs should stop the UK leaving the Single Market if we voted Leave. What did she say?   
No Brexit nose-pegs for me, thanks. This is the most important decision for our country in 70 yearsIf Brexit deal is that obnoxious -  and it is - let’s call a halt while we reconsider what is really best for countryIt would become clear that best deal is one we already have 
I agree. Eton & the public schools are at the heart of Brexit & the cynical manipulation of populism by an entitled elite questing for power. Observing this closely, as a former Schools Minister who knows these schools intimately,  has radicalised me  
Theresa May’s Brexit is not Brexit, it’s ‘patriotic surrender’  
Hold a second referendum on EU membership. - PetitionsThis needs your signature so we can get it to 100.000.   
The Tories have admitted 7,990 people died within 6 months of being rejected for PIP, since 2013. Their current Brexit shambles will make sure hardly anyone gets to know about this.Please retweet this if you think Tory Ministers should hang their overpaid heads in shame. 
looks like Boris Johnson wants the Tory leadership more than he wants Brexit to actually happen  
The customs union is at the heart of the EU’s protectionist racket. Leaving it is one of the major gains to be had from Brexit.  
Theresa May’s deal remains “fake Brexit” – the alternatives are far less damaging, says Martin Howe QC of @lawyers4britain 
Walk away March 29 th tear up the cheque. This is the BEST DEAL.   Brexit news: Theresa May warns MPs have three days to back deal or REMAIN under EU RULE | Politics | News |  
GMB have officially cancelled their Brexit “Countdown Clock!”to great laughter and merriment from Piers and Co and Political Guests Kevin Maguire and Andrew Pierce.Oh! What Fun!What a Jolly Jape!They Really Haven’t Got A Friggin Clue! 
When we stop Brexit, imagine how it will feel to be in the EU. The new things we’ll follow. The rights we’ll luxuriate in exercising. The places we’ll discover. We’ll get so much more out of it, now that we’ve become experts in it.I know I’ll appreciate it 10,000,000% more.  
What do the far-right, far-left, Islamophobes, antisemites, Daesh, Trump, May, Corbyn and the Russian government all have in common?They all want #Brexit to happen.Don't let the extremists win.  Demand a #FinalSayForAll. 
Praying for all tweeps, esp for peace between Israelis and Palestinians and for clear thinking about #Brexit decisions. #prayer 
Laughable - Nigel Farage the so called leader of the March for Brexit - doesnt even lead cant even get elected no matter how many times he tries - and uses a bus to get round on the march... the man is a joke 
Theresa May’s Deal is not Brexit...Theresa May’s Deal is utter capitulation.... Patriotic Surrender!!!  Once it’s Signed We’ll be trapped in an EU limbo Vassal State Zombie Forever.. FOREVER!!!  
'An obvious, exam-failing non-starter': some much-needed #InternationalLaw101 for @Geoffrey_Cox courtesy of @Uon_Law international law expert Marko Milanovic. Great blog on what #Article62 can and can't do. If you read anything today, let this be it. #Internationallaw #Brexit  
If politicians were bound by a hippocratic oath (first do no harm, or at least minimise the harm), what sort of Brexit should they vote for? 
Travelodge targets parents to fill post-Brexit staffing gap  
"British companies look set to cut investment by the most in 10 years in 2019 because of Brexit, even if Prime Minister Theresa May gets a deal. Some companies have moved investment and growth plans. Some of this investment may never come back to the UK."  
I urge all Brexiteer MP’s not to be conned into voting for that fraudsters deal, it is May who will take the blame for any extension to Brexit. Mays deal is a trap, hold your nerve, we do not want Mays betrayal agreement, she’s colluded with the EU. @OwenPaterson @andreajenkyns 
Hammond fails THREE TIMES to deny May has offered EXTRA MONEY to DUP to back Brexit deal  
Tory donors warn Theresa May Brexit delay will leave lasting damage to businesses, more so than no deal ' | via @telegraph 
If you voted Brexit, whatever your reasons, it has emboldened the UK far-right. The exclusionist narrative has brought forward xenophobes to populist, nativist groupings. They are angry, anti-Muslim and anti-immigration. The world is more dangerous & the threat from the Right...  
There is nothing democratic about a corrupt referendum; nothing patriotic about making your country poorer; and nothing honourable in bribing MPs to try to secure their votes.  
BREXIT BULLIES: Tusk leading panicking EU in plot to REJECT short delay- UK to be PUNISHED  
Britain’s Brexit crisis is rooted in the power of our public schools | John Harris  
Global mkts start in Risk On mood to the week on speculation Fed to sound decidedly dovish at it's meeting. SCMP article suggested Trump-Xi trade summit may not take place until Jun so pressure mount on Powell to deliver on Wed. US 10y <2.6%. Pound $1.328 before more Brexit votes  
Patriotism is doing the right thing for the country - not the wrong thing because it’s proposed by a Tory prime minister The right thing, in the national interest, is to stop Brexit 
Here are the people at risk if Brexit is stopped:1. The Tory partyCan we live with that? 
UK Prime Minister Theresa May will be hoping the third time's the charm when she tries to get the House of Commons to back her Brexit deal this week, after two previous defeats | Analysis by @janemerrick23 
Mrs May isn’t even close to having the votes to carry her Meaningful Vote 3, which is why she still hasn’t announced it. Boris Johnson’s column this morning is a declaration of no surrender. We are heading to a long extension of Art 50 & a referendum 
2011: @Jacob_Rees_Mogg suggested that there could be two referenda (one on the final deal).2016: @Nigel_Farage insisted there must be a second referendum if he lost.Did anyone shout those suggestions down as undemocratic or treacherous at the time?  Anyone at all?  Even once? 
"My name is Laurence; like you I am human.... My aim today is to transfer 10K people for  Paris to London and back. But it will take some time" words of a conductor in the #Eurostar in Paris as the French customs shows its hand on the #Brexit. #eurostardelays 
Brexit from a Left wing perspective - ‘The Single Market imposes massive constraints on economic policymaking, which any leftist should reject.’ @tfbrexit 
Brexit spurs biggest cut in UK business investment in 10 years: BCC  
At this stage it's pointless if she resigns or not, she's already stated that she has no interest in running as leader come next general election. The worry is the withdrawal & the neverending transition in the Customs Union, deliberate attempt to withhold Brexit this is madness. 
Get off it mate.On what planet do you represent "the people"?!!We all know #Brexit was funded by rich elite - manipulating the British people with proppgsnda tactics into voting against our own interests.You've bet money on Brexit.You Sir, are a charlatan and a scoundrel! 
Brexit news: Farage demands MPs reject May's deal again to stop 'YEARS OF AGONY' | UK | News |  -  
Just as xenophobes are trying to drag the UK over a cliff to a deranged hard Brexit, the Daily Mail accuses a Polish man of being Jack the RipperChildren are already going hungry, and austerity has killed many more people than the ripper could dream of. Brexit will add to it  
The Guardian view on Theresa May’s Brexit deal: third time unlucky. The prime minister is poised to try again. But whether she wins or loses the vote on her deal, she has lost the argument  
NEW: "Brexit, the Northern Irish Backstop, and Fundamental Change of Circumstances" by Marko Milanovic.#Brexit @philippesands @Steven_Swinford @bbclaurak @Peston @GuardianHeather @bricksilk @joannaccherry@OFOCBrexit @JMPSimor @thatginamiller 
Right wing, white nationalist movements 'must be challenged' - Professor Patman says many white nationalists use mainstream slogans in order to legitimise their arguments. 
In that case @jessphillips you do not understand the situationif Theresa May survives immediate coup mounted against her one day past brexit dateThis is just the beginning of 10 years of painful and humiliating negotiations 
Are in favor of changing the Constitution's economic provisions?While this is very friendly to the business sector, we need to identify potential losers, and include everyone in the convo. Will be open to a referendum first and a constituent assembly specific to that provision. 
MMT twitter might be worse than Brexit twitter 
 years ago, on March 18, 2014, Agreement on the Accession of the Republic of #Crimea to #Russia was signed in Moscow. It is based on the free and voluntary expression of will by the peoples of Crimea at a nationwide #referendum, held on March 16, 2014. 
"The United Kingdom is Ireland’s second largest export market after the U.S., and Brexit would end the free flow of trade between the two," writes Clive Irving  
Today marks  years since #Crimea & #Sevastopol officially reunited with #Russia: President Putin & Crimean authorities signed Treaty on the Accession of the Republic of Crimea to Russia based on Crimeans’ popular vote cast during the referendum of 16 March 2014 #CrimeaIsRussia 
Post-Brexit migrant salary plans 'would hit Wales harder'  
Trivial incidents will now be officially classed as terrorism so they can say 'look at how far right nationalism and extremism has risen since Brexit.' They take us for fools. 
#BrexitTalesMonkey's PawA couple were given a cursed paw with 3 wishes. They asked for more NHS funding. So Brexit began.Aghast, they wished for a Deal. But the terms were ruinous.Desperate, they wished for an A50 extension. But that didn't undo the curse, just delayed it.  
Not too late to get 'real change' to Brexit deal: Britain's Johnson  
'A waste of money': Dublin port reluctantly prepares for Brexit  
Brexit crisis tipped for British asparagus as EU seasonal workers stay away  
Brexit my flat ur Uber is here 
*BREAKING NEWS*Confirmation was received today that the only reason UK Parliament is obsessed with a "Deal" is because they're too thick to spell "Democracy".The unconfirmed anonymous government source refused to appear on camera, but he told us, promise.11 days to #Brexit  
Dan Hannan writing in the S. Telegraph admits that he was ready to swallow any kind of Brexit—Norway, Chequers or May’s deal—just not the backstop. No wonder the Tories deserve extinction when even Hannan can confess such a record of stupidity and cowardice. 
Conservative chairmen and donors are warning May not to betray Brexit. Business sees less uncertainty with no deal. If she does betray Brexit, the Tories fear they will face oblivion. And they will deserve to. 
British leader @theresa_may's government warns that it might not hold a planned #Brexit vote next week unless it feels it can secure a win that avoids a lengthy delay to pulling out of the #EU.Reuters pic 
Brexit has seen assets leave the UK but now we know that money has been pouring out of Europe for the past 50 consecutive weeks—the longest outflow in ten years. The cause? Recession, political turmoil and more forecast to come. Our own economy is much better placed. 
Interesting week for the global #economy and #markets ... with central bank policy meetings (including the #Fed and the @BankofEngland), #Brexit-related  debates in #Brussels and #London, and strikes in #France following a weekend of violent protests. 
I have to say that if I were an MP concerned about my future the idea that Brexit would be delivered by the looney ERG right would be enough to make me think it is time to stop and think again. 
WHY would May try to scare MPs into Voting for Vassalage?Any MP who now folds will have to square it with their conscience.Vassalage is NOT Brexit.Will Labour MPs be offered incentives, to Vote for Vassalage?Surreal to see a British PM doing her damnedest to subjugate the UK. 
Sad indeed. When Lab MPs like @KateHoeyMP have it sussed, I guess you are right, the @Conservatives are trashed. The door is open for a Brexit party alliance. 
we unfortunately didn't get to see this at the Sonic SXSW panel but we did learn that Shadow the Hedgehog voted for Brexit. 
What if everyone stayed at home for a week, simply refusing to leave their home?Would she notice that, perhaps, the nation doesn't actually begin & end in the corrupt dark rooms of Westminster?11 days to #Brexit, Theresa, you need to get out of the way. 
If 17.4m #Brexit supporters walked into their local bank & withdrew all their cash, on 30th March?Would @theresa_may finally notice that we are not simply lying down to tyranny?#AskingForAFriend  
Brexit spurs biggest cut in UK business investment in 10 years: BCC  
#TheresaMay has screwed over the #British people & sold us out. Now it is time for her to go. Oust May from #DowningStreet, put her deal in the bin & let a #Brexiteer who actually believes in #Brexit take over. May will never do the job & all she has done is sabotage our Brexit!  
Billboards target absent Farage with ‘where's Nigel’ signs on second day of Brexit betrayal march  
Monday's blog (18/03) is now posted (12:32 EAST) - Bank of England backtracks on its doomsday Brexit scenarios -  
For the 5% of the time that the @Conservatives Party isn’t beclowning itself over Brexit, it is busy trying to emulate New Labour by banning everything in sight and further infantilising the population. The Tory party urgently needs to be consumed by a cleansing fire.  
lie with Rod Liddle, Melanie Phillips, Douglas Murray, Rupert Murdoch, Chelsea Clinton, Katie Hopkins, the Daily Mail, Donald Trump, Brexit, white people or the male gender. It lies with Brenton Tarrant. Incidentally, he said that one of his aims was to polarise political debate 
Holyhead is in big trouble thanks to Brexit. Ireland is organising super roro ferries to go from Cork direct to Europe. They don't want to risk getting caught up in the chaos at Dover/Calais 
This hapless useless incompetent remainer government must be the worst since Parliament formed in 1215. This international embarrassment must be stopped. Brexit must proceed. The EU is dying trying to expand its way out of debt by leeching on poor countries and now Africa. 
@theSNP @scotgov  One of our own needs help NOW! #Brexit  has caused this.  We stand as a country of equals in Scotland regardless of their native birth nation.  We welcome them as Scots.  So show TM and the tories our muscle.  Fix this for Sianna who is Scottish by birth.  
Haven't you been watching the @LeaveMnsLeave pathetic turnout? No one wants #brexit. Please #votemaysdealdown 
#LordOwen: if the undemocratic attempts to block #Brexit were successful the effects in this country would be "very dramatic... will smash the present political system"! DO NOT #VOTE for the @Conservatives or @UKLabour they have betrayed us all! 
It's still not too late to stop this catastrophic #Brexit mess.And there's still time to grab one of the last few places on our coaches from #Cornwall to London for the historic march next Saturday - just £30 return!#PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote 
Brexit Explained  
Like the same wilful ignorance which led people to google “what is the EU” in 2016, after casting our votes for Brexit?The EU existed & was publicly visible but completely ignored by most.Megan has been publicly visible all this time. Your ignorance doesn’t negate her fame. 
Our current deal beats any Brexit deal. Who wants endless negotiations for years to come. Join millions of people in London on 23 March who simply want to stop this madness, let’s join together & demand to put it to the people #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople #RevokeArticle50 
Brexit: uncharted territory - having taken us there, those responsible have no real idea of their own inadequacies and have neither the capability nor the humility to understand why they have so roundly failed...  #Brexit.  
They’re gonna get an indefinite break from all the jobs they won’t have any more after you help the Tories pass Brexit.  
Doubt Mike killed himself over Brexit Jeanette but thanks for your inspiring input  
MAGA and Brexit are products of the same political delusion  
When there is a post #brexit inquiry. It will happen some day. . .  
Dark money is pushing for a no-deal Brexit. Who is behind it? | George Monbiot  
*Brexit Explained*  
Pretty much confirmed false flag in #NewZealand We all knew someone was behind it to try and start some sort of war but we aren't your sheep. #WWG1WGA #MAGA #WeAreTheNewsNow #TWGRP #PatriotsUnited #brexit  
#brexitgate The establishment have planned to conspire to stop brexit from day one,this is now being enacted,looks like they will get away with it. PM May is still in power to do that, her determination to stay in power using the WA can only be explained by this. #BrexitBetrayal 
You are missing a huge impact.. Scotland will have its independence referendum and will leave the UK to stay in EU.. we have been ignored and treated with contempt for too long. #DissolveTheUKUnion and it also will precipitate a unified Ireland.. the damage has been done  
May's Brexit disaster unreported by UK press: Britain BLOCKED from $1.7 Trillion in WTO projects  #finalsay #FBPE #PEOPLESVOTE #PeoplesVoteMarch 
But if #Brexit happens it'll kill off my partner's #HGV job on Anglesey. There's no capacity in Holyhead for the sort of arrangements that will be needed post #Brexit. So get real guys &girls, have patience and, if you can, support the #PeoplesVoteMarch next 23 March in London. 
Tory's biggest donor believes that Brexit is a huge opportunity for export markets and taking control back from EU to generate a raft of new, entrepreneurial policies for national renewal.And he's not worried about leaving without a deal on the 29th Mar  
Opinion | Brexit will mark the end of Britain’s role as a great power  
What's Brexit got to do with rock music? Fucking everything, Roger. If it makes it harder for British acts to tour outside the UK, or for international acts to tour in the UK, what do you think is going to happen? It might be okay for your privileged arse. But for up-and-comers?  
Let’s continue to resist Brexit. Our economy and values are at stake.Write to your MP to demand they #RevokeA50 & #StopBrexit. 
Thread - OK - here's my Brexit position. Happy to explain this in detail if you want.I believe that the deal presented by @theresa_may & the #EU is a rubbish deal. If provides the worst possible settlement terms. I believe we should reject it. There are two consequences to this 
And afterwards it'll be "We tried to deliver the Brexit you voted for. The establishment stopped us. Vote for me so I can fight back against the establishment."Even though it's not what they voted for. Nobody voted to be less sovereign & almost all Brexit voters expected a deal. 
*Brexit Explained*  
I can only assume the pro-Brexit politicians are banking on Brexit not happening. They'll never be blamed because the real damage will never happen.Pro-dealers will never be blamed for the loss of sovereignty and No-dealers will never be blamed for the economic catastrophe. 
Brexit Delay & Uncertainty Will 'Tank' the UK Economy & 'Kill' Investment  #recession #uncertainty #jobs #economy #investment #UK #Brexit  
@RohitKachrooITV  Don't give up now, Julie ! May is facing an imminent prosecution for Misconduct in Public Office, and a Summons will be requested in Court  by Friday. Brexit can certainly be stopped as a result of the corruption and criminality 
“May’s shamelessness is her greatest asset. Free from the bonds of duty and courage that would have made another leader feel constitutionally bound to resign, she feels she has nothing left to lose.”Scotland ignored while May prepares DUP Brexit bribe. 
There are only 11 days left until  #BREXIT and #FREEDOM for #BRITAIN ! If @theresa_may & the @Conservatives extend or delay #Article50 for any reason then the 17,410,742 must not vote for the #ConservativeParty in the coming local elections in May! #VOTE for the #BrexitParty! 
Everything - and I mean EVERYTHING, hangs on this vile, outrageous 'deal' being thrown into the dustbin.Theresa May deserves sacking and jailing for this abomination, but for now just concentrate on stopping it.REJECT it to save the UK, Brexit & longer term, your party. 
I & 2 other Brits are currently working on new EU law to tackle the dissemination of terrorist content online - crazy to think my country may not benefit from our expertise cos of Brexit  
In just over 2 years #Brexit has turned the UK into little more than an unstable banana republic, destroying decades of work building our nation's status as a reliable and trustworthy actor on the world stage. The economic cost of this will be huge & last decades. #PeoplesVote 
"Corbyn invites MPs for cross-party talks to find Brexit compromise"There's no such thing as a Brexit compromiseThe softer the Brexit, the more pointlessThe harder the Brexit, the more painfulThere's no such thing as respecting the resultLeave promised a& cheated 
Astounding that these #Brexiters just don't get it..A #Brexit based onLiesIllegalities Lost MandatesForeign InterferenceDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o Consent37% of Voters 26.5% of the Ppl Leaves NOTHING TO RESPECT #PeoplesVote #Remain 
Brexit and the NHS Dr Phillipa Whitford @Dr_PhilippaW will speak about the impact of Brexit on the NHS this Fri 7pm@Jordanhill_News @YesDrumAland @AnnieslandSNP @GlasgowWEToday @glasgowswestend @WhatsOnGlasgow@GradySNP @CMonaghanSNP @YesGNW @OFOC_GLASGOW @NHSforPV @Medics4EU 
It's just so weirdly unBritish to be as rude to our friends and neighbours as Brexit is making us. Surely, at any moment, we'll break out into an "I'm so dreadfully sorry; there's been the most awful misunderstanding, please forgive us." Won't we? 
That doesn't make it physically impossible. It makes it impossible to have an orderly Brexit on 29 March. A disorderly no-deal Brexit is perfectly possible, and at this point arguably even probable.  
Poll.Should I spend this significant week for Brexit either blogging and tweeting away about Brexit idiocy or watching cute panda videos? 
I would welcome explanation or justification from any British Nationalist.Why do 10 DUP MPs have more say in Brexit than an entire Nation?  
Ryan & others are mistaken. This isn't a one-off chance to leave the EU. Leaving the EU is certain. What this is about is what relationship we shld hv with the EU & the rest of the world post-Brexit. May's deal is a terrible option for that.  
Theresa May’s resignation publicly demanded by Tory MPs over her Brexit deal Tory Backbenchers said deep Tory Party splits exposed by recent votes mean the Prime Minister’s time is up  
@BorisJohnson we must never weaken and accept a deal that is not Brexit  smoke and mirrors persist stay Focused WE MUST LEAVE this bunch of cowboys who have watched too  much Soprano;s 
No good the PM continuing to pander to those who are only interested in their own leadership ambitions, the DUP or ERG fanatics. She would get Meaningful Vote through by making any deal subject to a confirmatory referendum including a choice to remain #FinalSay 
It’s “code” for Article 27 of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights  Deeply regrettable you feel entitled to smear anyone who supports Brexit. I wonder what your Brexit-supporting junior colleagues and students think about that.  
So now the person in charge of Britain's future is the leader of a tiny extremist party. Wow! That's taking back control and so democratic too! Bribes and lies, way to go Theresa May! #ToxicBrexit #StopBrexitSaveBritain #StopBrexitSaveDemocracy 
Those who think Brexit is synonymous with patriotism really need to read this.  It is just so incredibly sad.  I love my country. I hate what we’ve turned into.  
Boris ⁦@BorisJohnson⁩  Backed by his constituency association “five or six to one” says “no” to May’s #brexit deal. Too much vassalage.  
They can hurt us, humiliate us & get rid of us, but the xenophobic Brexiters can't kill the deep love we felt for the UK before the Brexit nightmare. It's our loss but also theirs even if they gloat at our pain & rejoice at our leaving.The country we loved is being killed by them  
A Brexit ‘alliance’ is seemingly becoming the preference of many patriotic and decent Britons to assure the revival of a sovereign Britain.  
Eurosceptic MPs should hold their nerve as anti-Brexit colleagues dig their own electoral graves - @tomcolsy99_ 
WATCH | For months Tory Eurosceptics have explained the horrors of May's Fake Brexit withdrawal treaty, but now people like David Davis, Esther McVey & Nadine Dorries are voting for it. Weak and spineless!  
May's deal is a temporary Brexit designed to ensure we beg to rejoin later. Next we will be completely shafted in the trade deal, then we'll beg to rejoin. 
Apparently March to Leave couldn't cross the River Tees because the bridge was closed....as usual... and the ferries weren't operating.... @LeaveMnsLeave so disorganised they hadn't checked ahead.Same people tell us No Deal Brexit will be easy.  @TiceRichard tice 
May's deal will not get enough support to pass this week.Therefore, according to Fox and Hammond, there will be no vote.This means May must ask the EU Council on Thursday to delay #Brexit for a long time if she wants to avoid crashing out a week on Friday.IF... 
Read what the Christchurch killer had to say about Brexit.  And then ask yourself why is Andrew Scheer such a fanatical Brexit supporter, and why can't the Con media see what should be so obvious?  #cdnpoli 
This is important and sensible: To back the PM's deal, we need proof that the next stage of Brexit talks will be radically different @BorisJohnson  via @Telegraph 
.@OwenPaterson: I still won't back Mrs May's #WA deal – because it's not #Brexit  via @Telegraph 
Are you watching @MarrShow It is like a parallel universe! And they are only on the newspaper review! Trying to connect the madman terrorist scum fascist in NZ to anyone who wants controlled immigration or Brexit. How does this kind of nonsense help anyone? 
The movement that backs BREXIT. Backs Trident. Backs Tory councils. Backs grants for the Orange Order. Backs austerity. Backs it’s racists. Backs London rule. Backs funding the Royal family. Labour’s socialism. 
I think all this talk about Ireland being the only English speaking country left in the EU post #brexit is bound to make the Maltese Cross. 
Few can understand how terrifying these revelations were for all involved. @shahmiruk faced mammoth attacks at the hands of the most powerful with the utmost bravery and integrity- well done indeed and thank you for your role in helping expose the wrongdoing on #brexit #voteleave 
Michael Portillo: Nothing in my political career compares to last few weeks in British politics.It's sort of chaos that occurs every half century.Is it to be the case you can disobey a 3-line whip in cabinet, yet still remain members of Govt?#Brexit #EU 
I note your self description.   Referendum was 2016. I was re-elected 2017 promising to be a strong pro European voice.  
Theresa May has been warned by her party's biggest donors that delaying Brexit would be more damaging to British companies than ‘no deal’, which has already been factored in.The uncertainty caused by a long extension would be ‘debilitating for companies’ 
The best doctor I've ever had the pleasure of working with was an Italian. She left the UK along with her Italian husband, also a doctor, due to Brexit. Tragic loss for the UK. 
Noteworthy thread from a noteworthy person, the reality is that the UK's politics will be totally dominated by Brexit for at least the next three to four years, at a time when its party politics and economy will be frankly falling apart. The outlook is dire.  
A popular initiative to raise Florida's minimum wage to $15/hour by 2026 (via a 2020 referendum) cleared its first hurdle; a state group submitted more than 80K signatures for a first review.  
If anyone is still in any doubt about Brexit being fuck all to do with what’s best for the UK and everything to do with the self-serving internal bickering of some bastards, this thread should definitely set your mind at rest.  
Not to be dramatic but if Brexit in any way affects my supply of halloumi, I’ll riot  
Martin Howe QC: Theresa May’s deal remains “fake Brexit” – the alternatives are far less damaging  
And we're not supposed to say they are stupid? That'll get brexit support lads, making sure the supermarket shelves stay empty. Genius idea!  
Brexit: Jeremy Corbyn indicates he could vote Leave in a new referendum on Britain’s EU membership | He is simply wrong. Wrong. Wrong.He is not where the large majority of our members and voters are either.   
Because the underlying justification for Brexit (democracy, sovereignty) is good, unchanging and has STILL not been meaningfully addressed by prominent Remainers?  
This was on display at an art fair in London yesterday. Designed by an IBM engineer and using AI, it measures in real time how Twitter feels about Brexit. It swings live. Genius!  
"Some MPs confuse the customs union with a free-trade area, and assume it boosts trade. If only they cd realise the customs union is at the heart of the EU’s protectionist racket. Leaving it is one of the major gains to be had from Brexit" @telebusiness 
They wont have jobs after brexit anyway if they cant get european licences/permits.  Fools 
UK consumers will benefit massively when Britain leaves the EU Customs Union - a protectionist racket which props up inefficient EU producers.  #Brexit 
This crass, insensitive and deeply offensive tweet from the @LibDems North of Tyne mayoral candidate @JohnApplebyLD demonstrates why people need to think before they tweet. Appropriating the horror of a terrorist attack to pass commentary on #Brexit is vile.  
So this is all about Theresa May and the preservation of the tory party.The country is careering towards the edge of the #brexit cliff and internally the tories are using bribery and faux deals to keep their party together. Like children in a playground.Where is the Headmaster. 
Indeed. Thank you. But with days to go before supposed Brexit don’t you think govt has proved itself utterly incompetent in matters like this?  
The WA is not good for Britain. Brexit is not good for Britain. No deal is a catastrophe for Britain. 
BREXIT CRISIS: Lorry drivers threaten to block major roads if Brexit is delayed /#EU #Brexit #BrexitVote #FinalSay 
No brexit would also risk keeping all our trade deals intact. It would risk a surge in the £. It would also risk Britain regaining some of the respect and power it has lost with the shambles of Brexit. 
Look Brexit is built on a steaming pile of corruption. Not all of it has been fully exposed. There is more to come out. And this is no a safe basis to do a thing like brexit. 
My final thought for the night."We must respect result" is biggest Brexit lie of all.#NothingToRespect in referendum result.Bad advice obtained illegally MUST be ignored#RevokeArt50 
So, many challenges lie ahead. Any suggestion that we will be able to forget about Brexit if we get a withdrawal deal is wrong. Above all, we must urgently work to rebuild confidence in the enfeebled governance of our country. 
If our politicians have launched a coup over Brexit, then this powerful and poignant article by David Starkey suggests a revolution of Magna Carta magnitude is probably unavoidable for the restitution of our democracy.  via @MailOnline 
Brexit itself will be far from over. The big choice about what sort of  relationship with the EU we want remains unanswered. So national divisions over Europe will still be open. This is about much more than just future trade arrangements. It is about deep political convictions. 
Jeremy Corbyn may no longer be able to use Brexit to mask the troubles of his leadership. It remains to be seen whether the Independent Group will become a major realignment of our politics. At least there will be further debate about reform of the centre. 
The future is here...Machines taking over from humans. This company also does Amazon deliveries, missile defence systems and Brexit negotiations.  
MPs have a Code of Conduct. If they actually followed it, Brexit would be dead and buried by now. Their duty to act in the interests of the nation and of their constituents outweighs implementing the damaging result of an advisory referendum. 
Does crime pay? Five times as many Scots voted to remain than voted Leave in NI, yet whilst the Scots and @theSNP get sweet FA, the DUP, up to their necks in the Brexit fraud, are not only calling the shots, they're blackmailing the chief Brexitscam beneficiaries for £billions.  
.@BorisJohnson To back the PM's deal, we need proof that the next stage of the Brexit talks will be radically different  
This is scary. The ERG are blackmailing May into resigning as the price of buying their vote. Means we could go into Brexit with a hard Brexit headbanger at the helm. Just what we need when the proper grownup negotiations start.  
 for all those thinking that if May's deal scrapes through next week Brexit is done and dusted...  
I’m not shy about my disdain for Twitter Discourse, but this weekend was a Rubicon moment. Everyone turned a vigil for 49 dead people into a referendum on Chelsea Clinton. That’s forever, it can never be taken back. And some are still going. This site can’t ever be salvaged. 
Brexit has devastated Britain’s international reputation and respect for its democracyEven a bunch of drunk and sleepless Italians + Poles + Hungarians wouldn’t come up with anything as disastrous as what happens in the CommonsBy ⁦@anneapplebaum⁩   
You've already established that the people can't make an informed choice until they see the deal they're signing. So claiming that it would be undemocratic not to pursue a Brexit that isn't publicly ratified is contradictory. 
Ooh, tomorrow is Brexit Betrayal Eve. Just two more sleeps until we find out whether we still live in a democracy or not. Night all.  
Nadine who are you talking to?  Simply don’t believe this at all.  Our polls show only 4% of Leave voters are in favour of accepting May’s deal.  96% would prefer No Deal.  @JuliaHB1 is correct, May is attempting to bully MPs with threats of no Brexit. Vote it down #BrexitDeal 
Brexit will mark the end of Britain’s role as a great power — Britain is suddenly looking like a banana republic as it makes reckless decisions, misrepresents reality, and now wants to change its own self-imposed deadline.By ⁦@FareedZakaria⁩ 
You’re hijacking democracy. Holding the majority of the country hostage to an illegal fraudulent referendum which was subject to foreign influence. Democracy did not stop in 2016. #Brexit is not above scrutiny the law or parliamentary sovereignty. You march against our country 
Brexit is not democracy. The ‘will of the people’ is meaningless in a non binding referendum corrupted by illegality... weird that Brexiters claim democracy while supporting illegality in democratic process 
FM can still direct a “lawful” Ref on independence, even if Theresa May refuses to 𝘢𝘭𝘭𝘰𝘸 Scotland to choose how it means to be governed, constitutional experts have said, as lawyers team up with politicians to try and craft a way out of Tory Brexit UK  
Still don't really understand how a non binding referendum can only be held once, but a meaningful vote can be run 3 or 4 times though. 
Fareed Zakaria CNN - Britain, famous for its prudence, propriety & punctuality is suddenly looking like a banana republic as it makes reckless decisions & misrepresents reality... #Brexit is a solution in search of a problem. #marr #ridge #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
CEO Badger Trust accuses Government plotting systematic destruction of badgers as nation is distracted by Brexit crisis  @PeterEgan6 @ChrisGPackham @charliemoores @Animal_Watch @GlobalWarriors @WCL_News @emeliobedelio @LeagueACS @MarkAvery @DerbyshireBEVS 
We got the evidence at the hearing of the European Parliament.Also the intervention of foreign interests during the  Brexit-referendum. It seems,the british political authorities could not care less...  
The BBC, Saturday afternoon, and a sweaty staffer is sprinting through the office, waving a post-it above his head and shouting “Get out the way! I’ve found one! I’ve found us another random celeb who’ll give us an ill-informed, logic-free soundbite on Brexit!” 
Russian bid to influence Brexit vote detailed in new US Senate report  #lbc #fbpe #conservatives #labour #libdems #snp #plaidcymru #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #brexit #itvnews #bbcnews #BBCNewsSix #bbclondonnews #londontonight #c4news #5news #skynews #c4brexit 
40 Tory Rebels Told Theresa May: We’ll Vote For Your Brexit Deal If You Quit As PM - but before any journalist calls, she did not ring me.  
This amendment is so different from what @jeremycorbyn was saying this morning (vote down May's deal, press for a GE, if that fails a public vote on a "credible" soft Brexit) we're not convinced the front bench will back it.Will you @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer ? Time is up. 
With dedication and organisation like this, I can't understand why Brexit isn't going better. #march2leave 
More clarity that the status quo was never an option in the referendum. The choice was profound change one way, or profound change the other.  
It seems to politicians like Brady are completely mis-reading the public mood. Public are fed up w/ politicians fudging Brexit and want a clean No Deal / WTO Brexit. If May's deal leads to a dead-end and years more humiliating surrender, public anger will only increase.  
Legally we are as #Brexitready as we can be, thanks to the cooperation of all political parties. Let’s hope this legislation is never needed, thanks @PresidentIRL #Brexit .  
Couldn’t be clearer, the @UKLabour  leaderships preferred option is for the UK to leave the EU. The membership can go hang, they want Brexit.  
How’s sitting on the fence & trying to be all things to all men ‘showing leadership’ As someone who used to be a member of Liberty & a big fan of Shami Chakrabarti, I’m saddened by her selling her soul for a peerage & single-handedly destroying her reputation#Marr #Brexit  
Wrong. Completely.1) Brexit has the ability to fuel our economy in the long term, especially given the unpredictable future of the EU & limitations it holds. 2) This makes LITERALLY no sense. Brexit gives us control of our borders. We choose who we let in based on our needs.  
It seems that many Tory MP's who previously voted against May's deal are now going to vote for it claiming it's better than no Brexit...they are nothing but a bunch of quisling liars....Please folks hit them where it hurts...at the ballot box..THE ONLY WAY IS @UKIP PLEASE JOIN 
Brexit has become an expression of right wing English ethnic nationalism, and for too many, racism. I take solace in the beautiful words of the late great William McIlvanney's observation that Scotland is "a mongrel nation". All are welcome to be Scottish and to be yourself. 
If Theresa May's Brexit goes through, it'll be in the heads of Farage, Johnson, Gove and all the other Brexiters. They can't pull the house down and then complain about how the bricks have fallen. 
BREXIT BLOCK: Truckers VOW to BLOCK Motorways if Brexit betrayed  via @Politicalite 
But ..  May’s Deal Is NOT Brexit!  
RT Decade after Decade has gone. by & ONLY NOW MI5 files reveal #Thatcher supported key ally over child sex abuse claims @Skypapers @SkyNews @BBCNews @LBC @itvnews #PoliticsLive #alloutpolitics @bbc5live @BBCr4today #bbcpapers #Brexit @conservatives @GMB 
If there's a general election, any party advocating remaining in the EU will get my vote.... and it won't cost them a penny!Anyone else out there going to do the same?#brexit #GeneralElection 
I voted to keep No Deal on table. The vote was lost. It's now raw politics. PM's deal, with 12 week technical extension (delivering Brexit) or a two-year EU imposed Article 50 ext. The 29th March date was lost last week. That is past. Now need to ensure Brexit not lost entirely..  
Keir, you and all other MPs who are lawyers will be aware of the corrupt and illegal practices surrounding the referendum. You must oppose any kind of Brexit, which diminishes our prosperity, security and global standing. #RevokeA50 
In one-on-one phone calls with Theresa May today, Tory rebels told the PM in direct terms that the price for them voting for the deal is her publicly committing to stand down so a new leader can take charge of the next Brexit negotiations  
This is awful. This is #Brexit. A Scot, married to a Belgian. Forced to leave because of the uncertainties around their future together in little #Brexit Britain.  
I’m completely ok with Corbyn voting Leave in a second referendum. It’s obvious he’s a Leaver. He’s been anti-EU his entire career.I’m not ok with him working against the Labour Party while insisting it’s democratic. Of course there’s disagreement about whether he is doing this  
Business, City, wealth creators, job creators all say the same: “We must have certainty - Brexit delay will leave lasting damage to businesses, more so than no deal.”  
This is amazing. Brexit is devoid of values, purpose and dignity.We leave the club only to follow the rules of the club without deciding those rules as we do now.What would it say about the state of our democracy if this twice-defeated  passes?  
NEW: 40 Tory rebel MPs tell Theresa May: we’ll only vote for your Brexit deal if you quit as PM  
Brian Adcock: The PM greasing the palms of those whose votes she needs most, namely the DUP, nice. #peoplesvote #TheresaMay #BrexitVote #BrexitShambles #Brexit #Tories #backstop #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #TheresaMay political cartoon gallery in London  pic.twitter.com/ezH5nWEXC7 
Brexit: Welsh farmers’ union calls for Article 50 to be revoked  #agriland#RevokeRemainRebuild#PutItToThePeopleMarch 
“the causes of brexit were not in general anything to do with the EU” !You need to door knock and chat with people in different areas to understand the EU was indeed a reason behind their voting for #Brexit 
This is reallly very good and worth a listen if you want to grasp the Brexit crisis Michael Portillo Tells Nigel Farage: Nothing In My Political Career Compares To Brexit Chaos  @nigel_farage 
BREXIT PROTEST & DIRECT ACTION GROUP UK...GREAT NEWS M6 GO SLOW JUST BEEN ADDED TO SITE  
Funny to see Brexiteers on TV angry about being involved in the European Parliament Elections given they moaned that the EU was...errr... undemocratic!! #Brexit ...and Shhh don't mention most Westminster parliamentarians are unelected  #Lords 
Latest @guardian cartoon...#TheresaMay #Brexit #BrexitDeal #WithdrawalAgreement 
WATCH | "We are twelve days from Brexit. All we have to do is hold our nerve and on March 29 we come out on a No Deal basis, save £39bn, and get out of this dreadful EU superstate" - Peter Bone confirms he'll vote against May's rotten treatySupport us at  
BREXIT PROTEST & DIRECT ACTION GROUP UKFirst 5 blockades of UK roads arranged for Friday 22nd March....  
May in make-or-break bid to gain DUP support for her Brexit deal  
In case you were wondering why we’re doing any of this, May has pledged to align whole UK with any new EU business and agriculture rules that we won’t have voted on but which will be forced on NI when we all increase our sovereignty and take back control under May’s Brexit deal  
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you.  
Problem which I think DAG understates. Not just MPs, few others have scrutinised the Brexit deal, even fewer have understood (possibly in single figures?) the full legal ramifications of all parts - not just the backstop.  
What you should be doing is opposing ANY form of Brexit. You know that every single form of Brexit makes us less prosperous, less influential, less relevant and reduces our rights. The hardest hit will be your heartland. YOU KNOW THISYour Brexiter leader will never be PM 
Brexit has already come at a cost, regardless of where it goes from here  
What I find most heartbreaking about Brexit is what  could have achieved over the past three years if it hadn’t been for this obsession. 
There's absolutely nothing 'honourable' about Theresa May and the self serving Tories!Theresa May asks MPs for 'honourable compromise' on Brexit  
Ah, but it does. You made space for it and now they want more. Hostile Environment  Brexit. 
"if the controversial backstop is ever triggered, Great Britain would adopt any new food and business rules that could be forced by the EU on Northern Ireland"  - thus the UK can't make a trade deal that the EU can't make  #Pointless #Brexit  
The meaning of ‘Meaningful’ must be upheld.Speaker must say no to third meaningful vote on Brexit.#NoMV3 
British Truck Drivers threaten to BLOCK ‘Planes, Trains & Roads’ if Brexit is delayed!  via @https://twitter.com/UnityNewsNet 
About 34000 people from Sunderland  managed to go to the football on saturday. But only 200 could find the time to march for our democratic freedom. People that voted Brexit are an embarrassment 
There is no honour in a compromise with corruption. If I were to accept corruption I would then be corrupt.Did you know in 2017 that the referendum leave result was corrupt? Did you know about the massive overspend, the dark money, the collusion & the foreign interference? 
Everything about any Brexit outcome is utterly unstable. Not nearly enough attention is being paid to how catastrophic that will be. 
What you would put in a Brexit-themed burger? #Brexit  
When a London Cabbie tells me that he voted #Brexit because anyone can rock up from Bulgaria and in 24 hours be  driving an Uber Car, that Cabbie should realise that these  licenses are U.K. laws and not implemented by the EU !!!!! 
Mark Sedwill runs Theresa May, in a similar way that senior mandarins ran her at the Home Office.  But it won’t be Sedwill’s name on the ballot paper at the coming election. So why let him decide the indefensible Brexit deal you’ll end up having to defend? 
The UK's fishing industry is being sacrificed as the government yet again bows to the demands of the Brussels bureaucrats:  #Brexit 
The troops arrive the day after Brexit is supposed to take place and includes soldiers from EU nations...Read now:  
Almost every word of this exposes the hypocrisy at the heart of May’s premiership, & the casual distortion of language & meaning that Brexit has wrought. “Patriotism is the last refuge of the scoundrel.” - Samuel Johnson“Patriotism is the virtue of the vicious” - Oscar Wilde  
Massive error here. MV3 is the same as MV1 - A bad deal dressed up with fake promises and commitments. The public remember and will vote out all of the sellouts at the next GE. #Brexit #Ridge #Marr 
Love the irony of labour politicians moaning about brexit because they think it might risk jobs. Guys, everything your party believes in would DESTROY jobs #bbcqt  
This is how Brexit Britain is now being portrayed. 
Perhaps obvious, but no less infuriating for it. In a wk where MPs have gone round in Brexit circles, there have been - among other things - the worst A&E figures on record & flashing lights in an outsourcing industry with 100s of £m in govt contracts  
May’s deal means that the administrative state’s grip on Brexit outcomes will reinforced, not weakened.  The Olly Robbins-Mark Sedwill types will have control.  Better to have a no confidence motion than accept that. Hold firm for 14 more days 
Will direct tensions between the Brexit wishes of the DUP & the ERG now be exposed?This isn't so much a sly backstop trap as a self-applied handcuff.  
The Disaster Capitalism Club: Vote Leave Backers Who Made Billions from Brexit – Byline TimesDisaster capitalism is hidden behind Brexit.   
 >>>>>>>  10k votes would make this a real samplePlease only vote if you are happy to retweet  have you changed your mind????  24 hours - 10k votes, 10k RT’s - GO#brexit #vote #Article50 #Referendum 
Highlight of Brexit is the UK begging international students to stay and find work after forcing them to leave. These jokes write themselves. 
Nadine, the 'deal' is NOT Brexit.  There is no mechanism for unilateral withdrawal.  We'd be in the EU forever.  Better to go for No Deal under WTO rules on 29th which is still the default position in law. 
It’s not too late for MPs to do the right thing — If I were a Tory backbencher I’d have wavered this far too, but now is the moment to see that Brexit can still be stopped.By Matthew Parris 
Theresa May's revised offer to the DUP involves making the whole of the UK a rule-taker, required to follow every change in the EU's laws, but without a say in any of them. Exactly the opposite of "taking back control", because we'll have much less than we do now. Thanks, Brexit!  
I made a video for @freemovementlaw about the Settlement Scheme for EU citizens to stay after Brexit and now there's something in my eye  
Fighting for Brexit in the wake of the Article 50 extension -A collage of UKIP voices outside the Houses of Pariament on the day that the political establishment voted to extend Article 50 and betray Brexit.WATCH:  
Latvian Foreign Minister on whether Brexit will ever happen. 
Theresa May's Brexit disaster — She has led her country, her party, and herself into a labyrinth, and she has neither the power nor the ideas that will allow them to find a way out. Her stubbornness and ineptness have made it even more difficult 
Important to recall these promises, including that UK would be part of a free trade zone (sic) stretching from Iceland to Turkey. The *only* conceivable meaning of that is Brexit = single market (Iceland) and a customs union (Turkey), which Brexiters now say would not be Brexit.  
FOLLOW BACK FOR BREXITEERS BUS #FollowBack #BrexitParty #BrexitBetrayal @boblister_poole @Brexit4Students @brexit999a @Tony_Dowd @ScotlandsBrexit @StandUp4Brexit @BrexitKnight RT and all follow each other. Building BREXIT network to ensure our tweets are not Shadow banned  
Exactly - this is all wrong & every MP that tries to shaft us will pay the price at next election ‘. They will definitely pay at #LocalElections - Brexit - we do not need this #MayDeal stitch 
Never for a moment believed the line the Farage pro Brexit march on London numbers were restricted to very low numbers for 'security reasons' . Did anyone on the Remain side fall for that lane excuse?   
Sorry, TheresaThere can be no compromise with hate or loss of rights. You might as well ask Jews to compromise with the Nazis, or blacks to compromise with the KKK. I abhor every element of Brexit with all my being.  
It is ironic that those Leavers backing #Brexit because of sovereignty and taking back control are supporting politicians who want to hand over much of that sovereignty to a global super-rich elite who couldn't care less about Britain and its people.#PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
In 1940 France was divided & demoralised, and depended on its Maginot line defences. The Germans simply drove through Belgium and around the French fortifications. The #Brexit right has similarly by-passed our normal legal defences against electoral crime and abuses of democracy. 
That has been the problem from the beginning : a Remain Parliament and a PM who said she would deliver Brexit but caved in to EU demands from day 1 and now caving in to Commons and a biased Speaker #BrexitBetrayal #peoplevparliament 
BREXIT BLOCK: Lorry drivers threaten to CLOSE UK transport links if exit is delayed   
Do you think Mays deal betrays your Brexit vote? 
Labour MP Ben Bradshaw told Clive Bull that the "most logical" and "decisive" solution to the Brexit deadlock is by having a second referendum instead of a general election.@clivebull | #Brexit 
When press and politicians peddle the same lies on an industrial scale, when they tolerate and cover-up electoral crime & foreign interference, when they use threats of violence to intimidate, we are not in the realm of normal politics, we are in the realm of hybrid war.#Brexit 
A honestly believe junkies are the most talented people on the planet n they would have done a better job of brexit  
Brexit was always going to be humiliation. We got to choose between economic suicide or losing our say in the rules that govern one of the worlds largest markets, in our own neighbourhood, whilst still being officially subject to them (in practice we'd always be affected by them) 
Well done you finally got there.Forriners and Tax AvoidanceBrexit 101 
DAVID STARKEY on how our politicians have launched a coup over Brexit.  via @MailOnline 
To understand what's going on, you need to understand that there are TWO huge struggles underway1. Brexit2. Establishment is moving heaven and earth to prevent the people elecing  a Socialist 
I say now the truckers and us are going to close Briton down. That feller we all laughed at stocking up on them beans in that supermarket because of Brexit!!               WELL HE DONT SEEM THAT STUPID NOW!! 
Yeah, I mean, it seems perfectly reasonable for MPs to get the final say on Brexit, doesn’t it...?  
#MarchToLeave #MarchForLeave #BrexitMarchGod bless every one of those ppl trudging along the road for democracy.LEAVE didn't win by a handful of votes, but by over ONE MILLION.It is time Parliament delivered on the decision of The People.Not remain, not vassalage, but BREXIT.  
We can learn much from #Brexit events in UK.  Our path to freedom and sovereignty will be much easier when we get rid of the treacherous troika of FG/FF/SF.   Reject them and embrace a patriotic alternative @IrexitFreedom . #IFP #Irexit 
Couple of things coming up in Elgin not directly run by us but important dates nontheless.Tomorrow Mike Russell @Feorlean is speaking about #Brexit from 6.30-8.00pm in St Giles Church.On Thursday 7pm #NaePasaran is being shown at The 8 Acres Hotel 
49% vs 41% of voters believe the decision to #Brexit was a mistake, while 57% vs 43% support a #PeoplesVote. Forcing through a crooked #Brexit without a #PeoplesVote against the will of the majority would be a catastrophe for our democracy. 
Next Saturday 23rd March hundreds of thousands of people will be marching to Parliament to demand a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit.Why will you be marching? #PutItToThePeople 
Ben Jennings on Theresa May's plea for her Brexit deal #BrexitVote #BrexitShambles #Brexit #Tories #BrexitShamble #BrexitShambles #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #TheresaMay  - political cartoon gallery in London  
Never before has the UK had such a shameful government & opposition. Both the @Conservatives & #Labour are grossly incompetent & so undemocratic, both parties are trying to sabotage Brexit. The UK political system is broken & the people deserve so better than this sham democracy!  
Thread 1. Here's what Theresa May has offered the DUP in order to secure their votes for her fake Brexit deal. She "promises" that should the backstop kick in, she will apply all the new EU rules to the entire UK, thus keeping the UK in the Single Market indefinitely. 
Latvian foreign minister says he would back Brexit extension. How very kind, but the overwhelming majority of Brits don’t want an extension. Much prefer you to say NO instead..  
“Today, the north's enduring and unrelenting misfortune is continued through the failure of British administrators to understand its people and their history.” Brexit, sadly, proves that.  
I heard Tony Blair sum up Brexit once, should it go ahead. He said there will be 17m people short on gratitude and 16m people long on memory 
Nurse accused of stealing British jobs after finding 'Brexit means Brexit' note.This is what #Brexit has done to our country. One of many reasons we'll be marching on Saturday.#PutItToThePeople #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote via @MetroUK 
You don’t have #Brexit. This isn’t independence. You have the mother of all political fudges that pleases NO ONE. Literally no one. We are rule takers now. Limited in influence and power. So you’ve completely and utterly wasted your time since 2015. Congratulations.  
I’ve a hunch if A50 is revoked on the grounds “that we looked hard at Brexit and we don’t like what we see so we’re not going to do it” - I think most people would be cool and relaxed about that. Shrug their shoulders., raise their eyebrows and then just crack on to be honest 
Hypothetical poll 1/2Please retweet both Only two options :- #brexit #eu #politics #uk #may #corbyn #WithdrawalAgreement 
Hear Hear ........   Brexit news: Redwood insists UK MUST leave on March 29 for THIS reason | Politics | News |  
Petition: Hold a second referendum on EU membership at 92,000. 8,000 to go, then parliament has to debate it. Sign then rt.   
Very good. One point: the Conservative reaction to Blair's centrism was not just to go mad on Europe. It was to embark on neoliberal overdrive or overreach (see austerity) masked by a culture war (immigration), much as in the US. For some but not all Tories that led to Brexit.  
Tony Blair: won 3 elections. Global statesman. Tells the truth on Brexit. Jeremy Corbyn: won zero elections, famous only on his allotment. Lies about Brexit. I know who I’d rather take note of. 
If there's anything going on the south coast M3 corridor count me in, i've only a car but would park anywhere in the name of Brexit 
So, basically UK would follow new EU rules it had no hands in making.Point Sam Gyimah continues to make: we are giving up our EU vetoes, becoming rule takers, rather than part of rule making.So, what really is Brexit for? Just the pretence of keeping out foreigners? 
Brexit in a nutshell.  
I will never accept Brexit.I will not accept a decline in my country's wellbeing and economy.I will not accept being dictated to by corrupt millionaires.I will not accept loss of mine and my family's freedoms.I will not accept a step closer to a fascist Britain. 
If you stand for democracy then you can’t stand for a gerrymandered advisory referendum, fought & won on proven lies and illegality. There should be no compromises where all of them will make the country poorer, less influential, less relevant with reduced rights. #RevokeA50 
It seems that Corbyn would back a second Brexit referendum that would not include Brexit at all.  And he favours a Customs Union, which is not Brexit at all, and maintains most of the downsides of EU membership. 
Dutch PM Likens May's Brexit Tenacity to Python's Black Knight@FBPE @J_amesp @TheNewEuropean @acgrayling @carolecadwalla @remain_central @HuwMerriman @TheIndGroup @mrjamesob @Telegraph 
Theresa May will cancel Brexit deal vote if she does not believe she can win it, ministers reveal  
Jeremy Corbyn is to hold more Brexit meetings with MPs across the HoC this week. Meetings confirmed so far are with Jack Dromey & Caroline Spelman, leaders of four opposition parties (SNP, Plaid, Greens, Lib Dems), Yvette Cooper, Hilary Benn, and the Common Market 2.0 group. 
Voting for May's awful deal will not solve the problem of people's impatience as it will not give us Brexit. Just building up the pressure of 17m voters being kicked in the teeth by its own government. Retribution will come for sure. 
*HANG YOUR HEADS IN SHAME  PARLIAMENT*"800 years of democracy is unravelling before our very eyes: Distinguished historian DAVID STARKEY on how our self-satisfied politicians have launched a coup over Brexit" 
CORBYN, THE LABOUR MOVEMENT AND A PEOPLES BREXIT -BRISTOL 23rd MARCH.  
also be adopted in Great Britain. Amazingly some ministers believe the DUP will capitulate and vote for her Brexit deal on Tuesday. Details here  
Brexit Terms Explained:Undemocratic vs Democratic  
Some people say SNP should use leverage over any minority Labour government to get a S. 30 order for a new referendum. Surely wiser strategy would be to demand a Scotland Act revision to clarify permanently that no permission from Westminster was needed.  
Once again we find that if you are a Tory MP you are allowed to change your mind and vote 2 or even 3 times for Brexit.If you are the British Public, it’s one vote, forever, never to be changed even if you have changed your mind.  
Would rather take our chances than be shafted by you lot. At least we can then leave the EU when a BREXIT party wipe the floor with you lot at the next election. 
The great historian David Sarkey is right: the British establishment are attempting a coup in trying to block Brexit. Something analogous is happening here with the Deep State's (and Never Trump) effort to undo the 2016 election adn unseat @realDonaldTrump  
The patriotic case for stopping Brexit - now!  
More Eurostar delays as French customs staff strike in 'Brexit drill'  
MP's who are thinking of backing @theresa_may lousy #Brexit in name only deal are the first rats in history who have actually got back on a sinking ship! Ditch this useless PM and leave on #WTOBrexit Do you agree? If so please retweet. 
The foolishness from @BBCNews is that this is such obvious and easily collected data on bias that @Ofcom should be digging into deep.Will @Ofcom interview @ThatTimWalker and also all those other journalists who were largely abandoned post Brexit and told not to speak of it. 
How come Theresa May gets THREE votes and we only get the one?The public should have the final say on Brexit. #PutItToThePeopleAgree? RETWEET  
Scottish Constitution project leader Dr Mark McNaught " Scotland can either choose to stay in  Brexit UK and be one of poorest & least-democratic countries in Europe, or become independent, amongst its richest, and THE most democratic. It’s up to you, the choice is that stark.”  
They didn’t take into account a bridge was closed on sundays - great planning .. bit like brexit  
"Do you think there should or should not be a new referendum on whether Britain should leave EU or remain a member?"Should 38% (+2)Should not 52% (+3)Don't know 10% (-5)Cons 81-13 against, Leavers 83-10 againstLab 66-27 for, Remainers 66-26 forYouGov Mar 15 
The public is losing patience - MPs must vote for May’s Brexit deal, says Sir Graham Brady MP 
“I was on the BBC a great deal before (Brexit)– maybe 3 or 4 times a month on television & often on the radio, including the Today programme. The BBC now has me on around 2-3 times a year. And, the last time I was on I was told not to talk about Brexit.   
Perhaps the biggest of #LeaveLies was the £350m for the NHS. The leading Brexiters don't want to support the NHS, they want to privatise it! And a trade deal with the USA would be a perfect means for achieving that goal.#RevokeA50 #Brexit  
"The House of Commons are expected to vote again next week on whether to accept or reject proposed Brexit deal. Should MPs ..."Accept deal 34% (+2)Reject deal 42% (+6)Don't know 24% (-8)Conservative voters break 68-21 FOR the deal, Leavers 45-35 FOR dealYouGov Mar 15 
MPs Peter Kyle and Phil Wilson are putting forward an amendment for a second referendum.Mr Wilson and Mr Kyle are both anti-Corbyn. Despite being elected as Labour MPs on Mr Corbyn’s manifesto they both refuse to endorse him as prime minister.They are men without honour. 
Brexit MARCH: Brexiteers continue 270-mile BETRAYAL rally against May's deal  
Insert obligatory Brexit joke here.  
Actually @ProfBrianCox my reasons for voting leave were entirely down to irreconcilable disagreements with the EU all of which would be immediately resolved by a clean #Brexit  
This is SO brexit  
This professor thinks that “causes of Brexit were not in general anything to do with the EU” ..., tell him, folks.  
No, the majority of the country *did not* vote for Brexit...  
I saw a vague headline about The Who and Brexit and on instinct typed the words Roger Daltrey into my phone. My gammon-dar is strong. 
This is what a politics based on lies looks like. Probably the last point at which it's worth reading Friday's post on my Brexit Blog trying to make sense of the last week's events before the whole circus starts up again:  
The people who are in this video are true patriots and are the only ones who care about Swindon.They organise these yellow vests days to send a message that we the 17.4 will not be betrayed.There’s nothing we want more than Brexit. @TomWho4 and @MartinPCostello who are true p 
Fellow Remainers. It's our march and our protest, and we have to pile the pressure on our MPs. Everyone who can must be there. March 23 London. #PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 #Brexit  
Kelsey Grammer supporting Brexit. The sad losses of Keith Flint and Luke Perry. Dean Cain and Brian McFadden saying that Australian prick was right to punch the young lad who hit him with an egg. It’s like the 90s are trying to destroy all our happy memories of them. 
Can someone explain to me how a referendum between May's deal, which has been universally condemned by leavers & remains alike, and remain, won't be seen as a monumental establishment stitch up by Brexiteers?  Healing... It won't be! 
It's not just that with Labour and the Tories supporting Brexit no one wanted the police to investigate the leave campaign -- though that matters.London is the dirty money capital of Europe, and stays that way because the authorities look the other way. 
Fellow Remainers - we need to do everything we can to persuade Brexity Labour MPs like Caroline Flint, Kevin Barron, Stephanie Peacocke, Ruth Smeeth and Lisa Nandy that they should not vote for May's deal. But don't be rude we have good arguments and facts. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
One of the very few honorable #MPs that not only believes in her Country but in honouring the Vote the 17,410,742 Brits who voted for #BREXIT! Your constituents will remember You #AndreaJenkyns..... unlike the rest of the COWARDS in the @Conservatives! 
6/. So if you do not want “a faulty referendum” and the consequences may I very respectfully suggest youall do your job properly this time, seeking a very long extension to enable you to learn from your past errors.Or #RevokeA50 and think again.  Long, hard and honestly. 
My @guardian column: A long #Article50 delay is now the only genuinely patriotic way out of this Brexit quagmire   
5/. With great respect your (all MPs) failure to do so is what is"walking into a room full of explosives with a lit match”.Instead you seek to subvert us with a threadpt of another faulty referendum that would quite literally be of your own making if it occurred. 
#Brexit profits:  Rees-Mogg earned at least £7m from management fees & investor returns on the multi-billion SCM fund. But this pales in comparison with his former investor Crispin Odey who, along with his partner James Hanbury, made £350m #RevokeA50 
“I'm just back from the campaign trail. We're hearing the same message again & again. It's bigger than Brexit now; it's about trust. For the 1st time there's a fear that MPs are actually worse than they thought. Please turn down this deal & make sure we leave on 29th” @CanterTory 
3/. As the depth of the corruption and Russian interference became clear instead of having a grown up conversation amongst yourself about how democracy had been defeated and the referendum annulled you just carried on with your ears blocked.  As now. 
Labour is a party of Brexit. Labour is a party of Brexit. Labour is a party of Brexit. Labour is a party of Brexit, etc.  
I have written a joint letter to the @Independent about how we can solve the Brexit impasse in Parliament. The key is the amendment tabled by @peterkyle and @MPphilwilson as stated below. If the Prime Minister brings back her deal this week we'll be ready:  
In one week I will be marching at the #PutItToThePeople March to demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. Will you join me?:  
Today on Gordon Brewer's Sunday Politics show:the view on Brexit from a Scottish Tory MPthe view on Brexit from a Scottish Labour MP& the view on Brexit from an SNP MP - oh no, wait, we didn't.maybe they couldn't find any SNP MPs. I expect that was it. Not bias, obviously  
Is that a veiled threat??  The 'deal' MUST be voted down as it is not #Brexit and would mean we are tied to the EU forever.  All 27 EU countries would have to agree any extension to Article 50 and that is not guaranteed.  No Deal WTO exit is still the legal default. 
Support for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit has surged in the days since the Gov's Brexit deal was decisively rejected by MPs for a second time, according to new YouGov polling.The only way forward is a #PeoplesVote. March with us next Saturday:  
Do you support the British Truckers? #BREXIT follow @UnityNewsNet for more! 
Here is Louis, he voted leave but now realises he was misled and has regret.Respect @louisjennings96, it's ok to change your mind when facts change. Many feel the same and are #RemainerNowIt's why MPs must asked for #InformedConsent on #Brexit  
1. You have never stood together with anyone, not even in your own party, & never with the 48%2. You do not have the right to claim patriotism & democracy 3. You haven't made a single compromise 4. You have done more to cause those divisions than anyoneSo Brexit off!  
Nicky Morgan told the Commons she feared that MPs were suffering “systematic intimidation” to get them to change their votes on Brexit. Electoral crime and threats of violence against MPs are fine, but a democratic #PeoplesVote is not!#Brexit 
Cottage. Roaring fire. Yvette Cooper sat thinking. I'm a Kamikaze remoaner trying to stop Brexit. I will lose my seat. BUT, l will get job in city 10 times my MP salary. A Quango. l keep house, swimming pool, car, hols and the proles will STILL be paying my salary. lt's worth it. 
Brexit lies - Brussels is offering us a false choice, says NIGEL FARAGE | Express Comment | Comment |  
Only by leaving the EU completely can we leave the CFP, take back control of our waters and begin the process of rebuilding an industry which has been decimated by the European Union. For this to happen, Brexit must actually mean exit!  
66% of those in the North & Midlands who voted Labour in the last election support a #PeoplesVote & only 21% oppose it. Are Labour MPs @JohnMann @KevinBarron @CarolineFlintMP @RuthSmeeth @lisanandy going to respect the public's demand for a vote?#Brexit 
Brexit: 'Physically impossible' to leave on 29 March, says chancellor  
I still won't back Mrs May's deal – because it's not Brexit, says @OwenPaterson 
Britain's unilateral rule-out of a no-deal #Brexit was like 'the Titanic voting for the iceberg to get out of the way', says Dutch PM #MarkRutte.#EUWeekInReview 
There is some truth to this but one very important thing will have been achieved by Leaving. A referendum result will have been respected and the likes of Brian Cox, Alastair Campbell etc will have necessarily been defeated. Not a small thing on the road back to democracy.  
The world order as we know it was built over two centuries, during the reigns of two liberal, Anglo superpowers--Britain and then the US. I wonder whether Brexit will mark the day that the West--as a political and strategic entity--began to crumble 
To be somewhat crude, #Brexit is a turd which our political elite has spent 32 months trying to polish. It's time to regain our senses and stop honouring a political cow pat. #RevokeA50 
Really worth putting aside 20 minutes to listen to Michael Portillo analysing the Brexit choices. He says he might have voted for the deal last week, leans against it this week.  
Transforming Britain After BrexitCome and hear from leading figures how the British economy can be restructured after Brexit to benefit working people and trade unionists.London, 25 March, 18:30  Hamilton House, Mabledon Place 
Don't know about you but I want Mays "deal" to be kicked into the gutter Tuesday. Let's ask Europe if we should extend #brexit or not. Got a feeling Theresa is shitting it as atleast 3 EU countries will say a big fat NO 
Labour's Corbyn invites UK lawmakers to help break Brexit impasse  
This is just ill informed information Hugh, absolute bollocks and frankly more scaremongering. Brexit was campaigned on self-determination and sovereignty and this is nothing more than virtue signalling, we're sick of this metropolitan bullshit camaraderie.  
A long delay is the only real way out of this Brexit quagmire | Matthew d’Ancona  
12 days to Brexit after 2 years of negs. #HMG persistently failed to grasp that EU meant what it said: unity, integrity single market & indivisibility 4 freedoms, no cherry picking, solidarity with Ireland etc. Don’t start future negs, if UK ever gets there with delusions-learn 
Keksey Grammer opining on Brexit? That's about as relevant as Martin Clunes rocking up at Fox News to talk about the border wall. 
Top quality journalism here. Referendum result in Lothian - 51% support for 20mph, 28% opposed.Headline - "Lothian says no to 20mph"  
Never mind, Millwall fans. Still got Brexit to look forward to. 
She hit the nail on the head and nobody could counteract her argument! No deal is a proper Brexit!    
#ThingsPeopleSayThatAnnoyMe"The people have spoken"Er no:1) The split in the three year old Referendum was about 50/50 2) A minority of the UK voted leave 3) There are a large number of people who were 15, 16 and 17 who couldn't vote, even though they are most affected 
I door-knocked for hours yesterday. Many people volunteered they‘d voted remain but were angry with MPs in Parliament for not respecting the #Brexit result. MPs need to walk the streets (so to speak) & hear what the electorate outside of London really think. It’s No Deal & Leave. 
Please collapse the government before we have a referendum on Mays deal or remain.Those who make peaceful revolution impossible make violent revolution inevitable -JFKIf Brexit is betrayed it’s going to be bad. Like nothing before in the UK. 
Seeing lots of @Conservatives being described as ‘Caving’ as we won’t get #Brexit but May’s BRino isn’t Brexit. All Tories will be caving to is huge & well designed trap to keep Vote from being properly enacted. “Oh I may as well vote for it”. But it isn’t Leaving it’s surrender. 
Cuz that’s what friends do to other friends when they are in turmoil, they ridicule them, point and laugh at them Y’all traitors man #brexit  
The last thing Scots want is another independence referendum. 
Your deal is NOT Brexit it does NOT respect the Ref result,& does NOT take back control.The 17.4M voted for Independence & we will NOT accept anything less. No Prime Minister should present her country with an unacceptable choice, you have betrayed us & we will NEVER forget!!  
Here's a Brexit compromise:1) #RevokeArticle502) Address the real issues that people were pissed off about that were dishonestly blamed on the EU by the leave campaign scumbags.What do you reckon? 
The latest in a long list of Brexit ironies is that remainers' last chance is if Brexiters heed Hannan's advice via @Telegraph 
All those who're saying they're sick of Brexit and want it over and done with need to understand May's deal and no-deal will both mean no end to the arguments about it. The fixation will remain on it, and that's where the money will go, rather than the needs of ordinary people  
Also - if Brexit is so overwhelmingly popular why don't they want the start point shared? It's not *security* as they claim - it's because they don't want the photo opportunity ruined  
As some Brexiteers look set to be blackmailed into supporting Theresa May's disastrous deal, well done to Owen Paterson for confirming he is NOT for turning as May's deal "simply is not Brexit."   
If Brexit happens without a new referendum, there will be literally ZERO evidence to suggest that people like our new relationship with the EU more than they like membership.(Given that membership officially has a 48% approval rating) 
Wonder how many that voted to #Leave would actually be relieved if #A50 was revoked and the #UK could begin the process of healing and getting back to normal. My guess would be millions looking at the #MarchToLeave turnout.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#RevokeRemainRebuild#Brexit 
The only deal #euflagmafia supports is the current deal.Farage has proved there is no appetite for leave #FarageMarchBrexit will fail, whatever the outcome. #fbpe#BrexitDeal #remainandreform #PeoplesVote 
Support for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit has surged in the days since the Gov's Brexit deal was decisively rejected by MPs for a second time, according to new YouGov polling.The only way forward is a #PeoplesVote. March with us next Saturday:  
It's our birthday.   Three years, every day, without a break.Please help to keep us fighting for a clean Brexit:  
BREXIT FARCE: Redwood insists UK MUST leave on March 29 for THIS reason  
So the rancid #Tory MPs are allowed to reconsider and vote again (FOR THE THIRD TIME IN 2 MONTHS) but the British public are not allowed to consider the #Brexit now on offer and so vastly different to what was sold 3 years ago?  #brexit #PutItToThePeople now! 
BBC News - Brexit: No new vote on May's deal without DUP support - chancellorMy heart will sink if a vote is called. How can people who have so roundly condemned the deal suddenly find that it acceptable and in the national interest?  
REMINDER: "Brexit is like giving up a three-course meal... for the promise of a packet of crisps in the future."Sir Martin Donnelly from the department for intl trade says the arithmetic of Brexit just "doesn't add up"#r4today @LBC #PoliticsLive 
The Sinister SideBrexit is a project of an ultra right wing faction of English nationalists. Many have founded their own political grouping - with all the characteristics of a distinct and separate party – within the Conservative government, want nothing less than a revolution. 
Project Fear as it has been sold is a fiction. We should see a Strongly Mitigated #NoDeal for what it is, and not the Hieronymus Bosch setting as painted by those wishing to stay in a #Customs and Regulatory Union. #brexit 
Absolutely Doreen. Did you know that May's own lawyer, Sir James Eadie QC , told the High Court in London on 21 Feb that May KNOWS that the 2016 EU leave vote was corrupt and illegal, but decided to press on with "brexit" - "brexit" is now essentially pure criminal corruption 
I don't care if May grants a Section 30 or not.Nicola should call an advisory referendum anyway.The Britnats can boycott it if they like. But would they really?Fact is, we know the kind of numbers we need.Achieve that, and the case for independence is made. END OF!#IndyRef2 
Corbyn would prefer his own Labour Brexit to fighting to keep Britain in Europe. Why he kept the door open today to voting leave in another referendum  
Don’t trust May’s calls for an 'honourable compromise' on Brexit.All she means is: MPs have to vote on her dud Brexit deal for the third time.Meanwhile, the people are denied a final say. Totally unacceptable.Write to your MP to demand #StopBrexit. 
Happy St Patrick’s Day to the guy who explains Brexit to everyone and thinks nobody knows he’s on coke. 
Full Brexit, No ECHR,No Customs Union, No 39 billion.  
And how will they get it through if ERG and DUP aided and abbeted by Labour collapse Government. We get automatic brexit. You have no idea of the anger in the people. They will eventually take down the Main parties and the EU. 
Omg this is so funny in a melancholy way.Pro #brexit marchers trying to cross on a bridge that’s closed on sundays. A thread with photos that is so brexit it almost hurts.It’s like one of those unbearable sitcoms that’s painful to watch.  
@ChrisLoesch @DLoesch @KurtSchlichter open contempt for the will of the people. And people wonder why you guys fight so hard for us to maintain our #freedom ? The UK has been in dire straights for some time. This is exactly why people voted for #Brexit .  
I joined @TheSDPUK because they are the only patriotic party that represents the views of those who support brexit and for a social democracy. #sdp #brexit  
Predictions please, for next thing on Brexit.Not what you want to happen, but what you think *will* happen. 
Less than 8k signatures needed, time for a final push:Petition: Hold a second referendum on EU membership.  
It's very simple.You either want brexit and to preserve UK democracy, culture, history & more  ORyou are fighting for remain which makes you a traitor and enemy of the UK & all it stands for.  
Name one positive thing to come from brexit so far - I’ll list my positive below :............ I can’t think of a single thing ! 
#LDConf finishes on a high with great speech from Vince +a new poll showing 57% people back @LibDems Brexit policy! See you next Saturday at the @peoplesvote_uk March 
hilariously pathetic. About 2000 more people marched in support of a local school where I live.....yes, a local school is more popular than Brexit! 
This is correct. May’s Brexit deal solves nothing.The causes of Brexit will still be there if it passes. Some will be made worse by it.And as the EU trade deal isn’t even negotiated let alone agreed, we’ll be arguing about Brexit for years to come. #StopBrexit. 
Wow! @FareedZakaria on Brexit: Britain suddenly looks like a banana republic @mrjamesob @sturdyAlex @JolyonMaugham @JMPSimor @OxfordDiplomat 
Viva Roger Daltrey! HARD BREXIT now.  
Mine & ⁦@peterkyle⁩ article on why we believe only our compromise can break the Brexit impasse | Phil Wilson and Peter Kyle | Opinion | The Guardian  
Brave is facing cancer in the absence of radio-isotopes. Brave is having type 1 diabetes, yet knowing your insulin supply is threatened. Brave is gritting your teeth & doing the job of 3 nurses, because 2 have quit over Brexit. Brave is *not* going for a walk.  
Remain campaigners are routinely dropped from TV shows......but a random Frasier actor sticks to the “get on with Brexit” script and they get a prime slot on @BBCPolitics.Sort it out @BBCNews. Stop the #BBCbias and give fair coverage to #StopBrexit. 
Silly I know but the last couple of years I honestly thought may had a plan?Because nobody could bollicks up Brexit the way she has, I assumed it was part of her strategy and it was, BUT FOR REMAINERS!! She has to be punished!!I fear there are devastating consequences AHEAD! 
#heartsnothate Stop this Brexit now it's madness!  
There is no ‘honourable’ compromise to be had on #Brexit. That’s why it’s right to give our people the #FinalSay and wrong to try to get MPs to suspend their principles to vote for something that harms our country #RightToVote 
Over 1% of the ENTIRE POPULATION OF THE UK turned out for the last People's Vote march in London.Farage can't even manage 1/100 of 1% - of the population of Jarrow!So I want to thank Nigel for making it graphically clear that THE PEOPLE DO NOT WANT BREXIT. 
Wouldn't it be great if @theresa_may @BorisJohnson @michaelgove @LiamFox @DavidDavisMP just for once were honest with the country and admitted that #Brexit is just one colossal mistake? #PutItToThePeople #RevokeArticle50 #BrexitShamble 
Dear @NickGibbUK , seeing as you've consistently voted against UK membership of the EU, please can you explain how your constituents will benefit from Brexit?It would also be good to hear what the benefits of Brexit will be for the entire country.Thank you.  
-"How are you going to tour in Europe" after Brexit? -"Oh dear, as if we didn't tour in Europe before the f*cking EU."  
Theresa May has betrayed the British people.MP’s have also failed to deliver the democratic will.We need Italy and Hungary to veto delaying Brexit.We cannot have continual betrayal when there’s no need.Everything establishment is saying is part of Project Fear being used!  
It's all true. Next we solve the Brexit mess; this followed by the technical challenges of long term habitation on Mars. Stay tuned.  
Fun fact: Just 85 MPs voted for a loser's vote last week. 17.4m voted for Brexit. Wonder if remainers can do the maths on that one... 
Apparently the house has been asked to remove banner .. staunch Brexit supporter apparently  
People who aren't idiots and don't have ulterior motives have been pointing out for a VERY LONG TIME that the wording of any new referendum isn't Corbyn's to gift, and it could very easily be 'deal vs no deal'. Owen is somehow just noticing and of course blames Corbyn for it.  
Imagine if there was no Twitter, and people had to rely on the BBC to tell them how brilliantly #Brexit was going. #BrexitBroadcastingCorporation 
I see the Guardian reported last week that Theresa May's supporters are only trying to keep her in office until 28th May, so she'll have been PM longer than Gordon Brown.  So on top of everything else, Brexit is now turning into a particularly rubbish episode of Record Breakers. 
I do worry sometimes that all votes cast during MV3, be they for or against May‘s deal, will ultimately become votes for another cliffegde: either in 2 years (end of transition) or in 3 months (end of short extension). Pessimistic? I am. Blame #Brexit 
Ooh.... a local event at long last, this ones just up the road from me!Jason's talk will broadly cover:1. How did we get to where we are with Brexit?2. Where is here?3. What does Brexit really mean?4. What can we do about it?  
The worst poss outcome whatever the final result of this utter #Brexit Clusterf*ck is that both main debased parties come out with their cosy 2 party stitch up intact & then seek to change UK Constitution in their favour!#RevokeA50 OR Revoke THEM!#PeoplesVote #Remain in Control 
A #Brexit question. Is anyone taking a legal route (via the Cambridge Analytica fall out) to challenge the validity of the referendum now it’s been proved that Team Leave broke the law? While we are watching our government eat itself this seems like a rather simple route - no? 
New poll shows 57% would support a #PeoplesVote. And just 32% support leaving on the deal negotiated by the Prime Minister. Tell your MP you don't want this #Brexit deal. A #PeoplesVote is the #OnlyWayForward:  
MP's who preparing to vote for May's deal, despite no change, using as an excuse the alternative is No Brexit please think againIf the #Establishment try to deny us #Brexit they will be defeatedWe will prevail .. Defeat May's Deal now@EstherMcVey1 @DavidDavisMP @DUPonline 
Let’s get this trending .. Really important you retweet before you vote! Thank you What is your best possible short-term outcome for #Brexit Thanks P.P  
Brexit means Blast  
“Stand together”says the PM behind “citizens of nowhere” and “queue jumpers”.“Honourable compromises”says the PM who demands that MPs vote on her dud Brexit deal again and again.Enough of this drivel. Give us a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit. 
So funny that #MarchToLeave #GammonballRun was due to cross @teestransporter bridge but they forgot to check if it opened Sundays! What is it about Brexit & lack of planning!!! 
We saw May's answer to a question on the house about possible fraud in the referendum: 'People knew what they were voting for'. Theresa May has given a green light to cheating in future elections. She is unfit for public office. 
Democratic votes are free & fairUndemocratic votes are criminal & corruptEU Referendum 2016 was criminal & corrupt Sir James Eadie QC (Your Defence Lawyer) agreed in Court last month.You denied me my democratic right to a free & fair vote? 
MUST READ: Only our compromise can break the #Brexit impasse:  
Can someone please clarify? If UK leaves the EU & Scotland becomes independent within the EU, can those of us stranded in England & Wales take up Scottish citizenship automatically? Or if we fought for Remain? It will be very uncomfortable living in Brexit Britain. It already is. 
With just 12 days till Brexit Theresa gave to me,Ministers resigning,Pointless elections,Deals with DUP,No confidence votes,Parliament contempt,UN Migration,Front bench of Remainers,Countless amendments,No deal defeat,Votes for extensions,And the worst deal in history. 
This week's edition of #SundayReading covers:- how to talk about the New Zealand massacre- why the college scandal made everyone mad- the latest on Brexit 
You think it's "democratic" to vote for a deal both halves of a divided country don't want?You think it's "patriotic" to do a Brexit your own experts say will harm the UK?You think it will "heal divisions" if people are made poorer by a deal they'll blame the other side for? 
What, in support of your Brexit? The thing that has done more to undermine faith in the competence & pragmatism of British government than anything in my lifetime?  
No. The referendum was fraudulent.  We are European. 
If MP's vote through May's deal you will be adding new parties to this list who will eviscerate Conservatives, Labour & Libdems seats in the HofCDefeat May's deal this week and let's win a proper Brexit  
Genuinely , when trendy angry middle class contrarians ( @spikedonline )talk about brexit as this huge working class revolt I cringe You got 140 lads out across the entire  ukONE HUNDRED AND FUCKING FORTYChesterfield take 600 to pre season friendlies Do one Pure shithouse 
MP's who are now prepared to vote for May's deal, despite no change, using as an excuse the alternative is No Brexit please think againIf the #Establishment try to deny us #Brexit they will be defeatedWe will prevail .. Defeat May's Deal now@EstherMcVey1 @DavidDavisMP  et al 
Government behind hostile environment, Go Home vans, the Windrush scandal and a xenophobic Brexit based on ending immigration confused as to why foreign students may not want to study here.  
Summary of tonight’s Russian TV news: Russia = good, abroad = problems. Home stories all positive (annexed Crimea allegedly happy, Putin upbeat on business, new plane, Repin exhibition)Foreign stories negative (NZ attacks, Ukraine election, Paris riots, Boeing crash, Brexit)  
After Survation said that the Tories had plummeted five points in its polls, YouGov confirms the trend. 5% down. Further to fall, no doubt, if the Brexit Betrayal persists. 
From 2017 On Brexit with Bernadette Devlin McAliskey“The Sad thing about the Tories they still think they are an empire, throwing their weight around like the schoolyard bully when they no longer have any power”  
Much of the anti Corbyn sentiment was a reaction to the persistent lies that he was a Remainer playing a "long game". If Corbyn had been more honest about his position on Brexit then there would be less of the vitriolic stuff. People will push back hard on liars. 
Thunder and lightning and hail  over Soho, central London right now. And Brexit is now legally just 12 days away. 
Oh right ! So the Farage mass "angry folk of Brexit" march wasn't a march at all but ... a "rally" and they stubbornly only let 200 people pay the £50. That explains the dismal turnout.Why would they do that though ?   
A St Patrick’s Day thought: I always thought demographics might one day drive Irish unity. But it is Brexit that could bring it about sooner. Real head-scratcher is that DUP strongly favors NI remaining in Union but supports Brexit that has potential to break the Union. Go figure 
WATCH: clip of an interview I did with Bernadette Devlin McAliskey on Tories England the DUP Northern Ireland and Brexit “I don’t know why people deluded themselves thinking this Tory Govt care about NIreland they care about themselves and their own class” 
‘The European Research Group -- which has as much to do with research as horoscopes do with astronomy.’ Coruscating piece on #Brexit Britain  
Over many generations, London's Irish community have made our city  a livelier, warmer and more vibrant place to live. Our diversity is our strength - and whatever the outcome of #Brexit - we will continue to celebrate #StPatricksDay at the heart of our city. #LondonIsOpen  
.@IanBlackfordMP: "The past week of continued Brexit chaos in Westminster has once again shown that Scotland’s interests are being ignored and sidelined." 
If we fail to leave the EU on March 29th then our politicians have failed this country. They have a duty to implement Brexit in full as per the largest democratic vote this country has ever had. That means complete control over our waters, laws, borders, money & trading policy. 
We’ll be at the #PutItToThePeople march next Saturday (23rd March) in LondonIf you’d like to join us, get in touch. We’d love to see you there!Brexit will make ALL of the UK & ALL of Ireland poorer.It’s time the politicians, from every party and none, gave us the final say! 
2. This generation of real #Remain voters will never back you to their dying day & the next generation your #Brexit betrays utterly, are lost to you & your god awful bunch of anti democratic charlatans.#RevokeA50 #Remain in Control in the EU...save yourself & ALL UK citizens!! 
‘The damage is done’: Disbelief in Europe at another lost Brexit week  
Thus chaos is exactly why we are where we are. A twice rejected bad deal, Brexit delayed, and the PM begging, bullying and bribing to get her shoddy deal heard again  
On @SophyRidgeSky @jeremycorbyn said he believed in in a reformed #EU. So in effect Corbyn backs our call for Lead not Leave.  If May's deal is voted down a 3rd time why not test this with MPs? Time for real leadership. People just want #Brexit to be over  
1. @PhilipHammondUK if you think by forcing thru a #Brexit based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesForeign InterferenceDisenfranchisement Rights Removed w/o Consent &The Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the Ppl,You'll reunite the UK you're seriously mistaken. 
‘It’s not a bribe. It’s just if we vote for something we have argued repeatedly is unacceptable and twice voted against we get a lot of money. In the DUP we call it a “Brexit incentive.” ‘  
Our brave marchers being welcomed into Middlesbrough today.The Westminster elite forget the majority of the country voted for Brexit!  
Big question is why anyone fighting for Brexit support in the upcoming Tory leadership election would back Theresa May's deal now. The longer they hold out - the better their chances among the grassroots. Leader of the pack @DominicRaab will know this. 
A view from GermanyBrexit Chaos: A sitcom by the name of 'House of Commons'"A European official joked this week he'd cancelled his Netflix subscription... he spends all day watching debates in the Commons; it's more entertaining than House of Cards".  
I’ve heard some odd things on Russian TV, but this is VERY ODD. Anchor Kiselev tonight says the EU’s Michel Barnier has “a noble face like a knight” & claims he’s using #Brexit talks with the UK “to get revenge for France’s defeat to the English at the Battle of Cressy” in 1346.  
More of the excellent forward planning that has made Brexit such a a success: attempting to march across a bridge that’s closed on Sundays. #GammonballRun 
You've campaigned admirably for Brexit, like many of us, and then at the last minute you advocate being tied into the EU forever!  I'm sorry, but what are you thinking???  I'm so disappointed in you.  The WA is NOT #Brexit in any form at all. 
And - a new verb is born:"to brexit: to say goodbye without (ever) leaving" 
It’s a scandal that May can think to bring her twice-defeated ghastly deal back for a THIRD vote, but denies us a #PeoplesVote, which now would be based on facts not lies & fraud. - Speaker Bercow should refuse to let this happen, by parliamentary rules. #Brexit 
Excellent. Amid the chaos within the Tory party, whether its Brexit or who’s after the PMs job, Labour are demonstrating Leadership and a real alternative to the past 9 years of deepening despair for so many ppl. So proud to be part of the Labour movement #SocialistSunday 
Great to be out campaigning today in Newport West with our fantastic candidate Ian Mclean Yes to BrexitYes to the M4 Relief Road #NewportWest#VoteMclean 
This is what happens when @UKLabour leadership stops equivocating about May’s Brexitshambles. It picks up support. The @peterkyle @mphilwilson Labour plan to offer voters a referendum on May’s ‘deal’ is a good idea. Watch for the ERG wriggling this week ...  
Brexit means closure, intolerance, and suspicion of the other; less trade, less inward investment, less growth; more intolerant, more mean spirited, more suspicious and hostile to people of colour, the European, the Jew, and the Muslim.By @williamnhutton 
Brexit  
@DavidDavisMP David, "You said last Sunday on #Marr that the PM's deal is WORSE than our present membership of the EU. So cancelling #Brexit & not leaving is better than the PM's deal.So why have you changed your mind?You have let down the #Brexiteers who have supported you." 
#Brexit is not patriotic, look at Rees-Mogg and Arron Banks with so many of their financial interests abroad and offshore. #Brexit serves Putin and a globalised elite who want to use the UK as a tax haven, and who care nothing for the British people.#RevokeA50 #PeoplesVote 
The Brexit deal Theresa May spent 3 years negotiating was voted down massively twice and everyone, leavers AND remainers, hates it, but she's trying again this week....Credit: @tombwild 
Theresa May to bring her Brexit deal back to the Commons for a third vote after they have rejected it twice — Parliament may vote about Brexit deal three times in three months, but Britons are not allowed to vote about Brexit two times in three years 
The March To Leave protesters on day two of their journey to London, travelling from Hartlepool to Middlesbrough todayPhoto by @CraigConnorNNP#MarchToLeave #BrexitBetrayalMarch #Brexit #Hartlepool #LeaveMeansLeave 
Paris is in flame and Macron doesn’t give a fuck. #macron #coruption #GiletJaunes #merkel #brexit #eu #globalism #GiletsJaunesparis #GiletsJaunes83 @giletjaun @EmmanuelMacron pic.twitter.com/cqEHfiMtq5 
Brexiteers (around 70 ) march on Teesside - but without the fraud Farage /#MarchToLeave  #GammonballRun #Brexit  
And remember, nobody on either side of the Brexit debate is proposing to bring our lost industries back. There's no "rewind" button, and to pretend there is, well that's absurd. 
No longer matters what our elected political reps do.Next time we get them at a ballot box, we're hammering them.Should it be locals, EU, or a full GE.UK Democracy bites like a bugger, when wounded.#Brexit in 12 days, or feel our wrath.Save yourself MPs, your party's over. 
All Brexit Deals Worse for Economy Than Staying, U.K. Government Says  
Today’s poll:Please vote and retweet.Q. Could you agree to vote through a Brexit withdrawal agreement on the basis of the deal being ratified by the public with a #FinalSay vote? 
"We managed fine before the EU."After Brexit, the EU will still be there. So it's not comparable.Like saying: "We were fine before cars, so I'm going to go everywhere on horseback." Good luck dodging the traffic! 
Notice how whenever a Muslim commits a terrorist act, the white political class & news media *immediately* make it a referendum on the religion of Islam & millions of Muslims. But when a white nationalist murders ppl & writes manifesto, no one interrogates the notion of whiteness 
Deleting Twitter until tomorrow. I’ve campaigned for Brexit day in, day out since 2015. Am facing bankruptcy by biased Electoral Commission. Charge I’ve been “got at” by cack useless Number 10 is bonkers. It’s simple: we risk losing Brexit, that risk would lead to untold damage. 
Oddly, both front benches probably want the same result this week: for May's deal to pass, without relying on Labour votes. If that happens, May gets Brexit without destroying her party; Corbyn gets Brexit while blaming the Tories. 
Oh dear : a pro bexit bunch of truckers want to blockade a port to protest against brexit not realising they are advertising what it’ll look like when customs are introduced . The mind boggles . And he can’t spell Saturday  
This is unequivocal now. So Corbyn apologisers can get off my timeline. It’s actually a disgrace that socialist Sunday is trending. A love in and waste of time back slapping exercise. Our country is at a cliff edge because we have no opposition. It’s disgusting #Brexit  
Whatever happens next week, there are still going to be many more Brexit battles to be fought over the coming weeks, months and yearsThe only certainty is that if Brexiteers allow themselves to be so bitterly torn apart and divided over this, the only winners will be Remainers 
David you CANNOT vote for the 'deal'.  It is not Brexit, it is worse than remaining as there is no mechanism for unilateral withdrawal.  No Deal is still the default position in law.  Stand firm.  
Fascism then & now. Blackshirts, yellow vests - same blind hatred & thuggery.#Brexit has been promoted by the extreme right from the start. They hate the EU because it was set up partly to prevent the rise of the vicious ultranationalism that had devastated Europe.#StopBrexit 
Between May giving more say over Scotland to the DUP than the people of Scotland have and Corbyn deciding, again, that Brexit May be a good idea after all has independence ever been more needed or possible than it is now? #IndyRef #SNP 
From his interview with Marr this morning and his wriggling refusal on several occasions to deny he'd vote Leave in a #PeoplesVote, it is blindingly obvious that Corbyn is ignoring the membership and continuing to drive us towards Brexit. such a Labour party will never win a GE. 
With Brexit still scheduled for March 29th, the next two weeks will test how deeply a nation can immerse itself in self-delusion:  
Anyone who has been paying attention knows that the PM’s deal is NOT Brexit, in fact it’s even worse than remaining in the anti-democratic EU. If the traitors like Fox & most of the other MP’s vote for it, there will be hell to pay, and it’s anyone’s guess as to the consequences!  
“I have a lot of respect for Theresa May -- she reminds me occasionally of that Monty Python character where all his arms and legs are cut off and then says to his opponent: let’s call it a draw,” Dutch Prime Minister Mark Rutte said Sunday. Black Knight h/t @Brexit 
A new history and a new life began for #Crimea in 2014. For  years, Crimeans have been moving forward regardless of hardships or hurdles. #CrimeanSpring #Russia #Крым #Россия #Referendum  
29th March: #Brexit Day (likely to be delayed in some form).2nd May: Local Elections. Tory grassroots collapses as they get hammered.23rd May: EU Election. UK will cause chaos, if we're let loose in there.Democracy catches up, eventually.We have them by the proverbials  
Huge support in Middlesbrough on March to Leave day 2. Ordinary voters furious at Parliament betraying Brexit  
Off to talk Brexit at @prospect_uk debate @Wimbookfest tonight with @anandMenon1 @J_Bloodworth & others.  Not sure I'll have many allies but will try my damndest to untangle what is going on and what is at stake, especially in terms of future of democracy  
It would be daft to hold a Yes/No referendum on May's deal, with ambiguity about what No means. The only ballot that makes sense is one in which the options are unambiguous and instantly implementable without more. That's May's Deal vs. Remain. 
David's right. Farage never turned up for fishermen at the EU. Never turned up for Leave in Brexit. Now he asked people to pay £50 since could go to the pub.  
Any day now BBC Scotland might actually decide to look into how Scotland will be gubbed by BrexitThe job lossesBusiness lossesBudget losses for Scotgov10000s of EU nationals leavingHuge losses to healthcareCare homesAgricultureHospitality 
If you're having a crap day, just remember it could be worst. You could be one of the people responsible for repeatedly saying the Brexit Betrayal March is a roaring success. #GammonBallRun 
It has been clear for weeks that it was simply impossible for all the #Brexit legislation to be in place before 29th March.  @GovUK,from the PM down, has deliberately misled the entire country about that. 
Surge in support for People's Vote following Brexit chaos  
It is ironic and sad that the Labour MPs like @lisanandy, @KevinBarronMP @CarolineFlintMP & @Steph_Peacock who are tempted to vote for May's deal or oppose a #PeoplesVote represent northern constituencies which will be far worse hit by #Brexit than London. pic.twitter.com/zl1safPXMh 
This is not a game, you're not bobbing for flipping apples! 65m lives affected in your indecision that will change forever the structure & landscape of the UK helping May to handover the UK to the EU if you vote for her #Brexit capitulation 
Can we please stop calling the proposed deal Brexit In Name Only? If that’s what it was, it wouldn’t be quite so bad. Instead, it keeps most of the costs of membership while walking away from most of the benefits. 
My goodness!Who would have thunk it ?This is the man advising the Government on tje legalities around #Brexit Heaven forfend ! Attorney General Geoffrey Cox apologises for failing to declare thousands of pounds in rent' | via @telegraph 
NOOOOOO Esther don’t vote for it. It’s not BREXIT!It’s a sham of a deal. At least with the Lisburn Treaty we had an exit mechanism with article 50, with this new treaty there is no clear exit mechanism. And the EU WILL keep us in the backstop indefinitely. 
Whether you’re remain or leave (and I’m as unimpressed as it’s possible to be by both the EU and the Brexit mob) you have to admit this March is the funniest thing that’s happened on twitter in a while. 1/2 
When The*tcher deregulated the financial markets, she sowed the seeds of the Financial Crash. When she deliberately discriminated against industrial communities, she sowed the seeds of Brexit. Then she knighted a paedophile... No. It isn't "time to move" on yet...  
Ignorant rich man has no clue about consequences of Brexit for the music industry and especially the impact on smaller touring acts, but brashly and impatiently presumes it will all be fine. #rocknroll 
A 21 mth extension to Art 50 through rejecting May's deal will surely mean someone other than May negotiates a new deal. So 1 way to think of this week's vote is: Vote down May's deal to get a new PM to negotiate a new Brexit deal from scratch. 
The mood you’re feeling right now and the last food you ate is your Brexit deal. Comment below  Mine is angry almond. 
Superb read from @carolecadwalla - When you look at how the NCA has just sat on blatant evidence of Russian interference, when you look at how you can go and commit the largest infraction of campaign finance law in British history and get away with it. 
#peoplesvotemarch in London, next Saturday March 23rd. Be there.Let's make this even bigger and noisier than the last one. Let all those assisting brexit know how you feel about something which removes your rights and makes us all worse off. 
I feel utterly betrayed by the government for constantly citing a wafer-thin majority from an almost three-year-old, flawed referendum as an unshakeable reason for wrenching my family's EU citizenship away from us. #PeoplesVote 
The votes are not law.We leave on the 29th.The WA is not  Brexit.Please do not vote for the deal! 
If you’re wondering how Brexit is going, I just listened to an Irish man seriously explain to @BBCRadio4 how the deal might affect leprechauns. 
We're on the march wi Nigel's ArmyHe's gonnae lead a merry danceAnd when Brexit all goes wrongIt won't trouble him for longBecause he's off to be an immigrant in France.  
Good to meet Irish Minister for Finance @Paschald to reinforce London’s strong links with Ireland ahead of a crucial week for Brexit.London's Irish community enrich our city - and I'm so proud to be hosting @StPatsDayLDN today. #StPatricksDay#LondonIsOpen  
Last week MPs voted to delay Brexit & remove ‘no deal’. With those cynical votes they changed the choice us Brexiteers face. We either vote for this bad deal or get no Brexit which would fly in the face of democracy. For that reason with nose held I will have to vote for the deal  
So Labour are whipping in favour of a 2nd referendum and hoping the general public won’t notice.  
May deal does not resolve #Brexit even on poor terms -- just buys a "transition" which could last to end of 2022, in which we remain EU members in every respect except minus our EU representation. At the end, with backstop looming, second ref arguments of today will be revived. 
"Boris Johnson to boost his hopes of becoming PM by backing Theresa May’s Brexit deal"If @BorisJohnson backs May's deal he will destroy any chance of becoming PMIt'd be, quite honestly, the most stupid things he's ever doneCareer suicide 
Brexit opened Pandora's box & gave licence to the scum of society who would normally be suppressed by a just, moral, caring society. The cruel, racist rhetoric of @theresamay_no10 as Home Secretary et al merely added fuel to the fire of ignorance! 
"May left a country in turmoil to its own devices. She vacillated for months before making her first decisions on Brexit. And almost all of them were wrong. It's becoming increasingly clear that she is the main impediment to solving the Brexit mess." 
This is brilliant! Well done Roger for shutting up biased ⁦@SkyNews⁩   Daltrey not impressed by Brexit question 
WATCH | For months Tory Eurosceptics have explained the horrors of May's Fake Brexit withdrawal treaty, but now people like @DavidDavisMP, @EstherMcVey1 & @William_Wragg are voting for it. Weak and spineless! Support our campaign for a proper Brexit at  
With a change of approach, the Prime Minister’s deal is (just) still capable of rescue. Last week’s votes show that the alternative is a cascade of chaos with Remainers frustrating, and then cancelling, Brexit. 
My ⁦@Telegraph⁩ column today: The accusation that the PM doesn’t listen is evidently fair. But MPs demanding a series of “indicative votes”, despite spending the last 2 years debating and rejecting every kind of Brexit, are guilty of the same charge. 
The DUP wants Great Britain's rules to stay aligned to Northern Ireland after #Brexit. Since the #backstop forces Northern Ireland to stay aligned with the EU, meeting the DUP's demands would turn all the UK into a colony. 
Timely reminder that May tried to get Brexit through without the say so of Parliament, taking a legal case to stop her.Her talks of reaching an "honourable compromise" are little more than the hollow words of a would be autocrat losing grip on power. 
It's impossible for millions of people to 'come together' to accept the removal of their rights. 
The EU - Donald Tusk - made it clear the obstructions were the leaders of both labour and Tory parties. jeremy corbyn’s prints are all over Brexit. It’s the offspring of Tory labour duopoly.  
Leave voters: “IF YOU TAKE AWAY OUR BREXIT YOU WILL RUE THE DAY YOU EVER MESSED WITH US.”Also Leave voters: “Our ‘epic’ demonstration is significantly less well attended than the opening of a new Lidl in Doncaster and its figurehead has already fucking bailed by day two.”  
Met with Irish Minister for Finance @Paschald today to reinforce London’s strong links with Ireland ahead of a crucial week for Brexit. London's Irish community enrich our city and I’m proud to be hosting St Patrick’s Day celebrations. #LondonIsOpen 
Remember Theresa May's deal is almost as damaging for the economy as No Deal ... To be certain to save economy from damage of #Brexit it is best to #RevokeArticle50Now 
You couldn't make this up, Farage asking MPs to obey the law and respect the electorate to restore faith in politics! - From the man at the centre of the greatest electoral crime in UK history when the 2016 referendum was disrespected and millions of the electorate were mugged.  
Peter Bone to Nigel Farage: "If her deal is voted on this week, I hope its defeated and then nothing happens until March 29th and we come out."@Nigel_Farage | #Brexit 
"We must fight the underlying causes of Brexit. We must not be seduced by lazy cliches. People wanted to give the establishment a good kicking. "@vincecable at #LDConf. Join live NOW > 
.@EstherMcVey1 this deal is the precursor to No Brexit!!  
The man who gave us #Brexit, @Matthew_Elliott, urges MPs to vote for May’s Deal. I ‘look forward’ to the usual suspects accusing him of “betrayal”. 
“The Brexit vote came down to people wanting to have more agency in the rules that we have to live under and that motivated millions of additional people to engage with politics. It’s a slap in the face to then be told ‘actually now we're going to ignore you’” @BeccyRyan 
Dutch Prime Minister Mark Rutte used a Monty Python movie reference to describe Theresa May’s tenacity on Brexit despite repeated defeats  
#BREXIT (abridged)  
.@DanielJHannan (who has been very flexible about different Brexit options) concludes that if MPs vote through May's deal the EU "has no intention of ever letting us leave. We shall be stuck forever with colonial status."  
"If Brexit is a political Everest we've only got to the base camp. We're going to have years and years of frustration and friction." @vincecable on the need for a People's Vote at #LDConf. Join live NOW >  
So why hasn’t he just let Brexit happen, @Kevin_Maguire? Why has he made it very clear- repeatedly- that he will not accept ‘no deal’? Why has he fought against @Theresa_May’s bad, botched deal? Your tweets lack the actual substance but are quick & easy for RTs and likes. 
It has been obvious for over two years that he was a #Brexit fanatic. I am in awe of his way with weasel words to hide what he thinks, but his body language shouts that he is lying. 
"I'm very proud of the role the Liberal Democrats have played with Brexit: Unapologetically making the case for remaining." @vincecable at #LDConf. Join live NOW > 
What a time to be alive. Climate change, mental health crises, nhs being destabilised, brexit, rise of alt right terrorism, the oceans are filled with plastic and the elected leader of the western world is a reality star. God has genuinely left her sims unattended, motherlode pls 
Dutch Prime Minister Mark Rutte used a Monty Python movie reference to describe Theresa May’s tenacity on Brexit despite repeated defeats  
If anyone needs info on People’s March next Sat it’s here.If Brexit vote is carried this week, it’s still important to march. The future relationship is open for negotiation and Remainers must not stand back and allow Brexiters to control this.MARCH  
Corbyn unconcerned about looming #Brexit disaster: He WANTS Brexit, happy to let May and Tories take blame, and then hopes to win a GE on back of public anger. This has been obvious for a long time.  
Next Saturday I’ll be at the #PutItToThePeopleMarch with @OFOCBrexit. It’s time to end the girdlock in Parliament and let the people decide. Retweet if you’re joining us! #PeoplesVoteMarch #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople #brexit  
Today on GPS, @ 10am & 1pm ET on CNN, we'll discuss the New Zealand attacks & Brexit w/ @SlaughterAM, @DMiliband & @ianbremmer; talk to @drsanjaygupta about his new HBO documentary, "One Nation Under Stress," in which he looks at what stress is doing to US life expectancy ... 
The referendum result was illegally procured.If I go and rob Kelsey Grammer's house, would he say that I should just "get on" with spending the money I have taken from him? No, he would want his goods returned and me brought to justice. That is all we require from Brexit. 
The Road To Brexit, a one-off comedy starring Matt Berry, Felicity Montagu, Alex Macqueen, Phil Wang, Natasia Demetriou, Simon Greenall, Ann Mitchell and Paul Putner will be on BBC2 on 26th March:  
There is nothing patriotic about ignoring businessThere is nothing patriotic about leaving EuratomThere is nothing patriotic about not being a member of the Single Market & Customs UnionThere is nothing patriotic about leaving EHICBrexit isn't patriotic, simples.  
Here’s a handy guide to Brexit vocabulary: 1. NO DEAL: Mogg & his hedge fund buddies get very rich 2. MANAGED NO DEAL: Mogg & his hedge fund buddies get very rich3. MAY’S DEAL: Philipp May gets very rich 4. CANADA +: Mogg gets so rich he buys Canada 
Are you at all concerned the draft Kyle Wilson Am I've seen on Twitter makes no mention of Remain option on the ballot paper only a requirement to a confirmation Referendum of the May WA deal. Could this be misinterpreted? 
So Corbyn finally admits that he would prefer a "good" Brexit over Remain. 
The people who will be poorest after #Brexit are those who are already suffering in deprived regional areas that voted highly to leave.Even if Brexit goes ahead, I'm pretty certain crowdfunders will support my campaign to re-join #TheFutureisEuropeP.S I'm not a grifter 
Unfortunately he still seems to be supporting his Lexit and that is NOT Party Policy.Trying to create his usual obfuscationsThis is like campaigning with concrete blocks chained to one’s ankles.It will not be forgotten or forgiven & if Brexit happens Labour will smell of it. 
Something needs to be done about the democratic system in the UK.  This is it? This is the threat of civil unrest?  If you’re not a multi-millionaire and you’re still supporting this, TBH you need serious help. #brexit.   Waken up. Hedge funds have committed to selling the £.  
As Jeremy said today, Labour's preferred option is for a Brexit deal that respects the referendum and defends jobs, rights & protections.Labour has a credible Brexit plan which is the basis for our ongoing efforts to bring MPs together to build the consensus our country needs.  
Right!@UKLabour are talking utter bollocks again@Keir_Starmer talking about @jeremycorbyn's alternative deal Its bollocksIt will not work as advertisedThey are lying to us about Brexit just like the Tories lie to usPlease read the below tweet 
#Brexit #Brexitprotests Anyone from Wales wishing to take part in direct action blockades of roads and ferry terminals please join and share this link.  
For those who missed the lie;"Every penny of this Tory bribe is to be spent abroad in England". Not one penny of this English Tory Brexit bribe will be spent in Scotland.  
Sent this:Dear Mr Bercow.We have had vote on no deal and a time extension to Brexit.That occurred, rightly, after the Meaningful vote.How can we now have that vote again post these votes? How indeed can you have a meaningful vote whose result can be voided as meaningless? 
Says a bloke who has resigned from his local Conservative Party Constituency Association (ahead of a deselection vote) in a parliamentary constituency* that voted 61%** Leave at the EU referendum.* Grantham & Stamford** Professor Hanretty  
Pushback in Labour against backing Kyle-Wilson. Stoke Central's @gareth_snell says a confirmatory referendum would pit "an option we've already voted down twice," against "an option our electorate rejected". Says it "stinks of establishment stitch-up". 
The elections would trigger a likely return to British politics for Nigel Farage, the former Ukip leader who is backing a new Brexit party to field candidates.The irony is that David Cameron called the 2016 EU referendum to destroy Farage once and for all. 
Theresa May said more than 50 times that we will leave the EU on 29 March. We now know that might not happen. Labour said it would respect the referendum result. We now know it doesn’t. Our politicians have lied to us and demeaned democracy.Brendan O’Neill on @Dunphy_Official 
Nice. Twelve days ahead of Brexit - MP figures out that leaving the EU means that you can’t keep the EU’s preferential trade agreements. (Maybe the arrangements during the transition period if WA is ratified are confusing?)  
"I am not going to compromise on my daughters future, and you or your family's future, and neither are the Liberal Democrats" @cajardineMP on the fight against Brexit at #LDConfDemand a People's Vote now >  
Always the plan. This proves without doubt, that our own Government is working to stop brexit. 
For those saying holding the EU elections would be a waste of tax payers money, what do you call a bung to the DUP, money well spent?#Brexit#Brexitshambles#PeoplesVote#EU#DUP 
The whole bloody country should be brought to a standstill if they betray Brexit. 
"We will add your biological and technological distinctiveness to our own. Your culture will adapt to service us. Resistance is futile." - The Borg Collective. Thanks @guyverhofstadt for your daily reminders of why #Brexit is such a brilliant idea  
Let’s help get this song to number 1! 17 Million F*ck Offs - A Song About Brexit Please help take this song to number one by buying a copy of the single at iTunes/Amazon etc Amazon ITunes (ignore Apple Music use iTunes store) 
#GoodMorningAmerica#ChicagoTribune#Chicago #SuntimesDear #Chicago #Illinois VotersLike Me,Do you believe that there should be a #CapOnContributionsMade to a #PoliticalCampaign?#DoctorYsLaw:#CapAllPoliticalCampaignsPut #Referendum on #Ballot#IL03 
"Stop Brexit. Migrants cooked and served your food today"  
Support for a People’s Vote surges as public reject Brexit alternatives  
From David Davis to Matthew Elliot, the most committed Brexiteers are now ready to back May’s deal - seeing the alternative as delayed Brexit, no Brexit and the risk of continental-style populist parties. My column:  
Still amazing journalism to find someone who knows less about Brexit than Mark Francois. 
This week, I will be responding to all questions about Brexit with this photo of Eddie Jones’ ego colliding with reality  
Whatever, Steve. I want to hear more from the American Trump fan who is starring in a musical in the west end. If anyone knows what’s going on and what to do about Brexit, it’s him... 
Seen through your language. You keep rejecting 'Tory Brexit' and No Deal but talk up Labour's "alternative deal". Labour want UK to leave the EU on Corbyn's terms instead of May's and certainly not to Remain.Stop taking us for idiots.#StopBrexit 
If MPs vote for May’s surrender agreement we don’t really leave. If the reject it they want to ask EU to indefinitely extend Art 50 - & we don’t leave. They could just vote against it, do nothing & we leave anyway on 29th. Will they totally betray Brexit? We will find out soon.  
Siri, show me an analogy for UKgov's Brexit progress: 
PM gone by next week?  Senior Tory @nigelmp : "If we have to fight EU elections, she will have failed.  Then the Prime Minister has to go."  #Brexit  
Meaningful Vote Three Initial Forecast:For: 245 (+3)Against: 389 (-2)Defeat by: 144 (-5)#Brexit #MeaningfulVote #WithdrawalAgreement 
Imagine England had got out of Ireland before 2010. No Brexit; No austerity, welfare cuts, bedroom tax. No sabotage of agreed dealing with the past legacy proposals;  no one sided favours to the DUP. . etc, etc. Sounds good to me. 
This is a party that most people & constituencies voted AGAINST in the 2017 election, paying a party that's pursuing a Brexit that 56% of Northern Ireland voted against, to deliver a deal that the UK people, as a whole, don't want.Sick bags anyone?#Marr 
Corbyn would vote Leave? Looks like it...Liberal Democrats demand better for remainers across the country. We must secure a People's Vote. #RidgeIf you want to join the fight against this Brexit mess, add your name here >  
Also, a sizeable minority deprive the majority of the UK population of their EU citizenship and associated rights and protections. This didn't figure in referendum debate. Hence Permanent EU Citizenship initiative 
Esther McVey has changed her mind about Theresa May's Brexit deal and is now prepared to vote for it..."because the rules have changed". McVey is not repared to countenance a #PeoplesVote because there is no way that the 'will of the people' has changed... #Hypocrite #Ridge #Marr 
A problem with May’s article in today’s Telegraph is she assumes the country will ‘come back together’ if her deal passes. This is nonsense. One obvious point: the causes of brexit were not in general anything to do with the EU, therefore leaving it will solve nothing. 
Let’s get a celebrity Trump fan on and talk to him about Brexit...Why? 
Jeremy Corbyn indicates he could vote leave in a second Brexit referendumNo printable comment, so no comment  
It is a common misunderstanding to suggest she has made mistakes.She has been out to sabotage Brexit from the begining.No mistake, a deliberate calculated ruse.  
"Once you've made the decision, once the vote is done, it's time to get the work done"Frasier actor Kelsey Grammer, who is starring in musical Man of La Mancha in London, speaks to the Andrew #Marr programme about #Brexit  
Corbyn has indicated he could back a 2nd referendum but vote leave. Back a 2nd referendum and vote remain. Have a 2nd referendum without remain on the ballot paper. Not back a 2nd referendum at all, vote against May’s deal this week but vote against a no deal. Clear enough ? 
Just walk away March 29th.   Brexit news: Theresa May warns MPs have three days to back deal or REMAIN under EU RULE | Politics | News |  
Brexit is about a lying, cheating gang of rich bastards who will use any trick and cause any amount of suffering in order to slash their tax bills and tear up the health, safety, environmental and workplace regulations which eat into their profits.#PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
Michael Portillo has said that nothing in his political career compares to the last few weeks in British politics, adding that it was the "sort of chaos that occurs every half century".@Nigel_Farage | #Brexit 
Labour to back the Kyle-Wilson amendment pushing the way for a public vote on May’s deal.What do pro-second referendum people say? ‘CORBYN BAD!’I get the feeling that Jeremy Corbyn could be screaming the words to ‘Ode to Joy’ wrapped in an EU flag and it wouldn’t be enough... 
Theresa May: "We can't keep having votes until you get the result you want"Also Theresa May: *tables her  #Brexit deal for a third time* 
RT if you think this old video sums up #Brexit logic...#Ignorance #StillTrue #Miles #Kilomilometre 
Very much in Nicola Sturgeon’s interest that she agrees a soft Brexit position with Lab - even if it means compromising - because the key prize for SNP is permanent customs union between UK/EU. That makes independence possible without a hard border at Gretna Green. 
So who’s looking like a serious operator & who’s looking like a spoiled child who won’t negotiate seriously? We need to do what’s in the national interest not keep bringing back the same deal which nobody, cross-party thinks is acceptable if we want to break the Brexit deadlock  
Labour's dilemma isn't about whether Remain would be on the ballot - it would be - but that some Labour MPs representing Leave seats don't think it would be fair to make the referendum a binary choice between May's extremely unpopular deal vs. Remain. 
DUP dont want to be treated differently than rest of UKFor GOD sake they are bloody different aren't they?Climate deniersAnti AbortionAnti LBGTPro BrexitOppose same sex marriageAgainst Gaelic languageThey are the dinosaur party in NI@Always_a_Yes @WingsScotland 
It would be a “no nation” Brexit as placing us in the customs union without being an EU member state is literally the worst outcome imaginable. No control over trade or customs policy. Having to open our markets to third countries the EU strikes deals with, with no reciprocity.  
nobody:jk rowling: dumbledore was once brexit secretary  
.@JeremyCorbyn right to be supportive of the @PeterKyle and @MPphilwilson proposal. As I said in Parliament last week, we must support the lock of a public vote to prevent a damaging Tory Brexit or no deal being imposed on our country. 
Theresa May needs to take her unacceptable Brexit deal and make way for a real Prime Minister.Share his message.  Stand with him.  We are the change #Ridge #SocialistSunday 
Presenting Brexit as an elite, white, male project allows those now intent on strangling it at birth to present themselves as valiant underdogs. We can’t indulge this fantasy. #SundayMorning #SundayThoughts #BrexitBetrayal 
Dear @jeremycorbyn I like most @UKLabour party members  don't want a #Brexit deal, I want to stay in the #EU because it's better for Britain. I don't trust Theresa May. Beware the backlash in the party if you screw this up. #Brexit is not the will of the people in 2019. 
I now have more than 15,000 followers.No one could be more bemused about this than me.Who knew that Brexit commentary would be so...erm...popular.I’ve had a great experience on Twitter -  the best part is everyone else’s thoughts and comments. Many thanks to you all. 
The Kyle-Wilson amendment leaves out what the options on the second referendum would be: hence it can be supported by the wisest possible range of opponents of Brexit - it would be for parliament to specify the options, one of which would be Remain.  
Exactly.  But people from PV group like @mikegalsworthy should be exposing Corbyn as he simply is not fit to be their leader, subverting membership wishes and policy to his own wishes.  They should be pressurising Corbyn to resign.The Brexit stink is going to be Labour’s too. 
Fed up with these Remainers trying to destroy the future of our children and future generations aren't you? They didn't know what they were voting for in the referendum. And they were fed a pack of lies, don't you think? 
Extraordinary paroxysm amongst educated people about leaving a trading block. As if before the #EU we were painting our faces blue and living in the forest #Brexit #BrexitAlliance 
Five mile detour for March to Leave because organisers didn’t factor in Tees Transporter Bridge closed on Sunday. Lack of planning from Brexit supporters? Surely not.  
UK government will only hold Brexit vote if it believes it can win - Fox  
So @scottishlabour are now going to back Theresa May to deliver #Brexit as long as there is a referendum, but not giving remain an option - while refusing to stand up for Scotland's remain vote. Scottish Labour are now leavers and enablers of a right wing Tory agenda. 
For the record, I drafted the tweet "Corbyn is on point on #Ridge" as he was supporting Public Vote. But I rewound to the start just to be sure.Correct me, but it sounds like he'll only back it if parliament supports a referendum on a yet-to-be-negotiated Labour Brexit.  
I've arrived at York Spring Conference - great to see so many young people energised by our fight against Brexit.  
With the EU parliament acknowledging Russian interference  in the EU referendum and the UK judiciary accepting May is fully aware of all the illegalities, sweaty Brexiters, knowing the game is up, become desperate to get any form of Brexit over the line.  
Keep showing MPs the strength of support to #StopBrexit.Sign the latest petition for a new referendum on EU membership.It’s at 92,000 - let’s drive it to 100,000 for a debate in Parliament.Please sign, retweet, share and tag a friend. #FBPE. 
Philip Hammond couldn't give a straight answer when asked on #Marr if the Conservatives were bribing the DUP to support Theresa May's Brexit deal. He obfuscated by saying that money wasn't being discussed! May is trying to bribe her way to a deal... #BrexitShambles #DUPBribe 
You know what offends me and us more then anything is that Hammond and @theresa_may  thought we wouldn't see through their lies and deceit. Everything they done the last 3 years has been to miniplate and stop Brexit!! She will surely go down in history as the most  EVIL WOMAN!! 
If a referendum were held today, likely voters divide 61% to 39% in favour of Remain rather than leaving on the terms negotiated by Theresa May.  
Perhaps the "pro-Remain children" who are dragged to Stop Brexit protests by their EU jingoism obsessed parents will grow up & think "Dad, wtf am I on the internet holding a sign saying 'Farage is a tw*t!?' Wtf is Farage?"  
The British can not cross the #Brexit 
I just told St Patrick about Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn’s #Ridge interview:Labour will back Kyle-Wilson amendment: pushing for a referendum between May’s deal and remain.If May’s deal is defeated then there could be a vote of no confidence against government.He wants to be PM to end austerity and tackle inequality. 
Asking the people (instead of just MPs) to vote on a #BrexitDeal wld not be undemocratic,as just claimed by @andreajenkyns on #bbcspBrexit is so different from what was promised that it wld be undemocratic to go ahead without asking the people to confirm that it’s what they want 
NEW Jeremy Corbyn says he could vote to leave EU in second Brexit referendum 
Except he won't get us it. Corbyn's priorities are getting the Tories to do the heavy lifting on Brexit to take the blame, Lexit and a GE.It'd be nice to see someone from People's Vote just be honest with grassroots Remain instead of polishing the Corbyn turd. 
Hang on. Gordon Brewer just interviewed Labour and Tory about Brexit but where was the third largest party in Westminster and the largest party in Holyrood? WTF? 
.⁦@peterkyle⁩ The honourable compromise would be to put her deal to the people in a #finalsay Theresa May asks MPs for 'honourable compromise' on Brexit - BBC News  
Will there definitely be a third "meaningful vote" on #Brexit next week? #Marr asks Chancellor Philip Hammond  
Hi @MaryLouMcDonald I live in Belfast with my English wife. I would campaign for a yes vote in a unity referendum. Should I chase her out of the country first?  When you’re done rabble rousing with Irish America I would love an answer. @sinnfeinireland 
The @duponline voted TWICE against the shambles of @theresa_may Brexit Deal. It is said that yet again money has been offered to them to back May, this time her deal. Seemingly the morals, beliefs and integrity of the @duponline can be bought with a shake of the magic money tree 
Day after Brexit10,000 NATO troops in ScotlandFor wargamesWah ha ha ha ha hah ah ah  
May is saying if parliament does not agree to her brexit deal which ties us without a voice to the EU forever, then we'll just have to be tied to the EU for ever without a voice. What a terrible choice. #ditchthebitch. 
Brexiteer MPs have a near impossible job. Vote for May's deal which potentially keeps us attached to the EU indefinitely, or risk Brexit being delayed and inevitably stopped altogether.Despite being between a rock & a hard place, they cannot give in. Stay strong and #LetsGoWTO! 
No, the patriotic thing is to do what's in the country's best interests. Your own government's analysis says that is not having any #brexit at all.  
If you asked everyone in the country whether they want negotiations with the EU to be a major feature of UK politics for the next 5-10 years, we would almost all say no.Well that is a CERTAINTY with ANY Brexit! 
Has the government offered more money for Northern Ireland to persuade the DUP to back the #Brexit deal? #Marr asks Chancellor Philip Hammond  
Something I realised yesterday when a whole class or Guardian media types were mocking people in Sunderland marching for their votes.The 2016 referendum is not just about EU membership, its about suffrage. It's about votes being equal regardless of wealth, status, age or class. 
How covering Brexit is like dealing with a new baby. My piece for the Sunday Times magazine piece about my pretty mega month  
WATCH | Brexit legend @Nigel_Farage cuts through the Tory spin and explains why May's Fake Brexit deal has to be rejected. "This treaty is the modern day equivalent of the Treaty of Versailles. It will solve nothing & cause years of agony"Support us  
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 17Nothing quite epitomises #Brexit like the mistakes of Failing Grayling.Here's the Chris Grayling of cats, trying to convince everyone he found the right size package to ship goods across the channel. #FailingGrayling 
I honestly feel sorry for them. Political differences aside, they've been chewed up and spat out by Nigel Farage et al. Now he's got his PR mileage (and their £50 fee) he's nowhere to be seen.The great Brexit swindle continues.  
Well said, Shami Chakrabarti. Jeremy Corbyn is providing leadership on brexit, and Labour's plan can break the deadlock, bring parliament and the country together, and secure a sensible brexit deal. 
This thread has had over 75k views. both @Independent & @guardian declined to publish the story that a) May's Company made $88bn after Brexit, b) May's Capital Grp invested in Russian banks, Arron Banks, US Healthcare &  Facebook would increase if Brexit happens /sanctions lifted  
The public expect us to deliver an orderly Brexit by end March. If hardline Brexiteers won’t vote for Withdrawal & try & force a #NoDeal #CrashBrexit we should work cross-Party to deliver a OneNation Brexit. #Ridge #Marr 
Finally managed to read @MaryCMurphy’s Europe & Northern Ireland’s Future. Thorough, detailed, excellent - an indispensable record of how Brexit collides with Northern Ireland’s “negative peace”.  
Very proud of @Cameron_Surname my Deputy Chairman for standing up for Brexit.  
Brexit is 300 hours away. #brexit 
Corbyn: If all else fails we'll back a referendum. Centrists: What are you waiting for, back a referendum!Corbyn: All else has failed so we'll back a referendumCentrists:  
Non-existent half-man half-tortoise Farage’s march to leave is a masterpiece of planning and feasibility and as such is the perfect metaphor for brexit. Their planned and published route takes them over the Tees transporter bridge today. The bridge is closed on Sundays. 
#BrexitCatGIFs (late Day 16!)I wasted so much time trying to find a GIF yesterday I dozed off!But MPs have wasted TWO YEARS trying to figure out a #Brexit deal so I don't feel that bad about it.Difference is I have posted a GIF today and they are STILL napping on what to do.  
We wish @sheryllmurray and other #Cornwall MPs would talk as honestly about fishing as the SNP's @Dr_PhilippaW.Instead, they scapegoat the EU for problems that are nothing to do with it & that #Brexit won't solve.#StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
Jeremy's strategy of appearing to support Brexit whilst actually opposing Remain has proved masterful. 
On #Marr. It beggars belief that the #RoyalMint has actually gone ahead and produced triumphalist Brexit 50p pieces that they may not issue. This shows that this government has no intention of healing the Brexit rift, but to rub the noses of remainers into their far right excreta 
 Chancellor doesn't deny he's offered the DUP another bung to get them to back the Brexit deal. Has any constituent part of the UK done as well out of the PM's woes as NI?  
The pile-on to undercut the morale of Brexit-supporting MPs this weekend is stupendous. And some are crumbling. They’re threatened with “No Brexit”.  But that’s rubbish. @hilarybennmp and @oletwinofficial official are no threat. Hold your nerve, Brexiteers. 
Hmmm, judging from the chancellor’s wriggling, it looks like the Govt has offered or is about to offer extra cash to the DUP.  They’re gonna need to start writing this on the side of a bus #brexit #marr 
To be honest, this doesn't bother me.He said he's OK with a Brexit that keeps the Single Market & Customs Union in order to protect UK jobs.As long as he gets us the referendum, as his party demands, I won't judge him for following his own views. 
We are proud to be part of the EU family in the UK. Brexit has made many people realise what they have to lose by leaving. Brexit will fail and the UK will be more European than before. X  
Labour is ordering its MPs to vote for a second referendum. Let's finally see if there are the numbers in Parliament for it.  
Honestly, I’m FED UP of politicians & media saying, “ We have to decide what kind of Brexit we want”. NO WE DON’T !! NO Brexit at ALL is fine by me. None of this half appeasement since there is no Brexit of any kind that is better that  our current relationship with the EU.  
remember when david cameron said re: brexit “this is a referendum not a neverendum” and yet i’ve somehow aged at least 30 years since 2016 
This Brexit march thing. Anybody any idea how they’re planning to cross the Tees when the Tranporter Bridge is shut on a Sunday? 
This is it. Time to get behind the amendment from @peterkyle and @MPphilwilson to give the public the #FinalSayTime for @UKLabour MPs to unite, none should bail out tory brexitBrexit: Labour set to endorse a plan to put May’s deal to a public vote  
Labour's Baroness Chakrabarti says Jeremy Corbyn has shown more leadership on #Brexit than Theresa May #Marr  
Jeremy Corbyn says Labour will try to remove the prime minister from power if she loses another vote on her Brexit deal. 
Corbyn wants to facilitate Brexit.  
#Brexit#BrexitCrisis#Brexiters#BrexitBETRAYAL800 years of DEMOCRACYDown the DRAINBECAUSE OFSELF RIGHTIOUS POLITICIANSHow our politicians have launched a coup over Brexit   @MailOnline 
This is the point where Labour explicitly repudiates the 2016 referendum result. It proposes a choice between non-Brexit and no-Brexit.  
So Corbyn is going to back May's deal on the basis of having a referendum but not to remain.The guy is a snake oil salesman, Brexit will happen and Corbyn will be at the front making sure it'll happen. 
The DUP "a marginal party in UK terms and one that does not even represent the views of most people in Northern Ireland [is] acting as the final arbiter of Brexit" - @fotoole in today's @ObserverUK 
It would appear the stitch up is almost complete as the fake Tory Brexiteers fall in line one by one. They won elections by lying about wanting Brexit and now they are standing aside to allow it to be killed 
Just one in four voters think ‘Norway Plus’ would honour the result of the last referendum according to our new poll by @YouGov, in today’s Sunday Times. Now clear that ANY deal will be so far from what was promised in 2016 that it must go to the people for confirmation. 
I think about this thing a lot & my main conclusion is that one significant cause of Brexit was that centrist BBC remainers' comfily insipid historical platitudes were just far, far too close to Faragian jingoism.  
Dear Conservative MPs, just so we are clear. If you vote for this Remain WA - which is worse than Remain - the party is finished. You will get wiped out in May and most of us, who are broadly and naturally Conservative, will be voting for a Brexit Alliance at GE ‘22. Well done. 
“The only clarity May’s Deal offers is that we’ll be spending the next decade discussing Brexit. That is why it must be rejected next week.” @Will_DryOFOC 
2/  If we are going talk of "walking into a room full of explosives with a lit match", then what else could be the effect of pushing through #Brexit on the basis of a referendum corrupted by right-wing hate, lies, crime & foreign interference, against the will of the majority? 
Malnourished Universal Credit claimants across the land struggled to find the energy to raise their hands in celebration when Esther McVey resigned...but she is continuing to turn the screw from beyond the grave - by pushing for a devastating hard Brexit! #Marr #Ridge 
Philip Hammond might want to form a consensus with MPs around a Norway style deal, but it would not respect the result of the referendum - it's Soft Remain with no voice, no vote and no veto.  
.@JeremyCorbyn’s NOT responsible for Brexit.He wants to unite us & repair the damage. He should be applauded..@CONservatives are the cause of Brexit & have been in power, w/ a majority every step of the way, & have been negotiating.They’ve divided & hurt the country.#Marr 
I think  @theresa_may  must have got wind of something? There's smoke coming from her phone this morning? She's been phoning everybody up threatening them if you don't do as I say then we won't have Brexit at all. She's done for womenkind what Capone done for valentine's day!!  
WATCH: Corbyn still backing Brexit "our preference is to recognise the result of the referendum ... there was a majority that voted no." #Ridge 
A lady for leaving?  if u cant beat em join em attitude. Bribery and corruption at its best. The WA is a treaty that doesn't deliver brexit. Stand strong for WTO on 29th March.  No deal, no delay. 
#Ridge-id It's still hard work getting this through, but Corbyn keeps plugging away...Labour has a plan that: would protect jobs and rights the EU would consider a majority of MPs would support could unite voters across the Brexit divide. 
My Dad, age 90, has just resigned his membership of the Tory Party. He says he feels 'betrayed'As do we allIf he were younger and fitter, he would join the actions being organised by @ActionBrexit to ensure our full No Deal BrexitPower to the People  
The idea of Brexit as a working class revolt is largely a tabloid  invention. The bulk of the Leave vote was the English middle class  
They told us there would be riots if Brexit didn’t happen. They couldn’t fill your local park with Brexit supporters.  
Accepting her 'deal' IS remaining under EU control.No Deal is still the default position in law.  The motion to remove it was non binding.We can still have No Deal WTO Brexit on 29th.  Reject the 'deal'.  
This and other responses exemplifies Labour obfuscation, and inability to lead. Corbyn truly is "full of sound and fury signifying nothing". #Brexit #indyref2 #PeoplesVote 
Add that to Corbyn firing the 4 who voted against referendum when the whip was to abstain, Starmer quoting PV campaign strategy at despatch box defending his abstention and you start to see the strategic alignment between Labour front bench and PV campaign ahead of their march 
Since becoming PM Theresa May has:Lost the Tory majority Lost 35 ministersLost 39 HoC votesLost 2 Brexit deal votesLost all authorityLost control of cabinetLost control of parliamentLost control of partyLost respect for the UKShe needs to go.#Marr 
Are you watching @MarrShow It is like a parallel universe! And they are only on the newspaper review! Trying to connect the madman terrorist scum fascist in NZ to anyone who wants controlled immigration or Brexit. How does this kind of nonsense help anyone? 
@nigel_farage claims Parliament doesn't represent the people? He may be right:Group on the left managed to garner support of 85 MPs in parliament to back a people's voteGroup on the right received 278 votes to keep their no-deal brexit dream alive#RemainerGovernment ? #MyArse 
Dear Leavers, we've respected the advisory referendum result for 32 months. Sadly your advice has proven to be rubbish. All the promises have been broken. Any normal business would have stopped following the advice many months ago & would have sacked the advisers. #Brexit #FBPE 
Marr: "The Chancellor has £billions to spend if the [Brexit] deal goes through."Incredibly one-sided. He will have the same money to spend if we stay in the EU. #marr 
Watch this key clip on Corbyn and a second referendum- he won’t say what the options are and how he’d vote- he says he’s against May’s deal- his priority is no to no deal exit  
Today 17 March 1992 referendum.68% of whites voted yes.Cartoon by: 
I really have asked myself over the past few years what the British people did wrong to deserve a bunch of arrogant, self-interested, self-aggrandising MPs with a blatant contempt for the voters that put them there. They don't give a stuff what we think about Brexit or owt else! 
"The City has declared itself “no-deal ready”.  With clarity on Brexit, UK stocks and the pound will soar' | via @telegraph 
Farage and company could barely get their own friends and family out for the #MarchToLeave.Can pundits now please stop issuing dark warnings of violent revolution if Brexit is delayed or cancelled?These people fled a light drizzle, they're not ready for Maidan Square. 
Esther McVey now plans for vote for Brexit deal she was against. It sounds like a joke - but the joke is on us.   
Doris this morning tells us that signing her surrender document is the 'patriotic thing to do'Is this really the Conservative party to which my grandfather & father belonged?Surrender document or no Brexit.ARE YOU A CONSERVATIVE ?ARE YOU DEEPLY ASHAMED? 
Watching Jeremy Corbyn on Sky  when asked what his policy was on Brexit was like watching someone who doesn’t know how to cross the road when the traffic lights are on Red.The thought of him in charge of this country is both disturbing and comedic.An accident waiting to happen. 
Corbyn has once again betrayed his Eurosceptic principles, and stabbed 17.4m voters in the back, by backing an amendment to hold a rigged referendum between May's Fake Brexit or Remain. We voted Leave but it wouldn't even be on the ballot!Support us at  
this is how brexit ends, not with a bang but a whimper...even brexiteers don't have the stomach for brexit anymore  
If Brexit MPs back Theresa May's deal, are they selling out?@Nigel_Farage | #FarageOnLBC 
Brexiteers lining up to proclaim that a Bad Deal is now better than No Deal, thus admitting that keeping No Deal on the table till 2 weeks before Brexit Day has delivered not one concession from the EU.The Brexiteers' negotiating 'strategy' ends in ignominious failure & retreat  
Our union backs a public vote on the #Brexit deal - fantastic that Labour wants to give people the #FinalSay! 
Says it is “ridiculous” for Government to continually bring back roundly defeated Brexit Deal   
What I want from Labour leader:“The Leave campaign was based on lies, misinformation, false promises, criminality and xenophobia. Brexit will make us poorer, weaker, will take away our rights and make the rich richer. Of course I would vote to stop Brexit”What we get:“Meh”  
No Brexit: betrayal May's deal: not the Brexit we wantedNo deal: Governent didn't prepare propelyWhatever happens Brexiteers will never take any responsibility.  
A calm and clear explanation from the next PM on Labour's plan for brexit.Theresa May's deal is a blindfold brexit. We have stuck to what our members agreed at conference, following policy to look at our future relationship with the EU. 
CORBYN: Labour backing 'Deal vs. Remain' second referendum amendment.What a total and utter disgrace.  
The fact the Labour leader cannot bring himself to clearly make the case for staying in the EU, in the face of all this chaos and all the evidence showing every Brexit scenario will harm jobs, business and livelihoods, is a betrayal of working people. 
'It would have to be a credible choice that's real' - @jeremycorbyn discusses his 'enthusiasm' for a second referendum but says his priority is making sure that the UK doesn't 'crash out' of Europe on March 29. #RidgeFor more, head here:  
Jeremy Corbyn indicates to @SophyRidgeSky he prefers to facilitate #Brexit with a deal over staying in the EU, disappointing many Labour supporters & voters. @TheIndGroup is clear: no type of Brexit beal is better than the one we have now as an EU member  
N Ireland effectively being given a veto over Brexit. Yet no other country in the UK is allowed to have a say. 
One thing fairly clear. If there is a second referendum, the Remain campaign would be advised to keep Jeremy Corbyn well away from anything they do. #Ridge 
Jeremy Corbyn rightly says Labour's manifesto and conference accept the result of the referendum, but we want a strong relationship with the EU so won't vote for a deal that doesn't deliver that #Ridge 
#Ridge - Would you vote to remain if there was a 2nd referendum?Jeremy Corbyn - It depends what the choices were.#marr #FinalSay #RevokeA50 
To save people time. No need to lobby me of new referendum proposal (Kyle/Wilson). It contradicts Labours election manifesto and I will not be voting for it. 
Corbyn talking sense on #ridge. Why do supposedly intelligent journos pretend they can't understand Labour's position on Brexit. We all get it. Why can't you? 
Liam Fox says the public have #Brexit fatigue and want to get it done.The only way to get rid of Brexit is revoke Article 50.The deal passing means years of more Brexit!  
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn has told Sky News the party is "not supporting Theresa May's deal at all because we think it is a blindfold Brexit" adding it is "ridiculous" to continue to bring back a deal for a 'Meaningful Vote' which has been "defeated comprehensively" 
No Brexit MP has a chance of becoming PM if they vote for TMs dealThey'll put themselves forward to negotiate the future relationshipIt's like voting to lock us in a cage & then going "vote for me I'll try & get us out of the cage I just locked us in"Forget it, careers over 
What’s Labour’s position on Brexit? Jeremy Corbyn: “Our preference is to recognise the result of the referendum. There was a majority that voted no.” There you have it. #Ridge 
I’m very cross with the People’s Vote guys this week but I am marching regardless. Whatever happens with May’s Deal, it is important that Remainers keep going. We can see from Farage’s pathetic march, that even if they get Brexit, they won’t keep Brexit.We will win this. 
This is what can happen in the next 2 weeks .Revoke Article 50.Extend Article 50 with EU 27s approval .Remoaner May's shit deal.No deal WTO Brexit.Out of those 4 options the only 1 that delivers on the result of the referendum is no deal Brexit 
'This is ridiculous, this thing has been defeated comprehensively' - @jeremycorbyn says Theresa May needs to recognise that Parliament needs to do something different, not put her Brexit deal up for a third or fourth vote. #RidgeFor more, head here:  
NEW: @JeremyCorbyn indicates   that he could VOTE LEAVE rather than REMAIN in a possible second referendum if Labour's Brexit proposals were an option on the ballot paper #Brexit #Ridge 
Asked by @SophyRidgeSky how he’d vote in another referendum, Jeremy Corbyn responds ‘it depends.’ 
We are proud that #Leeds has been chosen to host the National Conference of @LabPeoplesVote on 6 April. Many of our members are @UKLabour members & supporters who are desperate to see the party they love stand up against the far right project known as #Brexit.  
'No, we're not supporting Theresa May's deal at all' - Labour leader @jeremycorbyn says his party backs a 'credible choice referendum' on the UK's future relationship with the EU.#RidgeFor more, head here:  
Just to be clear - the Social Democratic Party would NOT be voting for the Barnier/May Withdrawl Agreement. A clean WTO Brexit is now the only available option which honours the 2016 vote. 
Good people can have widely differing views about Brexit, but the idea that @SteveBakerHW is driven by ego is too silly for words. He is a genuinely humble man. 
#Ridge - the fib that Labour keeps changing their position on Brexit was just blithely let slide when Fox said it. Listen to Corbyn. He is stating what our policy has been since 2016. We will not support May's ridiculous red lines. Step aside, May. Let the grown-ups take over. 
Thank you to Mr @AndrewMarr9 for kindly stopping to answer my questions on Thursday about what happens next with Brexit.#Marr #politicslive #Sodem 
Rich celebs wailing against Brexit 'because of the harm it will cause to poor people' but silent about Tory austerity & conscious cruelty need to seriously shut the fuck up tbhFucking hypocrites 
11 more sleeps til Brexit. 
What’s the logic in voting for something that delivers a non-Brexit in order to avoid no Brexit? What’s the logic in voting for something that will put UK in a worse place (forever!) than remaining (where option to leave still exists)? The British public are not fools. 
We're not leaving Guy, and if #brexit IS forced on us, we will campaign HARD to return within seconds. #RevokeArticle50. The Salvini connection is hugely important too. 
Because of what Parliament did last week, our options have narrowed to Theresa May’s Brexit deal, a permanent customs union or no Brexit at all. With regret, I’d urge Brexiteer MPs to back the deal. 
Tails shouldn’t wag dogs!The “inconvenience” of holding European Parliament elections is a minor issue compared to avoiding a chaotic #brexit#ridge#marr 
Any outcome of the Brexit process must go back to the people, not just her deal. So much has changed since 2016.  
Well done, Brexit ultras – the EU has never had more power over Britain | Andrew Rawnsley  
This man is pathetic #Brexit  
Liam Fox: "Voters have Brexit fatigue. They want to get it done."Weasel words. Brexit won't end on Brexit Day. We'll have finished the warmup lap... but a marathon lies ahead. #ridge 
.@UKLabour could’ve had as many Brexit positions as the Kama Sutra.We’re not in power.We don’t have a majority.We’re not negotiating.The onus on @Theresa_May to get a deal that works for the country. She has failed.Labour have a credible alternative.#Ridge #Marr 
Well done the Brexit ultras: the EU has never had more power over UK, argues Andrew Rawnsley.Very true, UK is learning about being at the wrong end of asymmetrical power. 
Esther McVey has changes her mind on Theresa May's deal because "the rules have changed." So if that's the case why can’t we have an another referendum then?#PeoplesVote #marr #ridge #FinalSay #RevokeA50 
Liam Fox is saying that UNLESS May's Brexit in Name only is embraced there won't be a Brexit. He misses the point. May's deal ensures we DO NOT Brexit. 
I voted remain, I still feel that way. I feel the referendum we had was lacking in info we now have. We should have 2nd Ref. #Ridge #Brexit  
Croydon Central and Britain voted Leave in 2016. Sarah Jones MP voted to delay Brexit. Sarah voted to overturn the biggest democratic decision in British history, and against the manifesto she stood on in 2017. Why would you ever trust Sarah again?  
Sophie #Ridge has just claimed she had a 'full spectrum of views' from her visit in Ipswich. Bollocks. She asked a couple of Ladies if they were confused by Corbyn's Brexit position then another couple of they still voted Tory. She then hit the Local Conservative club. 
This is true. As long as you define “patriotism” as making your country poorer, meaner, more isolated, endangering jobs, removing protection for workers and the environment and ensuring that a tiny Brexit elite make a fortune from the chaos they’ve created  
Former DWP Secretary @EstherMcVey1 "Last week, Theresa May, the Government, and Parliament conspired to take no-deal off the table, so the choice before us now is this deal, her bad deal, remains a bad deal, or no Brexit whatsoever."  
Don't buy the idea that WTO Brexit is off the table. If an impossibility why did the Brexit Secretary say No Deal still possible on Friday?  
We've not yet had a fair, honest, legal referendum. The lack of action in pursuing those responsible does not give anyone confidence that the next one would be any different.I'll march on Saturday for a #PeoplesVote but why not #revokeArticle50 ?@UKEUchallenge @BremainInSpain 
Nothing has changed @EstherMcVey1 ... only your will to continue the fight to exit the EU as mandated in the EU Referendum Result  
One week ago certain Brexiteers stated that they could NOT SUPPORT Theresa May's #WithdrawalAgreement because it was a Brexit in name only.  Now they prepare to "hold their noses" and vote for it. Supine 
The Theresa May deal or no Brexit ploy does not stack up. There will be Brexit or the government will fall and the Tory party will be shredded. We know it, they know. Stand firm. Dont bow to pressure. VOTE DOWN THE DEAL. 
Theresa May trying to get her Brexit deal through Parliament. 
‘@EstherMcVey1: I’ll vote for this bad deal or we risk no Brexit. Do you agree?  
Nicola Sturgeon may have the power to hold a “lawful” referendum on independence, if Theresa May refuses to agree to a fresh vote on Scotland leaving the UK. 
Very true, Andrea. EU27 citizens here and UK citizens in the EU27 are those who stand to lose the most with Brexit. How can we ignore it or be bored by it? That’s a luxury we cannot afford  
MPs warned Back my Remain "deal" or Remain in #EUMay's having a laugh,But her Remain minus deal is No Joke!No voiceNo voteNo vetoNo rebateNo trade dealThis costs us £39 Billion!No way!Leave on March 29 with mini-deals & trade WTO terms.#Brexit 
Mrs May's deal is actually a noose around Britain's neck. Spineless Tory MPs are helping her tighten it by chickening out under the threat of cancelling Brexit. They still know it's a death sentence but lack the nous and courage to fight our Remain Parliament. 
Anti-Brexit parliamentarians are massively damaging trust in the democratic process  via @BrexitCentral 
Very foolish of Theresa May to think people can’t tell the difference between the fake Barnier/May Brexit and real independence. Kidding no one but themselves.The ballot box is the solution. #SDP 
Former Work and Pensions Secretary Esther McVey who resigned from Cabinet in protest at Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal has told Sky News she will back the deal in the third 'Meaningful Vote' this week because "the rules have all changed" 
Caller on LBC suggesting that MPs may be persuaded to vote for May's flawed deal with the offer of titles.They're already offered bungs to Brexit-voting English towns & to the DUP. Scotland got hee haw (naturally).Westminster is corrupt to the coreIt's time for independence 
I don't understand why MPs such as @EstherMcVey1 now say they will support May's deal because they are afraid of losing Brexit. I thought Brexit-supporting MPs were agreed that May's deal isn't Brexit. 
Brexit has caused England to be a cesspit of hatred  
.@theresa_may, it is because I am a patriot that I am opposing your hopeless #Brexit dealIt leaves us poorer, less influential and less safeIt provides no clarity or certainty about our future relationship with the EUStop running down the clock!Grant a #PeoplesVote 
I don’t envy Brexiteer MPs. Voting against this deal risks huge delays and possibly no Brexit. But how can they vote for something which might trap Britain permanently as a rule taker from Brussels?  
ex-Government Minister & Hard Brexiter Esther McVey wants more teenagers to get saturday jobs. They need to learn how a post-Brexit low pay, low-prospect economy functions and how to prepare themselves to be exploited... #nastyparty #marr #ridge 
THE sight of only about 76 old timers making it to Hartlepool on Farage’s much hyped #MarchToLeave must kill off a couple of diehard Brexit myths:- everyone up North loves Brexit - if Brexit is cancelled there will be rioting on the streetsNo they don’t and no there won’t 
One of the reasons I am disappointed with the smug reaction to Brexit from the continent is that we all know no country in Europe would be able to take in a big question like Brexit and address it 
Unless wording is tweaked to make clear no deal is off the table (or other legislation actually takes it off the table), isn't the logical conclusion of this that the referendum will be on May's deal v no-deal rather than May's deal v Remain?  
Former Work & Pensions Secretary Esther McVey is on #Ridge today. Esther resigned her cabinet position just before that damning UN report on Tory Austerity was published. But I'm sure Sophie Ridge will have her back & tell you she resigned over Theresa's Brexit deal. 
‘Back my Brexit or we’ll never leave’ says Theresa MayOption 2 please  
Spineless Tory "Eurosceptic" MPs start to back Theresa May's worthless Brexit deal. These people are beneath contempt #PartyBeforeCountry 
I still believe that if you1. Accept Brexit is happening and2. Understand the dangers of No Deal, then you must conclude that the Withdrawal Agreement is the best solution to our impasse @anandMenon1 #beerandbrexit 
This is what @Theresa_May should have done when she lost the General Election. Be in no doubt: we’re in this mess because of her & her fellow @CONservatives.  .@JeremyCorbyn invites MPs for cross-party talks to find Brexit compromise #Marr #Ridge 
What is shocking is her utter naivety. How on earth has such a child managed to get into Parliament? Surely we deserve better than this? Brexit or no Brexit we need to know our country is in capable hands.  
The view from the US: ‘Parliament goes chicken on Brexit’. “The House of Commons has just resolved that it will not let Britain leave the EU without explicit permission from Brussels”. Wake up MPs, heed the advice of our largest trading partner, just leave  
My experience is people are afraid of second referendum because they don’t think we have safeguards in place defend us against dark money and foreign interferenceSo country has shifted strongly towards staying in EU and lack of support for #PeoplesVote does not undermine that 
Shameful from @EstherMcVey1 By voting for a Deal that she knows cripples Brexit, divides up the UK and hands control to the EU, she is betraying Brexit. Another spineless Conservative.  
Can someone please give me one major company whose profit has been increased sharply because of Brexit? 
I joined the Tory party at 16 until I left in 2011, in that time I met less than a dozen MPs who were true believers in Brexit and willing to be honest about it. Most are proving Brexit is about their careers and their party.  
A 14 point lead for #PeoplesVoteIn polls now.Imagine how popular @UKLabour would be if we delivered one! #Brexit #GTTO 
#FBPE community. Look out for tweets saying "I was going to the march next Saturday but I'm not now." They are Brexit trolls trying to undermine and reduce the scale of the march. Call them out for what they are. See you all next Saturday, come rain or shine. 
Brexit was a working-class revolt. Great by @jowilliams293  
Theresa May's Deal means no Brexit.That is ALL you need to know about it.Rejecting it for a third and perhaps a fourth time is the duty of EVERY principled Brexiteer. The rest is detail. 
Contradiction was baked into the Brexit result from the start. Now, its contradictions have proved irreconcilable - There's no sensible Brexit option that will get through parliament - it's time to revoke Article 50 and reconsider  via @prospect_uk 
So often the views of those who fish off the #westcoast of #Scotland are overlooked so it was great to hear Isobel Fraser remind @MrTCHarris of this. Presenters across the bbc should take a lead from her on true balance in their #Brexit coverage 
Very good analysis by @joycemcm on #bbcgms aided by the excellent Isobel Fraser in the chair putting @MrTCHarris in his place for his mischaracterisation of current Scottish politics & @theresa_may terrible #Deal especially on #fishing. #Brexit 
Groundhog Day politics...Theresa May seeks to persuade MP's to back her Brexit deal at the third time of asking.  
So Scotland should not have another vote on independence and to vote again on #Brexit is undemocratic as well. But to bring her deal to Parliament for the 3rd time & bribing the DUP is a good thing? I don't think so. Scotland needs to leave this Union! #indyref2 #unequalunion 
Things that are NOT legally binding:-A) 2016 Brexit referendumB) Vote to take no deal off the tableC) Vote to extend Article 50Legally binding things:-D) Article 50E) Losing all our international treaties, arrangements & trade dealsF) No deal by default on 29 March 
Liam Fox accused UK firms of hampering his ability to make Brexit trade deals because they don’t want to trade overseas. As Tory International Trade Sec he is supposed to promote UK concerns not trash them! #FoxOut #ToriesOut #Marr #Ridge 
Unionists say Scotland isn’t capable of running her own affairs.  If not, no country is: maps show that, in fact, Scotland has one of most highly educated populations in Europe. The 2014 referendum was a victory for fear tactics over hope - we mustn’t let that happen again.  
Quick Poll: If a General Election was held 2019, how would you vote ? Please vote and RT. #Marr #Ridge #GE2019nb Brexit Alliance = BP UKIP FB Sov Time Vets SDP 
“It seems they are acting on behalf of the EU as opposed to the interests of the majority of Britain’s, who voted to leave” Yup. @RitaPanahi sums up my feelings entirely on the #Brexit negotiation 
There are two sheet anchors for Brexit. One is a profound belief in national sovereignty, the other a profound belief in democracy.The SDP has both in its declaration of aims and values.The Westminster parties, with the possible exception of the DUP, have neither. 
Seeing confirmation that MPs will try to use the rule of Erskine May to prevent the only deal with the EU which exists going back for a third vote. If successful, short extension also dies. Be alive to the fact the same argument will be made if a second referendum comes back. 
48% is the minority Jackie, that's how referenda works otherwise what's the point? As for not being heard, we've been ignored since our joining & its inception but the point you're conveniently ignoring is that it took over 40+yrs of campaigning to bring about the 2016 referendum  
“I never promised it would be a huge success #Brexit”(Billboard location: @Nigel_Farage) 
Powerful stuff from Conservative grassroots 1: “....your deal as it simply does not deliver the result of the referendum that you and your Cabinet keep trying to fool us into believing it does – it does not.”  
For the avoidance of doubt: this is Labour whipping for a second referendum.  
Newspaper headlines: May 'begs MPs' to back Brexit deal. So what ever happened to the manifesto commitment - “no-deal is better than a bad deal”, and this deal is simply awful. Either deliver on your commitments or hold a general election..  
You want to see what abuse looks like?Spend 5 minutes at the barriers along College Green with the bussed-in UKippers shouting traitor and worse at nurses, grandmothers, & anybody else peacefully protesting against Brexit.True grit? True grim more like.#WeAreSodem 
Let’s continue to resist Brexit. Our economy and values are at stake | Will Hutton - the guardian  
We’ve reached a point in the Brexit madness where doing huge damage to your country is described as a “patriotic”. That is so warped it’s almost Orwellian.  
This is unconscionable. Real patriotism would stop the madness of Brexit in its tracks. And the sheer hypocrisy of denying us a voice but trying a 3rd time!! “Theresa May pleads with MPs to act like 'patriots' in an effort to revive Brexit deal” - Sky News  
Is there anything we can do here Indy people? This lady is being told to leave her Country, Scotland due to Brexit. She has 4 days. We need to raise the roof on this.  
Nicola Sturgeon may have the power to hold a “lawful” referendum on independence, if Theresa May refuses to agree to a fresh vote on Scotland leaving the UK. 
Theresa May told by 50 Tory associations she will be 'personally' held responsible for any Brexit betrayal. Party chairmen have told the PM they are in an "absolute state of despair as to what is happening to democracy in this once great country of ours"..  
I am not marching on the 23rd because of what some people did in Parliament? No, no. We are marching on the 23rd because of what some people did in Parliament.It’s going to be massive. Don’t miss it. Let’s Stop Brexit.#PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Allan Little, who led the BBC’s #indyref coverage, has triggered a row over referendum “bias”.says some colleagues saw it as their responsibility to show why voting Yes would be “foolish”says colleagues assumed independence was “wrong” 
800 years of democracy is unravelling before our very eyes: Distinguished historian DAVID STARKEY on how our self-satisfied politicians have launched a coup over Brexit via  
Almost unnoticed amid the Brexit frenzy, Philip Hammond’s announcement that fossil fuel heating will end in new homes from 2025 is a huge policy shift. Its architect John Gummer has.never declared payments to his consultancy from firms which will benefit.  
I still won't back Mrs May's deal – because it's not Brexit⁦@OwenPaterson⁩ is a Rock Star 
This isn’t Brexit  
I am reminded more than ever today that only a handful of Tory MPs were campaigners for Brexit before the 2015 election. The commitment of most now appears to have been opportunist and careerist, activated only once the referendum was called.Very disappointing to say the least. 
I’ve had a few leavers tell me the courts have confirmed the referendum wasn’t corrupt. They can’t even get that right. The court said no such thing, but exactly the opposite. 
I keep seeing tweets about Brexiteer MPs who have “changed their minds” & will now vote for Theresa May’s deal. They haven’t changed their minds, they still know her deal is terrible. They’ve been bullied & blackmailed by a Remain Parliament threatening to stop Brexit altogether. 
Tory MP after Tory MP is today folding on Brexit and saying they will back May's deal that will take our great country to a position worse and less free and less independent even than EU membership. Sickening.#notinmyname 
Why have so few Leavers given up on Brexit despite Leave MPs and other Leave figures in a daily war with facts, reality & reason?I suggest it's because one can't just say it's botched and stop there. It requires 'confessions' - even if only to oneself. A high bar. /1 
Tory Brexiteer MPs could vote for May’s deal (which we all know isn’t Brexit) in the face of a Remain Parliament. Or they could threaten to bring down this Govt in a no confidence vote & force a general election so we voters can elect MPs who DO represent our views on Brexit.  
 Allan Little, The BBC’s lead Referendum correspondent in 2014, tells the next and final episode of Yes/No - Inside the Indyref documentary: “I was quite surprised by some of my colleagues’ failure to understand their own assumption that the Yes side was wrong.” 
Endlich wieder eine Mauer.Happy St. Brexit Day.#StPatricksDay 
“You’d think they’re acting on behalf of the EU instead of the majority of Britons that voted Leave.”We can always rely on our Australian cousins to cut through the crap. The Brexit negotiations has to be the biggest failure by our political class since Suez.  
#ThingsPeopleSayThatAnnoyMe"Brexit means Brexit!"  
 Appalling. Actively threatening Brexit voters with no Brexit in order to get her fake Brexit through. She has lied to us so many times. 
Theresa May’s Daily Basketcase attacks Lenny Henry Ed Sheeran Olivia Coleman these Bastard Corbyn Comic Relief mates asking for money to help the sick the homeless families queuing at Foodbanks Tory in work poverty Britain, think of Brexit and Hate!!! pic.twitter.com/LvpMmaL9Of 
Support for referendum now 57%, with big majority for remain. Time for Parliament to follow will of the people and give us a #peoplesvoteSurge in voters saying UK faces national crisis 
As reported by @christopherhope in today's @Telegraph 86% of respondents to our latest survey want to leave the EU on WTO terms. 92% oppose a delay to Brexit. #LeaveMeansLeave #StandUp4Brexit 
Back my Brexit or we’ll never leave, says MayHer Brexit is No Guarantee WE Will Leave! Stand Firm, No Deal Is The Best Deal! 
Theresa May told by 50 Tory associations she will be 'personally' held responsible for any Brexit betrayal  
I was involved in private polling for a large corporation based near LA in 2014. Sample size 250k across socioeconomic scale from towns across Scotland. The Yes lead was in double figures.Immediately after the referendum I joined @theSNP you can fill the blanks in yourself. 
Breakthrough on second referendum  
This week’s #Brexit problem in a nut shell: a Tory leader not in control of her party, a Labour Party not in control of its leader, a parliament not in control of its agenda. 
PM's deal is not #Brexit.It is just a different type of membership of the EU.It is actually WORSE than our present membership.You know that is true Esther,so what is the real reason you are now going to vote for the #BrexitBetrayal ?Cut the waffle and tell us the truth. 
Sounds a bit far-fetched. Seems to me backing Theresa May‘s deal will have exactly the opposite affect for Boris. A worthy future leader would oppose, vote it down again, get her out, and be part of a new, tough, negotiating team that actually delivers Brexit, not Brino.  
Brexit would not be happening without him and he says it won't happen without a deal.   
Happy #StPatricksDay to my followers.Saint Patrick was a Protestant and member of the Orange Order. He was also a supporter of the Union. If he was here today he would want the DUP to deliver a no deal Brexit and he would welcome a hard border with the Republic of Ireland. 
The former Foreign Secretary’s future rests on whether or not he backs Theresa May’s deal.      Boris Johnson to boost his hopes of becoming PM by backing Theresa May’s Brexit deal  
Aaaand it's time to go home! Have fun with Brexit, England-chan  
An open letter: Prime Minister, you will be held responsible if Brexit is not delivered as you pledged, by Councillor Bob Perry 
I'm 64 this year. My heart is 22 and so is my head on brexit. I'm a father and grandfather. I want my children to live free and easy in a peaceful and united Europe. 
You’ve been doing some truly inspirational work, ByDonkeys. Your appearance at the Brexit March yesterday was epic. Have you got a site where people can donate to you? 
Anti-Brexit parliamentarians are massively damaging trust in the democratic process, says Alasdair Dow 
Lets be clear - a 2nd referendum or peoples vote or ratification whatever you wish to call it IS MORE DEMOCRACY NOT LESS... 
Scottish Parliament Committee Brexit impact on our non-privatised Scottish NHS Jeff Ace Chief Executive of NHS Dumfries & Galloway 3 to 4x as much to get medical supplies from other countries than we do now with the EU   
The Brexit  crisis wont be over until we take  on the right - me in the  Observer  
Theresa May’s Daily Basketcase Lenny Henry Ed Sheeran Olivia Coleman these Bastards are Corbyn’s Comic Relief mates asking for money to help the poor the sick the homeless people struggling families queuing at Foodbanks Tory in work poverty Britain, think of Brexit and Hate!!! pic.twitter.com/LvpMmaL9Of 
Just drove past a local boozer near where I live covered in signs saying 'LEAVE MEANS LEAVE'  if the 29th March, Brexit day, doesn't happen @theresa_may isn't going to know what has hit her!!! Just a friendly warning, because we are fucked off!!!!!! #Brexit 
And YOU Kate should not underestimate the anger and determination of the people striving to save you from your own stupidity. Brexit MUST and WILL be stopped. 
Here is the text of the Brexit amendment Labour is whipping for next week (h/t @AVMikhailova in @Telegraph ) - it would put May's deal to a second referendum. Tell your MP to vote for this (pls RT)  
And this shows that the 2014 Referendum election was clearly rigged Just Shows that the Tories rig elections use "Dark Money Bribery and Blackmail as a means to Control" A Gang not a political Party.  
Plans for a further Referendum will be dead, Labour's Conference policy will be in tatters, it will have ignored its Manifesto, No Deal will be more likely, and it will have failed its huge majority for a public vote and Remain. But what's worst is the sheer cynicism. /ENDS 
Let’s continue to resist Brexit. Our economy and values are at stake | Will Hutton  
Cry baby .. you’ve been plotting and scheming to destroy Brexit and now called out by local party members. Stop playing the sympathy card.  
Perhaps Labour will change its position back? Labour does seem to have more policy positions than the karma sutra - although it's genuinely hard to find one that doesn't involve Remainers and referendum supporters getting screwed. But where are we if it doesn't? /7 
'May will be held responsible for Brexit act of betrayal’ (£Free)Actually the whole party will be held responsible.#BrexitBetrayal  
This cynicism - signalling to those who want a referendum that Labour supports one whilst doing everything to undermine it - also ignores Party policy.Labour was supposed to push for it if MPs voted down a deal, if nothing was on the table, rather than if MPs supported it. /4  
As our Brexit Rug is Pulled Away!My definitive word for Parliament is Capitulation!“The action of ceasing to resist an opponent or demand!”“Surrender,Submission,Yielding,Giving In,Succumbing,Acquiescing, Laying Down One’s Arms”.....Have they no Conscience?I’m ashamed! 
BBC News - Theresa May asks MPs for 'honourable compromise' on BrexitMay now seeks honourable compromise now that she's nearly exhausted the threats she is able to make. 
#Brexit illustrated  
It’s controversial whether Cambridge Analytica did work on Brexit even though there’s an invoice to UKIP. CA/SCL couldn’t operate in Europe because of strict data laws. But thought they could escape UK data protection law by working abroad. Came close to getting away with it.  
Soft Brexit is a ridiculous idea. We would be rule takers, not rule makers. Unthinkable for a country with a huge economy, a nuclear arsenal and a permanent seat on the UN security council 
The 7 Brexit sins in one bus:Dishonesty CorruptionRacismXenophobiaVanityGreedSloth#FightFascism#StopBrexit 
Brexit.  
Theresa May asks MPs for 'honourable compromise' on Brexit  
The next election is really a referendum on what type of society and country we want to live in; a decent fair inclusive society, or more Govt endorsed & encouraged RW racism dividing and endangering our country? #auspol 
BREAKING: Brexiteers are mobilizing. There are 17.4 million #PatriotsUnited Join in.Be prepared to move at short notice - we will bring this country to a standstill.#Brexit #WTO #NoDeal #YellowVests #Blockade 
On March 16 we celebrated the 5th Anniversary of the 2014 referendum in #Crimea: 96,77% voted in favour of reunification with #Russia. Hundreds of thousands of Crimeans gathered to protect their home and further choice – to come back to Russia. #CrimeaIsRussia 
An educated population is not afraid of the unknown, they relish the idea of learning and understanding. The toxic-right lives in fear and hatred. Here is a column that discusses that issue w/ regard to Brexit 
Listen here to Tory MSP Liz Smith trying to talk down #indyref2 ... only to be met with a wall of laughter from the audience over her Tories' catastrophic handling of #Brexit  
Here in Canada, we have a rising party of Tropical fans that also have crawlled out from under their disease ridden rock to challenge us head on. UK was already long on its way with Brexit, now Aus, NZ ofc are in the race. Evil is duplicating faster than we can count. 
UK PM May warns of long delay to Brexit unless parliament backs her deal  
When the far right gets one public victory, this emboldens all of them. This is why hate crimes spiked after Brexit, even in the heart of London. You can tell us not to be scared right now but that's not completely realistic. This from AKL.  
Conservatives won in 2015 because they promised a referendum. They won in 2017 by promising to carry out Brexit. You may disagree with both - now that you are safely in your seat - but MPs are replaceable, while the British electorate isn’t.  
Nobody:J. K. Rowling: Hogwarts opposed Brexit.Nobody:J. K. Rowling: Also Dobby was trans. 
Oh, my goodness. Yes. When are the Tory MPs in their Westminster bubble going to open their eyes and see how the Party's constituency associations are imploding over their collective failure to stand firm and honour David Cameron's pledge at the outset of the Referendum?  
My British followers might appreciate how harsh Canada’s most read newspaper assess your Brexit situation. Basically says you’re soo fucked, and getting more fucked cause you’re also poorly educated. Enjoy! Xo  
It seems like the May deal not only fails to deliver on Brexit promises, it actually does the precise OPPOSITE. It delivers less freedom, less control and less sovereignty than EU membership. And, unlike EU membership, there is no unilateral way out... 
@DKShrewsburyBrexit means:1. Our own trade deals! ( But the WA backstop bans these.)2. Freedom from EU state Aid and competition rules ( But the backstop signs us up to them - including any future changes -about which we will now have no say )Continued... 
Which of these votes on the deal is the meaningful vote?Maybe it's time to put the meaningful vote on the #Brexit deal to the people in a #FinalSayForAll.  Ratify the agreed and deliverable deal, or invoke the agreed and deliverable option to withdraw Article 50 and #StopBrexit 
We have our sign up and our girls want voters to vote Yes for the referendum. We are excited about the opportunities this project will bring for their futures! #YESforDeKalbCentral 
Nobody:JK Rowling: quidditch is a metaphor for Brexit  
"The nine defendants face decades in prison on rebellion and other charges for staging a banned independence referendum for the northeastern region and pushing ahead with an independence declaration that Madrid deemed unconstitutional."  
imagine thinking you’re qualified to run for president when you haven’t even formed an opinion on brexit lmao the white male caucausity of it all 
Theresa May pleads with MPs to act like 'patriots' in an effort to revive Brexit deal  
We now have open hostility between the Right and the Left, and the absolute toxicity of Brexit, so to therefore imply blame lays at the door of the UK for this atrocity, without proof, to me, seems irresponsible. Unless there is proof? 
I'll take the delay, thanks.Forever."May warns lawmakers - back my deal or face long Brexit delay"  
This is called BRIBERY !   It is Illegal !!!!!!!!The #DUP said it wants a #Brexit deal after intensive talks with Cabinet ministers...  
Mrs May is definitely determined to force her diabolical WA on the UK.Brexit in Name Only is not acceptable, it's worse than staying in the EU.Mrs May is asking Brexteers to choose  between staying in the EU or staying in the EU ?She has lost her Marbles and must RESIGN !! 
There IS hope still folks.... dont be disheartened... the dream team are on the case exiting Brexit...With @amcarmichaelMP 
It’s not too late for MPs to do the right thing.Now is the moment for MPs to see that Brexit can still be stopped.Next week is critical. Write to your MP to demand #RevokeA50 & #StopBrexit. 
No Spanish TV broadcasted the mass rally even if it was in #Madrid & live on Catalan & int'l TV. 120,000 have marched against #CatalanTrial & for #selfdetermination. #Catalonia wants a binding #referendum where the int'l community ensures the  result is applied @elnacionalcatEN 
We live in a country where an MP is released from jail to vote against Brexit with a tag on her leg. Did anyone seriously expect these parasites to deliver on the decision they asked us to make? 
Poor old Nigel - It's Over - and he knows it - Close, but no cigar. h/t to the genius that is @ByDonkeys #MarchforLeave 
In Naha, about 10,000 people gathered to demand that Washington and Tokyo stop the construction of the new US Marine airbase at Henoko, the position that a large majority of Okinawans endorsed in a referendum, but which conservatives continue to dismiss. (MP) #Okinawa #Henoko 
"Britain is in greater danger today than it was in WW2. Then it was not divided; it was united. The Blackshirts were a minority & only in cities. Now the division is everywhere. That is what #Brexit has done. It must be undone."My mother, nearly 91 is marching for a #PeoplesVote 
This can't be emphasised enough. The real reason for the referendum in the first place as well as the indecent haste to trigger article 50.  
UK - rising hate crimes and Brexit and RUPERT MURDOCH USA - rising hate crimes and Trump and RUPERT MURDOCH Australia - rising hate crimes and the #NewZealandTerroristAttack and RUPERT MURDOCH A white supremacist controls the media in these 3 countries. 
"millions" After deselection, Kate has a bright future on the stand-up comedy circuit. #Brexit #Lexit #MarchToLeave 
Has anyone else noticed that the process of duplicating EU law into UK law is creating twice the red tape for companies? For example, after Brexit they'll have to:- file for trademarks separately in the UK and the EU- get type approval for cars in both the UK and the EU 
Brexit BOMBSHELL: Theresa May admits the UK may 'NEVER' leave the EU in SHOCK comments  
Dear @SkyNews @BBCNews @Channel4News @itvnews,I (remainer) recently debated Brexit with @BenedictSpence (deeply Eurosceptic) and it was the best discussion of Brexit I've even witnessed before. If you want ratings, keep showing heated brawls, but if you want progress, get us on. 
What a great letter from Tory party Cllrs. please readWith just under 2 weeks to go, we implore you, PM: do not allow an extension to Art50 and do not make a further attempt to push through WA, it simply does not deliver the result of the referendum.  
The party got 42% at the last election promising to deliver BrExit and that's with the worst campaign in memoryA party that ignores their core vote doesn't win. With Labour it's bailing out bankers. With the LibDems it's student fees. With Tories it's surrendering to Europe.  
They don't have the balls to reverse the referendum openly. They had to concoct a fake Brexit which is what the WA is. Reject it. Keep rejecting it. 
BREXIT LAST CHANCE: May warns MPs have three days to back deal or REMAIN under EU RULE  
So disappointed that my MP is so useless he doesn’t even have an opinion on Brexit. Just does what Jeremy says.Biggest issue of the day, I would have more respect if he was a rabid Brexiteer. Just not caring is surely the lowest of the low! 
Brussels bureaucrats dread the prospect that the post-Brexit British will cleave to the Swiss model of EU relations  
Mike it was hilarious. I have seen more people at a takeaway shop. If this government pursues Brexit without considering #PeoplesVote  or #RevokeArticle50 they are becoming an authoritarian fascist regime. The Tories and Labour will be dead in the water for generations. 
Struggling to understand the twists and turns of #Brexit?We'll leave you with a 15 second explanation from @Channel4News' @jonsnowC4. Thanks for watching #Insiders. 
. @DominicRaab & @EstherMcVey1 tipped to be Brexit candidate in future Tory leadership, Tory members deserve a good leadership election to look forward to after this "strong & stable leadership" we've experienced. So far it's looking promising.  
‘In the nearly three years since the referendum, all the noisy pub talk against arrogant, unanswerable elites has actually proved an understatement.’ Charles Moore gets it exactly right in today’s Telegraph. 
This is an outright lie, I have not been put on the candidates list, nor do I wish to be.All I want is Brexit and have come to the conclusion that Mrs May’s Withdrawal Agreement is now the only way to deliver that, thanks to the complete and utter charlatans in Parliament.  
A new YouGov poll for the People's Vote campaign shows people would vote Remain by 61/39 in a referendum against the deal. 
Brexit is no longer just a fight to free our country from the tyranny of the EU.It is also now a fight to save our endangered, centuries-old Parliamentary democracy, as well as the clarion call for a radical political shake-up the likes of which we have never seen before. 
New polling shows support for a #PeoplesVote surges as public reject #Brexit alternatives:  
"Since then, pro-Remain MPs have taken every possible chance to table amendments pushing Brexit in name only and wasted hours posing the question “why are we leaving?” instead of debating how best to plan the departure and shape our future outside the EU."  
Thousands rally in Madrid against referendum trial.  @assemblea_int @OmniumIntl 
Brexit Britain  
Theresa May & her gaggle of clowns are battling the clock.Frantically scrambling to tease another vote out of an untrusting HoC who rejected her twice.Media are bigging it up like it's disaster.Mere leakage, they're still breathing our fumes of freedom.12 days to #Brexit.  
The politics of fear pursued by the #Brexit right, fear of immigrants, refugees, Muslims etc has preyed on insecurities to drive many people to seek security in a kind of tribal siege mentality, in which crimes & abuses of democracy are OK if they serve the tribe. 
After three years of campaigning for citizens rights in #Brexit I am delighted to be starting a new campaign as a candidate for @voltluxembourg in the #EUelections2019  #FortheFutureNotthePast 
May warns of long delay to Brexit unless parliament backs her deal  
It sure is! Great meeting of @Somerset4Europe at @SomersetCCC today. Lots of coaches planned for next Saturday’s Stop Brexit march in London. Thanks Sam  
ICO is the least of your worries Darren, best take up @krishgm kind offer, spill the beans on national tv, dropping all the key Leave players right in it, and you might, just might, stay out of jail fella. Nobody in their right mind would take the rap for a bunch of shysters. 
Isn't #MarchtoLeave a wonderful metaphor for England after Brexit? A rag-tag group of fannies stumbling about sodden and blind in the pishing rain, having paid £50 for the privilege. A cliff edge awaiting them as their glorious leader decamps to a nice warm pub. Lovely Jubbly  
I reckon the Kyle-Wilson amendment will pass as it looks like it’ll have the support of many in Labour AND it’s been reported that maybe 10 government ministers could push for it.Looks like we’re heading for another referendum: May’s deal vs remain.Oh boy...  
.@RitaPanahi on Brexit: What's happening in Britain is shameful. It was the biggest democratic vote in history and the ruling class has done everything they can to undermine it. They don't respect the will of the people.MORE:  #Outsiders 
In a world where social media gets so much stick, step forward @Everton and my son Max to make a positive impact on so many others. Forget brexit for a moment and watch the smile on his face. I am one very proud dad and I can't thank my favourite football club enough for this. Xx  
Lord Blunkett says there should be a new referendum in which the choice should be between May’s deal and Remain. Talk about vote-rigging! These Remainers insist on treating Leave voters as idiots. 
It is *not* unpatriotic not to want to make your country poorer, less safe, less influential in the world. Desperate stuff from PM. We are *all* patriots. We need to find way forward for sake of our country - I believe that’s through letting the people have the #FinalSay #Brexit  
Impact of #Brexit on #F1 : 
The Who’s Roger Daltrey doesn’t hold back when asked about Brexit  
A @Con_Voice survey found 92% oppose a delay to Brexit & 86% want to leave on WTO terms"Parliament must respect the democratic process, which was outsourced to the public in ‘16..by leaving on WTO terms if an acceptable deal can’t be reached” Don Porter 
DUP reportedly seeking: a) guarantee the EU will not treat NI and GB differently in terms of the customs union and single market after Brexit; b) DUP MPs to be "deeply involved" in the UK Government negotiating team over the future trade deal with the EU. 
Tory MP Phillip Lee is a lead signatory on the Kyle amendment. More than 10 Tory ministers have expressed interest. Independent Group MPs also tell me they will back it (after their own 2nd referendum amendment was defeated last week). 
I really hope Scotland is watching. This rotten PM actually believes Scots will swallow this. Will they? I no longer believe they will. Scotland is ignored while May prepares DUP Brexit deal bribe  
Great that so many coaches to London planned by @euromove local campaigns for next Saturday’s Stop Brexit march! @Devon4Europe is filling 30! @Dorset4E & @Chelt4Europe, @LeedsEurope & others are in competition 
Visionary Prime Minister Theresa May is to suggest a bold new Brexit solution.She will travel to Brussels to suggest a part-time membership of the EU in which Britain remains part of the EU on weekdays and leaves the EU each weekend.  
Support for #PeoplesVote surges as public reject alternatives for "failing to honour" 2016 referendum:  
Earlier this year, YC4PV and C4PV wrote an open letter calling on Parliament to grant us a @peoplesvote_uk on #Brexit. Signed by Cllr's, Constituency chairman, YC chairmen & activists on all levels. The need for a #C4PV is growing within the party. 
James Reed: I've moved my jobs firm back to Britain BECAUSE of Brexit  
It’s like they told six drag queens to dramatise what happened this week in regards to Brexit.  
Have Sajid Javid and Jeremy Hunt ruined their leadership chances by voting to extend Brexit? One can but hope. 
Brexit dividend for Ireland....  
While Scotland & Wales & their Govts & Parliament/Assembly are ignored on Brexit:DUP demands seat at the table in future EU trade talks as price for backing May's deal.  
DUP demanding a seat at the table 4 all trade deals with the EU plus £1Billion in cash 2 back THERESA MAY'S Brexit Deal This is bribery and blackmail 10 DUP MPs are getting to call all the shots on Scotland's place in the EU while Scotlands FM & Scotlands citizens r being ignored  
Theresa May told by 50 Tory associations she will be 'personally' held responsible for any Brexit betrayal They add in an open letter that if May cannot ensure that Britain leaves the EU as planned at the end of next week she should resign via @Telegraph 
NEW The DUP demand is in two parts: 1) the EU will not treat Northern Ireland and Britain differently in terms of the customs union and single market after Brexit;2) DUP MPs will be "deeply involved" in the UK Government negotiating team over the future trade deal with the EU. 
Where is 1.Re 2.  The referendum was corrupt.  Repeated acts of corruption.You ignoring that fact INCREASES the corruption.  You become part of it.If you think you can restore faith in politics that way you are dreaming. 
1) I don't feel let down by this #Brexit warrior.2) Few took the establishment on like this lad.3) Few felt the weight he bore.4) He bore it on our behalf, we owe him. Criticism is harsh.5) Thank you, Darren. I think we've more in us yet, but I do get it.#NoDealNoProblem 
NEW Dominic Raab and Esther McVey tipped to be Brexit candidate in future Tory leadership election as Boris Johnson's chances wane   via @telegraphnews 
Tories fuckedEducation Public service sArmed forces NHS Brexit Care for elderly and people with disabilities A ruthless killing machine employed by the rich to kill off the poor Scum 
Another moderate, One Nation Conservative @NickBoles no longer welcome, even after voting for PM’s Brexit. Goodbye modernisation 
EXCLUSIVE Prepare to fight European elections, parties told as Brexit delay fears grow  via @Telegraph 
If like many Leavers you believe electoral crime in 2016 to be irrelevant, it means you have abandoned democracy in favour of a tribal politics in which crimes can be committed and rules broken so long as they benefit the tribe to which you belong. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Multinationals control fishing. For example, 80% of fishing boats have access to merely 1% of the quota. EU as boogeyman is well crafted psyops by conglomerate bullies and their Brexit operatives.  
The Cambridge Analytica/Facebook scandal is far from over.....'That’s why Wylie was invited. They [Facebook] wanted his knowledge. He was asked a lot of questions including about the company’s contacts with Russian entities.'Via @carolecadwalla 
Bob Perry: Prime Minister, you will be held responsible if Brexit is not delivered as you pledged  
We now go live to Brexit*sadtrombone.wav* pic.twitter.com/Q5pz6BDSfO 
Theresa May Theresa May Theresa May what an absolute mess this country is in... Austerity Windrush Child Poverty Foodbanks NHS collapse and Knife Crime and Hostile Environment and Brexit... it’ll never end until we Get Rid of the Tories  
‘a Labour source said it would make more sense to push the Commons into backing a referendum once MPs had settled on the withdrawal plan’We weren’t born yesterday  
#LetsStay so instead of wasting £billions on Brexit prep & lost economic growth, we can:- fund the NHS & social care properly- end child poverty- build many more affordable homes- boost resources for schools, skills & youth support- put more bobbies on the beatAdd your own 
It feels like everything is a Brexit metaphor right now.  
#BrexitUK Brexiting   
What a Brexit dividend  
A renaissance of Europe.Where youth unemployment is over 40% in some countries.Where growth is lower than the UK.Where weekly riots are the norm across France.Where 'ever closer ties' is always the answer, but never the solution.Thanks, but no thanks.WTO Brexit Now! 
Absolutely disgraceful. @EstherMcVey1 today France said no Agreement on MV3,this week and it’s no deal. FFS woman, hold your nerve for WTO. Do you really think Parliament would dare to really thwart Brexit? And now here you are, doing just that. As Robbins predicted & May planned 
Nicky Morgan told the Commons she feared that MPs were suffering “systematic intimidation” to get them to change their votes on Brexit. This is why #Brexit must be stopped. If crime & threats of violence are rewarded our democracy will die.#PeoplesVote 
Unfortunately the WA is nothing like Brexit. We still follow EU rules and have no way of getting out. It is Remain-minus.Please reconsider. 
Arch-eurosceptic Farage leads march over Brexit betrayal  
‘Just get OUT NOW!’ Brexiteer says no deal Brexit is ESSENTIAL for future of democracy | Politics | News |  
“She is mean. She is rude. She is cruel. She is stupid. I have heard that from almost everyone who has dealt with her”.  Theresa May's Brexit Disaster - SPIEGEL ONLINE  
Tyrants often stage votes and they always win by a huge majority. That's because contrary to what Brexiters pretend, democracy is not just about votes, it's about things Brexiters don't respect like the right to oppose, accurate information & the rule of law.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
EXCL: Here is the final text of the Kyle-Wilson amendment, tweaked after input from Keir Starmer.It will be tabled on MeaningfulVote3 this week and Labour will whip for it.It aims to get May's deal over the line in Parliament - but only if it is then put to a referendum.  
Labour is to back an amendment for a referendum on Theresa May’s Brexit deal this week It approved, the amendment would be binding on Parliament and would be May's deal (Remain) versus RemainLabour Leavers, you are being shafted! via @Telegraph 
The end of this message is fascinating: despite everything, Kawczynski still believes that Brexit is blazing a trail and that other countries will be keen to follow.  
I'm tellin' ya- The nexus of US election interference, Brexit, Cambridge Analytica, AggregateIQ, SCL,  GOP Data Trust, RNC, Koch, the Trump Campaign, oil industry, steel industry, and corrupt politicians runs right through WPAintel.Get Chris Wilson to sing. He knows the lyrics.  
SUNDAY TIMES; Back my Brexit or we’ll never leave, says May #tomorrowspaperstoday 
No Darren, you're the one who set a dangerous precedent by throwing £600,000 of illegal spending on illegal social media adverts targeted using illegally obtained data and ignoring the truce following the murder of #JoCox.#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#LeaveEUBrokeTheLaw #Brexit  
Won't get fooled again. #Brexit  
Last boat to #Leave Newcastle set off a fusillade of fireworksWe look forward to the fireworks in Parliament Square on 29th!MPs must honour taking back control of our laws, money & £6-8bn fishing waters!Thwarting #Brexit will stick a constitutional bomb under our democracy  
"Mum! Where's Dad gone?""He's walking to London, to show that Brexit means Brexit son""Just like the Jarrow marchers did in the 1920's?""No son. They marched to find work. Dad voted leave and fucked his job at Nissan""He's a thick cunt isn't he mum?""Yes son. Yes he is" pic.twitter.com/MThFkZssXb 
Think of the best #Brexit you can. A #Brexit that's got everything everyone who voted Leave could possibly want. It still won't be as good as the deal we have now. Leaving the EU is a monumental act of self harm. Only 1% will benefit and we know who they are, don't we!  
Tomorrow's front page: How dark money split the Tories on Brexit + a special six-page report after a week of Westminster chaos ... PLUS: Scotland are Calcutta Cup heroes   
Compiling a list of "old fuckers from entertainment who made their money and want to force Brexit on the young".Michael Caine John CleeseMorrissey The WhoRingo StarrAnyone else? 
That’s in addition to the point that @JolyonMaugham makes that, in the context of the costs not even of Brexit, but just of No Deal preps, it is a small amount in public finance terms. Grayling wasted over a 1/4 of the cost and is still in his job FFS!  
Seventy-five per cent of Conservative seats at the last election voted Leave.How will future candidates hope to win their seats if we have reneged on our promises? Brexit must be delivered on time and in full. 
What people don't realise is how real this is.Individuals who have made their life here, are choosing to go back to their country of origin because of the uncertainty of Brexit and the incompetence of the UK Govt.This has to stop, and it has to stop immediately.  
If only a fair chunk of the 10s of billions being wasted on #Brexit were spent on education and training, then people could be given real control over their lives rather than the fictional control offered by populist nationalism. #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
We dont want him  #EastSurrey @Conservatives members who want to let @SamGyimah know how they feel about his #Brexit betrayal pop down to @EastSurreyCons AGM onFriday 22nd March 2019 7:30 pm.The Wilberforce HallCaterham SchoolHarestone Valley RoadCaterham  CR3 6YA Show him 
The process of leaving the EU has exposed the venality and self-interest of the political class in this country. With a few exceptions, politicians have sought to water down the clear mandate to leave the EU or else to thwart it altogether:  #Brexit 
Even if you want Brexit to happen* you should want the UK to be represented in every way possible in the EU until the last moment as EU laws will apply in the UK during the transition period.*excluding those who wish for the obvious harm to their fellow citizens No Deal brings. 
To the tune of ‘Living Next Door To Alice’ Got a wee song for you all “For 24 months I’ve been living under the threat of Brexit ‘WHAT THE FICK IS BREXIT’ #janeygodleyvoiceover #swearing pic.twitter.com/ahLVXQjm0b 
Brexit awka United Spot the background voice  
“The Brexit vote was a clear intention of the will of the British people. 17.4 million people supported us leaving the EU, and to frustrate this wish by not enacting Brexit in an orderly, timely way risks long-term, large scale backlash societally and politically” @JacobGroet 
It's actually better to lose Brexit than May's awful half remain deal. A minimum 2yrs trapped under the control of foreign competitive entities, which sets the bar for what will be an equally awful half remain FTA. If we're lucky!Utter lunacy, from confirmed turncoats.  
Make no mistake, when the dole queues start growing post Brexit ...this fucker will be keeping his head down #MarchToLeave pic.twitter.com/F2N5Um1fqL 
I don’t have a degree and especially not one in PPE you see, so I shouldn’t be allowed to have an opinion. I’m one tier down from reality TV.This is view of those wanting to stop Brexit. They’re vile, elitist, sneering anti-democrats that can’t accept their world view has lost.  
Dear MPs, Being threatened with “no Brexit at all”, because Parliament can’t agree, is a nonsense and a hollow threat. I dare you to try and revoke A50 and thwart Brexit. France stated today, no MV3 pass for WA and it’s “no deal”. FFS hold your nerve if you want a real WTO Brexit 
My association have already refused to do anything until May is gone and the Brexit we voted for becomes reality. From public feeling on doorstep Conservatives and Labour are finished. 
Which is more democratic? A referendum where people don't get to see the deal first.A referendum where people are allowed to see the deal first.No-Brainer.So if the 2nd referendum is by definition more democratic than the first, how can *not* having it be more democratic?  
‘Just get OUT NOW!’ Brexiteer says no deal Brexit is ESSENTIAL for future of democracy   
Dear YES friends, when we next hold our #indyref2, do you think we could persuade @ByDonkeys to help to debunk the Unionist myths?They are playing a blinder with #Brexit.#ImitationBestFormofFlattery 
Polls say the country is divided regarding another referendum, but if we had one, Remain would win.@bremaininspain 
Thanks to all who came to the Daventry Conservative Association AGM last night.I think it is fair to say the vast majority were happy that I Voted AGAINST a 2nd Referendum Voted AGAINST delaying Exit Day  Voted AGAINST taking No Deal off the table 
Here's Stephen Barclay on the receiving end of a rebuke from @Dr_PhilippaW it's a pity more of these shysters weren't taken down by logic and facts...... 
Sorry I'm dutch so I don't understand why you can only vote once while everything has changed? And the parliament can vote three times while nothing has changed? #Notdemocratic #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
EU to lose £500bn and UK to gain £640bn in no-deal Brexit, economist claims  via @Telegraph 
Paterson 2015 -  "4.5-5 million jobs due to the Single Market/EEA. We can be really big players in EEA/EFTA post-Brexit"Owen Patterson 2019 - "Let's vote for a plan the EU has already rejected" 
‘The damage is done’: Disbelief in Europe at another lost Brexit week It seems that many in Europe think that the lunatics have taken over the Westminster asylum. Hard to argue. 
Facts?Always fatal when used against Brexit arguments.Why don't media use this every time Brexit liars justify Brexit in terms of fishingEU policy was to try to stop this but countries are sovereign and UK ignored itAnd who was our MEP on fisheries policy who never went?  
We're tracking the financial impact of Brexit - and it's already having an effect  
Brexit. Best so far. Can get even better  
Says it all. The crooks pushing for Brexit and the dumbass cowardly politicians crouching behind their naked ambition are the real architects of Brexit.   
The comically dismal Brexit march reminds me of this from Orwell’s The Lion and the Unicorn: “In England all the boasting and flag-wagging, the ‘Rule Britannia’ stuff, is done by small minorities.”  
PM's #BrexitBetrayal is NOT #Brexit .It is WORSE than our present EU membership.Who are you trying to kid Daniel?  
Crikey.  Look at Crispin Odey when he married Murdoch’s daughter, Prudence.Then see the money made not just by shorting the £ but buying gold.Hanbury too.No wonder he wants Brexit.Odey mentored Rees-Mogg & Somerset Capital ⁦@Byline_Media⁩ 
I support staying in the EU at the same time I support a soft Brexit. What I don’t support is a hard brexit or no deal. I am apart of a party that democratically voted on their brexit policy at conference, so I support my party in following that policy. 
Pat, I have never met a SF voter who says they should go sit on the wide open spaces of the backbenches in the British parliament. Brexit panto scenes & British disrespect on legacy has heightened that. You're just even more clueless on the north than Stephen Collins, aren't you?  
If you haven't yet realised that Brexit was the original enabler of the orgy of violent hatred that is now engulfing the world, you have a lot of waking up to do. And if you're not now fighting it, what the hell is wrong with you? 
Boles courted disaster by refusing to honour the democratic mandate of the EU Referendum ... as set out by your previous PM ... No SM or CU 
People saying they’re “bored with Brexit” show just how privileged they are.EU citizens live daily with uncertainty and anxiety. Farmers and business owners fear for the future. Factory workers risk losing jobs.Brexit isn’t a fancy political debate. It’s real life. 
That this should happen to anyone is grim, but it’s particularly offensive when you know that @catsinbelfry’s ancestors were killed for resisting the Nazis (as many Social Democrats, Socialists and Communists were). Brexit is exposing a really unpleasant underbelly.  
Corbyn was egged because some Brexit supporter didn't like him. Anning's was egged because he blamed Muslims for getting themselves killed while their bodies weren't even cold. Get some perspective.  
Any MP thinking that voting for TMs deal will be remembered as a good choice because it allegedly avoided no Brexit at all are profoundly wrongIf Brexit MPs flip, they're simply joining Team May and will be just as much associated with Brexit's betrayal as any ardent Remainer 
It looks less painful than Brexit. 
I’m hearing the DUP have driven the final nail in TMs plan. So......a series of votes coming, to try to design a Brexit that suits parliament  ....and then off to the EU to ask for a delay. #Embarrassing 
This is as much as stopping the far right as it is remaining in the EUBrexit is a Russian far right project to destroy the UK and destabilise EuropeNote that I say Europe, not just the EU, Europe as whole is threaten by the far right of which Brexit is a big part. 
I was just thinking that for those of us in Scotland, it has been a non-stop 7 years of divisive referendum campaigning (Indy), followed by vote, after effects, then more divisive campaigning (EU), vote, after effects. No wonder many are saying “Give it a rest” 
If the next referendum is on Rocket Science, my degree's worthless. So should I just listen to rocket scientists with years of expertise?Psh Nah! Remember the Challenger Shuttle? They got that wrong. I know better! Had enough of experts with acronyms like NASA getting it wrong. 
EXCLUSIVE Commemorative Brexit coins delayed amid confusion over date of departure  via @Telegraph 
More ‘sunlit uplands’ of #Brexit:‘Supermarkets are preparing to introduce rationing for online shoppers to prevent panic buying in the event of a no-deal Brexit’Basket-case; banana republic.Time to come to our senses and just #Stay 
You know something is fatally wrong with brexit when half a bus load turn up for a March the organiser didn’t turn up to - then look at a remain March and see the difference  
I’m trying to show Guy Verhofstad that all ages are fighting Brexit, not just our wonderful young Remainers. 
PM's #BrexitBetrayal keeps the UK under the control of the EU dictators for evermore, with no exit door.That is worse than our current EU membership.And you are trying to tell us it is #Brexit ???Do you think we are completely stupid?  
Brexit is dead. No one is excited by it any more, few believe it will deliver any of its promises, most of us think think it's the wrong thing for our country.Future generations will look back at the liars, cheats and charlatans who brought it with disgust. Lock them up.  
Although the prime minister wants to hold another ‘meaningful vote’ on her Brexit plan next week, it is by no means certain that she will choose to do so, says Robert Peston 
While people like @columeastwood bleat silly insults from the sidelines, having presided over the loss of their voice at Westminster, @duponline is in there making the case for Northern Ireland and influencing the outcome on Brexit.  
Death knell for Theresa May's Brexit deal as DUP and hardline Tories reject backstop changes…  #Brexit #News 
The UK needs a second Brexit referendum after no-deal exit is rejected, says Scottish lawmaker  
Northern Irish DUP edges toward backing UK PM's Brexit deal: Spectator magazine  
And for those puzzled as to why the fishing industry aren't flocking towards a party claiming to represent their interests, just listen to someone who understands their real problems who then rightly calls out the utter charlatans like the fish throwing Farage and Rees Mogg. 
Racist agitprop comments are not the “legitimate concerns of the people” or any euphemistic justification of hate speech. Anti-immigrant propaganda was rooted in vile right wing nationalism way before the referendum. It simply found a host for its parasitic maggots in Brexit. 
If brexit were stopped, some people would be seriously upset. Fortunately there’s only 68 of them and they all fit into this car park.  
The hate directed against Muslims  by the far-right and the #Brexit press serves the same role as hatred directed at immigrants & refugees of creating fear that drives people into a nationalist political tribalism that tolerates lies & abuse if they serve the tribe.#PeoplesVote 
Brexit in a single image. “DANGER: Cloud Cuckoo Land Ahead!”  
Serious question- how was David Cameron fooled into thinking these people were important and significant enough to require appeasing with a referendum on an issue that only around 2% of the country understood the complexity of? Has there ever been a greater folly? 
In his public school days Farage lead a march through Dulwich singing Hitler Youth Songs. This is who he is. No joking. This is who he is. 
The people of the UK voted for Brexit but the deep state and globalists won’t allow it.England has no Democracy.   
As satisfying as it might feel in the moment to mock leave voters (I've seen a few tweets today about the march) can we plse remember we need to keep these voters on board if we want to win the next GE, which might not be easy if we end up calling for a 2nd referendum. 
Did they promise to reimburse the £36m+ the OU has received in EU funding if Brexit goes ahead?  #LoveMK 
Disappointed with my fellow students. This is not the Brexit we voted for and we should continue to fight for the Brexit we want! 
Daltry is wrong. Touring was very different prior to joining the EU & much more bureaucratic. I am a Joint Secretay of the Variety & Light Entertainment Council & Brexit will be discussed when we meet at the Musician’s Union on Monday. Brexit means going back to the bad old days. 
There is no softer #Brexit than what is offered in the Withdrawal AgreementNot only is it not Brexit, but it actually binds us closer to the EU in several areas & removes our subsequent right to Leave without the EU’s consentAnyone who votes for it is an idiot or a traitor 
This is the damage that @darrengrimes_ is doingHe's working hand-in-had with Number 10 offering MPs a rope to climb down & support the dealDarren said earlier we're all on the same teamI'm afraid we no longer are. Darren is shilling for Government & damaging true Brexit  
My manifesto, Brexit WTO. Stop foreign aid, disaster relief only. Scrap HS2. Money saved spend on police, armed forces, pensions, social care, general infrastructure.  More quality apprenticeships instead of useless degrees.Scrap VAT, sort out all taxes, benefits. 
I am always intrigued by how #remainers call #leavers racist. When immigration after post #brexit will be much more diverse representing many more cultures as it is skills based. Also currently we get European migrants of all skills with freedom of movement currently. 
The sad little Brexit march shows what nonsense the "they'll be riots on the street if we don't get our way" rhetoric is. Most people are just desperate for it to be over with. 
“Does he or you look back on the Catalan independence process and regret the consequences?""No, I don't think that. Carrying out a referendum is not illegal so it's very hard to understand why all of them are here.”—@JordiTurull's daughter, visiting her father in a Spanish jail. 
And what @chrisinsilico revealed a year ago is how Brexit & Trump are 2 same campaigns linked by 2 same companies: Cambridge Analytica & Facebook. It's transnational money, data, crime. And boggles the mind that anyone on the left could support this... 
@BelgiuminUK you are forcing a family to tear itself apart !! This is so wrong !!! It is the politicians of the UK who are destroying ties with Brexit, not decent ordinary people who want to remain EU citizens !! Please look at this case !! Please. 
Wasn’t Jess Phillips a “voice for the working class”? Why mock working class leavers who are doing their best to stand up for their voice, which is taken away by MPs like you who think you know better than them on Brexit?!  
A real referendum doesn’t require a militia, guns or military hardware on behalf of one side - we in the SNP know these things. There’s no question that Crimea is Ukraine #CrimeaisUkraine    
This brexit shambles has been going on so long we’re in danger of running out of GIFs. 
‘Just get OUT NOW!’ Brexiteer says no deal Brexit is ESSENTIAL for future of democracy   
Please excuse a brief foray into the dark hole that is British politics. But this photo from #march2leave - a small mob of sodden, embittered xenophobes shuffling through a post-apocalyptic landscape - is THE most perfect visual depiction of #Brexit that you will ever see. pic.twitter.com/9jBHukkzjl 
And apart from anything else, the British public who voted Leave expect us to fight on. You only have to watch Question Time or speak to the passionate Leavers and they aren’t ready to quit, despite the threats and the supposed risks to a proper Brexit. 
Instead we should continue to fight the obstacles. The 2nd referendum argument is dying a death. We can see off with logic and common sense the arguments for a “soft Brexit”/Norway etc. Now is not the time to buckle to risks which are more powerful in the threat than the reality 
CCHQ could and should have intervened to protect @NickBoles - who has been tirelessly loyal and repeatedly voted for Brexit - from local extremists.  The Conservative Party’s lurch towards nasty, narrow nationalism continues.  Apres Nick, le deluge. 
BREXIT BLOCK: Lorry drivers threaten to CLOSE UK transport links if exit is delayed  
Brexit is not the Scottish government's fault. Allowing us to be Brexitted will be. 
David Moyes calls VAR "nearly as bad as Brexit"! #SWAMCI  HD11 
Sajid, your new best mate Nick only serves to undermine Brexit and democracy, whilst standing in one of the most prominent Leave constituencies in the country ?? The political gesturing is truly pathetic and has to stop, this is the sort of rhetoric that sinks ships !!  
After all the immense hard work delivering the referendum result against the odds, if Brexit is going to be stopped, blocked or watered down to the point of unrecognisability, then we should not be complicit in it. 
It's very difficult, but if Brexit fails, they'll quickly sink back into their armchairs and get angry about something else. There's nothing positive about them. Hate is hard to sustain. Take heart from the shambles of the Farage march. 
Former minister Nick Boles quits local Tory party amid Brexit rowOne Down, now Soubry needs to Go!  
Conservative lawmaker Boles quits local party over Brexit  
BREXIT CHAOS: DUP insist they are 'not discussing cash' in talks with Theresa May /#EU #Brexit #BrexitVote 
if you only do one thing this weekend to help stop Brexit, please please PLEASE write to your MP and ask them to vote down May's Brexit deal! she only needs 75 MPs to shift (which is roughly how many did shift last time) & then she's done it, it's all over.WRITE TO YOUR MP!!  
Although Theresa May wants to hold another ’meaningful vote’ on her Brexit plan next week, it is by no means certain that, when it comes to the crunch, she will choose to do so | @Peston  
I really implore Leave supporters and Brexit MPs to think through the implications of supporting this deal. I understand the motivation but I think it seriously underestimates the likelihood of ALL the benefits of Brexit being lost in a post WA-landscape, no matter who the PM is 
My MP Advice Surgeries and residents meetings this morning were dominated by Brexit. Vast majority pleased that I...  Voted AGAINST a 2nd Referendum Voted AGAINST delaying Exit Day  Voted AGAINST taking No Deal off the table 
A reminder:THINGS THERE’S MONEY FOR:Bribing the DUP (£1bn+)No Deal Brexit (£4.2bn and rising)Bribing Labour MPs (£1.6bn)Repairing Chris Grayling fuck-ups (£2.2bn and rising)THINGS THERE’S NO MONEY FOR:Feeding and educating our kids 
We need just one #Brexit candidate in each seat.  
During abortion referendum here (where pro-life side used disabled people in their propaganda) I told a woman without a disabled badge but with a "Love Both" poster in car she shouldn't be parked in a disabled space. She told me I was discriminating against her  #AbledsAreWeird 
Filled our bingo card for Lowry’s usual pathetic drivel.Knew we were on to a winner when he tried to call NI a province, then blamed Ireland for the UK’s disastrous Brexit negotiations. Called house when he tried saying the security forces weren’t knee-deep in loyalist collusion 
Theresa May appoints her latest Brexit negotiator  
The biggest proof that independentism has the majority is the length that the Spanish government went to to avoid the referendum. Also, @joethebrew proves it with numbers. 
“If they delay Brexit, you know who bloody wins, don’t you Deidre? Napoleon! That’s who! Bloody NAPOLEON wins, Deidre!”  
PENALTY MANCHESTER CITY!Havem't seen Sterling drop that quick since Brexit 
In 2016, @Sandbach said that she respected the decision of the electorate and it would be wrong for Parliament to overturn it. Now she believes that we should have a second referendum. Hypocrisy at it’s finest.  
Brexit news: How EU and Labour 'planned to MERGE England and France in new region'  
A new, troublesome topic hovered over the St. Patrick's Day parade in New York this year: Britain's failed Brexit deal with the European Union that could squeeze Ireland's economy.  
@ForBritainParty has offered to seat share with the other #Brexit parties.We are willing to work with others.  
English but so appalled by Brexit I'm cheering Scotland on. oops. 
There are just so many examples now though. Intimidation on the streets. The language of “traitor” and “Nazi” shouted (or tweeted or printed) at those who question the wisdom of Brexit. 
The #WithdrawalAgreement has been defeated twice by historic margins, for all the reasons we are all too well aware of – not least the inability to escape the horrors of the #backstop . #Brexit 
Charles Moore on Brexit. Those MPs acquiescing now to May’s awful deal will rue the day...  
This is where we’re at now. A German citizen in our country, whose grandparent fought the Nazis, being called a Nazi. This is what the Brexit elite have done with their lies. I am ashamed of what we’ve become.  
Uncomfortable truth: The more the Left retreats from #Brexit. The more the Far Right fills the void it leaves behind. The sentiment that drove it will not go away simply bc the Left refuses to understand it. 
And you shouldn't underestimate the anger of of millions of people who know that Brexit is taking away our freedom of movement, '000s of jobs and our self-respect. And it was 'won' by foul means, not fair. Unforgivable. 
Since I am apparently now in control of the Universe. I’d like to cancel Brexit, win the lottery and give everyone on Earth a fair portion of happiness. #ENGvSCO 
The public is losing patience: MPs must now vote for Theresa May’s Brexit deal - Conservative grandee and Brexiter Sir Graham Brady, who has changed his mind, makes the case in the @FinancialTimes 
Brexit news: How EU and Labour 'planned to MERGE England and France in new region' | UK | News |  
.@Telegraph cartoon#MayMustGo #Brexit #BorisJohnson #jacobreesmogg 
#Brexit making #Britain a laughing stock across the world  via @TheEconomist 
The Who singer Roger Daltrey was not impressed when Sky News asked him about Brexit.  
Scotland are level after trailing by 31 points. Swansea are leading Man City by two goals to nil. If Theresa May applies some common sense to Brexit we'll know this was all a dream. 
Good news.  Brexit is in conflict with the Good Friday Agreement - the whole of Ireland legally must vote on any change which impacts the terms of the Good Friday Agreement.  And Brexit would be such a change. 
hi all professional interviewers.... watch @anandMenon1 show how to conduct a fascinating long-form interview with @RoryStewartUK @UKandEU you'll know more about Brexit, the Brexit deal, the Conservatives at the end  
WATCH: Roy here voted leave, but today he chatted to @Bournemouth4EU & explained how, now that he learnt so much more about #brexit ramifications, he had changed his mind. For so many reasons he lists here, he is a #RemainerNow Respect to him, so many feel the same.#FinalSay 
Today in #Falmouth we met an ex-RAF helicopter pilot, now working in the aviation industry, He was unhappy that something with such major consequences as #Brexit is being pushed through without the people fully understanding.its impacts.#StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 
Remoaners say old people shouldn't have a say on Brexit because it's not their future.I say the people with the most life experience and knowledge of what's best for this country chose to leave the EU.Older people should be listened to more not less. 
A little reminder for you @JulianSmithUK - it’s yours and his constituents that get you elected, you and he fought on a manifesto to honour the referendum- he didn’t, it’s that simple - pay attention to your membership or you like him are toast. @LeaveEUOfficial @Arron_banks 
1/ Hey! @Nigel_Farage I hear your "EPIC march" from Sunderland didn't go so well today!  #MarchToLeave Meanwhile, we've been having fun down in #London SHREDDING #BREXIT! Put it in the bin - WHERE IT BELONGS!#voteleavebrokethelaw#WithdrawArticle50#BinBrexit 
BREXIT BLOCK: Lorry drivers threaten to CLOSE UK transport links if exit is delayed - Express…  #Brexit #News 
Whatever I think of this, undoubtedly true that there's a shift in mood re May's awful Deal. Just something of the desperate 'let's get it over the line' that misses whole point of #Brexit & turns it into a technical manoeuvre rather than a clear strike for sovereignty & freedom  
When people ask why I voted for #Brexit and to #Leave the #EU cleanly and decisively I simply point out that I crunched the numbers and quickly realised it was best for the #UK #economy.The more you analyse it, the clearer this becomes. 
Now, we'll find out who the true Brexiteers are & who's just thinking about their future. May's deal is nothing short of 'Remain Minus'. As Brexiteers who want a clean Brexit, we still love our country above everything, so why would we opt for this that makes us a vassal state?  
#Crimea remains positive about the peninsula’s reunification with Russia and if the referendum was held today, 89% of Crimeans would support joining Russia #Crimeanspring #Crimea5years 
For Britain agrees with the 56.3% of the Newport West voters who asked for Brexit in 2016. We are now asking you to come out again, vote for Hugh & vote For Britain and let the establishment know that your democracy will not be sold out. 
EU to lose £500bn and UK to gain £640bn in no-deal Brexit, economist claims  via @Telegraph 
I BOW before you truck drivers of great Briton that threating to block all roads and airports in or out!! You have 20 million people behind you with their carsThis corrupt government has got to realise if they block or delay Brexit!! there will be SEVERE CONSEQUENCES for them!! 
Pretty pleased with my first day organising the Brexit Betrayal march. 
The announcements Philip Hammond should make to prepare the country for a no-deal Brexit - James Heywood  
By voting for May's deal you aren't "saving Brexit" you're destroying itIf the deal passes, it's over. We've not just lost the battle we've lost the warIf it doesn't, come what may, the fight goes onAnd the fight will never end until we truly leave the EUNo surrender 
Darren, it isn't Brexit.  Do not fall into the trap.  I thought you were clever!  The WA/'deal' has no provision for unilateral withdrawal so we'd be tied to the EU forever.  You cannot support this act of treason. 
It took 11 years for the UK to negotiate joining the EEC, which was then 8 nations.Assuming we leave the EU, we have to negotiate deals with the 28 European nations, each of whom we have pissed off, plus 150 other nations.Brexit will take THE REST OF YOUR LIFE. 
Sad to see campaigners and pundits caving on Brexit, when nothing has changed.The deal still ruins our negotiating leverage.Still traps us in a permanent Customs Union.Still separates NI of from the rest of the UK.#StandUp4Brexit  
Presidential system will only take Pakistan forward if it wants to be an Asian Dragon. #Westminster democracy has even failed the #UK by fiasco of #BREXIT.Talent, expertise and skills needed for statecraft in the cabinet, not skills of constituency manipulation . 
It would cost way more than £28m to run a 2nd referendum because you don't like the result of the first one, you absolute spoon   
The bottom line is that to not deliver Brexit would see millions of voters, who voted often for the first time in decades, removed from the franchise altogether. Brexit was the only time millions have felt their vote matters. That’s why we mustn’t let them dilute Brexit further. 
#TheresaMay was never going to deliver #Brexit because she never believed in Brexit or backed it. A #remainer can’t lead Brexit & can’t lead the UK. We need a #brexiteer in power for the 1st time to lead our country into a new future. A remainer #PM will always hold us back! 
It really is time to #RevokeArticle50...Brexit has become an intractable mess. Pull the plug on it... and Brexit enthusiasts can work up a plan, in their own time, that would pass public & Parliamentary consent. Until then Parliament should get on with solving real problems. 
Brexit happened not because parties ignored “left-behind” voters, but because parties pandered to them — and failed to reduce their numbers.  A 3% increase in the education rate would have prevented Brexit. Instead, Tories de-invested in education  
Emoji Charades- Ok,- 2 words.-  - You’re going to do the whole thing-  - Sounds like-     - Duck soup ... luck food ... suck breakfast ... f*** Brexit!-  
The Tories could implement Brexit, cut immigration, slash tariffs, cut the tax burden, get the country booming & annihilate Corbyn's Labour at the next electionThey choose not to.They do not care about losing votes or alienating their grass roots. The EU is all that matters 
UK banking sector maybe not going to decamp to Paris post-Brexit after all.  
Former UKIP leader Nigel Farage spoke to Sky New at the beginning of the Brexit Betrayal march from Sunderland to London.For more, head here:  
DUP denies seeking cash in return for supporting Brexit deal  
Hugh Nicklin is bravely standing for Anne Marie Waters' For Britain Party in the Newport West by-election: April the 4th. If you are concerned about the betrayal of the Brexit vote by the establishment parties, then stand with us; together we can make history & save our country.  
More people attend Clyde v Stirling Albion than Nigel Farage's Brexit march 
Fair play to all braving the mud and the rain to march for Brexit. Ignore the sneering Remainer commentariat. By the time you reach London you will be greeted as heroes by huge numbers of Brexit voters from all over the country.   
MPs,Before you vote AGAIN just know this:A fraud-fuelled Brexit defined by a xenophobic PM and forced through with bribes, threats and cowardice will cause the kind of crushing failure we have come to expect from this national Darwin Award of a policy.Yours,A v pissed off UK. 
Whether you voted leave or remain or really don't give a rats ass - The fact that people need to march to reinforce the result of a national referendum belittles us and shames the UK ..  #MarchToLeave 
Well we know the NHS won’t be getting any of that apparent “Brexit Dividend”  
Why everyone is likely to loathe the Brexit we are most likely to get - unless Parliament and a public vote can stop it.  
Soubry in blistering attack on leaders who lit the Brexit touch paper and ran away  
Nigel Farage's March of the Misinformed arrives at a small town in the north of England...@Scientists4EU @mikegalsworthy #MarchforLeave #brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
BREXIT BLOCK: Lorry drivers threaten to CLOSE UK transport links if exit is delayed. 
Upmost respect for  @darrengrimes_  We FULLY support your decision, and we too are now advocating that MPs back Theresa May’s #WithdrawalAgreement. We cannot let Brexit slip from our grasp    
BREAKING: Mexico passes referendum to give every Mexican citizen a 20 foot pole - and Donald Trump will pay for it.  
Brexit:Withdrawal Agreement: FailTrade talks: FailSocial cohesion: FailPolitical agreement: FailWinning mass support: FailTime for a public vote to end the chaos #PeoplesVote 
We stopped Cooper/Benn from taking control of the #Brexit process by 2 votes. Their new version rules out any chance of a Brexiteer being able to put forward proposals. If we don't agree on #MV3 this week we're looking at long delay leading to #customsunion. I'll vote to leave! 
I take it back, the open top bus on a day it’s going to absolutely shit it down is in fact the most apposite Brexit metaphor I’ve seen this week pic.twitter.com/nKB4RHX83P 
I might be wrong but I’ve given it a lot of thought and I’m gonna go out on a limb here and say ‘Afterlife’ is the best thing @rickygervais has done. This might be because I am a grumpy but sentimental middle aged fool, but nah. It’s wonderful, watch it. (Plus it beats Brexit.) 
Brexit supporters keep telling MPs they must honour the will of voters so I fully expect them to agree that constituencies (and countries) that voted Remain should be allowed to stay within the EU. 
MPs must respect democracy & #Leave on 29th of March. No Deal's No Problem!Our industry won't take a 2nd sellout to a deal that makes Britain a vassal stateAll patriotic Britons must make MPs ears ring that we won’t take a betrayal of Britain or Brexit 
Also in #Falmouth today, we met this man, who told us why he voted Leave in 2016 and why he would now vote Remain.We're doing our damnedest to make sure he gets the chance to do so.#Brexit #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote #Cornwall #NHS 
"Nations that go down fighting rise up again, those that surrender tamely are finished." -Sir Winston S. Churchill #Brexit 
The Brexit bus:It's old, white, has a spare tire, is thin on top, and creates toxic emissions. 
A #Tory #parliamentary #candidate in a key #marginal, a seat the @Conservatives must win to gain a majority, has said “The #Brexit delay is going down like a shit sandwich...good areas were literally throwing my leaflet back at me” @theresa_may is destroying the PARTY! @ConHome pic.twitter.com/5RJb4gSkyI 
Brexit is a complete mess.  It was won on lies and deceit.  Those who voted to leave were conned.  Now the truth of Brexit has become apparent the British people deserve a 2nd chance to put right this wrong.    Please sign this petition and re-tweet.  
The #Brexit equivalent of raising the flag at Iwo Jima...   
Nigel Farage was made to confront his pledge to leave the country if Brexit was a disaster while standing atop a bus with the words 'Stop the Brexit betrayal' on the side  
Brexit: DUP says issues remain over deal  
I'm off for a long distance Brexit march to the fridge where I will, take Control of cheeses and fight off European produce, except for the cheese.Stronglerer Stablerer Togethererer 
#Brexit UK is now a never-ending 1970s Mike Leigh Comedy...  
Brussels is getting ready to sign up to its own worst nightmare: Five more years of Nigel Farage 
The Leader stops walking after an hour.Sits alone on a bus in the rain.Below him his disciples gather.Grey skies and howling winds.  Brain farts, gortex and umbrellas.The nation’s jaw drops.Brexit limps past like a rotting caterpillar straining to become a butterfly.  
Guess this means yet ANOTHER Urgent Parliamentary Question for Grayling next week! #BrexitShambles BBC News - Brexit ferry contracts could cost government millions more  
The core of the mess we're in. If May's deal doesn't pass, Brexiters will call it betrayal. But if May's deal does pass, Brexiters will also call it betrayal - leaving us with a Brexit that remainers don't want and Brexiters say isn't Brexit anyway.  
If Steve Bruce was in charge of Brexit the EU would be paying us £39bn to leave...#SWFC #Brexit 
The UK will need African countries after Brexit. I hope African leaders and governments will capitalise on this and make tangible demands and trade deals for the growth and development of their own countries. 
 This week at Westminster, Theresa May’s bad deal was voted down by Parliament - again.And SNP MPs held the Scottish Tories to account for refusing to vote to rule out a catastrophic No Deal Brexit, which could cost Scotland 100,000 jobs. 
No-deal Brexit preparedness notice phrasing is unbelievable!"Manufacturers who want to continue selling products in the EU"Who "want" to continue?! Let me check... Nope, they're not interested in keeping their business going. Stand down - false alarm. 
Worried we're going to lose Brexit entirely mate, it's either a softer Brexit or no Brexit at all from here. Respect you and your view enormously, but here's why I sadly reckon MPs need to swallow this shite agreement now  
People paid £50 each to go on this walk in the rain with Nigel Farage.  He’s not even there.  This is essentially #Brexit’s Fyre Fest.  
I blame Liam Ridgewell. For everything.City's collapse. Ferriby's winding up. Brexit. Austerity. Antibiotic resistant microbes. All of it. #hcafc 
Just so we're clear: The man who pushed Cameron to call the referendum in the first place just admitted he doesn't understand international law, that staying in the EU could be better than what Brexit delivers and that the country doesn't want the inevitable outcomes of Brexit.  
They can’t even bribe people without completely screwing it up. No new money for our towns, but she will find plenty of new money for the DUP. Theresa May's 'shameless' £1.6m Brexit bung for towns isn't even new money  
Defeating Brexit will not cause a far right upsurge, Brexit IS the far right upsurge. 
Daniel is making a mistake. If May's deal goes through, the Tories will own the catastrophe that follows--something called Brexit that isn't Brexit, that subjects Britain to EU rules indefinitely and leads to endless controversy. See today's Survation poll for the first fruits.  
On GPS this Sunday, @ 10am & 1pm ET on CNN, we'll discuss the New Zealand attacks, Venezuela, & Brexit w/ @SlaughterAM, @DMiliband & @ianbremmer; hear from @drsanjaygupta about his new HBO documentary, "One Nation Under Stress," ... 
It’s a win-win for folks who want to study abroad, the UK government and the British society. Rather coming late after years of calls for the cancellation of PSW visas to be reversed, now Brexit has made them bend. 
What's more important than #Brexit on 29 March? #CarryOnBlogging celebrates its 4th birthday! #CarryOn 
Next Saturday WE MARCH AGAINST BREXIT whatever means we think is best for stopping it; Revoke Article 50, @peoplesvote - my own view is that the latter will bring better closure than revocation - but I'd be very happy with revocation! indeed with anything that STOPS BREXIT. 
Put whoever got Iorfa in for 200k in charge of Brexit now 
Now, people will mock this March. Just bear in mind the people on it are as passionate about their view of Brexit as you are about yours. There’s no right and wrong, nothing so clear cut, and mocking and pile ons will be used to justify narratives. Rise don’t stoop.  
It's only took the BBC 18 weeks to report on what's happening in Paris.I'm surprised they are not blaming Brexit BBC News - Yellow vest protests: Violence returns to streets of Paris  
I just bought a flag. I am taking it with me to London on March 23rd to protest against Brexit.Will you join me there?Thousands and thousands and thousands of flags and posters carried by a million people will be something worth seeing.Let’s #StopBrexit . 
In 2016, the #UK contributed over €5.7 billion more to the #EU than they got back. Why is the EU trying to push #Brexit back as far as possible: #Brussels can’t afford to lose a cash cow @StevenErlanger 
A metaphor for Brexit. A miserable enterprise. Led by a toff. Popular support draining away. An economic wasteland in prospect.  
Nigel Farage leads supporters on 270-mile 'Brexit betrayal' march as they set off from Sunderland  
I am no longer fearful of a mass uprising if we cancel Brexit #MarchtoLeave 
Did you know?  UK police forces searched the Schengen Information System 539 MILLION times, just in 2017!!!Be a shame to lose all that intelligence with Brexit wouldn't it. 
BREAKING NEWS: Brexit postponed as torrential rain causes Great Britain to slowly float towards the French coastline. Dover expected to reach Calais before 29th March 
The MSM never mention that one of the #GiletsJaunes main demands is for a #Frexit from the EU. Macron said "No" to having a referendum because they would vote to leave. The whole of Europe will soon be rioting against the EU for destroying our democracies and taking our freedom.  
As the UK nears THREE SODDING YEARS of inclusive negotiating with itself over what a Brexit might actually look like, finally we have the definitive visualization from @RupertMyers. 
The EU Referendum was 2 Years, 8 Months & 21 Days ago. The UK is now 13 Days from #Brexit, 29 March. Under Theresa May's very bad, so-called 'deal' the Transition Period will apply until 31 December 2020, at least. This could be further extended until as late as December 2022.  
Because regardless of whether we end up with a deal or not, we're going to have to forge a relationship with the EU. We can't just ignore a market of 500 million on our doorstep.Consequence: Brexit will be sucking all the oxygen out of politics for a very VERY long time yet! 
Is this Ireland’s Brexit revenge, lying down for Wales to deny England? 
latest political poll by one of UK’s most accurate pollsters during 2017 General Election shows Jeremy Corbyn’s Labour Party have taken four-point lead over Theresa May’s Conservatives amid widespread concerns over government’s shambolic handling of Brexit  
Farage won't be completing #Brexit betrayal march – after weeks of urging supporters to take part /#Brexit #FinalSay 
Nick Boles resigns from local Conservative association over Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn: “May could destroy trust in the political system if she pays the DUP for support”. But abandoning Brexit, calling for a Customs Union and flirting with a Losers’ Vote won’t destroy trust? 
In 60 years...I have never seen such a pathetic & inadequate House of Commons as we have today.Faced with the most important decision for several decades, they have been confronted with their own shortcomings & lack of business experience on both sides of the House.#Brexit #EU 
‘Ello Miss, I wish to complain about this Brexit what I purchased not 3 years ago from this very boutique.  
Don’t wish to split hairs but #Brexit is a consequence of what @Nigel_Farage @UKIP and @Conservatives ERG MPs have done to us. These vicious unthinking morons are a symptom of Brexit and little more that the Tory ERG’s Brown Shirts in waiting. 
Have to say I enjoyed this Brexit Chronic reboot  
Since @Anna_Soubry appears to be the new darling of the FBPE/ WATON peeps, just a quick reminder that Anna voted 13 times against UK membership of the EU, and 5 times for an EU referendum.In other words #NeverTrustATory  
Process of Leaving EU has exposed self-interest of political class.Politicians sought to water down & thwart clear mandate to Leave #EUPM created confusion refusing to heed adviceTime political system was cleaned up & politicians held to account#Brexit 
We know why Leave voters want Brexit and the restoration of UK's self-governing democracy. It's their only way of controlling government. But why do Remainers  simply refuse to discuss it?   
The Queen has already led her nation to ruin. You think she cares about Brexit? 
What the @BBCNews always seems to omit from their rare reports on the #GiletsJaunes, is that 1 of their main demands is for a referendum on EU membership. The Gilets Jaunes are not just protesting against Macron, they also protesting against the EU.  
Nothing says brexit quite like a bunch of people spending money to be miserable in the rain, aimlessly wandering as everyone else laughs at them #MarchToLeave 
The DUP have twice voted against May's crappy Brexit deal.  But is it possible that another bribe, with our money, will help them to change their minds.  If it does then they're as shamelessly corrupt as she is.#BrexitMayhem #SackThePM 
I Bet If the Clash Was Still Around, I’d Know More About Brexit  
Tory MP @MarkPawsey said "the British people have had their say" and "leave does mean leave".He was re-elected by his 58% Leave constituency after promising to honour the referendum result. This week he broke that promise.Email us at info@leave.eu to have him deselected!  
This is #Brexit all over. They promised sunlit uplands with unicorns romping in open fields, what they got was a sodden bog and a bunch of disappointed miserable #Brexiters realising what was promised was just a pipe dream. 
It is clear the #Brexit promises made in 2016 can't be delivered. As Leave Means Leave set out on their march today, it was clear that @Nigel_Farage is in cuckoo land. 
The deciding factor on Brexit will be this:Will the Brexit supporting Tories put Country above Party?The ones who are flipping to support of May's deal are choosing Party, fearing a splitWhether Brexit happens hinges now on those who's patriotism transcends Party loyalty 
May's deal is designed to keep us IN the EU not get us out! If it passes it's game over for Brexit & for UK independence.Once May's trap has been sprung it's doubtful even if @Nigel_Farage was made PM we could escape!PLEASE vote it down! @NigelDoddsDUP @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
This checks out. #Brexit  
Farage's Brexit Party Now Has More MEPs Than UKIP - Euro Guido  
Finally people fight back against the corrupt, anti-democratic political elite:RT @p_hannington :: British Truck Drivers threaten to BLOCK ‘Planes, Trains & Roads’ if Brexit is delayed!   via @UnityNewsNet 
BREAKING Brexit betrayal marchers have cancelled the telephone box they’d booked as the venue for their final climactic rally in London 
Weird thing to put on the side of a bus!? #BillyNoMates#NigelFarage#Gammonballrun#MarchToLeave#Brexit  
It has to be said over and over, neoliberalism gave us Brexit and Trump, and Brexit and Trump have unleashed a carnival of reaction in the form of a resurgence of nativism, white nationalism and white supremacy. 
And finally, in the past three months when @CBCTheNational has found NO newsworthy climate story they have covered: Jussie Smollett - 3 storiesTrump-related - 52Huawei - 18Cannabis - 4Academy Awards - 6Brexit - 21Pipeline convoy - 7R Kelly charges - 1 #FixTheCBC 
Vote for @theresa_may's atrocious Withdrawal Agreement 'deal' & lose your seat come next GE Daniel.You won't lose to @UKLabour but the Populist Brexit Party!If Parliament betray the UK electorate both @UKLabour & @Conservatives will be decimated by a tide of UK voter revenge! 
Please follow @SteveHedley3 We are about to launch an important initiative #Brexit 
Rees-Mogg is a disaster capitalist. He's backing Brexit for the simple reason the EU are clamping down on tax avoidance. He's a self interest politician. He should be made to declare how much he will make. Or resign has a MP. 
Polish girl said to me today that she is going back home to Poland because of Brexit.But added that she'll come back to Scotland again when it is an independent country in the EU.She was crying. 
Which would you prefer?Gvt Brexit deal 36%vLeave w/ no deal 35%Gvt Brexit deal 34%vExtend Art 50, delay by up to 2 yrs 41%Gvt Brexit deal 30%vAlternative deal, keep in single market/customs union 45%Gvt Brexit deal 38%v2nd referendum 44%Survation March 15 
Nonsense. We were trailing the Tories after we came out for a second referendum three weeks ago. The poll you cite was carried out yesterday - after the government came out in favour of extending Article 50. Total spin.  
Instead of wasting billions in referendum to change the constitution for Raila Odinga to win election 2022, Why don't we channel the money to help the people of Turkana and Baringo county who are starving and dying because of hunger ! What are our priorities in this country? 
The British people should get the final say on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain in the EU. Agree? Add your name:  
Crewe & Nantwich was 60% #LeaveLabour MP @LauraSmithMP voted to take #NoDeal off the table.She voted to stop #Brexit.She will lose her seat at the next election.  
I think these are the same people who are threatening civil war if #Brexit gets cancelled. By the look of it, we don't have much to worry about. 
If you believe Brexit is the worst thing that could happen to this country, please march with us in London on 23rd March.March for @snb19692 & all the brave people of #SODEM who have represented US for two years, every day that Parliament sits! 
The @Conservatives must be punished at #localelections in May. The #Tories need a crushing, not only so they get the message Brits are furious they betrayed us on #Brexit but to help oust @theresa_may. Elections are the public’s  chance to make our voice heard! VOTE #BREXITPARTY! 
When are the 650 MPs in Parliament going to realise they probably outnumber the entire hardcore Leave base of the UK, and stop letting a single tail-hair wag the Brexit dog?  
END OF MAY: PM will be gone in weeks over Brexit shambles minister says - 'She’s finished'  
Here is the message Kawczynski sent - quite the journey from last month suggesting going to Warsaw to get the Polish to veto any extension “if we continue to push we may lose Brexit  
But that vote was not legally binding and an extension has to be agreed by ALL member states. Reject her deal and hold your nerve as #brexit is within touching distance 
"We'll all have to make sacrifices for Brexit but in the long term it will be better for everyone"Easy to say when your sacrifice is queuing for a bit a longer at the airport and my sacrifice is longer waiting times for treatment and not having meds #HowToPissOffDisabledPeople 
A great day campaigning in Newport! Huge support from the electorate who are tired of the same old two-party politics.  #Newportwest #Brexit #VoteUKIP 
Nigel Farage and his chums at @LeaveMnsLeave think they have all the answers to Brexit... all the solutions to that huge complex problem. But they can't even organise a walk in the countryside. They're clowns in clowns clothing #MarchforLeave 
Roughly 1.7m people have died in the UK since the EU referendum (margin of victory 1.3m). I wonder how many of them were old Leave voters.  
#NigelFarage says he will not be completing the 200-mile #Brexit Betrayal march from North East England to #Westminster despite asking supporters to join him.”@skynewsYiddish , as usual, has an apt  and beautiful word for #Farage:  #shyster#MarchToLeave 
Does my heart good to see the ERG #Brexit stance supported by the youth and multi-cultural Britain.  
Parliament leaves so many broken promises on Brexit:∙ Promised to respect our vote∙ Removed no-deal from the table∙ Delayed our exit dateTheir next move will be to push for a permanent EU Customs Union, or to force a second referendum, this delay is only the start! 
#MarchToLeave  is the best thing I've seen today. 50 odd damp and angry middle aged men tramping through areas that will shortly be harmed by Brexit while the elite that purport to despise charge them £50 each and stay in the warm. 
Really brings it home that support for #Brexit is not as 'widespread' as we are led to believe. Maybe it's time for  a #Purge of twitter #Trolls? Start with newer accounts with less than 500 followers. #NameShameBlock them if they turn out to trolls or bots.? 
In light of the  attack, here is Yaxley-Lennon  (AKA Tommy Robinson) whipping up anti-Muslim hate in a manner clearly intended to incite and legitimise violence against Muslims. #Brexit #FBPE 
Farage's Ability To Count Questioned After Claiming This Rally Attracted 500 People /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
Not even the snow & freezingconditions could stop the team canvassing today! Big thank you to the residents of Upper Achintore for speaking to us. Lots of support for @theSNP & many folk including EU nationals stating their concern about Brexit & that they’d back #indyref2 
Being members of the #EU has been the biggest political betrayal played on the British people for over 40 yrs. Heath signed us up to #EEC before we had a referendum. They've signed Treaty after Treaty taking away our Sovereignty without consulting us once. 
Russia's so-called referendum in #Crimea 5 years ago has been recognised by the international community as unlawful and invalid, however, Russia continues clearly violating international law in the illegally annexed Crimea. #CrimeaIsUkraine 
Betrayal of the Betrayal of Brexit March ...  
If there is a bleaker photo that sums up #Brexit for me, I’ve yet to see it. #MarchToLeave #brexitbourach #Indyref2 
Let’s make the Rugby more interesting today:  v If we win:1. No more Brexit 2. You have to wear Kilts for one day of the year of our choosing (Either Saint George’s day or Christmas.) If you win:1. You get the entire Invergordon riviera. #EngvSco #6Nations 
They’ll fall like dominos this coming week. Then they’ll spend two years bitching that this isn’t proper Brexit, and we need to get out of the WA.MPs: if you vote for it, you own it. It’s really that simple.  
Could fake news articles which got shared on Facebook have swung Brexit and the US election in Putin's favour? Almost certainly! But could almost two decades of vehemently Islamophobic press coverage have contributed to real life violence? Well, steady on, that's quite a leap 
I think the best way forward is for the deal to pass with the Kyle amendment. Long extension and a confirmatory referendum so the people can decide. The deal will solve not Brexit, there will be years of litigation and wrangling. 
Nigel Farage leads march over Brexit betrayal  
Tory Remoaner @SamGyimah hailed the referendum result as a "momentous decision" and said "the majority view must hold".This week he voted AGAINST a clean exit on March 29, allowing Remainers to further dilute and delay Brexit.Email us at info@leave.eu to have him deselected!  
#Brexit is a rebellion. A peaceful rebellion against those who wish to impose their ideology  without accountability . Non violent action to begin #TakeBackControl #LetsGoWTO 
Thought-provoking piece by @CarolineGruyter: even if Brexit were reversed, what kind of EU member would UK be? via @nrc 
OK Brexiteers, this has gained so much traction, we're now covering almost all of England. Our associate groups are well advanced in plans to show this government they cannot/must not betray Brexit. Your thoughts folks? See below   
Letter in GuardianHaving been defeated twice by thumping majorities, Mrs May now seeks to bring her identical Brexit proposal back for a third roll of the dice. Yet if we the people ask for a second referendum it is a “betrayal”. Why the double standard?Richard DawkinsOxford 
@ForBritainParty has offered to share seats with other #Brexit parties.The ball is now in their court.  
I'd like to see a profile of people on the march. Are there any NHS consultants, scientists, engineers, barristers for instance? Anyone, infact that could help keep us all alive & run the country after their disastrous Brexit or worse, No Deal Brexit. 
Calling some of our MPs stupid over their handling of Brexit is an insult to stupid people. 
The #MarchToLeave is a sorry sight. Join the movement across the country demanding better than this Brexit mess. Demand a People's Vote with us on March 23rd  
Until the supporters of democracy grasp that the kleptofascists are not engaged in democracy, but in hybrid war against democracy, we will repeatedly lose against them. They will run rings around the normal democratic & legal defences. This is war, not politics.#Brexit #FBPE 
With just days to go before the next 'meaningful vote' in parliament, 200 Brexit-supporters have begun a march from Sunderland to London. #MarchToLeave 
Seems you can ignore your own government's policy, vote against government motions, split the cabinet and even in this remarkable case be serially incompetent and still be part of the Tory cabinet. #Brexit #BrexitShambles #Art50 #FailingGrayling #Graylingatitagain #ferrygate 
In 1936, 200 men, 1 woman & a dog marched from Jarrow (Near Newcastle) to London demanding jobs & prosperity from a polical class that neglected the North.Today Nigel Farage led a bit of #MarchToLeave but does he care if Brexit makes the North poorer? 
Ignore the nay-sayers – here’s why we’re still on course for a clean Brexit on 29th March - @CJCHowarth 
Ha !So Nick Boles has resigned from his local Conservative Association. Apparently because his members don't like his position on Brexit, and were looking to deselect him.Remains a Tory MP though. 
A witness against Putin's friend Berlusconi dies after a month in agony. We need to ask whether Russian poisonings are intended to intimidate European politicians, including our MPs, and whether such intimidation is proving effective? #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
John Bercow should block a third vote on Theresa May’s Brexit deal  #RevokeRemainRebuild #MarchtoRemain #PeoplesVoteMarch #PutItToThePeopleMarch #FBPE #SODEM 
Of all the pitifully sad photos of Nigel Farage’s collapsing “protest march” this has to be the most pitiful, and most poignant.A bedraggled dozen of brexit protestors look hopefully up to an empty #brexit bus at Farage...who couldn’t give a toss.  
Trump is unraveling the post WW2 western alliance.The EU is trying to outlive Brexit and far right threats.Russia and China seem focused on an Euro-Asian alternative.Does Africa have a strategy to benefit from these ongoing historic changes? Does Nigeria? 
NHS in crisis Schools in crisis Brexit in crisis Housing in crisis Rough sleeping in crisis Prisons in crisis Social Care in crisis Police in crisis Crime in crisis Cabinet Ministers in crisis Theresa May in crisis The Tory Government in crisis “But Corbyn”... 
The only time you see a large gathering of Brexit Supporters is in a @bbcquestiontime audience 
Registering a full 6 on the Grayling Scale with an escalation warning notice. Brexit delay could cost millions in extra payments to ferry firms  
NEWS! Nigel Farage’s Brexit march proves nation cares more about Brackley Town vs Curzon Ashton than Brexit  
The ‘ridiculousness’ that needs to stop is Remainers behaving like spoiled children, unable to accept the country voted to Leave. The referendum was a national consultation, not a constituency matter. Kate is standing up for 17.4 million people. #StandUp4Brexit 
It will be easier for a future Brexit PM to escape the EU by re-invoking A50 than it will be to escape the WA / backstop trap. It is designed as a one-way ticket to faux-Brexit purgatory, where the only way out is rejoining EU - minus all opt-outs. 
This is #brexit !- 100 people pay £50 each to march with Farage- Farage tells them he's not marching to London- Farage pockets £5,000 Farage is a con artistBrexit is a massive con jobLeavers really are stupid if they think otherwise#StopBrexit 
pretty awful. but not that different from your run-of-the-mill SJW jumping on Twitter when the bodies are still warm, leveraging the tragedy to re-litigate some stale-dated argument about Jordan Peterson or Brexit or whatever. jeet heer and goldsbie have made careers out of this  
John Bercow should block a third vote on Theresa May’s Brexit deal - : John Bercow…  #Brexit #News 
The reality of the US style ‘health insurance’ system many Tories want to impose on the UK post Brexit.This is the reality of May’s deal. The reality of Brexit. I really Hope colleagues contemplating support for #MV3 think long and hard this week about the implications #FinalSay 
UK must take part in EU elections if Brexit delayed: Austrian negotiator  
Better to bury the rotten corpse of Brexit than the bright future of our children and our country. 
If May's treaty is agreed, we have surrendered. NI is annexed to EU customs territory. All leverage gone. A binding international treaty that can't be broken. It'll be impossible to fix later- a future Brexit PM can reinvoke A50, but cant undo this surrender treaty. 
One thing we know for certain about Brexit...Mrs May's catastrophic tenure of Downing Street has killed the grassroots Tory Party stone dead. When your party 'leader' views you as the enemy within, there's no future for it. 
Yes we will 17. 4 million voted leave the EU. Nearly all politicians doing everything they can to stop Brexit. From Theresa May waving the white flag  to EU. To Jeremy Corbyn hates EU all his life, pretending he loves EU now. And old duffer dinosaur  Vince Cable FFS.   
Siri, please give me a picture which sums up not only brexit but also the UK after #brexit.  
This would be good ..."Scotland’s Parliament to vote to approve The Constitution and Corpus of Law, prior to the UK Brexit deadline of 29th March 2019."  via @wordpressdotcom 
So after a few weeks, how's @BitchesvBrexit doing against @Ladies4LeaveSo as you can clearly see, Bitches Against Brexit have the clear lead of over 9k followers, plus all the dog pictures are well cute . #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote pic.twitter.com/V7qKOpFXo1 
A delayed Brexit will be a disaster for the EU. It's time to just leave on March 29th. 
As some Brexiteers look set to be blackmailed into supporting Theresa May's disastrous deal, well done to @OwenPaterson for confirming he is NOT for turning as May's deal "simply is not Brexit."  Support us at  
Exactly. That is why May is so keen on this deal. It is not Brexit and even if we do leave in name, the deal keeps us so locked in that she (or her successor) and her masters in Berlin and Brussels will be able to get us back in rapidly and completely. Dominated, humiliated.  
I must have missed thee German referendum to leave the EU  
The wonderful calm face of Brexit.  
My belief in an independent Scotland has never once wavered since voting Yes in 2014.  However I am worried that unionists will use this #Brexit catastrofuck to scare people into voting No.  Food shortages, border delays, medicine stockpiling etc. #indyref2 #DirtyGames 
BREXIT IS ILLEGAL, INSANE AND IMPOSSIBLE.Let's make Saturday March 23rd.. THE WILL OF THE PEOPLE MARCH! 
Russia’s so-called “referendum” at the barrel of a gun in #Crimea five years ago was a farce rightfully condemned by the international community. #CrimeaisUkraine 
Remain protesters confront people on Farage's Brexit 'betrayal' march  
Have never hidden my views on the EU. The referendum was a  UK vote not a constituency vote  
Trending News; Scottish Independence ReferendumTheresa May says Scotland will not be granted a new independence referendum as 'no means no'.Democracy is based on freedom to change course!Why does no not mean no after her Brexit deal has been defeated twice?  
There you have it... the real ‘sunlit uplands’ of Brexit.Could it possibly look any shittier?  
Oh the irony #brexit  
Get off the high horse. They voted for her in 2017, a year after the referendum, when she reflected the views of the Labour manifesto. In huge numbers. Don't preach to her. Unlike the Independent group, she didn't stand on a manifesto to get elected and then renage on it. 
Listen to me talking to @jongaunt on radio @SputnikInt about the Brexit betrayal, spiralling violent crime in London and the black cab trade.  
Dear Brexiters,When will you wake up to the fact that your leaders have been using you? Using you to push through a Brexit that's damaging to you and our country in order to enrich themselves with offshore investments.When are you going to get angry with them?Regards,Tom  
Also, regardless of your view on Brexit @NickBoles leaving the Conservative party would be a loss that is unnecessary and should be avoided 
I still don't understand how the Brexit Secretary Steven Barclay told everyone to vote one way, and then voted the opposite way himself. This is the surely the most bizarre incident in British politics since John Stonehouse faked his own death in 1974 
The various Leave rallies and today's March for Brexit encapsulate Brexit in a nutshell. They gather a few hundred peope, Remain fielded 700,000 at their peaceful protest, but the media presents both sides as still having equally strong support among the public at large. 
How Leavers thought brexit would work  
The Kipper March for a disastrous Brexit. ‘What do we want’? “Nigel to join us”. ‘When do we want him’? “When he’s finished attending to his investments and pension funds”......  
Doesn’t turn up for debates or votes in the European Parliament, doesn’t do his own march either:  Farage will NOT complete his OWN Brexit march despite urging his supporters to join him  
Tories nationalized their private civil war (over EU): now Tories are UKIP, and UKIP are the National Front. Meanwhile, UK Gov bribes MPs to pass a criminally fraudulent #Brexit that benefits disaster capitalists, US Big Biz, far-right theocrats, & the Kremlin. 
Arch-euroskeptic Farage leads march over Brexit betrayal  
Brilliant film from @CarolineLucas as part of her much needed @DearLeavers campaign.Our democracy is broken, Brexit is not the answer. Let’s call off Brexit and then fix Britain #FinalSay 
Now why would Donald Tusk want a long delay to Brexit?   
What has been some very dark months for UK politicians, the @duponline look like they are going to make it even blacker. After twice voting against @theresa_may Brexit shambles. It looks like another shake of the money tree has helped them change their minds. UK politics for sale  
The Tories have made an absolute mess out of Brexit, putting the interests of their party over the country. Britain deserves better. @joswinson at #LDConf 
Today, the Consulate organised an information meeting about #Brexit for the French community in the UK. Maintaining the rights of  citizens in the UK and  citizens in France is a priority of the French government.#EUCitizens 
We’re hearing that people are absolutely furious on the doorsteps today.“I’ve not heard it this bad since the ‘90s”People want clean Brexit to be delivered on 29th March. If it isn’t, they’re telling us they won’t vote Conservative again.#StandUp4Brexit #NoChangeNoChance 
Never realised how much the Leave means leave/Brexit bus looks like a Tesco value option. @Tesco #Brexitmarch 
I disagree @DKShrewsbury. This isn't anything like Brexit. It's worse than Remain. We should be going all out for the legal default - WTO. And you should be getting your Polish counterparts onboard to veto any extension. "Better to die on your feet, than live on your knees!"  
Jeremy Corbyn’s Labour take stunning four-point over Tories amid Theresa May’s Brexit chaos  
Slikts joks:  How much empty space the EU will have after brexit, aprox: 1GB 
Why, MPs, do you think you only have a choice between the May-Merkel Berlin Surrender (Remain) (WA) and No Brexit (Remain)? Do you really think you can thwart Brexit without ANY consequences? Do either of the above and you will have 20 million furious Brits.  Reap the whirlwind. 
UK must take part in EU elections if Brexit delayed - Austrian negotiator  
Breaking: International students will be allowed to stay in the UK for longer after their degree ends in a bid to boost the post-Brexit economy by £35 billion, the British Government has announced. 
“Kamala, do you have a position on Brexit?” “No. I don’t.”Headline: Democratic Presidential Candidate Kamala Harris Severely Lacking On Foreign Policy 
I wonder if the Queen of Delusion , @theresa_may has noticed that the 'massive' march of 350 people supporting Brexit is nothing like the 700,000 PRO EU marchers last year..? Let us make the PRO EU march on March 23rd so big that even she and @RobBurl can't possibly ignore it! 
We are marching for #OpenBorders from France, through Germany, to Schengen in Luxembourg. In the spirit of #Schengen and in the midst of the #Brexit tensions, this march is particularly symbolic: we are ready to fight for what we believe in and to tear down borders!  
Hilariously & unsurprisingly, Nigel Farage's Gammonball Run is a damp squib. More protestors & press than marchers. Only hardcore Brexiters can put aside all the evidence of damage that Brexit will cause and defiantly demand to impoverish the country! #GammonballRun #MarchToLeave pic.twitter.com/9nd1qcUPuj 
Reminds me on #PeoplesVoteMarch Oct.,23rd in London with 700,000 people & 1024 at the “Leave means Leave March“ with Nigel Farage @guardian.I really like the video of @brexit_sham when Farage was performing in front of shoppers. Similiar scene @montypython 
The other day the fishermen of the North East made sure Leave Means Lies got the message that they weren't falling for their lies over caring for their jobs, but today is a new low; a farcical turnout after chief liar Farage promised tens of thousands of supporters..#MarchToLeave 
Gina Miller: Can Nigel Farage marchers tell us the benefits of Brexit ahead of Meaningful Vote? @yorkshirepost 
If there's a better metaphor for Brexit, I can't find it. #MarchToLeave 
Anyone who still trusts Corbyn to oppose #Brexit or support #PeoplesVote is going to be bitterly disappointed. Again. 
Dear @Nigel_Farage in 2016 you said a 52:48 result was unfinished business. We agree. Today you say your #MarchforLeave is about democracy. So let's be democratic and finish the businerss with a #PeoplesVote to see how many want to #Brexit or #StopBrexit in 2019. #HeartsNotHate 
Better make that #PeoplesVoteMarch a tad more than that thenWhat was it last time? 3/4 million?Of course we could save everyone getting wet & just#RevokeA50Stop #Brexit#Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal & use all the time & £billions saved 2 #Reform 
Many thanks North Shropshire @Conservatives AGM for unanimously endorsing the Executive’s motion that it “continues to support the stance taken by their MP in relation to Brexit in asking for the Conservative Manifesto commitments to be delivered.”  
An open-topped bus in the rain is as good a visual metaphor for Brexit as any; Nigel Farage sitting alone in it is better yet  #MarchToLeave 
If Article 50 is extended (likely) & the UK stands in EU elections (likely) I'm considering running as an MEP in the East Midlands (I live on the East coast) on a Pro Brexit platform.If there's EU elections in the EU, who will you vote for?#EUelections2019 #BrexitMayhem 
I would like to thank the President of Shrewsbury Conservative Association for his support in difficult decision to vote for Withdrawal Agreement on third attempt having voted against on first two occasions. #Brexit  
Tories are corrupt to the core.#brexitbribe #CashForBrexit #BlockMayDeal #MV3 #NeverTrustaTory #Marr #r4today #PoliticsLive #BrexitVote #brexit #DUP #WithdrawalAgreement #NoDealBrexit #GTTO #SocialistSunday 
Many people realising UK is sliding into chaos and questioning why? Deliberate @Conservatives policy as revealed by @NickBoles MP. The #Brexit shambles is no accident but an orchestrated part of this plan to destroy UK from the inside to protect the EU Project. Treason is afoot.  
Is the U.K. the next location of yellow vest protests?  May and MPs are unraveling the voice of the people on the world stage. Interesting there are no Top Stories on the #BBC site this morning that I can see regarding the #BRExit betrayal.   
The #MarchToLeave is unwittingly allowing for images to be captured that sum up how depressing Brexit is more perfectly than anything we've seen yet.  
NOBODY CARES ABOUT BREXIT, it's just boring and worrying now, the will of the British people is to cancel it and pretend all this never happened.  
I want May to go, but no. The WA has to go too. Bring in a new negotiating team; One that knows what it’s doing; will stand up for Britain and Brexit, and isn’t an undercover Remain saboteur outfit.  
Coveney: “I spend at least two-thirds of my time on Brexit... I should be doing other things. We as a small country are spending hundreds of millions of taxpayers’ money investing in contingency plans for a no-deal Brexit which we don’t think will happen” 
The ERG will fight for Brexit through thick and thin (pictured)  
This pitiful #MarchToLeave crowd, taken at time when Brexit is in greatest peril, proves why #peoplesvote needed. I’ve been on many anti-Brexit demos across UK orlast 2.5yrs & all drew far larger crowds despite seeming futility of it at time but knowing cause was worth it   
'We're going to London to stop the Brexit betrayal'Chaos ensues as Nigel Farage and a group of supports set off on their 270-mile march to Parliament  
If @theresa_may succeeds in her plan to run down the clock, and we are days from crashing out of the #EU, the #LibDems will reach for the nuclear football.We will revoke #Article50 and pull the plug on #Brexit.#LDConf 
What you need to complete the Brexit analogy is this man saying afterward, “This is exactly what I intended to do.” 
Being in a total daze, for some reason I really needed to take stock of all the things which have changed or we’ve learnt about Brexit and British politics after this incredible week. I came up with 17 (minimum).   
Ok guys. @NE4EU were physically assaulted by Farage Thugs Sunderland today at #MarchToLeave We cannot let these Leave Thugs get their far right Brexit. Please sign & RT @nickreeves9876 @EUflagmafia @mikegalsworthy @Femi_Sorry 
The #Brexit debate is not about "facts" it's about identity & emotion.There's no reasoning with the unreasonable #YellowVests... We must simply stand up and challenge them - And implore others to see sense & join our campaign. #StopBrexit  
The #LibDems won't succumb to any of the #Brexit bribes being sought and offered to a small number of Labour MPs.We will not sell out our constituents', their children's and grandchildren's rights for a few shiny baubles.#LDConf 
“The last few days have been like watching the Cuban missile crisis re-enacted by the Teletubbies” - as far as I’m concerned, @MarinaHyde’s writing is the only Brexit dividend.  
“It’s so clear now that parliament is conspiring against the people. MPs are doing everything within their power to frustrate the largest democratic vote in UK history: the vote for Brexit. Our representatives no longer represent us.”Brendan O’Neill on @Dunphy_Official pod 
Nigel Farage will not go on his own march. The ultimate "Brexit Betrayal."  
Heartbreaking to see UK being torn apart by #Brexit. Levels of bile, vitriol and hatred continue to rise. As someone who has seen the incredible benefits of working closely with our EU neighbours in cancer care, this is all tragic for our society. 
So sad to see the consequences of the divisions over Brexit. My old friend @NickBoles is a v decent man & full of integrity. I desperately hope we can come back together as a party, heal the wounds and work to build a united future for our country 
The whole Atkinson thing (his brother being racist and Rowan himself defending Johnson a while back) makes Blackadder and Not The Nine O' Clock feel so distant.Why is Brexit the story of so many established figures who were once open minded turning racist? 
#Brexit what a balls up, what a car crash, what an embarrassment.The ref. was a cheap political fix, a clever Cameron wheeze, that has brought the country to its knees.And its advocates are responsible for this national humiliation.#LDconf #ExitFromBrexit 
If you're politicising yesterday's attacks, you're filth.Maajid Nawaz, Suzanne Evans etc. weren't responsible. The terrorists that actually carried it out were the ones "with blood on their hands", not UK Brexit commentators. Terrorism isn't something for you to point-score with 
The cost of this government's incompetence rises. The public deserves the choice to end Brexit.  
Turns out they didn’t want people to attend at all if you believe Brexit rentagob @IsabelOakeshott.So they must be delighted that hardly anyone turned out. 
And they said #IndyRef was divisive? I was only 15, but with my parents I canvassed, posted leaflets, went to about 8 rallies and I NEVER seen hate like this. From EITHER side. #Brexit  
Jacob Rees-Mogg wants Tory MPs to listen to Tory members, but he absolutely opposes MPs listening to the people. #Brexit is hypocrisy riding roughshod over democracy. #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
The Brexit deal provides no clarity and no closure. For our generation, and the next, we're demanding Parliament #PutItToThePeople. Next Saturday, hundreds of thousands march on Parliament, demanding a #PeoplesVote. JOIN US: 
Eurosceptic MPs should hold their nerve as anti-Brexit colleagues dig their own electoral graves  via @BrexitCentral 
PATHETIC: Only 200 people have shown up for Nigel Farage's very wet Brexit march /#EU #Brexit #BrexitVote #FinalSay 
I still won't back Mrs May's deal – because it's not Brexit, says @OwenPaterson 
In this just-published further Opinion on the PM’s #Brexit deal, we take a dim view of new legal arguments attributed to the Attorney General.  
“ Time to put Brexit back to the people “ ? - vote no to stay in EU- Scottish voices silenced on Brexit - trident being renewed - another 2 governments we didn’t vote for It’s time to put Scottish independence back to the people! That should be our priority. 
Scenes in Sunderland as the Brexit Betrayal March turns into a damp squib:  
 This week at the Scottish Parliament, the SNP Scottish Government committed £85m to the Borderlands Growth Deal. Plus, more on how we're working to protect Scotland's higher education sector from the Tories' damaging Brexit. 
There is a statue of this man in Westminster abbey.  I wonder how the brexit voters would like that. He stood up against evil.  
Chris 'Failing' Grayling has failed again, this time to anticipate the possibility of Brexit being delayed, leaving us with potential extra costs of £28M to hang onto the no-del ferries contracts. Should they end up being cancelled, that'll incur a charge of £56.6M. Sack him!  
Inevitable Jessica; inevitable when they're simply parroting what MPs, who should know better, say in parliament; the difference is of course this gentleman doesn't know the truth whilst Redwood knows this is a lie but has a sly and sneaky ulterior motive to deliver. 
It's over. Give it up. Brexit is dead. Prosecutions coming soon. 
Are these the same people who are going to start the civil war of Brexit doesn't happen? I think it might be possible to contain the violence. :-) 
Amid the chaos of Brexit negotiations, we must not forget just how badly this Tory government has let down the people of our country.Here’s our Party Chair, @IanLaveryMP, with a timely reminder. 
This must rank as one of the saddest photos I have ever seen. @Nigel_Farage #MarchtoLeave #Brexit #GammonBallRun 
This is the reality of Brexit and is another reason why the people should have the #FinalSay on the Prime Minister’s deal. @NeilFosterGMB @GMB_union @Tim_Roache 
You are marching so Jacob Rees - Mogg can increase his already £7 million investment earned from Brexit; so that Farage’s children can have German passports, so Dyson can move to Singapore, so that peace in Ireland is threatened. That is what you are marching for.  #MarchToLeave 
"We seem to think workers' rights are dependent on the EU, they're not" @DrGerardLyons talks to @georgegalloway on @RT_sputnik  about why Brits should be positive about #Brexit.  
#MarchToLeave is the perfect representation of Brexit. Backed only in words by its orchestrators, ill-advised by expert long-distance walkers and a faux grass roots event funded by millionaires 
ONE WEEK TO GO! Next Saturday, 23 March, 12pm, London. #PutItToThePeople. Demand a final say on #Brexit. For women, for everyone. #StillMarching 
Brexit is 13 days away. #brexit 
We the people are being humiliated thanks to our elected representatives.They think it’s easy to reject Brexit but we need to send them message that we will not tolerate betrayal.Italy and other leaders are against EU and so possibly could Veto.RT & LIKE if you AGREE!!!!!!!  
Busted the manifesto , rejected 17.4m referendum  votes & ran away before being deselected. Yep reeks of honour ...@NickBoles 
Nothing says Brexit like a bunch of old white people rushing headlong into something they've done no preparation for, have hugely underestimated and will make them utterly miserable. #BrexitBetrayalMarch 
Dear World,The UK did NOT vote for a no-deal Brexit in our EU referendum. In fact, the phrase was not even in use at the time.Pretending it did is the real affront to democracy.  
Theresa May can get a vote on her deal 3 or even 4 times, the British people are not allowed a 2nd vote. #Brexit is hypocrisy riding roughshod over democracy. #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
“Many pundits have seized on the ‘prejudice’ angle (to explain Brexit), but that’s not what makes the UK different"The key message is that there are other things..that have made UK folk want more autonomy from the EU" Prof Mariah Evans#StandUp4Brexit 
Brexiteers unite to warn May '#Brexit fightback' ON after #MarchToLeave kicks off in Sunderland 
Brexit accounts for nearly 70% of the investment slowdown in the U.K.  via @bopinion 
Yes! @theresa_may is attempting to BUY VOTES for her crummy deal. It is CORRUPTION! It is CORRUPTION! It is CORRUPTION! #Brexit #meaningfulvote #meaningfulvotefilms #MV3 #BrexitMayhem @10DowningStreet @UKParliament @HoC_Speaker_MP 
The #GammonballRun is probably having the opposite effect to that intended. The pathetic turnout must have a few wavering Remainer MPs starting to think that cancelling Brexit wouldn't be so risky after all. 
Brexit Betrayal March gets off to an unfortunate start  
Cool heads and wise counsel would say just as Jez’s rallies don’t indicate his actual public support so the Brexit March being poorly attended isn’t something that tells us too much but oh Christ it’s funny 
Just impose an extension long enough for a #PeoplesVote & EU elections if you want to help us. Don't give a short one. Stop this unconstitutional debased #Brexit that a majority of the People DO NOT WANT.#RevokeA50 #Remain 
When a Sky reporter asked Rock legend Roger Daltery a loaded question about Brexit, it didn’t end well......Brilliant stuff!  
If the pro Brexit people had wanted a march they should have asked the DUP. What they don't know about marching isn't worth knowing. 
They now need a Brexit Betrayal march Betrayal march 
Thanks Amber for the Travel news. But, getting back to Brexit: What the fuck is going on eh?  
Happy St Patrick’s weekend to all and fraternal greetings to Brexitologists esp colleagues @colmomongain @mitchefi & Tommie Gorman in the week that was in it. Heartfelt thanks to all for the feedback on the Brexit Republic Podcast and the weekly blog. Now rest (or #walesvireland) 
The Big Lie of Brexit award goes this week to:@IsabelOakeshott Cognitive Dissonance in action. 
Absolutely right. We need to attract the best and the brightest as @JoJohnsonUK says. And Brexit certainly doesn’t help our image as brainy Britain.  
Tom Brake pulls no punches on Conservative Brexiters at Lib Dem Conference. #LDconfIf you're sick of the national embarrassment that is Brexit, join our fight for a People's Vote  
Brexit chaos is what happens when English public school boys, nostalgic for Empire, dream up a scheme for the resurrection of British glory based on foisting every little-England frustration on their neighbors across the Channel who started or lost the war  
1. If Philip Hammond's presence at the talks with the DUP is an indication that the Tories are offering the DUP another bung In return for their support for May's Brexit Deal, I am warning the PM that she is in danger of destroying all confidence in our political system. 
So there are around the same number marching for Scottish independence in Berlin, Germany today as Farage has mustered for his Brexit march in England...  
Dear ALL MPs, it is time to point out that by constituency 2/3ds voted to Leave the EU. The big change Brexit has wrought is that our primary identity is now Leaver or Remainer, NOT Con, Lab,Lib. So, think on, before you sign your own electoral death wish and vote WA (Remain).  
Today marks the fifth anniversary of #Russia holding an illegitimate, fabricated “referendum” in #Ukraine in a futile attempt to legitimize its purported annexation of  territory. The U.S. calls on  to respect international law and end its occupation of #Crimea. 
Lazy, insincere scumbag Nigel Farage, encouraged people to participate in a 200 mile Brexit Betrayal March, yet wont do it himself  
Grimes has been radicalised and moulded into a right wing hate preacher by very rich and powerful, white middle aged men. They need confronting. He needs help. 
Interesting way to see it. @PaulinaAstrozaS #Brexit  
13 days to Brexit.Good job all that work by David Davis and Liam Fox in the negotiations to ensure we have the easiest deal in history has paid off and everything was resolved over the last two years following that argument of the summer. Otherwise we’d be fucked right now. 
Meet Rodney Atkinson, Rowan Atkinson's brother.Here he is, calling a German EU citizen a Nazi.In the middle of a UK city. This is the face of Brexit whether you like it or not. If you support Brexit you don't get to absolve yourself from this.  
The mismatch between the ideal of 100,000 jolly patriots marching through verdant English countryside and the reality of a few hundred old men stomping miserably through mud is a really on point Brexit metaphor.  
Brexit spec bin spotted.  
Chris Grayling, the headline act of this week long festival of Tory chaos has arrived.The National Audit Office has revealed that the Brexit ferry contracts could cost us £millions more as the cancellation of all 3 contracts would incite a charge of £56.6m.  
Things which are a problem:Right-wing terrorPolitical extremismHybrid WarfareDisinfo BrexitTrumpPutinLack of Preparedness Cyber AttacksDark MoneyAntiquated regulationBig dataWeaponised social mediaOnline radicalisationCorruptionThings which are not:Most of us. 
Given that the #PeoplesVote was dead and buried in parliament this week with only 85 or 650 MPs supporting it - where should remaining efforts go in next 13/12 days? Revoke A50 to end #Brexit now? ... orExtend A50 to give Mrs May more time? 
DISTURBING: Labour take 4-point lead in Survation election poll. A Brexit betrayal could mean Prime Minister Corbyn. Must not happen!  
The Brexit protest vote in the local elections for the three main Parties is expected to entirely wipe out their Councillors.  
#NotTheOnionBrexit supporter laments that he can't join Farage on his #EpicProtestMarch because he *LIVES IN SPAIN* 
Corbyn will come out clearly and unconditionally in favour of a second referendum the second after Brexit is cancelled.  
This is what a politics based on lies looks like. My latest Brexit Blog post, trying to make sense of the week's events and where we are now:  
The pro-EU MP Nick Boles has resigned from his local Conservative party saying a "division has opened up" between him and his members over Brexit.#Brexit 
WTO like the rest of the world.... Right there is why Brexit should just be stopped without a second referendum 
Eurosceptic MPs should hold their nerve as anti-Brexit colleagues dig their own electoral graves - @tomcolsy99_ 
‘Will the last man involved in Brexit who doesn’t think it’s all somehow about their penis, someone else’s penis, or the collective penis, please stand up?’Just brilliant.   
Is there any clearer expression of Brexit? The Brexit elite call for it to happen, get the ball rolling and then piss off leaving ordinary people to deal with the shitty conditions and unpleasant consequences. pic.twitter.com/GPPzz4CRKJ 
There are and only ever have been two Brexit options:Leave with May's dealLeave with no dealWe know May's deal is a Trojan donkey. It is a Remain++ turd with a label on it reading "Brexit".Anyone not fighting for no deal, anyone who backs May's deal, is working for Remain 
Is March leaving? Will there just be 11 months after Brexit? They didn't tell us that!!!  
The further you look towards the far-right the more you see lies, chicanery, cheating and crime. IDS lied on his CV.  #PeoplesVote #FBPE #Brexit 
Here's People's Hero & lithe legend @Nigel_Farage commencing the March for Brexit, as foretold by me 2 weeks ago!  
& @JuliaHB1 - she's been saying some awful stuff recently when she's not on skiing holidays making up lies about Brexit & border controls!  Plus @BorisJohnson not great on this. 
Very narrow range of commentators on R4 Week In Westminster, even by its usual standards. Three outright anti-Brexit journalists and one supporter of Mrs May. BBC still struggling to put pro-Brexit commentators on air. 
More loud #applause for @heidiallen75 switching to @TheIndGroup. "Having the courage of her convictions". 150 in audience. Remarkably not one dissenting voice yet. #Brexit #conservatives 
Great to join our Norwegian sister party @Hoyre at their party conference this weekend. #HLM19As we deliver Brexit it is more important than ever that we maintain and build on our international friendships. We’re leaving the EU, we’re not leaving Europe.  
Nick Boles: Tory MP quits local party over Brexit  
Nick Boles quits his Conservative association after clashing over Brexit and facing deselection.The association's chair said he has never before received "so many emails, letters [..] from angry Conservative voters who feel utterly betrayed by their MP." 
.@HicksPolitics and Carl Benjamin (Sargon of Akkad) discuss Brexit betrayal, Article 50 extension, the prospect of European Parliament elections and the EU nationalism of @guyverhofstadt#MarchToLeave#BrexitBetrayalWATCH: 
that’s actually Oxford Circus, two weeks after Brexit 
Andrew Neil SKEWERS Remainer Dominic Grieve – 'You're RIGGING second referendum'  #Brexit  
However long Brexit is delayed, the political class cannot delay its own day of reckoning forever. The naked contempt politicians have shown for voters will not go unrewarded, writes Mick Hume. 
What if Brexit was about the friendships we made along the way? 
this Brexit March is *fantastic*  
To those asking: “why can’t you just accept the outcome of the referendum? It’s democracy.”To which I reply: “with proven campaign fraud, election interference, and illegal campaign spending, how can you accept it?” 
#Tory voters expressing anger at @theresa_may & their party about #leadership & #Brexit. Significant support for @heidiallen75 switching to @TheIndGroup at her public meeting. Loud applause. 
Just to be clear Nick Boles hasn’t been forced out of his constituency for being anti #brexit.He’s being forced out because he’s not in favour of “no deal Brexit”. A policy most informed people & experts consider as self harming to insane. Just reflect on that for a moment.  
BREXIT BETRAYAL: The @ForBritainParty have asked our friends and colleagues across Europe at @menleuropa to help influence and directly oppose any extension to article 50. We must leave on March the 29th or democracy has been undermined by Parliament. 
STOP WOBBLING! Brexiteer MPs must put country before party. Delaying Brexit is treacherous, but Theresa May's Withdrawal Agreement, which condemns the UK to be a vassal state of the EU forever, is far worse.  
Q: Is Brexit going to be bad for British rock music? How are you going to tour in Europe? A: As if we didn’t tour in Europe before the ******* EU. Oh give it up! If you want to sign up to be ruled by the mafia you do it. Like being governed by FIFA!  
It's so important to him that he cannot even be bothered to finish it! He is the perfect example of Brexit! All mouth, no trousers. 
This is so perfectly Brexit. Cold, wet, pointless, not living up to its original promise, and with a boring old man whinging about George Soros.  
This is what happens when you lie to people and promise them the impossible. This is what the Brexit leadership has incited.  
Sturgeon signals Indyref2 push before 2021. More lies for the Cult to believe. They are deluded if they think Sturgeon will try for an independent referendum.  
We voted to leave.  We just want to leave. Please support our work and read our daily #Brexit research & news here: #GoWTO 
Brexit man with a face like a £2.99 fry-up who made his millions by selling alcoholics breakfast with their first pint blames the people he calls arseholes on national TV for boycotting his filthy, slave-labour run, atmosphere-free Pubs'R'Us chain  
Remember last summer when it was revealed that the Electoral Commission had set aside a budget for the 2019 European elections, held after the UK was supposed to have left the EU. It's almost as if the Establishment expected Brexit to be betrayed.  
So @trussliz, who herself changed her mind on brexit to be a #leavernow (perhaps for careerist reasons) claims noone has changed their minds on #Brexit. She uses it as an argument against a #PeoplesVote Shall we look at the evidence then?THREAD1/12 
I wrote an article on how Brexit, like so many crises before it, has been seized upon by those intent on privatising and deregulating our economy – and Brexit Britain will emerge victorious in a red, white and blue race to the bottom. Read it here:  
Damn right I will. 
"Failing to deliver Brexit will permanently damage faith in democracy" (he said colluding to undermine parliament) 
DUP owning Parliament, taking sovereignty back ! 30 pieces of silver and rising. Hey ho Democracy.While I’m at it third vote for the PMs deal and the public have to adhere to a bent referendum. #PeoplesVote 
Nigel Farage will not complete Brexit Betrayal March despite urging supporters to join him.For more, head here:  
Where do you have to apply to get the Brexit dividend? 
If you're concerned about the right-wing Brexit backlash taking to the streets...I think we can cope. It's time to stop being afraid.#MarchToLeave#EpicProtestMarch 
Underlines the importance of nothing happening without @peoplesvote_uk to confirm. Her deal is a blindfold Brexit designed to appease quiet lifers who ‘just want it Over with’ (which it won’t be) and the Brexit fanatics who can get what they want in the carnage that follows  
Brexit Britain, taking the world by storm in this week’s New Yorker. So strange, to be living in a global joke. Thanks, chaps  
Matthew Parris: “I’d have wavered too, but now is the moment to see Brexit can still be stopped” @TheTimes ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ #PutittoThePeople 
After voting against @theresa_may Brexit Shambles TWICE. The @duponline are going to highlight why politicians are the least trusted people in society by considering voting for it, even though it is exactly the same deal they have voted twice against. Now I wonder why that is? 
WAITING FOR BREXITTwo tramps meet on a country road by a tree. Estragammon: “Is this the #EpicProtestMarch?”Vladimir: “Shall we Leave?”Neither of them move. The End 
The march against Brexit vs the #MarchToLeave There's more people in the queue at the Post Office this morning than there is on Farage's march of the gammons. 
Nigel Farage takes a seat on the #BelieveInBritain bus after starting the March to Leave campaign in Sunderland this morning. Photo by @CraigConnorNNP#MarchToLeave #Brexit #NigelFarage #Sunderland 
It’s looking like Brexit will be betrayed & that there will be European Elections on 23rd May. If so, UKIP will wage an all out campaign on Unilateral & Unconditional Withdrawal. UKIP will make no alliances or deals. UKIP is the authentic party of Brexit.   
About 100 people (we are told) set off from Sunderland today to march towards London in support of #Brexit. Compare this to the 1,000, 000+ people that will March in London on March 23rd in support of a #PeoplesVote. 
While checking out the fuss around the #Brexit fishing flotilla in #Newcastle yesterday, @jrs911 explained why he voted Leave in 2016 to get more money for the #NHS but changed his mind to become a #RemainerNowWe all deserve a #FinalSay on the Brexit deal in a #PeoplesVote  
ROGER DALTREY: giving his temperate response to Brexit.Sky News quickly took it down, not for the swearing, which they could easily have bleeped out, but because it was Pro-Brexit. Shameful decision. Now if Roger would have dealt with Juncker......?  
What's the betting the Brexit Betrayal March still makes the news headlines?  
Ludicrous argument. The Tory party selected an arch remainer to negotiate Brexit.  
The mood of the entire nation beautifully encapsulated... Brexit has turned us into a bunch of exhausted, demented, echo chamber fuelled numpties.  
The March is to “show the elite “ that Britain wants #Brexit - but the #Brexiteer elite won’t be marching !!Nigel Farage will not complete Brexit Betrayal March despite urging supporters to join him | UK News | Sky News  
Consequences of failure to stop Putin in Crimea:1. Russian war in eastern Ukraine2. Russian campaign to prop up Assad3. Russian interference in Brexit, US presidential race & other Western votes4. Russian coup attempt in Montenegro5. Salisbury attack6. And much more  
McDonnell - "Some MPs want it to go back to the ppl in a confirmatory vote. That might be a compromise we have to reach" #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Today 5 years ago #Russia shamefully staged illegal "referendum" to legitimize annexation of #Crimea from #Ukraine. Legitimization never happened because the whole world knows that #CrimeaIsUkraine 
Owen Patterson: I still won't back Mrs May's deal – because it's not Brexit  
Before the referendum, Yvette Cooper was asked if MPs should keep the UK in the Single Market if the country voted Leave. What did she say?   
When the Brexit press awards are handed out @tconnellyRTE needs to win them. He is a reminder to journalists what they ought to be - diggers of truth about what actually happened and why 
After a momentous week in British politics, and ahead of another crucial vote on the PM’s #Brexit deal, Labour Leader @jeremycorbyn will be joining @SophyRidgeSky  Tune in on Sunday at 9am #Ridge 
Lovely piece by ⁦@GuardianHeather on our little group attempting to shape Brexit (there are a few others!). It has been a pleasure getting to know better ⁦@halfon4harlowMP⁩ ⁦@NickBoles⁩ ⁦@oletwinofficial⁩ ⁦@SKinnock⁩ 
This guy @euwalker4 is walking from Swansea to London against brexit. He finishes at #PutItToThePeopleMarch. Respect  
In current circumstances, Brexit delayed means Brexit betrayed.However long Brexit is delayed, the political class cannot delay its own day of reckoning forever.The naked contempt politicians have shown for voters will not go unrewarded. 
Just to point out that these are the ‘forces’ that would ‘rise up’ if Brexit were cancelled. LOL. Just get on with it FFS.  
People worried about Nigel Farage's Brexit March, which Farage himself is just "popping in and out of."  
Nigel Farage says he will not be completing the more than 200 mile Brexit Betrayal March from North East England to Westminster despite asking supporters to join him  
Nigel Farage leads the way as the March to Leave campaign gets underway in a soggy Sunderland this morning. Photo by @CraigConnorNNP#MarchToLeave #Brexit #NigelFarage #Sunderland 
I had to laugh at this. The whole lot need to be booted out, toffs & all. They signed their death warrant when they opposed Brexit. The sooner they are all gone the better. The Lords need to be replaced with a second scrutinising chamber elected on PR.  
Don't miss out on this fabulous #MarchToLeave memorial t-shirt. Was £49.99, now just 99p!  (All proceeds go to fund private plane travel by Nigel Farage, who sadly won't be able to complete his "Brexit Betrayal March" on foot).#GammonballRun #Brexit #PutItToThePeople 
Whilst this is hilarious, it’s also revealing. Aside a small hardcore, there’s no mass movement energised and enthusiastic about any type of Brexit (including WTO.) Myth of ‘riots’, ‘widespread unrest’ if Parliament allows a confirmatory vote is junk!  
Someone using sense and logic in approach to Mrs May and Brexit - an approach destined to fail :))  
“This is what happens when English public school boys, nostalgic for Empire, dream up a scheme for the resurrection of British glory based on foisting every little-England frustration on their neighbours...Delusion is the mother of debacle.”#Brexit 
Braving the great English weather to tell the establishment we cannot be betrayed on Brexit. We're Marching to Leave! @Nigel_Farage @TiceRichard@KateHoeyMP @andreajenkyns#MarchToLeave #Sunderland 
Nigel Farage betrays his own Brexit Betrayal March by not completing the full distance as he said he would.#peoplesvote #FinalSay #RevokeA50 
New Fishing for Leave campaign video. #marchforleave #takebackcontrol #brexit  
#ICYMI Alliance Leader @naomi_long was on @bbctheview this week, saying while she opposes #Brexit it is vital to bank the backstop. #DemandBetter 
Thousands of people will be marching to Parliament next Saturday to demand a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit Why will you be marching? Make a short video and let us know. Share it using #PutItToThePeople 
Chris Grayling's bungled ferry contracts have already cost taxpayers £33 million. They could cost us £28million more because the Transport Secretary failed to ensure they can be delayed if Brexit date changes. This country cannot afford Chris Grayling. 
Apparently, these are the people who start a civil war if Brexit doesn’t go ahead. I think we can relax.    
Start of the #MarchToLeave @Nigel_Farage Marching on together  STOP THE BREXIT BETRAYAL  
Nigel Farage cons idiots into paying £50 a pop to join him on a 200 mile "Brexit Betrayal March" that he himself won't be completing. He's so oily, I'm surprised America hasn't invaded him and started drilling. #brexitbetrayal #brexitbetrayalmarch #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
Brexit supporters getting angry with remainers instead of the people who sold them a nonsense concept makes as much sense as Fyre Festival attendees getting angry with the guy who tried to point out it was a con, instead of the guy who actually conned them. 
This week I explained why legal advice based on #Art62 #ViennaConvention should be a non starter as a change of circumstances justifying @theresa_may bringing back her defeated #deal for #MV3. Dominic Grieve & @Keir_Starmer agreed #unicorns #Brexit  
Q: Is Brexit going to be bad for British rock music? How are you going to tour in Europe?A: As if we didn’t tour in Europe before the ******* EU. Oh give it up!If you want to sign up to be ruled by the mafia you do it. Like being governed by FIFA!#StandUp4Brexit @SkyNews 
Our first #brexit music video Keep Us In #STOPBREXIT #RevokeArt50 #FBPE #FBPE #BrexitShamble #retweet 
On coach from Dorchester to Yeovil then bus to Taunton for next Brexit rally - at Somerset County Cricket ground TA1 1JT at 1:30pm. All welcome and free to attend. An exciting venue! ⁦@Somerset4Europe⁩. My coach goes all the way to Blackpool! 
"Zugzwang” - German chess term for when you are compelled to move, but all potential moves are disadvantageous. Or "Brexit" as we call it in Britain. 
So these are the people that will cause riots and take to our streets if they don’t get Brexit.Be more people trying to get to the bar in any pub in Cardiff today.  
EU will agree Brexit delay if there is a second referendumNo‑deal better than a big delay, says Stephen BarclayFrance says 'No Deal' if UK's plan unclear by next weekNigel Dodds warns May the DUP won’t waver on their red lines 
This may just be Marina Hyde’s best yet..“Think of it as a sort of Crap Negotiations World Cup. Theresa May doesn’t want to finish top of the group or her Brexit will face the Treaty of Versailles in the semis”  
5 years ago, Russia held an illegitimate referendum in #Crimea as a pretext for its illegal annexation. Since then, Russia has violated the rights & freedoms of the Crimean people,incl. the indigenous Crimean Tatars.We call on Russia to return Crimea to Ukraine#CrimeaisUkraine 
Jubilee 2017 manifesto:- Reduce wastage to generate savings = added 1 trillion+ in debt- Reduce cost of living & ensure no Kenyan dies from drought = high cost of living & 9 dead (Turkana 2 & Baringo 7)No need for referendum but proper use of public resources/accountability.  
The top 40 horrors lurking in the small print of Theresa May’s Brexit deal  
Turns out Nigel Farage won't be completing the "Brexit Betrayal March" he's charging people £50 to take part in, & only 350 people have signed up to it. Less than those from just from #Cornwall who'll be marching in London!People are sick of #Brexit. 
MPs can no more vote for this deal on Tuesday than they could on 15th January. It is not Brexit, and it will keep the UK in vassalage to Brussels indefinitely. 
Farage brexit March “may be cancelled” as so few people have signed up.One thing stopping more people joining is the cost is high - £50.There is no irony meter in #brexit land is there?Imagine cancelling something when you realize it will make you poorer...  
If you don’t follow the excellent @tconnellyRTE on Brexit - you must. Brussels insider and boy can he explain everything around the backstop.  
This  is what a self-inflicted wound to the UK’s life sciences sector looks like. All because of Mrs May & her Tory underlings’ self-defeating ‘Brexit red lines’ that were absolutely born out of her/Tory xenophobia.  
If Nigel Farage saying he won't be completing the 200+ mile 'Brexit Betrayal March' despite asking supporters to join him isn't the perfect analogy for Brexit, we don't know what is. 
The stupidity surrounding Brexit is insufferable. 
I’ve earned the Nile badge on Fitbit for walking 4,132 miles (the length of the Nile). I walked most of it backwards and forwards outside Stormont, waiting for progress on Brexit and devolved government.  
Keith Brown said the momentum had become unstoppable after the “unstable, undemocratic” Westminster’s handling of Brexit over the past few days 
BBC Breakfast reporting live from the Brexit march with literally one bloke in the background.   
I still won't back Mrs May's deal – because it's not Brexit    via @Telegraph 
Ms Cooper was an “utter, utter unmentionable egotist” says one Tory remain MPInside the cross-party Brexit delay group by @SamCoatesTimes & @hzeffman  
Also: 7 people who have zero intention of walking the entire route. Insert your own metaphor for Brexit here….  
Please everyone lobby the Mogg to stay firm. Our MPs have come this far, they must not deliver May's deal now!! #Brexit#StandUp4Brexit#LeaveMeansLeave @Jacob_Rees_MoggBrexiteers must now grapple with the trickiest game of risk  via @Telegraph 
The ⁦@NE4EU⁩ campaigners have turned up singing “ you can shove your Brexit up Farage”  
I’d like politicians in Westminster who insist Brexit MUST be delivered to watch these videos and ask themselves: is the culture we want in this country one that’s designed exclusively to appease *these* people?  
Now ONLINE |  In case you missed last night’s Mother of All Talkshows you can listen again at any time! Featuring: Christchurch/neo-Nazi terrorism, David Steel/Cyril Smith, BrexitGuests incl: Annie Machon, Phil Dobbie, Prof Alan Sked #MOATS Link:  
“The Brexit Betrayal March is going to give a very visual demonstration of what the feeling in this country still is, and that is to leave” says Nigel Farage before very visually leaving the Brexit Betrayal March. 
While Politicians & the media fixate on nothing but Brexit we’ve got soaring poverty, soaring homelessness, soaring malnutrition, a return of Victorian diseases & reduction in life expectancy! Please RT if you think this is what we should be talking about  
++BREAKING++Corbyn to back 2nd referendum on EU......But to delay it until it’s pointless & technically impossible to hold one. If you are still wearing your “hate brexit, love Corbyn” badge at this stage - you’re a f***ing moron.  
The intense pressure on MPs to fold is centred around threat of a long delay.Do we really think that the Conservative OR Labour parties will vote to hold European Parliamentary elections?Remember 70% of Conservative & 60% of Labour MPs represent Brexit constituencies.  
Are you one of the 17.4 Million that voted to Leave the EU?Will you ever accept @theresa_may ‘s deal as delivering Brexit?Will you ever accept this non Brexit deal that is being forced through Parliament over and over with bribes and bullying?Show your anger below.  
What do they want? Okay, they want "Brexit" - but what do they think Brexit will do for them?Are they just like football hooligans who turn up only for the fighting?I don't get it.  
A Tory parliamentary candidate in a key marginal, a seat the Conservatives must win to gain a majority, tells me that “The Brexit delay is going down like a shit sandwich...good areas were literally throwing my leaflet back at me”. 
• HoC: short extension if WA passes• WA needs major changes to pass in HoC• HoC rejected 2nd Ref• longer extension requires EU elections  • @Conservatives will be slaughtered.• Brexit will not go away• Future of parliamentary democracy relies on MPs having  integrity  
My favourite bit is where irony gets bludgeoned to death: "Mrs May has never dared think Brexit through. She has pursued it as her duty, without knowing what it is." 
We won't make the same Brexit mistakes when we negotiate independence  
Today marks the fifth anniversary of #Russia holding an illegitimate, fabricated “referendum” in #Ukraine in a futile attempt to legitimize its purported annexation of  territory. The U.S. calls on  to respect international law and end its occupation of #Crimea. 
I'm not a #Labour party member but if I was I would be demanding the immediate resignation of the 6 Labour MP's who voted with the Tories against the Parliament taking control of the #Brexit process. But probably Corbyn agreed with them... 
Yes, we Remainers here on twitter, who pick up analyse every twist & turn in Parlt etc, forget that there are millions of ppl out there who don’t.They just KNOW Brexit is wrong, & they’re planning to make next Sat HUGE.If you’re angry at PV, march for #RevokeRemainRebuild! 
Nigel Farage does not represent 'the people'. He is a public school prat with hard right fantasies. Teaming up with Arron Banks to help siphon foreign money into the Brexit vote - this needs a serious investigation before it is too late for the UK. #FarageMarch #BrexitCrisis 
#OmplimMadrid16M13M #Catalonia's President in Exile Puigdemont .@KRLS:"Neither former PM or VP of #SPAIN've been able to prove any crime against #PoliticalPrisoners. If calling a #Referendum of Independence is no crime under Spanish law, why are they on trial?"#FreeThemAll 
Petition: Justice for Jodey Whiting. Independent inquiry into deaths linked to the DWP  Please sign and share #brexit  
On this day 5 years ago #Crimea's citizens overwhelmingly voted in favour of reunification with #Russia (96,7% for YES) in a referendum with a very high turnout (83%), it was a victory for democracy and self-determination.  
A short video explaining where the UK's #Brexit negotiations are currently at MT @RupertMyers brexiting 
"Port of Dover welcomes independent confirmation of Port of Dover resilience." Analysis makes clear there's reserve capacity for vessels & vehicle throughput & supports ongoing master planning to develop the port successfully beyond Brexit. 
Just 350 people signed up for Nigel Farage's Brexit Betrayal March   
Labour should be higher. They have got Brexit right, have solutions to the economy, to inequality, a leader with integrity and moral standing. Without the biased media lies propping up a failed Tory party Labour would be out of sight. #IStandWithCorbyn #MediaBias #ToriesOut 
A wise and considered voice on many issues. On Brexit, “[Cameron] will go down as one of the most catastrophic prime ministers in our history.... A simple majority with an opaque question was irresponsible.” 
Clear and clinical analysis of the Brexit fantasy. ‘Having your cake and eating it’ was not only a myth to mislead the public. It entered the soul of Brexiteer fundamentalists and displaced their capacity for rational thought. (Myth is a kind word) @chrisgreybrexit @BrigidLaffan 
Hard to see how Farage et al could have made the #MarchToLeave any more of a massive metaphor for #Brexit:-Called it "grassroots" when it's actually run by millionaires.-None of them will actually march all the way.-Experts doubt it can be completed as promised. 
Brexit is an almighty fraud.And if May’s deal passes, ‘it will set up years of acrimony, slow burn economic decline and rumbling political crisis.’ Brexiters’ lies are and will be devastating for this country.@chrisgreybrexit insightful as ever. 
Why are 10,000 troops from 13 countries Belgium, Canada, Denmark, Estonia, France, Germany, Italy, Latvia, Lithuania, the Netherlands, Norway, Spain,Arriving in the UK for major exercise the day after Brexit is not being delivered? 
Rowan Atkinson's brother, Rodney, calls an anti-Brexit protestor a Nazi because - wait for it - she's German. This country has lost its mind and may never find it again 
If you rule out no-deal Brexit, there will be rage I tell you!Erm, no. Tories dropping and UKIP showing no vital signs.Brexit needs to be binned.  
I cannot recommend to read this piece strongly enough. Indeed, it’s one of the best articles explaining #Brexit I have ever read. And I read a lot.   
An indefinite extension to Brexit might be the solution lurking in the long grass. That way Britain could remain in the European Union forever while professing to want to leave, writes @NYTimesCohen 
This is why no Labour MP or Tory “moderate” should back May’s #Brexitshambles  “deal”. If it goes through, they’ll ditch her, put in a hard Brexiteer & force the most extreme damaging #Brexit on the country. #FinalSay #PeoplesVote 
‘The territory we’re in is not so much The Will of the People as The Won’t of the People’ Best Brexit one liner yet by ⁦@MarinaHyde⁩ ‘Brexit – the niche production that truly brought the house down’  
Nigel Farage trolled by his own hypocritical Brexit comments printed on beer mats  
@jamesob @femi_sorry Farage asking people to do something that will hit them financially and deemed dangerous by experts, and he will abandon them before the whole sorry event is over. Parallels between #MarchToLeave and #brexit itself are almost too much to be coincidental! 
MPs believe Theresa May will be 'gone in weeks' after Brexit shambles  
A leading brexit idiot saying that the general public should do something difficult whilst not having to worry about doing it themselves? Sure there is an metaphor in there somewhere  
The cost of Brexit is already apparent  
Global Events happening in Spring/SummerU.S China Trade War talks delayed to JuneBrexit Delayed to June 30G20 Summit in Japan June 28-29FATF will have final meeting on international standards for Crypto in JuneUS SEC Public Forum May 31Russia Crypto regulations July 1 
"A meeting between Trump & Chinese leader Xi Jinping to end the trade war may delayed to June, sources said, as they will not be able to finalize an agreement by April"The Brexit is also being delayed to June 30...Everything seems very well planned.... 
The Times: Blow for May as lawyers reject Geoffrey Cox bid to ease backstop fears saying his reference to the Vienna Convention is "badly misconceived".#Brexit #MV3 
#MarchToLeave numbers growing here in #Sunderland, get ready to march #brexit #leavemeansleave #nodeal #WTO #democracy #UK #YellowVestsUK 
I think it's too late to save the Conservative party. It's gone too far now! RT @Feduporiginal: MPs believe Theresa May will be ‘gone in weeks’ after Brexit shambles.  MP's must vote down her deal & be done w/ her, once & for all. 
Like those famous ‘bumps in the road’ (aka thousands of job losses) the elites driving Brexit will not bear the pain they are inflicting on their ‘people’s army’#tragic 
“Whatever anti-democratic processes are carried out next, the ERG must realise they should have no part in them – and let the anti-Brexit MPs electorally dig their own graves.”  
All the resources being invested in #Brexit could’ve instead been used to:  • Tackle climate change • Deal with knife crime• Fund schools  • Stop austerity • Cut uni fees • Pay higher wages to NHS workers • Help refugees ... and, so much more.  
As analogies for brexit go this has to be in the top 10.Man launches campaign to do something stupid and difficult, when people sign up to his vision he realises it's bloody difficult and slopes off to his club instead leaving his supporters floundering  
#Brexit is not dead. It will only die when we #RevokeArticle50. MV3 must be voted down this week. MPs can then look at more palatable alternatives. That can only happen if we get an extension of A50 beyond June 30th. There is still time to stop it, but our MPs must act now! 
My piece in today’s @Telegraph.  Without substantial changes, I will vote against the Withdrawal Agreement when it returns to the Commons. The Malthouse Plan B is now the best option to deliver Brexit on time and in full.  
Eurosceptic MPs should hold their nerve as anti-Brexit colleagues dig their own electoral graves says ⁦@tomcolsy99_⁩ in ⁦@BrexitCentral⁩   
The #Brexit Daleks are coming!  Join me (and them) on the March against Brexit in London on 23rd March! #FBPE #StopBrexit #JustMakeItStop 
Nigel Farage says he will not be completing the more than 200 mile Brexit Betrayal March from North East England to Westminster despite asking supporters to join him   
The UK Parliament is an unstable, undemocratic institution foisting an unwanted Brexit on ScotlandYou simply can’t trust the UK Government to act in Scotland’s interestsIt’s time Scotland took our own decisions - @KeithBrownSNP 
It's essential for @Jacob_Rees_Mogg to rebut this story immediately.I cannot believe the ERG would 𝙚𝙫𝙚𝙧 vote for a deal which betrays #Brexit (and the UK) as comprehensively as the Withdrawal Agreement.We must not give in to Brussels/Berlin's bullying (via Mrs May).  
"None of us want to vote for this thing - it’s worse than what I resigned over but the alternative is a cascade of catastrophe as the other side gets more room for manoeuvre to stop Brexit". 
This poll isn’t surprising, given the behaviour of hardline Remain rebel Cabinet Ministers in Parliament this week.If the party forces through Brexit in name only using the threat of a long delay or losing Brexit altogether, this will be the tip of the iceberg.#StandUp4Brexit 
We go LIVE to the UK’s efforts to achieve Brexit  
For me there's no Brexit uncertainty. I'm certain I want to leave and I'm certain I want to leave without a deal. 
Join us this morning as we kick-start UKIP's campaign for #Newportwest!• Make #Brexit happen• Stop mass immigration.• Bin the BBC licence fee.• Scrap the Welsh Assembly.Location: The Queens Hotel, Bridge Street, Newport, NP20 4ANTime: 11am 
I bet there is a correlation between poor education and people voting Brexit...Just telling the truth 
Irony klaxon. The Jarrow March was protesting against unemployment and poverty. Brexit would create more unemployment and poverty. Oh and the Jarrow marchers didn’t go on a coach.  
Sky,s just taking the piss out of Farage's Brexit Betrayal March. Described it as a stunt and 'a disjointed series of walks some ending in the middle of nowhere' - Actually sniggering at it. Said only 50 people are doing the whole journey. 
Granddad survived Western Front in WW1 but he didn't hate Germans or anyone else. He never talked about war. Now #Brexit Brits proudly say how they survived 2 world wars, while telling my tax-paying foreign girlfriend to "fuck off back to your own country". 
This is bound to be blamed on Brexit by the idiotic Remaniacs!They blamed it for all the other car losses so why not this one?  
Wetherspoon boss Tim Martin, “Previous referendum results on major constitutional issues have always been respected in the UK." What, like the 1975 legal referendum which the 2016 illegal referendum is attempting to disrespect? 
Fartage will not be completing #Brexit march he urged supporters to sponsor at £50 a head.Maybe Grayling planned the route and Fartage realised it ended going nowhere fast! 
Today we celebrate the 5th anniversary of the All-Crimean referendum. #Crimea is a unique blend of different peoples’ cultures and traditions. Russians, Ukrainians, Crimean Tatars and other ethnic groups live side by side retaining their own identity, languages and faith. pic.twitter.com/G2R8gi4Lls 
Thanks for reading this far. So when MPs are deciding the best way forward they should also factor in the reality of Brexit so far on people's jobs and on our industries so far. It's probably fair to say that most people voted for things to get better, not worse.  12/12 
Hiring bouncers to keep lesbians from demonstrating against patriarchic power at pride. Can't make this up.But then, can't make Brexit up, either. 
Considering the entire weight of the BBC, ITV, print media is behind the Tories, and that the brexit split gives Tories a default ~50% leave vote anyway, it's absolutely remarkable Labour are anywhere near, let alone in front. Corbyn has done an incredible job as leader. 
On the 5th Anniversary of so called referendum organized by Russia and illegal occupation & annexation of Ukraine’s Crimea I reaffirm Latvia’s unwavering position that Crimea is an integral part of Ukraine, we’ll continue support territorial integrity of Ukraine  #CrimeaisUkraine 
My bit on wherever the fuck we are now with Brexit  
An obscure Tory peer used arcane procedure in the House of Lords yesterday to stop me speaking about an elected second chamber. But I returned to the fray later & the Bill to perpetuate a nominated House did not pass. In this Brexit crisis we need much bolder reform 
You never see anyone under the age of 50 doing this kind of thing. These same people though, will tell us 16 year olds are too immature to vote in a referendum?? 
I will apologise if I'm wrong but I think that whilst the LOTO was laying flowers, visiting his local mosque and attending a vigil the PM spent the day attempting to 'persuade' DUP/Conservative MPs to back her botched Brexit deal ...This difference says it all. #turntolove 
Is this Brexit?  
⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ - you are a despicable fraud.EXCL Jeremy Corbyn may not back bid for second EU referendum until after Brexit deal agreed |  
Good analysis of options by @alexebarker.Four possible outcomes of the UK’s request for a Brexit delay via @FT 
Irrespective of whether you are Leave or Remain, if you break electoral law on an election/referendum - the election/referendum should be rerun. We are supposed to be a country that respects the rule of law.  
Labour promised to deliver on the result of the referendum and not try and hold a second one. They are now breaking that promise.  
Farage not completing Brexit march despite backing it  
Civil service morale & confidence now virtually non-existent, because of Brexit & a leadership vacuum in Whitehall since the tragic death of Jeremy Heywood last hear  
#OTD  years ago people of #Crimea decided their own future in a regionwide referendum. It is characterized by unprecedentedly high turnout: over 83% of voters came to the polling stations. The referendum's outcome left no doubts - #CrimeaIsRussia. Full factsheet  
I will not vote in any new euro-elections. I do not recognise the legitimacy of that entity and never will. #Brexit 
#CrimeanSpring 5 years later: 96.77% of residents of the Autonomous Republic of #Crimea and 95.6% of #Sevastopol residents voted for reunification with #Russia on the All-Crimean referendum on March 16, 2014. More than 82% of the people of Crimea took part in the vote.   
Ok, let’s hold the Euro elections & make them a campaign to stop Brexit & get out the truth on the benefits of EU membership  
The DUP has denied the accusation that they are being bought with “cash for votes” - in order to give victory to Theresa May in Meaningful Vote #3. It took £1.6bn to buy them after GE2017 - How many £billions for a Brexit vote? #DodgyBrexit 
Tom Colsy: Eurosceptic MPs should hold their nerve as anti-Brexit colleagues dig their own electoral graves - @tomcolsy99_ 
Happy #Caturday This week, #Brexit came to a shuddering halt...#BrexitCatGIFs 
March 16, 2014, the All-Crimean referendum's two questions: 1. Are you in favour of reuniting Crimea with Russia as a constituent entity of Russia? 2. Are you in favour of restoring the 1992 Constitution of the Republic of Crimea and the status of Crimea as a part of Ukraine?  
Brexit.  
Today we celebrate the th Anniversary of the 2014 referendum in #Crimea: 96,77% votes were cast in favour of reunification with #Russia. This historic choice of the people of #Crimea must be respected & celebrated as a triumph of true democratic processes #CrimeaIsRussia 
Elated about referendum to increase funding for SASC & Indigenous student leadership at UBC. I’m so proud & honoured to work alongside student leaders I hope my faculty colleagues are paying attention & recommitting themselves to anti-violence & Indigenous-led initiatives.  
2. I’m an ethnic minority, my great-grandparents were immigrants and I love my country. We’re a world powerhouse: economically, culturally, scientifically; you name it, we’re up there. The UK is an incredible country. Once we heal from Brexit, we’ll find our feet again. Watch us. 
I think Chris Grayling would make an admirable new Brexit Secretary, he has all the qualifications for the job. 
Brexit is 330 hours away. #brexit 
'Do you know who I am? ' Yeah, someone who just lost a legal case and who now owes the court £20k! 
Ray Winstone has warned of a “rebellion” if the Brexit vote is overturned and there is another referendum, insisting that the UK should “just walk away”. Winstone: Second referendum would lead to 'rebellion', UK should 'walk away'   
Britain’s agonizing national humiliation over Brexit continues:  
The UK has not “woken up” to the threat posed by far right extremists who see the government as the oppressor of their imagined community. 
When 10 people, members of a party holding their own national assembly hostage, voting against the will of their own citizens, accepting bribes to keep a minority party in power dictate the fate of 64m people. It's time to leave | #brexit #scotref #indyref2 #yes2 
Curious to see a post-Brexit world. Personally, most of the articles I have read focused heavily on the EU side (i.e. trade and migration) of things but not enough on the global aspect of Brexit. It's interesting for me to read articles like this one. 
I *did* say I very much doubted that any of the #bbcquestiontime audience would be your average Ealing folk and lo and behold shouty Brexit man has previous...  
Beto O'Rourke: "Do I have a position on Brexit? No, I don't. I mean, I think it's in the world's interest to strengthen our alliances & our partnerships."  
According to the Telegraph May can only get her deal through if she promises to quit. Another case of party before country. It is said she can then retire with dignity as the woman who delivered Brexit. Who are they kidding? The deal is an abortion. But you can never trust Tories 
MPs. Man up.Shun deceit and obfuscation.Work with, not against, Democracy.Research, in detail, WA + PD. They will cripple + disempower the UK.Take a clean Brexit. Then and only then negotiate FTAs, under UK terms, that  satisfy leavers and remainers. 
UK Cabinet Ministers prepare for 'managed' No Deal #Brexit  #photography via AwardsDarwin 
Point of clarification: there is no Second Referendum if the deal is ratified. Approval of the WA means the UK is out following a short technical extension to get necessary legislation through the House, followed by transition period. Don’t be fooled by this argument.  
Remember the time I said @jeremycorbyn doesn’t want a second referendum and I got flack for it? Don’t be fooled by his overtures to his pro-EU base & MPs, he has behaved just as cynically as some of the Tories on this issue.  
Sky: Brexit, is it going to be bad for British Rock?Roger Daltrey: No, what's it got to do with the rock business? Oh dear, as if we didn't tour in Europe before the f*****g EU. Oh, give it up.If you wanna sign up to be being ruled by a f*****g mafia, you do it. It's like FIFA. 
If the world wants to know why we want a second referendum after #brexit, apart from the fact it's a complete catastrophe. Here's a recap of the sort of rubbish Scotland gets hurled at it daily for voting to remain in the UK  | #scotref #indyref2 
Labour are so finished...it would be good if 70 Labour MPs & 20 Tories now resigned the whip & joined @TheIndGroup ...sadly too many not prepared to put career on the line for Country.#RevokeA50 #StopBrexit #Remain in Control in the EU#Brexit Britain FUBAR 
Toxicity around Brexit is caused by the people who would rather start a culture war than respect the resultThe responsibility is on the losing side in an referendum to respect the result. That is a key part of democracy & society that the ongoing remain campaign is undermining 
Bercow ruled out an amendment signed by 127 MPs ruling out a second referendum.  When the history of Brexit comes to be written he will surely be exposed as the biased little **** he really is. 
Apparently 188 Tories including the Brexit Secretary and another six cabinet ministers voted against the motion extending Brexit. Only 112 Tories voted for it. May got it through with Labour support. The lady has to go. 
Perfect depiction of how UK Labour Party should have focussed on incompetence of government's Brexit handling. Could have provided vision for future: progressive politics inside Europe. Battling for a better Europe. Instead of in-fighting. Democrats learn lesson before too late.  
Seriously, how is the man who brought about this entire Brexit mess so chronically stupid!?! When we get the new referendum I'm going to enjoy using all the footage he's given me over the past 3 years.  
Geez Farage! In 35 seconds he manages to:Show he doesn't realise trade deals ARE international treaties.Admit there are versions of Brexit which are worse than EU membershipAdmit the country doesn't want the negotiations which would have to happen UNDER ANY Brexit.  
21st Century Riddle:If two adults can meet, marry and get divorced in a year, how long after a referendum are people allowed to change their minds without it being - for arbitrary reasons -  undemocratic? 
If you think the referendum act did that, I'm afraid you may want to review the documentation that came with it. Warning: "Leaving the EU" is not one size fits all.  
According to the Evening Standard, May has made the ‘huge concession’ that if her deal fails a third time she will allow Parliament to take control of Brexit. Surprised? Me neither. 
Brexit is a con trick. The graph shows a sudden rise in the polls for Leave just before the vote, when dark ads, lying, cheating, stolen data, overspend, propaganda came into play. After the referendum, Leave petered out until Remain was consistently ahead in the polls.  
Brexit ferry contracts could cost government millions more  
Parliament is not “thwarting Brexit” @DavidDavisMP Parliament gave you and your clan a lot longer to deliver what you promised would be the easiest deal in history.You failed.  You resigned.  The Brexiter Rat Club. BRC not ERG.Parliament now calling you to account. 
Brexit BOMBSHELL: DUP could be offered ‘CASH’ to back May's EU exit deal warn sources  
The European Structural Funds that will disappear after Brexit.Wales, what were you thinking?  Or the South West?And how much does “The North” trust WM to replace these losses?This can only be proof of the distortions and lies that characterised the Leave campaign.  
The Secretary of State for Health and Social Care is spending his time failing to give competent answers to journalists on Brexit. This in the week that we learnt of the fastest fall in life expectancy in the UK since World War Two. Has anyone told Matt what is actually going on?  
There’s also the car plants that are going to close for a week at end of March because of the Brexit chaos  
PUTIN'S CRIMEAN REFERENDUM: FIVE YEARS ON16 March marks the fifth anniversary of the fig leaf "referendum" staged by the Kremlin to justify the Russian seizure of Ukraine's Crimean peninsula. Five years on, many of the Crimean myths promoted by Moscow continue to circulate  
How Brexit ends... Theresa May, asleep in her bed early in the morning at Number 10, is awakened by the sound of running water. She gets up, walks to the bathroom, opens the door to find Bobby Ewing taking a shower. He smiles at her. 
This is a MASSIVE point from @ajcdeane.Those 10 DUP votes are crucial, because a load of Tory votes depend on how they swing.#Brexit will depend on the DUP.#SkyPapers 
Brexit silver lining: Wetherspoon profits are plunging like a stone. That's what happens when you invest millions of pounds into alienating half the population. Poetic justice. Not surprisingly, Tim Martin blames Remainers. It's ALWAYS Remainers for him.  
Outrageous. Corbyn may not back bid for new EU referendum until AFTER Brexit deal agreed.Labour are taking Remainers for granted.Labour MPs should be campaigning for a #PeoplesVote & #Remain - or millions of us will never vote for the party again. 
Commendable & very loyal of you. So many of us wanted her to do well in her job especially with Brexit. She promised much but has proven to be untrustworthy & a liar. She must go. 
You said yourself, a second referendum would settle it. You're a hypocrite of the worst kind...  
#NigelFarage is part of the elite. A millionaire career politician, the peddler of #Brexit lies, the prince of wince, the spigot of bigot, the zen of phobia. I’m afraid he’s coming to #Sunderland. A proud, hardworking city that has gained so much from the EU membership #GoAway 
How about an indefinite extension beyond March 29? Britain could remain in the EU forever while professing to want to leave. Brexit could be Britain’s Godot. Everyone would be happy. Brexit, Act IV, Scene I  
Why can’t we do this? Because BREXIT  
I'm puzzled why Irish Catholics think the pro-abort cultural Marxists wouldn't rig referendums. These guys openly state that Catholics & other Christians should not be allowed to express opinions. That's actually much more radically corrupt & tyrannical than rigging a referendum. 
In a move that will incense campaigners for another Brexit vote as well as the vast majority of Labour’s activists, Mr Corbyn believes demanding a chance to go back to the public can only work once the withdrawal agreement is passed.##PeoplesVote 
PEOPLE are very quick to criticise Theresa May as #theworstever Prime Minister but she does deserve a bit of credit for uniting a completely divided country in horror at the absolute wreckage she has made of Brexit 
Spare Theresa May the horror of going begging to the EU by voting for her Brexit deal the third time around, says @JGForsyth 
Newfoundland entered Canada with "no deal" based on a compromised referendum.  The UK are pulling a "reverse Newfoundland". 
He’d be a bit late then wouldn’t heIf May gets her meaningful vote 3 allowed and it passes, that’s it. We go out with her deal. So he needs to support amendment to have that deal affirmed by the people nowHe’s either fucking stupid or wants to brexit as much as May does 
You know how there just so happened to be planned military exercises on the days of the Barcelona attack and 911 etc?Well there just so happens to be a planned military exercise the day after brexit.. 
time to get pregnant, i guess! right on the eve of brexit, exactly as a foolish referendum intended. 
Media will have you believe Britain is in chaos due to brexit but reality is everyone’s watching documentaries about nonces and missing children  
This well researched audit trail of hatred linking the perpetrator of the shootings in New Zealand through Candace Owens of Turning Point to the ERG. The UK & the US are caught up in ongoing coup attempts & unless we can stop both #Brexit & #Trump, these coups will succeed. 
#RogerDaltrey of @TheWho a True #Brexiteer ! The #EU is the #Mafia...... Roger is correct!  #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #Brexit 
Amazing talk in Dorchester by @Andrew_Adonis this evening. Made an extremely compelling case for stopping Brexit and was very engaging to talk to in person. Great to have had him come   
Brexit?  
So is May’s deal and no deal and in effect the referendum mandateThat leaves revoke article 50@Jacob_Rees_Mogg #remainernow 
I’ll be there on the 23rd and I don’t give a damn who says what about whateverWe need to make a noise that cannot be ignored. No one owns this scream of national anger! No one can guide it. We are one and we hate Brexit! 
Rees-Mogg who was pleased to announce he had taken tea with Candace Owens, whose words radicalised the  killer into violence. Here he is using the rhetoric of fascist Twitter trolls. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
When, within living memory, the UK was an imperial power any Briton could feel superior to most of the world's inhabitants just by accident of birth. No wonder so many (mostly English) are angry and uncomfortable with their lost status in the modern world.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
A legal challenge over the Electoral Commission’s refusal to investigate EU referendum spending by the Democratic Unionist Party (DUP) has reached the High Court.#ukeuchallenge 
There are only 13 days left until  #BREXIT and #FREEDOM for #BRITAIN ! If @theresa_may & the @Conservatives extend or delay #Article50 for any reason then the 17,410,742 must not vote for the #ConservativeParty in the coming local elections in May! #VOTE for the #BrexitParty! 
Is @skynews expecting mines in the English Channel and surface-to-air missiles at European airports to take out incoming British passenger planes? Why would #brexit cause a problem for musicians on tour? Brexit derangement syndrome in full swing. 
THANK YOU TO EVERYONE for their support for the" Hold A SECOND REFERENDUM on EU membership " Petition which has now PASSED 90,000 SIGNATURES!Do PLEASE KEEP REPEATEDLY RETWEETING the Petition as many people do not sign petitions on THEIR first sighting! 
You were elected on it you bloody fool. Read your own manifesto. During the referendum campaign it was said by both sides. 
The Body Shop HQ and DC is in Littlehampton because a second generation Italian immigrant grew up in the town and wanted to give something back to the community. To see that position being put at risk because of brexit is upsetting  
As Brexit gets ever more humiliating, MH gets ever more scintillating.  "Brexit – the niche production that truly brought the house down" | Marina Hyde.   
Actually, May's deal is worse than no Brexit. What country in the world, outside of unconditional surrender under war conditions, accepts rules from a competing entity (27 competing countries that is) with no say, no influence, no vote and no veto. Switch on *your* brain Iain.  
Tech Review 1) Extracting Huawei From Telecom Networks Impossible? 2)China's Headwinds 3)Investing 4) ICYMI Tech News  $AAPL $GOOGL $GOOG $FB $AMZN #Huawei #China #Fed #EUR #USD #GBP #Brexit #stocks #investors 
Mueller is extremely complicated, as will be any future UK inquiry. All the NCA has to do at the moment is confirm whether or not £8m came from Rock Services and frankly one week is more than sufficient time to ascertain that answer. If it didn't Banks' donation is impermissible. 
Our political elite is sending a very clear message to the overwhelming majority of the young. It is "Fuck off, you don't matter, you don't count, even the dead are more important than you."#PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
Anyone aware of any leave voters who want another referendum? I haven't asked all 17.4 million of them, but I'd hazard a guess that they still want the UK to leave the European Union, as per the 2016 ballot paper.  
All those who desire #Brexit seem to be referring to the version they want as "the least damaging".Why do they want anything that is in any way damaging?What happened to the sunlit uplands of Brexitland?Our children should not have to suffer Brexit damage.  #newsnight 
Beto admitted today he doesn't have a position on Brexit.Hillary does.  
NEW EXCLUSIVE: Jeremy Corbyn may not bolt stable door until after horse has bolted. #brexit 
For the love of god.If the HoC agrees the Withdrawal Agreement, unless it is with an amendment requiring a referendum for it to be ratified, the UK will leave with that deal.This would be backing a referendum at precisely the point it has become impossible to have one.  
Not everyone who wants a try has had a go at being the Brexit Minister yet #article50excuses 
Bob Moran on #Brexit #BrexitShamble #BrexitShambles #Brexitdeal #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #brexit #artwork #ingrampinn #TheresaMay #prophecy #politics #democracy #capitalism political cartoon gallery in London  
perhaps you can tell me how many times in the national debates leaving the customs union was mentioned?  Perhaps you can also explain to me why 63% of leave voters polled the week after the referendum said they didn't think it meant leaving the Single Market or CU? 
MUNDELL MUST GO - SCOTTISH TORIES VOTE FOR NO-DEAL BREXITThe SNP has called on Scottish Secretary David Mundell to resign, after he failed to vote against a No-Deal Brexit - which could cost 100,000 Scottish jobs & plunge Scotland's economy into recession 
Let's get the lifeboat launched while the going's good - regardless of what England does or doesn't do with its Brexit. They've served notice of intent to force Scotland into whatever they decide regardless of how we voted. THAT is the material change. #UseTheMandate #IndyRefNow 
2) Sky: "Will Brexit damage British Rock music?"RD: "Why would it?"Sky: "Touring Europe" RD: “As if we didn’t tour in Europe before the f***ing EU! Oh, give it up! If you want to be ruled by a f***ing mafia then go ahead & sign up to the EU. It's like being governed by FIFA" 
1) Sky News went fishing for anti-Brexit headline in an interview with The Who. It didn't go to plan, so they deleted the video. Here is what happened for the benefit of those who did not see it. RD = Roger Daltrey 
Can smell the full brexit mode summer window were about to have. Man's about to bring Maguire, AWB, Sancho & Declan Rice  
Here’s an idea: delay Brexit, investigate whether there was Russian dark money used in the Leave campaign, then hold a second referendum.  
Theresa May is 'finished' and must 'fall on her sword' as price for her Brexit deal to win meaningful vote – say senior aides Trouble is the damage her deal will cause to the country would be catastrophic and possibly irreversible via @Telegraph 
May 'should've listened to me' - Trump #Brexit 
My 17 yr old niece just texted:"That cockroach of a woman has a cheek! She & her Tory rats, bitch about us wanting a 2nd vote for Independence after almost 5 yrs - but she wants a THIRD go at her Brexit deal being passed? Get a life, Treeza."Yep..Couldn't have said it better. 
Does Brexit = shambles: ask a minister:  
The people do not consent to this #Brexit DELAY! Retweet.  
That 'vile ideology' you speak of? That's what underpins #Brexit.You are part of the cycle of hate and fear. Your thoughts and prayers mean nothing to those who are suffering. 
• Tory party chiefs fear they could lose 1,000 councillors in  local elections in May• Tory MPs know of councillors who were refusing to stand • activists are ripping up their membership cardsMPs believe May 'gone in weeks' after Brexit shambles  
Because Brexit is so last year #Article50Excuses #TheLastLeg 
MPs believe Theresa May will be 'gone in weeks' after Brexit shambles  
An astute piece from The Diplomat looks at the hair trigger balance that must be maintained around Bougainville's independence referendum. Just so many ways this could go wrong as #PNG government does not seem to be intent on fair dealing 
Oh give it up, you liar! Neither suggested such tripe in the referendum campaign. You really are a disgrace. Do the honourable thing and resign! 
See also Bannon decamping to Italy to set up his 'Academy of the Judeo-Christian West' with new protege Benjamin Harnwell, longtime aide to Conservative member of the European Parliament, and Farage, ally Nirj Deva. 
Lovely to spend the evening with @tweetblakemore talking #Brexit #Brexit #Brexit... You'd think we'd be sick of it?! Thank you for my replacement light up #dinosaurs (after someone accidentally ran off with mine!) We're super excited for the march on 23rd! #StopBrexit 
People now having second thoughts about the march on the 23rd because they don't agree with the tactics of People's Vote.Agree with them or not, this may be our last chance to show the strength of feeling against BrexitDo we go out with a bang or a whimper ? Up to you 
Like going ahead with a #Brexit based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandateForeign InterferenceDisenfranchisementThe Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the Ppl isn't?A #BrexitShambles thatRemoves Rights w/o Consent & leaves Country & Ppl Poorer?Respect? Honour? 
I think we've found the "Brexit dividend"  
The EU said they'd only agree to an extension if we've got a good excuse. So our poll tonight is, what excuse should we give for extending #Article50. #BrexitTweet us your suggestions now and use the #Article50Excuses#TheLastLeg 
Brexit: 'Skint' Nigel Farage's company assets grew almost £400k last year 
“Game of Thrones may be resolved before Brexit.” - @alex_brooker. #TheLastLeg 
I got so bored of hearing about Brexit in the news this week. @TheLastLeg has just summed it all up in 60 seconds #IsItOk 
Forget about the backstop, the sinking pound and the Westminster impasse. Aberdeen has run out of Peroni! Now I know how bad Brexit will be!  
“Change is coming, it began before Brexit and will continue after Brexit.  It is up to us to all to manage that change and to build a new and United Ireland for all the people who share the island” @MaryLouMcDonald 
Merkel ally floats idea of broader talks with UK if Brexit delayed  
Brexit: ministers trying to win over DUP in talks on legal guarantees | Politics | The Guardian -  #bbcnews #skynews #Newsnight #skypapers #bbcpapers #DUP #brexit #NoDealBrexit #BrexitShambles #brexitdeal 
“A path back to the EU post Brexit is clear. A united Ireland is route back to the EU.” @MaryLouMcDonald 
Put this tweet on every billboard around Britain & if there is another referendum we will vote out by 90% #culturedestroyer 
Hello Remainers, we should be making a huge noise about Rees-Mogg and Steve Baker sharing tea with far-right extremist Candace Owens whose rhetoric radicalised the  terrorist into violence. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Our excellent London @LibDems Mayoral Candidate @SiobhanBenita telling #LDConf why she joined the party.We pretty much joined at the same time – like so many others who want to end this national embarrassment called #Brexit!!  
Theresa May is 'finished' and must 'fall on her sword' as price for her Brexit deal to win meaningful vote – senior aides  
NEW EXCLUSIVE: Jeremy Corbyn may not back bid for second EU referendum until after Brexit deal agreed 
Is May about to lose her THIRD Brexit secretary? Stephen Barclay hints he could quit if PM backs a long extension to Article 50 saying 'we shouldn't be afraid to leave with no deal'  
“I joined the @LibDems, like so many new members, on the morning of the EU referendum result” - Mayoral Candidate @SiobhanBenita at #LDConf rally 
Today I hosted public meetings for   Moray’s EU Nationals in #Findhorn and #Elgin - big turnouts and lots of #Brexit concerns. It’s heartbreaking that our fellow citizens face this. Huge thanks to @HamishUFraser of @CitAdviceScot for joining me. @BenMacpherson @Feorlean 
Brexit  
@BBCNews follows Laura Turull, daughter of Catalan minister @jorditurull, one of the top politicians imprisoned and under trial in Spain for organizing #Catalonia's referendum of independence in 2017.#FreeCatalanPoliticalPrisoners  
ExclusiveDowning Street aides say Theresa May is 'finished' and may be forced to set out timetable for her departure to save her Brexit dealTwo senior No10 figures believe the PM should 'fall on her sword' to ensure she is able to 'go with dignity' 
In the UK 332 homeless people died on the streets in the last year. This man has since the 2016 referendum has earned an estimated £7m plus his MPs salary. Do you think he’s right?  
#Brexit when the stance on Brexit taken by @duponline and @Jacob_Rees_Mogg et al. is put under the microscope it is nothing more than uber English nationalism. Reminds me of the line ‘for the love of one’s country is a terrible thing & it makes us all part of the patriot game.’ 
Oh, just, for some reason, remembering that time the Royal Mail trolled Brexit.  
Waiting for the Brexit deal vote like… #Brexit #Gogglebox 
Maybe Reggae Is The Only Way To Solve The Brexit Debate.... What Do You Think Reggae Warriors Reggae Is The Healing Of The Nation @princesspyhia @DavidRodigan @bbc #rootsmusic #brexit #regggaebbc #politics #london #reggaeuk #rasta #reggaeislife #uk #reggae 
135 days ago the @ElectoralCommUK referred a crime that corrupted the result of the 2016 referendum to the NCA. @DamianCollins asked for this matter to be resolved expediently. How long does it take to verify that funds haven't come from where claimed? 
I have to be firm with Corbyn. Morally I have no choice.I know @TheBMA says a No Deal Brexit would cause major loss of life.I know he's a eurosceptic.I want to trust he'll back the views of his partyBut with the platform I have, I have a responsibility not to take the chance. 
Brexit is not about making a deal with the European Union. Brexit is about leaving the European Union. 
Tom Colsy: Eurosceptic MPs should hold their nerve as anti-Brexit colleagues dig their own electoral graves  
I hate #brexit because it will make britain poorer, because it will destroy jobs, because it inhibits freedoms and diminishes rights and freedoms.Make no mistake about it, Brexit is lose lose lose.  
The man who caused it all… @David_Cameron #Brexit #Gogglebox 
Supporters of a #PeoplesVote headed down to meet the #LeaveEU “flotilla” on the Quayside today. Bizarrely, both sides oppose May’s horrendous #Brexit deal!Surely the only way out of this is a #FinalSay #referendum?@angelsforeurope @NE4EU @OpenBritainNE 
So 2 years ago we voted to leave we didn’t vote for any kind of deal we just voted to leave!! Now the politicians we pay to run our country don’t seem to want to deliver this but are quite happy taking the pay rise!  #joke #brexit #leavetheEU 
It's the most problematic part of the Brexit process but at times you can't even see it  
Brexit supporting Facebook site gets @peoplesvote_uk shock! Reflects mood in the city as people despair of Tory #Brexitchaos.@campbellclaret 
Pictures: Fishing For Leave Flotilla Kicks Off Brexit March to London  via @BreitbartNews 
Every MPs view on Brexit  
You are a xenophobe and your "hostile environment" is fundamentally racist. Your whole Brexit plan is based around ending Freedom of Movement. You are obsessed with immigration. You are part of the problem.  
When all this is done all @MarinaHyde’s Brexit columns should be placed in a time capsule to explain it to future generations. Everything else should be shredded.  
A general election is precisely what we need to end two and a half years of Tory chaos over Brexit, the wretched failures of Cameron and May and nine years of savage austerity.Time for a @UKLabour government. 
Anna is terrified of an actual People's Vote because she knows she stands zero chance of being re-elected. No by-elections for her. No general elections for her. Just a re-run of a referendum for us when we've already given the answer and she refuses to accept it  
"This is what a politics based on lies looks like." The latest from @chrisgreybrexit; a sober and compelling analysis of where the UK is with Brexit 
Five Labour MPs have quit party roles to defy orders and vote against holding a fresh Brexit referendum. 
The behaviour of these remainiac MPs during & after the referendum has been appalling and only served to strengthen Leave resolve. We've only been in the EU for 40 odd yrs and look what we've given away in that time, these people need holding to account and deselecting.#Brexit 
Great turnout for @fishingforleave today. The country is #NoDealReady but our politicians have failed.The only way to honour the referendum now is to #GoWTO. 
.@Bromund: “It’s like a kid who removes a band-aid slowly hoping it’ll hurt less. Far better to rip it off and be done with it.” #Brexit @WashTimesOpEd 
#FollowFriday Brexit heroes @BrexitStewart@AmandeepBhogal@ShankerASingham@JuliaHB1@Tim_R_Dawson@Soutiam21@LoveWestley@darrengrimes_@tomhfh@AlastairJT@mollygiles2015@chilakajc@tomwhx@uk_rants@CPierceUK@Ella_M_Whelan@oflynnmep@BrendanChilton@COLRICHARDKEMP#FF pic.twitter.com/xRZxY3ME4K 
I shall be marching on 23rd March.I am against #brexit in any form.#RevokeArticle50 (#RevokeA50), #PeoplesVote (#PutItToThePeople).We all stand together. 
There is very little better than being in a camper van with the person you love. Apart from being in a camper van with the person you love while still being a member of the EU. #brexit #TheVan #ThumbTwiddling 
Lot of complaints about English identity being responsible for Brexit. What we hear less about is that the big rise in English identity occurred 20 years ago and the very people now complaining dismissed it and did fuck all to recognise it. pic.twitter.com/i2C0m4tHDF 
EU holds SECRET MEETING to decide Brexit delay terms - and rules will INFURIATE Brexiteers. Of course they will, any delay to Brexit even if free & without terms, will infuriate Brexiteers. We have a legal default option, we should use it. #ManagedNoDeal 
OMG I can’t BELIEVE we were all sleeping on the Grayling angle to Brexit extension  
Theresa May has already handed over £1 billion to the DUP to keep her government in power. Now she wants to splash more cash to force through Brexit. All while Labour sit on their hands. Britain deserves Better. #ChangePolitics#ChangePolitics 
No long Brexit delay without election of British MEPs, says leaked paper  
Seriously, any sane person watching this from outside the UK, must think this country is just insane. We are willingly marching towards a more unhealthy nation. Needlessly. One wonders how many Brits will die because of Brexit. #FoodUnwrapped 
Today fishermen rallied to support #MarchToLeaveBritons MUST fight to make obnoxious MPs who'd shatter our democracy honour #BrexitMay's deal is a dire threat to our fishing & whole countryMake your voice heard!Huge thanks & well done to all who took part & supported   
Merkel ally floats idea of broader talks with UK if Brexit delayed. No thanks, we’ve already had three years of ‘talks’. Time now to announce we’re leaving using the legal default option - a managed WTO exit. Get on with it..  
#FoodUnwrapped Gotta love the British pasta maker that believes brexit is an opportunity to replace imported products. He does however import his wheat from France as UK doesn't grow durum. 
1000 followers in less than two weeks!! I must thank each an everyone of you for your support. At a time when the country needs UKIP most, you are all showing your support in big numbers after the brexit betrayal. Party for the people. Keep retweeting to gain more members  
ooh this new Brexit movie looks good  
MUST READ: This thread alone should #StopBrexit. Fiona O'Leary @fascinatorfun, one of the most impressive remain social media commentators, showing it's not just a dotted line between far right extremism witnessed in NZ & that unleashed by Brexit, it's a big fat marker pen arrow.  
"I don't think another vote would be possible because it would be very unfair to the people that won. They'd say 'What do you mean, you're going to take another vote?"President Donald Trump on a second EU referendum,March 14th 2019.  
May well pass, but this "deal" is not Brexit.At least admit it's not Brexit, and stop telling the same lie every dog in the street can see through.It's a deal to suit Remain.An abject failure & any UK politician should be utterly ashamed it took them 2 yrs to come up with. 
The Establishment tried to rig the EU referendum by using taxpayers' money, state media and the civil service to promote Remain. In a 2nd referendum the cheating would be even worse. It wouldn't be a fair fight.  #Brexit 
This week my team & I managed to persuade DWP to overturn decisions & reinstate payments for two constituents, both of whom are genuinely ill. Yeah, of course Brexit is important, but when you restore somebody’s faith in politicians, you know you’re doing ok! 
This is perhaps the only benefit of Brexit - almost nobody wants to follow the UK example  
Overheard in big @BetoORourke scrum: “Do I have a position on Brexit? No.” 
Please tell me you saw this Brexit Skanking @ashindestad LOOOOOOL! They should have let Rodigan do a set at the Commons. 
How hard is it to say "this killer's views are about as age-old White supremacist as they get, and his racist attitude begs to question how political discourses (Brexit, Prevent, etc) and media have given racial logics legitimacy" 
#anyquestions There is only one Brexit outcome that does not require the agreement by anyone, the legal default option - a managed no-deal Brexit.. 
Breaking: Pub chain owner blames customers for not spending their hard earned cash at a pub chain which doesn't share their values, completely forgets it wouldn't have been an issue if he'd kept his business out of a political shitstorm! | #EveryonesFaultButHis #Brexit pic.twitter.com/Szr19TcnSQ 
The March to Leave will start in Sunderland tomorrow. The protest will head to Hartlepool before moving south over the next two weeks, culminating in a mass protest in Parliament Square on March 29:  #Brexit 
If we don't have a new referendum we'll have to choose between a sovereignty-stealing deal everyone hates or becoming the only major economy in the world with no local trade deals, which you know can only make us poorer.Sorry, correction: POLITICIANS will get to decide that. 
I just had a sickening thought...     when food shortages kick in after Brexit..  what kind of Gammon will they be serving with chips in Wetherspoons?  
I hate #Brexit I hate #Brexit I hate #Brexit I hate #Brexit I hate #Brexit I hate #Brexit  
I want an Exit from Brexit. If you do too, add your name and join the campaign today:  #ExitFromBrexit via @LibDems 
So @TomHulme79, although too young to vote in 2016, but openly backed brexit. But now he is an active member of @YoungTories4PV and is president of his Uni's anti #brexit group. He appeared on @BBCNews last week. Respect. 
On to Brexit now...  #BBCAQ 
I'm just scunnered with the whole world right now.  I'm scunnered with the xenophobia & racism that fuelled #Brexit Scunnered with this endless cycle of violence, blame, intolerance.  And I'm scunnered with those who legitimise this hatred & then act shocked when called on it. 
#Brexit Republic Episode 31 out now. The sinking of MV2, the 'My Dear'-ing of a senior EU negotiator & more with @tconnellyRTE @mitchefi & myself. 
Retweet if you pledge not to vote for the betrayers of #Brexit.  
Given that the deal apparently is disliked by so many leave voters that voting for it is a #betrayal I am beginning to be persuaded by leave voters that we should have another referendum.  Reality is catching up with the false promises made by @LeaveEUOfficial @peoplesvote_hq 
If the DUP sells Brexit down the river by voting for May’s deal in return for bribes, it should expect a backlash. A UK majority could then back Irish unification. 
Must read. I have no motivation whatsoever to write about Brexit when others produce work of this quality. Kudos.  
"Brelcome!", says Portugal, which has launched an internet campaign aimed at wooing UK visitors, its most valuable tourist market, to keep visiting the country after Brexit  
The EU has set a deadline for Brexit delay plans. Leaked documents show it would terminate Britain's membership from the EU by July 1 if the country hasn't taken park of European Parliament elections by then.  
Great post by a consistently insightful Brexit blogger. Every post a must-read.  
As I said just now, it’s the anti Brexit lot creating division. Using an appalling massacre as a campaign tool. They really are unpleasant people. x  
TIME TO GO: Theresa May CANNOT fix Brexit 'shambles' - 'She can't bring it back together'  
May's 'disgraceful' Brexit strategy will make EU exit FAIL - 'It's a great BETRAYAL!'  
Without UK participation in the EP elections, there will be no Referendum, if Council agrees with this (IMV pretty reasonable) advice. It is as simple as that.4/ 
I know I go on about this, but I cannot emphasise enough that it is essential now that anyone wanting a #FinalSayForAll #PeoplesVote referendum make the case now for UK participation in the EP elections, both to EU27 and to our own MPs.3/ 
Theresa May explodes at 'disloyalty' of her Cabinet rebels who defied orders to help Labour Brexit amendment pass  Our whole House of Commons is DISLOYAL to our democratic system. They are ignoring 17,410,742 million voters. Democracy is dead in UK NOW. 
Brexit Secretary Stephen Barclay hints he could quit over Brexit delay  
Throughout the Brexit debacle @iandunt's analysis has been superb, and this is one of his best pieces 
Some people are still saying Brexit must happen or the far Right will get worse.Remember this:1. The far Right are never appeased.2. Allow Brexit, and they'll see it as a victory and their vitriol and violence will increase for their next 'project'.3. No Brexit, they lose. 
Trump and Brexit leaders both focusing on making immigration an issue. Hope they are able to live with the consequences of their rhetoric. 
#Brexit latest: What's happened this week and what happens next?  
Our MPs really are such a bunch of treacherous bastard's feathering their own nest, drain that Parliamentary swamp !!#Brexit 
We are angry and we will not rest until the #brexit crooks, liars, cheats and charlatans are put behind prison bars. 
Agree; we've heard people talk about the political class being corrupt and slurping from the trough for years and we were sceptical: brexit has exposed them. Time to get angry. 
Why the Prime Minister’s ‘Deal’ Does NOT Mean Leaving the EU - Proof of the TRUTH! Please Retweet!!!  via @The Great Brexit Debate 
It was an honor to sit down today with Ireland’s Minister for Health @SimonHarrisTD and discuss Trans-Atlantic trade, Brexit and US/Ireland relations. And Just in time for #StPatricksDay2019 !  
Shut up you moron. German passports for your kids and you said you'd leave UK if Brexit failed.  Dyson moved his company to Singapore to access Euro markets, Mogg got his overseas funds and profits he'll make from insulin and Ratcliffe left for tax purposes. You Brexiteers F.O.S. 
So @lisanandy do we Remainers have to threaten violence and civil war in response to a criminally corrupted referendum to make respect the majority who oppose #brexit? No we don't do violence but be warned we are angry, very angry. #peoplesvote 
JOHN Bercow blocking #MeaningfulVote4 at the last minute is my preferred Brexit outcome not unlike when the aliens save #LifeOfBrian from certain death#deusexmachina 
What madness now infects  the country like a virus #Brexit  
Beyond their lying, illegality, dodgy funding and Russian backing, perhaps the most despicable thing about @Arron_banks and @andywigmore is the unashamedly racist Brexit campaign. Goebbels would be proud. (And Wigmore praised Hitler’s propaganda) @EmmaLBriant 
Brexit strikes again.Ford slash over 5,000 jobs in .........., Hang in a minute, it says Germany. Clearly #FakeNews.  via @TheLocalGermany 
If Brexit has morphed into a shambles, the blame is not on the patriotic Brits who voted for it but the parliamentarians and civil servants who have systematically shafted it. 
The mere fact that @theresa_may has already lost two Meaningful Votes by record margins renders a third Meaningful Vote Meaningless. We are witnessing a disgraceful farce.#Brexit is backward.#RevokeA50 
So to get her Brexit deal over the line, will May promise DUP the NI assembly cd veto any GB regulatory divergence? But if NI is aligned to EU & vetoes GB divergence, what is the point of Brexit? And where is veto for Welsh Assembly and Holyrood?  
White supremacist terror attacks are deeply connected to mainstream politics. Jo Cox was murdered in the weeks before the Brexit vote. The Pittsburgh synagogue shooting came a week before the US midterms, as the president and Fox News fearmongered about the "migrant caravan." 
Let the people decide Second referendum nowOr revoke Article 50 given the last vote was corrupt and criminally achieved 
This is an un-used hashtag #BuyBritish4Brexit We've been asked to get it trending for a new group who launch on 30th March to ensure the economy is boosted after WTO Brexit  Please support and retweet folks. 
Theresa May must be punished at local elections. The Tories need a crushing,not only so they get the message Brits are furious they betrayed us on Brexit but to help oust May. Elections are the public’s chance to make our voice heard tell May we won’t tolerate her selling us out  
“This has gone beyond Brexit. What is at stake is nothing less than the legitimacy of our system of representative govt. If MPs are seen to have sided with overseas powers against their own constituents, nothing will ever be the same again” @DanielJHannan 
Empty words.You have done nothing to stop the UK press from spreading hate. Your ministers have said things that spread hate. Brexit is a close relative, based as it is on tribalism, racism and xenophobia. The same press that wrote these headlines also facilitated Brexit.  
I think her Party will fall apart under her if she goes to Brussels and begs for a long extension. Two-thirds of her own MPs voted against delay, most of her Whips and her own Brexit Secretary. It won’t work for her and we are two weeks away. 
Thank you @jreybbc for good piece on @BBCWorld, covering Laura Turull's visit to her father @jorditurull in prison. Allowed 2 hours time with her father once per month for his 'crime' of organising a referendum.  Good to see more coverage of this outrage from @BBCNews. 
.@thomasbrake calls out Jeremy Corbyn, who has aided and abetted Theresa May's botched Brexit. #LDconf 
Let's understand this. As it grows in power China will seek to extend its sphere of influence into Europe, and it will seek to weaken democracy which it sees as as a threat to its own system. We need to strengthen European unity and democracy. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
Schrodinger's Corbyn:When @jeremycorbyn is simultaneously betraying Leavers by supporting a second referendum and betraying Remainers by not supporting a second referendum.  
THINGS SAID IN CUSTODY:Sgt - "As a Romanian national there's a bilateral agreement in place to inform your Embassy, at least until 29th March 2019"Detainee - "what happens next"?PC (gives 5 minute talk on different outcomes of Brexit)Detainee - "No, I meant next in custody" 
"Join me and hundreds of thousands of fellow protesters and remainers next week" @thomasbrake calls for everyone to stand up to Brexit next week. Join us on March 23rd. 
Can you please tell me how you come to see any connection between Brexit & hate?  I can’t see it myself, and I’m genuinely interested to know.  
We thought there was something fishy about this bloke delivering a pre-prepared pro-#Brexit rant on BBC Question time last night. We didn't know the half of it...#bbcqt 
"Jeremy Corbyn has aided and abetted Theresa May every step of the way on Brexit. He has betrayed the poorest and most vulnerable in society, who will be hit hardest by Brexit." @thomasbrake #LDConfDemand a People's Vote now 
1992 De Klerk's government calls a referendum on continued negotiations for a peaceful settlement with ANC.70% of whites vote yes. He gets to share the Nobel peace prize  with Mandela.2019 Ramaphosa - whites are land thieves and all of them supported apartheid. #EWC 
Donald Tusk the EU President says Brussels will allow UK extra time if there is a Second Referendum.. True to form! The EU has previous on this; just ask France, Ireland, Denmark and the Netherlands. Wanna leave? Keep having votes til you don’t!#BBCQT 
Ie, about 3% of what Government has allocated to preparing for a No Deal Brexit, which Parliament has voted against.  
Political commentator James Morrow is spot onTHERESA MAY’S “absolutely disgraceful” Brexit strategy has been to make Brexit fail and force a second referendum on the British people.Our Prime Minister makes Tony Blair look like a saint 
Just as I thought I couldn't get angrier at the fucking state of the world after hearing @gaslitnation's Brexit special, I listened to @sarahkendzior and @AndreaChalupa this week (Impeach Normalization) on my bike ride home. Let me tell you, incandescent rage got me up that hill. pic.twitter.com/NWcYXyFsJ3 
Seeing lots of apoplectic Brexiters posting on social media that unless they get their hard, no deal Brexit, that they'll never vote again. Fine by me, I'd rather their small-minded, right-wing, xenophobic views didn't get any traction anyway!#StopBrexit 
No another ‘traitor’ doing the EU’s bidding would step in. If we got a #Brexit PM they’d be hamstrung by permanent Customs Union with EU + awful further concessions. WA is simply dreadful. Hoping @duponline do not waver! #ManagedNoDeal 
Driven by hatred.Like your description of some female Muslims as “letterboxes” and your hate-stirring against immigrants during the EU referendum.You out of all people, @BorisJohnson, don’t get to say a word about this. All you need to do is have a look in the mirror. 
Brexit Sec said “It’s time for this House to act in the national interest...to put forward an extension that is realistic.I commend the Government motion to the House” & then went & voted against it. Difficult to recall a more dysfunctional, mendacious & incompetent Govt. 
Chancellor Hammond has held talks with Northern Ireland unionists amid expectations that the UK government will offer extra spending for the region to swing Ulster MPs behind its Brexit dealScotland of course will get nothing as per usual Who says hatred and bigtory doesnt pay? 
Our children are having left wing views drilled into them at school these days, that's why remoaners want children to vote in another referendum.Disgusting moment school kids chant 'Theresa May f*****g wh*re' at climate change march  
Overall this is pretty helpful for Downing Street as they try to show the Brexiters they should be more scared of a long extension than Theresa May’s Brexit deal. Not many Tory MPs are keen on holding European elections in May. Nigel Farage is a bit more keen 
And now a scene from Brexit  
So here’s a leaked EU “room document” on the legal questions relating to a Brexit delay. It was circulated to EU ambos earlier this afternoon. Our full story here:  
In which Brexiteers, who don't trust the prime minister or believe she is strong, continue to believe that a leader who cannot control her own cabinet has the strength to defy parliament and the EU and deliver a no deal Brexit. Perhaps she is Boudicca after all  
Several social media groups have been in contact to ask if we'll help gather support for a national truck drivers protest if #Brexit is delayed. Your thoughts? #BrexitBetrayal 
Exclusive: Speaking to @theHouse_mag, Nigel Dodds warns Theresa May the DUP will not "waver" on the party's Brexit redline. Any hope of wiggle room has been - as expected - flatly rejected. 
The Brexit Secretary @SteveBarclay said today “If we don’t have a deal, we should leave with ‘no deal.’”We completely agree, and we currently don’t have a deal that honours the referendum.Please email your MP to let them you agree #StandUp4Brexit #NoChangeNoChance 
When the Leavers voted for Brexit, I bet they didn't know they were handing control to the DUP.  
‘Article 50 should not have been triggered when it was’ - @ranvir01 After a chaotic week of politics, MPs voted to delay #Brexit - but when did it all go wrong?  
So I guess it's ok to use the Vienna Convention to void the referendum then @Jacob_Rees_Mogg#RevokeArticle50 #TIG 
good for yoyr son and daughter - if we Brexit their campaign -and ours will begin the very next day.  
Theresa May's 'shameless' £1.6m Brexit bung for towns isn't even new money! The Office for Budget Responsibility have confirmed the Stronger Towns Fund will be met from existing budgets! Even May’s latest Brexit bung was a con!  
Would absolutely love for Sarri to win the Europa League with guys like RLC, CHO & Christensen playing a bit part. The look on the face of these Sarri hating, Brexit supporting Play-Doh sniffers when he lifts it for the Chels, ahhhh.  
Ollie Robbins is negotiating his own #Brexit along with Theresa May. It's certainly not the Brexit written on the 2016 referendum ballot paper, which the majority of voters voted for: LEAVE THE EUROPEAN UNION. 
Don’t know about you but it feels weird not sitting around of an evening watching Parliament vote on Brexit like Mr Blobby in a pottery factory with a death wish. 
If Brexit stops Michael Portillo making those endless bloody train journeys for BBC2 it will all have been worthwhile. 
Problems facing Kenyans:- High cost of living- Unemployment- Hunger in 23 counties(due to drought)- Huge public debt- Poor leadershipGovt efforts to find solutions:- Taking loans, stealing & increasing taxes- Huduma Number- Referendum- Handshake- Legacy agenda 
this man voted for No Deal Brexit barely 48 hours ago. he voted to take away his constituents' medication, to ruin their businesses, to lose them their jobs.glad you're feeling cheerful today @MarkLancasterMK  
Theresa May's approach to Brexit is fundamentally wrong.Her deal doesn't even settle our future trading relationship with the EU.We should offer them a Free Trade Agreement and, if they reject it, be strong enough to walk away without a deal. 
This is a minister from the Labour Party Front Bench on Wednesday.  Barry Gardiner talking it down too.And they are still trying to kid us that they are resisting it “just now” 8 working days to Brexit.They are a disgrace.  
"The Liberal Democrats will be out in force next weekend marching against Brexit" @joswinson #LDconf Join our march against Brexit >  
...and guess who else turns up with Candace...@fascinatorfun @brexit_sham @NarcAware @WillBlackWriter @smilinglaura @Lorelei_174 
Blair said to stop #BrexitVote down the deal - thenVote down No deal -  thenVote for a long extensionThis is the exact course Labour and EU have taken. Going to plan isn't it. Are our cowardly politicians going to allow Blair to ruin UK like he did the ME??? 
"At every stage of Brexit the Conservatives have put the interests of their own party over the country." @joswinson opening Spring Conference#LDconf 
A timely reminder to the UK that during negotiations both sides have their standpoints and one side cannot simply dictate to the other: "EU will agree to extra time if there is a second Brexit referendum | The Times  
As always, @chrisgreybrexit writes on Brexit ten times more perceptively and elegantly than people paid actual money to do it. I hope he ends up writing a book on all this. Do read. 
NEWSLETTER | Our referendum victory is under assault from all sides, and we need the resources to stand up for the votes of 17.4m people. We need your support to keep up the fight! You can donate to our campaign at  
Yes! There are Benefits of #Brexit! The #ERG hedgefunding elite are already benefiting. The #DUP has benefited from taxpayer money! Putin and Trump will benefit from a divided Europe! Given we already trade globally and control our borders how will YOU Benefit? #Remain #RevokeA50 
Third year #MPharm Industrial Option assignment to write a magazine-style commentary on effect of #Brexit on pharma industry.  Students once again surprise and delight with creativity.  Actually looking forward to marking these.  
Possible core policy suggestions for Nigel Farage's Brexit party. Looks like they intend to drain the swamp.  
Remember the service sector that comprises 80% of our economy? The one our politicians studiously avoid talking about when it comes to Brexit, like a silent fart in a crowded lift. It's just a fortnight away from being massively damaged by no-deal. 
#IsItOk that @theresa_may has brought her brexit deal to parliment so many times my son now thinks he's #Bercow 
Why the woman who quit the Cabinet in protest at PM’s Brexit deal will now vote for it. ⁦@EstherMcVey1⁩ explains on the Political Thinking podcast & talks about being fostered, hated by Labour, her plain speaking & whether she’ll be the leading lady 
I wish those in government who think that Brexit is a good idea would look at the behaviour of these irrational 'people' and just think about how all this is actually destroying this country outside their protected 'bubble'.It scares the life out of me, I fear for my children. 
When you were interviewed by Katie Hopkins you said that the EU referendum was the second referendum, and a confirmation vote would be the 3rd vote on the matter. Now you are saying that there won't be a 3rd vote. Just admit that you make it up as you go and hope nobody notices. 
fear that in the coming weeks, especially with the pretence of a "brexit betrayal", the fash here will be inspired by the actions of the white supremacist in new zealand and that minority communities should remain vigilant. 
Clive has us winning the quadruple and Unai Emery solving Brexit. 
How long before Lord Adonis tries to blame this on Brexit as well?  
I heard someone shot up a Mosque on the other side of the world earlier today. Obviously as a result of this, we must cancel Brexit, make UKIP illegal, and increase mass immigration indefinitely. 
Cost Of Unpaid Student Loans 'Could Blow £12bn Hole In Government's Brexit War Chest'  
Rodney Atkinson was a candidate for the Referendum Party in 1997 and then a UKIP leadership contender.  Now this is how he spends his time:  
Remember when I suggested that the UK would find itself in dispute at the WTO post Brexit?   The proposals from @LiamFox for tariffs and N.I. border appear to be illegal under WTO rules.   Who is going to negotiate a new trade deal while we are in dispute? 
There are a lot of us out there feeling flat and tweets and likes have fallen since yesterdays vote for a second referendum on Twitter. Together we can..Get on here and help those with few followers and few likes to belong and to believe and to get to London on the 23rd. 
Mrs May's threat of "either back the WA or it's NO BREXIT AT ALL" is an empty one. Consider the consequences of actively going against the largest democratic vote in our history. It would be political suicide for The Conservative Party. Don't fall for it! #StandFirm #GoWTO 
[WATCH] Audience Demolishes 'Arrogant' Second Referendum Politicians on Question Time  
The Body Shop opened a distribution centre in Germany and made 20 UK staff redundant. "The continued uncertainty about the impact of Brexit requires us to be proactive in managing every aspect of our business to meet our customers’ needs" 
I agree. A GE now, given Jeremy Corbyn's stance on #Brexit, could be devastating for the Labour Party. I'm not aware of any Remainer who would vote Labour, even if they've always voted Labour.  
Petition for second referendum now passes 89,000 signatures!!!!!! Have you signed? If yes please RT if no please sign now and then RT  #PutItToThePeople #FBPE #StopBrexit 
He then went onto say later in impromptu presser: “We are not discussing cash in these discussion. This is about Brexit and how we protect the future of the UK”  
Then shame on them for lack of conviction! Anyone who votes through this UNTHINKABLE WA agreement are morons, or worse! #WTOBrexitNOW #VoteDownWA Do not truss UK up like a prisoner!Brexit Big Beasts Going Wobbly  via @GuidoFawkes 
  We've updated our #Brexit blog with the latest developments on how we're protecting our customers in both the UK and Europe:  
'Do what you are TOLD!' Wetherspoon's Tim Martin warns MPs to respect Brexit vote  
UKIPers won't stop me stopping #Brexit!  They can jeer and chanting all they want ... #EUSuperGirl keeps singing! #StopBrexit 
MPs have failed to follow our instructions on delivering Brexit 
EU leaders warn that the UK must put forward a clear plan for what happens next if there is to be a delay to #Brexit  
When the DUP are confirming “ongoing and significant” talks with government and those talks involve four or five cabinet ministers, you know something’s shifting. #Brexit 
Minister @SimonHarrisTD kicked off this morning as guest speaker at the @CalChamber International Trade Breakfast in #LosAngeles addressing Cal business leaders on Ireland-US, EU-US & Brexit. Great celebration of the deep two way economic links between Ireland & Cal #StPatrickDay 
Loving EU is a losing game  #Brexit  
I hope non-UK listeners to @CHAPOTRAPHOUSE understand that the account just given on the show by Costas Lapavitsas of why most of the UK left oppose Brexit is simply wrong. Most who oppose Brexit have no illusions about the nature of the EU. We're neither idiots nor fantasists. 
DUP say they have held “constructive £ talks £ with £ the £ government £ about £ Brexit” 
Brexit: DUP welcomes 'renewed focus' on their concerns after talks  
Tory MPs! Switch on your brains! Vote for the deal. (Reposting this from a few days ago. Seems more relevant now. Anti-no deal MPs will revisit their attempt to take over. Election and/or revoke now likely. 75% Brexit better than 0% Brexit)  
Brexit has awoken the bottle shops of Edinburgh, bravo @corneliusbeers. We can win this yet  
. #brexit Looks like the Tory Government are about to Bribe the DUP with more Money to buy their votes!                    We have to face facts the DUP                           are the best Political Party                                     money can buy  
Who governs Britain?  via @financialtimes I wonder if all this gloom is right. You could argue Brexit has gone like drain-cleaner through the furred plumbing of British democracy and in hindsight will be seen as a purging force for renewal. 
Please keep voting down the WA. Don’t buckle to the pressure.If the deal passes, it is not just a battle that is lost but the Brexit War. For another generation. 
With others fighting to deliver a #PeoplesVote, I have invited @JeremyCorbyn to meet us on Monday.Labour has had many Brexit policies, seemingly decided by the few on its frontbench. The time for ambiguity is over. A cross-party solution needs to be found & found quickly  
Met a leave voter last night. Lovely old chap. Proper gent. Telegraph reader. I asked him if he ever thought about, or discussed the EU before the referendum. He admitted he hadn't. I could tell that had an impact. 
"I thought we were definitely leaving on 29th March?""Why would the PM bring her deal back again if she's already lost TWICE?""Are we actually going to leave the EU?"@anandMenon1 answers the big questions in his 'Brexit for beginners' mini-lecture – on @BBCBreakfast earlier. 
One of my favourite die hard Brexiteers (someone who thinks we should invade Brussels to demolish the Berlaymont) gets in touch. He's coming round to the need to back the Withdrawal Agreement, fight about it later, get out, better than no Brexit. It's catching. 
@LeaveEUOfficial I voted for the PMs deal which would have meant leaving on the 29th March 2019 but a no deal Brexit is NOT what was promised to voters 
Staring at this for a while now. #Tierfilme statt #Brexit. #Weekend. 
Friday, but also peak #BrexitBetrayal O’Clock. That’s not a ‘tomorrow’ thing: been perfectly self-evident since the referendum. Cllrs know it, often being closer to the #grassroots than MPs. So hardly a shock I’m in dialogue with Cllrs exploring defection. #Brevolution 
1/ Decided to hang out with some of the #ClimateStrike kids in Parliament Square this afternoon!  Seriously... #Brexit is such a distraction from dealing with the real issues! And it will stop us achieving #ClimateAction progress as a continent! #StopBrexit #climatechange 
Just saw an idiot screaming Brexit-related racial abuse at a woman in a Hijab , who bravely drove away when challenged by actual adults. Got his registration, reported to police. 
"EU will agree to extra time if there is a second Brexit referendum"See how it works yet?  
Donald Trump criticizes Theresa May for 'how badly' Brexit talks have gone 
The UK Govt has all the tools that it needs at its disposal to ensure economic prosperity after #Brexit. Any economic hardship should be blamed on them and not on leave voters.Markets do not rule over Govt. 
In these times where everything from Brexit to bloodymurder are driving division, perhaps we can build hope & connection oneconversation at a time, street by street, neighbourhood by neighbourhood. I think we have a chance to act now. #allofus. My weekly message @allofusinmind 
I have to stop feeling this angry. It’s making me ill. But only a very sick person would not feel angry at what is being done to this country in the name of Brexit. 
This is what a politics based on lies looks like. My latest Brexit Blog post trying to make sense of the week's events and where we are now:  
Jacob Rees-Mogg and Steve Baker joining for a nice cup of tea with Candace Owens, whose fascist bile and hate radicalised the  terrorist. She has proclaimed Hitler would have been fine if he didn’t want to “globalise”. Never mind the Holocaust. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Brexit 50p (sorry I’ve no source to credit)  
EU leaders warn no-deal Brexit not ruled out despite MPs' vote for delay | Politics News | Sky News  
'Pork-barrel bribes'. An excellent letter by @LibDemLords Lord Thomas of Gresford. The PM is breaking the law by offering cash subsidies to MPs' constituencies in exchange for their vote on Brexit. What of the DUP? We mustn't accept the corruption & illegality of Brexit Britain.  
On Monday, opposition parties will meet to discuss the way forward from the Brexit crisis. With so much at stake, we must do everything we can to protect people's jobs and living standards - and put the decision back to the people in a second EU referendum. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Hey kids, if you learnt nothing else today it's that it's ok to skive school if you have a passionate belief in something.  For example the Government's betrayal over Brexit, or your parents tax rates. 
We're closer than ever to winning a public vote on Brexit vs Remain.Join us next Saturday for the Put it to the People march in London. This is our chance to show MPs how much the country wants a new vote - and to end Tory Brexit.Sign up here:  
There doesn't appear to be a Brexit dividend for Tim Martin's pub chain.  
60% of Crewe & Nantwich constituents voted for #Brexit.The local MP @LauraSmithMP voted to delay #Brexit.She has betrayed her voters.She will be thrown out at the next election. 
Listen to what Leave voters actually want instead of what you might think they want - it's not that hard for a Remain supporter reconcile themselves with Brexit. Why are politicians finding it so difficult?  
BREXIT  
The establishment promised we would leave the EU on March 29th 2019, but they are now attempting to delay Brexit or even stop it all together. That’s why we need to show them we will not sit by whilst they betray Brexit!! #BrexitBetrayal 
Just in case Boris Johnson is struggling with his Brexit climbdown/ Tory reunification/ let's us heal the country speech. I thought I'd write it for himhttps://www.ft.com/content/45005008-464a-11e9-b168-96a37d002cd3  
I can't believe Americans get HULU and we are gonna get an ITV/BBC hybrid that looks like Brexit in TV form. Hate to see it. 
The state of this person using the massacre of 49 people to make a point about Brexit. Brexit derangement syndrome is a very real mental illness.  
Jacob has a plan and it could stop the governments attempt to delay Brexit in its tracks!  
Exasperated with Britain, Brussels is debating how and whether to extend Brexit and still deal with China, Russia, populism, Trump and divisive European elections in May. There's a lot of anger and nasty jokes, but a relationship with the UK still matters 
Suggestion: Amendment to next weeks episode of the Meaningful Vote series - “This house seeks an extension to A50 before passing the WA to investigate material impact on result of the 2016 referendum by foreign influence and/or illegal acts during the campaign period and before.” 
REMEMBER THEM 15 Tory MPs who voted to do in Theresa May and give Benn / Cooper / Corbyn / Boles / Lewtin control over BrexitBebbBenyonBolesClarkeDjanoglyFreemanGreeningGrieveGyimahLeeLetwinSandbachSoamesStevensonVaizey 
The Brexit Club. #UpdateAMovie 
Difficult to visit London without spending some time in one of the good bookstores there. Brexit can’t change that.  
Thanks so much to everyone who has sent me lovely messages after last night’s @bbcquestiontime. Too many to thank you individually but I really appreciate it. Keep fighting the good Brexit fight, folks. 
EU says UK no-deal Brexit tariff plan is ‘illegal’.If proof were needed that those advocating a no-deal Brexit don't understand the implications of their 'proposals', here it is.  
This might work but for the person who was an inspiration for the monster behind this heartbreaking massacre being publicly backed by some of your highest profile MPs.Even boasting of meeting her in Parliament.Blood on your hands....... 
FullFact is woefully misinformed about EU Defence. They omit the vast post-2016 schemes which the UK is in and peddle fake news about EU defence policies and a supposed referendum block on ‘such EU defence powers’ — this ONLY applies to Common Defence, final unitary EU military.  
Our new Brexit plan B is the "rogue state" approach, as modelled by entities such as North Korea. Don't like the Irish backstop? We'll just tear up the deal and walk away. Don't like the WTO tariffs? We'll just rip up the WTO rulebook and set ours to zero for whoever we like. 
Goldman sees a 60% chance that a close variant of May’s current Brexit deal is eventually ratified. It also thinks there is a 35% chance that Brexit is reversed, via a second referendum. 
Looking more closely at the "#CommonMarket2" (or “Norway+”) option for #Brexit Not much better than May’s #brexitdeal when you look the small-print... . 
Excellent and accurate description of Brexit and Westminster MPd  
Tory Brexiters Jacob Rees-Mogg and Steve Baker joining for a nice cup of tea with Candace Owens, whose bile and hate radicalised the  killer.And a reminder of Rees-Mogg's bow-tie dinner with a racist Nazi and his chums. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
David Davis has cracked; the DUP, Esther McVey and other clown car Tories will end up backing #MV3 tooWhich means sane people have to cheer on the ERG crazies including Mark Francois and CHOPE in rejecting May's #dogsdinnerBrexit drives us all round the twist eventually   
Theresa May's 'shameless' £1.6m Brexit bung for towns isn't even new money.Never. Ever trust Theresa May.Never. Ever trust the Tory party. They are con artists....!!  
In a great historical nod we passed the Jarrow church where the 1930s Jarrow marchers started to London to highlight the working folk of Britain's cry for politicians to listen.MPs must LISTEN & not thwart #BrexitJoin the #MarchToLeave to show MPs you won't take betrayal 
Many members of government have resigned as a result of Brexit, but somehow Theresa May has maintained her post.  
So in these astonishing Brexit times where watching #bbcparliament is like being in the twilight zone, your idea of news is to report an alleged FOI response to the Tories about a ‘tax’ that nobody is paying. 
Turkeys voting for Christmas. Sheep sprinting towards the abattoir. Insert your favourite metaphor here, as you read about fishermen staging a protest on the Thames in the hope of precipitating a no-deal Brexit... 
‘The lemon is completely squeezed’, Dutch PM Rutte said of Brexit negotiations, in a tangy change of metaphor from the ball falling over the cliffs of Dover   
Nigel Dodds has said 'nothing should be read' into the fact that Hammond was present at the #DUP's talks with the Government.But why would anyone read anything into the presence of the man whose job is to dish out money? #Brexit #bbcnews #LBC @LBC #bbcpm 
The SNP, Lib Dems, Plaid Cymru & Greens have invited Jeremy Corbyn to a cross-party meeting on Monday 18 March to discuss the way forward to resolve the Brexit crisis - including putting the decision to the people in a 2nd EU referendum, with option to Remain #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May’s government may be descending into chaos over Brexit, but at least Britain’s media knows who to blame: Jeremy Corbyn.  
. @Loella172 sits down with Luxembourg Finance Minister @pierregramegna at @The_LHoFT to talk about the fintech ecosystem, regulation, brexit and more #fintechfriday 
There was never any prospect of the Tories blocking Brexit altogether or even having a second referendum. The threat is and always has been that they will deliver a "Brexit" that kills Brexit. A deal that hands the EU total control, but that many people will believe is Brexit. 
Ignoring young people who couldn't vote in the EU referendum is a mistake - they'll speak at the ballot box | @Femi_Sorry 
All my support to the Scottish FM @NicolaSturgeon in her goal to exercise the Scottish right to self-determination through a second independence referendum. All our solidarity from Catalonia! 
four People’s Vote parties (SNP, Plaid, Lib Dems, Greens) have written to Jeremy Corbyn seeking a meeting on Monday to find out if and when he will push for a second referendum  
'Outraged! My council MIGHT charge for parking to help the environment.Fuck that... I'll vote tory and Labour for brexit to destroy the economy!'Said no-one... Ever.  
22/. A reminder from @nickreeves9876 of the MSM hate amplification as part of the Brexit message.This is how to stoke it.  All responsible.  
Labour in Brexit chaos again as top Jeremy Corbyn ally says second referendum would be ‘disaster’ 
From today's @FT #Brexit #Article50 #extension 
Trump throws shade on May's handling of #Brexit in a conversation with the Irish premier Leo VaradkarDo you agree with him? 
In the Midst of the Brexit Storm Launch the Independence Lifeboat:  via @SputnikInt 
Britain is in crisis – and Theresa May is blocking the only solution. “A customs union and alignment with the single market could solve the Brexit impasse. Tory cowardice is the primary obstacle.” Via @OwenJones84 
It's been a dramatic, #Brexit-dominated week in the House of Commons. Read our round-up of this week's business 
Brexit Secretary Steve Barclay explains why he voted against the government on #Brexit last night, minutes after arguing for the plan in the Commons[tap to expand]  
Antoinette @Sandbach was re-elected by her Leave constituency after promising to "respect the decision" saying "it would be wrong for Parliament to try and overturn it."This week she voted against Brexit.Eddisbury Conservatives, e-mail info@leave.eu to get her deselected!   
The DUP will not be be bribed over Brexit.They will accept the cash, and do what they want to do anyway. 
5 yrs ago Russia tried to legitimize its illegal occupation of Crimea by organizing a fake referendum in Ukrainian territory. By orchestrating this so-called vote the Kremlin blatantly flouted intl law: @HelsinkiComm#CrimeaIsUkraine 
There comes a point in every Brexit commentator's life when they discover @DmitryOpines and realise everything they have ever done of which they are proud was at best second-rate. 
Dear@WeyandSabine@guyverhofstadt@eucopresident@JunckerEUEU citizens in the UK want to fight the EU elections against UKIP.Then we want to fight #Brexit in a #PeoplesVote referendum.Then we want help rid Europe of populism, nationalisum & division.With LoveThe UK   
Brexit BOMBSHELL: How Iceland wanted Britain to join Nordic alliance of non-EU countries  
DUP Westminster Leader Nigel Dodds says the party has had a "constructive dialogue" with cabinet ministers over Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal and talks will continue over the weekend 
London will miss having you. Many (most?) of us HATE #Brexit and what it's doing to our country. #StopBrexitSaveBritain Enjoy life in Amsterdam.  
“Hey, I bet you can’t be so crass as to somehow try to tie this appalling atrocity in New Zealand to Brexit!”“Hold my beer”  
Farage trolled by his own hypocritical Brexit comments printed on beer mats  
Just as I predicted 3 days ago, Remoaner MPs have given all the power to the EU so another referendum can be forced.I hope they are ready for the backlash.EU could force PM to hold second referendum or soften Brexit as the price for extension  
Translation: “don’t believe a word I said yesterday- believe what I say today, although tomorrow  I might tell you that I didn’t say it at all.” Is there any job qualification for Brexit Secretary ? The job does seem to attract real howlers.  
This is a brilliant explainer from @CJCHowarth of the European Research Group's #Brexit strategy over the next fortnight.Ignore the nay-sayers – here’s why we’re still on course for a clean Brexit on 29th March  via @BrexitCentral 
Why is the BBC repeatedly misreporting Labour's position on Brexit and getting the most basic stuff wrong?Two examples from just *one* day this week with @jon_trickett and @EmilyThornberry Not good enough. 
Finally, #BREXIT is taking off.  
1/3 Lots of talk in UK media, and UK right leaning media ONLY that the EU will offer the UK an extension to Article 50 so that we can have a referendum on the Withdrawal Agreement or Remainining in the EU.... 
Theresa May has been told by senior EU officials and other European leaders that conditions for an extension to the Article 50 exit process would include the option of a second referendum on EU membership.  
Two stories.One RE: #ChristchurchMosqueAttack One RE: #Brexit 30 minutes between them. They tell us so much more about who we are than the hate we see being spread by the Christchurch terrorist and by Brexit. They cannot undo either. But don’t forget to tell them. [THREAD] 
As Brexit draws ever nearer @aaronbastani can't understand how the BBC gets even the most basic facts wrong.Full video:  
“The Secretary of State has treated the people of Wales with contempt by voting to inflict a no-deal Brexit catastrophe on them. He seems to believe that inflicting a recession worse than 2008 is a price worth paying to keep his cushy job" @JonathanPlaid 
Conservative MP @DrPhillipLeeMP was re-elected by his Leave-voting constituents after promising to honour the referendum result.This week he voted AGAINST delivering a clean Brexit on March 29. Conservatives in Bracknell, e-mail us at info@leave.eu to get him deselected!   
Climate change is much more important than Brexit. My article on Conservative Home  
What an odd endorsement of Brexit  
TREASON: Parliament Blocks BrexitJoin me LIVE at 7pm UK time (3pm EST) for a full break down of how the British establishment has conspired to subvert the will of the people! Parliamentary democracy has failed! 
This dog is my favourite as it expresses it's opinion of Theresa May and her Brexit negotiations.  
EU says UK no-deal Brexit tariff plan is ‘illegal’  
Ben @TheLocal Europe and You."The reality is that Britons in the EU are still, almost three years since the referendum, living in limbo" #citizensrights #inLimbo #RevokeA50 #FBPE 
Latest figures show 70 Companies have invested in Ireland as a result of Brexit  via @IDAIRELAND 
Big mistake, what is the point of splitting the Brexit vote and letting con,lab back in? YOu need to put aside your egos and do deals, one brexit party in each constituency otherwise you will be seriously letting Brexiteers down. @TheSDPUK @BrexitPartyUK @TimePartyUK 
... and also a drug dealing criminal. #Brexit #FinalSay 
UK's Attorney General Cox has new legal advice on Brexit - Is this new legal advice? Was the PM aware of it before putting her deal to parliament? If so questions that need to be askedThehttps://reut.rs/2FdzoaQ 
Hello Amsterdam...and goodbye and good riddance to the unwelcoming and inward looking Great Britain. #EU #Brexit #Amsterdam #FinalSay  
Contrary to reports, @theresa_may is kind, thoughtful and altruistic. She’s not the #maybot you think she is. Her #brexitdeal is the right way forward. And she should deliver it, even if it means her resignation. The national interest comes first. @LBC #brexit 
WATCH: "This week, finally, stuff has changed." Our Director @anandMenon1 was on @BBCBreakfast this morning delivering a mini-lecture on 'Brexit for beginners'. And you can read more in-depth analysis from Anand here:  
Once again this Tory government is exposed for trying to con people over last week’s latest Brexit bung.  
Beware! Today I was offered a very disheartening warning: May’s deal although already rejected twice might just pass on the third vote in @HouseofCommons because the alternative -a long extension- poses such a serious threat to #brexit. 
“84% of Irish public think us companies will continue to invest in Ireland despite Brexit and 7 out of 10 leaders of US companies say Ireland is a better place to invest than three years ago” says AmCham CEO Mark Redmond at @IrishCentral conference this morning in New York 
Many people aren't happy with MPs after this crazy week - but I argue for @UKandEUthat they are managing to persuade the Government to change its approach to the Brexit Endgame.New post just up looking back at the week in the @HouseofCommons 
“I look at this deal, it’s not Brexit for me and many people in Parliament. The manifesto made it clear that No Deal was better than a bad deal. All Conservative MPs got elected on that platform & I find it astonishing that we’re even having this debate actually“ @SuellaBraverman 
The reason Parliament cannot agree on Brexit is because all options are FUCKING TERRIBLE. The sanctified bloody referendum was a fraud. People were lied to, tricked by rich spivs. It’s a shit sandwich and we need to be asked again if we REALLY want to swallow it.  #PeoplesVote pic.twitter.com/K4LMpE2fY7 
Every politician who voted for Art50 before we had even a glimmer of an idea of what kind of Brexit we want shares responsibility for this. And every other job lost because of their ineptitude #BrexitCrisis 
Gosh.  Used that many Remainers drink in there before the referendum? 
It is absolutely staggering that Tory HQ should be berating others for selling-out Brexit without acknowledging they are doing the same.Confirms their contempt for the electorate and for our democracy.  
In fact polls show the UK to be the most tolerant country in Europe, and even more so since the pressure release valve that the vote to leave the EU turned out to be. This is an appalling tweet. But we forgive you because we know that Brexit has driven you mad. 
5,000 new jobs created in Ireland due to Brexit, according to IDA Ireland  
This Brexiter said he knew how we could solve the issue with the Irish border... and his answer left James O'Brien with his head in his hands.@mrjamesob | #Brexit 
British Parliament discussing Brexit, circa 2019 coloured.  
Ah @EstherMcVey1 - a principle-free zone.... shares a No deal platform with Farage one minute, lies the next, promotes her Ladies for Leave idiocy, pretends to march for true Brexit, then folds and votes for a deal she resigned over. Beacon of Brexit bad faith.@Rowland72James 
Will there be a Brexit 50p? ⁦@standardnews⁩ got no answers from Treasury today. 
EU leaders warn no-deal Brexit not ruled out despite MPs' vote for delay  
Brexit Secretary Stephen Barclay tells BBC: "We shouldn't be afraid to leave with no deal".This is after he voted against the government's motion to extend Article 50. How long can he stay in gvt if May's deals falls again next week?Live updates here: 
. More preposterous than defying the will of 55% of your own constituents and 52% of the general population by calling for a second referendum, Anna? 
Watch SNP's Mhairi Black magnificently call out Theresa May’s ‘irresponsibility’ over #Brexit and #BrexitShambles - article by @WeeBrian86 
"Many people voted Leave to help the NHS. Now that we know Brexit is actually damaging it, the People deserve to vote again...please, if you care about the NHS, join me & a million others on March 23rd...to help save our NHS." #PeoplesVote  via @NHSvBrexit 
fuck them, we're not marching to please them, we're marching against Brexit! HQ are just a few mediocre white guys, don't let THEM stop you from expressing yourself! we need to demonstrate how unpopular Brexit is first and foremost, for our sake; this march needs to be massive!! 
A long delay to Brexit by May, necessitating UK participation in EU elections, will be the biggest betrayal of the British people by a national leader ever. Anyone who stays with the Tories after that will bathe in reflected revulsion for many years to come.  
To try and blame Jeremy Corbyn for the Tory Government #Brexit is ridiculous ....Spot Clive Lewis pic.twitter.com/tVKPOLDZhN#BrexitMayhem #BrexitShambles #GTTO #JC4PM #BBCQT 
Brexit this week - explained in 60 secondsThis week parliament held 3 votes on #Brexit, with more to come next week. But what do they all mean?Dr @ClairGammage, from @BristolUniLaw, takes us through the 5 things you need to know about the votes & how they'll affect Brexit.  
What will the Independent group do now? Is there any point in their existence?Second Referendum Crushed in ‘Major Defeat’  via @GuidoFawkes 
Riddle me this what is an EU army doing on Uk streets the day after we are told we won’t get Brexit is this the army to put down the next presant revolt  
After two years of negotiating a Brexit arrangement with the EU, the UK is highly unlikely to leave on the planned date of March 29.Here's the latest:  
One week to go guys. Please read & share #RT In the Midst of the Brexit Storm Launch the Independence Lifeboat:  via @SputnikInt 
The first two Brexit Secretaries voted against the deal they themselves negotiated.The third Brexit Secretary said "watch this" and voted against the motion he had proposed only moments before.And Brexiteers wonder why they never get anywhere. 
MP who quit Cabinet over Brexit deal now set to vote for Brexit deal. This stuff writes itself.  
Theresa May promised we would leave the EU on the 29th of March, but yesterday she voted to delay Brexit.  
A barrister under suspicion of drug possession goes viral after pro-Brexit rant on BBC Question Time /#EU #Brexit  
Flotilla of fishing boats sails down the Tyne in protest at MPs' betrayal of the Brexit vote:  
At some point Brexit Secretaries and other Ministers who keep resigning rather than face reality are going to have to face reality. Presumably when one of them becomes Prime Minister.  
BREXIT SECRETARY: UK shouldn't be afraid to leave with No Deal. Are you listening @theresa_may? 
“#Brexit...Any ultimate acceptance of a Brexit agreement by the DUP will be measured against this declaration by @DUPleader “We will not accept any form of regulatory divergence which separates Northern Ireland economically or politically from the rest of the United Kingdom.” 
Looks like Steve Barclay will resign next week if the deal falls at MV3 and PM applies for a longer delay. He makes it clear he won’t support that... so she’ll need a 4th Brexit Secretary.  
Hamlet thinks over #Brexit:To be?Not to be?Not to be, exactly, but also not not to be?Can we renegotiate what “be” means?Delay. 
I voted to ensure we do not have a General Election - it’s the last thing we need and wouldn’t resolve the #Brexit impasse in Parliament  
Brexit arguments, and those who peddle them, are exposed with the smallest amount of scrutiny  
For those screaming 'Project Fear', here's concrete evidence that Brexit is having a negative impact on the NHS. The EMA have officially moved out. #PeoplesVote 
Brexit will create a “Little England” in two ways: the country will have less power and influence in the world, and it will likely break up as Northern Ireland votes to join the Republic and Scotland opts for independence—both in order to remain in Europe  
Ray Winstone has warned of a “rebellion” if the Brexit vote is overturned and there is another referendum, insisting that the UK should “just walk away”. Winstone: Second referendum would lead to 'rebellion', UK should 'walk away'   
Guy leading company with plummeting profits, feels #brexit was the right choiceIt would be kinda embarrassing to be seen in one of those pubs, now wouldn't it?Go on, RT this, so others don't drink there too. 
As a Brexit delay looks likely, how much longer can Theresa May push her twice-defeated deal? Our Brexit editor @JohnGPeet looks at another week of embarrassment for Mrs May and Britain, in “The Intelligence” 
This links from Christian Supremacy to Gamergate to Unite the Right to Fox News to the Rohinga Genocide to Brazil’s elections to Brexit to Chemnitz to Tree of Life and back again. 
Brexit Secretary @SteveBarclay, who voted against Article 50 extension, clear that UK could still leave with No Deal. “We shouldn’t be afraid to leave with No Deal” 
"The failing Brexit project has crowded out too many important issues over the last three years, and it’s time our political system addressed itself once again to climate change." @vincecable 
"Most of the political class has proved incapable of adapting its thinking to the mass disaffection that the referendum revealed. Instead, by seeking to thwart the result they've deepened the estrangement of voters from the political system" -- John Gray 
Great to meet Brexiteers Terry and Eileen who travelled all the way from Sterling to attend my @DominicRaab event yesterday. Wonderful to meet up today and talk Brexit.  
IMPORTANT: With the deluge of Brexit news, this story is being missed.Read how our civil liberties are being systematically eroded by this hyper-statist government:  
Brexit would mark the end of Britain’s role as a great power, and I wonder whether it would also mark the day that the West, as a political and strategic entity, begins to crumble.My latest column:  
It is a spat when you @'d them both as a gotcha, and reduced the livestream of a mass murder to 'the same story as Brexit crimes'. I'd have thought you would have a touch more sensitivity than that, and I'm disappointed to be wrong. 
You can watch our lively discussions about the #ClimateStrike, Brexit and other issues on #PoliticsLive here. Glad to have been on both this show and Newsnight in 2019. Most years go by without an interview on any mainstream BBC programme: 
John Bercow sparks row for not allowing vote ruling out second Brexit referendum 
Sounds like we could be having Brexit secretary number 4 if the deal goes down again next week  
What will it take for you to realise that Brexit is Damaging the NHS?They've left the UK now. New drugs will be certified for the EU market first (because it's bigger) so British patients will go to the back of the queue.  
I used to think, particularly after Trump's election, that a parliamentary system had some advantages over a presidential system. With Brexit, Britain is doing its best to provide a counterargument, underscoring all the flaws in a parliamentary system of government. 
I'd love to know why so many MPs respect a #Brexit based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesDisenfranchisementForeign InterferenceRights Removed w/o Consent & theNon-Binding wills of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the PplW/O Question or a Confirmatory #PeoplesVote + #Remain option 
Esther McVey, November 2018: “May’s deal does not honour the result of the referendum."Esther McVey, January 2019: “Voting for this deal is the most dangerous path to go along.”Esther McVey, March 2019: ‘Forget everything I said before...’ 
Whilst everyone was so artfully distracted by Brexit this week, @theresa_may’s @UKHomeOffice was found to be breaking the law yet again. In focus this time is the cruel policy of refusing to tell people when they are going to be put on a plane so they can’t defend themselves. 
"EU will agree to extra time if there is a second Brexit referendum" by @BrunoBrussels 
Soubry told her constituents one thing during the 2017 General Election and did another after being re-elected. Her constituency of Broxtowe voted Leave in the EU Referendum and she has done everything she possibly could to go against the majority.She is absolutely a traitor.  
Exc: @jeremycorbyn has written to @IanBlackfordMP asking for a meeting with the intent of thrashing out a cross party Brexit position between @UKLabour and @theSNP 
Ok, here’s your chance, you have the floor.Name one tangible and unarguable benefit that brexit will bring.  
the mass murder of Muslims at prayer (which is itself a continuation of far-right murders including Pittsburgh, Charleston, Utoya) to a mere talking point in your Brexit narrative. It's disgusting, and an insult to those still fighting for their lives. 
.@minpres Rutte on the #Brexit talks: "As an expert on side-letters & codicils [re: he negotiated one with the EU after the Dutch rejected the 2016 EU-Ukraine assoc. agreemt], I can say that the lemon has been completely squeezed." @mattsteinglass 
This is a lie. In my article I wrote "the dealings of Arron Banks highlight the desperately overdue need for reform of electoral campaign law". I'm not going to engage in this further because using the slaughter of 49 Muslims in New Zealand to engage in a Brexit spat is vile. 
It's entirely cheap. I don't shy away from talking about racism in relation to Brexit, nor the role of tech companies in facilitating fascist radicalisation. But what you've done is use this as an opportunity to crow "see, i'm right!" in your own petty beefs, and reduced... 
I'm not a prominent anti-Brexit voice, @ayocaesar. I'm a serious & committed pro-law voice. And it's not a cheap point. It goes to the heart of the critical moment we are currently in regarding the absolute unaccountability of the tech giants. 
Brexit delay for what? EU leaders want answers, Ireland says  
"Potentially devastating temperature rises in the Arctic are now inevitable even if the world succeeds in cutting greenhouse gas emissions in line with the Paris agreement." But yes, let's focus on Brexit instead. This is why we need the #ClimateStrike 
My English husband & I (both SNP) are fed-up with this attitude that we must try to save England from their foolish decisions. We can't, and the majority of them don't give a jot about us. England voted for Brexit & it will happen, we have to save Scotland with Independence. 
So Jezza, you call for everyone to work together to get a solution to the Brexit fiasco. What do you mean by that exactly? Everyone agreeing with you? That’s what it means when you say it to your own MPs. Or maybe it means allowing your supporters to trash on social media anyone 
"But what if another referendum ends up with the SAME result?"Well, if it does we'll know it was based on REALITY, not FANTASY. And, whatever the result, there is at least A CHANCE people can get behind it. As things stand, there is NO CHANCE of healing divisions. 
The funniest Brexit thread for some time.  
I voted Remain, but the sight of prominent anti-Brexit voices using the massacre of 49 Muslims to bang their drum is beyond insulting. How dare you piggyback on this story to score a cheap point against commentators you deem as insufficiently outraged  
Theresa May's Brexit deal has been defeated by Parliament twice. Your preferred No Deal option has rejected under any circumstances. Following your logic, does that means Brexit is now off the table, too?  
Perhaps, in a few days, Parliament will at last decide what it wants from Brexit.Thereby placing it, at last, in the position it should have been before MPs voted to invoke Article 50, rather than days before the actual departure. 
Ian Blackford called for the UK government to recognise that the Scottish Parliament had voted by 69 votes to 59 to allow a referendum on independence 
Andrew Neil SLAMS Remainer Grieve over 2nd referendum: “you say that the public doesn’t want the May deal but you want a referendum on the May deal versus Remain. So you’re rigging the referendum from the start by choosing most unpopular Brexit option!”  
SHUT UP ABOUT BREXIT OH MY GOD have some fucking respect  
Why is it ok for Theresa May to keep asking the British Parliament to vote again and again on her Brexit plan but not ok to ask the British people whether they want to reconsider their vote on Brexit?  
Brussels may try to force Theresa May to hold second referendum or water down Brexit as the price to pay for an extension of Article 50. EU bosses are meeting soon to discuss whether, cost and conditions of Britain’s delay. The price of ruling out No-Deal!  
Hey everyone, we are just coming to the end of Season One of the Brexit Boxset.We will find out next week if it is going to be renewed for seasons Two up to Ten.If so, we won't have any alternative but to binge-watch the lot in real-time. 
The EU will soon Brexit itself. 20 trillions of euro debt festering away in the EU's little eurozone Ponzi scheme. It's inevitable collapse will take the EU with it! Bosh!! 
I don't want to spend my entire life arguing about Brexit.If we get a Brexit deal that Brexit voters hate, they'll blame remainers and vice versa.If we leave on No Deal, the economic damage will never be forgiven.A vote where the options are actually concrete is the only way. 
11/According to this Sun article in February of Turning Point“Other members of the group are Darren Grimes, founder of BeLeave and Brexit Central and Steve Edington, director of the Politics UK YouTube channel.” 
Andrew Neil SKEWERS Remainer Dominic Grieve – 'You're RIGGING second referendum'   
Cameron said it will be once in Lifetime Referendum, the People’s Decision will be Respected!  
 WATCH: @drewhendrySNP expertly exposes Labour's hypocrisy on a second EU referendum. If @PaulJSweeney wants a #PeoplesVote, why did he abstain last night? Only @theSNP has been consistently & passionately against Brexit - the 'official opposition' is out of its depth.  
Superb! band, lorry and a boat crossing Tyne bridge! #brexit#MarchtoLeave#CoastalCommunitiesCount#SaveBritainsFish@LeaveEUOfficial@LeaveMnsLeave 
MPs constantly voting on Brexit is democratic but the people being allowed another vote on it would be undemocratic. I’ve got that right, haven’t I? 
#Remain MPs have voted against themselves,the law THEY passed & the British people – while coming up with no agreed alternative. They can no longer hide behind the facthey are working alongside others 2 thwart #Brexit completely.They must NOT be allowed2 complete their treachery. 
Because of Brexit or because his pubs are shite?  
Looking for some light relief from a heavy week of Brexit shenanigans? I can offer you the yield curve played on a marimba. My latest @FinancialTimes Chart Doctor makeover, in conjunction with the amazing @tomhannen  #dataviz #sonification 
Michael Gove’s Brexit agony  
Message to Ian Blackford MP: You have no right to speak for "the People of Scotland" on Brexit!  
UNCUT | A large number of Britons voted against Europe because they felt abandoned ... That's why we need to learn from Brexit, EU chief negotiator @MichelBarnier tells Daniel Cohn-Bendit in an EXCLUSIVE unedited interview.Watch more:  
Someone should make a "Brexit escape room", where your team tries to escape Europe. You're allowed one extension, but in the end you just end up in an even smaller room than when you started, and the staff all left hours ago. But hey, you did it! Cost is 8% of your salary. 
Arlene Foster: "It's at the end of a negotiation that you see the whites of people's eyes"She is of course referring to the DUP here who will climb down and keep the Tory Brexit #shitshow on the road  
From time to time I like to remind myself of this snippet about Labour's sabotaging of the 1979 devolution referendum.  
Andrew Neil’s complicity in this doesn’t stem from neglecting to report on Facebook propaganda and Brexit, it stems from being chairman of extreme Islamophobic magazine the Spectator. Owen’s name doesn’t belong here at all  
MPs reject second Brexit referendum 334-85 in latest Commons vote 
@duponline #Brexit.The DUP views the ‘backstop’ as a threat to the Union, an attack on its  ‘parity of esteem.’ To Nationalists ‘Irishness’ is its parity of esteem. The last Stormont talks failed because the DUP hasn’t  come to terms with ‘parity of esteem’ for nationalists. 
In case you missed my recent speech on #Brexit, here it is. Essentially, the 'will of the people' is a fake argument, as no one knows what it means, but is used by MPs to push their own selfish versions of Brexit at the expense of the British people.  
Also want to make something clear. My dad was angry with the people calling for a 2nd referendum. He doesn't have a problem with leaving with a withdrawal agreement but he is sick of the delays and extensions. 
So many people will not vote for independence because of the chaos that is Brexit. They don't want any more chaos.This is why the case for indy has to be ironclad this time. Truth on currency, pensions, taxes, military etc.No mistakes. 
The Ref has been positioned as the mandate for Brexit & as the pinnacle of democratic exercises... claims that are distortions of the truth.Time for the will of parliament to retake sovereignty from a fabricated will of the people.#RevokeArt50 #TIG 
Imagine the UK had held a referendum on becoming a state of the US, that had bn rejected, then the following yr all main parties had run at a General Election saying they accepted that result, but 18 mths on MPs decided from March 29th the UK'll be part of the US. Wld that be ok? 
Because they couldn't have had these talks like 2 years ago. The govt has ultimately ruined #Brexit. #BrexitBetrayal #BrexitMayhem 
The Remain-dominated House of Lords makes a rare concession to the Brexit cause...   
Translation: We never actually thought people would really vote to leave. They were meant to vote 51-49 Remain so we could keep our jobs as MEPs and use the close result to demand a further referendum! Don't blame UKIP who backed leave, blame the people for believing us!"  
Leave MPs/Remain MPs who wish to implement the referendum result in 2016 should now bring closure and vote for the not so good withdrawal bill. Then when trade talks inevitably fail to have already prepared for a no deal to be able to unilaterally terminare the withdrawal act.. 
Poll: sick of hearing the people who voted leave were lied to and mislead. I and many I know wanted out before any campaign even started. Wouldn't it be great to know how many of the 17.4 also wanted out before the referendum was granted:Please RT@BrexitKnight@LeaveMnsLeave 
Yvette Cooper campaigned on the promise that she would "not vote to block Brexit". Her constituency voted 70% leave in the ref. Yet she has blatantly ignored her constituents. I can only assume she's already mapped out a life outside of politics, and has long since past caring. 
Brexiteers believe they have now tried everything to get a better deal - the only alternatives are a softer Brexit or no Brexit. So: time to pass May’s deal? My column:  
I think its a pretty good indicator of how the mood in Britain (amongst Leavers), is shifting towards wanting to remain. #Brexit 
What a sad indictment our modern MSM in Westminster yesterday as they seemed to blank UKIP’s Gerard Batten with his Brexit followers who were interviewed by the World’s Press Corps Instead!Perhaps too many “Home Truths!”Perhaps it’s a case now of “Selective News!” 
I'm anti-Brexit. But shoehorning Brexit into discussion of islamophobic murderers on the other side of the world is crazy 
The votes are in and have been checked and double-checked. With almost 5000 votes cast by fans through Twitter, email and the Sporting Memories group we can confirm that the winning design is......... option B! There will be no second referendum ! #ycfc 
Chancellor called into today's crunch Brexit talks with the DUP  it's getting serious people  
Are we going to let them get away with this? With this Brexit betrayal, they’re relying on the fact that you’ll forget that they betrayed you in this way, that you’ll forget that they just ignored your democratic voice, and that you’ll just accept it. 
George Monbiot - There was so much cheating & illegality surrounding the referendum, regardless of which way it went, the result should not be considered sound.#peoplesvote #politicslive #FinalSay @GeorgeMonbiot 
2nd referendum heavily defeated, winning 4 Commons votes in a row, now @dup in serious talks with Govt. is it coming up roses for @theresa_may ? 
The year is 2052, Brexit deal is rejected by parliament again.Tottenham look foward to playing in their new stadium in 4 months time. 
Our Chair, @AngusMacNeilSNP has written to @LiamFox on the progress of rolling over EU Free Trade Agreements. He has attached a table showing the progress of @tradegovuk in this area. Read the letter here:  and see the full table below. #trade #brexit #ftas 
The failure of the Prime Minister's handling of #Brexit is clear. Wrong strategy, wrong priority and now the wrong result. To be honest, we would rather see this guy in charge   
Can you not make a fucking terrorist attack against innocent people about Brexit please  
Please note @CaroleCadwalla was also spreading the false rumor that Italy would veto an Article 50 extension.Fake news and despair trolling help Putin, Farage and Banks. Cut it out. #Brexit  
#brexitYou can actually hear the screeching of Brexiteers in Westimster at this idea from all the way up here in Aberdeen.  
You must have been in a Wetherspoon's ;). I heard a comedian on Radio 4 saying 'A Leaver is someone who voted #Brexit because they didn't like Pakistanis". Many a true word spoke in jest. 
That's like saying we should hold all political commentators who are also Muslim responsible for Isis and should keep them off the airwaves every time there is an Islamist attack. Drawing a line between Brexit and Christchurch is why we have 'hate spread all over the west'. 
BBC News - Mark Drakeford's Brexit position confusing - Labour source  
There are only 14 days left until  #BREXIT and #FREEDOM for #BRITAIN ! If @theresa_may & the @Conservatives extend or delay #Article50 for any reason then the 17,410,742 must not vote for the #ConservativeParty in the coming local elections in May! #VOTE for the #BrexitParty! 
it's OUR march. we're the ones putting the work in. we should all go regardless & march for whatever we want; i'm marching to #RevokeArticle50 & stop Brexit! idgaf what HQ want us to do, they ain't our bosses (although they think they are!), we're volunteers, not their skivvies!! 
For those of you blessed to not know terrible UK columnists by name: Polly Toynbee is one of the self described sensible centrist voices (ie Labour right, anti-Corbyn) in permanent diaper exploding meltdown over Brexit 
Nothing disgusts me more about the EU referendum campaign than this blatant lie on the side of a red bus.  
This is Ross.Ross wants to wreck Scotland's economy by having a hard Brexit.Ross promised to 'stand up for Scotland'.Can you see what's wrong with this picture?  
Watch how #Brexit may threaten Italy’s #Prosecco wine market. 
When I voted I was prepared to take a financial hit in the beginning to enable longer term growth and wealth. But we need some positivity from the media and the goverment. Its all fake news and negative press around brexit. 
Gerald Scarfe on #Brexit #BrexitShamble #BrexitShambles #Brexitdeal #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #brexit #artwork #ingrampinn #TheresaMay #prophecy #politics #democracy #capitalism political cartoon gallery in London  
People in Huddersfield were right to give the establishment a kickingNearly everyone I spoke to there said they felt powerless. And no matter where we stand on #Brexit we all agreed politicians must give power to the  people.Please watch, share & follow @DearLeavers #LetsTalk 
I left the BBC in order to say this:Brexit is the single dumbest idea in the history of these islands. 
"Not only was the referendum legislated to be nothing but a consultation exercise, the campaign itself has been found to be unlawful..."And then they all cry "democracy" on TV and in MSM. This is what irks me.  
Our next star is a fab protestor outside Parliament yesterday! She said: “I studied in France. It was a truly happy time in my life. We can all see that #brexit will leave us worse off.” #eyesonthePRIDE let’s make sure that the government will finally #putittothepeople 
If you see an islamophobic terrorist attack and your immediate thought is “how can I make this about Brexit and Russia” you need to just log off 
"Strong & Stable" = Weak & Wobbly"No Deal is better than a bad deal" = My bad deal is better than No Deal"I will not call an election" = I will call an election"We will leave the EU on March 29" = No we won't"Austerity is over" = No it isn'tNever trust a Tory. #Brexit #GTTO 
Pointing the finger at Owen is a galaxy take Carole. And this has nothing to do with “Brexit crimes” get a fucking grip  
Excellent, interview by @Nigel_Farage he said how it is.Like he said we need a ‘no deal’ on 29th and I agree.A lot of people thinks that young people’s for remain well I will tell you I’m 16 and I support a no deal Brexit.I’m a big supporter of Nigel Farage as well.SHARE!  
#Sodem is the Stand of Defiance European Movement.Brexit would mean a loss of rights for everybody.  
Brexit is based in white supremacy. So is the Wall and MAGA. These are dark and murderous times. As we consider candidates for President here, I'll be looking at those who speak most openly and empathetically about identity and xenophobia - and the threat - not economics. 
And yes, @OwenJones84 & @afneil this is *exactly* the same story as the Brexit crimes you insist on ignoring. It's big tech facilitating the breaking of national laws & being wholly unaccountable to our parliament. The idea it doesn't matter is ridiculous & terrifying 
#Brexit: “I think it’s time that [Theresa May] looks at her time in office because I’m not sure she is the person to bring this back together again” says former adviser to the PM Tom Swarbrick#politicslive  
Good to see my brother @ottocrat get a shout-out by @AP today for his powerful form of anti-#Brexit activism via dark humour.But it failed to mention his embarrassing hobby of #knitting EU-patterned socks & hats! Check out his excellent podcast @CakeWatchCast with @GuitarMoog 
They predicted economic disaster from (1) leaving the ERM; (2) keeping the Pound £; (3) voting for Brexit. Wrong, wrong, wrong. Now they’re predicting disaster with a WTO Brexit.  Wrong again. 
Today is meant to be 2 weeks until Brexit day & it still can be. #Nodeal #brexit is still the legal default position & is written into law. #Brexiteers must stay strong, vote down #Maysdeal & if necessary call an election. May & the other remoaner MP's have stabbed us in the back 
Another priceless Brexit quote - from UKIP-ex Suzanne Evans….“The problem we have got is MPs voting with their own consciences and beliefs” #politicslive 
Why is the Irish #Brexit backstop a good thing for Northern Ireland?  1) It works 2) It places Northern Ireland in an advantageous position relative to Britain3) It has public support@SamuelMarcLowe writes in @prospect_uk 
Meet #BBCQT Tory plant, Henry Hendron. This ex-barrister is currently prohibited from practicing law because he supplied the drugs that killed his teenage boyfriend. Henry once represented Pro Brexit MPs Nadine Dorries & Nigel Evans.   
Our MPs failed us last night by voting to extend #article50#EU will punish us if they agree to an extension.It needs one #EU member state to say "No"We need politicians with a backbone not Cabinet Ministers who break collective responsibility! #Brexit @SocialM85897394#BBCQT 
Christchurch is a sickening indictment of the divisive & intolerant world we now occupy. A tragedy on all levels.If you use this as a perfect opportunity to start promoting the fucking EU or a 2nd referendum, you really are a trollful creature beneath all contempt. 
Brexit creates uncertainty. Uncertainty creates risk. Risk creates speculation. Speculation creates profit opportunities for those with money, and miserable prospects for the rest of us. 
The HoC voting down a second referendum is even more the reason to get out there and march. Let's show the world our determination to fight Brexit. Masses of people taking the streets of London will be the people's response to May and to the abstaining Labour. 
The DUP is holding “ongoing and significant discussions with Government” over Brexit — Press Association. 
JUST PUBLISHED The 'biggest democratic exercise in history'? - oh really?Time for parliament to ignore the referendum, take back control of UK democracy & #RevokeArticle50#TIG 
Looking at the European papers is exciting. They all seem to be talking about brexit being over and how foolish the British people were to think they would be able to leave the EU. One is even thanking Blair for his work and faith in believing brexit could be stopped. 
BREXIT: Pub chain Wetherspoon's profits plummet.. Boss Tim Martin blames remainers/#EU #Brexit #BrexitVote #FinalSay 
Brexit is the gift that keeps giving for magazine designers  
#ICYMI this week I & all @theSNP MPs voted....YES to a People’s Vote with the option to remain in EuropeYES to extend the Article 50 negotiating periodNO to Theresa May’s botched Brexit dealNO to leaving EU with no deal & we all signed amendment for independence 
EU will agree to extra time if there is a second Brexit referendum | News | The Times  
Joining the EU brought a sledgehammer to our fishing industry. It overwhelmingly voted to Leave, and has (again) been betrayed in May's deal. #brexit #FridayThoughts 
The Courts forced Parliament to make the Article 50 decision, notwithstanding the referendum.Parliament has now checked and shaped, and is now taming, the Executive's policy, despite every effort by the Executive to evade this.Could still fail, but this shows fitness.  
#NeonNazi #yellowpest twunt James Goddard’s YouTube channel has been demonetised for violating the platform’s policies on "hateful" and "incendiary and demeaning" content#brexit #bnp #ukip #dfla #tommyrobinson #yellowvestsuk 
NEW - With the UK in constitutional crisis, the EU confirming Russia interfered in the Brexit referendum campaign whilst British courts hear the PM accepts Leave illegally procured the result, @RobertCPalmer13 asks will parliament now reclaim sovereignty?  
Fun dinner last night with Irish Prime Minister @campaignforleo @JoeBiden @DanMulhall and others. PM was feeling confident that any Brexit deal would protect the peace process. 
The DUP says it is "involved in ongoing and significant discussions with the government" over Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal after MPs voted to make the government request an extension to Article 50 to delay the 29 March Brexit date 
I see A C Grayling has wasted no time in politicizing a devastating terrorist attack for his own agenda. Absolutely appalling. Can we please stop conflating Brexit with the important battles against fascism, intolerance and racism. THEY ARE SEPARATE BATTLES YOU FOOL.  
As Scotland's chances are being snuffed by Brexit and despite the evidence of independent countries like Ireland thriving - some folk don't want Scotland to match that   
And today, BBC are hosting former UKIP politician, Suzanne Evans, on their Politics Live programme. Before the referendum, she made numerous fear-inducing references to Turkey joining the EU. I'm not saying she is Islamophobic, but she shared a lot of stuff to feed Islamophobia.  
Thank you, young people and #climatestrike supporters of Leeds . While the grown-ups twist themselves in knots with #Brexit, #YouthStrike4Climate is taking action all across the UK in villages, towns and cities! 
This thug who assaulted a #Sodem protestor claims people who want a #PeoplesVote are "perverting democracy".He wouldn't recognise democracy if it bit his bum (which hopefully it will).#PutItToThePeople #PutItToThePeopleMarch #Brexit #StopBrexit 
It only takes 1 of the 27 EU member states to veto an extension to Article 50. If that happens, it is very likely that we are crashing out of the EU on March 29 with a no-deal Brexit by default.  
 NEW PODCAST Our latest #Think32 podcast features MEP Martina Anderson @M_AndersonSF discussing local & EU politics and - of course - #Brexit.#ThinkEU #DerryGirls 
Five thousand up. Thank you to all my followers new and old ... dare I say the real Brexit elite. 
Welsh cabinet tension over @FMWales' Brexit stance, says senior @WelshLabour source 
#Brexit has become idiots versus cunts. 
You were always welcome in London too.Lost influenceLost jobsLost reputationHappy now #brexit supporters? 
Brussels 'will demand a two-year delay to Brexit for a second referendum or softer deal' if May fails to get her deal through a third vote - as rebel Tory MPs warn her she will have to QUIT to win their support  via @MailOnline 
In response to lots of enquiries, we are pleased to confirm that, even in a no deal #Brexit, the tariff on imported #halloumi from #Cyprus will be zero. We know this will be warmly welcomed by Cypriot exporters and British consumers alike. @cyMCITpress @CostasKadis @GLakkotrypis 
#BREAKING France says Britain must offer 'clear' #Brexit response ahead of March 21 EU summit  
Actor Ray Winstone warns of "rebellion" over government handling of #Brexit  
Also: I am coming across Labour MPs who *support* a referendum but who say they'll vote for PM's deal next week because it won't happen 
BREAK: The DUP say they are “involved in ongoing and significant discussions with the government today.” #Brexit. 
I have this piece on how Brexit has shown the effectiveness of the UK constitution - and that the constitution is not "broken".There has been a political crisis, but not a constitutional one.As I currently don't have a personal blog, I need to find somewhere else for it. 
Sad to see my colleague @vincecable step down as Leader. He should be proud to have overseen our record party membership& I thank him for the strong leadership he's provided to the @LibDems throughout this #Brexit chaos, keeping the party united in our campaign for a #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May's Brexit deal is likely to be put to a third parliamentary vote on Tuesday, official says  
Today our Education Minister has announced that research in Welsh universities will benefit from an extra £6.6m #BritishScienceWeekIt's particularly important given ongoing #Brexit uncertainty.Read more  
My heart breaks for Muslims around the world and the people of New Zealand. Brexit did this, Trump did this, any place there is #Islamophobia did this. This heinous act of gun violence needs to be met with love, but also action. #NZMosqueShooting 
Gina Miller is back on our screens this lunchtime for #PoliticsLive . Gina was a big Labour Party doner until 2015 and Quite recently she admitted she fears Corbyn's democratic socialist policies more than Brexit.  
people are comparing Brexit to the fall of Rome but that surely didn't have as many moments of pure bathos  
Things that will finish me with the Conservative party for good:1. Mays fake Brexit deal passing the house2. extending Article 503. second referendum4. Theresa May continuing as PM after March 30th 
The European Union is poised to tell Theresa May that she must hold a second referendum or soften Brexit in return for them granting a lengthy delay to Britain’s departure date. EU will agree to extra time if there is a second referendum 
Family’s questions go unanswered after another QEUH patient dies. People die but Nicola yaps nonsensically about Brexit and independence. Except when insulting a police officer and agreeing her opponents are traitors. @cultfree54 @2351onthelist @JohnLeoNo1087 
All those who say they are bored with #Brexit and we should just get it over with, need to grasp that Brexit will just open up the doors to more years of bitter argument, chaos, division & uncertainty as the UK tries to rebuild its trading relations, including with the EU. 
#Brexit has not been the expected boon for eurosceptic parties. Populists have done well in several elections since the UK referendum, but the #EU’s negotiations with the UK have shown that leaving the Union is painful. 
You aren’t someone who is undergoing chemo, radiation therapy and a bone marrow transplant in Brazil because NHS oncologists say Brexit is jeopardizing cancer care. I am. This has already gone way past ‘a culture war’; Brexit is ruining the lives of real people. 
Portillo is only partly right.  He says that with no delay, Parliament would be required to vote for one of three things: May’s deal; or no deal; or no Brexit. But they don’t need to vote for no deal. If they do nothing, it happens by default on March 29th. 
“Alun Cairns has treated the people of Wales with contempt by voting to actively inflict the catastrophe of a no-deal Brexit on his country. He has made his position untenable and must resign immediately” - @JonathanPlaid 
The logic of Brexit is based on the assumption that the EU will implode. To acknowledge that the EU is stable or perhaps even growing more powerful so contradicts all the core assumptions of Brexit that those who back it cannot grapple with any signs of European strength 
I’ve only just noticed:We’re now going to the EU27 to ask for an extension to help us to avoid a No Deal Brexit, immediately after our government whipped MPs to keep No Deal as an option. 
I'm afraid of a society that refuses to call Brexit for what it is - a disaster capitalist power-grab, enabled by xenophobia and racism - and isn't willing to relate it to what happened in Northern Ireland thirty years ago, and to what happened in New Zealand today. 
Rather than our hard-working, responsible and generally well-educated young the government and the political elite prefer to pander to loud-mouthed yobs. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
Don’t be. I’m English but I speak French to my young children, as they’ll need it in the post Brexit world.  And to piss off any dinosaurs. If a ToryKipper ever comments to me on public transport, they will get a stream of anglo-saxon to make their xenophobic ears fall off. 
It's my weekly column on the latest Brexit Joy; we'll miss Brexit if it ever gets sorted  
A quick article by me in ⁦@heraldscotland⁩ on this week’s brexit dramas and the choices MPs have still not made. #buyapaper 
‘So whatever the outcome of the Brexit process, Ireland will remain a committed member of EU with all the solidarity, stability and certainty that membership brings’. Read speech to Bloomberg Centre, London here: . Great to meet @MyStephanomics there too! 
'Sadly, any wine chat is now ruined. Ruined because someone has to drop the Brexit bomb and start talking about how difficult it will be to import wine after Brexit and blah blah bore-off,' writes radio presenter @thejamesmax 
Got Me Knighthood, Ermine Next Sir Vince Cable confirms he will stand down in May as leader of the Lib-Dems, the UK’s Little Party. The former busted flush is planning to remain an MP and write books. It follows internal criticism for his lacklustre performance over Brexit.  
Remain MPs, who is this woman?  If you don't know, don't say another word about the supposed benefits of Single Market.(Answer is here: )#GoWTO #Brexit  
Profits at JD Wetherspoon fall by 19 per cent as Tim Martin slams "the establishment" over Brexit  
My therapist will be working overtime on Brexit when I see her | John Crace  
Theresa May's 'shameless' £1.6m Brexit bung for towns isn't even new money The Office for Budget Responsibility have confirmed the Stronger Towns Fund is not new money and will be met from existing budgets  
A senior Welsh Labour source says @fmwales position on Brexit is "confusing" and "not sustainable" and that he should be more willing to press for another Brexit referendum. Says there is, apparently "some tension within Cabinet" of Welsh Government on the issue. 
What the hell do you mean "if Brexit happens"? Maybe you should just be a little bit more honest with everyone and say "if democracy happens" because that is what you are trying to damage at the moment you anti-democratic waste of space! 
If you feel that lines of communication between citizens and elected representatives are fractured (Brexit?), think about the #DemocraticDeaficit experienced by deaf sign language users. We're heading into a year of evaluating ideas to tackle the issue.  
It's that time of week folks. For a set of assumptions that make Brexit look like Confucius. Wales by 3France by 10England by 15 
Have you noticed that neither Rees-Mogg, Gove, Borris Johnson or any other MP professing to be all for brexit has uttered a single word against the attack on our democracy. Not a single world. Only Farage speaks up. We have the wrong people in parliament for sure. 
This week has shown that the politicians cannot end the Brexit crisis themselves. The only path forward is to give the people the final say on this mess through a People's Vote with the option to stay in the EU. Add your name if you agree >  
BBC current affairs is a laughing stock..Govt/brexit mouthpiece. Now use CH4(superb) and SKY(very good) as my preferred sources of news.CNN for American viewpoints,Al Jazeera for balance. 
Just gonna leave this here. #Brexit 
Now Brexit is to be delayed, we must demand to take part in the EU elections, writes @JLongworthLML 
“I don’t think any of us can bear two more years of this” #choochoo #Portillo tells #DominicGrieve about achieving #Brexit by 29 March (and they look at voting figures) You can NOT TRUST @Conservatives or @UKLabour the THIEVES of #BREXIT! VOTE #BREXITPARTY 
The relationship between France, Germany and Britain is at the heart of the European story and three historical figures embody it. #Brexit 
To lighten this grim day, this thread is the funniest thread you will read on Brexit.  
Join me, @DawnHFoster and @michaeljswalker on today's #Novara FM as we break down the morass of parliamentary shenanigans and the deeper meaning of this week's Brexit shifts. Is No Deal finally off the table? @ResonanceFM at 1pm! 
Remain MPs are kicking the Brexit can down the road with the express  intent of scuppering Brexit altogether. They share a contempt for  British democracy in common with the worst EU bureaucrats.  
This ‘audience member’ is Henry Hendron - an ex-barrister currently prohibited from practicing law who has previously represented Brexit MPs Nadine Dorries & Nigel Evans, and who spoke at the Tory Conference in 1998.#bbcqt.Credit @martin_lowe 
Don't believe Messers Banks & Farage - Official in Italian Govt said "very unlikely" they'll block #Brexit extension request, dismissing as absurd suggestion that their populist Govt will cut deal with  Brexiteers in London. Same from  Polish Govt  
If Brexit is a disease, then @Coldwar_Steve's The Festival of Brexit, is the cure. A bit like Sylvester Stallone in Cobra, but with less violence and more Cilla.( Cillavester Stallone? )Buy it now! Wordery:  Amazon:  
Dear @theresa_may, you have handled Brexit appallingly and divided your country in the process. I hold YOU entirely responsible for this.Does that qualify me to be in your Cabinet? 
As PM May Moves to Delay Brexit, Here’s All the Times She Promised it On Time  
"Brexit is about rage and hate." Absolutely spot on and rage and hate breeds hate and rage. I watch this guy and even with the sound turned off my natural reaction is to punch him in the gob! 
Today's @standardnews #cartoon #Brexit #illustration #trump 
A group of @fishingforleave fishing boats has set off on the River Tyne to protest against the Prime Minister’s Brexit plans...Is that a French truck they are using?? #stopbrexit#RevokeA50 
GREAT BREXIT BETRAYAL: Parliament BACKS Article 50 Extension | Politicalite UK | Unreported News, Politics and Opinion  
Donald Trump: "I'm surprised at how badly Brexit is all gone," I gave Theresa May "ideas on how to negotiate... she didn't listen"Somebody who paid $130,000 for a one-night stand is in no position to criticize anybody's negotiating skills. 
While we've all been distracted by the big #Brexit votes in the Commons - some really interesting happenings in the Lords on the Trade Bill 1/ 
If Brexit is supposed to be a shining example of how straightforward and beneficial it is to leave the EU and go it alone, I think the EU's reputation is safe for now. 
Sitting in a seminar run by UK govt on the implications of Brexit for Erasmus funding.  The extent to which this madness is destroying student opportunities is heartbreaking. 
‘Britain has no leadership to give its MPs the courage they need to march away from the pharaohs of Brussels’.The British in the wilderness as Brexit crisis explodes 
So, "EU leaders could demand that Britain hold a second referendum as a condition for a longer extension."This is another example of why 17.4 million of us voted to leave. No foreign power should dictate terms to a nation which isn't (yet) a vassal. 
Guy Verhofstadt has implied that he would only favour any extension beyond May if we have an election or a second referendum. He fears 73 Nigel Farages around in the new European parliament.  
From @smh today: Tarrant claims conservative pundit Candace Owens to be the “particular person” who radicalised him the “most”.“Each time she spoke I was stunned by her insights and her own views helped push me further and further into the belief of violence over meekness.” 
Today of all days I celebrate my @techUK colleagues. Male, female, old, young, gay, straight, brexit, remain, left, right, muslim, jewish, privileged, pioneer, north, south, east, and west. We all have very different stories but we are all #Strongertogether #mytribe #techUK 
"They used to say Britain punched above its weight. But London has nothing on Dublin" - @EdwardGLuce on why the US-Irish relationship is critically important on Brexit  
According to the flat earthers, Australia doesn’t exist. It’s just an elaborate hoax. They probably also think that Britain will take back control after Brexit.  
The problem is Ben, she brings her deal back for MV3 next week. If (I accept it's a big if), her motion is allowed by the speaker (like MV2) unamended & it passes, you and the LP will have seen Brexit agreed without ever voting for a PV.  People won't forget. 1/ 
Remainers and the EU aren't scared of Brexit being a disaster there scared it will be a success. 
2. And, whatever people say, the Leave campaign has provided succour to people like this. They are not really bothered about Europe. I am convinced that it is about “political correctness”. Brexit provides their racist views with a convenient cloak of perceived respectability. 
Majority of Britons Don’t Want Brexit to be Delayed  
If the country has shifted to remain, a second referendum is essential to inform the government. If, presented with May’s deal, they STILL want to leave, then what's the problem? Plus, it could be legally binding this time. And include British citizens in the EU. Real democracy!  
Racists are so blinded by their bigotry they are very bad even at racism. Brexit will make the UK more multi cultural, not less. It is actually one of the small upsides. 
Whether brexit is right or wrong is a matter of opinion. Whether this government is right or wrong in what it has done and is doing is a matter of fact and it is obscenely wrong. Our country has never seen such an attack on its democracy. 
Proud to be part of the @ofocbrexit campaign who, alongside @FFSake_ , are ensuring young people are heard in the Brexit debate! #peopelsvote #brexit #BrexitMayhem 
The sheer arrogance of the #Remain majority of MPs in the HOC is breath-taking!The whole place needs a thorough clear-out at the next General Election.A betrayal of the UK Electorate by these anti-democratic, referendum & 2017GE manifesto promise breakers will guarantee that! 
Politics - The Great Irrelevance to Human Life - The David Icke Dot-Connector Videocast  #Brexit  
THESE MURDERS ARE YOUR FAULT JOHNSON.YOU: Campaigned on an anti-immigrant Prospectus Created a Brexit which  unleashed the Far Right Conspire with Bannon in spreading Far Right GloballyAttack Muslims with racist hate speechYou & your global cabal are to blame  
Radio Essex:Ray Winstone has warned of a “rebellion” if the Brexit vote is overturned and there is another ref insisting that the UK should “just walk away”. "It looks like they’re not doing what the country wants, which is not democracy, so we should just walk away.” 
'EU will agree to extra time if there is a second referendum'.Of course: there have been 48 referendums on EU integration and accession, of the 48, whenever they've gone against EU integration, Brussels has always asked the member state to vote again.  
The trouble is the only arguments that would get through to the likes of him, put us in the same racist boat. The reality of Brexit is we are going to swap white east European christian migrants for brown predominently muslim ones. I doesnt bother me but it would bother him. 
'Go back to your country': join some dots. They go all the way to New Zealand and back. From passive xenophobia to active hate, this is a cancer in our world. And unquestionably, Brexit has stirred it up in our country, and that's a disgrace.  
Will your butt plug still work in Europe after Brexit or will you have to buy some sort of adaptor? 
4/ @jeremycorbyn gave his strongest statement yet at the dispatch box after the vote in favour of another referendum This followed @Keir_Starmer’s excellent & crystal clear assurances in his speech, which is worth reading in full. 
Geoffrey Cox’s New “Legal Advice” on Brexit Incentivises Unionist Violence - Brexit has revealed further the rottenness of the British political Establishment, but I am still truly shocked now to see the Government of the United Kingdom negotiating a  
A small piece on some implications for Irish diplomacy of Brexit. Prefaces a larger (gloomier) piece due for presentation at upcoming ⁦@DCU_Brexit_Inst⁩ conference. “Brexit, Diplomacy, and Defence | Irish Politics Forum”  
North-South, Kurd-Arab, Sunni-Shia joint prayer, the first time this has happened since the referendum  
Who governs Britain? Drop what you’re doing and take 60seconds to read this. Brilliant piece by ⁦@henrymance⁩ in ⁦@FT⁩ on the UK constitutional crisis that Brexit is exposing:   
European leaders warn they'll say no to Brexit delay without clear explanation of what UK wants  
My hot take on the Brexit shitshow  
Who is the current Brexit Secretary? I  only ask because I’m worried it’s my turn and nobody’s told me. 
Fun piece by @henrymance on Brexit and the constitution, but it could not be more wrong.Brexit has shown our constitution *not* to be broken.  Do not confuse political havoc for constitutional havoc.The curious thing is that Brexit has not caused a constitutional crisis.  
Want to catch up on a week of Brexit chaos? Here we take you through each day with the help of ⁦@jessphillips⁩ ⁦@Jacob_Rees_Mogg⁩ ⁦@SamGyimah⁩ ⁦@EmilyThornberry⁩ ⁦@DrPhillipLeeMP⁩ and brilliant analysis by ⁦@rowenamason⁩ 
2/ The overwhelming majority of MPs on both sides who back a #FinalSay #PeoplesVote abstained yesterday because we believed that was the best way of delivering the biggest Commons coalition for another referendum at the right time. 
Welcome news that in a No Deal #Brexit, #Cyprus is preparing legislation to allow Britons already living here a grace period of one year to get their MEU1/3 after Brexit Day. We thank the Cypriot authorities for continuing to safeguard rights of British citizens.  
Just saw horrifying Christchurch news. Let's be clear: This attack - This is Trump. This is Bannon. This is FoxNews, Breitbart, Brexit. It is angry western exceptionalism & white supremacy. It is an utterly evil, poisonous movement. Alt righters will condemn it, but this is them 
We can't say we weren't warned. Olly Robbins made it clear it was the "deal" or an extension back in February. And blow the referendum result. So much for the people. The arrogance is stunning.  
He is Henry Hendron - an ex-barrister currently prohibited from practicing law who has previously represented Brexit MPs Nadine Dorries & Nigel Evans, and who spoke at the Tory Conference in 1998.#bbcqt @bbcquestiontime @BBCPolitics #PoliticsLive @lbc #bbcaq 
The fight we are seeing now over #brexit is the fight and debate that we should've been having for 2.5 years.Both the government and the opposition are complicit in delaying debate to run down the clock.This is a complete stitch up.#stopbrexit NOW 
“Brexit Ruined My Dinner Parties”, actual headline in today’s @FT showing there is no end to the suffering. 
One thing @CONservatives don’t seem to’ve grasped is that if @Theresa_May’s deal passes, they will pay the price at the ballot box come the next election. For two simple reasons: 1. It’s not actually Brexit 2. It’s a bad, botched deal that’s going to have serious consequences. 
"A healthy Brexit must include.. maintaining current standards of care and not increasing workforce challenges when changing immigration rules for non-UK staff...concerns that funding for health may be diminished in a post-Brexit world."  
Oh MAY-tron!The front page of today’s Irish Examiner.#Brexit #CarryOn 
Great event with @DaraDoy talking about Brexit, investment in Ireland and the political landscape into the future.  Talking to @flacqua now for @BloombergTV 
Don’t miss this tonight #MinersStrike #TonyBenn #Brexit @talkRADIO #Moats 7pm 
Superb, concise analysis. Really nods at the core of why Brexit happened. (In short, some very wealthy people were fed up with the regulatory power of the EU, so went on a campaign to harness people’s anger at globalisation, and direct it against the EU).  
The people frustrating Brexit are the ones who need to be sidelined. They're the ones who have said that Democracy doesn’t cut the mustard anymore. Let’s be undemocratic they have decided & they’ve forgotten the history of these islands. #csm #BrexitMayhem 
The Brexit deadline may be extended, but the deadline for entries to the Paul Foot Award for investigative and campaigning journalism isn't - all entries must be in by 2nd April. You can check out the previous winners here:  
Calling all people who voted remain. #Brexit #Remainers If MPs succeed in betraying a majority vote and we end up staying in the EU.I hope you enjoy waving your sons & daughters off to war in the EU’s new global security role. 
The argument that revoking Article 50 isn't blocking Brexit - just stopping the current, failed Brexit process - needs making loud and fast. Because we're going to need to give MPs who promised not to "block Brexit" a way of climbing down. 
Even by the chaotic standards of the three years since the referendum, Britain is lost   
What's driving auto companies out of Europe? Sluggish markets, competition from Silicon Valley, tighter emissions standards and Brexit uncertainty.  
9 months ago Lib Dem MEP Catherine Bearder and Academic AC Grayling met with lead Brexit negotiator for the EU Parliament Guy Verhofstadt and instructed him on the best ways to disrupt or stop Brexit. At no time did Femi accuse these People's Vote campaigners of being "traitors".  
Edward Luce: "a hard deal Brexit would trigger an equally hard Irish-American roadblock. Why jeopardise peace in Ireland... in quest of a US trade deal that’ll hit instant roadblocks in DC? It’s worth dwelling on that catch-22"   
Great thread. The short term pre-referendum Treasury forecast was wrong, but economists without a line to push (especially OBR) got the impact of the Brexit referendum on the last two years broadly right.  
Who is damaging our Brexit?> The EU - Tusk, Verhofstadt, Rumpoy> EU Stooges - Blair, Campbell, Soubry, Branson> Pro EU money & agitators - Soros> Rogue Lords & MPs - Rudd, Wollasaton, Adonis> The pro-EU MSM - BBC, Sky> Thick/hoodwinked/lying Remainers> Corbyn> Mrs May 
Brexit which has been an exploded British bomb of nostalgia from World War II, now literally uncovering actual British bombs from World War II.It’s almost as if god is a satirist  
Donald Tusk wants a long delay to Brexit... is it any wonder?  
Donald Trump says he 'hates' to see Brexit being 'ripped apart'' | via @telegraph  unimaginable that the Govt and PM have put own agenda above the democratic people's vote #BrexitWTO 29th March 
#Zakharova: On March 18, 2014 #Crimea was reintegrated into Russia. For us, the issue of Crimea has been resolved forever, its reunification with #Russia being the result of Crimeans’ free will expressed in a referendum  
When will our Quisling MPs realise that a clean WTO Brexit is not “a catastrophe”, but an escape route? 
I think in times like this where we see barbaric attack in #NewZealandShooting and the madness on our own shores of #brexit selling away our future i think @mrjamesob on @LBC will be providing some good context for us to take heed! 
No one even close to being in his right mind can look at the behaviour of this government and not realise that something is now seriously wrong. This is not about brexit now, its about losing our country, our future and everything else to a corrupt band of globalists. Wake up ! 
Britain's future to be decided by MACRON and MERKEL: How MPs have GIVEN UP Brexit control  
"As representatives of the people, you are obliged to deliver Brexit. Deal or no deal."No deal should not have been taken off the negotiating table. Parliament has weakened the Government's position and our chance to get a good deal.#bbcqt pic.twitter.com/QmLsJKyHI4 
Why MPs won’t be forgiven for defying voters over Brexit:  
I seem to remember you supporting Brexit which has unleashed racism and xenophobia in this country. 
Nigel Farage is working with other EU nation states to try to manufacture a veto of the UK's Article 50 extension request. This would force a No Deal Brexit onto the UK. It will collapse the economy, cost lives and sink the UK into international obscurity...#Treason #BrexitCrisis 
WINSTONE: Second referendum would lead to 'rebellion'. “It looks like they’re not doing what the country wants, which is not democracy, so we should just walk away.”  
‘What did you do during the Brexit wars grandpa?’‘Well, I was snarky on Twitter until March 14th 2019, but then I went back to reading long Russian novels.’ 
How the Speaker of the House of Commons calls a vote on Brexit  
So now our MPs have arrogantly ignored the will of 17 million British people and have taken the first steps to halt Brexit. At the same time they are prosecuting an elderly British soldier who may or may not have committed a crime 50 years ago. I'm so proud of our MPs 
Meeting my Danish Colleague Minister Anders Samuelsen @anderssamuelsen in Copenhagen @DanishMFA this morning, as part of #StPatricksDay programme to discuss #Brexit. I took the opportunity to thank the Danish Govt and its people for their solidarity during this process   
Remain ministers who abstained on a three line whip in order to frustrate Brexit are entirely lacking in honour and courage.  
In run-up to European Council on 21/22 March just had working breakfast with @eucopresident Donald Tusk. We discussed internal market, climate, EU-China Summit preparations and of course #Brexit. Current withdrawal agreement is only deal on table.  
Britain will have plenty of scope to cause trouble in Brussels after delay to BrexitMy latest @Telegraph comment: 
My point from last night: The problem about Brexit is not uncertainty about Brexit, it is Brexit... it is moving to a regime of persistent uncertainty (see below). Thanks to DAFM @KingsCollegeLon (and to @susiesymes1 for noting) Video and slides to post on Monday also @PIIE 
This looks like the best way out of the Brexit mess from @peterkyle and @MPphilwilson - vote through Theresa May's 'deal' but only on condition it is put to a public vote, with Remain being the alternative. 
Thanks to all at @IrelandEmbGB last night for a fabulous #StPatricksDay reception. It was the perfect balm for refugees from @HouseofCommons & #Brexit & a great reminder of the incredible soft power of a small but dynamic #EU member state 
Parliament’s plot to thwart Brexit is complete | Coffee House  
This endless talk about 17m feelin betrayed if Brexit doesn't happn.... What about the 48million that will be betrayed if it does? 
So, things just got (even more) complicated. Here's the latest flowchart, taking into account last night's vote and the commitments made by the government on indicative votes. #Article50 #Brexit  
"Doctors and pharmacists are being told not to give patients extra prescriptions in advance after Brexit...The NHS has stockpiled medication in case of difficulties in the event the UK leaves the EU without a deal at the end of this month." 
There is only one group of MPs fighting to stop the catastrophic Brexit.There is only one leader showing the leadership and courage needed.That leader is @ChukaUmunna of @TheIndGroup 
And before the Referendum - here 3 days before - mainstream economists made predictions which were highly accurate 
Is Brexit forcing the carmaking industry out of Britain? It’s not quite so simple. Here are some of the forces reshaping the industry.  
The shameful mess that the Conservatives have made of the Brexit process will have a real-world cost 
The WA deal is NOT Brexit.  
The 190 @Conservatives MPs who bravely voted against delaying Brexit need a plan for what happens when MV3 is lost. They cannot let the PM go to Brussels to beg for a humiliating delay, even if that means lying on the tarmac in front of the plane. Get your act together now. 
Let’s look at the development of these forecasts. At first, Brexit-supporting economists did well as the economy held up better than expected. But the good times did not last.... ... and now the optimism looks more like blind faith...... faith, based on nothing  
Number 10's entrapment strategy continues: vote for the deal by 20 March and there'll be a short delay to #Brexit (courtesy of the EU); if you don't there will be a "more substantial" delay (also courtesy of the EU). 
If the will of the House has to be respected on No Deal, presumably it also now has to be respected over a second referendum. 
"This is about holding the conservative party together, not our country"@labourlewis says James Cleverly is "chatting breeze" when he accuses Labour of not reaching out to find a consensus on Brexit.  
The white man who killed nearly 50 Muslims wasn’t insane or lonely or have a bad upbringing, he released a manifesto clearly stating he’s a “regurlar white man”. He’s a terrorist & a direct result of right wing rhetoric. You can say w/e you want but Brexit & Trump fueled this. 
#Brexit is a disruption to trade in #EU & especially #Ireland. I want to assure Irish farmers that EU resolve will not buckle: solidarity behind Ireland remains rock solid, steadfast, & unwavering. @EU_Commission has a strong toolbox of support measures ready to go.  
Brexit news summary, Fri 15 March 2019:1. CNBC said it had seen 93 large company `earning calls` from S&P 500 companies, all cite the negative impact of Brexit on their business during the last 3 months 
The "Just get on with it" brigade seem to be winning. No longer able to argue that Brexit will benefit the UK in any tangible way, they've pulled out the big guns: the irresistible argument that burning the UK to the ground is preferable to the tediousness of the Brexit debate. 
Most Tory & Labour MPs are denying a #PeoplesVote & seeking to rule out UK participation in EU elections. Democrats?MEPs are our voice in the EUWe don't need Faragists slagging off the EU we need friends!He & #Brexiters harm Us.Long Ext or #RevokeA50Let us vote!No #Brexit 
What do you think should happen within the Brexit extension period, if agreed by EU27?Pls RT 
It's hard to believe but our youngsters have got it. And good luck to them in their #ClimateChange protests today. They understand the vital issues we face. Meanwhile our politicians are endlessly fighting over a completely needless #Brexit while the planet burns. #Priorities 
I take it last nights #bbcqt was 45 minutes of Brexit talk again, right? Brexit really has been a god send to our Tory bias broadcasting corp. They have used it as a centre piece of topic for years to give this murderous Government a free pass to do what the hell they like. 
Oh, today of all days, just a reminder that @Nigel_Farage said if he didn't get the Brexit he wanted, when he wanted it, he would "put on the khaki" and "pick up my rifle". He also said, on June 24th 2016, that Britain had had a Revolution without a shot fired in anger, days... 
Making sense of the week - #Brexit diagram V18 UK requests long extension: 84% No Deal 15% Gen Election 33% May's Deal 16% #PeoplesVote 15% Rescind Art50 1% UK in EU until 2020 19% Spiral of tedium now eliminated 
President Trump on Brexit: "I can tell you it's a very complex thing that's going on right now. It's tearing the country apart. It's actually tearing a lot of countries apart. And it's a shame that it has to be that way."  
"I want Brexit to get back British identity"I feel most British when I'm living in another European country. Being "the British guy" becomes an explicit part of my identity compared to everyone around me.Isolation doesn't strengthen our Britishness. It makes it less meaningful. 
I’ve been told many times Brexit is about democracy. No it isn’t. It’s about a group of far right spivs hijacking democracy & fraudently fixing the referendum for their own gain. 
Britain’s parliamentarians are in revolt against the electorate. They are pursuing a coup, albeit a bloodless one, against the public. This is what last night’s votes against a no-deal Brexit reveal: that our representatives now refuse to represent us!  
Fed up of reading yet another commentary piece describing Brexit shenanigans as a "pantomime". Pantomime is fun. 
By voting to Extend Article 50, delay Brexit and STOP us leaving as planned on March 29th, MPs have broken their promises and are shamefully defying the wishes of the majority of the people. Only UKIP is standing up for Brexit and #ForTheNation 
Brought to you by the hard right Brexit-supporting U.K. media - your pals Theresa #ChristchurchMosqueAttack #nzattack 
I can't quit believe what I'm witnessing here in the United Kingdom, home of democracy, having fought off fascism & defended itself against tyranny we're now having it forced upon us via a privileged metropolitan elite, how can a 4 MP majority vote override 17.4 million?#Brexit  
Tonight @talkRADIO #Moats I will address the life of Mr #Benn the murder of 50 #Muslims in NZ the killing of #Brexit It will an important edition of the #UniversityOfTheAirwaves Please don’t miss it. 
UNCUT | The key question that needs to be answered is why Britain has chosen to leave the EU, the bloc's chief Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier tells Daniel Cohn-Bendit in an EXCLUSIVE unedited interview 
Have you been afraid of speaking your language in public since the Referendum? Please tell us your stories 
When Brexit stops being an abstract and takes a definable form, support for it slips away.READ @lara_spirit's article in today's @timesredbox 
Discover the highlights of this week's plenary session: Preparations for no-deal Brexit Fight against misinformation  Plans to cut greenhouse gas emissionsWatch the video to find out more   
Damian Green called Brexit Protester Steve Bray a "wanker" because he was, erm, protesting. He said "I think that was a piece of analysis. Political analysis, which I stand by" - another analysis is that Green is a disgraced ex-Cabinet member who shld probably keep his head down!  
Britain's future to be decided by MACRON and MERKEL: MPs have given up ownership of Brexit  
I would say this wouldn’t I, but think ⁦@FraserNelson⁩ is spot on about why Tory MPs should get this Brexit deal over the line on Tuesday   
Well said. The truth about Brexit is finally dawning on the public misled by the sunlit uplands promises of Leave campaign. It may still be possible to have a 2nd Referendum #PeoplesVote with a Remain option or a much softer EEA & CU type Brexit which won't damage our economy.  
"The European Union is poised to tell Theresa May that she must hold a second referendum or soften #Brexit in return for them granting a lengthy delay to Britain’s departure date." 
Great reports from @guardian on today's global #SchoolStrike4Climate. Dear other UK media, including @BBCNews, there's a world beyond Brexit: ps give the 1000s of young people taking action the coverage they deserve and our planet needs.#FridayForFuture 
Great news that Team Sky Pro Cycling Team has got new sponsorship. Team Brexit will be sponsored by a chemical company owned by Jim Ratcliffe. Jim is a big cycling fan who moved to Monaco to keep his money safe and to be near Sir Froome and Thomas Geraint! Chateau Team Brexit!! 
To be clear, there is no such thing as a Brexit plan that can protect jobs, rights & our security.Repeating this lie over and over does not change that reality.  
She gets it. Take the win we have and sort the rest out later. If the Tories don't deliver Brexit then they are finished forever.  
Farage seems to have made so much cash out of Brexit, you'd think he'd be supporting an extension of Art 50. 
I was interested to hear that only 85 MPS voted for a second referendum - is that right? 
Brexit has always been about small-minded men thinking small   
I’ll be talking to @DaraDoy for @business this morning on recent political events, Brexit, the Irish economy and Ireland’s place in a changing world.  
Parliament armed with all the Brexit facts and risks of the deal has rejected May’s deal twice and with historical majorities.But the narrow result of 2016 advisory plebiscite (steeped in fantasies, lies, fraud and foreign interference) is still being hailed as decisive.  
"If Tory politicians truly believed we must forget the past and move on, they would not be trying to drag us back there" - My column in today's @irishdailymail on #BloodySunday and its legacy for #Brexit  
Millions of working-class people voted for Brexit because they have the most to gain from Brexit. The reason the elite hate Brexit so much is that it has given ordinary people a voice, writes @jowilliams293 
Significant 4 Lab frontbenchers felt strongly enough to vote against referendum last night & give up posts when easy option to abstain 
This is the youth movement pushing for a second Brexit referendum  
Days in markets without a Brexit vote :(  
"It's the most problematic part of the Brexit process but at times you can't even see it". The problem is Brexit, not @BorderIrish 
Government deadlocked. Parties divided.The constitution cracking. My long read on what the Brexit crisis tells us about our politics 
Exactly. Honour the referendum? Sure. I would love for democracy to be respected and for that illegally procured “victory” to be voided.Cheats must not win. Otherwise it simply tells me that it’s open season on any public vote. 
WATCH: Northern Ireland has a massive democratic and Brexit seeks to only damage this more. Co founder Doire Finn explains why a People's Vote is the only way to protect the futures of young people In Northern Ireland #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Great read from @henrymance on how Brexit has shattered the link between direct and parliamentary democracy.In the 1975 and 2011 referendums, MPs’ views were aligned with the public.On Brexit, there's a yawning democratic divide:  
This is absolutely disgusting. Just as the Brexit drama was making for fascinating television viewing, I will now have to watch days of maudlin multicultural propaganda instead. 
How much real influence do you think Speaker John Bercow is having over the Brexit process?Watch Laura Perrins' view from 2017 when Bercow was last engulfed in a Brexit impartiality row.  
Oh dear me! Wrong again, @DavidLammy !  Nigel Farage has brought about Brexit, spent years debating, on committees and in the EU on legislative work while absolutely and rightfully railing against the political class.  He speaks for 17.4 million people- you total doughnut, Lammy.  
Why has @BBCr4today @bbclaurak @bbcnickrobinson never mentioned that this unwanted #Brexit's based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o ConsentOthering not TogetheringThe Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the Ppl?Odd isn't it. 
Brexit or not, the sun did set on the British Empire on Aug 15,1947.Everything else is just  aftershock.  
Today, the people of #Crimea begins to celebrate the 5th anniversary of the historical events of the Crimean Spring.#CrimeaIsRussia#Crimea #Russia #Referendum #March2014 #Крым #Россия 
Unacceptable.  EU will agree to extra time if there is a second Brexit referendum | News | The Times  
More plants of raving Brexiteers in BBC audiences. Their role in the Brexit crisis is a scandal. The law forces me to pay an annual licence fee to keep these overpaid UKIP/Tories in power. Yet they in return deny me my rights as an EI citizen  
Global trade and brexit top of the agenda @farmersjournal @GrantThorntonIE conference this morning 
Brexit is a failed project. It is now clear to all but the most infected diehards that it is damaging lunacy. 
Based on personal experience talking to many people about Brexit, the will of people, I promise you, is neither Leave nor Remain. The will of the people is quite simply: we've had enough hearing or talking about it, we're bored now. 
He also told Theresa May that Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit plan would break the deadlock.But I'm sure that point was raised many a time on your show last night...#CorbynsCustomsUnion 
So looks like U.K. may be in the eu elections. If that is the case we must kick out the brexit supporting meps. Let’s start getting the word out@brexit_sham @Lawyers4EU @abcpoppins 
Good. Because what we need is an opposition party willing to look into the illegality fraud and foreign manipulation surrounding the referendum. Democracy did not stop in 2016 and Brexit is not above scrutiny the law or continuing democracy. All the best. #brexit 
Wow, Brexit must be really powerful to influence a different country thousands of miles away, which is not in the EU and never has been...  
Would you rather: a UK at the head of Europe or the feet of Donald Trump?Watch what happened when @Femi_Sorry and @gracefituk talked Brexit.  
If anyone screwed #Brexit then it's the ERG who turned a relatively pedestrian proposition into a full blown campaign to end formal relations with the EU in peacetime on the basis of a flimsy economic theory. Did they seriously expect parliament to roll over and let them do it? 
I accessed the 'British identity in the Neolithic / Stonehenge' Telegraph article. There is a lot of troubling stuff here & not just in terms of the journalist's spin - there are direct quotes from the lead researcher eg 'This was a late Neolithic Brexit' #brexitprehistory 
Brexit dominates Friday's headlines following MPs' vote to delay EU departure 
Spot on "Far from asserting parliamentary sovereignty and ‘taking back control of Brexit’, by voting against no-deal MPs have just handed the keys to the whole process and thereby to our democracy to unelected Eurocrats."  
Cost Of Unpaid Student Loans 'Could Blow £12bn Hole In Government's Brexit War Chest' Ministers have not been honest with taxpayers about the cost of the system.  
You respect a vote so contaminated by the corruption of foreign powers, lies, deceit and criminality. If you believe in democracy you would back a second referendum now the voter knows the consequences. That is democracy. If you want to vote Leave again you can. Flawed judgement.  
Difficulties explaining Brexit to my 4 yr old daughter. News on in kitchen prompted her to say: “What’s wrong with breadsticks?” My wife then said: “it’s all about a vote” to which she said: “What, strictly?” 
A delayed Brexit will be disastrous for the EU, writes ⁦@LiamHalligan⁩ 
“Parliament does not want to rejoin the EU, it does not want a referendum. It cannot ask for an extension to implement the deal if MPs don’t want the deal...Once you have eliminated all the alternatives, the conclusion is...the UK will leave on 29th March”  
Brexit is about rage and hate. Violence is a new political normal in England.  
Mor UK job being lost due to Body Shop to axe jobs as it announces move to Germany. I wonder how long it's going to take Brexit disaster deniers to say it was the diesel crisis? via @MetroUK 
All those ‘delivering’ #brexit are Remainers. That’s why it’s looking like shit right now. #StandUp4Brexit & RT if you agree. pic.twitter.com/Yf0XVAslDl 
#Brexit This is what 17.4 million that voted leave the EU think of Steve I love myself Bray. Where’s the cameras haven’t filmed me shouting stop brexit for  15 minutes.  
Brexit has been toxic.Not one redeeming feature.  
#Brexit#BrexitLIES#BrexitBETRAYAL#BrexitVote#NotMyVOTE#LeaveMeansLeave#PoliticsNotDEMOCRACYWHAT MORE CAN I SAYPROFESSIONAL POLITICIANSTHESE ARE PROFESSIONAL POLITICIANSNOTREPRESENTATIVESOF THE PEOPLE#TheDayDemocracyDIED 
On Brexit.The policy of the government has changed and the position of Parliament has changed.But.The legal position so far is unchanged. There is a non-trivial chance that it will not change.That would mean UK leaves EU without a deal two weeks today.Not there yet. 
Just a reminder that with May's Brexit deal, we would still be paying in to the EU until 2028 & will be responsible for liabilities until 2064.Remind me again, why it's a good thing to pay & have no say? #RemainAndReform#StopBrexit #FridaysforFuture @IndyCouncilGrp 
A really important point from @ChrisGiles_  that the economic costs of Brexit shouldn’t be thought of in financial crisis-like terms (an analytical mistake I made right after the vote, I confess).  
Hold your nerves, ERG and DUP: Ignore the nay-sayers – here’s why we’re still on course for a clean Brexit on 29th March  via @BrexitCentral 
 via @GuidoFawkesA list of all those that agreed to delay Brexit.Good idea to keep the list for the next time you have to vote at a GE and wish to take your revenge perhaps. 
If #Remain had won the Referendum Britain would have stayed in the European UnionBut Leave won the National Referendum. So we are staying in the European Union 
When will everyone wake up and realise Corbyn’s proposals are the only decent and viable solution to this Brexit crisis.#BrexitCrisis #LabourBrexitDeal 
Interestingly #Portillo on #bbcthisweek last evening forecast EU would refuse to extend A50 & 3 options would be presented to HofC1/ May's Deal2/ No Deal3/ No BrexitPortillo concluded by saying he thought MP's would vote for No Brexit & would be forever damned by electorate  
Absolutely farcical. This and the #Brexit chaos is why the country is losing even more faith in our politicians. Time to get some consensus and put it back to the people for a #finalsay @peoplesvote_uk 
LEAVE: Cabinet Ministers rebel to vote against Brexit delay. Good to see some MPs stand up for the pro-Brexit majority!  
At least the violent man in this clip won't be getting away with what he did...  #Brexit #FBPE 
If you favour a fresh referendum, don’t be put off by politicians who say ‘We’ve had the vote: live with the result.’ Theresa May’s had two votes now, and she’s now looking for a third. 
Exclusive: Essex-based actor Ray Winstone says he fears there will be civil unrest and a rebellion if the referendum result is overturned by MPs in Westminster #Brexit pic.twitter.com/m1eXbCY2Iw 
Yesterday the Brexit Secretary voted against the motion he’d just spoken in favour of. He took over from a Brexit Secretary who resigned in protest against the Brexit deal he’d just negotiated. This is Political Psychosis. 
Coming Soon on Brexitshambles: NEW from @RobertCPalmer13 Solving the Constitutional Crisis: The Will of Parliament or the Will of the People? -'The European Parliament voted that Russian State actors ‘interfered in the Brexit referendum campaign using overt and covert means.'  
Remember, the UK will be subject to the EU Anti-Tax-Fiddle Directive under *all* #Brexit scenarios *except* "no deal" - which fully explains why the rich, the tax-fiddlers & the ERG want "no deal" so, so, so much.  
Don’t worry Chris, there are enough of us who will stick with our election promise and see through Brexit.  
Cool, cool. So it wasn’t the Tories who cut funding for renewables? Who pushed Fracking despite local protests? Who give billions in subsidies to fossil fuel companies? Who REMOVED Climate Change from school curriculums? Who are using Brexit to bulldoze environmental protections?  
Anyone who met with Bannon. Anyone who approved of Zac Goldsmith’s mayoral campaign. Pretty much all the ‘bad boys of Brexit’. And of course in the US pretty much the whole Trump lot. Trump himself. 
WATCH: Audience Demolishes 'Arrogant' Second Referendum Politicians on #BBCQT  
EU Brexit lawAgreed text of no deal legislation ready for adoption1 social security - 2 Erasmus - 3 road transport - 4 flights - 5 air safety -  
Theresa May’s Tory Brexit Secretary closing the debate “it’s time to act in the National Interest and I commend this to the house” 5 seconds later he voted against it!!!  you What!!!! Hahahaha!!! FFS!!!   
Amber Rudd David GaukeGreg ClarkDavid Mundell Claire Perry (Business and Energy Minister)Chancellor Philip Hammond deserves a place all of his own for openly pushing the government to not even a Brexit in name only but a Labour/Tory remainer coalition.  
The votes this week don’t change anything. Any changes to the Withdrawal Act still need to be passed in legislation moved by the Govt.70% of Conservatives’ members & voterbase want Brexit.Theresa May faces a stark choice between her deal or her party. 
The EU27 inc Ireland will have a veto over our trade deal. Our behaviour shows we cannot be trusted. The withdrawal agreement is the easiest part of Brexit.  
The European Union is poised to tell Theresa May that she must hold a second referendum or soften Brexit in return for them granting a lengthy delay to Britain’s departure date  
In addition to that  important point, is the fact that the referendum was corrupted! It was hacked +the result should be discredited. The investigation into Banks etc has shown it affected 800,000 votes. Much more than the difference between L and R. Why respect a corrupt vote?? 
Bear this on your conscience with absolute certaintyIf you support the alt-right, if you voted for Trump or brexit, if you participate in cmcsgt or any other right wing institutions, this is your problem, the shooter was one of yours and you flamed this fire. 
Are you angry about the failure of our politicians to recognise that Brexit has failed & it is time to revoke Article 50? Then please join us on the People’s Vote march in London next Saturday. We have a limited number of tickets left for...  
David Lidington all but accepts that there will now be a long extension & he hasn’t the faintest clue how Brexit will be resolved! @BBCr4today 
The inability to deliver what we voted for is down to THEIR political incompetence, it is NOT down to our vote.THEY overwhelming voted to trigger #Article50, knowing the TWO possible outcomes. It’s simple: Deal or #NoDeal.#Brexit #StandUp4Brexit 
Under the Conservative government we’ve had:- Higher tuitions fees - High house prices - Brexit- Rising knife crimeI dunno if Labour can do a better job but it’s time for the Conservatives to go. 
“A certain coldness from the EU was to be expected after the referendum. What was not expected was the readiness of British MPs to collude with Brussels in the hope of frustrating the largest vote in British history”  
17:4 million people expect delivery on the mandate they gave to Parliament. Delaying Brexit doesn't make matters easier. We need to start taking decisions and leave on 29th March  
Quick (theoretical) question, what would be the best way to make money out of Brexit (not for everyone, for people/hedge funds wealthy enough to buy money)?- The UK crashes out on March 29- Everyone thinks it will, and at the last minute, A50 is revoked and the UK remains. 
Gotcha! “ You are rigging the referendum from the start”...Andrew Neil destroys arch-Remoaner Dominic Grieve and forces him to admit to wanting a rigged, unfair referendum.  Watch right to the end where Grieve says “It’s true.”  
‘In many ways it’s even worse than being a member of the European Union, in terms of us being bound in to European rules.’MEP Nigel Farage says Theresa May’s Brexit deal is a ‘horrendous mess’, and Britain should ignore the ‘doom-mongering’ and leave at any cost on March 29th.  
No. Younger readers should start with the labour manipulation of the 1979 devo referendum and study the McCrone Report for some context, then decide if labour sold out Scotland then and continues to do so now. 
Early point of yesterday's SODEM. Me standing there quietly with my anti Brexit sign as class of European students take group photos.Teacher: "Excuse me, please be in our photo!"Me: "Oh, uh, sure."Teacher leads me over and puts arm around me as photos are taken. 
Anyone watching this can see that @jonsnowC4 is no impartial commentator. He’s just another hysterical Remainer who has found himself unable to come to terms with the result of the referendum. He’s lost the plot, and it shows every time he appears on our television screens.  
I wrote an article for the Psychologist on the mental health impact of Brexit.  On Monday there will be a seminar on this at the BPS office in London.  @julie4nw @WernerT_Man @NylaNox @vdavidmartin @prutske_uk @MadameMerteuil 
Ignore the nay-sayers - here's why we're still on course for a clean Brexit on 29th March | via ⁦@BrexitCentral⁩ 
RIGHT WING POLITICIANS TWEETING THEIR DISMAY AT THE NZ TERRORIST ATTACK SHOULD PROBABLY TAKE MORE FUCKING CARE AT THE BILE THEY PEDDLE THEMSELVES. IT’S A WONDER THIS HASN’T HAPPENED ON SUCH A SCALE IN THE UK WITH THE PURE TOXICITY OF PROPAGANDA THAT’S BEEN SPEWED UP FOR BREXIT 
He should be in charge of the next phase of Brexit negotiations!  
I hate to link Brexit to this outrageous incident, but we must all take a stand against hatred & divisiveness. It's time to choose sides & it cannot be with those who stoke division, whether it be based on xenophobia, exceptionalism or racism. Enough! 
Stephanie, given that #Brexit is turning out to be so different from what was promised, shouldn’t voters be allowed to confirm or not that they still want to proceed? Otherwise you’re telling the public: “you had a say 3 years ago, so now shutup &accept whatever we come up with”  
Thought for today If the UK and EU had spent the last three years creating visionary solutions to #climatechange instead of trying to sort out the total #KnullOpp that is #Brexit Our children could be learning, not protesting today.       #ClimateStrike 
Ground turkey. Chlorinated chicken. Everyone looking forward to those Brexit trade deals?  
Keir Starmer: “This evening the Brexit secretary voted against his govt’s own motion on Brexit, which earlier in the day he had defended in the H of C. That’s the equivalent of the chancellor voting against his own budget. This is a government that has completely lost control.” 
Trump says the Brexit deal would have worked better if Theresa May had let him fix it. Yeah, based on his string of negotiation disasters in the USA as president, I'm convinced. I have some oceanfront property in Arizona to sell you, too. 
#Brexit is a total mess. What's next is anybody's guess. My favourite sandwich? Egg and cress. Ooh I get the shivers. 
Brexit is extremely bad for our mental health. People are fed up with all the tension and the feeling of their country being held to ransom. This is no way to govern. #StopBrexitFixBritain 
Here’s another one unable to explain to her electorate that Brexit will make them poorer and remove their rights.Shame on her.  
The Brexit Secretary voted against the motion he’d just promoted – 9 naysayers. 
Her toxic #WithdrawalAgreement which delivers Fake Brexit is like a vampire in that it refuses to die. Back it comes next week and perhaps the week after that. This PM is deplorable   
Never mind no deal or a 2nd referendum, remember the heady days when having your cake and eating it was the subject of parliamentary debate? #Brexitcast turns 100 and @bbclaurak and I lose it (a bit) 
Theresa May's Brexit strategy, if it is a strategy, just might be brilliant, if it works (via @bopinion) 
Brexit- Don’t try it at home.  
As usual, we've gone for something totally unexpected in our morning #Brexit edition.You may not believe this but it comes from the EU Commission yesterday :  
The Garden Bridge is today being discussed in Parliament. About time. There's a thing called Brexit in the House & news, but it's great that @mimsdavies, @SteveReedMP, @KateHoeyMP, @RupaHuq are working to hold @ChtyCommission, @BorisJohnson, @tfl, misTrusteeset al to account. 
IMPORTANT NEWS:Corbyn has insisted on the resignation of shadow ministers that voted against a referendumLabour is serious about whipping for a referendumCrucial as we work to build support across the party and the Commons for the Kyle Wilson amendment #FinalSay 
BREXIT DELAY: EU pours cold water on May Article 50 extension – 'ALL EU27 need to approve'  
The moment to call for a second referendum is "when all else fails" says businesswoman @thatginamiller. "You have to try to exhaust all the options first" #r4today 
Labour will back a second referendum "if it's the only way to stop a no deal or a bad deal" says Labour's @BarryGardiner #r4today 
In his defeatist interview just now, Barry Gardiner did say that Labour would support a second referendum if it was the ‘only way to prevent a bad deal.’ Since that is the case, he means that Labour will support a referendum - so we should be positive & energised by the prospect! 
Oh gawd Barry Gardiner on @BBCr4today quoting the audience on @bbcquestiontime as proof that people are divided over Brexit. Has no-one told him the audience is hand picked and full of Kippers and Tories, this programme is not a reliable source of public opiniom.. 
Good News: everything has been defeated in the House of CommonsBad News: everything has been defeated in the House of Commons#Brexit 
Talking about my career again today. I'm inches away from saying "actually, do whatever you like - but seek truth, rely on facts, work for the common good, and you'll be a better person by lightyears than the selfish, power-crazed morons allegedly running the country". #brexit 
Shame @JuliaHB1 was not on the UK's Brexit negotiating team.Here in this short clip she succinctly summarises the abject failure of our politicians to honour and implement the 2016 referendum result.  
Every single thing about this “How much we will save on tariffs after Brexit” thing in The Sun was completely wrong  
Unacceptable to dictate 2nd referendum as part of time extension #Brexit 29th March WTO terms  
It's democratic for Theresa May to bring her Meaningful Vote back for a THIRD time, because MPs can change their minds, but to have a 2nd referendum (whether you agree with one or not) is undemocratic because the people aren't allowed to change their minds, tory bastards #GTTO 
Brexit Sec. Stephen Barclay stood in the House of Commons and pitched the Government's motion in favour of an extension to Article 50... then he voted against it. Yet, Brexiters like Barclay don't think the 'people' can have changed their minds! #BrexitShambles #revokeArticle50 
Even considering the absolute lies and deceit of the 2016 #Brexit vote I fully understand the underlying issues that led many to vote #Leave… But I further believe that those issues were wholly the responsibility of the #UKGovernment not the #EU… #Remain 
May’s Brexit deal is awful, but the implosion of her authority means the alternatives are worse. Here’s my Telegraph column on how she might now win on a third (or fourth) vote.  
IN  2015 I HAD BRITISH POLITICIANS UNDER MR.@David_Cameron (HE MUST REMEMBER THAT) AND FRENCH POLITICIANS UNDER MR.@fhollande   ,OF COURSE @EmmanuelMacron TOO.(DONT LISTEN TO TRUMP EMMANUEL ,HE'S SO WRONG).FINALLY BREXIT WON IN REFERENDUM,I WAS VERY SAD. NOW ,IT'S OK,UP TO THEM.  
May ignored Whitehall advice at the outset to seek cross party agreement on the way the UK would leave the EU. She pig headedly crashed on, sweeping aside any advice. The only way forward is to revoke A50 and start again, bringing all sides to the table.There, I fixed #Brexit 
The number of times I’ve been told that UKIP aren’t Far-Right by liberal Brits...During Brexit campaign, they mentioned Islam on Twitter and TV more than any other issue. In 2017 GE, Muslims were mentioned THREE TIMES MORE than the next issue on here (which was terrorism, so..)  
Brexit = hate unleashed.The far right feel empowered now. The UK is a mess. 
Ignore the nay-sayers – here’s why we’re still on course for a clean Brexit on 29th March, writes @CJCHowarth 
How come Theresa May keep on taking the deal back and back to parliament to vote, but we can’t have a second referendum on the almighty shit show? 
The rise of the far-right terrifies me. All the subtle ways it is permeating society, broadcasters letting Farage et al have a voice, nationalism. People sharing racist stuff and thinking it’s ok. It’s NOT OK. It fuelled brexit and now is the reason so many are dead in NZ. 
BBC bias:  out of 30,000 guest speakers across platforms in last 2 yrs less than 3% have been brexiteers- panels are 2:1 - 6:1 pro remain.  Only one program in last 2 yrs looking at possibilities brexit presents...  
@ForBritainParty has offered to share seats with the other #Brexit parties.  
Let Britain have the last word on Brexit 2/2  
The world is a horrifying placeBut a nice old gentleman lent me his spare brolly this morning as I walked home from the bus stop in the rain and told me how sorry he was about BrexitThere is still kindness 
The #Brexitcast Centenary Special! 100 episodes of cake, talking over each other and BREXIT chat. @BBCSounds | @bbc5live 
Just stop your nonsense.The EU is more democratic than our own electoral system!And frankly, winning a referendum through illegal activities, breaking Electoral spending laws and lying to the British people is highly undemocratic! 
Well worth reading @henrymance on how #Brexit and the referendum broke UK parliamentary system #HouseofFools  via @financialtimes 
I totally agree with you. There should be ONE BIG Brexit party not several little ones. They should join forces, get elected and get us out, then they can do their own thing  
We are supposed to accept that there will be some financial ramifications to Brexit but "it will be worth it" for all the freedom and positive trade agreements to follow. But Scotland shouldn't be independent because of the "risks" involved in haein our own currency?!?  
Donald Trump says he 'hates' to see Brexit being 'ripped apart' May has Her Own Agenda, To Remain! 
Clive is right, rather than a conversation with the country to build a consensus around brexit, Theresa May instead spent 2 yrs in a conversation with her own party. The PM & Tory Party are responsible for the mess we are all now in. Well said @labourlewis 
Brexit parties need to join forces and become one force - they'd clean up. Lots of small parties would just dilute the votes and none would win! 
Watch @theboysmithy explain the mysterious music of the yield curve, in what may be the geekiest video ever created. Also: it has zero Brexit content. #datavis 
So a woman fighting to obtain informed consent for a brexit which satisfies none of the promises made to get people to vote Leave is a traitor, but the Leave leaders touring foreign fascists to block our country's options aren't...#BrexitLogic 
@anandMenon1 explains what the hell is happening with Brexit, in this excellent explainer. Brexit for Beginners. #bbcbreakfast 
.@realDonaldTrump reveals how @Theresa_May ignored his advice on how to handle #Brexit negotiations, adding he’s "surprised at how badly" they’ve gone.More on the US president's opinion on Brexit here:  
And the ultimate irony is this. In betraying students - and so many people beyond that - the Lib Dems took distrust of politics to a whole new level. Combined with austerity, THAT's what caused Brexit. Do they take any responsibility? Do they ever look at themselves? 'Course not 
Can I just say all this diversity stuff is officially getting me down. Negative study after negative study! And then there's Brexit and other tragedies / disasters!! So here's a video of my son learning to ride his bike to cheer us all up  
This view has come up time and time again on the doorstep. When the people get the idea that their votes can simply be ignored where do they turn? I fear for the answer but will blame those politicians who voted to stop us leaving the EU #Brexit #bbcqt #bbcquestiontime 
And what do they also do? Like everyone else, they blame not the government responsible for this shambles... but the opposition, despite there being no majority for a 2nd referendum in Parliament. And why? Because the Liberal Democrats are Tories in drag. 
I really don't know where to start with this catalogue of lies. Even the People's Vote campaign itself stated that yesterday was not the time to be voting on a 2nd referendum - so what do the Lib Dems do? Lie through their teeth about it. 
Authority is draining away from May. She leads a team dedicated to emasculating #Brexit. Her lack of integrity has contaminated Conservatives and her mediocrity has emboldened a Parliament filled with treacherous MPs. Here’s a reminder what a real leader looks like. #MayMustGo 
ERG Brexiter Mark Francois has said he doesn't want to lose his hard Brexit. "I was in the army, I wasn't trained to lose"... Francois was a volunteer in the Territorial Army" #Hypocrite #BrexitCrisis #r4today 
Good thread here reminding how much the far right a**holes that brought you Brexit and Trump have been targeting Australia as the next front. Not a good look now.  
The House of Lords debates a Bill today to perpetuate a wholly nominated second chamber. I will oppose it in support of an elected federal Senate located in the north of England. Instead of Brexit we need to change our political system for the better & spread power across Britain 
Stockpiling for Brexit being discussed on @BBCRadio4 this morning. I'll just leave this here. 
TONIGHT - I’m speaking on Brexit in Dorchester at 7pm - at The Thomas Hardye School DT1 2ET. Fittingly, as the end of Brexit is a bit like the dark end of a Hardy novel All welcome and free to attend! 
May's deal is NOT Brexit. It does NOT honour the referendum result. It's WORSE than where we started. It's a TRAP with no representation and no way out.@JSHeappey@Jacob_Rees_Mogg@LiamFox@DJWarburton@MarcusFysh@JohnPenroseNews 
Why has the Serious Crime Agency still not reported on Arron Banks & the source of his £8m Brexit funding?Important this issue is resolved - & appropriate legal action underway - before the next referendum 
Astonishing. Truly. Even in context of #Brexit madness. Stephen Barclay, passionately: “It’s time for the House to vote in the national interest”. Then he votes other way, explicitly voting against what he has just called “the national interest”. Words no longer have any meaning.  
Brexit Explainer, Fri 15 March 2019:1. Last night’s vote does not guarantee Article 50 extension, it has to be agreed by the EU. The EU have specifically asked for justification and consensus. The U.K. has now ruled out the deal (twice), second ref, indicative votes, & CU/SM. 
Brexit: Will EU leaders agree to an extension?  
George I'm sorry but some of the votes you cast this week will be viewed by many people as votes against Brexit. Particularly voting to hand control of Parliament over to a remain dominated House. Thankfully you lost otherwise Brexit would be at more risk than it already is.  
Parliament doesn't want to re-join the EU, doesn't want a referendum, can't ask for an extension to implement the WA if MPs don’t want the WA. Nobody wants more drawn-out negotiations or EU Elections, manifestos, campaigns etc. So UK will leave 29th Mar.  
Asia stocks rally, recoup all of losses last week that were worst so far this yr as worries about global slowdown appeared to ebb for now & after UK voted to reject disorderly Brexit. Bonds unch despite Risk On rally w/US 10y at 2.62%. Oil at 2019 high on unexp decline in US inv.  
Everyone, & I do mean EVERYONE seems to be forgetting that the referendum result was corrupt and fraudulent. why is nobody investigating this massive constitutional criminality 
Notice To All Checked-In Passengers of Brexit Flight M29. This is to inform you that the carrier has announced plans to reschedule your flight. Please check the information board for a new flight time. The operator regrets the delay. Thank you. 
God help us. Amidst all this Brexit nonsense we have quietly returned to Dickensian poverty with barely a murmur of protest. Where is our collective social conscience?  Have we learned nothing from history about improving life and conditions for everyone, especially our children?  
so you respect a referendum based on law breaking, lies, deliberate deception dirty money illegal data harvesting secrecy contempt non disclosure agreements hiding the truth from the general public ...and condone all of this too .....the list goes on 
Now is the time and we must get free of a Westminster Parliament that has brought us 10 years of Extreme Austerity for this Brexit Shambles is going to impose Decades more Austerity upon us with Food And Medicine shortages and Martial Law! Brexit was...  
Which broadcaster has provided the most pro #EU #Brexit lies and general scaremongering.? 
Trump ally looking to sabotage UK request for Brexit delay  
It’s a matter of complete indifference to me what some thinks is good for England/Lab. loaned my vote to @theSNP for Indy. The utter carnage of W’minster is a material change IMO. So I expect @theSNP to stop pandering to the ‘England/Lab’ clique and act. England wants Brexit. 
”You can check out any time you like,But you can never leave!” #Brexit  
The vote was fine, the idea was liberating. The remainer MPs were shocked, spat their dummy out and have thwarted any attempt at a true #brexit. They don’t deserve a place in our Parliament for such treachery. #JobCentre 
As this Brexit farce now shows, #Donald Trump would have made a far better job of negotiating with this bullying EU!What is also not in doubt is that the President would not have got his country into such a terribly weak position in the first place as May and past PMs have done! 
Must be something in Fenland water. First leader @FenlandCouncil Chris Seaton abstains on own budget motion then Fenland MP and Brexit Secretary @SteveBarclay votes against motion in Commons he’d just defended . A Fenland clergyman denouncing God would make it an unholy trinity 
New Brexit stamps due out tomorrow. #brexit  
Opinion: The people will have a Final Say on Brexit. It's inevitable  
Monty Python's Life of Brexit,plus all the wonkish data on factor investing you could ever want. Latest Points of Return:  
Brexit: Will EU leaders agree to an extension?  
So mar tek on the laytist Brexit developments. Two years thav ad to get this sortid, an wim still non the wiser nor no nearer. These MP's am a cowin disgrace. It doe tek the self servin arseoles two years to sort out theya waygiz or theya expensiz. Get the bloody lot on um owt. 
I see they renewed Brexit for another season. 
@DrBrianMay Dear Dr. Brian May, Thank you so much for supporting our first petition to save Henoko! Now that Okinawa's Referendum is over & 72% of the population strongly opposes the base that will destroy the coral reef, we have a new petition! 
The draft bill proposed by #Taiwan’s anti-marriage equality has advanced to second reading in the legislature, and will be combined with the Executive draft bill for multi-party negotiation. Anti-marriage equality groups warn the ruling party not to disobey referendum results. 
some of the videos coming out UK around Brexit has been appalling...we have to stopped tolerating hate speech and racism.  Period. 
Don't vote for May's pseudo-deal under any circumstances. A long delay is preferable to a worse-than-remaining so-called 'Brexit', as Martin Howe QC argues.   
Unsurprisingly, the killer is also a Brexit supporter  
So basically... #Brexit is like when I have to defer my student loan for another year... I just keep putting it back, thinking it will go away eventually... 
@RolaWorLD Thank you, Ms. Rola, for supporting our first White House petition to save Henoko. Now that the Referendum is over and 72% of Okinawans strongly oppose the new military base, we have a new petition! Please support the second petition! 
You abstained on a 2nd Ref.You're in Brexit coalition with May, you own this mess with them 50/50. 
19. Q+ (POTUS) drops in on the UK Q Research board! UK anons not happy with Brexit situation but excited to hear from our POTUS! 
Never forget the US is not the only country under attack.  #Brexit, now #ChristchurchMosqueAttack - dark forces trying to separate us from one another and weaken human rights and democratic alliances. We must #Resist.  #AllOnePeople  #DemocracyIsAHumanRight 
Trump said Theresa May "didn't listen" to his ideas on how to negotiate Brexit, and a second vote on EU membership would be "very unfair to the people that won"  
Secret documents suggest Brexit will never happen  no surprise to me ,my friends and I said it would happen last year , @GerardBattenMEP said it years ago. Only a peoples revolution can stop this. 
Parliament argues that it stands for representative democracy. But the House of Lords represents no one and now MPs are overturning the wishes of the electorate as expressed in the referendum. Most constituencies (Labour and Tory) voted Leave. Most MPs don’t care. The people will 
Shut up Shouty-Man, we want one clean referendum?  
From #Trump to #Morrison Government to #Brexit and on & on. When you demonize and dehumanize migrants and refugees and fool and deceive the public into actually believing they are being overrun & their way of life is at stake, this is what we get. This is the cost  
EUref was the second referendum. It overturned the declared will of the British people in the original referendum that took us into the EU.  But, somehow, this can never be revisited ever again according to Leavers.  
Toto Wolff on Brexit: "For some time I thought it was a tragedy. Now it is also really good comedy. Every evening I watch  and what they are showing in the House of Commons. You are not quite sure whether it is a Monty Python thing." 
curiouser and curiouser @FinancialReview #Brexit  
Brexit: May to try to persuade MPs for third time to back deal  
BRITISH PARLIAMENT votes to ask the EU to delay Brexit until at least June and head off a chaotic end to their 46-year partnership in two weeks.  
White Supremacy Terrorist, the man who identified himself as Brenton Tarrant has uploaded lengthy manifesto online before carrying out Christchurch, New Zealand shooting rampage. I just read a bit of it... he likes the idea of #Brexit ...   
The vote to delay Brexit leaves open whether the delay will allow time to implement the existing deal or to find a new course of action  
The program funded by the grant did not go to an "exclusionary" program; it was for public education. @MorganeOgerBC was successful in undemocratically distracting the attention of city council to turn the vote into a referendum on VRR's independent, unfunded work. 
Brexit was a misjudgment; not by the voters, but by the politicos who thought they could cauterize a wound in the Tory party with a referendum that was a one-way bet because the nation wouldn't be so stupid as to vote Leave. Unwilling to admit & fix their mistake, they destroy UK 
Will @bbcquestiontime ever learn that they will always be found out about all their plants in the audience? UKIP, Tory, #Brexit supporting @BBC I used to like BBC, but no longer. 
Addressing the largest St. Patrick’s Day lunch in the world with the Lansdowne Club! The support & solidarity of the Irish diaspora has never been more important with Brexit on the horizon.   
Brexit: bring on the clowns - we are left in the grip of the clowns, with the uncertainties piling up over time rather than diminishing. With our parliament, never have so many been so badly served by so few...  #Brexit.  
What’s the right jaunty contraction for “Brexit, but shooting Piers Morgan out of a cannon” #Morgone 
Oh dear. Anthony Roberts just told the 1500 people at the Lansdowne Club St Pat's lunch NSW would help Ireland build a post-Brexit wall. Think it was meant to be a joke. 
Great piece by UQ's @DougallAB on the historical roots of Brexit conservatives' fantasies about post-EU prosperity in a glorified commonwealth or Anglosphere. Brilliant! “Brexit: Britain’s Commonwealth pivot is nothing new” , via @LowyInstitute 
The ‘People’s Vote’ campaign didn’t want a second referendum amendment either...  
How’s that? James Cleverly was a prominent campaigner for Vote Leave, and JHB is a Brexit ultra.Brexit is madness that has caused three years of chaos. It’s now an Interbatiobal laughing stock. Why did you want to do this to our country? 
Even if we say the Russian bots had no influence on the Brexit vote, we all agree that Russia at least tried to interfere and that the Brexit mess has consumed massive administrative UK resources, weakening us.Doesn't it piss you off that Putin is smiling at at job well done? 
‘Trying to explain #Brexit to Americans is like trying to explain wildfires to people whose houses are underwater’-  
Brexit and Trump's campaign were part of the same plot to undo the global order, which was spearheaded and funded by Russia#Maddow 
Anyone else has had a series of job interviews this week where all the interviewers just broke character to talk about #Brexit? 
Sir Patrick Stewart is paying for Yorkshire protesters to travel to an anti-#Brexit march in London #PeoplesVote  
This is quite simply a superb piece of writing, encapsulating #Brexit #BloodySunday & points in between. 
When ppl rightfully react to the downside of globalisation, eg incr power of corporations ‘determining’ what govts can or can’t do, nationalism arises. When nationalism rises, xenophobia rises with it. This is fertile ground for neoliberalism to thrive. Trump, Brexit CIP #auspol 
Love this time of year with every day having at least five college basketball games and Brexit votes. 
Trump and Irish leader celebrate their countries’ close ties but differences over Brexit are evident  
Tell you what, let's just revoke article 50 and take 2 years of peaceful calm to have a good think.By that time half the people who thought #brexit was a good idea will have died of Dail Mail induced apoplexy or old age and the problem will have gone away.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
The Nazis were a product of German economic collapse ISIS came from downturn in the Middle-East Trump was only elected by a slim margin because of de-industrialisation in the midwest. Brexit was voted for by former mining communities who were abandoned in the Thatcherite era. 
Just imagine if all the time, energy and focus that #brexit has taken up had been focused instead on the real problems. Like climate change. And poverty. That’s the real tragedy 
Bill Shorten wants to make this election a ‘referendum on wages’, but his 45% emissions reduction target means cutting $9,000 from your pay.  Every Australian worker deserves to know how Labor is going to reach their economy wrecking targets.Read my letter to the ACTU here   
It IS Theresa May’s fault we are where we are.She should have tried to bring together BOTH sides, following one of the closest referendum results ever.She chose to further Divide so the Conservatives Could...Conquer.Brexit means Brexit?She’s gotten no further than that. 
Retweet if you LOL'd when Trump said it was a shame that Theresa May 'didn't listen' to his ideas on Brexit.  
@TimmermansEU is brilliant there.  Thanks for the clip @brexit_sham.I’m ashamed of the ignorant pig who interrupted and heckled whilst having the gall to be displaying the Union Jack.  I can imagine the look he’d‘ ever got from the Queen! 
You changed you mind on PM's unchanged deal in a matter of weeks, yet like a typically arrogant out-of-touch Westminster elite you deny voters could have changed THEIR minds on #Brexit following 3yrs of revelations of lies, impact & lawbreaking.When did you lose your integrity?  
This ‘audience member’ is Henry Hendron - an ex-barrister currently prohibited from practicing law who has previously represented Brexit MPs Nadine Dorries & Nigel Evans, and who spoke at the Tory Conference in 1998.#bbcqt.Meanwhile, members of the public can’t get tickets. 
A long extension of the Brexit deadline could mean Theresa May loses any control of the debate in Westminster  
Greetings from Helsinki where it's 3.15am, I'm into the second of two night shoots, and I think I'm hallucinating. Because like Twitter and madness and Brexit and no Government and Oy Vey. But no apparently this is all real. 
Tbf if logic were only issue at play we’d probably say we’ll stay members til end of transition, keep voting rights etc while we work out future relationship and do whole thing as a done deal. But Westminster + Brexit ≠ logic.  
No matter what the eventual outcome of Brexit is? How will this country unite? Our Politicians are despised by both sides. Leave and Remainers are getting angrier by the day. Not just with each other, but by our whole political system. We need something new in this country. 
Ignore the nay-sayers – here’s why we’re still on course for a clean Brexit on 29th March  via @BrexitCentral 
Brexit Eurosceptics vote against deal that delivers BrexitLabour which backs 2nd Ref vote against amendment for oneBrexit Secretary votes down motion he commended to CommonsLabour vote against May's deal because they want customs union (when there's one in backstop) 
Well i just hope we are not getting another  82 Days of Brexit   As they have totally lost the plot all of the Numptys they are no longer  serving the people  At least my Ticker is  going down   must be grateful for small mercys..  
I was in the audience at #bbcqt tonight (hi Mum!). While the men argued over Brexit, it struck me that the actual expert in EU law, Prof Catherine Barnard, barely got a word in. Shame. I’d have liked to have heard more from her. 
Writing at 1am and just want to say I hate Brexit for many reasons, but a big one is never having time to watch Derry Girls, Alan Partridge and Fleabag. 
MPs have voted to ask the EU to delay Brexit by at least three months. @NIAbbot asks: who's to blame for this delay? Is it not ultimately the fault of the likes of Jacob Rees-Mogg? 
EU Elections Thu, 23 May 2019 – Sun, 26 May 2019UK #Brexit extension to 30th June 2019N.b If the UK is a member of the EU then UK citizens HAVE THE RIGHT TO VOTE IN EU ELECTIONSWe will be a member therefore the Govt will be breaking the law to deny us a vote. 
Because they didn't kill it. The ones responsible for killing Brexit are the Remain-voting MPs that never wanted it to happen in the first place. If they had just got behind the result and actually HELPED instead of trying to overturn it, things could have gone better. 
Nothing would surprise me any more. Theresa May is a Remainer and has never had any intention of delivering the Brexit that People voted for. We have been sold out..  
“Nighty Night, don’t let our Brexit dance-athon bite. Yes, we are promising not to stop dancing until we leave: Ram Jam, Run the Riddim selecta!” @afneil starts off the #bbctw #Brexit danceIt ain’t stopping till the UK leaves the EU…. TBC!   
ICYMI in the US, Brexit’s moving along with all the soundness of a Trump/Kim holiday dinner party.  
#China is a rising geopolitical power, #NorthKorea has nukes, #Russia is hacking elections, #Europe has no clue what its doing with #Brexit, #US politics are literally on  but yes, let’s throw T-Rex in the mix and see if this can somehow bring back global order. 
What do you think is the ultimate fate of Brexit? 
Trump: Theresa May "didn't listen" to my ideas on Brexit 
Five resignations over Brexit vote show Labour, at least, still does politics with honour  
Yeah look at the hate in his face - Brexit exposing people for what they are -stripping the ugly minds naked  
#ForBritainPlease sort this out, merge with UKIP, Brexit party.If there are to many options Labour could get in, there is an opportunity if you parties get it right.I believe if the 3 of you merge, you could get a majority in parliament. 
Sometimes headlines make me spit feathers! Just saw one that says 'Brexit delay confirmed'.....no....it is not.....what is confirmed is that Parliament have instructed Treason May to request an extension of Article 50....& that's only a request, going nowhere without EU approval. 
Absolute right. He sums up the real anger over the trashing of democracy - just respect the result and deliver Brexit  
D-3075Q+ sends a message to the Patriots of the UK- To stand strong and know that the US with with them. Brexit is going to happen or there will be MAJOR civil unrest in the UK.  
"MPs have control of the powers of force in our country — police, army, tax authorities, courts, etc. As such they have the practical power to cancel Brexit. But they do not have the powers of justice or consent in doing so."  
9. It would fight back against the forces from Russia and elsewhere, that seek to destabilise Europe and drive a wedge between allies, and have used Brexit as a proxy to do so. 13/ 
THE EUROPEAN Union is like a “prison” and never considered the possibility that a member state would want to regain control from Brussels and file for divorce, Sébastien Chenu, a spokesman for France’s eurosceptic Rassemblement national party  #BREXIT 
Brilliant from this #BBCQT audience member tonight:"We had a referendum. People voted for a reason. It would be the end of democracy in this country if Parliament doesn't honour what people voted for.Parliament had two years to do this and they haven't done it." pic.twitter.com/mtQO6EVc71 
ABSOLUTE state of this Government summed up by- Brexit Secretary voting against the motion he recommended- Tory whip abstaining on motion it is his job to get MPs to vote for- Theresa May bringing her deal back for a 3rd and 4th time despite record breaking loss 
The maddest part: the original Brexit referendum was non-binding. None of this had to happen (or even still has to happen) if only members of Parliament don't mind potentially losing their jobs.It could stop tomorrow. None of this has to continue. 
30 June is the new 29 March ... blah blah blah. A total #Brexit cock-up, with no-one in British politics knowing how the fuck to handle the situation, or if they do, they lack the support. The UK is a global embarrassment ... and there I was, thinking Spain had won that prize. 
Electoral law was broken during the referendum. "Honouring" that crime is an insult to democracy. 
How's Brexit?Mad.Parliament has rejected Theresa May's deal twice. Today, they also rejected taking direct control of the process, while voting for an extension.May's deal comes up for a third vote next week.Everyone's running for cover and no one wants to be responsible. 
Does anyone else find that a 'Love Corbyn Hate Brexit' on the laptop of a prominent broadsheet journalist reveals an apocalyptic lack of understanding of what's been going on since 2016? This is a columnist, not a 12 year old. It's not funny. That's 'Vegans for KFC'. OMG.  
Could Brexit break the BBC? The tensions, the bewildering question of ‘balance”. Typically thoughtful piece by Mark Damazer   
Brexit, No Deal?Brexit, May’s Deal?Remain?These are surely the final choices, and could be decided by 29th March in Parliament.If you were an MP which would you vote for given this choice?Please vote and retweet.Thank you. 
That #MeaningfulVote franchiseBrexit WarsThe Tax Dodging Empire Strikes BackReturn Of The Peoples VoteThe Phantom No Deal MenaceAttack Of The ERG ClonesRevenge Of The Sick Tories 
Jeremy Corbyn leads Labour MPs in support for second referendum, minutes after abstaining on vote to deliver People’s Vote - Evening Standard  
MPs vote to delay Brexit, by 413 to 202 - a huge 211-vote majority. But Labour refused to vote for a #PeoplesVote, letting down millions of Remainers.Write to your MP to let them know you’ll only vote for parties that back a final say or #RevokeA50. 
.@afneil looks back on what Tory MP Dominic Grieve told his voters in Beaconsfield at election time about #Brexit 
Chelsea banned. City set to get a ban. Liverpool and United under investigation. Safe to say UEFA and FIFA aren’t a fan of Brexit. (Or the Premier League, for that matter.) 
I voted Remain in 2016, but for all the Remainers who insist that their opinion should count more than anyone else's, think very carefully about what you wish for. Because invalidating the 2016 referendum will mean betraying millions of people like my Dad. 
That's an outright LIE from Dominic Grief on #BBCTW.No Deal #Brexit most certainly does NOT "breach the Good Friday Agreement".Why is this lie left hanging? 
This is not the time for recriminations. An error has been made. There is damage at home, as ERG swank around claiming a Ref is a dead idea, but right now EU27 opinion matters as much. Without a long extension, there is no referendum. Simple as that. 
this guy just straight up making stuff up. The five who resigned all voted *against* the second referendum amendment, not for it.  
This has cheered me up. I’m not the only Brexit optimist! Vote against MVx - Ignore the nay-sayers – here’s why we’re still on course for a clean Brexit on 29th March  via @BrexitCentral 
"People are voting all over the place" #choochoo Portillo on Dominic Grieve #bbctw #Brexit film  Michael predicts EU may not back an Article 50 extension 
If you book a hotel room, then come across a ton of 1* reviews, you cancel it. If you plan to stroll in the park after breakfast, and it starts chucking it down, you stay in.In every aspect of life, we change our minds *all the time*. So why can't we do the same for Brexit? 
I’m not even on a hate trip re #JacobReesMogg  and I’ll tell you why .... He’s doing what he was bought up to do, he’s no fool, the ONLY fools are the the poor buggers who voted for Brexit who believe that one day they can drink from his Golden Chalice 
#bbcqt has defeated me. I couldn’t bear to continue watching. I had thought that Twitter criticism of Hartley-Brewer was exaggerated but having heard her huff dismissively at the risk to diabetics from a no deal Brexit, I am re-considering my position /1 
You think their constituents’ interests are served by keeping the Tories in power?!Or, for that matter, Brexit. 
"Never forget. This man asked us 2 vote on #Brexit. Without defining what it meant. Without carrying out any projections of consequences. All in an attempt 2 settle an internal Tory party feud. He then knighted all his mates and f***ed off into the sunset"  
Best #Brexit quote of the day.   Thank you @IanBlackfordMP 
Great piece by one of the great hopes of the labour movement Eddie Dempsey #Brexit  @EddieDempsey 
Serious question - are bidets just always in a bathroom when you move in or has anyone ever actually decided to put one in? Presume they'll be more expensive after Brexit... 
#Brexit #Ireland Latest news. Geoffrey Cox QC finds route out of backstop by defining the Irish as churls under Clause 16 of Magna Carta. Speaking off the record Cox said "It's all sorted, we own them now! They are our bondsmen." 
6 Labour MPs voted against the Benn amendment which went down by 2 votes.It would have allowed Parliament to take control of the Brexit mess from this clown-car-driven-by-Voldemort of a government and possibly brought it down.What sort of Labour MP votes to prevent that? 
“We didn’t know what we were voting for,” say the referendum’s losers.That’s absolutely true if you voted to remain without having properly read the Lisbon treaty. #Brexit voters knew what they were voting for. We voted to LEAVE the EU. In other words, to NOT remain. #BBCQT 
Substitute ‘impeachment’ with ‘second referendum’ and the symmetry is startling #BrexitShambles 
Six men brutality murdered in sop, today, 14/03/19 by French cameroun . One, called wirba Aloys was shot on his way to the 'Mfu' house @billyb2009 @El_Adamita @MarkTJones500 @LizMcInnes_MP @NforHanson @antonioguterres @antonioguterres @AsstSecStateAF @chukwue47446373 #Referendum  
If Question Time is anything to go by, Brexit is making the U.K. an extremely toxic and voletile place.Thank you Mr Cameron 
I recently made a speech in the European Parliament about Brexit and the impact on health sector and specifically made a reference to the way in which people’s well-being had been negatively impacted :-( 
Lisa here voted leave but looking at the mess & situation now she is really not sure and may well be a #remainernow She is not alone in thinking this, whilst there are some hardliners, there is a huge softening of the #brexit vote.We need a #finalsay #PeoplesVote 
I spoke w Secretary Pompeo this morning and urged him to push Britain and EU to assure that the Good Friday/Belfast Agreeement is protected in any Brexit Agreement. He concurred on the importance of protecting the peace process. 
During the 2016 referendum, the remainer campaign claimed that leaving the EU would cripple our economy, well it's impossible to predict that or make such claim as we haven't left yet and Britain's economy has never been tested outside the EU!@aley_aa@BrexitKnight@MsmAnti 
‘There are people’s futures at stake here’This EU national says the Brexit debate should not just be about those who can ‘shout their opinion the loudest’. #bbcqt 
'Irish border' is incuded in the BBC's 'Brexit jargon' explainer tool along with things like WTO rules and the backstop.Sums up so much in one image.  
The referendum was unlawful and the result is unsafe.This is the verdict of a court of law.What this #brexit #shill wants or doesn't want is his personal view.It doesn't over-rule a court of law.We are stuck in 2016.This is 2019 and we cannot 'honour' a flawed referendum. 
"We didn't have a clue what we were doing, so I want a second referendum so I can vote REMAIN again" #BBCQT 
I wrote a short piece on the history of a post-Brexit pivot to the Commonwealth, kindly published by @LowyInstitute 
Never like to miss an opportunity...... 
Brexit Delayed - Trump & Ireland PM Discuss Brexit & Inept UK Gov (video)  #Trump #FTSE100 #jobs #trade #economy #Eurozone #recession #EuropeanUnion #BrexitMayhem #BrexitCrisis #Brexit  
Julia Hartley-Brewer has gone completely off the rails here. Torn apart by the inherent contradictions brought about by the nebulous nature of the Brexit campaign and left stumbling over her words in a dumbstruck stupor.It's glorious to witness.#bbcqt 
Audience member just said we should have a referendum between deal & No Deal because otherwise it would "disenfranchise millions of people".Are you ***** kidding me? These people genuinely think that after the 1st referendum, 16.1 million people just walked into the sea.#BBCqt 
So as usual, I haven't watched #bbcqt tonight. Don't tell me, a panel of 4 tories and one tory-lite and Fiona Bruce only accepting questions blaming Corbyn for #Brexit? Lots of sympathy for the Maybot and her flippin' croaky voice and some barely coherent gammon plant ranting? 
Wales were handed devolution based on a 50.3% to 49.7% referendum result.Take your "#Brexit was too close" bollox & stick it where the sun don't shine.#BBCQT 
‘Her own party isn’t playing ball’This audience member blames the divisions in the Conservative Party for the current situation on Brexit.  #bbcqt 
Julia Hartley-Brewer sees Brexit as winner-takes-all. As soon as you understand that, the rest of her attitude comes into sharp focus. #bbcqt 
.@EmmaLewellBuck did what she believes is right and voted against a second referendum   
@jonsnowC4 won’t have to sit and think that the Brexit shambles was his fault, unlike journalists & presenters from other stations. 
Either the country has shifted to remain, in which case a second referendum is essential to inform the government, or they still want to leave, in which case, what's your problem. 
I fully agree with @JuliaHB1. We must never stop voting. When arrogant toads seek to silence us, we must continue to speak until we’re heard. Sooner or later, we’ll win. I want #Brexit delivered on time but I’d rather wait for a proper Brexit than rush into a fake Brexit. #BBCQT 
#bbcqt Powerfully emotional contribution: "if democracy is denied, I'll never vote again." That's a staggering indictment of what Parliament has achieved in crippling Brexit. 
‘We’re only at the end of the beginning…’EU Law Professor @CSBarnard24 says there are tougher times ahead with Brexit. #bbcqt 
I voted remain. I think we should stay in the EU. I don't think remain would win a second referendum and I think advocates for a second referendum have failed to address the core reasons why Leave won in the first place. The entire thing is fucked and this country is fucked. 
Tory James Cleverly just argued that the other parties aren't acting in the national interest.Tell me, @JamesCleverly, what do your own party's experts say that ANY version of Brexit would do to the living standards of the British people?#BBCqt 
If there is another referendum, the Brexiteers should just boycott it. #BBCQT 
 WATCH | "It is nothing but sheer arrogance of people that have lost, and people that want to subvert democracy!"This audience member slamming second referendum campaigners just won tonight's #BBCQT.  Support us at  
What worries me the most is that @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and the ERM will give in to fear of No Brexit and vote for May’s Remain By Another Name deal. A deal so bad Remain would be preferable and I say that as a passionate Brexiteer! At least we could have another go at leaving! 
UK govs own analysis shows every form of Brexit we will be worse off, we are making our country poorer..That is unacceptable. #Brexit #bbcqt 
Those “lets get Brexit over and get it done, merchants” just don’t seem to realise that this is only the beginning of the Brexit nightmare. #bbcqt@CSBarnard24 Prof of EU Law : 
Five Labour MPs quit roles to oppose new referendum vote  
Brexit Madness - UK PM Theresa May to Ask EU for Brexit Delay (video)  #economy #stocks #FTSE #investors #investing #GBP #USD #EUR #ECB #BoE #Brexit  
#bbcqt So, if you're 16 or 17, you'll be absolutely delighted to know that Julia Hartley Brewer thinks you're far to young to vote in a second referendum on an issue that will have a huge influence on your future. I just wonder how do you feel about that? 
WATCH | "As representatives of the people you are obliged to deliver Brexit, deal or no deal. By taking no deal off the table, you have been lazy, you've copped out, you've weakened our negotiating position and our chance to get a very good deal from Europe." Hear, hear! #BBCQT 
“Even in the ERG, most people want to have a deal with the EU, but there’s a very big difference between wanting to have a deal and recognising the reality”Shanker Singham of the IEA explains how he sees the idea of a no deal Brexit.#newsnight | @ShankerASingham 
#Brexit brilliance  
Sorry Julia Hartley-Brewer, you can't use the argument that we implement general elections as an argument against another referendum.If we had a referendum now, then there'd be more time passed between the two EU referendums than between the last two general elections!#BBCqt 
#bbcqt @JuliaHB1 Julia, we can’t have anyone under 18 voting on Brexit but they are old enough at 15 to take full responsibility if they go abroad and join ISIS. 
Sometimes doing the right thing doesn’t always feel great, like today.Most people know that I’ve put my heart and soul into finding a way through the Brexit nightmare.I don’t loose my faith in you when the going gets tough, so please, keep faith in me too - I’m trying my best  
.@IanBlackfordMP: "In Scotland, we gave 16 and 17 year olds the vote during the independence referendum, and the engagement was tremendous." #bbcqt 
Unforgivable. Labour still pushing Brexit and refusing to back a new referendum or #RevokeA50.Millions of Remainers have had enough and will vote for #Remain parties. 
EU law professor @CSBarnard24 says there's a long road ahead in the Brexit process. #bbcqt 
Wow. So many young and ethnic minority people speaking up in favour of #Brexit tonight. And a few ‘gammon’ types getting very angry in their anti-Brexit rants! That’s really going to annoy the #FBPE crowd!!  #bbcqt 
And here's Redwood caught red-handed, spinning his brexiter lies in parliament itself, nowhere is safe from their attempts to mislead - h/t to Peter Kellard - @BackTheMacUK for posting the full version of Sir Ivan Rogers presentation in this thread - shame on you Deadwood - ENJOY 
TOMORROW: Brexit? Never heard of it, mate. #TomorrowsPapersToday #MailFrontPages 
“What’s the point of a second referendum if they didn’t honour the first?” #bbcqt 
Sorry, if you're still saying "Do you want a third referendum, or a fourth, or a fifth" you're... not a smart person.Brexit was 4 words in 2016. It's a 585-page treaty now.It was a blank cheque in 2016. Now it's been filled in.We either cash that cheque or rip it up.#BBCqt 
‘It is nothing but sheer arrogance of people that have lost, and people that want to subvert democracy’This audience member says he is against another referendum on leaving the EU. #bbcqt 
‘As representatives of the people, you are obliged to deliver Brexit’This audience member says that a no-deal should not have been taken off the negotiating table. #bbcqt 
Weirdly  - Brexit has raised the profile of a lot of us in this fight. On both sides. Even humble little me. I won't be massively affected either but you know what? I want what is best for my country and Brexit is an obvious and malignant mess. Wake up Britain #bbcqt 
‘I think we need to think very, very seriously about what people think now, as opposed to two years ago’This audience member says there should be another referendum on leaving the EU. #bbcqt 
March Brexit almost certainly out of reach ....  
Watching #bbcqt.  Good to see @IanBlackfordMP speaking so clearly and showing the leadership which is missing from the two big political parties on #Brexit.  
For all the chaos, confusion and noise, fundamentally nothing has changed about Theresa May’s bad #Brexit deal. With Parliament in gridlock, the only way to make progress is to withdraw Article 50 and give the British public the final say. #BBCQT 
Sinn Féin MPs @ChrisHazzardSF and @OrfhlaithBegley responding to today's developments on #BloodySunday and #Brexit from London  
Weirdest thing about today was hearing @Keir_Starmer and Labour MPs justify Labour’s decision not to whip in favour of a second referendum because @peoplesvote_uk said it was the wrong time. When did we outsource our Brexit policy to a third party campaign group? 
Julia Hartley Brewer's made a career out of Brexit. Hard Brexit might inconvenience her slightly but it will not harm her career. She's not an ordinary member of the public. #bbcqt 
I ask my fellow countrymen and women in Wales, how can you ever vote for either @WelshLabour or @WelshConserv again after the Brexit farce??With the Newport West by-election coming, please don’t give them your vote!Only @Plaid_Cymru and @WelshLibDems seem to care about Wales. 
Julia Hartley-Brewer is immune from the worst impacts of Brexit. It’s all just a game of shits and giggles for her.  #bbcqt 
If you keep May as leader, you will still lose to Labour in the coming election.  Replace May with Hunt, Boris, Sajid, Truss, Rabb - almost anyone, and you can win Brexit and the election  
The Conservatives' @JamesCleverly is determined to deliver Brexit. #bbcqt 
BBC,ITV and SKY every single day give these shysters an easy interview,nodding in agreement with them when they start slevering their lies about Brexit! Well done @jonsnowC4  
I assume the Tories agreed to extend the Brexit date so that the German car makers, Italian Prosecco makers and French cheese producers would have time to lobby their government’s?   
.@IanBlackfordMP: "When the amendment to have a second referendum came up... a shiver ran along the Labour front bench and couldn't find a spine to climb up".  Here's Labour sitting on their hands and refusing to vote for a second referendum. #bbcqt 
This week, Brexit has taken a notable step backwards | Analysis by @LukeMcGee  
Our next question is about another Brexit referendum. #bbcqt 
The man on #bbcqt is completely wrong. There was no mention of either “hard” or “soft” Brexit during the referendum campaign. This was the establishment’s first line of attack against the people after we voted the way they didn’t want. #BrexitMeansBrexit 
"Welcome to Fuckknowsville. Population: us." @MarinaHyde is regularly a political sketch writer of genius, but this is Brexit column is so scarifyingly good that I want to have bits of it tattooed on my body.  
Can someone please explain how it’s unfair to hold a second referendum on #Brexit, but totally fine to hold a third vote on a plan that has twice been soundly defeated? 
The SNP's @IanBlackfordMP says the Labour party has been 'spineless' during Brexit negotiations. #bbcqt 
#bbcqt hasn't been on for 10 minutes and we've heard the ad hominem fallacy: "we've had a referendum" & "stop betraying democracy".  Listen. I refuse to respect a result that vitiated by electoral fraud and criminality. Why should we respect a result that damages our country 
“Rather then have a conversation with the country, she wanted to have a conversation with the Conservative Party”.@labourlewis criticises Theresa May’s handling of #Brexit. #bbcqt 
European Council President Donald Tusk has said he will appeal to EU leaders "to be open to a long extension" of the Brexit deadline, if the UK needs to rethink its strategy and get consensus.  #bbcqt 
Man in audience: "Parliament was instructed to execute Brexit. It's not brain surgery." #bbcqtIt certainly isn't brain surgery. No brain surgery, no matter how complex, requires 3 years, £4.2 billion, and 11,000 people to execute. 
After being regaled with a list of significant dissenting voices against a no deal Brexit, Julia Hartley-Brewer's response was this:1 - Unsubstantiated tosh about nameless entrepreneurs who apparently agree with her.2 - She believes in Britain.Absolutely hopeless.#bbcqt 
Brexit will be fine because DumboIs certainly a take  
Julia Hartley Brewer is hatred manifest in flesh. Unbelievable delusion to ignore the damage that Brexit is already inflicting on the UK. #bbcqt 
basically what I’m saying here is I’ve fucking had it with Brexit & everything else  
Have to be honest w/you Angus, after this week I'm done with trying to save the UK from Brexit. That place you work is possibly home to the MOST incompetent government AND main opposition I've EVER seen. No point anymore. Only independence will save Scotland. 
The new EOS User Agreement is coming! It will replace the constitution that EOS launched with!This will also set a precedent that we do not need 15% voter participation to enact a referendum. A milestone indeed.Support these BPs! 
hi Julia, your opinion is irrelevant to us those of us with more than once braincell will be on the #PutItToThePeople march on Saturday 23rd March, marching for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit! JOIN US!!!  #bbcqt 
No Brexit from Chelsea, Arsenal, Man United, Man City, Liverpool and Tottenham this year... 
I’ve been wanting to say this to that awful ‘Stop Brexit’ man who shouts all day long into his loud hailer right outside my office window - making it impossible for anyone to work.   Damian  
Whatever happens with #Brexit I think we can all agree it's been a jaunty couple of years  and we wouldn't have missed it for the world. 
Second Referendum Crushed in 'Major Defeat'  
‘Rather than a conversation with the country, she wanted to have a conversation with the Conservative Party’@labourlewis criticises Theresa May’s handling of Brexit. #bbcqt 
Another one bottled it. They're dropping like flies. Just because a mad lady says handing over our law making for an indefinite period is Brexit it doesn't mean it actually is...  
UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP speaks to the BBC on the extension of Article 50 and the Brexit betrayal.WATCH:  
Julia Hartley-Brewer on #BBCqt again... She's already admitted why we need a new referendum.  
March Brexit almost certainly out of reach  
There is no majority for a 2nd refThere is no majority for a 2nd refThere is no majority for a 2nd refThere is no majority for a 2nd refThere is no majority for a 2nd refThere is no majority for a 2nd refThere is no majority for a 2nd refAny questions? #Brexit #bbcqt 
.@Anna_Soubry is a true patriot. The traitors are the ones pushing for a catastrophic Brexit, of any kind, to protect their own interests instead of those of the whole country. 
Perhaps this is how they finally kill Brexit and get her toxic ”deal” through. A legal ruse with no chance of real world success.  
28) Politicians failing to listen, at all, to the British people was again, part of why Brexit happened. Now we have a bunch of opportunistic charlatans forming their own breakaway group and refusing to hold by-elections... while attacking Labour each and every day. 
Why on earth do the people's vote organisation have so much influence when it means blocking a 2nd referendum, but none when it comes to getting one? - Who made this decision that today was not the right time?It's made me realise they are completely unaccountable 
27) Only the opposition have sought to understand the causes of Brexit. Only the opposition have sought a deal which protects British jobs. Yet it gets panned, every day, for its respect of democracy and failure to oppose what the British people voted for. 
I can't wait to see who's going to be the next Brexit secretary.  
Taking a break from #Brexit to highlight something important: that when Gaza fires rockets directly into Tel Aviv, as they did tonight,  it is the duty all of us stay totally silent as if nothing happened.  
EU says UK must justify any Brexit delay  
Maybe. Just maybe.....the MPs who voted against Brexit this week will glimpse the chaos, crisis & growing risk of a hard left Marxist Corbyn Government, and vote for an orderly Brexit Withdrawal next week so we can move on. Please.  
This is why we need to cancel Brexit. If we go through with it, people like this feel empowered and the country will never recover.  
The #UK and #EU negotiating #Brexit deal  
Transport Secretary Chris Grayling planned to use the airfield as a giant HGV holding bay to prevent traffic jams in a no-deal Brexit  
If you think your vote matters just look at what's going on in the UK, the people voted for #Brexit and because the gov didn't get the result they wanted they keep prevaricating until they get the outcome they want. #BrexitMayhem 
22) Labour would only be in a position to stop Brexit or force an election IF MORE PEOPLE HAD VOTED LABOUR IN 2017. It's that simple. It's always been that simple. Corbyn cannot change parliamentary arithmetic by waving a magic wand. Seems like Remainers believe in unicorns too. 
Yes because this deal is a real winner on the doorstep!!. Do you think Brexit supporting Tory voters are stupid? They understand the deal. They know it handcuffs us. They know May is having to bully her party into accepting it because it’s deeply flawed and she’s failed. 
Jeremy Corbyn sacks Labour rebels who blocked second Brexit referendum 
There is no such thing as a 'hard Brexiteer'.  You leave the EU, or you don't.It was a term coined only after Remain lost & invented to help them do all they could to make Brexit impossible.  
Oh this really is pathetic from the Attorney General:I think he’ll find that: -Brexit-Confidence & Supply Agreement -Prolonged political vacuum -Prospect of return to hard border-Demonising the backstop-Austerity Have had a ‘socially destabilising effect on NI’.  
So basically Cameron held a referendum in order to keep the Conservative Party in one piece, the result of which was to tear it to bits. Genius stuff. 
Vince Cable to stand down as @LibDems leader. As one of the key people behind austerity he played a major part in the most destructive set of policies in my lifetime. The duplicity of his party after 2010 meant they were crushed. It also helped lay the foundations for Brexit. 
Trump: Brexit debate is 'tearing country apart'  
May’s Withdrawal is Not Brexit, it’s Staying Tied To EU!  
Numerous times during yesterday’s debate on the Brexit Omnibus Bill in the #Seanad, I’d to endure a variety of FF & FG members talk about “our special relationship with Britain”.Quite frankly lads, this is what Britain thinks of Ireland and Irish lives  
Part of the problem with the Brexit negotiations is the word “deal”. As if this was just a bit of business. This is the ideological & political future not wheeling and “dealing” and just totting up votes. Let’s try talking about it without word “deal” ? 
Scotland is a mess.The SNP led independence referendum divided us like nothing before.For those folk who think the SNP are warm and cuddly. Please read this and retweet:#bbcqt 
Labour, under Jeremy Corbyn, have literally opposed May’s deal from the start (as well as opposition to no deal) alongside now supporting a second referendum with remain as an option.What are you talking about?  
20) That is still the position now. All options ARE open. Yet when Corbyn proposed a 2nd referendum in a parliamentary amendment, it was voted down. When it was again proposed today, it again lost. 
It was great, for one moment I thought Jon was going to lift him up by the lapels but self restraint won out.@Channel4News have done a great job on Brexit related matters. 
Sarah Wollaston holds the “new colleagues” brief in the @TheIndGroup. After today’s display of catastrophically poor political judgement on the second referendum vote, I doubt that she will have much work to do—with MPs from any political party.  
19) Labour, of course, only got a hearing on the doorstep by backing Brexit. They'd have been crushed if they hadn't. Labour then agreed an eminently sensible motion at last year's LPC: vote May's deal down, seek an election, and if it didn't happen, leave all options open. 
You know when you break up with someone to teach them a lesson and you didn’t really want to but they pushed you too far and you think it will all be okay in the morning but then a lot of stuff happens overnight and then two years later you are both completely....fucked. #brexit 
With Gwinnett's big @MARTASERVICE referendum looming on Tuesday, I argue in @AtlantaMagazine that tech hype has *falsely* convinced many suburban voters they can solve mobility challenges without increased funding for conventional transit. #atlpol #gapol 
The Geoffrey Cox legal advice that Theresa May hopes would save her Brexit deal has been dismissed by the 'star chamber' of Eurosceptic Tory lawyers as "erroneous" and "badly misconceived"No chance of ERG or DUP voting for May's deal now via @Telegraph 
Who else feels the same as @Rylan ?? #brexit   
How did your MP vote on #Brexit delay?  
This evening I voted against a second referendum and against any delay to #Article50. Last night I voted to keep No Deal on the table. The people of Aldridge-Brownhills and the United Kingdom voted for us to leave the EU and I will continue to vote to ensure that this happens. 
So... Since #Brexit "supposedly" isn't happening on 29th March now ...Does anyone have want to organise me a birthday party? #article50debate #BrexitMayhem #stopbrexit 
Your entire party, sorry limited company, broke every promise you made to the electorate. Is it any surprise that no one supports your miserable 2nd referendum? #Brexit  
notable... Q+ posted on UK Q Research bread for the first time. #brexit  
Theresa May suffers devastating Brexit revolt after eight Cabinet minsiters and 180 Tories refuse to back delay proposal  
A second referendum may not be the likely outcome of all this. But saying it’s dead because just over half MPs voted against it - in a world in which May is fighting to secure a deal that first lost by 230 - seems a bit premature. 
You can’t be anti austerity & pro Brexit. Inconvenient truths. 
A Labour newspaper sums up the Labour position on #Brexit: "yesterday would have been a good day for a second referendum, tomorrow would be a good day for a second referendum, but today wasn’t". We need a new politics.  
After a tough couple of days for Brexit supporters the annihilation of the so called People's Vote amendment in the @HouseofCommons was especially cheering. @peoplesvote_uk is as dead as a dodo. Good. 
Vince Cable has demonstrated incredible dedication and leadership to our party, and against Brexit. My sincerest thanks to all the support he has given me as a new MP. Looking forward to continuing the fight alongside him! 
If Brexit doesn't happen, I wonder if all those Remoaners will be so happy in a couple of years when they're getting paid in Euros, and their taxes are increased to support the millions of Mrs Merkel's unemployable migrants who will be living in their towns and villages. 
Yvette Cooper campaigned on the promise that she would "not vote to block Brexit". Her constituency voted 70% leave in the referendum.There isn't a clearer example of a politician more out of touch with the feeling of the electorate she claims to represent. Shameful! 
Labour: We believe that there should be a people's vote, the people MUST be heard.Parliament: Ok let's vote on it.Labour: We obviously didn't mean right now. #JamTomorrow #Brexit 
I live in a Leave voting constituency.During the 2015/2017 General Elections my MP for Worthing West Peter Bottomley dismissed Brexit advocating political parties on basis that he would respect any Brexit vote whether it be Remain or Leave.Today he voted to extend article 50. 
There are tons of studies showing direct links between austerity and the Leave vote. The Lib Dems' general short-sightedness and economic illiteracy provided 'one of the causes' of Brexit.  
A fool a misguided fool. Trying to fool us all by supporting Brexit while only hinting at a People’s Vote.  
All British liberals should be grateful to @vincecable for providing stable leadership to the @LibDems for the last two years and a calm, rational and sane voice for the country over the last decade during the financial crash and Brexit.  
The last two & a half years of Brexit negotiations, summarised in a short video:  
Jeremy Corbyn leads Labour MPs in support for second referendum, minutes after abstaining on vote to deliver People’s Vote  
Brexit secretary Steve Barclay closed the debate for the government, saying: “It is time for this house to act in the national interest, it’s time to put forward an extension that is realistic.”He then voted against the motion  
Unexploded wartime bomb found at site to be used as lorry park in event of no-deal Brexit  
Today we the voter got the message loud and clear from Parliament.  We can send our reply on 2nd May. Vote for independent or Brexit Party candidates only. 
Outside the House of Commons, the face of #Brexit. Meanwhile, inside the House of Commons the farce of #Brexit.#RevokeArticle50#FBPE #FinalSay#PutItToThePeople #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Seeing as most of our MPs seem to be having a go at it, I think I need to try this abstaining lark. Y'all can go leave the EU. I'm abstaining from Brexit.*declares her bed a country, makes herself Queen, never leaves* 
Not often I agree with Sir Kier but what a farce, the Brexit Secretary voting against his own motion  
Over 70% of the audience agreed that we should have a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal this evening @cambridgeunion debate! Resounding result showing that students want to have their say! @FFSake_ 
The irony the government seeking to use Vienna convention to try to get Brexit through, but refusing to acknowledge it when it comes to their obligation to uphold rights of Northern Ireland people to have equal rights on equal marriage and abortion ... #NowforNI #equalmarriage 
I've avoided using this word, but I can no longer avoid it.We are led by TRAITORS.We are governed by TRAITORS.Our media are TRAITORS.UK is being sold out by a collection of TRAITORS.We'll have our #Brexit, but we're not getting it while we are led by TRAITORS. 
In fact, it’s almost as if a horribly vindictive somebody, somewhere (can’t think who, or perhaps what) wants Brexit to fail so badly that they don’t give a damn about peace in Northern Ireland. 
Quite. BBC in Scotland have always been like this but I hoped new channel wd turn over a new leaf. Don't think they realise how impressed viewers would be if guest commenting on Brexit came from Stornoway or Orkney for a change. @ScotlandTonight are much more accommodating. 
Morten Morland on the third day of Brexit votes #TheresaMay #ZombieGovernment #BrexitVote #BrexitShambles #Brexit #Tories #BrexitShamble #BrexitShambles #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #beherenow  - political cartoon gallery in London  
Brexit Secretary arguing for delaying Brexit. Then voting against it. Then being the guy who will have to negotiate it. Not even peak Brexit.  
Christopher Howarth: Ignore the nay-sayers – here’s why we’re still on course for a clean Brexit on 29th March  
Ahhhhhh poor old @Anna_Soubry doesn’t like it when she is called out for what she is. A traitor to her party her country and our democracy. You reap what you sow my dear. #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal 
Brexit means Brexit, unless it’s that Brexit, not This Brexit which means it’s a different Brexit to the Brexit that originally meant Brexit. 
oh hi twitter im back what’s been going on? brexit? hmm, i don’t know her. 
Labour civil war is now unfolding, JC is the primary cause of his parties demise! Brexit has broken the UK and both labour and the tories. I thank WM for awakening me to the SNP and the stability they have show through this sorry Brexit. Independence is the destiny we deserve!  
British motion to postpone Brexit will be analysed in detail. No-deal Brexit is the worst scenario for both the Great Britain and the European Union. We will do our best to avoid that. 
Speaking at an event tonight, told them that the Brexit Secretary had just voted against the motion he had just spoken for in the Commons ... they thought it was a joke. 
4) She made the wrong choice. The first of very many wrong choices. Instead, she quite ridiculously viewed a close, 52-48 result as a referendum on immigration (her weird, personal obsession)... and worse, she triggered Article 50, setting the clock running on the UK's future. 
Meanwhile at Brexit  
Brexit is 361 hours away. #brexit 
The current #brexit situation:  
Lord Heseltine says the government is "bulldozing" a twice-defeated deal through parliament. He says the situation is "ironic but contemptible".More Brexit analysis here:  
Captain on deck!#Trump (aka Q+) weighs in on the #BrexitMayhem.  The will of the people is being subverted by the #Globalists.  Very SAD to see #GERMANY pulling the strings on the #UK!Democracy must and should always prevail. Q+#Brexit #WWG1WGA 
Just to remind you that we could have been on track for leaving the EU without any doubt that we were leaving were it not for Brexiter MPs not voting for a withdrawal agreement. #Brexit 
The reason the UK is in this mess its simple. 1) Cameron called the referendum, then went absent without leave for much of it, and had no plan whatsoever for if it was lost. A monstrous abdication of responsibility for which he will go down in infamy. 
Guardian front page, Friday 15 March 2019: Cabinet split exposed as MPs vote overwhelmingly to delay Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn confirms Labour frontbenchers Ruth Smeeth, Emma Lewell Buck, Yvonne Fovargue, Justin Madders and Steph Peacock have resigned over a second referendum. pic.twitter.com/BEzPdeU2kZ 
Gosh, what a perfectly, brilliantly sad description of Britain and Brexit:  
That's Corbyn, whose party's manifesto in 2017 backed Brexit... but a soft, jobs first Brexit, far more in tune with reality than the disgraceful lunacy of "No Deal is better than a bad deal" or "citizens of nowhere". And which, rightly, called for a customs union. 
Extend Article 50 and use the European elections to stop Brexit, it is the only way to stop Brexit argues @andrew_adonis. 
That's Corbyn, who campaigned for Remain, voted Remain, and wasn't featured much because - hello! - the BBC and most of the media turned Remain v Leave into an internal Tory party battle. Which in many ways, it always was. That's certainly why Cameron called the referendum. 
Let Britain have the last word. Give her the final word on the #Brexit deal. Take the deal when it is done and seek further permission on it - from the public. Let the public hold it up to the light, for their final say. To back it or keep what we’ve got.  
Brexit has been so fractious, not many compliments get handed out. Nice to see this one about the huge effort behind the scenes that my party colleagues, others and I have put in to build centre ground consensus in an age of extremes.  
Brexit secretary makes case for an extension on behalf of the government then votes against it. And now he will be sent to negotiate an extension on behalf of the WHOLE COUNTRY. How can he credibly stay in post after this? It further demeans the UK  
Trump says he's 'surprised at how badly' #Brexit talks have gone for PM Theresa May  
So Vienna Convention can only help end the backstop if there is, for eg., a 'socially destabilising effect on NI.’ Yes, it has come to that. It’s that bad. It’s come to a VERY sorry pass if MPs vote to be sacrifice NI to save May’s Brexit deal.  
Brexit is like a fuck boy....chats shit..gives it the biggun but when it comes to it nothing actually happens 
I’ve had a lot of angry messages on this and I’m sorry that many of you feel I’ve let you down. I feel so sad about this entire mess, but for me, ensuring Brexit happens trumps all else.I fear the political class will do all they can to take this from us – you’re all heroes! x 
People who say "I'm sick of hearing about Brexit" are probably the same people who said "I'm sick of hearing about the Second World War" between 1939 and 1945. News is all the stuff we don't want to hear 
A lot of so-called Labour supporters criticised Jeremy for asking his MPs to vote against a second referendum but then saying he supports a People's Vote.Surely this shows his flexibility and willingness to appease both sides? Brexit doesn't matter. Being PM does.#JC4PM  
I think we should just collectively ignore our politicians until they start making sense on Brexit. Refuse to listen, as if they were children high on Twixes and pop. 
Have you noticed how so many people involved with Brexit are getting dozens or even hundreds of £k fast and easy?What is their secret?Where is this #magicmoneytree? 
Tomorrow's front page: SNP make two formal complaints to the BBC accusing broadcaster of deliberately demoting the role of third party at Westminster + another day of Brexit chaos  
In tomorrow's paper: The SNP raise two complaints over the BBC's coverage of this week's Brexit votes.  
Opinion: Brexit has finally broken the British political system  
Amber Rudd writes to her constituents to explain why she defied whips to keep no deal Brexit off the tableIf I was one of the 55% of her constituents who voted Leave, I would be looking forward with relish to voting her out at the next GE via @Telegraph 
Stop lying:1. There is no such thing at 'the will of the people' on Brexit2. Neither you nor Theresa May can give the 37% of the electorate who voted for Brexit what they voted for since:2a. They voted for different reasons2b. You lied to us by saying we'd keep the benefits 
So the UK may not be leaving the EU on 29 March after all, but when and how depends on what happens next…#Brexit latest: [tap to expand] 
“the Brexit Party first and Conservative Party second. If so, big moment. Shame so few ministers or MPs had the ability to understand the battle was underway or the balls to be part of it. I think tonight may show it’s too late. They lost without really putting up a fight”. 
How high were the stakes tonight for the Tory party, in all those failed attempts tonight to wrest control of Brexit from the PM. Here is the view of a senior Tory MP: “The Tory Party may be finished after tonight. Seeing the huge numbers voting against a delay - shows we are... 
So basically the government have bugger up Brexit by ignoring the democratic vote. Let off all the IRA murderers and now prosecuting the soldiers from 40 years ago in Northern Ireland. My how you must feel so proud of your success. As an retired plod I will burn down London. 
I don't often talk politics with my parents, but today my dad went on a rant about how dumb Brexit is. He typically votes Conservative and he was less than impressed when I told him that Scheer supports Brexit. It's clear that my dad is not a fan of Scheer. 
Anna Soubry says Parliament's vote today to reject a second referendum by a 249-vote majority "is a betrayal of the British public."Her doing everything she can to thwart the people's vote in 2016 is not a betrayal, according to her twisted logic. 
Nailed it...#BrexitShambles #Brexit #BrexitCatastrofuck #Brexshit pic.twitter.com/EA3OIEIfpr 
994 days ago a referendum took place that is ripping asunder the Conservative Party, Labour Party, probably the United Kingdom & Westminster’s credibility. And is costing tax payers an absolute fortune and has made the UK an international laughing stock. Wow! 
Theresa May proposing her Brexit withdrawal agreement for the 3rd time:  
Many Tories want to do the right thing on Brexit but feel hampered by their associations or other party considerations. If you have a Tory MP +want to stay in the EU/get a public vote, let them know+get others to do likewise. We need as many on board as poss to get a #FinalSay 
Matt Hancock (left) and a goldfish. #Brexit pic.twitter.com/EQbzhfUX54 
Are we sure it isn't too late to summon the bravest knights in the land and send them on a quest to find the isle of Avalon – the dwelling of Arthur, the once and future King of England, and maybe get him sort out these Brexit negotiations? 
I truly don't care about WM, England or Brexit anymore   I just want my MP'S to do what's best for Scotland  #DissolveTheUnion 
The only political voice ordinary people have is the vote. They don’t have a seat in the Lords. They don’t have newspaper columns. They just have the vote. If we undermine the vote we will make people voiceless and democracy will be finished.Brendan O’Neill on the war on Brexit  
Sinn Féin MP @ElishaMcC_SF will be on tonight’s @ViewFrmStormont from Derry following today’s Bloody Sunday decision and @ChrisHazzardSF will be appearing from London discussing the latest on #Brexit — 22:45pm on @utv 
ExclusiveThe Geoffrey Cox legal advice that Theresa May hopes will save her Brexit dealAG has circulated advice with Tory MPs on how backstop could be terminated under terms of the Vienna ConventionBut 'Star Chamber' says it is 'badly misconceived' 
Reporter: "What advice did you give to Theresa May that she didn't take?"Trump: "Who?"(This actually happened earlier during Taoiseach Leo Varadkar's White House meeting with US president Donald Trump). #Brexit  
Worth remember that if it wasn't for Gina Miller we wouldn't be heading for a no deal Brexit.Thank you Gina. 
The weakness of Jeremy Corbyn & Labour has plunged this country in chaos, Tories holding the country hostage because we’re afraid of a Labour GovernmentMay, 2017 GE “Nothing has changed Brexit Means Brexit & No Deal is better than a bad deal”May today, “My Deal or no #Brexit” 
Labout not backing the second  referendum amendment wasn’t about timing at all. It was about WHO proposed the amendment - the TIG. This was a cynical move by Labour to scupper the TIG from winning their first amendment and stopping them gaining the upper hand on the Brexit debate 
Just another reason the SNP should walk out of that Cesspit declare SCOTLAND independent and leave Little England to their Brexit Clusterbouarch. Any decent English folk who want to live in a country who sees you as one of them no matter where you were born can move to Scotland..  
Steven Camley on the third day of Brexit votes #TheresaMay #ZombieGovernment #BrexitVote #BrexitShambles #Brexit #Tories #BrexitShamble #BrexitShambles #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #beherenow  - political cartoon gallery in London  
What is the Brexit delay for?  The EU closes down from April to July.  Are they going to have emergency sessions? 
Even at this incredibly late stage your attempt to overturn democracy was backed by a pathetic total of 85 MPs. Face facts we had a #PeoplesVote and we don't want another. #Brexit  
Click here: Brexit is being BETRAYED! Get your Yellow Vests now! Loads of options available on our website! #Brexit #YellowVestsUK Click here:  
We tried to amend PMs A50 motion today. After we lost, we voted with the PM for her A50 motion. Seemed the responsible thing to do. Now I see the Brexit Secretary who argued against us & for the PM’s motion actually voted against it. And her Chief Whip abstained. WTF 
Perhaps under-covered is how the Daily Telegraph has become the country’s only hard Brexit mouthpiece, and to do it, splashing around in Trumpist rhetoric. This is the *only* newspaper in the country backing what’s happening right now.  
Best and likely the only sustainable option is Indy. We have to face it half rUK will never give up on Brexit till it’s done one way or the other ... they want it, it’s their choice, let them have it. 
Why does the place a law is made make it a better law? What is the benefit to you and other UK citizens of restricting EU nationals freedom of movement? I can't defend EU wastage, but does that justify the Brexit potential job losses when there is so much homegrown wastage too? 
... then it's extraordinary that the Leader's Office and the whips have held the thing together so well, and it's the Tories whose discipline and coherence has completely broken down—epitomised by the Brexit secretary voting against the government's Brexit policy tonight. [2/3] 
Given that Corbyn is leading a PLP that is in a permanent tantrum, in which blocks of MPs have opposing views on Brexit, and several MPs and all of Tinge, the Lib Dems and the SNP spend their time finding gimmicky ways to expose divisions with grandstanding votes... [1/3] 
The most shocking thing about Trump's Brexit comments? He's right - Freddy Gray  
Brexit summary. The people who screamed that we should take back control when we always had control anyway have now forced us to hand over all control to the EU who now have control over our destiny.  
UK is heading for difficult times. We (Europe) need to give them one last opportunity. UK remaining in EU is best solution. #EU #Brexit  
Perspective: Brexit is Britain’s mid-life crisis  
If you’re confused about #Brexit there’s good reason to be. Even the UK Gov’t & its Ministers are confused about what they should do, how they should vote, what for & why. Here’s a great illustration of the utter mess the UK is in....  
Jeremy Corbyn has tonight sacked 3 shadow ministers & a whip who rebelled to vote against a second Brexit referendum 
Trump on Brexit (verbatim): Both sides are very very you know, they're cemented in. It’s a tough situation, it’s a shame. Frankly it’s a shame, there was no reason for that to happen, they could’ve had the vote & it should’ve  gone smoothly but it didn’t. Very complicated issue.  
After the week’s parliamentary shenanigans, a reminder of how the UK voted in the EU referendum and why: 
Wondering when the UK media and the HoC realise that the Brexit no-deal deadline is actually April 18. If the UK want to leave with a deal and avoid holding EP elections then April 18 is the last day to get a deal approved by the European Parliament 
Vince Cable is quitting as Lib Dem Leader. He will go down in political history as one of the core architects of austerity and one of the causes of Brexit. Thanks for the memories. 
How long should the delay to Brexit be? 
Saying “I won’t blame the Tories!” is just an admission that there’s no strategy to win over Conservative MPs, get Parliament to take control of a deal then put it to a referendum, or apply pressure for a snap election in which a PV could conceivably get on the Labour manifesto. 
With each day of delay, it's 1 extra day of uncertainty, which is 1 extra day of nervous UK business holding back on investment, which is 1 extra day of nervous international entities holding back on UK investment, which is 1 extra day of UK growth wasted. GET ON WITH BREXIT.  
President Trump claims he gave Theresa May ideas on negotiating Brexit but 'she didn't listen'  
So says @guyverhofstadt - the chair of the European Parliament’s Brexit Steering Group. He doesn’t have a say on extension, but does his thinking reflect that in some EU member governments? Yes.  
Great speech summing up the #Brexit shambles which leaves the UK as the laughing stock of Europe. Mhairi Black doing Scotland proud. #Article50 #PeoplesVote 
Brexit thugs. If there are liberal minded, compassionate, respectful Brexiters we never seem to see them. 
As everyone fixates on nothing but Brexit this is the story of one of the hundreds of homeless deaths on our streets. To our shame we have lost all perspective  
Without Corbyn robbing May of her Parliamentary majority, Brexit would be a foregone conclusion and a Tory deal done by now.Your problem ain’t JC. It’s the fact that even if he whipped Labour MPs to back a second referendum, the motion *still* wouldn’t get through the Commons.  
The full list: the MPs who voted to delay Brexit - The Spectator  
Heard of Jim Breyer? I had not. But he's one of the missing links in all the dark money nonsense behind the theft of the 2016 election & Brexit. He is the brother-in-law of Mitch McConnell. And don't get me started on Mitch's wife, Cindy Yang's big pal. 
If you want to know what is happening with Brexit and you’re outside the UK, here’s a cabinet minister being interviewed on TV just now outside the Houses of Parliament.    
The Brexit Secretary, folks.  
MPs have voted to delay Brexit - so what might happen now?  
Something not #brexit  
You voted with Dictator May for a Tory Brexit that wipes £40Bn off public spending and damages jobs and livelihoods.You voted against giving yourself and the Labour Party a voice on a better deal.Don't pretend you have integrity, your constituents voted Labour and got a Tory.  
How embarrassed is it possible to be about one’s own government? Personally i don’t want Brexit. Maybe that is what should happen. But not on a calculated “how many votes can we corner?” principle. This is a bigger decision than that. Shame honestly. 
The Queen should trigger a General Election to solve Brexit crisis, writes Paul Routledge  
Brexit was not a posh white man’s coup. It was a working-class revolt that attracted millions of women and BME people. The idea it was an elite plot is a convenient fiction, writes @jowilliams293 
Obviously, I’ve seen some emails & noticed some constituents questioning my decision to vote against a ‘no deal’ Brexit yesterday, so I thought I would expIain my reasoning. More than happy to carry on a dialogue with people over this, though: pic.twitter.com/ntKPCq223z 
The face of Brexit. It's nice that we're screwing up our country for people like this. Everyone should feel very proud.  
Tonight almost all Labour MPs voted to delay Brexit. The majority of Conservative MPs voted against any delay - including me. They won. 
The vilification & disrespect shown to all SNP MPs is beneath contempt As was demonstrated by the obsequious @michaelgove yesterday The SNP have been consistent in their commitment to SM & CU since Brexit result announced & BLOCKED at every turn #DissolveTheUnion#VoteSNP pic.twitter.com/avnPvABDXc 
Scottish MPs voting against delaying #Brexit by requesting Article 50 extension: 1. K Hair @Kirstene4Angus *2. C Clark @Colin_J_Clark *3. D Ross @Douglas4Moray 4. J Lamont @John2Win 5. R Thomson @RossThomson_MP * first two are ministerial aides but it was a free vote 
To honour an illegal #Brexit Leave Campaign is a disgrace & shows that you have no scruples and should resign as an MP.You also have no understanding of business, finance or economics which makes you an incompetent buffoon & un fit to be an MP #RevokeA50 #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
Wanna know the problem with the #brexit negotiations.... see that bottom line. Says it all to be fair.  
Britain isn't ready for a no-deal Brexit, JPMorgan's Jamie Dimon says  
Why do think Brexit is dead? Public anger hasn’t even started to ratchet up yet. You never understood the reason why we won....  
My constituents have had their say 70% voted leave and at the general election 98% voted for candidates against a second referendum.  
So... with #Brexit prob delayed til at least June 30th, that provides space for a General Election here on super Friday May 24th, with a full month to form a new Govt afterwards? Curious. 
feel a bit like crying and i'm not sure why. maybe just the stress of the last few days all piling up, i'm sure i'm not the only one! Brexit is so bad for our mental health. 
I said I would implement the instruction of the British people in the referendum. I think we should leave on March 29th deal or no deal  
Can you take control of @labour ? Please? Because our current leader shows no leadership on #Brexit 
Sad reflection of what is happening in the UK. Direct democracy denied. #Brexit  
Brexit has become the political equivalent of Ross and Rachel. A will-they-wont-they, which has become tired and relies more and more on zany side characters and rehashed story lines.I'll be there for EU... 
Oh but perfectly fine for Blair to be lobbying for us to stay with the French government? Perfectly fine for Mr Grieve to have French ministers in his office lobbying for a long extension for a 2nd referendum okie dokie  
The country voted to leave and it’s time to get on with it - so this evening I voted against extending Article 50. I want us to leave with a deal but I don’t want to delay Brexit. We must move on and make it work. 
"My position on Brexit is a hard one as I consider Brexit to be a good thing for the  will help to rebuild a political Europe. We don't want the UK clinging to our ankles, and have to drag it around with us anymore." 
Remain MPs are kicking the Brexit can down the road with the express intent of scuppering Brexit altogether. They share a contempt for British democracy in common with the worst EU bureaucrats.  
British democracy is now dead. After taking no-deal off the table, MPs just voted to delay #Brexit. Treasonous witch May will soon fly back to her masters in #EU to beg for extension. Choice for people unambiguous: accept slavery or put on a #YellowVests and hit the streets. 
Everyone keeps saying we’ve reached peak Brexit. I’m starting to think we won’t have reached peak Brexit until they decide the only way to honour the will of the people is to use our own trident missiles to turn the nation into a pile of radioactive dust 
UK MPs have voted in favour of delaying Brexit by at least three months.  
BREAKING: Amy Jackson, Jeremy Corbyn’s political secretary, has texted the 4 Labour shadow ministers who did not abstain on the second referendum amendment asking them to resign from the frontbench. They are Justin Madders, Stephanie Peacock, Emma Lewell-Buck and Yvonne Fovargue. 
Donald Trump has today repeated his false claim that he was at his Scottish golf resort, Turnberry, "the day before" the Brexit referendum.As @FactCheck reported in July 2018, that's not true. He arrived the day after the vote. 
Really have to hand it to our MPs. They’ve successfully rejected every single conceivable Brexit outcome and have idea what to do next. You could put 650 cats - the most contrarian of all the creatures - in Parliament and there’d be more consensus. 
If #Brexit is forced through without a #PeoplesVote, our democracy will be poisoned for decades to come by the fact that the biggest political change since 1945 would have been obtained through crime. A terrible, toxic and tragic legacy. 
Why wont the 50-70 actual true blue Conservative MPs split from the fake red tory, party - The Brexit Party is waiting for you! 
Brexit weiss nicht was Brexit tut.  
No you don’t. You’re a representative not a delegate. Your duty is to act in your constituents’ best interests. And that means stopping Brexit.  
I tell you what can you imagine how chaotic Brexit would be if it was not clear what people voted for 
'They need us more than we need them'. God grant me the confidence of a white dude still making rosey Brexit predictions in the face of objective reality.  
I’m not a remoaner. I’m an ordinary, hopefully decent person, who wants to remain. I believe that Brexit will be disastrous for U.K. I support remaining because I care deeply for this country. To call me and others remoaners is disrespectful, please apologise. Thanks 
MPs voted against holding a second referendum on Brexit. Forty-one Labour MPs defied the party whip ordering them to abstain.  
There are 15 days left until Brexit. That's 11 working days and 2 of those are Fridays taken up with Private members' bills and the last Friday is clear. That's 8 effective days left.When was the "People’s Vote campaign" going to, "press the public vote issue in Parliament"?  
Types of chaos in ascending order:ErrorCock-upFuck-upCalamityOmnishamblesCatastrofuckPile of arseBrexitChris GraylingThis:  
Another tolerant Brexit voter.   
You DO NOT delay Brexit. You ensure that it happens!  If, at 11:01pm on 29 March 2019, the United Kingdom has NOT left the European Union, I fear for the future of parliamentary democracy in the UK as we now know it. 
All of the adversarial schoolboy shouting, heckling and theatrical face pulling in the @HouseofCommons is just so pathetic & embarrassing. They are all so out of touch. So isolated from the real world.Whatever your stance on #brexit, the whole system needs a colossal overhaul 
The British Parliament voted in favour of delaying the Brexit process beyond the scheduled date of March 29 and overwhelmingly rejected a call for a second referendum, plunging the country into political chaosRead @ANI Story |  
Even the Netherlands are taking the Michael. #BrexitMayhem #Brexit  
Against 2nd referendum: Trump, Putin, Xi, Salvini, Orban, Farage, Le Pen, Rees-Mogg. For 2nd referendum: Caroline Lucas, Sadiq Khan, Nicola Sturgeon, John Major, Keir Starmer - & I suspect Varadkar, Tusk, Macron & MerkelWhose do you support: the despots or the wise? #Brexit 
Listening to some of the passionate, heartfelt speeches over the last 3 days of Brexit debates, it astounds me you're not having to implement a ticketing system to manage the queue of TIG joiners. It only takes 10 new TIG friends to erase the point of the DUP. Imagine that! 
I promised my electorate I would not support a 2nd Referendum. Today I kept my word & voted against this amendment to force Parliament to hold a second referendum. An absolute majority of MPs voted against - 334 against 85 for. Now let’s get on with it and agree a #Brexit Deal  
They will be voting on May’s Deal for the THIRD TIME next week but you only want one referendum vote? 
The political class refused to respond intelligently to the 2016 referendum. Instead of trying to implement its result, they have treated it as an eruption of unreason.Now, British politicians are trapped by their own history. A long read by John Gray. 
Nicola Sturgeon said the extension to Article 50 must be long enough to allow another EU referendum to take place. Finger on the pulse again. 2nd referendum isn't happening.   
I promised myself a good while back I wouldn't fall out with family members anymore over Brexit. Failed at that tonight. Feeling quite buried under everything atm, so here's Torridon from 3 years ago. Look at all that sky. Wish I was there.  
I think it’s pretty clear, after the Brexit votes in Parliament and Theresa May’s obvious inability to get anything done (and ditto Corbyn) that we should do the right thing and get on the red phone to @lordbuckethead. 
With Brexit now on hold, there’s only one option left: compromise | Simon Jenkins  
As promised here’s the 60 second update from me about today’s votes in parliament on Brexit for walthamstow residents - longer version on my Facebook page with more detail. Shortest version - one step forward, two steps back! #brexithaos 
Under-remarked side impact of a delay to Brexit: thousands of Conservative councillors and council candidates are currently campaigning ahead of the local elections, and are now in danger of being punished as proxies for the Prime Minister. A lot of people very unhappy. 
“LEGALLY the referendum was NON-binding, but GOVT. of the time PROMISED to implement the result” #SimpleMinds 
First and foremost, we are democrats. The SDP stands behind the 2016 referendum mandate.  We consider the nation state to be the upper limit of democracy.  The European Union is not and never will be a social democratic enterprise.#SDP #Brexit #JoinTheSDP #bbcqt 
Will you guys, at any point, being taking your anger about the death of Brexit out on the people who actually killed it? You know, your Jacob Rees-Moggs, your Bill Cash’s, your Bernard Jenkins, your Boris Johnsons...those guys? 
Video explaining Brexit.  
I love the smug way remainers say Brexit isn’t going as well as we expected and we lied about how good it could be totally ignoring the fact they are the ones bloody sabotaging it ! 
Libraries staff will be on standby in Rotherham if needed to help the town’s estimated 7,000 EU residents complete the paperwork they need to stay in the area if Brexit goes ahead. 
Brexit needs to be cancelled before it brings down down the economy and capsizes small business like ours. So what if a few racists, xenophobes, and anti-immigrant @DailyMailUK readers get a little upset? 
I submitted a freedom of information request on Brexit commemorative coin. Here’s the last message from the Treasury...  
When they said the Brexit deal would be done by Christmas, they didn't say which Christmas. 
The Brexit process heads for extra time  
Lost in all the Brexit debacle is the report from the Institute for Fiscal Studies on yesterday's Spring Statement, which finds that TEN MILLION families will be an average of £420/year worse off as a result of the benefits freeze being extended. 
Brexit Chaos Solved in One Move  
Lucy Harris kicks off Leavers of Britain gathering in Nottingham. Brexiteers across the political spectrum coming together. We voted to leave the EU and we want our public servants to enact our wishes. #brexit @Leavers_Britain #parliamentVsthepeople #BrexitBetrayal #GoWTO 
Overhearing two people arguing about Brexit on a date in a pub and it's NOT going well people. 
I voted against the 2nd Referendum AND extending the #Brexit deadline.  
And now the 12 year-old and 9 year-old are in the bathroom, holding their own vote on a second referendum, and the 12 year-old is yelling out 'The ayes have it, the ayes have it'.Apparently they held another vote on whether the 9 year-old would get hot water in his bath.  
I don't want a people's vote. I want Brexit killed stone dead. #RevokeArticle50 
SDP & Brexit Party are both seeing mem'ship surge on back of Brexit betrayal. While these parties will have differing domestic agendas, they should form an electoral pact on delivering Brexit & controlled immigration. After that they can compete.  
If your motive is to build a campaign against Brexit this is a terrible approach. If you motive is to build a campaign against a Corbyn led Labour party then this makes perfect sense  
To all those #FBPE #PV #TIG people out there. Handy fact sheet:Corbyn didn’t want the referendum Corbyn didn’t call the referendum Corbyn campaigned (vigorously) for RemainCorbyn achieved 70% Labour Remain votesCorbyn didn’t negotiate BrexitYou’re bloody idiots. 
The next former Brexit Secretary taking his Prime minister’s lead and voting against his own motion today.In other news, the Prime minister complained about leaks from Cabinet according to a er leak from cabinet. 
Westminster votes for an  #Article50Extension.#Brexit #BrexitMayhem 
Britain pleads to extend Article 50: The stark humiliation of Brexit  
To reiterate: the ECJ ruled the UK can cancel Brexit unilaterally, any time, no approval needed. The door to safety is open and clearly marked. The UK refuses to take it because they are run by absolute morons. 
I’m from the US and even I want an independent Scotland. Every good thing I hear about the UK usually started in Scotland, and it’s where I’d spend the most time on a visit. I don’t want Brexit screwing up my travel plans! 
Name him or it didn't happen....Owen?  OWEN? O W E N???? 
Corbyn wants a GE bit he wants one so he can attempt to force his Brexit on us.He doesn't want a PV with an option to remain.I genuinely believe Corbyn wants Brexit more than he wants a Labour government. 
if you people arent going to Brexit then im just going to have to go over there and do it myself 
The people don't want an extension;   we want to leave. No 2nd ref, no extension, no £39 billion. #BrexitBetrayal #brexit  
EU citizens who have made their home in east London are being offered help from @TowerHamletsNow's own Brexit contingency service  
Voted remain but am % behind Corbyn. The establishment of a Labour Government for the many, is the number one priority. It's the only hope for millions of people in the UK #Brexit#JC4PM2019 
Donald Trump says he 'hates' to see Brexit being 'ripped apart'  
Dynamo Kiev would get relegated if in @premierleague. @EuropaLeague  has been great travel but awful football this season. Vodkas all round...#DYNCHE #Chelsea #CFCBut it's less boring & pathetic than Brexit 
#UK parliament voted to delay #Brexit.Dear British people, you didn't really think your elites will let you leave the #EU, no matter what you voted, did you? 
In a meeting today, trying to get the “Love Corbyn Hate Brexit” sticker off my laptop, because I still hate brexit but I no longer love corbyn. wouldn’t come off, just left a grey sticky patch, & this nice young tory woman next to me said “at least you didn’t get it as a tattoo” 
Secret Brexit plan B: underpants on head, two pencils up nose, shout "wibble!"Failed once in another forum, but that's absolutely no reason not to try the same thing again. 
Not gonna rehearse unwisdom of no deal here but other, moderate Tories know it well enough. How do they feel being in the same party as Brexit kamikazes? Knowing that their next leader might be of that number? 3/ 
Watching Donald Trump opine on how to negotiate Brexit is like watching an amoeba deal with particle physics 
When TIG and FBPE come out and try to blame Corbyn, despite this clear request to MPs from PV campaigners circulated today... we all know their game is up.They don't care about stopping Brexit - they care about stopping Labour under Corbyn.Ever feel like you've been had?  
314 MPs ducked the opportunity for Parliament to take control of Brexit, which is supposed to be all about the UK Parliament taking back control. So the  buck and blame is passed back to @theresa_may. At least we know what's coming next. Her deal with an orange post it note. 
If one of these is your Labour MP, remember to say 'thank you' for respecting the referendum result and helping to ensure that Brexit will be delivered. 
Have any of those MPs who voted to delay Brexit actually encountered a voter on the doorstep who said "You know what we need is to drag this whole process out a bit longer so you lot can carry on squabbling"? Get us out NOW! #Brexit  
On this basis there is hope for currently roundly defeated prospects - such as the Malthouse compromise, a second referendum - almost anything really - all by April 14th. 
MPs have voted overwhelmingly for Theresa May to ask for a delay to Brexit. @IainDale asks: where do we go from here? 
Day 993 in the Big Brexit House, and another crank on the pathos handle | John Crace  
This is where we're at, John Redwood still spouting nonsense in Parliament, pretending nothing has happened to the British economy following the EU vote, conveniently oblivious to the massive post vote action taken by the BOE and still attempting to mislead over GATT Article 24. 
Remeber this #Brexit chaos is EXACTLY what the EU wanted to send a message to other countries that might think about leaving. They are not our friends, colleagues or partners. 
Brexit edging. So hot right now. 
We’re almost at 400 followers This account promotes the traditionalist, conservative wing of UKIP & supports ‘@GerardBattenMEP’s national populist direction We need UKIP for now & beyond Brexit, the fightback starts now, follow us & support your local UKIP branch!   
Surely , no matter the latitude allowed, that inevitably leads to resignation or ejection from the Government even by a Prime Minister in Name Only ?  So I look forward to meeting Brexit Secretary Number 4 .  
I think I may have slightly broken today, in terms of Brexit anyway. Our PM is going for a 3rd attempt to get her deal through. A 3rd attempt. But no we can't have a second referendum. Because you "can't keep asking the same question until you get the answer you want". 
Ergo, half the Tory party support no-Deal Brexit.  
Brexit secretaries since July 2016:Davis, Raab, Barclay.@oldhamathleticafc managers since July 2016:Robinson, Sheridan, Wellens, Bunn, Wild, Scholes.Twice as hard? 
So let me get this right. @conservatives are putting in place a "deal" that doesn't deliver a proper Brexit, that costs us £39 Billion , and ties us more tightly into the Customs Union erc than before? And they think people wil will vote for them?  
Well he is a Brexit Secretary and has an illustrious string of forebears to match up to. 
‘Puppies in a box “2”...The Sequel.’ Back due to huge public demand...all new, wide screen, never before seen footage...forget all this Brexit rubbish...it’s “Puppies in a box....2...”  
Watching Westminster shenanigans from afar this evening & noticed the People’s Vote people didn’t approve of second referendum motion, and the actual Brexit secretary voted against the gov Brexit policy. Still going smoothly then. 
*sigh* Neither a '#British' #identity nore #Europe as a concept existed in the #Neolithic. That‘s a bad #Brexit metaphor. And only so close to abuse #archaeological data for ... nationalistic nonsense, @Telegraph.  
Yes, this is a coping mechanism #Brexit 
The Brexit Secretary is the government’s main Brexit spokesperson. He spoke in support of the government’s position today and then voted against. 60% of government MPs voted against. How long can this government stay in office? Utter madness! 
Before you say Brexit hasn't achieved anything, it's managed to undo 500 years of British foreign policy in barely 2  
"You can’t have it both ways. If you support it, vote for it." With less than 20 days to go until #Brexit, @ChukaUmunna has a message to the Labour leadership on its mixed messages on whether to back a #PeoplesVote. Support us here:  
How can Leave supporters trust that Remainers in Number 10 would negotiate a future relationship that's faithful to the referendum result?  
Day 993 in the Big Brexit House, and another crank on the pathos handle | John Crace  
Brexit is 363 hours away. #brexit 
When it’s almost the end of the week, you can’t hear the words 'brexit' or 'MP's Vote' anymore and you hear the sound of your 1st Gin and Tonic being mixed!!  
It's not the Brexit uncertainty I can't take, it's the passive-aggressiveness. Why can't they throw some shoes or chairs at each other, let some steam off. 
Paul is continuing to refute @HenryNewman ‘s Downing St propaganda. Some of this may seem dry but it cuts to the heart of #Brexit and our struggle to break free. Here’s the latest.  
MPs voted to authorise the government to ask the EU for an extension of the Brexit deadline beyond March 29th  
Trying to make sense of the Votes this evening, Brexit Sec votes against his own motion and Chief Whip abstains.There isn’t a local council in the land that could operate like this.  
This week Mrs Villiers - Won’t vote for the only deal available because it is not #Brexit enough. Will vote for no deal despite the chaos it would create. Won’t vote to delay #Brexit to fix the mess she and her friends created. #Chipping deserves better. #brexitshambles 
This is Brexit Secretary Stephen Barclay arguing passionately in favour of the government’s Brexit extension.Right before he went and voted AGAINST it.  
Analysis: Never let May lecture the indy movement about not taking No for an answer againCS editor Ben Wray says that when it comes to democratic legitimacy, an independence referendum is streets ahead of the Prime Minister’s Withdrawal Agreement.  
Everyone’s voting against what they want. Brexiteers won’t vote for Brexit, people wanting a people’s vote won’t vote for a people’s vote and a large number of remainers who want to remain keep voting for Brexit! 
You can argue Labour failing to support a public vote today is/isn't valid. What's unarguable is the absolute failure to campaign for one.It's why Labour MPs are voting against when it's clear Brexit is a failure and the country has moved to Remain.It's been piss poor so far. 
Today's anti-Wall vote in Congress is the American echo of the anti-Brexit vote in the UK yesterday The elite are subverting the Will of the People Will we allow this to continue? 
Disappointing to see @realDonaldTrump continue his unprecedented interference in internal UK politics today. US continues to push the UK toward a hard Brexit or no deal exit. Constant sniping at the PM. The special relationship is in its worst shape since the Suez crisis. 
The UK Parliament voted to trigger Article 50. Today it voted to signal it wants to reverse delivering Brexit when it committed to.  A day of reckoning is coming. 
My votes this week:* I voted to leave the EU with PMs deal* I voted against having no deal removed completely, leading to indefinite uncertainty* I voted against a second referendum* I voted for limited time extension to June so we can try & leave with deal.@ScotTories 
It was an honour to accompany Taoiseach @campaignforleo to his meeting with @SpeakerPelosi, with whom he had a warm & substantive exchange on #Brexit & immigration issues.  
As was to be expected, MPs have voted to extend Article 50 and delay #Brexit. Are you going to let them get away with this? Join #ForBritain and fight back.  
I joined the SDP because they are a party that stand for what I believe in and as I read their New Declaration it filled me with hope for the future. #sdp #brexit #hope 
Great night on the doors in Cardonald! Lots of support for SNP People are exasperated with Brexit + can see it's the SNP that is really speaking for Scotland. #IndyRef #VoteSNP 
Every week #bbcqt audience members demand that MPs get together to work out a Brexit deal... so they will be glad to know that after repeated Govt defeats Labour is trying to do that, with a focus on protecting jobs and communities, despite the hostility from Tory front benches.  
Good. Brexit has taken a notable step backwards - CNN  
better do this again tonight!  it's OUR march on Saturday 23rd March, and we need it to be MASSIVE, to show our MPs and the EU27 and the whole world how we feel about Brexit!!use hashtags #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote #bbcqt 
Trump criticized British Prime Minister Theresa May's handling of #Brexit talks  
I’m not to keen on peoples vote. We have already had one and we chose to leave the EU. if we hold another one it’s against our principles and what we believe in democracy.There is no point in wasting time trying to change the referendum results.We do need another general election 
Strangest 2 things of the night - Steve Barclay, the Brexit Secretary, voted against the plan he had been arguing for minutes before, and the chief whip who is in charge of getting MP s to back the govt, abstained 
188 @Conservatives MPs (including her Brexit Secretary, who closed the debate!!) voted against @theresa_may tonight, to keep faith with voters and stop a delay to Brexit. Only 112, mostly placemen and Remainers, voted with her and Labour. Go figure what she’s doing to her party. 
This evening the Brexit Secretary voted against his Government’s own motion on Brexit, which earlier in the day he had defended in the House of Commons. That’s the equivalent of the Chancellor voting against his own Budget. This is a Government that has lost complete control.  
Not the right time to push the People’s Vote?It’s two weeks to Brexit and the Gov will now seek an extension to June 30th.There will be no time to hold a confirmatory referendum, plus you need to agree a Deal first or we will crash out.It was a chance to lay down a marker 
For anyone wondering what Germany thinks about #Brexit.Today’s @SZ: 
If @matteosalvinimi saves Brexit by vetoing the article 50 extension,Where will you be holidaying this year? 
'Jobs First Brexit''Will of the People'2 of the most disgraceful slogans of the last few years. 
Understand your wish to uphold #EUref but do you believe there is a #NorthernPowerhouse majority for a cliff edge #NoDeal #Brexit? Can you explain how #Nodeal would be good for the #4IR reindustrialisation in the #NorthernPowerhouse that you and I believe in? #Timeforcompromise 
A reminder; this is what happens on a good day for the prime minister #Brexit  
Yet again, UK’s most senior journalists completely discount or misread the EU in their Brexit analysis. Next week the European Council will decide whether UK will get an extension. Not just the length of extension. The UK can only ask. It is up to EU27 leaders to decide.  
My prediction on how this Brexit shambles will play out:MV3 is voted down.EU Council then offers the UK a 2 year extension to Article 50.ERG get spooked by this and reluctantly vote for MV4  - which narrowly wins. #BrexitVotes 
Majority of MPs know that voting for a 2nd referendum would be career ending.  
Who, along with me, is so cheesed off with parliament’s handling of Brexit?  Do they not realise that procrastination is one of the worst things we can do to this beautiful country?  Every day lost costs UK business hundreds of millions.  MP’s - please ditch your ego’s. 
Serial liar and deceiver Theresa May voted to scrap the 29th March Brexit date she had promised to honour time and time again. No wonder the public have come to regard politicians with the utmost contempt. #StandUp4Brexit #StandUp4Democracy 
In a 1956 referendum Malta voted to become a part of the UK but, for various complicated reasons (RC church hostility; British penury; Suez), they were told it wasn't happening. Anyway, all we need now is Malta to remember this & veto Article 50 extension... 
Tonight parliament rejected a second referendum, indicative votes, and an alternative deal. We are asking for an extension for nothing and May has played a blinder.  
Joyous, civic Scottish nationalism in action again.Luke Graham was of course one of the Conservative MP's listed in SNP Brexit Secretary Mike Russell's inflammatory tweet from the night before.  
Er...then why didn’t he support the vote on it today? With 15 days to go before the scheduled date of #Brexit what is he waiting for? A complete absence of leadership from the leaderships of the established parties. For a different approach visit  
This man wants the UK to leave the EU with no deal.That will probably cause a recession, potentially a long and deep #recession.This man will then profit from that recession by acquiring assets cheaply. This is #ToryBritain #Brexit #VoteLabour 
Thanks for all the kind tweets about tonight’s @BBCParliament commentary - and apologies to anyone who tweeted a question we didn’t answer. I’ll be back with @RuthFox01 for the next big Brexit vote... possibly on Tuesday. 
I’ve started buying gifts for friends and family to give them on the day Brexit finally happens. I’m going to make Brexit Day our summer Christmas. Religion didn’t want us to have fun, at least we got Xmas. Same with Brexit voters. So I’m giving friends gifts! Food, medicine, etc 
This, ladies and gentlemen.THIS is Brexit.Right here, in a single tweet.  
Stephen Barclay has just voted against the government motion for which he gave the closing speech. The cabinet has a death wish. How can the Brexit secrtary now negotiate for an extension? End of days part 993 
But in that sense this is now a Labour Brexit, because 236 Labour MPs voted for the PM's motion to seek delay and only 112 Tories 
Another blow for Theresa May as EIGHT Cabinet ministers vote against the Brexit delay she is seeking.They included Brexit Secretary Stephen Barclay. Chief whip Julian Smith abstained. In all, 188 Tory MPs voted against the Government motion. 
This is sadly (sorry seb) emblematic of the UK’s biggest Brexit problem.Extending Article 50 needs unanimous consent of the rest of the EU. We’re so busy arguing with ourselves that we haven’t even begun arguing with the EU.  
You chickened out of the Labour leadership contest. You've chickened out of a by-election in Streatham. You're a fraud, that nobody should take seriously. All nice suits and no substance. #brexit #amendmentH 
Remarkable breakdown of votes: 190 Tories opposed May's Brexit delay, only 114 in favour8 Cabinet ministers voted against PM: Fox, Grayling, Mordaunt, Williamson, Leadsom, Cairns, Truss and Barclay - who literally spoke in favour of it minutes earlier 
Couldn’t be clearer. Yes. @UKLabour will support Kyle/Wilson amendment. I want the people I represent, voters in Nottingham South, to have the #FinalSay on #Brexit.  
MPs had the chance to take back control of Brexit – wresting this tortured process from a weak, flailing and moribund government – and they ducked it. My take  
The former Brexit Secretary voted with the government, while the current Brexit Secretary voted against the government   
Britain votes to delay Brexit after chaotic week in Parliament. Here’s what that means  
Does the Brexit Party have a plan for the UK after Brexit? 
Tonight I voted against a delaying Brexit, but the Parliament agreed to an extension. It must be a swift one, with purpose. We must deliver the result of the referendum, and hurry up about it! 
Brexit has taken a notable step backwardsDamn, GB is more fucked up than we are here in the US! Come in y'all ... We're counting on you! 
How about we compromise and do a flexi-time #Brexit One day in one day out?  Weekends we all hunt Mark François? 
Still getting my head around the Brexit secretary voting against the motion he himself closed the debate for on behalf of the government. I know it was a free vote but why was he closing the debate if he didn’t believe a word he was saying? Barmy. 
'Brexit'. 
Extending A50 has proven so divisive it even split the Brexit Secretary - 5pm Steve Barclay: "It is time to put forward an extension that is realistic. I commend the Government motion to the House."6.08pm *votes against it*  
> We were promised our vote would be implemented> We were promised Brexit> We were promised a Brexit govt.> We were promised MPs & Lords who represent us, not themselves> We were promised Leave means Leave> We were promised out by March 29thWe were lied to. 
Extraordinary. Brexit Sect Stephen Barclay summed up for  govt on May  motion to delay Brexit then Voted AGAINST. How can he go with May to Brussels to ask for delay next week? Unsustainable. "Like a Chancellor voting against his own Budget," says a Labour MP. Liam Fox did same. 
MPs gave their backing todayTo seeking a Brexit delay:As this month's too soon,They'll try end of June,(Before which will come end of May).#Brexit#BrexitMayhem#BrexitVote #TheresaMay 
So, er, the prime minister tables a motion to delay Brexit. Her Brexit secretary votes against it. And he is still her Brexit secretary. In what conceivable way can this be described as a functioning government? 
WATCH: @BillNeelyNBC reports from London on UK Parliament voting to accept a government motion to seek a delay by at least 3 months to the current #Brexit deadline set for the end of March.“It’s up for the European Union to decide how long the delay will be.”  
Here you go Tasha. I've rotated the video for better viewing...  #Brexit #Sodem #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50Now #FBPE #PutItToThePeopleMarch 
"I'm surprised at how badly it has all gone from a stand point of negotiations but I gave the Prime Minister my ideas of how to negotiate it, she didn't listen... It's very sad to see what's happening there."President Donald Trump on the #Brexit negotiations,March 14th 2019  
[READ IN FULL] The 412 MPs Who Voted to Delay Brexit  
I’ve heard it all now. The Brexit Secretary has just voted against the motion that he’d just been arguing for. Anyone got a better word than Omnishambles? 
Peak Brexit - the Brexit secretary  just voted against his Govt’s motion that he’d just given an impassioned speech in favour of at the dispatch box.  
I've decided that if Brexit happens, and maybe even if it doesn't, I'd like to set up a charitable society designed to promote links between young people in the UK and young people in Europe, with the express purpose of fostering pan European spirit and cooperation. Am I crazy? 
The most shocking thing about Trump’s Brexit comments? He’s right   
Stephen Barclay, the Brexit Secretary;- proposes the Government motion on article 50 extension. - votes against the Government motion on article 50 extension. But STILL the public aren’t allowed a #PeoplesVote?! 
I am a Greater Manchester MP and I voted for a 2nd referendum.  
BREAKING: Brexit Festival delayed. 
As a fully signed-up Anglophile who would be overjoyed if Britain stayed in the EU or at least had a v. close relationship with it, I find the degree to which every Brexit camp just assumes that the EU will magically do whatever is necessary to support your strategy frustrating. 
We need:- A citizens' assembly to consider the best Brexit outcome - A national conversation about a new, truly democratic constitution for the UK. Brexit it a symptom, not the cause of our broken democracy. The only long term answer is a democratic revolution   
The SNP release a list of 67 ways the Highland economy could be hurt by Brexit @IanBlackfordMP @ICockburn  
So here's what I think happens about Brexit next:  
'Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn reiterated his support for a further referendum after earlier ordering his MPs not to vote for one' Well, that's coherent. 
MPs overwhelmingly back Brexit delay  
We know EU27 need a reasoned plan for the long extension that is needed for a referendum, and we know a decision is likely to be made on an extension next Thurs/Fri. 2/ 
Brexit Secretary Steve Barclay at the despatch box at 5pm this evening: "It is time to put forward an extension that is realistic. I commend the Government motion to the House."He then voted against it.  
Tonight the House of Commons rejected a second #Brexit referendum. Good call. #respecttheresult #wehadapeoplesvote #letsgetonwithit 
The EU is a trade and regulatory superpower. It’s the economic equivalent of a military negotiation with the US. Thucydides figured this stuff out in the 5th century BC. The idea we ever would gain control from Brexit was the dumbest thing I ever heard. Jfc. 
Nigel Farage urges Tory Brexiteers to still take the risk of rejecting Theresa May’s “awful” deal as MPs vote to seek a Brexit delay @Nigel_Farage | #Brexit  
also apologies to the Brexit Means Brexit crowd, come on @Twitter give us more than four polling options you despotic tyrants 
Brexit Secretary did not back what is now Government policy to seek an extension - Voted against it alongside 7 other Cabinet ministers. 
So Stephen Barclay, who is the actual BREXIT SECRETARY for the actual GOVERNMENT, closed the debate FOR THE GOVERNMENT, and then voted AGAINST the government’s policy on BREXIT.  
Tonight the Brexit secretary voted against the government's Brexit plan.We all need a drink.  
.@MattCartoonist sums up a chaotic week of #Brexit drama  
And who could forget Liz Truss, chief secretary to the Treasury. She also voted against a Brexit delay. 
Today in Brexit. It's all perfectly simple 
Shortly after the referendum, a friend asked me whether  might change its mind about #Brexit . They might, I replied, sarcastically, but only after so much animosity and drama, that the EU will say 'No, thank you‘. I was half-joking. I really hope I was wrong. 
Very disappointing but predictable. Most Labour MPs abstained on #peoplesvote amendment this evening. After the vote Corbyn then repeated  Labour‘s support for #FinalSay. He‘ll still be doing that after Brexit. Remainers are being played. 
8 cabinet ministers voted against asking the EU to delay BrexitBarclay (he wound up the debate for the government! This is not normal)CairnsFoxGraylingLeadsomMordaunt TrussWilliamson 
The UK Government’s Brexit Minister voted against his own government’s Brexit motion.Every day the government plumbs some new depths. #Brexit  
The UK desperately asking the EU for an extension is the first example of losing control. The EU has all the levers as it will have when the UK pleads for a decent trade deal. Brexit is - and will continue to be- the opposite of ‘seizing control’. 
The Govt is now proposing to cancel Brexit Day. That’s the Tory Party that promised us time and again it would be March 29, esp at GE17.  
More news from the Mad World of May's Brexit....The Brexit Secretary voted against the very Government motion that he actually spoke for at the Dispatch Box. 
PLEASE RETWEET and SHARE to all my followers the @Conservatives under the pathetic leadership of @theresa_may have now betrayed YOUR #BREXIT.... Please support and add the following #website to your #Twitter Profile as your website link! SPREAD the WORD!  
The Brexit secretary himself voted against the very motion he had just spoken in favour of at the dispatch box.  
Stephen Barclay, Penny Mordaunt, Gavin Williamson, Liam Fox, Andrea Leadsom, Chris Grayling, Liz Truss, and Alun Cairns all voted AGAINST the Article 50 extension. Astonishing to see the Brexit secretary vote against the government's preferred course. 
Wow. PM backs extension - but won on Opposition votes - opposed by 60% of her own party MPs and several of her own Cabinet - including her Brexit and Trade SecretariesUnprecedented situation.  
Editor texts me from Tel Aviv: "Thanks for the analysis you just filed on Brexit. Hope we can use it. Right now we're in the outside shelter because rockets may have just landed"#Cantwaittogetback 
Having ignored implementing the outcome of the largest democratic vote ever in this country would you ever vote #Conservative  or #Labour again?**Please retweet after voting **#UKIP #ForBritain #SDP #Time #Soverign #Brexit #WTOBrexit #BrexitBetrayal 
I voted against an extension to Article 50. MPs however supported a motion which allows for a short technical extension in the event of a deal being agreed.I voted against a 2nd referendum and this was defeated. 
Tonight’s votes show clearly that we need to urgently change path on #Brexit.Labour’s proposals received more support than the Prime Minister’s deal - a cross-party consensus is there to be reached which secures a deal and allows us to move on. Now the PM needs to listen. 
In other words, Theresa May got a delay to Brexit through the Commons on Labour votes  
Just think. There are some old cunts that voted for Brexit who are on their death beds but have been clinging on for the big day. And now it's been postponed.Sleep tight, auld yin. 
How on EARTH if Brexit happens it’s going to be #Jeremycorbyn’s  fault ? Have you heard yourself ? Give Cameron and druggie George a call ! Start from there 
Members of the government who voted against the government’s motion to delay Brexit:- Steve Barclay- Jake Berry- Alex Burghart- Alun Cairns- Liam Fox- Chris Grayling- Trudy Harrison- Robert Jenrick- Kwasi Kwarteng- Andrea Leadsom- Jack Lospreti- Kit Malthouse 
Brexit analogy; We’ve all been on a night out with a mate who says “It’s shit here - let’s go somewhere else.” Then when u leave u realise he has no idea where to go &the place u left wont let u back in.The UK is standing in a kebab shop at 2am arguing about whose fault it is 
Conservative MP Paul Masterton (who was a government aide until last night) says there is "a complete absence of a longer term strategy" on Brexit. #c4news 
Only 112 Tory MPs voted to delay Brexit. 188 Tories voted against. Theresa May only got the delay through thanks to 236 Labour votes. 
The great irony of Brexit is that it has given the EU more power over UK affairs than ever before. 
Damian Green sums up the views of the nation on Stop Brexit Man...  
Labour Bottle Second Referendum Pledge  
Confirmed: Brexit Secretary Steve Barclay voted AGAINST the PM's motion he had just spoken from the Despatch Box in favour of to close the debate. Go figure. 
Confirmed David Davis voted to delay Brexit 
Brexit votes: what happened, what it means and what comes next  
Please think about how you would feel if you were 16-21 and were going to face the consequences of Brexit - we haven’t had the opportunity to vote. 
People upset about delay to Brexit: BrexiteersPeople not upset about delay to Brexit: Authors with Brexit books to write 
3 years of lies, deceit, promises, brexit means brexit & when finally, with days to go the con can't be maintained any longer the corrupt worms simply vote to extend the time in the EU to get enough time to arrange a second referendum. I think the EU is better than this shit. 
Anyone else sick to the back teeth of bloody Brexit?It’s a massive distraction by the Government while they put Austerity Policy after Austerity Policy in through the back door while they think our backs are turned.I just want a Labour Government- whether in or out of the EU  
College Green Stop Brexit Guy: "You just called me a wanker"Damian Green: "I think that was analysis. Political analysis. Which I stand by"  
Who has been the Biggest Arsehole in this whole #Brexit nightmare.?Part Two. 
I'm about to deliver a talk about cannabis and mental health to students at Eton College. If only the famous pothead @DavidCameron_MP had seen my talk 40 years ago at Eton, he may not have developed psychosis and called the EU referendum. Don't smoke drugs kids. 
Whilst Parliament has voted to make it less likely that we will crash out with no deal, the ongoing chaos shows exactly why we need to stop the clock, revoke Article 50 and with Parliament in gridlock - give the public the final say on Brexit.  
Expected Tories to enable a damaging #Brexit. But many Labour supporters are appalled that @jeremycorbyn is waving it through - & abstaining on a #PeoplesVote today. Choosing to stand by, while livelihoods are at stake, is a fundamental violation of Labour’s traditional values. 
I, for one, love being a secret government lawyer and drafting a "Plan C" for Brexit, in which if MPs refuse to agree on a deal, the UK has no choice but to become a Sharia State. As you can imagine, my boss cannot do anything about this 
Why indeed restage a 3 yr-old referendum swung by the lies/overspending of venal right-wingers with vested interests, Russian interference & now-deceased Daily Mail readers? As I explained to my 18 yr-old who wasn’t eligible to vote in the first one, “That would be undemocratic." 
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you  
So three years since Brexit was proposed.• Everyone who proposed it has since fucked off.• We now have a prime minister that no fucker voted for.• Not one single person has a fucking clue what is going on. Solution: another three months should sort it no worries 
Ok, time to recommend this absolutely lovely natural wine at £8 and it is called The Witches! Perhaps, they can help destroy Brexit? #LesSorcieres 
No. Democracy has risen like the phoenix from the ashes of a corrupt referendum and the influence of a hostile foreign power - Russia, and is breaking free of the malign influence of US money spent in the “Think Tanks” of Tufton Street. 
Of the three people most recommended to me as ‘sensible’ Leavers in early 2017, two have now withdrawn their support for Brexit (@OliverNorgrove & @rolandmcs) while the third recently tweeted that my biological mother should have aborted the foetus that became me... 
Better night for #Brexit . However, MV3 on Monday. Expect the motion to be amended to include a delay if the deal is rejected again. This time I predict ministers will resign to make it so. EU summit on Wednesday to consider any request.#StandFirm 
UK / Europe relationship explained #brexit  
Would you mind not calling us ‘Remoaners’, @adamboultonSKY? You’re meant to be a serious journalist, not a hack spewing right-wing propaganda for the Express or the Mail. And yes, we’ll continue to fight Brexit, because Brexit equals corruption. #PutItToThePeople 
Dumbo will be airborne before Brexit  
This  was the scene in the House of Commons at 17:00 tonight on the vote for a Second EU referendum. The vote on Amendment H. That's the Labour party, top right, sitting on their hands while everyone else gets up to vote in the division lobbies.  
"WHAT DO WE WANT?""WE DON'T KNOW!""WHEN DO WE WANT IT?""AT A LATER DATE""SURE ABOUT THAT?""NO!"#Brexit 
Here's why Donald Tusk prefers a long Brexit extension  
Brexit is 364 hours away. #brexit 
Says the guy who’s going to jail for money laundering #Brexit  
Opinion: Brexit has finally broken the British political system  
Beware 8 numbers in usernames. Joined Jan 2019. Vocal on Brexit.Troll farms are up and running. I wish @twitter would do more about this. 
I'll be completely honest- I have no idea what Brexit is.When I first heard the word I thought it was some new English cheese, and I'd like to leave it at that. 
Local man starting to suspect it’s too late to ask what Brexit is  #brexit  
Oh God. Stephen Barclay now talking about elites. Not sure I can stomach any more Tory politicians moaning about elites. Brexit a fantasy opposed on EVERYONE by a tiny, moneyed, white elite. The hypocrisy literally makes me feel sick 
City council to fly EU flag on Brexit Day  
Actual words that appear on BBC News:"Following the votes, Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn reiterated his support for a further referendum after earlier ordering his MPs not to vote for one." 
Brexit is becoming so tedious that I'm thinking of unfollowing myself. 
Feeling very sad as a young person tonight. My friends are feeling very sad as young people. Not just because a second referendum was denied but because we are sat at home, having no say in anything, watching the government mess around with our futures for political points 
This is my Brexit face. The PM and the entire soap opera parliament should resign. Cats should be in power.  
It's all perfectly simple. Yesterday, some of Theresa May's MPs defied her by voting for the motion she put forward; today Jeremy Corbyn ordered his MPs not to vote for the referendum he supports. It's all very simple and normal and under control and fine.  
Brexit catastrofuck, latest summary:2016: “Let’s take back control!”2019:“Let’s beg the EU to keep control or we’ll be living in The Walking Dead in 2 weeks” 
My thoughts on today’s votes #batleyandspen #brexit We can’t accept no deal and the Government have no mandate for their deal. We need to now work across the House to find compromise  
UK signs post-Brexit trade deal with Fiji and Papua New Guinea  
'The World's Greatest Negotiator' has seen fit to berate (yet again) UK PM Theresa May on her Brexit negotiating with the EU."She never took my advice" Trump laments.@realDonaldTrump - anybody that listens to you or takes your advice is a fool.We don't elect fools here... 
I know Lab and Con won’t want to talk about their betrayal of Peterborough’s Brexit vote in By-election. I won’t let them get away with that  
REVEALED: The REAL reason the EU is desperate to delay Brexit until 2021. OK there it is.The stitchup is complete, the con is over, the majority have been fooled, democracy has been lost, corruption has won. Should we be grateful or furious?   
A quick tip of the hat to the discipline: It’s been genuinely #inspiring today seeing so many colleagues carrying out their vital work, tweeting out the vote results from Parliament six seconds after BBC News! Thank you all for you expert service! #Brexit #dissemination #media 
Hillary Benn amendment a historic turning point tonight. To take Brexit process out of government hands and kill May's zombie deal. Lost by 2 votes.  Six Labour MPs voted against and saved May. If they not expelled, what use is Labour? Barron Campbell Hepburn Stringer Mann Hoey 
Brexit delayed. I am going to be on College Green until I am 35. I regret not rinsing the Uniqlo thermals in the sale. 
This is indicative of why Britain is in such a horrible mess right now.Brexit is not just a failure of politics but a failure of journalism and punditry. 
"I'm surprised at how badly it's all gone"Donald Trump has harsh words about #Brexit for the British prime minister Theresa May [Tap to expand]  
So Brexit isn’t happening on the 29th March 2019, but government states that March 3019 is looking doable....#BrexitMayhem 
“I was rather puzzled by the leader of the opposition saying something about a Peoples Vote... as more than half the House of Commons voted against a 2nd referendum tonight, the matter is completely dead” Julian Lewis #StandUp4Brexit 
#Extension. What for? #Brexit 
And the chances May gets her Deal through by Wednesday next week: still ridiculously slim.So long extension request is now the most likely outcome.(Which I have been saying for months already)#MeaningfulVote #Brexit 
Labour is simply Lexit now. Our country deserves an opposition who are investigating fraud illegality and foreign manipulation in the referendum. Who care about NI. The NHS. EU nationals here. Gibraltar. The most vulnerable in our society. They don’t.  #brexitshambles 
You have a duty to represent your constituents interests and the national interest. Brexit, in any form, is against both interests.Can you name a single tangible benefit Brexit will bring the good people of Stoke on Trent? Brexit = less jobs, rights, protections, austerity.  
I asked one of 15 Tory MPs who defied May by voting for Benn/Letwin/Cooper amendment, which was probably the surest route to avoid no deal Brexit, why more of his colleagues who hate no deal didn’t join rebels. “They are morons - genuinely not bright” he said. Attached are the 15  
"It is still possible to deliver #Brexit on 29th March, and to do that with a deal" says Health Secretary Matt Hancock - after MPs vote to seek a delay to UK leaving the EU pic.twitter.com/i4b9dYBmWD 
Trump slams Theresa May's handling of #Brexit  
@ayeshahazarika | Caroline Lucas, Nicola Sturgeon and Vince Cable are the only leaders who have showed any courage on #Brexit  
Now brexit is delayed, we invite you to prose the new date: - 12 of Never; - next glaciation etc 
What's just happened? BBC Political editor Laura Kuenssberg explains the latest #Brexit vote.  
UK parliament has voted in favour of delaying Brexit by three months, pending approval of PM Theresa May  
I'm just going to leave this quote here. "In a 52-48 referendum this would be unfinished business by a long way. If the Remain campaign win two-thirds to one-third that ends it." -  
For friends outside the UK who have absolutely no clue what is happening with Brexit, here are the two essential facts you need to know:1. No-one in the UK has a clue either. 2. That's it. 
In the coming #LocalElections  Remember this....#Labour  abstained on #Brexit when it mattered!Vote #libdems Here are the #Labstainers  sitting on their arses yet again!! 
Some on the remain side have worked with EU officials to literally sabotage Brexit, a democratic mandate and our democracy as a whole.Look up the definition. It is definitely traitorous.Farage on the other-hand has supported the democratic result. Jimbo needs to get a grip. 
My thoughts exactly. If anything, the #Brexit #Chaos has overwhelmingly demonstrated to us that ’British Democracy’ is not fit for #Wales. Is it democratic? That English MPs have an overall majority over Wales in #Westminster? No Way! #eingwlad #indyWales #annibyniaeth 
Tonight 334 MPs (51.4%) voted against holding a 2nd EU referendum. This proves, conclusively and completely, that even if Corbyn backed a 2nd referendum, it could not pass in Parliament. 
MPs tonight voted to make it less likely that we will crash out with no deal - and avoid the damage that would do to London - but the ongoing chaos in Parliament shows exactly why we need to revoke Article 50 and give the public the final say on Brexit.  
JUST IN: The British Parliament has approved a government plan to ask the European Union for an extension to the Brexit process.  
I have voted tonight against a second referendum and any extension of Article 50. 
Here we go again. The only way MPs can get a three-month extension to #Brexit is if the agree her dreadful Withdrawal Agreement.What is it about May which makes her want to tie us voiceless to an alien power, on terms dictated by Berlin?  
#BREAKING: U.K. lawmakers vote 'aye' to delay BrexitREAD MORE:  
Looking forward to tonight’s Question Time Brexit special live from The Dog and Duck Wetherspoons in Bolton with Nigel Farage presenting, Arron Banks, Hartley-Brewer, Boris Johnson and Ian Botham on the panel and the entire ERG and Conservative Golf Club in the audience #bbcqt 
This government is absolutely bloody useless. If Brexit has taught us anything, it’s that Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn couldn’t organise a piss up in a brewery. Perhaps we need a referendum on bringing back an absolute monarchy. 
JUST IN: British lawmakers vote to delay Brexit just 15 days before it was set to happen  
I would be astounded if the EU flat refused UK's request for a Brexit extension. Think about it: the EU effectively expelling the UK and consigning it to a probable economic crash...? Would be an act of diplomatic aggression that would poison the EU's reputation for generations 
MPs vote to delay Brexit until the end of June: Latest updates here 
The irony that the #brexit proceedings could potentially end up being in the hands of the EU... 
I voted against a delay to Brexit. As a delay was passed by Parliament, I want to see deal agreed ASAP so we can minimise to short, technical, extension. #brexit #getonwithit 
Railroaded at the start with Theresa May.Sham leadership election became a coronation, as the establishment schemed to ensure it.Our #Brexit has been a con by a corrupt UK establishment, to remain in servitude to Brussels corruption.Westminster must actually smell like sewage. 
Betrayal: MPs have had nearly 3 years to deliver Brexit. Those who voted to defy the British people and delay Brexit against their manifesto promises have proven they are not worthy of our democracy. 
There is already a clear Remain majority in the country which demographic change will cause to grow relentlessly. That growing pro-Remain majority would look with deep anger at a political class which had ignored crime to foist #Brexit on them. MPs be warned!#PeoplesVote 
I wonder who is counting how many times Theresa May said “Brexit means Brexit” and “We are leaving the EU on the 29th March 2019”? 
Parliament has voted to extend #A50 & delay Brexit. How do Farage, Banks & Wigmore, who so cherish British 'sovereignty', square the fact that they've been lobbying a foreign govt (Italy) to block the will of the UK Parliament? #BrexitMayhem 
So Project Sabotage is complete. Back to EU on our knees begging for an extension of time! For what? Just to have more Groundhog Days? Or to enable a 2nd Referendum? & what then? A third one? & if Brexit wins again, the Establishment & Parl’t won’t stop. 
Brexit update from Parliament The 2nd Refendum Campaign Group voted against a 2nd Referendum. MPs voted to delay Brexit day until 30 June so MPs can now accept the bad deal they rejected yesterdayEU will now vote whether to allow this delay for the bad deal to be approved 
uk to pray for delay on brexit d-day after parliament gainsays may's exit play, will eu say yea?  
These are some of the Conservatives determined to stop Brexit, or make it ridiculously soft. Remember these faces if we are blocked from leaving.They voted against the government in the Benn amendment which would have taken control from the government.  
The breathtaking hypocrisy of Jeremy Corbyn as MPs rejected another Brexit referendum by 334 votes to 85 with Labour abstaining. The bastard then had the gall to reiterate his support for a further referendum after earlier ordering his MPs not to vote for one! What the fuck? 
Government forced to change their policy. If the EU agree, Brexit won't happen on 29th March. Given the Government's failure to agree a deal, this is vital.  
When Corbyn told his MPs not to vote for a second referendum he was thinking of the North. When Corbyn got to the dispatch box saying he supported a second referendum he was thinking of the London elite. He's playing both sides. 
Did they start minting those special commemorative #Brexit 50p coins with the 29th March on them? 
Welcome to the ⁦@TheSDPUK⁩ Rod Liddle!As Mr Liddle says, ”There are krill, living in the darkest reaches of the Atlantic Ocean, that would have made a better job of managing Brexit than our politicians.” Read on   
EU Commission on #Brexit decision in London:  
Instead of this probable 'Remainer coup' to 'take control' of the Brexit process, how's this for an idea? In 1629, King Charles I dissolved Parliament and ruled alone for 11 years...  
The silence from the British left on the #BloodySunday decision today has been deafening. Yeh, we know #BrexitMayhem is happening, Brexit will disproportionately impact those in the North. I’m not shocked but would have been nice to see a smidge of solidarity on a tough day. 
#Brexit delay: What just happened?  
BREAKING Brexit delay CONFIRMED as MPs vote to scrap March 29 exit day  
The only thing that would improve Brexit now is a conspiracy theory that Queen Elizabeth secretly wants to Remain because of her German heritage 
The House of Commons has voted to delay #Brexit - time to support @Nigel_Farage and the Brexit Party @LeaveEUOfficial @Arron_banks 
Quite something that a good day for the prime minister is when she defeats a couple of amendments, gets a motion through and now government policy is to delay leaving European Union, contrary to the policy she's been banging on about for the best part of 3 years.#brexit 
You can't make this stuff up.  BBC summary:  "Following the votes, Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn reiterated his support for a further referendum after earlier ordering his MPs not to vote for one." 
Responsibility for the need to request an Article 50 extension lies with Theresa May's botched handling of Brexit.Labour has a credible Brexit plan to protect jobs, rights & our security.That can now be the basis for MPs to work together & find the consensus our country needs 
Dear @eucopresident,Though we appreciate that UK MPs have voted for a Brexit extension can we ask you to finally instruct the @EU_Commission to take #citizensrights off the negotiation table. Over 950 days of uncertainty is enough for us EU citizens in the UK #RescueOurRights 
This is hilarious. #brexit  
Tonight's #Brexit vote results in full  
This is so exciting. We are determined to give the British people a Brexit party for which those not on the hard Right can be proud to vote.  
A loooong extension to #Brexit is a neat way for everyone to save face. The Leavers still have the result of the referendum; the Remainers still have Britain as part of the EU. 
BREAKING: UK Parliament votes to accept a government motion to seek a delay by at least 3 months to the current #Brexit deadline set for the end of March.  
WATCH | For years, our prime minister promised the nation we would be leaving the European Union on 29th March 2019.Tonight, Parliament has passed a government motion to beg Brussels for a delay to Brexit. The sewer that is the House of Commons strikes again! #DrainTheSwamp 
The will of the people is 52% of those who voted three years ago.Well 48% are millions of voters and I am one of many who will never vote for a party that gave me Brexit. Never Tory and never Labour. 
Oh FFS, if we Brexit on 30 June that’s four days before the Modern British Studies conference and I will have to spend three days listening to HISTORIANS OPINING ON BREXIT, I thought they would have got it out of their system by then, thanks a bunch Parliament 
In laymen’s terms, can someone please explain or tell me now, WTF is going on with Brexit?There’s been so many votes, I’ve lost track!I’m sure I’m not the only one!Please 
So, why is a long extension now unlikely?Because the EU need a reason and rationality and Parliament has just voted against a second referendum, indicative votes, and an alternative deal.They don’t need tealeaves to see an extension would just see more of the same tired shit. 
Waiting for Brexit is Beckett's worst play. 
Oh good. Even more time to talk about Brexit, backstops and arcane parliamentary amendments   
Meanwhile, outside the #HouseofCommons,  £900billion already moved out of UK by firms to prepare for #Brexit. Huge loss to the tax revenues that finance our public services.  
MPs have voted to delay Brexit. This is a complete betrayal of their promise to deliver Brexit on March 29th. MPs are a complete disgrace and view the people of this nation as fools and idiots. We will march back. 
CAN WE ALL AGREE HOW UTTERLY STUPID TRIGGERING ARTICLE 50 WAS BEFORE DISCUSSING A PLAN?! How did your MP vote? Even the leader of the opposition voted to trigger Article 50!STUPID!  STUPID!  STUPID!    Brexit - TheyWorkForYou  
The House of Commons has just voted to extend Article 50 and delay Brexit. This is an outrage. The time has come to pledge your support to The Brexit Party. 
So is the Brexit tide turning ? PM wins delay motion, defeats move by MPs to take control and a 2nd referendum is decisively rejected. 
I feel a bit better about myself after this brexit vote because I’ve never had 3 whole years to do an essay then asked for an extension 2 weeks before the deadline 
Brexit means Wait a minute.  
A public vote would be a "realistic option to break the deadlock", says Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn as UK MPs vote to seek a delay to #BrexitFollow live updates:  
This looks like a natural version of the Political infighting over #Brexit They’ve forgotten to look at the bigger picture  
Remind me hiw often May told us that we WOULD leave on March 29? Now she begs to extend it to end June unless she can push her toxic Brexit in Name Only. What an absolute shower.  
Parliament has tonight voted in favour of asking the EU for more time to sort out the Brexit mess. This extra time should be used to work towards a People’s Vote, not for the PM to keep trying to flog her dangerous deal. Join us on 23 March in London to demand a #peoplesvote 
Is it too late to have a referendum where one of the options is ‘turn back time and put the one who had a bit of an issue eating a bacon sandwich in charge’? 
So basically Tory MP’s have just voted against discussing alternatives to May’s awful Brexit deal yet have voted for an article 50 extension in order for the deal to be presented yet again to Parliament for rejection.The Tory Party above country every single time. #BrexitChaos 
I want every news bulletin from now on to start with “Previously on Brexit...” 
So far UK House of Commons voted against:- Current Deal- No-Deal Brexit- A second referendumSorry UK friends, I'm Italian and then very familiar with political non-sense, but I must admit that this is really confusing me. What do you want then? 
Theresa May has made an absolute mess of Brexit. Extending Article 50 is necessary, but the only path forward now is put Theresa May's deal to the British people and give them the option: May's Brexit or staying in the EU.Add your name if you agree >  
“What do we want?”“WE DON’T KNOW!”“When do we want it?”“LATER!”#Brexit 
OH FUCK THE PROBABLE NEW BREXIT DATE IS DURING THE ONE HOLIDAY I HAVE BOOKED THIS YEAR 
Britain is no longer leaving the EU on March 29th 2019. MPs vote to delay Brexit while a plurality of voters tell pollsters that they oppose a delay, as do seven in ten Conservatives & Leavers. Fragile times in British politics, especially for the incumbent Conservative Party. 
After whipping his MPs to refuse to vote for one. This has now become a Labour-Tory Brexit. I pray that you can find a way to prevent this. 
#Brexit UPDATE MPs don't want PM’s dealMPs don't want a no-dealMPs don't want Malthouse compromiseMPs don't want to give MPs time to vote on Brexit optionsMPs don't want a 2nd referendumMPs don't want Labour's approachMPs don’t want to leave on March 29th  
Brexit delayed until 30th June unless the eu say no!! What a treacherous bitch she is!! Over 100 times she said “we would leave on the 29th March 2019” we have now got confirmation that brexit is dead! Time to start getting together people.. brexit HAS BEEN BETRAYED!! 
It’s frustrating to have lost so narrowly but we have achieved our main goals: to stop no-deal Brexit on 29th March, to get the PM to seek an Article 50 extension and to secure amendable motion on 25th March so MPs can start debating Brexit compromises. 
In the last three days, MPs in the UK have:- Rejected Theresa May’s #Brexit deal for a second time- Rejected leaving without a deal- Rejected a second referendumThe UK will ask the EU for an extension to its leaving date. 
#BREAKING Parliament has voted to delay Brexit by at least 3 months to continue negotiations for a deal. Britain was originally scheduled to leave the EU by March 29. 
BREAKING: UK Parliament votes to accept a government motion to seek a delay by at least 3 months to the current #Brexit deadline set for the end of March.  
The Brexit farce continues Delayed to 30th June.What a fucking shambles! 
To all those Labour people who kept saying "I just want Brexit over with so I can get back to normality" - it's not happening. Time to fight for an internationalist solution! 
David Cameron should be held accountable for the Brexit mayhem he has caused  
Breaking News: Britain’s Parliament wants to put Brexit on hold. It approved a motion to delay the March 29 withdrawal, but the E.U. must agree.  
MPs have approved a Government motion which aims to extend the Brexit process by 412 votes to 202, majority 210. 
Breaking News: The UK parliament just voted to delay Brexit, which was set for March 29.The extension could go to the end of June, if Theresa May can pass her deal with the EU next week, or for a much longer period if it fails again.  
Told Michael Gove voted to delay Brexit 
Parliament has voted to extend Brexit. May will try once again to get her deal approved within this extended period (assuming the EU approves it). If she fails, she should either call an election or resign. ERG MPs should combine with the Opposition to bring down the government. 
75% of Leave voters against delaying Brexit beyond 29th March. Parliament has just ignored what they voted for.  
"Parliament should deliver the instruction that they were given by the referendum to simply leave the EU on the date that they themselves said the 29th March." - Leave Means Leave Chairman, John Longworth  
Current Brexit situation summarized  in one gif:  
Jeremy Corbyn just said in the House of Commons that we need a second referendum  
As always with Corbyn his actions don’t match his words. He teases support for a second referendum, minutes after voting against one. How is anyone still fooled by this act? 
Spectacular indecision on the part of @UKLabour on the issue of a second referendum. 
MP’s have voted to delay Brexit 412-202, a majority of 210 . Parliament have betrayed the country & are unfit to run the UK..........  
More Brexit chat for the next few months...yaaaaay....just what we all wanted...errr what’s the opposite of champagne?!  What a pile of  
If you're wondering why the Independent Group went ahead and forced a vote on a second referendum against the wishes of the People's Vote campaign, it was to give Chris Leslie the chance to launch his regular soundbite #TiggersPlayPolitics 
Brexit HAS NOT been delayed. MPs have voted for it to be delayed - the EU27 need to agree to it now. 
Remembering that time I got loads of flack for saying Corbyn doesn’t want a 2nd referendum.  
Govt motion to extend A50 passes by 412-202. Brexit delayed until June 30 (as long as EU agree) >>> So over half Conservative MPs voted against PM as well as multiple cabinet members. This is a very unhappy ship indeed 
BREAKING: UK Parliament votes to ask EU to delay Brexit by at least 3 months; Britain's March 29 departure now unlikely.  
So Britain no longer wants to leave on March 29th. Europe may, or may not, agree. We don’t know how long Britain wants to extend for. And Labour want a second vote, having voted against it an hour ago. Jesus wept. #Brexit 
Parliament votes to delay Brexit until 30 June by 412-202Trust in politics will take much longer to recover 
UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP will be on the BBC News channel at around 8.30 PM discussing the Article 50 extension result and the Brexit betrayal.  
"We haven't figured out how to do a brexit in 3 years, another few months should sort it though" 
BREAKING NEWS: UK lawmakers have voted in favor of delaying the Brexit process, acknowledging that more time is needed to break the deadlock over Britain’s departure from the EU  
BREAKING: Britain's Parliament votes to delay Brexit by 412 to 202, although the EU must still formally agree to it before March 29  
412 MPs Just told the British People to Go Fuck Themselves #Brexit #BrexitVote #NoDealBrexit 
The @UKIP flag has dominated all of the @SkyNews coverage of Brexit today. This is right and proper.  
MPs have approved by 412-202 a Government motion seeking EU agreement for an extension to Article 50 to delay the 29 March Brexit date 
So to summarise, MPs don’t want Theresa May’s deal, don’t want no deal, don’t want another referendum, don’t want a series of votes to work out what they do want but DO want three more months to... 
BREAKING: U.K lawmakers vote in favor of requesting Brexit delay from EU until June 30, 2019  
BREXIT DELAYED 412-202 
BREAKING: Brexit WILL be delayed. We are NOT leaving on 29th March. 412 - 202. 
U.K. PARLIAMENT VOTES TO DELAY BREXIT DAY 
List of Tory MPs trying to stop Brexit in direct conflict against their party election manifesto. They should resign and call by elections  
Panic over everyone...... 
Sad to think I'll have to add businesses in your constituency to my long, long tally of Brexit damage before too long. 
Dear @eucopresident, This is where a wall once divided not only a country, but also people’s lives. Let’s make sure that the one division in Brexit we have overcome—citizens’ rights are agreed—is protected now. Let’s give #The5Million certainty! #RescueOurRights by ring-fencing. 
Main motion: Extend Article 50 until June 30th if MPs approve PM’s deal by 20th March. If deal rejected, seek extension but note terms would be in EU’s hands.> If this passes, Brexit day is officially no longer March 29 (as long as the EU agree an extension) 
My current feelings on brexit   
The Tories called the referendum, the Tories invoked article 50, The Tories fudged the negotiation. The Tories also have been found in contempt of parliament, voted against their motion & lost, and can't get a deal past their own MPs. How is this labour's fault? #Brexit  
If we end up with a Tory Brexit this is a picture that should and will haunt the Labour Party  
Labour's Hilary Benn says it's "essential that we secure an extension" to Article 50.His amendment was just rejected by parliament by two votes.Follow live updates on #Brexit here:  
Apparently, MP's are allowed to have 5,679 votes this month on Brexit.But the British public are allowed one vote on Brexit in their lifetime.Democracy at its finest.  
This clusterbourach is what happens when you play tribal brinkmanship politics.If the Tories and Labour hadn't played stupid playground politics for the last two years, Brexit would have a resolution by now.Instead the entire UK is paralysed as it circles the drain. 
If this vote passes now - it is no longer Government policy for Brexit to occur on March 29th... 
If he gets 'confused' by a simple three line whip then how can anyone believe the Business Secretary knows what he's talking about on Brexit?  
These are the guys we need to debate for us during brexit  
#BrexitMayhemSo far MPs have voted against: 1) customs union2) EEA 3) May's #WithdrawalAgreement 4) #WTOBrexit aka #NoDeal5) Second referendum aka #PeoplesVote6) Malthouse compromise A and B So tell me... 
 Gwyliwch / Watch  @JonathanPlaid call out Labour and the whole Westminster establishment on their handling of Brexit and the need for a #PeoplesVote"The moment is now!" 
Whilst there are clearly problems with a second referendum, none greater than preventing the Tories from cheating, we're over the moon you're mocking this as you ALWAYS back the wrong horse, so when the EU makes it a condition of an extension we'll all be laughing like drains!  
just spotted this guy outside parliament, says he won't stop playing d-ream until they stop brexit  
MPs have voted against a second Brexit referendum - a motion put forward by Sarah Wollaston of The Independent GroupChuka Umunna and Anna Soubry are attacking Labour for rejecting the motion - despite the People’s Vote Campaign also opposing it #TheIncompetentGroup 
MP's have now:* Rejected leaving the EU without a deal* Rejected leaving the EU with the gov's deal* Rejected leaving the EU with a different deal* Rejected a second referendumAt this point, I can't see what is left (even if an extension to Art 50 is approved).Bonkers. 
He’s either fibbing or can’t remember. Either way what he’s saying is false. He arrived in Scotland after Brexit vote not before.  
A person of democratic principle seems to have got lost and ended up in the House of Commons! Of all places! #brexit  
MPs have narrowly defeated Parliament’s attempt to take control of Brexit.Thank God. The last time Parliament seized control of legislation (1642) the result was civil war. MPs also voted down a motion to hold a second referendum. But they will certainly vote to extend Article 50 
Sorry, @peoplesvote_uk but you are morons. Cretins. Imbeciles.'Vote for a delay to Brexit, not a new referendum.'For. Fuck's. Sake. IN ORDER to obtain a delay, YOU WILL NEED A GOOD REASON. Such as a new referendum.Your raison d'etre. Just what the fuck are you playing at? 
The House of Commons have voted against:•May's Deal •Customs Union •EEA•Second referendum•No Deal Brexit•Malthouse compromise•Decide by itself what to doDo MPs are for anything to solve the Brexit conundrum, either way?  
The British Parliament is now against:• May's Brexit deal.• No-deal Brexit.• Holding another referendum.What next? They all threaten to just hold their breath, until Europe gives in on the Brexiteers' promises that they could leave all EU responsibilities, keep benefits?  
I hope all those supposed Labour MPs who are pro people’s vote or claim to be such, out of pure spite they have probably enabled a Tory Brexit or even a no deal Brexit. It won’t be forgotten and it won’t be forgiven. Your loyalty to pro Brexit Corbyn is sickening. 
These are the 6 Labour MPs who defied the whip to vote against giving Parliament control of Brexit. Government won by 2.  
I am now more confused by Brexit than I was by the calculus section of my Maths A Level which I prepared for by mainly watching Neighbours 
For anyone keeping score...Parliament has now rejected leaving with the deal, leaving without a deal and holding a new referendum.The only other option is #RevokeArticle50. Just sayin...  
Hillary Benn, Remoaner, is in charge of the "Exiting the EU Committee".Our PM is a Remoaner, as are most of her team.Westminster bats for the losing team.#Brexit will happen, but this shower will make us hate them before it does.Fine, they're mostly gutter trash anyway. 
On Monday I’m speaking to museum folk in Brussels and visiting the new house of European history, museum of the EU. What the hell do I say about Brexit!?!  #BrexitMayhem 
A referendum doesn't rule out leaving. It surely would force those that want to leave to come up with a plan the public would support as opposed to the highly unpopular WA. Your position makes no sense at all. 
You're telling me that tomorrow there's going to be massive Brexit fallout and the release of a Madeleine McCann documentary AND a megastorm? Did the editor of the Daily Express find a genie or something? 
15 Tory MPs who voted to do in Theresa May and give Benn / Cooper / Corbyn / Boles / Lewtin control over BrexitBebbBenyonBolesClarkeDjanoglyFreemanGreeningGrieveGyimahLeeLetwinSandbachSoamesStevensonVaizey 
There is no brexit deal which will work for the potteries or any other part if the UK  
Brexit taught the young that old folks would rather crucify them than face existential change. So, I expect some political tit for tat.  
Now that we’ve seen Corbyn’s true colours after he didn’t support giving the choice back to the people on Brexit in a new vote, I really can’t see how any  remainer Labour Party member can still bear to be in a party he leads. Still...up to them I s’pose.  
No-one could accuse Ruth Smeeth of being a Corbynista. There's nothing the Labour leadership can do or say that'll convince her to back a second referendum. The same goes for other Labour MPs. This basic point has been missing from political coverage.  
UPDATE - The UK Parliament has now voted against:- Theresa May's deal (twice) - No deal - Customs union - EEA- Second referendum- Malthouse compromise- Parliament taking control- Indicative votes  #BrexitChaos 
"Throughout the Brexit process, @realDonaldTrump has done nothing but offer the British government a hand of friendship and a very generous-sounding trade deal. He made the same offer this morning. The UK has not responded in kind," writes @Freddygray31 
So not only did Labour abstain on a #PeoplesVote, six of their cadre voted against parliament taking control of the Brexit process, handing power back to the most incompetent and right wing Tory government in history. 
Dear Ruth Smeeth, there is no #Brexit deal better for your constituents than staying in the EU. It's sad to see you supporting a policy based on a referendum narrowly won by right-wing hate, lies and crime. Surely you should be condemning such tactics not condoning them. 
I suspect you'll be sadly disillusioned. All forms of #Brexit will fail your constituents.  
Live images from the U.K. Parliament #Brexit  
.@Nigel_Farage continues LBC’s coverage of the Brexit delay votes. Get all the reaction and watch the results live:  
FARAGE TELLS EUROPE: REJECT BREXIT EXTENSION @oliver_lane#BrexitMayhem "Nigel Farage told the European Parliament that they had pushed their luck too far and the only route left was for a full Brexit to take place later this month as planned." 
I'm utterly lost. What the fuck just happened with Brexit? I stopped paying attention for 4 hours and now it might as well be Narnia. 
Tonight Jeremy Corbyn betrayed remainers. When it came time to stand up for a People's Vote, he refused.Liberal Democrats are the party of remainers. Join our campaign for a People's Vote on the Brexit deal with the option to stay in the EU >  
I can’t believe I’ve followed Brexit so closely for two years and now suddenly I feel like that time I feel asleep in the cinema during Lord of the Rings and when I woke had no fucking idea what was going on. 
Ruth Smeeth has resigned from Labour's front bench in order to vote against a second referendum. 
You know those Star Wars prequels that just droned on for hours about  customs borders?Brexit. 
The risk of a no-deal Brexit just increased again  
#Brexit #Chaos the only is for Wales & Scotland to have sovereign Parliaments. #Westminster is not fit for purpose. It has never been more obvious. 
“We’re entering a post-democratic era. The EU, the epicentre of the globalist agenda, sees democracy as an inconvenience. Defending democracy is the great battle right now.”Brendan O’Neill and @Nigel_Farage discuss Brexit. Full video here:  
Brexit is 365 hours away. #brexit 
Meet The People Who Went Insane Trying To Follow Brexit  
Even though they voted against it, MPs know a second referendum is the only way out of this Brexit mess | The Independent  
TIG own up to it. Their Lab people left in order to block the democratic mandate of the referendum from being delivered. The new aristocracy  
What we know: MPs don’t want no deal, a second referendum or May’s deal. What we don’t know: What MPs want. 
Just to clear this up. Again. ⁦@realDonaldTrump⁩ arrived in Scotland DAY AFTER #Brexit - not day before as he has just claimed  
Voted in favour of a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit but Labour whipped to sit on their hands and abstain (apart from a few honourable exceptions). 
Labour MP Ruth Smeeth who was parliamentary private secretary to deputy leader Tom Watson has resigned from the party's front bench for voting against a second referendum rather than abstaining 
Between all the different Brexit options - no deal, Norway-plus, Theresa May's compromise, the Swiss option, the Ukraine model etc etc. - Brexiteers who think about it for more than a second are massively split. While Remainers all want one thing, to be in the EU. 
If Benn's amendment passed remainer MPs would have taken control of Brexit. The remoaner coup has failed. 
Brexit is a democratic outrage. Nobody voted for the deals or no-deal on offer. And the country would now vote to #Remain by a 12-point lead. 
Brexit now feels like the final moments of an exam when you are throwing the fucking kitchen sink in. 
Suggestion - build a sound proof wall around the UK so the rest of us don’t have to listen to their interminable Brexit melodrama until they make a decision. 
What Parliament has rejected so far:May's dealNo DealSecond ReferendumOpposition controlLong delayThe only things Parliament actually has voted for:A50 - setting no deal as the legal default.Alternative arrangements to replace the backstop. 
Was invited on Channel 4 News tonight to discuss Brexit, but couldn't make it. So will say what I think here. There is no Brexit consensus among Brexiters except saying 'respect democracy' and 'Brussels bureaucrats' a lot. Brexit's a word which even divides people who support it. 
Am writing a piece for Washington Post on how Brexit Britain is in a worse state than Trump's America. I defy anyone to contradict me. 
MPs reject amendment to take control of #Brexit process and force a series of indicative votes on the way forward, by 314 to 312Follow live updates:  
So close. Government fight off Benn Amendment by two votes, 312 to 314. One vote the other way would have left it tied. Bercow would have had the casting vote.What a thing that would've been.#brexit 
At the crucial moment when radical Remainers need to be building bridges if they want to stop Brexit, they're losing their shit.  
I've resigned from Labour's front bench this evening in order to vote against a second referendum. This was a difficult decision but I have a duty to support the will of my constituents. We need to leave, and leave with a deal that works for the Potteries  
Benn amendment to extend A50 & set aside time to start process of indicative votes in search of a #Brexit parliamentary majority loses by just 2 votes 312-314. *chief whip punching the air etc etc* 
The Benn Amendment fallsAyes - 312Noes - 314Maj - 2The Commons erupts in celebration at the fact that they've STILL no clue how to break the Brexit deadlock. 
Between the Brexit carry on, NI soldiers being hounded, referendums being subverted, mass child abuse being ignored in the name of diversity & god knows what else, I’m deeply ashamed at the mess politicians & interest groups have turned our country intoThe swamp needs drained 
So the Benn/Letwin/Cooper amendment loses by 312 to 314. For those in cabinet who vehemently oppose a no-deal Brexit, and didn't vote for the amendment to keep their jobs, this is a disaster - because risk of a no-deal Brexit has increased again 
Wow. Very narrow escape for Govt: Benn amendment for Parliament to take control of Brexit defeated, by 312 v 314. 
House of Commons vote on Hilary Benn et al. amendment - to allow the House to debate the next steps on Brexit, result:AYES: 312NOES: 314 
It’s 2024, Britain votes to extend the Brexit deadline as Americans eagerly await the “soon to be finished” Mueller report, NYC housing prices hit a record high despite population decline and a fresh faced young actor has been cast in an upcoming Spider-Man reboot. 
How Many More Times. May. Alone.  Made. The. Decision. To. Leave. Parliament didn’t.  The referendum didn’t.  
Today is day three of Brexit votes this week and here’s what’s going to happen:- First, MPs are voting on four amendments - Then they’ll vote on the main motion put down by the government to delay Brexit 
Stopped watching #bbcqt years ago.The bias is blatant.James, PM's #BrexitBetrayal will keep UK under the control of EU dictators for evermore,with no exit door.That is not #Brexit.It is staying #INIt is actually WORSE than our current membership.How could you vote for that? 
Actually only 17 Labour MPs voted against a referendum - not 18. Lloyd Russell-Moyle voted both ways to demonstrate abstention! The very low number of Labour votes against a referendum is the story of the day 
Result very soon on vote that would put MP s in charge of Brexit process, taking control from the PM 
Sarah Wollaston’s preposterous scaremongering on Sky over a no-deal Brexit is so OTT that it will (I trust) be counterproductive (from her point of view). 
"The Labour Party had said they would move to back a people's vote, and it's very clear that they don't."Independent Group MP Sarah Wollaston forwarded a vote for a second referendum, which was rejected by the house.Follow live updates here:  
A quick reminder that only the SNP and Dennis Skinner voted against having an EU referendum. 
I can’t believe I’m hearing this again. DONALD TRUMP DID NOT PREDICT BREXIT THE DAY BEFORE VOTE AT TURNBERRY. HE ARRIVED  IN SCOTLAND THE DAY AFTER, ON JUNE 24. HIS TWEETS CONFIRM THIS. I WAS THEREDid someone say #FakeNews ? 
the EU referendum was nearly 3 years ago and the combined efforts of our entire political class has yielded nothing at all. if they'd sat around playing solitaire & talking about the weather we'd be in exactly the same circumstances as we are now. fun thought 
By the way, @realDonaldTrump, threatening our EU friends and allies like @campaignforleo and Ireland is totally unacceptable. It’s not what #Brexit supporters want or stand for. The ERG will find it as ugly as Remain do. Nobody believes you will do anything for the U.K. 
Have I got this correct MP’s have voted against May’s deal. Voted against No Deal and voted against a 2nd referendum? What is left? The EU have asked the question “what does the uk want?”  Well, answers on a postcard please 
Unbelievable.  MPs just voted to decide whether to hold another series of votes on March 20th to decide what kind of Brexit they want... Norway, CU/SM, Canada plus etc etc...NINE BLOODY DAYS BEFORE B-Day????This is 3 years too late!    What a bloody FARCE! 
Just realised I picked the wrong story and wrong gif given what's happening in Westminster today. This is a better summary of current Brexit plans:  
.@MhairiBlack slams MPs during the #Brexit debate on extending Article 50 as not being 'an union of equals'.  
If - and it's uncertain - tonight MPs can take control, we need to a) seek a parliamentary majority for a customs union/single market Brexit and b) put the done deal to a referendum. 
On that referendum vote, many fewer voted against (334) than against Theresa’s May’s deal both times (434 in Jan; 391 this week). Also, only 18 Labour MPs voted against; we now know who they are & Labour members can focus on them! 
The TIG's defeated second referendum amendment was irrelevant. Its been clear the only route to a PV, one of 2x democratic routes to Remain, is through exhausting all the options. That's why the strategists (as opposed to grandstanders) in the PV campaign opposed it... 
I’ll be on #bbcqt tonight. I’m guessing that #Brexit may come up, if (when) it does I’ll explain why getting a deal voted through is still the best way to secure our exit from the EU.You can watch at 10:35pm on @BBCOne and @bbc5live 
#Brexit supporters like me hold @realDonaldTrump in profound contempt. We know he’s a liar. He’s offered the U.K. *zero* special trade deals. He’s done nothing but insult the Queen.If ever there was an argument for pressing pause and taking Tusk’s long extension, ERG, its this. 
Cool, friendly barman at my local just asked me what I was doing tonight and I genuinely said "Watching live parliament channel to see next round of Brexit votes."  
All four Plaid Cymru MPs voted to hold new referendum 
Go Mr President, says it like it is ..... oh that we could have him here in the U.K. negotiating for us !  #Brexit @realDonaldTrump 
TONIGHT on @cnni: I’m live outside British parliament with my colleagues @HalaGorani and @richardquest as MPs vote on whether they want to delay Brexit. Join us at the top of the hour.  
 May's #Brexit deal once again took a beating in Parliament and mostly because of objections to the 'backstop' relating to Northern Ireland. But what exactly is it again? And why is it such a problem? @FRANCE24_en's @CntrentF24 is here to help! #BrexWhat 
So what does Parliament want The Brady Amendment won by 16 votes‘No Deal’ lost by just 4 votes May’s deal lost by 149 votes2nd Referendum lost by 259 votes We wonder if Brussels have figured it out yet...#StandUp4Brexit 
The Brexit you were promised vs the Brexit you're gonna get.  
“We welcome the fact Parliament has rejected a proposal for a second referendum. A second referendum would undermine the democratic process, being extremely divisive and create untold uncertainty.” - John Longworth, Chairman of Leave Means Leave 
The 25 Labour MPs who voted for 2nd referendum -  
If they remember anything, Tory MPs should remember this one stat from YouGov tonight: 75% of Tory voters think MPs voting to delay Brexit want to stop it altogether. The public know what your game is - you must vote against extending Article 50 and leave on March 29th.  
Labour split three ways on the 2nd referendum vote: 25 voted for, 18 voted against, the rest abstained. Very messy for Corbyn, who whipped for a no show. 
Gargantuan defeat for idea of second referendum just now in HoC.  Good. 
Brexit votes, but every time the government loses, the music plays faster. 
Great to see @DanielZeichner and @stellacreasy voting for 2nd referendum. Sorry if I missed other heroes (or got them wrong) 
It's extraordinary that more than 250 MPs happily voted for a No Deal #BrexitIf this was being caused by a natural disaster, we'd have such a different response.Yet because apparently over 250 people willingly choose it, we have to pretend it’s a rational thing to do.  
A lot of "people's vote" grandees wheeling out lame excuses - we weren't trying, we weren't ready, this one doesn't count, we had the wrong trainers on. But quite a moment. A clear majority of MPs voted against a second referendum. 
MPs begin vote on amendment to take control of #Brexit and force a series of indicative votes on the way forwardFollow live updates:  
hand, they know if Benn/Letwin/Cooper flops, risk of no-deal Brexit is massively back on again 
When a referendum meets a parliamentary democracy  
Jeez, do any of these Tories possess the slightest trace of self-awareness? THEY are the Government. THEY are betraying Brexit just as much.  
I’d say this is apt portrayal of the current UK governments Brexit plan  
BREAKING: Britain's Parliament votes against holding a new Brexit referendum, at least for now.  
This to me is a critical amendment. If it passes, we are well on the way to MPs finally wrestling control of Brexit from the govt. 
Powell amendment lost by a squeaky three votes - now on to the main vote, Hilary Benn's plan to delay Brexit and for MP s to take control of the process and try to find consensus for a way forward that is NOT the PM's deal 
The British Parliament doesn’t want May’s soft Brexit, doesn’t want a hard Brexit, doesn’t want a new referendum. What do they want? Eternal limbo? 
Mark Francois wrong as usual.  The People’s Brexit vote NOT ‘dead in the water’ if PM May can spectacularly fail twice, the PV can easily fight another day. 
MPs have rejected by 314-311 a move by Labour MP Lucy Powell to request a delay to Brexit until 30 June to find a way forward with majority support by taking control of parliamentary time on 20 March 
 Parliament has voted overwhelmingly against a second EU referendum. It is not only off the table but consigned to the dustbin of history where it belongs. Now respect the result of the 2016 Referendum and deliver #Brexit. #EURef2 #PeoplesVote 
“We will keep up the pressure for a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal. We’ll keep holding the Government to account and providing the real opposition our country needs. The British people deserve the final say on Brexit.” 
Brexit spokesperson for The Independent Group, @Anna_Soubry: “The Labour Party leadership are determined to deliver Brexit, which would harm our country... But The Independent Group will not give up." 
House of Commons votes 314 to 311 to reject @LucyMPowell's manuscript amendment to @hilarybennmp's amendment (i).This amendment would have specified a new Brexit date of 30 June 2019 and rewritten Amendment (i) to include that date.  
TIG have just emailed this to their supporters."Those of our Group who left the Labour Party did so because we believed the hope of changing the leadership’s position on Brexit was gone. Today, sadly, we were proved right. The leadership are determined to deliver Brexit".  
The same political cowardice that made MPs vote against amendment H (new referendum) today, is what will make them back it when they're desperate to avoid the blame for a deal everyone hates or a National Disaster Brexit.We are in dire need of a better class of politicians. 
Labour don’t want ‘no deal’, May’s deal or a 2nd Referendum all they want is chaos so that they can get a General Election.  
The UK Parliament has made some decisions on Brexit:They don’t want a 2nd referendum.They don’t want the Prime Minister to go to the EU without having a deal.They don’t want the Prime Minister’s current deal.They still want out of EU.I have never been more confused. 
In an almost-too-perfect metaphor for brexit, the emergency brexit lorry park turns out to have an unexploded bomb underneath it, which we put there to thwart the Germans and then forgot all about.  
I'm noticing a few folk thinking Labour abstaining on the referendum vote was in contravention of its conference policy. It was actually in line with its conference policy. 
Interesting to watch Mark Francois declare that as a result of the Commons voting on a non-binding amendment a second referendum is "dead, gone." But a no deal, voted upon on exactly the same basis, apparently isn't. 
Jeremy Corbyn promised to deliver on the referendum result.But now we know his promises mean nothing. Watch this.  
As an English person, I feel better represented by you, @joannaccherry and @theSNP than by Tory or Labour. Let’s hope successes of sanity and rationality so far this week continue now. Sad MPs not confident enough to ask the people but guess many know BrExit might be abolished! 
18 Labour MPs voted AGAINST a second referendum.The party’s position was to abstain. This shows the difficulties in the PLP over a second ref. 
Why I supported and voted for Brexit: 
UK lawmakers reject a move to support a second referendum on Brexit. It's a blow to campaigners for a so-called People's Vote. Follow live updates:  
Want a second referendum? Then you need to spend your time lobbying a) Tory MPs and b) Labour MPs in Leave seats who, as things stand, will vote to stop a second referendum, *whatever* Corbyn does or says. 
Meaningless Commons vote just now on another referendum in which overwhelming majority of us who back one abstained. Priority today #article50 extension, as yesterday it was taking #NoDealBrexit off the table. #finalsay #peoplesvote day will come & better when we can win it. 
Very pleased that the so called ‘People’s Vote’ proposal for a second referendum has just been so heavily defeated in the Commons. We had the people’s referendum and they voted to leave. I will continue to vote to deliver on that decision. 
2nd referendum comprehensively defeated here in the Commons, by 334-85. 
SECOND REFERENDUM CRUSHED IN ‘MAJOR DEFEAT’Sarah Wollaston’s amendment calling for a long extension to provide time for a second referendum has been crushed this evening by 334 votes to just 85. 
Times NEWHole in Theresa May’s argumentSenior gvt sources concede we could still leave within months even we U.K.-EU agree 2 yr extension May’s attempt to threaten MPs with long brexit delay has legal flaw 
Take your second referendum and shove it up your arse. 
#cartoon #brexit #brexitchaos #BrexitShambles #BrexitCrisis #BrexitChaos #BrexitDeal #BrexitBetrayal #uk #TheresaMay (english version, by ) 
Exactly, @realDonaldTrump is so correct.That a second referendum would be ‘unfair’ for the UK.Donald also said it will be a betrayal of the people.He also mentioned which I agree is that you can’t reverse on an election which already happened.If you STAND with Trump RT!!!  
So in the last 24 hours @scottishlabour vote against a rise for carers and @UKLabour abstain on a second EU referendum despite it being their policy. #forthemanymybahookey 
.@Femi_sorryDo you want to stop Brexit or do you want to try and damage Corbyn?Corbyn & Starmer have laid out a clear path which includes the possibility of a second referendum.Why don’t you concentrate on the Tories? They are the enemy here,  
So even if every single Labour MP voted for that second referendum amendment it would still have failed. Maybe time for the #FBPE Remainiacs to get real and stop holding hands with Tories who thrust us into this mess. 
Parliament now agrees that:It doesn't want the dealIt doesn't want no dealIt doesn't want a second referendumI'm genuinely confused. What's left?  
While SNP MPs voted to give people the chance to decide their own future in a second EU referendum, the vast majority of Labour MPs and Jeremy Corbyn sat on their hands. Just look .  
Second referendum rejected by 249.People can claim long game fantasy crap all they like but the EU will be looking at this and ticking off another reason not to entertain a long extension for Britain to work through this identity crisis. 
A second referendum, the so called 'losers’ vote', has now been defeated in the House of Commons so is it is off the table. 
MPs reject amendment calling for second referendum on #Brexit by 85 to 334Live updates:  
"IT'S NOT THE RIGHT TIME TO PUSH FOR A SECOND REFERENDUM."Yeah, I agree. Let's give it a few weeks, eh? See how the fucking land lies. No point rushing into shit when we've got a full *checks notes* FIFTEEN FUCKING DAYS left until we have to tell grandma she's gonna die. 
85 to 334 against another referendum - wowsers 
There is no majority for a further referendum.  
What matters about the second referendum amendment is not that only 85 MPs voted for it, but that 334 voted against. So, there isn’t a majority for it even with Labour front bench support 
So the Commons has now rejected a second referendum by a bigger majority than it first rejected the May Brexit deal! 
.@sarahwollaston amendment calling for a referendum is smashed to bits, because the People's Vote campaign thought it was too early to push their case in parliament and asked their MP supporters not to back it. But still embarrassing for those who want a referendum 
JUST IN: UK lawmakers reject amendment 'H' of today's vote, calling on the government to delay #Brexit and hold a second referendum, by 334 votes to 85  
JUST IN: UK lawmakers reject a move to support a second referendum on Brexit. It’s a blow to campaigners for a so-called People’s Vote  
Even the ‘People’s Vote’ campaign didn’t want second referendum amendments put down today...  
MPs have rejected by 334-85 an amendment from The Independent Group MP Sarah Wollaston to request an extension to Article 50 in order to hold a second referendum with Labour MPs and some Conservative MPs abstaining 
A Conservative PM called the referendum  A Conservative PM lost the referendum  A Conservative PM botched the negotiations  A Conservative PM refused to take no deal off the table  A Conservative PM ran down the clock  Yet somehow Brexit is all Jeremy Corbyn's fault? 
Second Referendum Crushed in 'Major Defeat'  
I imagine you know this already, but the Brexiters of the European Research Group will be voting against @RhonddaBryant amendment which would instruct @theresa_may NOT to bring her Brexit deal back for a third meaningful vote next week - even though many of them agree with him 
We have lost a people’s vote amendment by 334 votes to 85 votes. Labour abstained. An opportunity to drive forward the need for such a vote and Labour flunk it. They are the midwifes to @theresa_may Brexit. Absolutely spineless. #peoplesvote 
.@Femi_Sorry it *is* an attack.Brexit is a 100% Tory disaster They called referendum They bungled negotiations Corbyn was right to whip re Article 50 in light of referendum resultHe & Starmer have opposed Tories in all else.If there is a 2nd ref, it will be due to Corbyn  
For me this isn't about timing. This is about standing up for what I believe in. #PeoplesVote My #Gower constituents deserve a #FinalSay on #Brexit 
When it came time to vote for a People's Vote on the Brexit deal, Jeremy Corbyn's Labour Party literally sat on their hands.  
This is what Labour’s commitment to a People’s Vote looks like. #PeopesVote #Brexit @theSNP 
The best thing to happen in Corbyn's mind would be for May's deal finally to pass: he gets Brexit (which he wants); someone else to blame entirely for it (which he wants); and can avoid having a proper policy on it (which he wants). 
I'm told @TulipSiddiq has voted for the second referendum amendment but as she is on maternity leave, she had to rebel by proxy  
Breaking: Live from Westminster as MPs vote on Brexit again & again & again... (Enlarge to see the unicorns). With apologies to JMW Turner (1834).  
Trump and Putin apparently don’t think a second Brexit referendum is a good idea. A second referendum is therefore probably a good idea. #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVote 
Brexit is a nightmare, but one good thing to come out of it is the growth in stature of @jessphillips  - here she is, attacking the Tory benches, attacking the ERG, reminding some on the Labour benches how its done. Full Speech -  
If Corbyn hadnt bagged 13 milllion votes from f*cking nowhere and screwed Mays majority you would be looking down the barrel of the hardest Tory Brexit imaginable .Get real . 
Understandably Sarah Newton wanted to distance herself from this governments botched Brexit... by why didn’t she resign over their catastrophic failure in their treatment of disabled people. Don’t let that record be forgotten. Please share to #GTTO 
Labour benches are almost full because they are ABSTAINING, yes choosing NOT TO vote on whether to allow for a @peoplesvote_uk which is clearly the only way to resolve this #Brexit shambles. Truly a dereliction of duty by the ‘Opposition’ - history will not be kind to them. 
Also... let me take a minute and tell you the ACTUAL reason I voted the way I did in the #referendum...   
WATCH | "Your decision. Not politicians. Not Parliament. Just you." This is what we were told by the leader of our country when casting our vote.Three years on and Parliament has voted to ignore the People. Help us keep fighting for Brexit:  
Corbyn WHIPS to abstain on 2nd referendum. I apologise for swearing but fuck you Labour, and everyone who has #JC4PM in their name. 
Foreign leaders who are against a second referendum about Brexit:•Marine Le Pen•Viktor Orbán•Vladimir Putin•Matteo Salvini•Donald Trump•Xi JinpingBirds of a feather flock together  
A stupid argument. Not only have the People already voted to leave the EU but Parliament has voted to implement it three times - to hold the referendum and respect the result, to leave the EU (A50), and the EU (withdrawal) Act. Respect the vote & the law..  
The green benches remain full of Labour MPs refusing to vote for another referendum...  
Today we are backing an amendment to secure a People's Vote on the Brexit deal.The politicians have made a mess out of Brexit and it is time to put the deal back to the people, and give them the option to stay in the EU. 
Labour MPs sitting still, abstaining on Wollaston amendment calling for second referendum. Means it will be resoundingly defeated.  
Watch LIVE as MPs vote on delaying Brexit and a second referendum  
The Leavers logic that the 17.4 million people who voted for Brexit was a decision cast in stone, immovable by time should also mean that what ever Leavers ate for breakfast on June 23, 2016 should be served to them everyday for the rest of their lives. #BrexitShambles 
Labour making a display of their abstention on the Wollaston referendum amendment:  
amendment for 2nd referendum in name of @sarahwoolaston will be heavily defeated. no one likes a turncoat whether they are a Tory or Labour one 
Labour MPs sitting in the chamber rather than voting for a second referendum #referendum 
Labour are abstaining on the Article 50 extension amendment backing a second referendum, which is supposedly their policy.  
I am about to vote AGAINST a second referendum and against any delay leaving the EU. Sadly, most MPs look set to defy the voters, and will vote to stop Brexit happening on the day Parliament set in law just a few months ago.  
But after Maastricht I took the view that leaving the EU would always be too much trouble than it was worth.And I became as sceptical about Whitehall and Westminster than I ever was about Brussels.When the referendum was called, I was going to stay neutral.2. 
Vote on Wollaston referendum amendment now - will not pass, Labour pro referendum voices pointing out that if it did it would knock out ability to pass the Benn amendment - votes unlikely to get into triple figures.... 
Brexit comedy gold.Liam Fox announces deal “to keep us trading freely” with Pacific islands.Apparently this will make a huge difference... because, after hard wrangling, we’ll be changing nothing. Now we just need a gazillion other deals in 15 days.  
Vote 1 on another referendum - remember this v unlikely to go through because a lot of referendum campaigners don't think it's right time to push for it 
LIVE: British MPs are voting on whether to delay Brexit after rejecting PM Theresa May's deal and a no-deal exit. If the motion passes, all the other EU members will still need to approve an extension to Article 50 to delay #Brexit.  
Watch as MPs vote on delaying Brexit beyond 29 March  
Trying to catch up on Brexit after a blissful morning of pretending we're not about to be cast into a lake of boiling piss and I now have the same look of wounded incredulity on my face as the dog adopts when I hold him still so the vet can force a digit up his arsehole. 
Found time to catch up with the latest @YouGov tracker data on "Brexit: Right or Wrong?". The lead for "Wrong" gradually creeping up, e.g. 9 points in latest poll (from 7 March).  
How long a Brexit delay will EU leaders sanction? And how great is the risk that the UK will have to participate in May’s elections to the European Parliament?  
This is an exceptional and honest thread. But in truth a liberal Brexit was always impossible. It was and remains a project by the right, of the right and for the right 
LISTEN: Brexiteer Tells LBC - “Voting Leave Was The Stupidest Thing I’ve Done In My Life” /#EU #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Brexit is Britain's mid-life crisis  
Eyes down for the next set of Commons #Brexit votes. I’ll be live on @BBCParliament with @RuthFox01 from 5pm - as the voting gets under way. As they used to say on Stingray, “anything can happen in the next half hour.” 
You are an absolute disgrace. You lied to your constituents to get elected, you are at best a mediocre Secretary of State, broke collective responsibility and have allowed the EU to take control of the Brexit process. What have they promised you? Resign. #StandUp4Brexit 
⁦@bbcquestiontime⁩ WHY is this third rate pundit & employee of Brexit backing billionaires on your show NON-STOP ???  
Today’s vote on another referendum is not the right time or for the right reasons. Neither is it supported by the official ‘People’s Vote’ campaign.I’m abstaining and will focus on the #Compromise which will bring us together and take Brexit back to the people 
Labour referendum backers are mainly all rowing in behind frontbench not backing the Soubry TIG/ SNP/ LD referendum amendment  
For those at the back, today isn't the day to push for another referendum because today is the day to secure an extension to Article 50. The time to push for another vote is when you can plausibly say there is something to vote on - or that all other options are exhausted. 
Leave voters voted for more money, trade & control. Forcing the opposite on them with Brexit without consent would be wilful negligence, a betrayal of Leave voters & a crime against democracy they have the right to a Public Vote on the Deal  
My solution for healing our divided country post-#Brexit.Watch | RT (@ComedyCentralUK special coming soon...) 
The party 70% of whose voters chose Remain, fights against a motion asking for a second referendum. Makes total sense: it's a party following the orders of an ideological fanatic, its boss. Not its voters. 
Cannot think of a single thing about Brexit that is honest or good for the country now. Cannot think of any prominent Brexiter with integrity. Cannot possibly imagine how that can play out, other than as the most epic of all national fuck-ups.Or we could stop it all..... 
The British Parliament will vote today on whether it wants to ask the EU for more time to figure out a Brexit plan – and how much time it wants to ask for. The difference between a short delay and a long one could be significant. 
How I will vote tonight - Brexit Update  
UK parliament votes on #Brexit next steps  
Plaid Cymru MP @JonathanPlaid calls for Welsh Secretary @AlunCairns to resign after voting to keep no-deal Brexit option on table.  
I wish everybody who voted in the EU referendum could first have worked - as I did at the Telegraph - with at least some of the people who were to be charged with delivering it. That more than anything decided how I voted and it has made me unstartled by what has happened since. 
We need time to reframe the narrative, from frustration & brinkmanship to cooperation & reconciliation. My @GreenWorld_UK article in response to @eucopresident Donald Tusk suggesting a lengthy #Article50 extension so UK can rethink its #Brexit strategy.  
"Time flies," says Pres Trump, noting it's his 3rd time at the annual Friends of Ireland Lunch in the Capitol. He congratulates @SpeakerPelosi on her Irish grandchildren. Raising the Brexit quagmire, he expressed the hope "it will all work out. Everything does."  
Want to write about Brexit just to use this image.  
and that this brexit deadline of march 29th is set in stone it is the end of the line the place where the rubber meets the roadunless it gets extended in which case carry on my frens just keep muddling along 
Why as part of a new Parliament to replace our current Rotten Parliament, we need a new Speaker.Bercow refuses to accept for debate a cross-party amendment signed by more MPs than all the ones he has accepted combined.Blatant anti-Brexit bias#BrexitVote 
I will be voting to extend Article 50 today to avoid the UK falling off the cliff on 29 March. We need more time to find a solution that breaks the Brexit deadlock. In my view the only way to do that is a public vote but that is a vote for next week not today. #lukeMP pic.twitter.com/PEmfJMamI5 
Answer: If it will help thwart Brexit, I'll select it. If it helps enable an orderly exit as per the referendum result, I will dismiss it.  
I’m not going to be called in this afternoon’s debate so here’s what I would have said. #Brexit  
Three of the most intellectually honest Brexiteers on Twitter are now all opposed to Brexit in practice: @rolandmcs @OliverNorgrove @thescepticisleYou can sneer and mock, but kudos to them for their open and detailed explanations.(Fwiw, not much between my views and theirs.) 
The moment of reckoning has arrived.Will Labour back the #PeoplesVote tonight, and the #LibDems, or will it again be a case of manana?They can choose to aid and abet #Brexit, or take a stand.They can avoid taking a stance, or cast a meaningful vote.The choice is theirs. 
Michel Barnier tells a summit of regional and city leaders in Bucharest: 'The consequences [of Brexit] are innumerable and they have largely been underestimated in the UK, both during the referendum and after it.' 
Sorry to my reasonable Brexit supporting friends but I haven’t felt it for a long time now. Sorry to everyone else for my small cameo in this too. I no longer hear the music. 
“I gave the Prime Minister my ideas on how to negotiate Brexit...she didn’t listen to that and that’s fine.” Donald Trump says he’s ‘surprised that Brexit has gone so badly’ from the standpoint of a negotiation.  
I think we should enhance the political declaration for a closer relationship or switch to the EEA. However, if there WAS a second ref, I would not recommend giving Brexiteers another crack at this. They don’t deserve it. I’d just tell Brexit to shut up and go away.  
Moderates want to override peoples’ votes in:U.K. - Brexit VoteVenezuela - General ElectionLabour Party - Leadership Elections.They have a problem with democracy. 
FFS! Trump supported Brexit, and even spoke about trade deals with the UK before the 2016 election.  The rhetoric about 'taking your country back' and 'controlling your borders' worked perfectly for rabid his base.Everything he supports ends badly, he's a total fcuking idiot...  
If #Brexit were a pet, we’d’ve put it out of its misery by now. 
i just want to make sure i understand the latest brexit news the government tried to vote for their position and lost and then tried to vote against their own position and lost again wait that can not be right 
Sadly, the referendum brought out the worst in Britain. It brought out the worst in a lot of people, including, sadly, myself. I’m a writer and I consider it important for my integrity to finally, explicitly, admit I made a lot of mistakes and said a lot of things that were wrong 
Flapping my mouth about Brexit in the cold for the next four solid hours for RTÉ, BBC, CNN, but most of all, my haters. 
One thing is absolutely certain: #Brexit will not benefit the vast majority of people who voted for it. And it won't solve our country's problems. So, why are we still going ahead with it. #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 
I will vote against any delay to BREXIT tonight and oppose a second EU referendum - the largest ever vote in UK history cannot be discarded, or we will imperil our democracy itself. I stand with the people of Romford and will honour their wishes!  
LIVE now- What’s next for #Brexit? Chief Negotiator @MichelBarnier is addressing the 8th European Summit of Regions and Cities in Bucharest.#EUlocal 
Despite voting to remain in the EU and sending a majority of anti Brexit MPs here twice, Scotland is ignored says @MhairiBlack 
In 2015/16 I became involved in actively arguing for Brexit & in online campaigning. That was the end of objective analysis. I began to inhabit a bubble of my own making. In the bubble my own reasoning seemed more solid than it was. Doubts & concerns didn't penetrate the bubble. 
Soon it will sink in what we have seen has ramifications way beyond #Brexit. If Parliament can ignore will of the people here what happens when we want to resist an aggressive military invasion, but our MPs don’t because they’ve all been promised chateaus & pensions in Brittany? 
The Tories have made the UK parliament a laughing stock and Labour have confirmed their status as the spineless midwives of Brexit. What a shambles that is letting down Scotland and the entire UK. Scotland must now get on- our interests are not served by this Westminster cabal.  
Brexit band names (March 2019 edition):Joint InstrumentThe Malthouse CompromiseThe Independent GroupJuncker 
Our First Amendment rights, like all fundamental constitutional rights, are not subject to democratic referendum.Even 99% of people cannot take away the free speech rights of the other 1%.This is part of the glory of American exceptionalism.@IngrahamAngle 
It is clear that had not Tory cabinet ministers Amber Rudd, David Gauke, David Mundell and Greg Clark not abstained on a three-line whip, a no deal Brexit would still be on the table. Amazingly, they are still in the cabinet. But they should all be deselected. May should resign. 
Trump and Putin opposed to a democratic #PeoplesVote. Just in case you were in doubt whose interests are served by #Brexit. 
Donald Trump - '2nd EU referendum would be unfair.' - 'I gave the prime minister my ideas of how to negotiate it, she ignored them' Perhaps because she thought taking advice from a six times bankrupt would be a bit of a joke? Jog on Don. 
Brexiters. Please choose one of these statements. Both cannot be true.“The People’s Vote is an attempt to stop Brexit”“Brexit is the will of the people” 
He’s right. May’s handling of Brexit negotiations has been catastrophic from start to finish. Appointed Brexiteers to key positions but then sidelined and undermined them - with disastrous results.  
We the voters will not forgive imperious Remainer MPs for their Brexit betrayal. Yesterday, Remainer MPs threw off the shackles of democratic accountability, and declared themselves independent of the people they serve. They mustn’t get away with it..  
Maybe I’m being really naive, but I can’t make sense of this not voting for a second referendum because it won’t pass this time position1) doesn’t abstaining *guarantee* it won’t pass?2) even if it won’t pass, shouldn’t you still show support for it if you agree with it? 
So much for “global Britain” and “Liberal Brexit”, the voices of the small minded, the ignorant, the mis/ill-informed are amplified now. They need to be put back in their box for Brexit to actually work and Britain to slowly repair its reputation. 
#ICYMI Alliance Leader @naomi_long spoke last night on #NolanLive on the possibility of Direct Rule after a no deal #Brexit  
We’ve seen Britain’s relations with its key allies deteriorate, the exposure of so many of our politicians as woefully inadequate, our Brexit strategy - the very height of ineptitude - has been an embarrassment. My pre-ref reassurances were humiliatingly wrong. 
It is clear Labour's alternative commands more support than May's deal. She must now move on her red lines. I stood on a manifesto promising to respect the result of the referendum. People and businesses need the certainty to move forward #GTTO #LabourDeal 
They'll just play sombre funereal music, a single violin version of "Ode to Joy" playing for the last time as the clock strikes Brexit.  
“If Brexit happens I’ll hold Corbyn responsible”.And there you have it ladies and gentleman. It’s all about Jeremy Corbyn.  
These images of Seumas Milne with Putin in Sochi in October 2014, while Putin was engaged in a brutal war of aggression against Ukraine tell us everything we need to know about Corbyn's attitude to #brexit. He will do what Putin wants. #PeoplesVote 
I think MPs should back the Withdrawal Agreement if the Prime Minister puts it before parliament for a third time, as Bercow and this Remain Parliament will clearly now either:1) Force a second referendum2) Dilute Brexit so much that it resembles EU membership in another name 
Donald Trump criticizes Theresa May for 'how badly' Brexit talks have gone  
President Trump is doing more to secure Brexit today than @theresa_may has done in the last 993. 
No problem. Manston is only due to become the largest lorry park in Europe holding up to 4,000 lorries in the event of a No Deal Brexit on March 29...  
CONFESSIONS OF A "LIBERAL BREXITEER"If the UK doesn't leave the EU I don't personally care anymore. I don't really consider myself a "Brexiteer" now.I used to have passion for Brexit. Though it was an enthusiasm for a certain vision of it. That died ages ago. THREAD  
Tonight I will vote against a second referendum and I will vote against any delay to #Brexit We must deliver on our promises and finally give the country certainty. No delay. No second referendum. 
So let me get this straight:Labour Party conference - “we back a people’s vote”Scottish Labour - “we back a people’s vote”Corbyn at the dispatch box “we back a people’s vote” With the chance to vote for such a “people’s vote” - not today troops #labour #Brexit 
Corbyn is a Kremlin stooge helping get Putin the #brexit he so craves. Corbyn will damage the country, hurt the poor and the vulnerable and wreck Labour's election chances in order to deliver #brexit. Corbyn is the worst of all the many #brexit frauds. #PeoplesVote 
There are real connections tween BREXIT & Trump. There's Vladimir Putin. And the back-to-the-cave self-serving Brits-firsters trying to rip the world into smaller pieces are joined at the hip w/the self-obsessed money addicts & paranoid imbeciles who identify as Trumpsters  
Trump added a new detail to his fictional Brexit story this time: a shot at Obama. He said he correctly predicted Brexit the day before even though "President Obama made the opposite prediction. And I was right." Obama opposed Brexit but didn't make a prediction. 
. @CharlieElphicke "I backed Remain in the referendum, but the tradition in our country of democracy, of respecting the public votes, of respecting the two thirds in my constituency who voted to leave the European Union means that I believe we should get on with it..."  
“There should be a new [Brexit] referendum and people should vote to remain,” Former US Treasury Secretary @LHSummers tells me.“If anything else happens, it will be a tragic error that will haunt Britain for decades to come.” 
President Donald Trump says Brexit is "tearing countries apart" and the US "will stay right in our lane"  
We definitely supported a People's Vote yesterday and we'll definitely support a People's Vote tomorrow ... but today? Nah, now is not the timeIt's conceivable if a Labour Government was in charge of Brexit they'd be making an even bigger arse of themselves than the current mob 
May's Brexit deal might be constitutionally dead-in-the-water now. Today the Commons considers @RhonddaBryant's motion, and Bryant rightly argues that constitutional convention says a motion cannot be brought back to the House unless it is substantially changed. MPs might vote 
Charlie Elphicke, the MP for Dover (i.e. constituency most affected by Brexit): "I will be voting against every amendment tonight. I will also be voting against the main motion, making it clear we need to honour and respect the verdict of the referendum." Turkey, meet Christmas. 
It seems I'm the only one with the guts to say it!! But the problem with GB is one thing, WOMEN!! Just heard some stupid MP bint on sky saying the referendum wasn't a vote it was an opinion!! I'm not making this up. The 1st mistake we made was letting the thick bitches VOTE!! 
Since becoming PM, Theresa May has:Lost her majorityBribed the DUPTriggered Article 50 too earlyPut down unnecessary Brexit red lines  Wasted 2 years running down the clockDelivered a Brexit deal that’s been voted down twiceAnd still she blames everyone else. 
Against a second referendum: Trump, Putin, Xi, Salvini, Orban, Farage, Le Pen, Rees-Mogg, GraylingFor a second referendum: Caroline Lucas, Sadiq Khan, Nicola Sturgeon, John Major, Keir Starmer - & I suspect Varadkar, Tusk, Macron & MerkelWhose side are you on? 
Unexploded WW2 bomb at Chris Grayling's 'no-deal Brexit lorry park' airport - peak Britain reached 
President Trump hosted Ireland this morning in the White House. The Irish relationship with the US remains very strong. We had a great discussion about trade, Northern Ireland, Brexit and Irish immigration and I thanked him for his support protecting jobs at Aughinish.  
.@theresa_may has two options:1) Adopt @UKLabour’s #Brexit proposals2) Call a general electionWhy is the #media so very slow in facing up to, and presenting the public with, that political reality? 
What he actually said the day before Brexit, to Maria Bartiromo of Fox Business, was that his "inclination" was to 'get out," but "I don't think anybody should listen to me...I haven't really focused on it very much." 
Brexit wasn’t a mistak-No, can’t do it.  
What kind of idiot is Charlie Elphicke (Con, Dover) and other MPs who go on about "honouring the referendum"?The referendum, corrupted by mysterious money from Arron Banks and others, deserves no honour, respect or any other form of response other than criminal investigation. 
Meeting with Ireland's PM, Trump told his usual vivid story about standing at his golf course in Scotland the day before Brexit and surprising everyone by predicting Leave would win. He was at the golf course the day *after* the vote. He did not issue a prediction the day before. 
Trump attack on 2nd ref is not surprising. UK changing its mind on Brexit strengthens the EU and prevents Trump from getting a massively in his favour FTA with the UK. I just wonder if Farage asked him to intervene. Maybe one day we’ll hear the tapes @carolecadwalla 
When historians write the tale of Brexit, this week may be seen as the moment the nation finally grasped the mess it was in    
Facts: 17.4 million people did not vote for a no deal #Brexit. 17.4 million people did not vote for Theresa May's deal. 17.4 million people did not vote to become poorer. And I suspect they're not happy that they were lied to. 
Likely Benn will pass. Potentially heading for a really Soft Brexit as we speak. So the UK will become an associate member of the EU, without voting rights. Overall, one key reason why the two Harolds concluded we must join. 
Now that Putin & Trump are both against a second referendum because of their solicitous concern for British democracy, it can’t come soon enoughI’m told President Xi also fears for  democratic values if the people are given another vote 
#NoA50Extension do not allow #remainMPs with an EU agenda of stopping #Brexit to show further contempt for 17.4Mn people who voted to Leave. Legal position is we leave on 29th March - Do it! WTOBrexit 
David Jones attacks campaigners for a second referendum because they want to stop Brexit. "I've no doubt that ambition is not shared by the people who sent us here." He just really, really doesn't want to check. 
Justine Greening - We need to finish off the referendum by going back to the people & finding out where they want to go.#PeoplesVote #FinalSay #RevokeA50 @JustineGreening 
It’s just such a stupid idea. Not thought through. Old fashioned. Not commensurate with an understanding of the modern World. Driven by prejudice and, as we now know, not workable facts. The very best you could say about Brexit is it’s a massive waste of everyone’s time.  
BREAKING Unexploded bomb found at Chris Grayling's 'no-deal Brexit lorry park' airport 
Theresa May proposes that if a deal is passed before next Wednesday, Britain's government should seek to delay Brexit until June 30  
The #ConservativeParty & the #LabourParty have LIED to the 17,410,742 people who voted for #BREXIT! We can not Trust the @Conservatives or @UKLabour with our votes they are both #FRAUDSTERS! Use your Vote wisely in the Coming May #LocalElections! VOTE #BREXITPARTY @brexitparty_uk 
We are closer than ever to giving the British people the final say on Brexit and the chance to stop this madness. Join our fight for a People's Vote  
Wouldn’t it be much simpler if MPs admitted they want to stop #Brexit altogether, and save us all time?I’m sure the #BBC would be happy to act as their cheerleader. via @BBCNews 
Here we have, unequivocally, the primary reason for an Art 50 extension. And that is to overturn the 2016 referendum result, before #Brexit has even had a chance to prove itself, one way or the other.Disgraceful. Utterly disgraceful.  
Young people face "being wheeled in to the operating theatre for major social and economic surgery" based on a "consent form that was signed by their grandparents nearly three years ago" - Independent Group MP Sarah Wollaston on #BrexitUpdates:  
.@realDonaldTrump says a second #Brexit referendum would be ‘unfair to the people that won’, and that @theresa_may didn't listen to his advice. 
Anyway here’s some good news. 15 days before Brexit and the manager of customs at Dover tells the BBC that ‘it’s just not viable’. Heartening to learn the £4.2bn of taxpayers’ money spent on no-deal preparations wasn’t wasted 
What a spike in toilet paper sales says about Brexit  
Dear House of Commons,Ignoring @UKLabour Brexit plan cannot make it disappear.@jeremycorbyn has a plan to bring everyone together that has already been endorsed by the EU.Swallow your pride and take it!#GeneralElectionNow#NoPVYesGE#NoMV3 
UKIP Wales Leader @NeilUKIP and Newport West by-election candidate speaking to @adrianmasters84 about the betrayal of Brexit and Article 50 extension.  
Amid the Brexit Mayhem FIVE critical votes in the Commons..I'll be down on parliament's green live at seven with the action and the reaction..join me at 7.00pmChannel 4 News!  
We must leave on the 29th of March, so we can internationally start signing new trade deals. Scaremongering won't work, we made it clear to the government in June 2016 what we want!!!!Don't betray us, you have been warned!!!#WeAreLeaving #Trump #Brexit #March29th #TradeDeal 
Those people still blaming @jeremycorbyn for Brexit are either completely ill informed or deluded or just anti Labour .The ConDems wanted the referendum.The negotiations are 100% Tory owned.The shambles today is 100% Tory owned.Simples .. 
France: Swaying between short or long extensionGermany: Extension OKIreland: As long an extension as possible (21m)Lux: "Unthinkable" for UK to delay Brexit beyond EP vote on 26 MayBelgium: Happily accept a long extensionPT: Only accept long extension 
MPs to vote on second Brexit referendum for first timeI know it's too much to hope for, but....  
Unbelievable. @JMPSimor is on @KayBurley show saying the 2016 referendum was “an opinion poll”. Apparently, Parliament represents the will of the people even when it’s denying the expressed view of the people. Funnily enough, not how the public sees it. 
Is #InfluencerMarketing risky to your #brandreputation?Find out why people now link #Brexit to #FyreFestival @SpirosMargaris @TamaraMcCleary @JimMarous @jaybaer @BernardMarr @guzmand @Shirastweet @evankirstel@MarshaCollier @Ronald_vanLoon @leeodden#SMMW19 #b2bmarketing pic.twitter.com/euwS6AGesX 
Trump says second Brexit referendum is 'unfair' and lashes out at Theresa May in extraordinary attack  
Donald Trump's #Brexit advice to Theresa May was "to sue the EU - not go into negotiations", according to the UK PM Watch back:  
What should the next Brexit amendment motion be called? 
Competing shouts from protesters: ‘We want Brexit’ & ‘no deal, no problem!!’ VERSUS ‘Brexit’s a lie, Brexit’s a con, Brexit’s rubbish and we want it gone!!’ Sigh. On the brighter side, the sun came out!!  #BrexitMayhem 
President Trump continues to weigh into the Brexit debate: "It's tearing a country apart ... It's a shame that it has to be that way. I think we're going to stay right in our lane." 
Dr. Sarah Wollaston - The government will never be forgiven for the consequences of brexit unless they get consent. If the Prime Minister were a surgeon she would be struck off if she proceeded without consent.#peoplesvote #BrexitMayhem @Anna_Soubry @sarahwollaston 
Donald Trump: "I'm surprised at how badly it's all gone," I gave Theresa May "ideas on how to negotiate... she didn't listen"#Brexit latest:  
Ok @lisanandy @Y_FovargueMP @JoPlattMP we hope at 5pm you will vote down extending Art50 for a 2nd Referendum no point abstaining as this will show us your preference. No point hiding #WiganVotedLeave 63.9% 
God, Trump is so embarrassing when he tries to sound like he knows something. On Brexit: "I think they are probably going to have to do something." No shit, "really smart" man. 
#Brexiters need to realise that they have lost their #Brexit & if it goes ahead they will be trapped in a Pay & Obey No Say deal lock.They actually stand more chance if they #RevokeA50 convince the UK it needs another Ref when there is a good plan to leave. 
@Anna_Soubry - "Does he not understand, that across the length & breadth of this country, that ppl are supporting a peoples vote. #Brexit  
At a time of national political crisis, it is vital to stop the prevarication, ambiguity and chaos, and make a decision. We should vote on the #Brexit options including a #PeoplesVote - this is why @TheIndGroup, on a cross party basis, are pushing a #PeoplesVote today. 
Anyway, if Brexit has been getting you down, at least now you know that the government fully defends its soldiers' right to murder innocent unarmed civilians in the streets of the United Kingdom, and will do everything it can to ensure they aren't punished. 
"As a German migrant and a scientist, freedom of movement has shaped my  professional and personal life over the past 20 years, it defines who I am and what I stand for. Brexit is the exact opposite of this."#Brexit #inLimbo #RescueOurRights@ashleighfurlong 
Trump returned to one of his most persistent lies during his meeting with the Irish PM today, claiming that he predicted during a news conference at his golf course in Turnberry that Brexit referendum would pass.That Turnberry news conf took place the day AFTER the Brexit vote 
So here's the problem. There's no enthusiasm for a Brexit delay, let alone a second referendum. Labour is being told to back an amendment which doesn't have Parliamentary support or public support. If you want a referendum, you need to fix both things.  
Trump today on Brexit: “It wasn’t that I was a supporter. I predicted that it was going to happen."In May 2016, Trump told Fox News that "migration has been a horrible thing for Europe" and that UK would be "better off" leaving the EU. 
Apparently the liberal elite have a "self-serving entitlement that prohibited views other than their own, that wants to delegitimise the opinion of the vast majority of law abiding patriotic decent British people who voted for Brexit." 
.⁦@michaelgove⁩ betrayed #Brexit the day he shafted Boris. He is more responsible than anyone for this entire clusterfuck.   
I'm marching to show I hate Brexit, and if it's not for #RevokeArticle50 , then I'm marching for #PeoplesVote  and I'm wearing a #yellowrose to support EU  people in UK.The important thing is numbers. ALL remainers need to march. 
You might think that the Brexit negotiations so far have been embarrassing, even humiliating. But the moment the UK requests a full-on extension, things will become much, much worse. The UK will be a supplicant  
Anything but Brexit; cranked up the time machine and took a trip to Penzance back in April, 1977 to snap this classic view. 45026 about to head up-country with a ‘proper’ train.  
WATCH | @realDonaldTrump slams Theresa May for ignoring his negotiating advice, says a second referendum would be "very unfair to the people who won", and tells Irish PM Leo Varadkar, to his face, that he's prepared to "do something very severe economically" to the EU   
Irish Govt admits it would need EMERGENCY AID from EU after No Deal Brexit:“You’re looking at hundreds of millions here. Between the beef industry and the fishing industry we’re talking mega-money.”Michael Creed, Irish Agriculture MinisterJanuary 2019  
A second #Brexit referendum would be "very unfair".@realDonaldTrump says he's "surprised at how badly" Brexit negotiations have gone. Follow the latest #Brexit fallout here:  
Donald Trump: #Brexit is "tearing a country apart, it's actually tearing a lot of countries apart... it's a shame that it has to be that way" - @POTUS gives views on Brexit during meeting with Irish PM Leo Varadkar Latest:  
 A no-deal Brexit would catastrophically damage Scotland’s economy. Only the SNP are standing up for Scotland.  
TRUMP ON BREXIT: “It could have been negotiated in a different manner frankly”  
In press conference with Leo Varadkar, Trump repeats once again the lie that he predicted Brexit would win during a visit he made to Turnberry the day before the referendum -- in fact he visited Turnberry the day *after* the vote  
“I believe that this Parliament can both deliver the referendum vote, ensure the constitutional integrity of the UK - including Northern Ireland - and fully comply with the vote to leave following the referendum Act, passed as we know by 6:1 in this House” @BillCashMP 
Trump has said again that he was in Scotland the day before the EU referendum and predicted the result. Untrue - he was there the day after. 
Here's Trump's comments on Brexit:'I'm surprised at how badly it has all gone from a stand point of negotiations.'But I gave the Prime Minister my ideas of how to negotiate it, she didn't listen to that and that's fine but it could have been negotiated in a different manner.' 
THIS was something else, the Irish PM contradicted trump’s STUPID and arrogant RANT on Brexit and trump was visibly pissed afterwards-trump also went on to attack the EU and their trade practices as the Irish PM looked on, and I’d def give a penny (and much more) for his thoughts  
EU’s share of the world economy is declining. EU predicts 90% of future growth is outside the EU trade bloc. UK exports to the EU are ~44% & declining. Considering these #BrexitFacts & other new #Brexit facts how would you vote in a 2nd #PeoplesVote referendum? 
President Trump: "I would like to see the whole situation with Brexit work out." Irish Prime Minister Leo Varadkar tells Trump he disagrees and regrets that Brexit is happening  
does that femi lad literally just wander the streets pontificating at random people about brexit. is that his job 
Trump opposes second Brexit referendum on grounds it would be “unfair” to proponents 
US President, Donald Trump, says a second public Brexit vote would be 'unfair'. 
Donald Trump: I'm surprised how badly Brexit negotiations have gone 
There's no point in having a pop at #PeoplesVote for it's statement on the second referendum today.Look at the amendment as a test, a toe in the water.On the 23rd we march, hundreds of thousands of us, in a show of strength and solidarity and we lobby our MPs and prepare.  
BREAKING: Clown who couldn't get Paul Ryan and Mitch McConnell to pay for a simple wall criticizes Theresa May for not taking his advice on negotiating #Brexit 
Would you vote for a no-deal Brexit?  My answer YES 
“We were sold a pack of lies and I can’t believe I fell for it”A remorseful Brexiteer tells Shelagh Fogarty voting to leave the EU was “by far the stupidest thing I’ve done in my life”@ShelaghFogarty | #Brexit 
Anyone taking seriously the Vienna Convention as a super-clever ploy is the Brexit equivalent of the "Freemen of the Land" or some other type of Flat Earther.Please, just no. 
Trump on Brexit: “Things could’ve been very different.”“I gave the Prime Minister some advice. She didn’t listen.” On a second referendum: “I don’t think that would be fair.” 
"You might have to tell the world what's happening, because nobody knows."@realDonaldTrump says #Brexit is "tearing a lot of countries apart" as he welcomes Irish PM Leo Varadkar to The White House. Follow the latest #Brexit fallout here:  
Trump needs to openly say that the UK is not behaving like a democratic country. This could force May's hand to honor Brexit.  
Instead there is this this delusional idea that all that is stopping Brexit being cancelled is that Corbyn isn't wishing really hard. 
NEW: Oliver Letwin tells me they think they have 20 Tory MPs supporting the Benn/Letwin/Cooper amendment tonight, meaning it has a very good chance of passing. Just to remind you, that would give Parliament the chance to vote on all the Brexit options and find a way forward. 
Trump says second Brexit referendum is 'unfair' and lashes out at Theresa May in extraordinary attack  
#BREAKING US President Trump says "surprised" to see "how badly" Britain's Brexit procedure has gone  
Labour will NOT be voting for a second Brexit referendum in the Commons tonight. 
TRUMP ON BREXIT: - Second referendum ‘unfair’- May didn’t take negotiation advice- Surprised how badly negotiations have gone  
'Let us just be clear. We are being played for fools here' @CarolineLucas tears the Brexit process to shreds. It's never been more important to get out on the streets on March 23rd and call for a #PeoplesVote 
The route forward on #Brexit means leaving Withdrawal Agreement as it is but rewriting the Political Declaration on Future Relationship to point to #EFTA #EEA.#CommonMarket2.0 is only Brexit left that won’t crash the economy & offers something for everyone.  
More Brexit bad news for 700 Welsh jobs. This is getting never-ending and the Brexiteers are still in denial. Shocking, absolutely shocking!! 
Very telling that a lot of the People's Vote crew seem to realise that any party who revokes Brexit will condemn themselves to electoral oblivion and yet they're still happy for Labour to do it. Interesting. 
John Bercow is engulfed in controversy today over his handling of Brexit. Can you guess how he voted in the Referendum?  
Trump: 'I'm not going to comment on Brexit... it's tearing the country apart' 
The European Parliament has voted overwhelmingly in favour of the continued recognition of EU citizens’ social security contributions and acquired entitlements in the case of a ‘no deal’ Brexit.In total, 652 cross-party MEPs passed the regulation, while just 8 voted against. 1/ 
Donald Trump: I'm surprised how badly Brexit negotiations have gone  
Tory MP Chris Chope says he would consider supporting a vote of no confidence in the PM if @jeremycorbyn moved it.Why?Because she has betrayed the country over #Brexit. 
Anyone get the impression the Speaker is determined to stop #Brexit? 
Just when the day could hardly get any trickier for the PM, Trump says she should have listened to him, and he's surprised how badly Brexit negotiations have gone 
Celebrate our only true UK national holiday. It’s @ComicRelief day on Friday. Here’s an excuse to dance your Brexit Blues away and make the world a better place at the same time. Go for it!#IfYouDontDanceYourMoneysStillGood Thanks x 
Trump on Brexit, as per @Reuters:  – A second Brexit referendum would be 'unfair'– Says Brexit is 'complex'– Says May 'did not listen' to his suggestions on how to negotiate Brexit – Says he's 'surprised' by how bad Brexit negotiations have gone. 
"It's all gone a bit tits up, really."Outside the Westminster bubble, @JonSnowC4 went to speak to the people of Egham in the Home Counties about how Brexit is going. #BrexitMayhem pic.twitter.com/2CrpB5a904 
Interesting speech by Christopher Chope, hardline Brexiter. "Instead of accepting verdict of House she is stubbornly continuing to assert that her deal is a good deal. And now she is holding a pistol to our heads by threatening that we will lose Brexit altogether." 
“Labour defends decision not to back second referendum amendment tonight”Labour, the arch betrayers of the British people. A useless shower.Is there anybody who will vote Labour at the next GE? Labour RIP@UKLabour @jeremycorbyn 
The only majority to be found for a second referendum is going to be if it is that or the cliff and will run through a panicked A50 revocation. 
Tonight it looks like Labour are going to abstain on a vote that could provide a People's Vote. Jeremy Corbyn's voters deserve stronger leadership against this Tory Brexit. Demand a People's Vote with the Liberal Democrats 
TRUMP SAYS HE IS SURPRISED HOW BADLY THE BREXIT NEGOTIATIONS HAVE GONE TRUMP SAYS U.K. PRIME MINISTER MAY DID NOT LISTEN TO HIS SUGGESTIONS ON HOW TO NEGOTIATE BREXITREUTERS 
"A flawed second referendum could break our democracy".I can't help but think that one of things damaging democracy is people like Lisa Nandy, who surely know about this data, suggesting to us with a po-face that democracy is fine and would only be broken by a public vote.  
Barring a series of rolling extensions, which the EU will never agree to, we can now safely assume that Brexit will definitely happen.  The 'People's Vote' is the only realistic way of overturning Brexit, and the Labour leadership clearly have no intention of letting that happen. 
A longer #Brexit delay might involve holding European elections. So what?:  
I'm with Farage on this. If he wants to use his influence to ensure Brexit happens, then he should forget about the Brexit Party and start lobbying European governments. Poland, Italy, Hungary! Get them on board to REJECT an extension to Article 50. 
Donald Trump is about to explode into the Brexit debate again with some pretty incendiary comments - he seems to have accused the PM of failing to listen to him  
This clearly has absolutely nothing to do with Brexit.  
Tonight in Parliament I will vote against any Brexit delay and oppose a second EU referendum. By the largest poll in UK history people voted to leave the EU; almost three years on this decision must now be honoured; not to deliver would damage, deny and disrespect our democracy.  
Corbyn instructing his MPs to abstain from the #PeoplesVote amendment this evening if further proof of his support for Brexit 
.@Nigel_Farage on the betrayal of Brexit: ‘Westminster’s current crop of career-minded politicians are anti-democrats posing as men and women of honour’  
Breaking: TRUMP SAYS HE DOES NOT THINK ANOTHER VOTE ON BREXIT WOULD BE POSSIBLE BECAUSE IT WOULD BE UNFAIR 
Tusk tells May that Corbyn's plan could break the Brexit Deadlock.It's past time for the PM to swallow what little pride she has left & except Labours 5 amendments. #CorbynsCustomsUnion#TheRealPm 
I hugely respect your work and want electoral law to be reformed. I also regard the referendum result as a political rather than a legal problem, and that Remainers should focus on convincing Leave voters, rather than convincing existing Remainers the referendum is null and void. 
#Trump says he thinks #Brexit could have been negotiated differently.says he gave #Theresamay his advice but she didn’t take it 
Gov. Gavin Newsom says the moratorium on the death penalty he announced yesterday is just a first step in ending capital punishment in CA - he will begin considering commuting death sentences & support a referendum to abolish the death penalty next year.  
The British people do not want Brexit to be delayed via @YouGov 
Labour already put an amendment down with the option of a second referendum. It was voted down 327-296. But I have people in my mentions angrily demanding Labour back a new amendment which is a) doomed and b) opposed by the official People's Vote campaign. Extraordinary.  
The message has gone out to all Labour MPs telling them to abstain on the amendment pushing for a second referendum. Source say it’s a three line whip.  
No Deal is nothing to be scared of. Let's just leave on 29th March, and deliver the Brexit vote 17.4m are relying on! 
Brexit has turned our political world upside down. There could now be a fundamental realignment that pitches those dedicated to defending democracy against those who apparently have little need for it, writes @gtbho of @tfbrexit 
"650 people have no concern for what the people want."@Ella_M_Whelan and @queenchristina_ debate whether Brexit should be delayed until an agreement with the EU can be reached.Follow the latest #Brexit fallout here:  
Theresa May thinks she can ask parliament 3 times if they want her deal (newsflash: they don't) but they won't let us, the electorate have a second referendum to see if WE have changed our minds.Now that we know the facts, WE MUST VOTE AGAIN.#PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Theresa May has singlehandedly brought the Conservative party to the brink of anihalation, but it is speaker Bercow's anti-Brexit credentials that has destroyed parliamentary democracy.  
Didn’t have the heart to tell these anti-democracy campaigners outside Parliament that the official “People’s Vote” campaign are advising MPs today not to vote for the actual amendment demanding an actual second referendum...  
Speaker John Bercow has refused to take amendment from ERG ruling out a 2nd referendum, of course he has., he wants to vote against Brexit yet again. the pompous prig is utterly transparent 
An extension of Article 50 might be long enough even for the National Crime Agency to complete its investigation of Arron Banks.Unsurprisingly, Banks and friend Farage are doing all they can to get their right wing friends in Europe to block an extension.#Brexit 
On @BBCPolitics earlier, I discussed with @afneil why it is so important that the @Conservatives honour our Manifesto commitments to deliver Brexit by leaving the Single Market, the Customs Union and the remit of the ECJ.  
 Cost of holding EU elections: £108m Cost of holding another EU referendum: £129m That's over £230m Remain campaigners want us to WASTE by delaying Brexit and holding another referendum - on top of all the extra money we'd have to send to the EU! 
ma maw said there wis gony be another brexit vote n a wiz like anythin ye say Agnes but what's that got tay day way the price ay a freddo ya bamcoupon22.3k Retweets     38.7 Likes 
and now it's just noise and theatrics, a horrible sideshow while the really important stuff is going on right here. A producer rang me up to ask what I think about Parliament and Brexit, and the only honest thing I could say was "I don't care." 
Kay Burley to brexiter Ella Whelan - Given you are so confident that ppl still want to leave, why not put to a second referendum?. #Brexit  
Tories held the vote! Tories decided the question! Tories screwed up the remain campaign! Tories negotiated the failed deal! Brexit is all Corbyn's fault! I might have backed remaining if you're number one priority was staying the EU and not attacking Corbyn.  
Looking for sublime #Brexit art? Look no further than The #FestivalofBrexit @thamesandhudson, from @Coldwar_Steve. Unforgettable tableaux of Brexit Britain featuring an all-star cast. Warning: might scar you for life.  
Up/down referendum on self with no nuance possible.  
THIS!!! fuck the stupid bastards running People's Vote HQ, it's us grassroots activists putting the work in and winning this, it's OUR campaign, it's OUR march, come along and let your placard speak for you! i for one will be marching to STOP BREXIT  #RevokeArticle50 
Friday I had food poisoning and drove halfway across Scotland, Tuesday I moved house, Thursday my car broke down likely irreparably. Brexit. Seriously this week sucks balls. Send wine. Or gin. Or cava. Or literally any form of alcohol. Ta. 
MPs to vote on a Scottish independence referendum! But since the majority of MPs in the Commons are English this will go down like a lead balloon.  
TAKE TO THE STREETS: UKIP To Lead Brexit Rally Outside Parliament During Brexit Delay Vote  
“Keep calm and drink tea” is not an option for #Brexit and the following days. We need a very clear and comprehensive reason for a delay extending Article 50.XB 
Labour will not support tonight's vote for a second Brexit referendumShadow Brexit Secretary Keir Starmer has said the party does not believe it is the right time to back the call - and the People’s Vote Campaign has said exactly the same #BrexitVote  
Labour, no matter what, want the opportunity to push through their version of Brexit. And with 15 days left, Labour seem to think we’d believe them when they say they want a People’s Vote. Simply, Labour aren’t to be trusted when it comes to Brexit.  
75% of Leave voters against delaying Brexit beyond 29th March, poll finds   
I’m speechless....BREXIT SHOCK: MPs to vote TONIGHT on giving public second referendum  
Kind of like Brexit Iain. “Such a massive demand for it” that almost 3 years after the vote “it can be yet” apparently - and we still don’t even know what “it” is. But whatever “it” is “it” is the “will of the people.” Hilarious is not the right word. Idiotic is more apt.  
Reflections on this:1.) Astonishing it's taken ERG this long to realise parl would move to softer brexit.2.) It's so odd that ERG have outsourced their judgment on this to DUP. They have quite different Brexit aims.3.) Idea Lab MPs will come over because of DUP is mad. 
A major new poll from YouGov shows that British voters reject delaying Brexit with an Article 50 extension. It's time for politicians to stop stabbing us in the back and actually deliver what we voted for: a clean WTO Brexit on March 29!Support us at  
@Ella_M_Whelan now being lectured at for being a YOUNG Brexit vote who doesn't understand job insecurity of 50 somethings. No sense of irony. Basicall whatever age you are as a Leaver, you get lectured about how ignorant you are by those Remainers who always know better @SkyNews 
We need to march. My friends and I are - again - travelling from France. I've been to all of them. Still not convinced about another ref as MPs shd have the balls to revoke, but I shall march against Brexit. Show we are shoulder to shoulder against this #StopBrexit 
Personally, I'm tempted to argue Labour should back the amendment to show that there aren't the numbers for a second referendum in Parliament and end the baseless myth Corbyn is in possession of a big red shiny People's Vote button once and for all. 
Brexit Nine-Nine:  
“Some people will dismiss our analysis as ‘Project Fear,’” … But with just over a month to go to Brexit . . . it just isn’t good enough to keep saying that ‘something will work out’ without any details of exactly how.”  
Trump's "unlimited" chlorinated, hormone-pumped post-Brexit trade deal coming to a lunch box near you!  
We are delighted to have had a chance to discuss, in great detail, the issue of #citizensrights for EU citizens in the UK & @BritishInEurope with German @spdbt MP @MetinHakverdi. Pleased to hear that we agree citizens are important in this complex process of Brexit.  
NEW: This message was sent by @Phoebepotter_1 to @OFOCBrexit activists, warning that this evening's votes will be "deflating" for the second referendum campaign. 
Amazing. @CSBarnard24 is an absolutely authority on legal matters to do with Brexit. So pleased to see her doing this.  
Pleased to contribute to the ⁦#IrishinBritain series ⁦in ⁦@ITabroad⁩ ⁦@IrishTimes⁩ on the importance of networking, business opportunities and the concerns of ⁦@IIBN⁩ members, ahead of #Brexit  
At 86 years old, the inspirational legend that is @AlfDubs (probably?) becomes the oldest frontbencher in the history of #Parliament - @UKHouseofLords & @HouseofCommons - guesting for us in @DefraGovUK SI debate on ‘food & feed’ post-#Brexit@LabourHistory 
UPDATE II: Guido has seen a message from second referendum youth group @OFOCBrexit telling activists that tonight will seem "deflating"... 
There is going to be an awful lot of heat, and not a lot of light, about developments in parliament today & in the coming week.We need to cut through that noise: we demand a ratification referendum on any Brexit deal. It's the only way to bring closure. 
'The potential is unlimited!' Donald Trump wades into the middle of the Brexit crisis with an early-morning tweet talking up a 'large scale trade deal' with Britain after we leave the EU  via @MailOnline 
The British people aren’t thick. "Would having a new referendum and voting to remain in the EU after all respect the outcome of the referendum?"Would 22%Would not 57%Don't know 21%YouGov, Mar 13 
"There's 15 days left until we leave with no-deal, it's crazy to call for a referendum this early.""Don't they take a minimum of five months to organise?""SHUT UP, we've for some reason made ignoring that part of our tactics.""…Why?""SHUT UP, OKAY."  
As MPs prepare to vote on a 2nd referendum, we just want to say thanks for your support to @Nigel_Farage, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and @DavidDavisMP (Location: Westminster Bridge Rd, a 5 minute walk from the Parliament) 
What???! After spending the past months castigating Corbyn for not forcing a vote on a second referendum, @peoplesvote_uk now recognise as fact what he has been saying all along - that a PV only becomes viable when all other options have been exhausted. 
Basically, as things stand, there is no Parliamentary majority for a second referendum, whether the Labour leadership backed it or not. Those pushing for a vote now are driven by wanting to bash Labour, rather than trying to get a referendum.  
Labour's Sir Keir Starmer says his party will not back today's amendment calling for a new referendum on #Brexit, saying "today is about a different issue" 
"I have no intention of criticising colleagues, but I have always accepted that collective responsibility is the price that you pay for the privilege of being in the government."Liam Fox reacts after several MPs abstained from last night's Brexit no-deal vote  
British lawmakers rule out a 'no-deal' #Brexit, putting pressure on Theresa May to find a way out of the impasse  
Saddest part: enormous damage has already been done to UK's economy, social fabric and democratic institutions by the racist, xenophobic, nativist, far right project named Brexit. Whatever happens now is about damage limitation at best, avoiding catastrophe at worst. 
If Britain did have a second referendum it would not be about Europe. It would be about "the establishment"; betrayal, backlash & strained passion on all sides. It would not bring unity but exacerbate and entrench polarisation. The better angels of our nature would exit the room. 
Outrageous: 'Biased' Bercow rules out amendment to rule out a second Brexit referendum.  
I am ready for no deal Brexit.UK ready for no deal Brexit.Everyone ready for no deal Brexit.It’s only the remainer MP’s who cry like babies and act like children in playground.Let’s demand that they get sacked.They work for us the people so tell them what you think! 
What a difference two years makes… or not. In June 2017, Emily Maitlis was asking if Brexit was dead.“Yes,” Lord Heseltine said. “We have a split country, we have a split cabinet.” #newsnight | @maitlis | #TBT 
That march is six days before we're still set to crash out without a deal. The campaign against Brexit is not so much a clown car as a motorway pile-up.  
Very good from @lisanandy on why we need the deliberative democracy of a people's assembly to find a consensus on how to resolve Brexit rather than another divisive referendum  
I support the Brexit Deal proposed by the Prime Minister and will continue to vote for it, so we can make a success of Brexit.Read my message to Hastings and Rye.  
Under a hard or soft Brexit, London's role as a global financial hub is going to fade over time, says JPM CEO Jamie Dimon  
It’s time to get beyond the Brexit debate and ask some serious questions.What other laws do the British electorate disagree with?What legitimacy does Parliament have when it defies the electorate?Why are both major parties ignoring their constituents? 
Use your #Brexit voice now, or lose it forever. Act now, quick advice here:#GoWTO 
This is what Labour, under Corbyn, does. Puts itself in a position to get a win over a government in shambles and then destroys itself because Corbyn and his advisors love Brexit. 
To be clearer on the earlier point, KS was not rejecting supporting a second referendum. He was rejecting the timing i.e. he did not want to support it TODAY. He made it clear that didn't mean Labour wouldn't support one in future. Problem is, there's not much future left! 
One positive of Brexit is that it's demonstrated quite how many insipid, faintly anonymous, frequently uninformed, uninspiring and in some cases downright dumb MPs inhabit our decaying Houses of Parliament. 
Remainer Speaker Bercow Blocks Vote on Stopping Second Referendum  
The vote in the Commons today is the important vote. Every MP voting to delay #Brexit must be sacked. It is an affront to democracy that any #MP could vote against the British people. We have waited 3 years to leave & now corrupt #MPs want to betray us again by STOPPING #Brexit!  
Just in case you weren't finding Brexit quite infuriating enough already you can always pop RT on  
If your a truck driver or haulage company why the hell would you want to come to the UK after brexit when customs are reintroduced? I’d decline for sure - I bet many others will . 
The Brexiteers have been blocking Brexit. The People’s Vote campaign want MPs to not support a People’s Vote. No Deal is still on the table and too many MPs are pretending that the option to revoke Article 50 doesn’t exist.  
How can people be expected to develop well-informed views on #Brexit when this kind of nonsense is printed???@TheSun @tnewtondunn 
The idea the @Conservatives will ever unite around a #nodeal #Brexit has been exposed as fantasy, says @anandMenon1#BrexitMayhem #Brexitvoteexplained 
Speaker John Bercow set to rule on blocking Theresa May's Brexit deal being voted on third time  
Brexiteers were right on Tuesday to reject a deal that would leave Brussels in control. Tonight MPs must reject any delay to Brexit and it's time to leave on March 29th. 
Sir Patrick Stewart is paying to bus protesters from Yorkshire to an anti-Brexit march in London  
After Brexit we can live on coconuts. 
Brexit has already cost £40bn+ in lost growth.The Govt estimates its deal will make us £100bn-a-yr worse off.We're in danger of losing 60+ trade deals around the world.The Govt is in meltdown.But don't worry, Liam Fox has signed a trade deal with Fiji & Papua New Guinea.  
Reminder: Scotland rejected Brexit. This is an English problem. What Westminster has made clear is that independence is the only way to protect Scotland. 
Trump-loving Piers Morgan buried in ridicule after he begs the president to help fix Brexit  
No deal is not something I welcome. It's just something I'm resigned to as a consequence of our institutional political incompetence. That is not a consequence of Brexit. This is something profoundly more serious. #Brexit 
Just gave a media interview in Romanian & realised I express myself so much better in English. Really difficult speaking on Brexit using my 2012 vocabulary.I guess that's what 6 years of education in English & a British partner do to you.Any tips?#ThursdayThoughts 
Two BIG things wrong with this statement: “The people decided in a fair referendum that Britain should extricate itself from the EU”. (1) ‘The people’ who thus voted were 26% of the population, 37% of the electorate. = a minority of ‘the people.’ (2) ‘Fair’?? Crimes, fraud, etc? 
Mass abstentions now likely on second referendum tonight. MPs aligned to the People's Vote campaign are being advised to abstain. Labour will officially whip to abstain. Not sure how this will translate to remainers outside this building. 
I’m reminded, by someone well-placed, that  Congress wouldn’t sign / trade deal if there’s a hard / border - which there would be in ‘no deal’ Brexit.(Plus,  @BillClinton, was the guarantor of Good Friday agreement which removed hard border.)Agree @realDonaldTrump? 
We have a Leavers of London 'party' on 27th. There be food, excitement and bitchin' bout #Brexit - I'll be there and guest speakers to be announced. See website for deets.  
BREAKING: People's Vote campaign begs MPs not to back vote on 2nd Referendum. So after all their squealing, they've bottled it. Pathetic.  
A better one than you for starters - what a crock of cobblers Femi. People are literally dying by the thousand after 9 years of Tory cruelty, but a one-trick pony like you can only harp on about Brexit. We need a Labour govt.You're no different to Farage in what you achieve. 
The Taoiseach has emerged from his meeting with Mike Pence stating that they discussed Brexit and strengthening ties between Ireland and the US.  "I did not spend the meeting tied to a chair watching a flashing light box.  However, now I love women" he added 
Even the ‘People’s Vote’ campaign don’t think today is the day to put down a second referendum amendment.Funny how you focus your energy on Jeremy Corbyn - he is the leader who is actually giving your platform a lifeline... 
May will bring her hated Brexit in Name only "deal" BACK to the Commons next week. She will use the time between now and then to twist more arms to get it over the line. If she fails, she will seek an extension of Article 50. At NO POINT does she deliver Brexit. It's betrayal. 
NO DELAY: - 75% of Leavers against Brexit delay beyond 29th March- 72% of Tories against such a move- Overall, more Brits against a delay than for 
"The idea of bringing back the deal for a third time, without even the pretence that anything has changed... is an act of desperation"Shadow #Brexit Secretary Sir Keir Starmer says PM's approach is "absurd and irresponsible" 
The national numbers also look like this. We keep saying if this election is a referendum Democrats win... but if it's a choice, that becomes a much dicier proposition for Democrats based on recent data.  
Labour voters destraught at #Brexit need to take note of how Corbyn & Starmer vote todayLabour has the option to join #LibDems and support a #PeoplesVote tonightInstead they're going to show support by abstaining!Make no mistake, again Labour are handmaids of a Tory Brexit! 
Let’s hope @UKLabour follows the advice of these two sage political soothsayers. Remind me how many seats the only mainstream party to oppose Brexit got in 2017? Oh yes. Eight.  
How dare you blame LAB & Corbyn!1) This was a Tory referendum 2) The Tories have messed up the negotiations3) 52% of the country voted leave including 70% of LAB constituencies4) Corbyn's Brexit has support of the EU & HoC & will protect jobs & the economy  
If the social and economic impact of a no-deal Brexit was caused by a natural disaster there would be offers of international aid, Caroline Lucas says@mrjamesob | @CarolineLucas 
Ben Bradshaw says many in Labour tempted to vote for that amendment, because many Labour spokespeople do not always speak with Starmer's "clarity" on second referendum. 
Today we’ll see the true motives of FBPE types.If people really want a second referendum they will wait and back Labour today.Those who are using today to attack Labour show they don’t care about another vote and just want to end Corbyn as leader.(Even Campbell is right!)  
Extraordinary thread.May's pretended weakness seems to have emboldened certain Remainers.Surely a British PM wd not foster chaos?How else wd her White Flag get enough votes.Brexit-voters won't stand for vassalage.The WA is NOT the answer. MPs must stand up for a REAL Brexit.  
The Labour party not supporting a final say referendum cross party amendment today. No amount of smoke grenades they use to justify this betrayal will survive the judgement of history. The vote is tonight - if Labour don't support it will be to their eternal shame. 
75% of Leavers are against delaying Brexit beyond 29th March, as are 72% of Conservative voters. Those who voted for Brexit want us to now leave on time, Deal or No Deal.  
UPDATE: Another big day of Brexit votes, but I was able to ask the Leader of the House earlier about the need for the Chancellor to commit to making a further statement about the incredibly unfair treatment WASPI women have faced in recent years. .@WASPI_Campaign 
David Lidington who used the advisory status of the referendum as a reason to reject an SNP amendment to the referendum bill. If only that had been remembered by Theresa May who has repeatedly lied to the House by claiming the referendum was an instruction.  
Labour @Keir_Starmer confirms Labour will not back second referendum motion today 
Parliament is being asked if there should be a second referendum.We are prosecuting Mr Boris Johnson MP for his actions in the first one. All politicians risk prosecution if they appear to lie to the public as they have before. #BrexitMayhem #Speaker #Bercow #PeoplesVote 
Arch globalist Tony Blair ‘secretly advising’ Macron on how to sabotage Brexit  
We owe it to our children, their children and generations to come to pass on to them a better country and a better world. #Brexit and the people who support it are clearly not interested in this. They are  only interested in themselves. They must never get their way!  
How can half of all Scots look the Brexit debacle in the face and conclude that staying in the UK is a safer bet than independence? // @LesleyRiddoch 
Interesting exchange between TIG’s Soubry and Starmer on People’s Vote - that ends with her shouting “shame on you” at him for not backing referendum. He quotes Alistair Campbell and the PV campaign saying now is not the time to push for a vote. 
If MPs reject Theresa May's #Brexit deal for a third time they will be allowed to hold a series of new votes to test different ideas on a way forward, says Cabinet Office Minister David Lidington  
The @peoplesvote_uk urge MPs NOT to back second referendum motion tabled by @sarahwollaston today 
You couldn't make it up! Sir Keir Starmer shares with the Commons a statement from the so-called People's Vote campaign disavowing the Sarah Wollaston amendment seeking an Article 50 extension in order to allow for, er, a new referendum to be held... 
Surely this is a good idea - If we can not get our own politicians to get us out ,why not use the Italians - any Article 50 extension needs permission of all 27 member states - If Nigel can get one or more to vote against we will get Brexit under WTO by default  
Starmer says Labour will not vote in favour of second referendum this evening 
I was on @BBCNews this morning talking about Brexit. Here's the short version... Government falling apart in office, Labour MPs will be despised if they support this bill, we need a second referendum...  
The government needs to make time for MPs to hold a series of indicative votes allowing them to decide which Brexit option has the most support. That should then be put to the public in a #PeoplesVote says @ChukaUmunna. Support us here:  
2/ "@Europarl_EN is NOT perfect BUT it WORKS!"#Brexit clearly does NOT!#BrexitBreaksBritainSome Sharpie action on the train! See you in #Westminster later!#RevokeArticle50Now#RevokeArticle50 
Brexit voters have been shamed, belittled, patronised, condescended to, so don't expect them to organise huge, self congratulatory marches in London.Do expect them to punish Labour in the privacy of the ballot box if we back a 2nd referendum AND campaign for Remain! 
Labour MPs are telling me they will be whipped to abstain in the vote on tonight's second referendum amendment. There is a lot of anger on the opposition benches today. 
Brexit:We're still in, but we voted out. We'll be out in a fortnight unless MPs in constituencies that voted out figure out a way to keep us in.The 2nd referendum campaign have come out against a vote on voting again on the vote they lost, because they think they might lose. 
"MPs will tonight vote on whether or not Brexit should be delayed until after 29th March. Do you think MPs should vote…?"In favour of delay 38%Against a delay 43%Don't know 19%Leavers break 75%, & Tories 72%, AGAINST a delayRemainers 65%, & Lab 58%, FOR a delayYouGov 
I think we should do something to help Remain MPs decide if they really want to have a People's Vote amendment, perhaps we could have some sort of referendum 
Hearing on #wato "Brexit has divided the country and parties". No, important distinction, it has EXPOSED divisions & dysfunctional #brokenpolitics that can't deal with them. If you waved wand & got rid of #Brexit, they'd still be there. 
I have just paid the *second* instalment of money so that my Hungarian friend Anna's second child (born here) can become a UK citizen = £950THIS is what #EU citizens were PROMISED in the Referendum. I don't see ANY Government Minister 'honouring' the promise. #brexit  
An overwhelming majority of 78% of #Tory members oppose a #Brexit #extension. It is time for #Tory members to do something. Start ousting  the #remainers beginning with the senior ones like @AmberRuddHR , #Grieve, @DavidGauke, @NickBoles etc!  #BrexitParty 
Brexit has shown up the Establishment as a bunch of small-minded, mediocre bullies.The vote for Brexit was a revolutionary act. Of course the Establishment has fought it tooth and nail. 
Intellectually challenged. Morally bankrupt. Lacking the courage to admit she wants Brexit at any cost. Sorry, Angela, but it takes more than a "lays it on with a trowel" Northern accent to speak for the working class.  
Why is [checks notes] Jeremy Corbyn blocking a second referendum  
SNAP POLL: By 43% to 38% Britons want MPs to vote AGAINST a Brexit delay.All Brits: 38% delay / 43% no delayRemain: 65% delay / 17% no delayLeave: 12% delay / 75% no delay 
The fact is, this attitude is prevalent, not only among Labour supporters, but within Labour leadership. There are many who think the chaos caused by Brexit will be some sort of opportunity for a purer form of socialism than is available while in the EU.  
Is @DefraGovUK ready for Brexit?Submit your questions for the Defra ministers, who will be asked the best ones at our sessions on Wednesday 27th March, using #askDEFRAministers or via our website: #Defra #Environment #Brexit  
Lidington rules out Corbyn's alternative Brexit dealon the basis that it was "decisively rejected by 323 votes to 240". This is after repeatedly telling the House to pass May's deal, which was rejected this week by 391 votes to 242. 
The Tories are in chaos & last night it should have been made abundantly obvious to everyone that they are only in it for themselves. The so-called 'party of business' was whipped by May to vote in the most anti-business way possible & back a no-deal Brexit. #BrexitMayhem 
Why do I keep reading the #NoDealBrexit vote wasn't legally binding? The referendum was only advisory and was "won" with a smaller majority and look where that got us! #ThursdayThoughts 
Remain Parliamentarians are speaking like Leavers don't exist and the Referendum never happened. 
I welcome Donald Trump's endorsement of Brexit. He's as popular in the UK as a bad case of hives. Something his British apologists have failed to grasp. 
It's incredible frankly. When Obama warned Britain of the consequences of Brexit  - Nigel Farage practically melted with indignation that a US President should meddle in our affairs. Now Farage has got Trump to make a lot of empty promises to try and swing Brexit for the lads. 
Offers Lidington deal. If govt will bring forward precise motion describing express votes for House on Brexit, they'll give in. "None of us prefer to grab the order paper. None of us prefer these elaborate devices." 
John Bercow has sparked  a row after refusing to select an amendment which would have ruled out a second referendumLive updates: 
Tottenham's Eric Dier told to 'stick to football' after tweeting support for #PeoplesVote on Brexit  
It's clear now that Brexit Parties must plan for long term to get Brexiteers into Councils, Assemblies & Parliament.The establishment parties will never deliver the Brexit we dreamed of & voted for.Let's begin at the local elections in May & EU elections (if held) in July. 
Huge US support for Brexit and for a large free trade deal with the UK. All the UK has to do is leave the EU, and respect the votes of 17.4 million Britons who voted to leave.  
Tired of #BrexitMayhem and endless #Brexit news?Well click the link below and enjoy the great Tony Benn in one of the finest political speeches I have ever heard.More wisdom, passion and inspiration in 10 minutes than most manage in a lifetime  
Scenes. The official campaign for a second EU referendum doesn't want MPs to vote for a second EU referendum today 
Silicon Valley Hypocrite:  McGlashan, charged with fraud.Every dollar is used most effectively, narrowing the gap, advancing progress toward economic inclusion. Said son was place kicker, bribed test proctor. #OperationVarsityBlues #Brexit  
THINGS YOU MIGHT HAVE MISSED BECAUSE OF BREXIT: In February the number of patients seen within 4 hours in A&E was the worst performance on record (84.2%) - following on from January 2019 which was the previous worst performance on record.  
I have written a mini-essay about how the state of the world – Brexit, Trump, Bolsonaro, social media vitriol, climate change, poverty – my god all of it – has genuinely begun to affect my mental health. I think a lot of people might be feeling this ->  
New - Phil Wilson tells me he is abstaining on People’s Vote amendment because of the timing. Big ref supporter. He is behind the yet-to-be-put Kyle-Wilson amendment which would approve the deal subject to a second referendum. Very significant that group backing Labour position. 
Everyone ** calm down **.Bercow's selected amendments don't matter, because these votes don't matter.We leave on the 29th March under EU law (A50(3) of Lisbon Treaty), as it stands, whatever the outcome of these votes.A50 extension requires unanimous EU approval.#Brexit 
The Brexit options according to Tory MP Dominic Grieve:a) We accept the prime minister’s dealb) We find another dealc) We find a mechanism for revoking Article 50 More: #newsnight | @Maitlis 
If the Brexit debacle grinds on for a thousand years, men will still say "This was its finest hour".  
My latest article @NeilClark66. Tory contempt for the Irish peace process is sowing dragon's teeth. #Ireland #BloodySunday #Brexit #GoodFridayAgreement 
Tuesday was about defeating a Brexit deal which will be disastrous for the UK; yesterday was about taking calamity of no deal off the table; today main task is to secure an extension to Article 50 to enable next steps, including #PeoplesVote to be democratically worked through 
A second referendum with Remain as an option would mean by definition that the first referendum has been cancelled. Your vote. Cancelled. 
"Could Britain ask the EU for an extension of some weeks or months? Could Britain cancel its withdrawal from the EU altogether? Is there time for a second referendum, or new elections?" @davidfrum describes the chaos that could follow a no-deal Brexit:  
What's doing immeasurable damage to Country & Democracy is forcing thru a #Brexit based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesDisenfranchisementForeign InterferenceRights Removed w/o ConsentThe Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the Ppl #RevokeArticle50#FinalSay 
Remember that time @BarackObama said something about Brexit and the brexiteers were all like "keep your bloody nose out of UK politics!"  
This isn't an attack. It's a statement of fact.IF Brexit happens I'll hold Corbyn responsible.He whipped to trigger article 50, so IF HE DOESN'T WHIP to stop it, it's on him.If he'd done the outreach I've done he wouldn't need to worry about Labour's Leave seats.#BrexitMayhem 
Totally agree with my friend the great @pollytoynbee “Labour must become the pro-European opposition the country needs to campaign in either a general election or a referendum.”  
You couldn't make this up. The second referendum campaign is against a vote in the House of Commons on a second referendum. They only like votes when they know they're going to go their way you see.  
“As it's been the Govt's longstanding policy to oppose a 2nd referendum, will the Chancellor of the Duchy confirm now at the Dispatch Box that the Govt will oppose the Amendment H and will whip its MPs accordingly?” Mark Francois#StandUp4Brexit 
No need for correction. I said Tuesday night he had not mentioned a second referendum in his key 25 minute speech opening the crucial Commons debate on the May deal. He didn’t. You’re welcome.  
Why can't we have someone like President Trump in charge of Brexit!!! Donald Trump wades into the Brexit crisis with an early-morning TRADE DEAL tweet  
Dear UKTHIS is what Remain looks like. Your leader (who you didn't vote in, and can't vote out) has spoken.He's giving us time to rethink our 'Brexit strategy' AND if we come up with the right strategy, he'll let us move off the naughty step.  
I'd like to thanks all the many MPs who signed a motion to rule out a second referendum. In doing so they have demonstrated just how frightened they are that Remain would win. 
If for any reason @theresa_may and the @cabinetofficeuk think that the easy option would be to Stop, Delay or Postpone #Brexit in any shape or form...... A WARNING from a #Tory #Member, #Activist and #Voter, we members within the @Conservatives if necessary will destroy YOU! 
What exactly is a two-month Brexit delay supposed to accomplish again? 
According to the likes of Jacob Rees-Mogg/ Mark Francois and Bernard Jenkin, #Brexit was about us taking back control, well Parliament is doing just that, the dictators in the ERG don't like it, life is suddenly getting better #BrexitMayhem #RevokeA50 
#Brexit delayed Brits' rejection of establishment parties as seen in EU and US, because Lab and Tories promised to carry out Brexit.With those promises proving increasingly hollow, big vacuum for new pro-Brexit parties like #SDP exist on left and right. 
Bercow refuses to pick even one pro-Brexit amendment - including a cross-party anti-second referendum amendment signed by 127 MPs from Labour, DUP, Independent and Conservatives.Bercow does the speaker's chair no favours.  
When you say “Endgame” are you referring to the new avengers film or post-Brexit Britain? 
Must say, I never dreamed the end of Theresa May's premiership & the drawn-out death of Tory Brexit would be this much fun 
Well it looks as though we have been well and truly let down by our MP's. A bunch of self serving sycophants. Remainers launch their bid to force a soft Brexit  
Trump's Tweet Today about a possible 'large scale Trade Deal with the United Kingdom' may seem innocent, but it was just a complete endorsement for BREXIT, also known as Putin's "dream come true".Don't be fooled. 
People's Vote campaign says it doesn't want a vote on a second referendum this afternoon. 'We do not think today is the right time to test the will of the House.' 
People's Vote campaigns comes out AGAINST second referendum amendment being voted on today. "We do not think today is the right time to test the will of the House on the case for a new public vote." 
We keep seeing this: Governments around the world are actively working to suppress information that would help protect their citizens and persistently ignore the will of the people who want #OpenBorders STOPPED! #Brexit, #BuildTheWall, etc., etc. 
New - Senior Labour source says they currently expect whip to abstain on second referendum. Things could change though. 
Brexit: MPs will hold formal vote TONIGHT on a second EU referendum  
Why does nobody in the media question the legitimacy of the referendum result? Leave has been found guilt for breaches of electoral law. Yet the result stands. This is the REAL insult to democracy. 
Remainers cannot be allowed to kill off Brexit in Parliament.Join the fight back on 29th March in Westminster 
David Lidington, 16 June 2015: "The legislation is about holding a vote. it makes no provision for what follows. The referendum is advisory."David Lidington, 14 March 2019: We agreed "we would treat [the referendum] as decisive".The duplicitousness is staggering #RevokeA50Now 
Catching up on #fmqs and watching @NicolaSturgeon  and @LabourRichard agreeing on #Brexit omnishambles. Just imagine what could be achieved if Labour stopped listening to its UK PLP and got behind independence & started working with The SNP towards a better Scotland  #Indyref2 
Just a thought... how much has Brexit cost and everything that surrounds it? Security, travel, staff, time?????? How many of our ex service people live on the streets and are homeless?What a time to be alive. 
The EU is not our enemy Scotland.We can have 27 partners to help us prosper whilst listening and acting to our voice. Westminster does not have our interests at heart they ignore our voice. Brexit has proven this. We can stay in the UK and wither or leave it and flourish.  
BREXIT: Let’s check in with the “will of the people / tyranny of parliament” crowd, shall we? See how they’re handling the latest Brexit developments?HINT: It’s not well.  
I think every Conservative MP should be tagged & on an 8am - midnight curfew until Brexit has been put to sleep.This is fun 
Bercow shows his hands in the #BrexitBetrayal undermining Britain's long history of democracy by allowing MPs to vote on the Second Referendum Amendment 
On reflection, the ERG should take @eucopresident’s long delay. The House will have to legislate to avoid No Deal in any case.That legislation will pass. You cannot #Brexit in chaos.If ERG want avoid revocation of Article 50, take a long delay as @DanielJHannan and I suggest. 
BREAKING: May, in new efforts to get Parl't to vote for her WA, has threatened to nuke Sunderland."My deal, or risk no Sunderland at all," she said. "We're honouring the referendum & delivering what the people voted for." 
We have had 3 leave supporting brexit ministers.  All brexiters decided not to stand for pm.  The erg failed to put forward a viable plan.  Brexiters have failed every step of the way because their Brexit fantasy is a lemon.  Own it! #RevokeArticle50#FBPE 
I have never applied for any political party before, never been that fussed as long as life went on, but due to this week and the complete shambles that is Mrs May's Brexit, I've finally applied to join the SDP. It feels good to have done something.#SDP #SDPUK 
Truly a sorry episode in British democracy- Benn/Cooper/Letwin want entirely unaccountable group of 25 MPs to seize executive powers- Bercow corrupting the office of Speaker to support partisan campaigns- All while MPs trying to force a banana republic-style second referendum 
Nicola Sturgeon: I will ‘exercise mandate’ to hold independence referendum  
How much Leavers have put up with since the referendum. Insulted constantly and accused of the worst character defects, and for what? Disagreeing? Voting? Feels like there's no reason or inclination to be civil now though, when there's nothing but incivility and deceit in return. 
So the Government is apparently considering cancelling Brexit all together and revoking article 50. This cannot be allowed to happen. The political apathy that exists in the country is already sky high. This will change to anger if their vote is completely ignored. 
Some positive change from our government amoungst the chaos of Brexit!  
Keep that #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit solution on the table & ensure a longer extension with the option to hold EU elections...I'm sure Jeremy will be seeking the Thwart both...Be warned if he does enable #Brexit #Remain will Thwart him & Labour next opportunity#RevokeA50 
Hands up who's sick of #Brexit   #BrexitMayhem #BrexitVote 
People’s Vote campaigners have screamed and screamed for months at Corbyn and Labour for not pushing for a vote on and backing another referendum. Now they’re saying we shouldn’t have a vote on it. They are honestly the most ridiculous bunch ever.  
Pretty significant announcement from David Lidington. Government will allow MPs to hold a series of indicative votes on Brexit options if the meaningful vote is not passed next week. Over to you, Tory Brexiteers ... 
It appears the Speaker of the HofC, is now running our Country & outcome of Brexit!This is the man whose wife's car displays a poster saying: "F*UCK BREXIT! Would this man still be Speaker if he was a Leaver? Our Gov't & MP's have become a disgrace!@BrexitKnight@gerardjasper 
This is the government's argument against delaying Brexit to find a deal more acceptable to MPs than the PM's deal. Such delay would do "real damage to the public's faith in politics and trust in our democracy" says @DLidington. Is he right? 
Theresa May is the "gravedigger" of the UK car industry.  Devastating report in main German news magazine of impact of #brexit.  Predicts job losses in sector of 50% in ten years. Says impact on German manufacturers "digestible".  
.Number 10’s message to ERG & DUP:Vote for current deal by next week and get Brexit agreed this month and enacted by June at latestORVote it down, and get indicative votes where Commons majority rules (ie Norway [Plus] perhaps referendum) a long extension, and EU elections 
We've been asked by lots of our readers to factcheck a viral post with a list of claims about the Lisbon Treaty, or "what will actually happen if we stay in the EU".Most of the claims are wrong. Read more:  #Brexit 
With new cynical manoeuvres every day, Remainers in Number 10 show why they can’t be trusted to deliver Brexit.  
...funnily enough four of the six MEPs that led on this motion are British. We featured them during another "crucial week in the #Brexit saga" in META last November. Thanks again to @GreenKeithMEP @SebDance @juliegirling and @catherinemep! 
One of countless reasons why we urgently need a General Election, @jeremycorbyn as Prime Minister & a @UKLabour Government.The UK has had enough of #Brexit MAYhem!Theresa May's CONservatives have done too much harm!#ThursdayThoughts #ThursdayMotivation 
Gina Miller asks people to politely hear Nigel Farage out on his march, but to ask him how he felt Brexit could ever have helped their communities... 
Our whole political system is rotten. There are no constraints on these people. Constitutional norms are being ripped up. It is simply staggering and a much bigger fight than Brexit now beckons.  
Can you imagine if this much debate, news coverage, protests, outrage by rich pundits and analysis went into George Osborne's austerity legislation in 2010? What a different Britain we'd have today-because without austerity remain would have won the referendum. #BrexitMayhem 
I will be voting today to extend Article 50 in order to provide time for a Public Vote on Brexit -and allow our country to change its mind. 
Cabinet Office Minister David Lidington has announced the Government would facilitate a series of indicative votes on alternative Brexit plans in April if a Brexit deal has not been agreed 
Lidington flagging up that we would have to fight Euro elections at end of May if Art 50 extended beyond then. Good! Bring them on! They will be the referendum on stopping Brexit which Mrs May is denying the people 
MPs at last are deposing Mrs May's brexit dictatorship and reinstating our sovereign Parliament. If brexit can only survive under a dictatorship then democracy demands it be put to death, now, before it does any more harm. 
Yuuuge honour to play wing woman to ⁦@WillieGeist⁩ today - and 3 hours with no Brexit. Phew!  
Bercow refusing the amendment on ruling out a second referendumThere's now a full political coup being carried out by Remainers 
Tusk foresees an extension in Brexit talks of at least a year: official  
The fact that may isn't sacking any of her government tells us that this was all planned by her to fraught Brexit. If the country isn't going to be the way WE want it then its only right WE take it back!! Just need ideas now. like a walkout of businesses or gridlocking London!! 
A sensible leader would have sought the opinions of the house at the start of the process not the end. Brexit has always transcended party politics and thus a consensus approach was undoubtedly key from before triggering Art. 50. 
MPs will vote on giving the British public a second Brexit referendum #FinalSay | #PeoplesVote  
John Bercow refuses to allow an anti second referendum amendment despite the fact that it has 127 signatures. This is just brazen contempt for Brexiteers and playing politics, something he is not meant to do. 
 via @GuidoFawkesMore on the traitorous Bercow .The amendments he has picked today are all anti Brexit ones.He is yet again showing his true colours.How Bercow is still speaker is remarkable. 
£ firm. Friend in FX markets says "Even GBP is bored with Brexit". 
Britain’s politicians are in revolt against the electorate. They are pursuing a coup against the public:  #Brexit 
.@DLidington says that if the PM's deal is voted down again next week, then @theresa_may would co-operate with Benn/Letwin/Cooper et al to establish a process to establish what kind of Brexit or no Brexit a majority of MPs could support. But he thinks British people would... 
"There might not be any Brexit at all" is a threat right up there with "Stop that or I'll give you a million pounds" 
John Bercow was absolutely right to reject the amendment to rule out a new referendum. It would be unconstitutional. It's aim would be to try to tie Parliament's hands.  And Parliamentary Sovereignty includes the fundamental principle that Parliament can't bind its successors. 
Just heard from Liddington in the House that the Tories will introduce legislation to prevent a no deal Brexit if no agreement is found.Boulton on Sky even suggested they could also vote to revoke article 50. It gets worse by the hour. 
Amendments to be voted on -1) Extension of Art 50.if not agreed then:2) Second referendumif not agreed, then:3) Scarlets-Ospreys-EU Merger 
Will we have a stint from filibustering meister Rees-Mogg so he can use floccinaucinihilipilification once again? 
Just leave this here.... Whether we have a Hard Brexit or Soft Brexit, Whether we exit on the 29th Mar, in June or in 2 years,Whether we have a PeoplesVote with or without Remain option,Tories will be for the few, Labour will always strive for the many#VoteLabour #JC4PM 
Tough talk aside, EU leaders want to avoid a no deal Brexit in their own economic + political interest. So longer-term extension or shorter (if PM can show she’s close to parliament approving her deal) EU leaders will probably say yes to an extension – if through gritted teeth /6 
Bercow is shaping up the House of Commons for another referendum to suit his own agenda and that of other remain MP’s. Democracy in the UK is officially dead.  
"Brexit? I'll get it under control sharpish but it'll cost you. £450,000 basic, Sammy Lee parachuted into a safe seat in Surrey and Kevin Davies named as Secretary of State for International Trade and you've got yourself a deal. Anyone fancy another bottle of plonk? I'm gasping."  
I'm sick of listening to Tory politicians telling us they can't let down the 17.4 million people who voted to leave the EU. We now know #Brexit, any form of #Brexit, will be a disaster for our country. Start acting in the interests of 65 million British people. #RevokeArticle50 
I was elected on promises to oppose a second referendum & for a deal which provides for easy trade, protects workers’ rights and ends EU freedom of movement. My opposition to no deal had always been clear. Yet legally we will still default to no deal if a deal isn’t backed.  
A long extension is NOT required. A workable Brexit deal that can command support of the House IS required.It's clear Theresa May & her Tory Govt are incapable of delivering thatTherefore we need a #GeneralElectionNow & a Labour Gov which DOES have a plan#BrexitMayhem 
Data does not matterTrade does not materGlobal Growth does not matterManipulation/Deception of a sitting US President does not matterChina does not matterDebt does not matterBrexit does not matterGeopolitical risk does not matterNOTHING MATTERS 
Speaker of HoC John Bercow has just allowed MPs a vote on holding another referendum, but decided not to allow a vote on ruling one out.  Utterly shameless bias.  Remainers taking control of Brexit....smell of betrayal is getting stronger by the hour... 
Just a reminder that the Tories had a parliamentary majority at the time of the Brexit vote.  Mays attempt to destroy the Labour Party by calling an early election has ultimately only resulted in the destruction of a Tory Brexit and her own premiership.Karma. 
Never forget that Margaret Beckett made clear that she opposed sacking Bercow as Speaker over his bullying because Brexit "trumps bad behaviour.” It is long past time to #SackBercow 
In which Duncan conveniently ignores that Mandy is not expressing a view on independence but on the absolute shitshow of Brexit negotiations that we are currently buffeted by...but perhaps Duncan thinks it is all going well.  
Yesterday I couldn’t get called to speak on “No Deal” despite having chaired a Commons committee inquiry into it. Today a motion signed by 127 MPs ruling out a 2nd referendum didn’t get selected. I’ve made my charge in the House; here is further evidence for the record.  
This is a big moment for Labour: the first opportunity it has to vote explicitly on a second referendum.  
The argument over the Brexiter amendment is so pitiful. If you want to stop a second referendum, just vote against the amendment proposing one. Fucking conspiracy theory bellends, really. 
It’s not the Kyle-Wilson plan, which I think is better and perhaps the only way to break the Brexit deadlock, but I will vote for @sarahwollaston’s cross-party amendment for a people’s vote. 
What efforts have been taken by parliament to investigate the PROVEN fraud illegality and foreign manipulation surrounding the referendum? Supporting something so flawed is deeply undemocratic.Notwithstanding that, why can’t people change their mind? #brexitshambles 
Have we got a second referendum?  
Gina Miller admitted she pushed for a meaningful vote to save the govt from themselves, because her main priority was to prevent a Corbyn led Labour government. If her meaningful vote leads to us backing a 2nd toxic referendum, she will have achieved her aim. 
Francois calls for government whipping against a second referendum - "including ministers" LOL 
.@DLidington slaps down @michaelgove for threatening direct rule on Northern Ireland if there is a no-deal Brexit - which some DUPers saw as a naked attempt to bully them in supporting the PM's Brexit deal. Humiliating for Gove 
One word of caution for the SNP as they rightly lead the charge against Brexit. Do not expect any quid pro quo from the English based parties. As soon as Brexit is avoided the SNP will be vile separatists again. 
Name and shame time: Angus Brendan MacNeilMr Kenneth ClarkeKeith VazJonathan EdwardsPete WishartDrew HendryThese MP’s just proposed an amendment to cancel Brexit by revoking Article 50 and it was signed by 30. They think democracy means nothing. Stop voting for them! 
David Cameron will almost certainly be reviled by history for setting Brexit in motion. But he may have unintentionally helped bolster the European project as no other country is likely to go down the path of exiting the EU any time soon after seeing what it did to the UK. 
Trump cheering the breakup of the EU. Congress should not approve a trade deal w Britain unless 1) Brexit fully protects the Irish peace process, and 2) the U.S. completes a trade deal w the EU first.  
....and lest we forget the madness they cling to, the madness spouted by that doyen of swivel-eyed economics, Patrick Minford.......'these things happen' 
This evening, Parliament will vote on extending Article 50 in order for a public vote to be held - taking the Brexit decision back to the people. We have until 5pm tonight to mobilise and persuade MPs to support it. Retweet, tag, quote retweet - let's spread the word   
5 surprises in the Spring Statement 2019 small print that got buried by Brexit including a transition cash pot for Universal Credit families has been 'reduced' & Business investment at its worst level since the financial crash  
Any pro Brexit party at any GE in the future will already have a clear mandate to leave, and wouldn't need a referendum to do so.If we don't get Brexit now, we'll get it whenever the GE is. 
Brexit is really pissing me off now 
Can I urge everyone to email, text & tweet their MP of whatever persuasion, to encourage support for amendment (h) on the Withdrawal from the EU vote this evening so that the country can return to sanity and finally put this Brexit nonsense behind us.  
We need a General Election.The Brexit party to lead with one manifesto commitment - to leave the EU on WTO terms immediately.They'd wipe the floor with Corbyn and May.The nation can then get what it voted for. 
They are Our Allies???? UTTER RUBBISH they are Our ENEMIES! The way the #EU treats #Britain is a disgrace, let's save £39bn and #GoWTO to save #Brexit!  @CCHQPress @Conservatives @ConHome @TheConWom @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns @BrexitStewart #BrexitParty 
What is the point in voting for a second referendum if the plan on what happens if the country votes to leave again isn’t established!! 
“I didn't think it was possible to make the U.S. Congress look extraordinarily functional,” Former US Treasury Secretary @LHSummers tells me.“The House of Commons in its handling of Brexit makes the U.S. Congress look extraordinarily efficient and effective.”  
John Bercow still defending his choice of amendments - lots of disquiet over not selecting one ruling out a referendum. Says he can justify his choices 'to the world'  
Brexiteers so terrified of a second referendum they don't want the suggestion even debated. 
The last 48 hours have proven Labour's strategy on Brexit over the last 2 years completely right.1) A 'No Deal' is being progressively closed off.2) ERG have been nullified.3) May's deal is almost certain to fail.You won’t see that on BBC or in papers, but there we are. 
Here is amendment I: It is the cross party move to wrestle control of Brexit from the govt.  
That amendment was also the only one which reaffirmed the choice made by the British people in the 2016 referendum. 
Moment of truth for the Labour leadership on a second referendum... 
The anti-Second Referendum amendment had more signatures than all of the amendments Bercow selected put together. #Bercoup. 
Watch the result of the vote this evening on Amendment H. If it passes then it shows the will of the HoC for a referendum on whether to accept TM the PMs deal or to remain in the EU.  It'll be the most important vote of the day, the rest is time wasting in my opinion. 
part of Rob Delaney's "a version of Brexit has already happened" view is why no deal horror stories fail to land. Lower wages, costlier goods, shrinking state? People are already living it!  
Speaker selects #PeoplesVote Amendment H from @sarahwollaston @TheIndGroup to be voted on at 5pm today. Finally we get this on the agenda - despite the efforts of the main party leaders to prevent it. We’ll fight and keep fighting for this way through #Brexit mess.  
The EU's #Brexit panto, written by those theatrical wizards Emmanuel Macron and Angela Merkel (with choreography by Michel Barnier, Tony Blair and Theresa May) is being delivered flawlessly by the motley crew of actors in the Commons. 
I would argue that Labour aren’t being played for fools by Corbyn, they’re being played for the toothless wimps they are. For 4 years they’ve let this far left extremist & his bullies take over, assist Brexit & create an institutionally AS party. And you wimps have let him  
If Labour doesn’t whip in favour of the second referendum amendment there are going to be fireworks.See my piece from yesterday for more: 
WATCH | Scandalous! Mark Francois expresses his "disappointment" in the Speaker refusing to select an amendment to tonight's motion categorically ruling out a second referendum. It had cross-party support from 127 MPs!A Remain-filled Parliament run by a bent ref! #DrainTheSwamp 
Bercow getting the usual backlash from Tory MPs over his amendment selection for tonight's vote. Their arguments can be summed up "why aren't you helping us run a dictatorship?"Here are the amendments in question. #Brexit #BrexitMayhem 
It is hard to understand why Bercow did not chose the amendment ruling out a 2nd referendum. Huge number of signatories and cross party. Strange. And now Bercow finds himself the centre of attention - which he must be furious about. 
BREAKING: Speaker Bercow refuses to pick anti-second referendum amendment.  
That's the better argument (even if it isn't a point of order). By virtue of voting against a second referendum, the House is doing what the Brexiter amendment would have done. 
Amendments selected for debate include one tabled by The Independent Group's Sarah Wollaston which calls for a delay to Brexit in order to hold a second referendum 
Now Ann Main having a go. Insisting it shouldn't be voted on because it hasn't been costed. Bizarre and tedious. Now Caroline Flint up. She says she is "delighted" there will be a vote on a second referendum. 
Riots in Parliament won't beat what's coming from the people if they cancel #Brexit!#BREXITBETRAYAL #BrexitMayhem 
Brexit Britain  
First of all, there will now, finally, be a vote on a second referendum. Amendment H will be voted on first. It reads like this.  
Instead of selecting the widely supported anti-Second Referendum amendment signed by the likes of Caroline Flint and Gareth Snell, Bercow has chosen to pick amendments with far less support that call for:minority of MPs to seize control of the Legislative agenda, ruling out MV3. 
Riot coming - Bercow allowing MPs a vote on holding another referendum, doesn’t choose to allow a vote on ruling one out 
@DamianGreen Appalled to hear you calling @snb19692 a 'wanker'.I understand that you are an *expert* in this area, but nevertheless, it is unacceptable.Official complaint made. I am a pensioner. I disapprove of language like this #brexit #sodem 
Of course he hasn't selected it, it would rule out the one thing he and his chums want to happen. This is the consequence of a Remain parliament and Speaker with a 'bollocks to Brexit' sticker on his car. That sticker shows his contempt for our vote and for 17.4 m Brexit voters.  
Brexit AND deal with Trump? England just can't catch a break.  
JUST IN: UK parliament speaker selects amendment calling for second referendum on #Brexit  
This means that the amendment which attempted to kill the second referendum has not been selected. 
MPs will vote on giving British public a second Brexit referendum  
Bercow refuses to call an anti-Second Referendum amendment that had been signed by 127 MPs: 13 Labour MPs + Entire DUP +1  Ind + shedloads of Tories.naked partisanship. 
AMENDMENTS SELECTED: I, E, J and H.Amendment B, the Brexiter amendment, "this house believes a second referendum should not take place" has not been selected. Once again, they're furious with the speaker. 
John Bercow selects Wollaston, Benn, Corbyn, Bryant amendments. Key ones are the Benn (which is the Cooper amendment) and Bryant to block meaningful vote MKIII. Speaker DOES NOT select amendment to block second referendum. 
Bercow has not selected amendment B on ruling out second referendum...But has selected Benn (indicative votes). Wollaston, Corbyn & Bryant Mark Francois furious... 
BREAKING: Bercow Refuses to Select Cross-Party Second Referendum Amendment Signed by 127 MPs  
The Speaker has selected amendments to today's motion on Article 50 extension but NOT the one tabled by more than 100 MPs seeking to rule out a second referendum. Mark Francois is currently raising a point of order to complain about the decision. 
NEW: Speaker selects amendments: Hilary Benn's alternative way forward, Sarah Wollaston's pro-second referendum, Jeremy Corbyn's Labour frontbench one and Chris Bryant's which would block third meaningful vote. But NOT anti-second ref one  
Speaker selects amendments - including the second referendum amendment, the indicative votes amendment and Labour’s amendment.NOT the one rejecting a second referendum- Mark Francois apoplectic 
There are plenty of bad takes over Brexit, but the great Piers Morgan has set a very high bar for the worst.  
John Bercow selects amendments for today’s vote:(h)  Sarah Wollaston - extend A50 to hold second referendum(i) Benn - indicative votes on Brexit options(e)  Corbyn - reject May’s deal and extend A50(j) Bryant - no more votes on May’s deal 
Bercow has refused select ERG's amendment to rule out a second referendum, despite having 127 signatures. Here comes a riot. 
Green Party leader Caroline Lucas MP: "Theresa May is shameless, out of control and she needs to put her deal to the People." Would you accept a second referendum if the options were Theresa May's deal or No Deal?@Iromg | @CarolineLucas | @TheGreenParty 
One of the best examples of the phenomenon known as 'active information avoidance' is people still saying, this morning, that they don't know what Labour is proposing on Brexit. 
President Trump has since 2016 urged the UK into a no-deal Brexit with a view to wrecking the European Union and forcing an isolated, vulnerable UK to accede to US trade demands. He has hit the UK with steel tariffs. Trump may be @piersmorgan 's friend, but he's not Britain's 
Hearing from Tory MP strategy is to vote down a 2nd #referendum today, but get a 3rd meaningful vote next week which he thinks will now pass due to panic amongst #Brexiteers and #DUP. So the people not allowed a second vote, but MPs to get three (or more) #indyref2 #PeoplesVote 
FM: "I do respect the outcome of the 2016 referendum - Scotland voted to remain in the EU. That's the best outcome for Scotland. If the Tories could ever find it within themselves to stand up for Scotland, they would recognise it's the best future for Scotland." #FMQs 
How To Be A Writer:Stop piracySmash the patriarchyStop BrexitOpen doorway into luminous alternative dimension of friendship, magic and adventureRemind self of fundamental difference between fiction and real lifeTea 
The blunt truth is that the First Minister will only accept the result of a referendum – any referendum – if it goes her way. Isn’t it time to respect the result, back an orderly Brexit, so this country stands a chance of moving on, together? #FMQs 
12 Scottish Tories refused to stand up for Scotland and instead put their party before the national interest.There are no excuses for Tories voting for a disastrous No deal Brexit that would catastrophically damage Scotland's economy.#FMQs 
FM quite rightly tells FMQs ..”I genuinely can’t believe Jackson Carlaw wants to talk about a twitter hashtag”- Tories doing anything to avoid defending their Brexit mess #fmqs 
Well, that's nonsense as usual from Mr LammyMr Farage was democratically elected, therefore he is speaking on behalf of his constituents.Mr Farage's view on the EU were confirmed by the national referendum. You could argue he has been given a mandate from 17.4 million people 
This is a coup by Remain MPs breaking all their Brexit promises and attempting to take back control from the voters.  
All very well if you like dancing and being positive etc. It does very little to address the #Brexit problem.  
Nicola Sturgeon says it was “utterly shameful” that Scottish Tory MPs refused to vote against a no-deal Brexit last night #FMQs 
Don’t speak for me please. Well over half the country DIDN’T vote to leave, and nearly half the country actively voted to stay. Don’t act like it’s something universally wanted. Brexit looks more impossible and disastrous with every passing day. 
Recently I found this topical message in a bottle written by Kayomi, washed up in debris on the Thames Estuary. Opening line :-"Hi there! Writing to you from 2017 when Brexit is still a mystery to most...."#messageinabottle #Brexit  
A few thoughts as we enter another day of #Brexit chaos in Westminster.  
.@TheBMA has told the PM there is no bigger threat to the nation’s health than #Brexit. Pretty damning stuff.Let’s hope she takes her hands away from her ears & listens to the experts for once.Time to give people a #FinalSay on a decision that will define our country's future. 
James O'Brien explained the current state of Brexit using the analogy of buying a toaster - and listeners loved it.@mrjamesob | #BrexitMayhem 
The #RevokeArticle50 ammendedment to end #Brexit in an afternoon, is down again today with more names (from Labour) - as well as same half the SNP MPs plus Ken Clarke from Tories.  
The laughing stops - #NoDeal is the only way to put an end to the humiliation and deliver #Brexit - let's get on with it! @BrexitE billboard at Birmingham Haden Circus @birmingham_live #Birmingham @LeaveMnsLeave @StandUp4Brexit 
‘Total DISGRACE’ - Nigel Farage gears up to SAVE #Brexit as he brands Parliament ‘LIARS’  
I fear Parliament will now find a way of stopping Brexit, writes @DavidDavisMP 
This is what the E U don’t like. ........Donald Trump vows to cut bumper Brexit trade deal with UK saying 'the potential is unlimited'  
*british person voice* actually it’s good that baby died. Actually it’s good our soldiers murdered a bunch of civilians. Actually hunting your own food after a no-deal Brexit will be good. Actually it’s good that basic services are privatised. 
Brexit is 15 days away. #brexit 
As I understand it, MPs shouldn't be asked to vote again on an unchanged proposition. Contrast this with Brexit where the sunny uplands have turned into scrublands devoid of medicine and fresh food. Ample reason to vote on the actual deal. #PeoplesVote 
No matter what happens we MUST leave the EU on the 29th of March, no ifs no buts! #brexit #BrexitVotes #BrexitBetrayal Sign here now:  
Brexit Chaos update:process of updating statute book to be Brexit- compliant getting tangled up in general delay/meltdown - eg this already passed Statutory Instrument on Emissions Trading specified today as day companies had to trade in allowances.Now date has to be amended  
British Fascist got Trump to help win Brexit  vote | The Independent  
We really value the role that nurses and midwives from the EU play here in Wales. Here I explain more about the settled status scheme and how to apply #Brexit #PreparingWales 
Speaker John Bercow set to rule on blocking Theresa May's Brexit deal being voted on third time  
It’s getting worse for May. Cooper, Benn and Letwin are tabling an Amendment which will allow MPs to take control of Brexit and Chris Bryant has done the same, with the purpose of taking a 3rd meaningful vote off the table. 
I know this is not US news but this is Globalism defeating the vote of the people right before our eyes. It would be naive to think Democrats in this country are not taking notes given the Special Council appears to have fallen flat. #BRExit  
Now the options we are faced with is Theresa May’s deal or no Brexit. 
Proud to be supporting this. We had the referendum. Voting against this would be anti democratic  
Amendment NOT to have a second referendum has now got over 100 signatures - Tories, Labour, DUP.Surely speaker would have to select? And the PM would presumably vote for it Labour would have a job whipping that one  
Also watch for Amendment B which demands that a second referendum be rejected. Big cross-party support here too. 127 backers made up of Brexiteer Conservatives, all of the DUP and a number of Labour MPs. Surely speaker has to call it?  
So the sabotage of the Democratic Will of the People by the Establishment & the Remainers is nearly complete. One more heave & what Gina Miller started by getting a Remain Parl’t to have the last say on Brexit, will be over. Brexit delayed is Brexit denied. Now they know we will 
Genuine, (if evergreen), question. Can someone explain what Labour's Brexit position is now.  
Since becoming Prime Minister, Theresa May has:-Lost the Tory majority -Lost 35 ministers-Lost 39 House of Commons votes-Lost 2 Brexit Deal votes-Lost authority of her party-Lost control of parliament-Totally destroyed the UK-But she has not lost her job.... 
How can Leave supporters trust that these people in Number 10 would negotiate a future relationship that's faithful to the referendum result? 
Lots of messages saying No Deal (already voted down) or a General Election. That risks a Corbyn Government led by remain Labour MPs which will mean No #Brexit, not ever. 
Quote of the day“To the day I die, I shall curse myself for ever thinking a referendum was a good idea. I'm an idiot. I'm happy to admit to your listeners, I'm an idiot."Charles Walker, Conservative MP, speaking to the BBC World Service's Newshour 
PLEASE RETWEET and SHARE to all my followers the @Conservatives under the pathetic leadership of @theresa_may have now betrayed YOUR #BREXIT.... Please support and add the following #website to your #Twitter Profile as your website link! SPREAD the WORD!  
At 70 yrs old I have now decided that by the time the shambles is sorted out I'll be dead. So sod it, I don't care anymore. #Brexit has been sabotaged by a bunch of self obsessed MPs who have lost democracy and stained the reputation of the mother of Parliaments. 
WATCH | "May's deal is not Brexit, and anybody who votes for it will be voting to stay in the EU" - John Longworth telling it like it is. No Deal? No problem. Let's go WTO on March 29 and deliver what 17.4m people voted for!Support us at  
key point in below: I dont see a way that relations between post-Brexit UK & EU can avoid freezing into acrimony. Post-Brexit UK can only clamber over EU trade barriers by undercutting EU on taxes, standards, etc. That will spark EU trade retaliation against UK  
 Vice-President of European Parliament, @MaireadMcGMEP tells @skynews a #Brexit extension isn’t a given:“I was surprised in the lifts & coffee bars: people asking ‘how long can this go on?’ How long can we live in uncertain times which are bad for morale, confidence, business”  
Northern Irish farmers fear Brexit  
Farage unveils PLOT to secure Brexit on March 29 – 'you have encouraged me'  
Throwback to Feb 25th when Jeremy Corbyn & his Brexit team went to Europe & made more progress than Theresa May could ever hope to achieve in 3 yrs.Instead of asking 'what would Labour do?' Our media should be reporting what Labour CAN do.#TheRealPM 
Brexit is not a god. Parliament must thwart Brexit if it is not in Britain's interestsThere was no *will of the people* but if there was, it was annulled by illegality.Parliament was NOT given an instruction by the people. You lied when you addressed the House on the EUNoW bill  
Munya will be marching on Saturday 23rd because he's worried about the harm #Brexit is causing to society. Join him to demand they #PutItToThePeople:  
Timetable:TODAY: Vote on MotionWED: If MV3 fails, debate begins on brexit alternativesFOLLOWING WEEK: Indicative votes 
If the PM can vote remain in 2016, then vote for no deal brexit yesterday.. then bring back the same deal to parliament hoping MPs change their minds.. does this not suggest the public can change their minds?! This is simple logic David Davis.  
Cross-party group submits motion to take parliamentary control of Brexit  
If only Trump could read or understand basic facts.The UK just passed a 'No deal' Brexit 'under any circumstances' vote, which could delay the process for years.UK trade with the EU is over £600Bn, which is almost three times the USA, so we'll take things in order, thanks...  
What the hell just happened in Britain? Humiliated Theresa May is on the brink, but she’s trying one final Brexit gamble.   
Is the British party system obsolete in the age of Brexit? My final post from UK/Ireland argues yes. Latest in @TheAtlantic 
Please, try to understand, most of us want to #RemainInTheEU. We don't want a #Brexit strategy. We will never have a consensus on economic suicide.Mr Tusk's junior staff, are you showing Mr Tusk these replies, or is he only hearing from May? 
Amendment of the day comes from Tory MP/bill-blocker Christopher Chope, who suggests sacking the entire UK Brexit negotiating team, replacing them, and sorting out an entirely new deal from scratch, all *in two months*.Optimistic. As shown by the fact he's the only signatory.  
not tanks but #thinktanks like ERG enable the march of vile fascism and destructive nationalism across our democracies. Time to see #Brexit for what it really is and to be very afraid of the consequences if we do not #RevokeArticle50Now 
Czech Prime Minister: "I told her [Theresa May] the best solution would be for Great Britain to stay in the European Union. Therefore I am convinced it is worth calling a new referendum." 
This is shocking - our NHS being sold off under the cover of Brexit   
Live: Debate on extending Brexit negotiating period in UK parliament #Brexit2019 
Occasional reminder for the fucking thick or fucking dishonest:Caring about Brexit *is* caring about poverty, public services, welfare, and more. A no-deal economic crisis would devastate the all of them just as it piled thousands if not millions into poverty. 
My WhatsApp groups, mainly sane sober Irish people, are alive with incredulous rage at the #BloodySunday decision. Combine with the evil clownage of brexit, it's turning us all to raving republicans. 
There is now a real risk Parliament will thwart Brexit. MPs must endorse a way forward that delivers on the will of the British people.  
It's time to leave with No Deal and connect with old allies. RT if you think it's time for a World Trade Brexit!  
NEW: Tories Nicholas Soames, Nick Boles, Antoinette Sandbach, Dominic Grieve, Dame Caroline Spelman, Jonathan Djagongly and Sir Oliver Letwin put their names on a motion to take brexit out of May’s control on Wednesday, after likely MV3 failure Tuesday  
TRUMP: Looking forward to ‘large scale’ trade deal with Brexit Britain. “The potential is unlimited!” 
 Tories about independence: We said no and we meant it. Tories about Brexit:MV1: Westminster didn't mean itMV2: Westminster didn't mean itMV3: Westminster... 
A PM must govern for the nation in times of national crisis. Mrs. May governs - or now is chief convenor having lost control - solely for her tribe. Instead there must be indicative votes on what Brexit MPs from all parties can agree. Then a confirmatory referendum +A50 extension 
This is one of the dumbest pro-Brexit arguments. "People don't read treaties".If someone isn't willing/able to read and/or understand the Brexit treaty, then they clearly didn't do so with the Two EU treaties and all of the associated legislation when they voted Out.  
G. Brown has called for a 1 yr delay to Art 50 for a second referendum on #brexit because thus far it has not been what was promised to either side. Anyone out there see the blatant hypocrisy here? namely simultaneously advocating no #indyref2 after we didn't get what HE PROMISED 
In lobby briefing: No10 refused to call PM’s motion tonight a Government one - it can’t, because May too weak to whip it. The startling conclusion is therefore the Govt doesn’t currently have any collective policy on Brexit, at all. 
NEW: @RhonddaBryant amendment to block Theresa May from a third vote on her Brexit deal, and get Britain off the "merry go round".  
More names of backers of Benn- Letwin-Cooper. Justine Greening and Philip Lee on there and list growing. Cross-party #Brexit alliance is on steroids today...  
We already have one through the EU.Brexit, much like you, is a rudderless disaster favored by halfwits and racists. 
“It’s time for some plain speaking: the political class is in revolt against the people. MPs are engaged in a coup against their own voters. Their slow-motion assassination of Brexit is a fatal assault on democracy itself.”Brendan O’Neill in @spectator 
Remember #Brexit can be ended in an afternoon by #RevokeArticle50 and sending one letter to the EU to reverse the PMs letter of March 2017 ... But there are only 15 days to do this. 
Gang of four Cabinet ministers told to RESIGN after defying May on Brexit vote  
#Brexit: @Europarl_EN adopted @EU_Commission proposal to protect #ErasmusPlus participants' rights in a no-deal scenario. Individual participants abroad at the time of a potential no-deal can complete exchanges as planned. @EUCouncil adoption to follow.  
#IsItOK that Brexit changed from four words (Leave the European Union) to a 585-page treaty, and yet they keep saying we all knew what we were voting for? 
Under different circumstances, I could back a socialist Brexit. But let’s be real: the social base for Lexit is “people who felt really strongly about the Eurozone crisis”, and most of them voted Remain anyway.  
That feeling when you thought you knew what was happening with Brexit and then something new happens...Send us in your #IsItOk tweets now!#TheLastLeg 
For those brexiters that think a fraudulent referendum didn't influence their voting choice I suggest you look at the brand of washing power you habitually buy, what brand of shoes have you stuck with, what type of car...?To deny the effect of marketing / sales is ridiculous. 
Hey @theresa_may .. you complain about us Scots about wanting a 2nd vote  within five years when you are wanting 3 brexit votes in a month..  Hypocrit. 
Bothered by Brexit? We're at the University of Sussex and want to hear what you think. Come sign our #battlebus near the refectory! 
#BBC doesn’t approve of umbrellas or hats but maybe given the way #brexit has changed the rules of politics perhaps the atrocious weather outside Parliament could change the rules on broadcasters vs weather!  It’s chucking it down  
Scotland what you are witnessing here is a Tory party actively using a programme of misinformation to deflect from their real & destructive #Brexit mess. @ScotTories are FULLY supporting the worst case #Brexit scenario for Scotland - a no deal!! Why? 
Problems facing Kenyans:- High cost of living- Unemployment- Hunger in 23 counties(due to drought)- Huge public debt- Poor leadershipGovt efforts to find solutions:- Taking loans, stealing & increasing taxes- Huduma Number- Referendum- Handshake- Legacy agendaSigh 
 via @GuidoFawkes61% of Conservative members think the Appeaser should resign.Pretty sure after last nights debacle that figure is now higher.Will Tory MP’s take any notice.??Unlikely as they take no notice of their voters on Brexit do they !!! 
Everytime they tell us another public vote would be undemocratic, but then have yet another vote in Parliament, my bullshit-o-meter starts ringing like Mark Francois' dinner bell. Any MP who says another referendum would be anti democratic is a complete fucking crook 
V cool seeing OFOC in the @NewYorker this morning. I spoke to Sam about why so many young people are furious about Brexit - have a read!  
England & Tottenham footballer @ericdier has come out for a #PeoplesVote today.It’s not reasonable – or fair - to force the Gov's Brexit deal on us without putting it to the people. March with us to demand a #PeoplesVote on 23.03.19:  
Yes, this is a massive rocket outside the Scottish Parliament (the Black Arrow) and it's all Christine Grahame MSP and @Skyrora_Ltd's doing! MSPs will debate the future of Scotland's space industry today. A welcome break from #Brexit  
WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING:** U.S. Stocks on Thursday set to open flat, GE slumps (down 24 points as of 7:15am)** Asia markets mixed after China's industrial output growth slumps to 17-year low** European markets rally amid Brexit confusion; Lufthansa shares fall 6%  
TV doesn't do self-criticism but after Brexit it cannot escape its failures. Spot on from @johnharris1969 
NEW: @johnmcdonnellMP tells me Labour will not be backing amendment for second referendum tonight, but could do next week. Also still undecided on whether to back Benn/Cooper/Letwin amendment in indicative votes, which lots of Labour backbenchers are supporting. 
"I am suspicious they are trying to overturn the vote."With Theresa May's Brexit deal in meltdown, campaigners for Leave and Remain around Westminster are p**sed off with politics.  
While working in the USA market, I helped prospect/create/safeguard 000s of UK jobs through inward investment. EU membership/access was part of the govt-inspired UK sales message. Brexit just made me and all UK inward investment colleagues liars. If I was my clients I'd sue. 
Oh **UK! What next for Brexit?  
European, UK shares rally after UK parliament votes down no-deal Brexit  
Simon Coveney, Ireland's foreign minister, said this morning the EU is likely to offer a 21-month delay to Brexit...don't say the ERG diehards weren't warned... 
I'm loving James O'Brien's analogy of empty toaster boxes and #Brexit. Priceless radio as usual. @mrjamesob @LBC 
If Remainers get their way regarding Brexit:- "we now need a proper Constitution"- "reform the electoral system as FPTP is not fit"- "more £ for areas of the country left behind"If Brexiters get their way:- "ha ha we won you lost"Who's got UK's best interests at heart? 
No more negotiations if Brexit delayed: EU lawmaker Hubner  
#Brexit  Just hold on together ! @TreasuryMog @HMCabinetCat @DiploMog @Number10cat  
Government have announced that the debate on treatments for rare diseases which should have taken place today but was rescheduled because of Brexit debates, will now take place next Thursday. @cftrust @PKUFamily 
A 21 month extension of Article 50 on Brexit is a second referendum with the worst camouflage ever.  
3. Lots of 'ifs' here, but it means even if MP s vote tonight for delay to end of June, Brexit still could actually happen before then-partly cos altho there is lots of new law govt might like to get thro before departure, it's only Withdrawal bill that absolutley HAS to be 
May won't. The only way forward is the Labour Brexit deal.  The EU will accept it.  The House would vote it through.  Only the Tories refuse it, because it would tie us to certain EU Directives, and, key to May's obsession with immigrants, will include some form of Freedom of Mvt 
Parliament had to revoke A50 and urgent Brexit Inquiry (together with Leveson 2)  
I still haven't heard what the alternative to Brexit is supposed to be - more Austerity, more corruption, more homelessness and corporate homicide? - Is that what Remain is offering us? 
Donald Tusk confirming today that he will be appealing to the EU27 to consider accepting or granting the UK a long extension IF the UK finds “it necessary to rethink its Brexit strategy and build consensus around it”. The EU has literally bent over backwards to help the UK. 
I have yet to see anyone explain what a General Election would achieve in regards to Brexit. Someone, come on? A plausible scenario of what it would do? Or even what it would be about? Asking for a few million friends..... 
Theresa May says a second referendum is bad as it’s telling people they got it wrong and to vote again. Yet she happily keeps putting her deal to a vote again and again despite historic losses 
An old rule means Bercow could take drastic action on #Brexit and prevent another vote on May‘s deal  
Please shout louder !! We Must enshrine the death of 'nondeal' in law and #RevokeA50 and then investigate #Brexit 
Dunno who is author but s/he just solve #brexit once and for all   
I can tell you why UK prosecutors decided to prosecute 1 soldier for  #BloodySunday : it's done to distract attention from Theresa May's treachery over #Brexit  This is all about political games to shield May as the prostituting press will pick this up. A national disgrace. 
We could call it Brexit Fools Day. 
#Brexit is itself the catastrophe. In chess terms #EURef put UK in "Zugzwang"--obliged to make a move when all moves lose. Instead of admitting the blunder & resigning the "Brexit Game", UK Gov first claimed it had a winning position & then switched to blaming others  for fiasco. 
They want to kick Brexit into the long grass.They hope they can chip away at our morale and extract concessions from our hard-pressed taxpayers in the process.It mustn't happen, we need to be out of this sorry little protectionist racket as soon as possible!  
if they vote not to delay brexit today, i will disintegrate 
Among #AP10ThingstoKnow: Democrat Beto O'Rourke announces 2020 White House bid; French investigators to analyze Ethiopian Airlines' black boxes; UK lawmakers set for another big Brexit vote.  
#Brexit: MPs to vote on delaying leaving the #EU  
NEW: Hilary Benn / Yvette Cooper / Oliver Letwin amendment allowing MPs to take back control of Brexit  
It was a pleasure to talk with you - albeit about a distinctly unpleasant topic: The superfluous, stupid and disastrously disorganised #Brexit. You are the ones who will suffer most from this mess - we @fdp promise to do everything we can to help @the3million 
Theresa May: You can’t have another vote on Brexit. So stop asking. Also Theresa May: Hey I changed a few words can you please vote on my stuff again so we can dive into the abyss 
Very pleased to be a signature to this amendment today to take a 2nd Referendum off the table  
Thought I’d repost this because it’s not been well-understood by some members of the Shadow Cabinet and a ‘spokesperson’. The vast majority of our members and *voters* will not forgive Labour if we betray them on Brexit.  
EU Council President Donald Tusk to appeal to EU countries to be open to "long extension" to #Brexit negotiations if UK decides to rethink strategy Latest developments:  
England Your EnglandNigel Farage is lobbying EU governments to veto any British government request to extend A50 so as to force a No Deal Brexit on March 29. I repeat, this is an unelected politician in Britain lobbying foreign governments to oppose Britain's parliament. 
If Brexit is getting delayed can we also delay killing Inbox please?  
Liz Truss is one of the MPs I think should be jailed for lying. As Lord Chancellor she lied that Article 50 couldn't be reversed. She was also one of a bunch of Tories including Patel and Raab calling for Asian style low taxes and working practices. 
New video from AMW: #Brexit - Are we going to let them get away with this?   
Labour's @AngelaRayner went on @Peston to say a second referendum would be “disastrous”, she's right.It would tell millions that they are an irrelevance, that the political class does not and will not listen to them, that they needn't have bothered.  
Some might say #RevokeArticle50NowI'd rather  revoke this Tory Govt and have a #GeneralElectionNowBrexit is a distraction from the real source of poverty, deprivation, homelessness & the reason why our precious public services are disappearing before our eyes#GTTO #JC4PM 
It was Blair and his New Labour who first realised the British people bought the myth of British #democracy to such an extent that their rulers could get away with anything. Since then consecutive governments did whatever the hell they wanted and now May is canceling #Brexit 
why stop there? with our vast new cache of trackable GPS-enabled knives, we could set up a "Knife Uber" in case you ever need to cut something but only have blunt objects to hand. it could pump millions into the post-Brexit economy  
111 MPs are calling for parliament to rule out a Losers' Vote and respect the result of the 2016 referendum - the largest democratic exercise in the history of our country  We voted Leave, so let's leave!Support us at  
What an embarrassment, a Belgian has sussed out #TreasonWeasel Farage, but at home, broadcasters and MILLIONS of deluded voters think he their saviour and not the cause of the situation they find themselves in….hating others that enrich our country. 
This betrayal of Brexit can still be stopped - Nigel Farage (£Free)Personally, I think we’re entering retribution territory.#BrexitBetrayal 
Another Brexit Deal is possible.Another Britain in possible.#GeneralElectionNow #JC4PM 
Angela Rayner, another 'socialist' collaborating with the hard-right in 'respecting' a referendum won by right-wing hate lies and crime, while denying the people a vote on something they could not have possibly known in 2016. 
The problem with the idea of a Brexit Rethink is that implies there was ever a Think. 
2/This was immediately countered with “where’s your evidence”. Now, given we were on the show to debate Brexit- as you can imagine, it was highly unlikely that I carry a folder of evidence around with me on a daily basis, on the off-chance the topic may come up in conversation... 
For the record, inward investment over the last 5 years before the referendum was £400bn from EU27 companies, £300bn from USA (and they hate to sue... right?) And a further £300bn from Japan and RoW.Ball park figures from DiT inward investment report. 
..... Or, let the people decide. Britain is much better informed place now, majority have seen through and wised up to "Leave Lies". #Brexit  
The @CommonsLeader announces next week’s business, this is either fantasy business or what can only be described as SI filler.  The Government need to provide parliamentary time for the House of Commons to find a majority for a different approach on Brexit, not waste time.  
Disgusting from @AngelaRayner - an insult to the British people and democracy. She prefers to stick with the result of a referendum corrupted by right-wing crime and lies, and denies the people a vote on something they could not have possibly known in 2016. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
This Brexit mess won't be resolved in a matter of weeks. We need the time for a public debate and a #PeoplesVote 
BREAKING: Benn/Boles/Cooper/Letwin amendment would allow MPs to take control of the business of the House, a bit like similar amendments attempted to in the past. Would give MPs chance to find their own solution to Brexit. Very significant.  
I've also put my name to this amendment this morning, asking Parliament to outright reject any prospect of a #secondreferendum on #Brexit. We asked the question already in 2016, we must deliver on the answer!!  
For anybody thinking that Salvini may ride in and veto an Article 50 extension to save Brexit: the only thing he's worried about is Sunday's Milan derby.  
Hmmm...interesting pre emptive strike by Brexiteers today with amendment to rule out another referendum. 
Theresa May "now lacks the authority to sack" ministers voting against the government, says the BBC's Norman SmithThe prime minister is "in the crosshairs of both sides" in her partyFollow latest updates here:  #Brexit  
THREAD- OF-BREXIT-THREADS: A personal opinion from the British Advocate-General at the ECJ on #Brexit and possible length of extension:  
If politicians don’t trust “the people” to make the right choice in a referendum then why do they trust “the people” to make the right choice in a general election and then willingly accept their seats in Parliament? 
"A long extension" It's obvious what game is being played here. The EU (aided by many within the UK establishment) is doing its damnedest to subvert the referendum result. If we don't leave on 29 March, our democracy may not recover for a very long time.  
Just an idea......Maybe just cancel Brexit  
There is a consensus that the economy is around 2% smaller than it would be if the #Brexit vote had not occurred.Were the economy 2% bigger, we could have increased spending by £15 billion without increasing the deficit, says Carl Emmerson at our #SpringStatement briefing 
Do you know ... I honestly used to believe this. After Parliaments deliberate dismantling of Brexit I swear never to vote again.I will never give a 'mandate' to these crooked bastards again. pic.twitter.com/K0SlIC35yv 
Take a moment out from your day, forget #Brexit and enjoy a magnificent #sunrise over #Stanley in the #Falklands . #FeelingBetter yet ? #ThursdayThoughts and that #FalklandsFeeling . 
My latest film script revolves around a woman who, after a head injury, awakes to find that whenever people say the word “Brexit “ she hears “cuddles” 
Brexit is undeliverable.  
As an illustrative example, Truss made the tired old claim that Labour caused the 2008 world recession and overspent - of course they did neither - as proven here -  and the Labour benches have been unable to articulate the argument against this for years. 
Shame on you Kevin Why "must" Parliament "honour" a corrupted, advisory referendum when all MPs know it will destroy the country?  Why are MPs allowed repeated votes on the topic but not the "people"? This is totally counter to party policy agreed at Conference and you know it. 
The country seems to be going to hell in a hand- cart - Govt is in meltdown Issues arising from #Brexit the HOC is grappling with now - have been apparent to most of us since the EURef.IMO the way forward is  - call a GE - all issues on the table - fresh Govt - fresh start. 
This is the worst type of Brexit - a Soft Parade Brexit - which, even the most ardent of Doors fans knows is pure toilet. 
Gang of fourTreacherous Cabinet ministers told to RESIGN after defying May on Brexit vote  @AmberRuddHR @GregClarkMP@DavidGauke @DavidMundellDCT @theresa_may @Conservatives 
Our amendment for this evening's vote has cross-party support and gives MPs the opportunity to do the right thing and extend Article 50 to let the people to have the final say on #Brexit in a #PeoplesVote. If you agree, please sign up and become supporter:  
"Don't despair, because Parliament can work together," Conservative MP Caroline Spelman on #BrexitLabour MP Jack Dromey says the problem so far has been "Tory talking to Tory"Follow latest updates here:  
If MPs are allowed to vote again on Brexit, then so should the people.  
We could stop Brexit today. Rebuild our economy. Tackle deprived regions with education, industrial plans, apprenticeships, transport. Help the NHS. Use existing powers to control EU immigration. And form the world’s leading progressive team with France+Germany+UK. 
Honestly, i don’t understand all the criticism of the UK Government. I think it refreshing to see the Parliament debate the Brexit issues and vote on the various approaches.This should make the negotiations with the EU much easier once the UK decides to trigger article 50. 
#Brexit #Bants. Funny but true!?!?  
Imagine if Eric Dier is the one to stop Brexit from happening…  
Can I share an unpopular opinion? I still think May's deal is close to the best Brexiteers could hope for. If you think the deal is terrible, then it's because #Brexit is an terrible idea. 
So what happened last night? MPs rejected the UK leaving the EU without a deal, meaning a no-deal Brexit is off the table. But, Theresa May is refusing to back down and could make a third attempt to get her deal through Parliament.  
Treasury appear to be trying to bust the rules of devolution again, bypass the Scottish Parliament and force local authorities in Scotland to compete with each other - if brexit happens there'll only be more of this.  
Many thanks to German @fdp MP @Lambsdorff for listening to our concerns, and the constructive discussion that followed. Good to know that he also sees #citizensrights as priority no matter what Brexit outcome.  
Watching Spelman and Dromey on @SkyNewsBoth say we must avoid no deal, but that we find a Brexit deal that won’t harm the country.The fundamental choice of Brexit is this: we either do harm or we avoid harm and follow rules.Neither is sustainable. Neither makes sense. 
How can half of all Scots look the Brexit debacle in the face and conclude that staying in the UK is a safer bet than independence? // @LesleyRiddoch 
Long is the only practical way...3mths is a nonsense...this #Brexit based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o ConsentThe Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the PplIs INVALIDWe must have time for a #PeoplesVote B4 CONFIRMATION 
Right there’s been a lot of voting in Parliament against no deal Brexit.Do you want no deal and do you feel you’ve been betrayed and tag your MP in? 
If Brexit happens, I'll be the first to join up to support a "Hard Rejoin" campaign - Full Schengen, adopt the Euro, the works... 
FFS @theresa_may let it go!Your 'deal' is dead!Finished!Over!Deceased! It is an EX DEAL!You are making yourself and the UK look ridiculous. #Brexit#ExtendArticle50#PeoplesVote 
Tusk to encourage EU27 to be open to long Brexit delay  
It’s the British public that has been stitched up by Parliament. ‘Total DISGRACE’ - Nigel Farage gears up to SAVE Brexit as he brands Parliament ‘LIARS’  
This is what many on the Labour, Lib Dem, SNP, TIG benches would like. A long extension, new MEP elections and then they would say “we might as well just stay in the EU after all”I will continue to vote to respect the referendum and get us out of the EU before the EU elections  
MPs launch bid to seize control from Theresa May with votes on all options including new Brexit referendum  
WFI founder member @JeaneF1MSP reminds #bbcdn that Brexit is not about Theresa May's future, it's about Scotland's future and Scotland has been ignored.j 
I'm afraid to say that the margin of victory was simply too narrow to accept this result, plus I think it obvious that these MPs didn't really understand what they were voting for. #Brexit #FBPE #BrexitMayhem 
Here’s the Brexit Deal the Tory media don’t want you to know about.Corbyn’s plan is already endorsed by EU and could unite Parliament and the country.#LabourBrexitPlan#NoMV3 
Mammoth week for the @AcademiWales team, supporting 3 Conferences, development sessions on Brexit Preparedness, Trust, Leadership on Ice, Senior Leadership Experience, Facilitation Skills, Medical Leadership Programme, Decision Making & Coaching. Thank you #HighPerformingTeam 
“This is a scorched earth policy, where all options, except for the PM's Withdrawal Agreement are being destroyed, leaving us with a huge delay - maybe over a year - or her deal, which is a Hotel California Brexit, where we'll check out but never leave” @ABridgen#StandUp4Brexit 
Dear @BBCNews. If you are tired of sourcing your Brexit vox pops from pool halls in Luton and markets in Lancashire, could I suggest some alternative sites where you could obtain the views of the British public? Here goes...An NHS hospital in LondonA science park in Cambridge 
The handling of Brexit is like procrastinating a uni project until the last day only to realise it is way harder than you thought so you beg the lecturer for an extension. And then procrastinate some more loool 
Here we go folks. Game on. @hilarybennmp @YvetteCooperMP and @oletwinofficial seek to let MPs take back control of Brexit process. NEXT WEEK. 
Ken Clarke - PM’s deal is dead, ERG will keep blocking. We should go back to square one, work out what final relationship should be. #Brexit  
NEW PODCAST PLEASE RETWEET. Theresa May isn't the only Traitor in Westminster. Why don't our leaders like @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn and the rest not love and value our country like we do? They are all traitors. We need to #brexit on #WTO terms.  … 
Limp Brexit 
My sweet dad served 35 yrs in armed forces. He said Brexit wouldn't be settled in his lifetime.  Sadly he was right. Now I wonder if it will be settled in mine? (Polly Toynbee one Leave voter less - shame on you madam for your comments on the day he died) 
Last night I voted to keep No Deal on the table. Alas not quite enough of my colleagues agreed. Alongside a cross-party group of 110 MPs today I’ve signed an amendment that proposes that Parliament rules out a second referendum on Brexit. We must honour the decision of June 2016 
Mark Noble is a proper no-deal Brexit and this is why he is and will always be better than you 
Just FYI - an 'orderly Brexit on March 29' doesn't exist any more.It's 15 days away (!)You need pass the MV and the Withdrawal Agreement Bill to get orderly. Orderly is April/May at best.My latest for @instituteforgov 
Labour members - ever get the feeling you’ve been played?@AngelaRayner is now arguing against the labour conference motion on #brexit.  
for space reasons yesterday I had to forego an entire section on men who have made Brexit about their penises, but haven't ruled out it returning 
Today on @BreitbartNews Daily, 6-9am ET:@JamesDelingpole on #Brexit@michaelpleahy@RepLizCheney@SebGorka@NeilMunroDC Call in now 866-957-2874!@SiriusXMPatriot 
Controversial, we know, but MPs salaries need to be tripled so they can attract higher calibre people and expel imbeciles like Liz Truss and the incompetents debilitating our political parties - Watch Truss being taken apart by Eddie Mair. Full Clip Here:  
I feel so strongly that removing ‘No Deal’ from the table, was the wrong thing to do. We now have precisely zero negotiating power. I simply do not get how so many people fail to understand this basic point. The farce, has become even more farcical #Brexit #NoDeal 
BREXIT: There was a time when the upbeat “we can grow our own potatoes” attitude of Brexiteers was almost endearing. Now they’re trying to deliberately crash the country, not so…  
Sure, Brexit is a pretty big deal, but there are more important issues around, like how we go about sorting out our defence and midfield for next season  
Channel 4's Dispatches @C4Dispatches claimed this week that @Jacob_Rees_Mogg made £7m from Brexit. Mr Mogg wouldn't answer their allegation but luckily I caught up with him and let him set the record straight. (I'm nice like that aren't I?)  
Absolute state of this!  Cosmic grade dissembling. We voted to LEAVE. There was no caveats about “a deal” - Westminster MPs invented this and now seek to bury Brexit using it as a faux excuse.  
Can somebody contact Andy King and ask him to sort this Brexit mess out  
People voted with very limited real information on which to base their vote. They made a choice then, but as events have unfolded, we now have a far better idea about what "Brexit" actually means for us. Let the people who will be affected, decide. The millionaire MPs will be OK 
Hmm, okay. Has anybody realised Brexit doesn't seem to be going very well? 
“They need to sort themselves out” - ⁦@EU_Commission⁩ Vice President ⁦@TimmermansEU⁩ talks to @skynews about the next #brexit steps  
There you have it. @jeremycorbyn moving his party even further away from backing a second referendum. He has absolutely no intention of doing anything to prevent his and @theresa_may's #Brexit 
Every one of the signatories is effectively saying to the public:“You’ve had your say. Now shut up. You have to live with whatever we dream up.”Unacceptable.As has been said: a referendum is either democratic or irreversible.It cannot be both.(h/t @davidallengreen) 
Brexit myth 12: “You would say all this, you’re Remainer who wants to stop Brexit”. No. I respect our parliamentary democracy. If Parliament votes through a hard Brexit, passes May’s deal or decides on a People’s Vote, I’ll follow. At this stage it’s no longer about what I prefer 
We need to reflect.. 48/52 is not a landslide by any means. Three years ago ppl voted for fantasy" Brexit", now we are in "reality #Brexit"  
BREAKING: Amendment being tabled imminently by Hilary Benn/Yvette Cooper/Oliver Letwin calling for extension of A50 to find ‘alternative approach’ to Brexit. Would possibly pave way for indicative votes but exact wording still to be published. 
Last day of this week’s Brexit festival. Really think they should consider holding it over four days next year 
I too can no longer support the Conservatives any more. The Brexit party will wipe the floor at next Election, even if it is a protest vote. Somehow you all have to sort this lack of Procedure & Governance in Government. It is scary to know we have no rules & regulations anymore. 
Britain faces TWO YEARS of Brexit limbo unless Theresa May wins vote  Donald Tusk will urge EU leaders to agree a 'long extension' to Article 50 to give Britain time to 'rethink'.A complete FAILURE. I will NEVER again vote “ Conservative” if this happens. 
it's always a referendum on whether a woman is pure and perfect enough  
ERG's Mark Francois: "There is likely to be a vote today on whether or not to take a second referendum off the table. The critical question is: will the Speaker select that amendment?"@JuliaHB1 |  
You don't have to gamble to help our wounded Veterans - @Keir_Starmer & Mark Francois. Whatever happens with #Brexit, we'll welcome £50 from both of you  
Hilarious watching remainers still punt the idea that they were the ones at a disadvantage.Remain outspent leave by £5m.Remain was overwhelmingly backed by the establishment.Nobody gave leave a hope in hell.It was remains referendum to fuck up. And they fucked it up. 
Just in: The EU negotiator urges member countries to be 'open to a long extension' to give the UK time to 'rethink' its Brexit strategy.  
If you want to understand yesterday’s and today’s Brexit votes in Parliament, read this brilliant (and v funny) analysis by @IanDunt  
Most annoying and frankly scandalous thing about #Brexit is the demanded acceptance that NOT acting out a marginal majority on an advisory referendum is a threat to democracy, but allowing politicians to lie and cheat to an independently ruled illegal-referendum win is not. 
Since Britishers are busy with Brexit and wont come back Please adjust by licking the feet of Italians in India They also taste the same and look the same.#ThursdayThoughts 
Here's a list of elected #Labour #MPs from #Leave voting constituencies who voted in favor of removing #NoDeal option from #UK's #Brexit options. Not only have they shown contempt for their #voters, but also for #democracy. Labour's #contemptibles list? 
Brexit is so fucked.She's making them vote a THIRD time on the same discredited deal. But at least we have democracy right? :^) pic.twitter.com/mf2ZGZ8xyL 
I'm a Dr working in NHS. Corbyn respects the democratic mandate of the people who voted Brexit.Labour founded the NHS and will fund it properly& will try to mitigate any adverse impact of Brexit.Tories are absolutely anti NHS; they're privatising and destroying it. ProNhs=Labour 
My permanent black marker pen stopped working so I licked the nib only for it to explode in my mouth and now my teeth are all black. That's how my day is going. #Brexit 
You need to get rid of May BEFORE she locks the country into a binding international treaty, not afterward 
Why the European elections could help us halt Brexit. @Andrew_Adonis explains more. 
Richard Tice issue DIRE warning to keep no deal Brexit ON THE TABLE – 'People support it'.Join the #MarchToLeave to support a No Deal:  
There’s one thing guaranteed to lower your spirits faster than Brexit. A Brexit phone-in. 
Why it's vital MPs now vote on ruling out a second referendum, writes George Eustice 
The humiliation was thinking the referendum was a good idea in the first place, informed and then carried out despite the overwhelming evidence against its likely outcome.  
Austerity created this mental-health crisis. Brexit has sent it into overdrive | Frances Ryan  
 Hearing cross-party group of MPs are about to table an amendment that would allow parliament to test support for Brexit alternatives - based on suspending Standing Order 14, which lets government control the business of the House. 
The talk of a second referendum is ridiculous. if 101% of the electorate voted to leave it would make no difference because the elite don't want to leave. There is too much money in being in the EU for them. Winning a 2nd referendum would be as effective as winning the first. 
Tired of all things #Brexit? 'Snoop Mogg' and 'Still May' are now trending in the #UK  
I know we are focused on Brexit dramaBut the President of European Parliament has said Mussolini "also" did positive things like building bridgesFFS he sided with Hitler, suspended democracy & passed anti-Semitic lawsImagine if "populists" said this 
BREAKING: March To Leave - 14 to 29 March - Leave Means Leave organized.14 Towns, 14 days. We are coming for the traitors in Parliament.Sign up here - #Brexit #MarchToLeave #WTO #NoDeal 
Absolutely. Existing MPs such as JRM, Steve Baker, IDS, Andre Bridgen, Andrea Jenkins, Owen Paterson et al who have attempted to deliver Brexit must not be damned by the actions of their ‘honourable friends’ who must be voted out in favour of a Brexit candidate of whatever stripe  
Circa Waves are opening their own pub - it's an antidote to Brexit gloom, a way to meet fans, and it takes place on March 19th...  
Mad props to the BBC1 schedulers who are following their late-night Brexit News Special on March 29th with a screening of Sliding Doors 
Loyalty is a two-way street.If politicians and Parliament don’t feel the need to respect the Brexit election result, then we shouldn’t feel under any obligation to respect them or their laws.#BREXITBetrayed #BrexitBetrayal 
The current brexit scenario is akin to people standing at the foot of the bed, arguing over who will put in the airway, whilst the patient flatlines. We aren't being led. We aren't using evidence. We have recognised but are ignoring the problem.The post mortem will be a lie 
Theresa May is forcing her deal through. Her plan is to take it to the wire.What's the betting the ERG will cave on a third vote next week?Parliament is populated by actors playing their part in the biggest political scam in history to deliver a scam Brexit or a no Brexit. 
Things that are certain:- there is no Brexit dividend- some MPs openly want to harm the UK- Jeremy Corbyn is not the saviour, on Brexit or anything else- Brexit will inflict equal opportunity pain: it will hurt all of us (Leavers, Remainers and Abstainers) alike 
The #GBP surges the most in nearly 2 years after another no-deal vote, rising 2% against the USD and posting its biggest gain since April 2017. Learn how the vote could impact different industries, which instruments to watch, and how to take advantage of Brexit.#BrexitVote 
So one Scottish Tory MP didn't know how to vote in Brexit referendum and another who couldn't think of a question to ask PM with weeks to go before country heads over a Brexit cliff. How is this representing constituents??  
So you’d agree that EU citizens living here and paying taxes should have had a vote in the Eu referendum, right?  
Liam Fox refused to protect the NHS in any Free Trade Deal and to Exclude the NHS from any Future Trade Deal #Brexit#BrexitMayhem#PeoplesVote 
On @bbc5live, Leave caller says there should be another referendum with only May’s deal or No Deal on the ballot — no option to remain. And Nicky Campbell does not challenge her. Why? This is THE issue. 
Here you go, UK.You want a way out of your impasse, time for a serious rethink: this is what you have to do.#Brexit #MeaningfulVote 
“We actually have to go back to the people and we have to have a second referendum.”MPs voted against a no-deal Brexit and they've rejected Prime Minister's deal. Lowri Turner shares her views on what should be done next.@Lowri_Turner | #jeremyvine 
‘The referendum was only advisory’ you’re in cuckoo land pal. This is a case of MPs usurping power from the people 
Another major day in Brexit. Don't worry, after today there won't be another big vote in Parliament for at least 3 days.Here's the lowdown on today.  
Brexit has cost £100bn so far.Enough to increase spending on the NHS by 80%.All this pain and humiliation, for what? No gain, ever. 
No, Seriously.. 
Did @LiamFox just confirm during International Trade Questions that under existing ISDS rules UK Government can be potentially sued by existing FDI companies in UK as a result of Brexit?   That's over a trillion pounds of FDI.  And Brexiteers thought £39bn was a lot of money! 
Gina Miller succinctly explains the utter shambles of Brexit.#BrexitMayhem #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement #BrexitVote 
This chaos can’t continue. Something has to give. We need an orderly Brexit on Mar 29. If, to get the votes for that, the PM has to promise that she will go after the Withdrawal Treaty is secure, to allow a new leader to reunite the country and oversee the next stage, she should. 
A reminder that @stephenkerrMP represents the magnificent #Stirling seat which voted 68% #Remain in the #EUref.Last night Mr Kerr voted in favour of No Deal Brexit, even though that would reduce the value of the Scottish economy by 9%.Local people & businesses deserve better. 
Daily Briefing:- Prime Minister Theresa May wounded by rejection of 'no-deal' #Brexit- Goldman Sachs sees greater chance of UK PM getting deal through- NATO to release his annual report 
OK she is trolling us. She really is trolling us. There is no way on Earth this article & headline are anything other than conscious & deliberate self-parody. BBC News - Brexit crisis presents opportunity for Theresa May  
If you're a tabloid editor and the woman you want as prime minister is making a hash of the brexit you're desperate for, this is the "look over there" moment you need.express team must be weeping in their beer. #MadeleineMccann 
A simple graphic explanation on why Scotland should be an independent county.#indyref2 #Brexit  
It might have passed your understanding, but only the government can bring a referendum motion so 'wanting power' would be the first logical step...to what you desire... 
Has @jeremycorbyn forgotten these conference policies?"Conference notes Labour has set six robust tests for the final Brexit deal.""If we cannot get a general election Labour must support all options remaining on the table, including campaigning for a public vote."#Brexit  
"Brexit is only impacting a limited number of Indian business operating in the UK. The vast majority of Indian companies are here for UK-specific reasons" - @UKIBC CEO, Richard Heald, on the impact of #Brexit in @timesofindia 
Thank you Chris. Greater Manchester has 27 MPs. You are one of only 3 that genuinely support the referendum result. The UK and Gtr Manchester voted to Leave the EU. The disconnect between parliament and the people is staggering.  #GoWTO 
The house has ruled out a ‘No deal Brexit’. To salvage an ounce of credibility and self respect MP’s should now rule out a ‘2nd referendum’. I hope they now realise that British democracy is in tatters and this present House of Commons can never be trusted. 
It's the beginning of the end tonight when they vote for an extension to Article 50. This is not what we voted for at all, this is another scam to screw us out of Brexit. This PM needs to be hung out to dry if Brexit isn't delivered on 29th of March. I am absolutely fuming mad. 
Austerity helped create Britain’s mental-health crisis. Brexit has sent it into overdrive. >> My col.  
'A free-trade deal with the EU will be the easiest thing in human history' - Liam Fox'Brexit does not mean the UK will leave the single market' - Dan Hannan'Money saved from leaving the EU will result in the NHS getting £350m a week' - Red BusThere is more if you'd like 
Now if we'd only called it the Meaningful Referendum, we could have held it fortnightly, and discarded the results at will. 
The Brexit options are narrowingTheresa May's deal could pass but she will need to -Get assurances for DUP of a proper Stormont Lock on new regulatory barriers across Irish SeaGive her MPs a free vote to encourage Labour rebelsSet out a timetable for her departure  
Just received mailing from #HBBC @Conservatives about voting in the upcoming local elections in May.  Dear @Conservatives because of your party’s duplicity over Brexit & failure to respect the democratic will of the British people you will NEVER receive any votes from me again 
MPs questioning Liam Fox about post-Brexit trade with Switzerland. John Bercow butts in to announce that the best thing about Switzerland is Roger Federer. Silence. Questioning resumes 
‘This country is a sick joke’: readers on the no-deal Brexit vote  
The simple reason for the paralysis and chaos is that the government and most MPs know there is no version of Brexit that is better than staying in the EU but can’t admit it. Had any Brexit option been better a consensus for it would’ve formed immediately after the referendum 
Brexit myth 11: “Though we won by such a narrow margin, we still won, so get over it!” No. Even General Elections can return hung Parliaments. Theresa May called early GE in 2017. That wasn’t deemed “undemocratic”. If there’s no clear parliamentary majority, we always vote again 
Of all the outrageous and scandalous aspects of the #brexit #shambles , May’s third time lucky strategy is the worst of all. 
If you’re wondering why @DavidMundellDCT @AmberRuddHR @DavidGauke @GregClarkMP & the rest are trying to sto #Brexit it’s because they are all globalist shills who want to keep or get their snouts in the #EU trough. Their loyalty is to the #EU not the #UK 
"Brexit, in any form, will stunt our future economic prospects. We know this because the Treasury itself told us so in its own economic assessment."For @HuffPostUK, our Treasury spokesperson Chris Leslie MP gives his reaction to the Spring Statement. 
VETO VETO VETO... The British people do not want to re-think Brexit.. THEY VOTED LEAVE 
In fact, a Palace of Westminster insider said yesterday, 'Support for a second referendum in this place is far larger than people realise, and growing fast'. Very good to hear: It's the only way out of the terrific shambles that Brexit has dragged us into.  
“A version of Brexit has ALREADY HAPPENED”: @robdelaney, austerity, and our warped news agenda 
Tusk open to long Brexit extension to give UK time for ‘rethink’  
One of the more painful things about being an international lawyer during Brexit is watching spivs and grifters like Rees-Mogg try and game the system.Herewith, a thread.  
The only way to get out of this absolute Brexit shambles is to put a board of business leaders in charge...no political allegiances, no self-serving career politicians, just people who will get things sorted so our economy can prosper 
#Brexit Is there a bigger idiot anywhere in  than Steve look at me Bray. Spends all his time outside Parliament talking nonsense to everyone. Trying get his face on every TV channel. Shouting stop Brexit everyday. Shut up  your boring us all to death.   
NO TAXATION WITHOUT REPRESENTATION.                        And yetSo so many EU citizens paying tax in the UK were not allowed to vote in the fraudulently won Referendum. 
'Chaos reigns': what the papers say about the no-deal Brexit vote  
Brexiteer MP: I was an idiot to ever think a referendum was a good idea  
Cameron calls referendumUnbearable lies about EU during campaignBrexit wins by small marginUK triggers article 50EU negotiates in good spiritMay calls new elections + loses majorityEU negotiatesDeal is readyMay loses voteEU gives second chanceMay loses again. EU:  
Nigel Farage added £400,000 to his assets in 2018 from media and appearances - hardly the "I'm skint, there's no money in politics' line he was trotting out last year! The #hypocrite is profiting from our Brexit pain... #StopBrexit #BrexitMayhem #RevokeArticle50Now 
For anyone wondering what Germany thinks about #Brexit.Today’s @SZ: 
If we do hold European elections in May, it will in effect be a referendum on membership of the EU. We should recognise this now and start preparing a pro-EU strategy to elect MEPs that are Remainers. 
At last night’s event someone asked if I could write a joke about Brexit!Do you know how long it takes to write a Brexit joke? Two and a half years! AND THERE’S NO PUNCHLINE!!!Here all week etc etc 
“MPs who don’t want us to Brexit at all are hiding behind taking ‘no deal’ off the table and voting for that, because they haven’t got the guts to admit they want to frustrate Brexit, because they know 2/3rds of our constituencies voted to leave the EU” @ABridgen 
Heidi Allen MP shows the kind of inspired leadership we so desperately need. If only we’d conducted the Brexit negotiations over Twitter from the outset, all this would have been sorted months ago. #StopBrexit #Heidi4PM 
Instead of the PM pathetically using this to bully MPs into accepting a profoundly bad, already twice defeated deal, we should grab it with both hands and get out of the #brexit mess.  
The stark reality for Brexiteers & our leaders this morning is that if we don't UniteOrganise CampaignLobby  March,Peacefully Protest Boycott EU productsNetwork on social mediaJoin a Brexit Party & financially support the Brexit cause.We could lose what we voted for. 
A note to Leavers:After a Nazi referendum victory in 1933 Goebbels said that "there is no possibility for parliamentary interference, to obliterate and render ineffective the execution of the nation’s will." That's the fascist way of looking at referendums.#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
We are living through a war. We just didn’t realise straight away because this one doesn’t involve bombs, bullets or bayonets. It’s the war against truth and honest dealing, against the rule of law itself. Trump, Brexit, the dishonest campaign against trans people. They’re fronts 
Only course that could possibly salvage democracy now would be to prorogue Parliament – allowing No-Deal Brexit on 29 March – then hold General Election ASAP to cleanse Commons of the unrepresentative anti-democratic dross that now comprises ~75% of it in a Great People's Purge 
Location: St James' University Hospital, Leeds.Always remember, these chancers won the referendum by promising to defend an NHS that they want to dismantle.  
One important function of the PV & 'Brexit As Apocolypse' idea is that it allows academics, who often have conservative interests combined with a 'subversive' self-image, to maintain performative radicalism while spitting fury& contempt at the most radical Opposition for decades. 
The referendum was defeated by a slim margin. The people CANNOT vote again. It would be undemocratic....   My deal has only been defeated twice in Parliament by historic & unprecedented margins. We MUST vote again...  #BrexitShambles 
“The betrayal of Brexit is one of the most shameful chapters in our country’s history” (Nigel Farage).It’s hard to find optimism in the plight to which we’ve been brought by Cameron’s self-serving 2016 folly. But if Farage now feels betrayed, something must be going right. 
People are waking up, they are starting to realise that Democracy is being ignored. This isn't about the will of the commons. It's about the will of the people. Respect itThere are many resigning memberships and joining @TheSDPUK.#Brexit #NoDeal #BrexitVote #NoDealBrexit 
One senior EU negotiator describes latest Brexit vote as “the Titanic voting for the iceberg to get out of the way”.EU humour now even funnier than British. It is that bad. 
#BrexitMayhem This country used to be a democratic one, we don't need another referendum, the decision to leave the EU was taken in 2016. Unfortunately this totally inadequate goverment has made a complete ballsup of the whole thing. A clean out of parliament in needed. 
It's time you lot brought that silly-arsed government down, @eastantrimmp.You know & we know they have no intention of playing fair or adhering to the #Brexit result.Let them fall, let's see where UK democracy leads us.You're being railroaded otherwise. 
Brilliant speech and an excellent clear explanation of why we have to protect the internal market st the end of the clip 
Parliamentarians sabotaged something far greater than #Brexit this week. Our ancestors, and the great philosophers, will be turning in their graves at how democracy, Western values and British history were simultaneously ripped to shreds by a bunch of Twitter-bashing third-rates 
Morning All!  Whilst Brexit vote was unfolding two young women contacted me. Both cases - cancer has returned, now incurable and need new cancer drugs. Touched they trust & rely on me to help. They felt it pointless to contact their MP's. Trust & competency at an all time low... 
How often you are allowed to change your mind.Advisory referendum:NeverLunch:DailyStrictly Come Dancing:WeeklyBRIT Awards:Once a yearGeneral Election:Every 4 yearsMarriage:Every 12 years (UK average)Meaningful Vote:Until you get the result you want#Brexit 
If Brexit MV3 passes next week, it will bring:- 18 months or so of modest certainty, allowing manufacturers to quit the UK in an orderly fashion- the mother and father of all fights over the future relationship- a millennium of wingeing from Brexiters that "theirs was better" 
Donald Tusk will ask EU leaders to consider a "long extension" if Britain needs it to "rethink" its Brexit plan  
Pas Brexit?! By ⁦@XavierGorce⁩ 
Watching the ERG implode, as they wrestle a defeat from the jaws of victory, is a special highlight of Brexit.  
It's very odd how parliament gets 3 chances in 2 months to change their mind on May's Brexit deal, but the country doesn't get a second after 2 years. 
1) 33 months after the June 2017 referendum, U.K. continues to negotiate internally on the way it could exit the EU and on possible options for its future relations with the EU. 
Bye bye Tories @Conservatives . Membership cancelled- Broken manifesto- Broken Brexit- Broken PMWill never vote for you lot ever again. Sorry @DavidTCDavies I respect you as an MP but can no longer support you as an @Conservative@JuliaHB1 @Iromg @BrandonLewis @theresa_may pic.twitter.com/pBYnSKCMVJ 
Parliamentary democracy is a terrible thing isn't it Piers. A pity no-one taught you the difference between it and the plebiscitary dictatorship used by the fascists in the 1930s. Or maybe the fascist way of doing things rather appeals to you. #PeoplesVote #brexit  
Fed up of Brexit? Join our march to stop Brext  
Can I suggest that all political parties have this “Brexit result by constituency” map pinned up on their campaign HQ walls, a necessary reminder as we head into a General Election territory. Blue = Leave (cc: @Fox_Claire) 
#TrapHero#CatalanTrialCatalan Police @mossos' Major #Trapero is tried today for defending peaceful voters during #Catalonia's #1O #1Oct #ReferendumAnother unjust instance of #Spain's supreme court #FakeTrial of legitimate representatives for honouring an electoral mandate pic.twitter.com/KTZLbXihkP 
While attention was on Brexit yesterday - The Chancellor REFUSED to lift the benefit freeze driving those on the lowest incomes into further poverty. Austerity is not over.  
There is a parallel universe out there where AF is part of an Executive with standing to make invite, where we don’t have Brexit uncertainty and resultant pressure on PSNI resources…(and perhaps a different US President) 
BREAKING: EU Council President Tusk says bloc should be "open to a long extension" for UK if it needs to rethink Brexit strategy. 
Read up on my take on the latest in the Brexit drama and other news from this week 
Just over 14 days to #Brexit"Let's have some indicative votes!"With the votes on 25, 26 March. The week of Brexit!FFS If you want a Brexit rethink, MPs, you have to *REVOKE* Article 50, and then do it properly. Not make it up like this. 
EU open to a 'long' Brexit delay, Donald Tusk says  
Rejection of a WTO Brexit will go down as one of the darkest days in British political history. By a majority of 4 MPs’ proved just how out of touch they are with the public and how they will stop at nothing to end Brexit, the British public can see right through the lies.  
After last night's votes, it is clear that the only option left is to give the people, not the politicians, the final say on the Brexit deal with the option to stay in the EU.Join our fight for a People's Vote >  
The abject failure of May’s brexit is her personal failureShe has piloted us to a crisis in the verge of a catastropheThis is her personal disaster, we don’t have to hold hands with her in it. Nor should we RevokePut the country in safe modeThen next stepsBlame her 
 FORGET BREXIT5,700 PIP Claimants Sent Home From Their Health Assessment Due To Staff Shortages.Despite private companies getting hundreds of millions for DWP contracts, they can't even staff their assessment centres.Please READ/LIKE/SHARE 
IF YOU ONLY HAVE TIME TO RETWEET ONE ITEM TODAY CAN YOU PLEASE MAKE IT THIS SHORT CLIP?It blows the lid off what "EU REFORM" might mean for EU democracy and Britain. It is a chilling reminder of just why we voted to leave the EU's political project.#BREXIT #NOW 
Reading the initial comments, the national division over Brexit has nothing/nowt on this...  
Yes, Cameron owns the Brexit catastrofuck.And the liars of the Leave campaign.And the Brexiters who insisted on mad moonshine.And May for only listening to mad moonshiners and putting party before country.But every MP who voted for Article 50 before we had a plan owns it too. 
The government and parliament should be holding it’s head in shame. They have screwed this up beyond belief. You will never get another vote from me. @Conservatives @UKLabour #brexit 
Not really true though - the "communities who voted for Brexit" by population are overwhelmingly comfortable southern English suburbs, small towns and villages, despite the fact that John Harris always gets sent to some desperate Yorkshire ex-pit town for his Povvo Whispering act  
Mark Francois and Steve Baker in VLAD'S ARMY  as members of the dreaded ERG AKA  Elite Regiment Gammon they aren't trained to lose! #Brexit  
#BREAKING: European Council President Donald Tusk backs a 'long' delay if Britain 'rethinks' Brexit  
Brexit: Understand this lady works for the UK at the ECJ. For sheer clarity, this thread takes some beating:  
Minister who changed her mind on Brexit claims ‘no-one has changed their mind’  
Still M.A.Y. (featuring Snoop Mogg)Theresa May's Chronic Brexit  
To all those #Leavers bleating on about democracy and complaining because parliament voted to avoid a #NoDealBrexit, it was you lot that wanted the UK government to regain it's sovereignty. Well that is exactly what it has done. You got what you wanted. Stop moaning. #Brexit. 
#ThursdayThoughts  Will someone please inform Theresa May Groundhog Day was in Feb. not March & like her Brexit deal, is now irrelevant. I would ask her to forget her rejected plan, lose it, just like she did with the documents on child abuse & MP's dodgy expenses, with ease. 
Taking morning away from Brexit for a relaxing run up the 932 steps of Tower 42 in the city. #VerticalRush #shelter 
We can’t have a second vote on Brexit but you can have as many as you want in Parliament until you get this Tory Brexit through. History will not be kind to you and the other Labour MPs who are damaging our country by supporting this PM. 
But sure, you're right, it's Jeremy Corbyn that has been blocking a second referendum  
15 Days to Brexit Disaster unless we extend or revoke.On March 23rd come with me & a million other people to London. Then there can be no claim about the will of the people being for Brexit.If there is no other agreement by March 28th Parliament should revoke Article 50. 
As a migrant to Britain, I am glad you can move on. If only those of us reviled repeatedly in aid of the racist, xenophobic, nativist, far right project called Brexit could shrug it off with the same ease.....  
Parliament trying to deal with Brexit.#PeoplesVote 
When you compare and contrast John McDonnell versus Angels Rayner you realise we are being lied to by a Labour Party that wants Brexit no matter the cost  
MPs last night Cheered when ‘No Deal Brexit’ was defeated in Parliament,They Cheered again when Treasonable May mentioned a ‘Second Referendum’Then they ‘Jeered’ when it was said they must respect their electorate with one heard to say ‘They don’t matter’My Vest Is Ready. 
A third vote on the SAME DEAL makes an absolute farce of the Government's position that a second referendum 'goes against democracy'. According to @theresa_may you can't keep voting until you get the result you want...unless it's your own deal, of course  #BrexitMayhem 
Oh look, my book, My BrexitTo be published by @HarperCollins 
European Council President Donald Tusk says he would be "open to a long extension" of Article 50 "if the UK finds it necessary to rethink its Brexit strategy" 
Do Remain ministers who defy the whip in order to block Brexit, yet keep their jobs, have any honour? Do their supporters in No10?  
I mean, it's bound to be one of those times I'm called "Hugh". Or "Malcolm". Or "Giles". And nobody is going to do a stone of infamy twice. Particularly after Brexit, when all the stonemasons have gone back to Poland. 
Donald, my European friend, UK will find no consensus. EU will not get 2nd UK referendum (despite what you've been told). If EU has any sense it will let UK leave. Keep UK membership & EU will risk being destroyed from within by 77+ resentful new UKIP, Brexit Party & Tory MEPs. 
Can anyone remember when there was a more useless incompetent bunch of treacherous buffoons in Westminster? #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit #BrexitDeal 
Labour Bottle Second Referendum Pledge  
It's important to note that, although MPs voted to take a no deal #Brexit off the table last night, 278 predominantly Tory MPs were willing to plunge our country into a no deal catastrophe. I'm sure there's a word for people who are prepared to do this! #RevokeArticle50 
Bringing a deal back to Parliament is not the same as holding a second referendum. It's not "hypocrisy" to do and not the other. I am surprised how many people are using this obviously rubbish argument. 
Why is Daniel Kawczynski such an ardent supporter of Brexit, & prepared to shamelessly lie, repeatedly, in order to get the UK out of the EU?Could it be because he stands to make a tonne of cash out of it?Well, you decide.#PeoplesVote @lbc #r4today #newsnight #PoliticsLive 
2nd referendum.3 options with single transferable vote.No deal.Mays deal.Remain.It's as simple as that 
It’s over for Cringe Tinge (a.k.a @TheIndGroup). The only possible way they can get their 2nd referendum would be via a General Election. They don’t want that. Why? They’d all lose their seats. Wonderful.And, no, we don’t want you back in @UKLabour! 
Sorry, but the deal was not Brexit, it was a trap that only enabled us to leave with the permission of the EU, and would give them the upper hand in trade negotiations, but you know that, so it appears you are trying to kid us! My vote will be now going to any true Brexit Party!  
Chair "You and I have a special relationship Mr Coburn. I'm special and I don't know what you are" 
Pretty tired of Labour's "we don't WANT a second referendum because..." stance. I don't "want" one either, in the same way I wouldn't "want" surgery to remove a cancer. I'd prefer Brexit over by revokation. In absence of that, putting it back to the people is the best option. 
This is a public service announcement  Tonight’s #Brexit votes will be live on @BBCParliament channel, as they always are. Full coverage of @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn @IanBlackfordMP and everyone else called to speak. 
During my consultations ahead of #EUCO, I will appeal to the EU27 to be open to a long extension if the UK finds it necessary to rethink its #Brexit strategy and build consensus around it. 
Absolutely.Nobody talks about the opportunity cost of #Brexit, yet everyday we hear stories of soaring foodbank use, teachers buying food & supplies for children and statistics on every sort of poverty going the wrong way.  
Labour don’t want to stop Brexit, They simply want the chance of implementing their version of Brexjt, no matter the cost, no matter the damage.  
 How can you still expect to be in the cabinet having not backed the PM last night?  Are you going to resign? Have you got no comment whatsoever this morning?Silence from Amber Rudd as she leaves home following her abstention on rejecting a no-deal Brexit  
If MPs can be asked a second time what they think on Brexit, why can’t the public? #finalsay 
There’s lots of talk about the cost to business of “Brexit uncertainty”, but are other self-employed home-workers finding that they are losing days of work time to the mental and emotional stress of watching the country tear itself apart? 
Chancellor Philip Hammond tells @BBCBreakfast some Tory rebels "will want to think again" about rejecting the PM's #Brexit deal if the EU insists on a long extension to Article 50  
Surely the only way to address Brexit is to address austerity. We've achieved exactly five-eighths of fuck all by way of improvements to housing, income, distribution and security since the referendum.  Nothing has changed there at all. 
The Brexit Party isn’t a real party, its just a name registered with the Electiral Commission, & even the ownership of the name is being legally disputed. UKIP is a national party with 27k members, 100 + councillors, MEPs, & branches nationally. We are ready to fight. 
'There is no #Brexit deal that will give the same level of benefit to the NHS that we currently have as an EU member' @HannahPopsy  
In our latest report on #Brexit-related treaties we draw the UK-Swiss Trade Agreement to the special attention of @UKHouseOfLords, not only because it’s important, but because it differs significantly from current EU-Swiss arrangements. 1/5   
This strikes me as the optimal position for Brexit MPs. You get to leave AND to keep moaning on. Full house.  
The day a Tory free Scotland moved closer. They ignored all the warnings about what a no deal Brexit scenario would mean for their constituents.  
The less you follow the Brexit process the better your predictions will be. A year ago you'd have said "There will be lots of argument and drama and then they'll get a deal through at the last minute." Still the most likely outcome. 
Worse off under no-deal Brexit? Go on, pull the other one, Mr Hammond  via @telebusiness 
.@AllisterHeath is brilliant in today’s @telegraph “There have been many bad days on the road to the Great Brexit Betrayal, but this was the most devastating so far. The vote...confirming most of our ‘representatives’ are ready to thumb their noses at us.” And this...  
The chicanery now being contemplated by the Tories to justify a 3rd #MeaningfulVote could utterly destroy any notion the #EU27 may have that the U.K. Govt is acting in good faith. Last nail in coffin of Britain’s international reputation? Thread  #Brexit  
Today, I will vote against any extension to Article 50 and have co-signed an amendment saying that “the result of the 2016 EU referendum should be respected" and that a second referendum should not take place. There was a ‘People’s Vote’ in 2016, and the people voted to leave. 
It would almost be worth getting a Brexit extension so the EU tax haven law due in on April 1st, can make UK it's first target...watch them squirm then, eh? 
Apologies for the sweary word in the first tweet but this is too important. The people who bankrolled Brexit to “take back sovereignty” are asking the successors of Mussolini to help them impose a completely different kind of Brexit from the one they promised.  
And Farage's set-up speech will be seen by a large targeted audience pushed on Youtube by RT (Russia Today)..... Meanwhile, @TimmermansEU does speak for the citizens of our country: 
The Government is fast forwarding us towards disaster  It's time to press pause - and give the public the final say on Brexit #BrexitMayhem 
Our party has lost its mind. #brexit was always going to be damaging with no realistic benefits for the majority of our voters. @RuthDavidsonMSP you have let our @ScotTories voters down. 
Unlike those in the political class, UKIP is proud to stand with the people. Together, we are standing up for Brexit, standing up for democracy and standing up #ForTheNation #WTOBrexitNOW 
This #Brexit chaos cannot be solved without us sitting around the table with our partners to hammer out a consensus. I will therefore be flying to Brussels tomorrow to listen and consult with Hamas, Hezbollah and dissident Irish republicans. @BBCRadio4 #r4Today 
Exclusive footage of Theresa May’s new Brexit plan. #BrexitShambles #BrexitMayhem 
LEAVE: 100+ MPs put forward amendment against second referendum. “We believe Parliament should honour the real people’s vote – the decision already made in 2016.” 
I wonder if MPs will vote on May's Brexit deal so many times it will become parliamentary tradition, like dragging the Speaker from the chair at the state opening. Rejecting the deal will become an annual ceremony, long after Theresa May and Brexit have been forgotten 
I do not understand the argument we can’t have a #secondreferendum because we’ve already made a decision.If I’d decided to buy a house, only to get a survey back saying it was riddled with rising damp, I wouldn’t just buy it regardless.Why can’t we think again? #Brexit 
I don't like anything #TheresaMay has ever done, but everyone blaming her for the state of #Brexit is a joke. The reason it's gone so bad is because it's such a stupid unsolvable problem. Brexit being a disaster is the best outcome it could have ever possibly had 
There is a Brexit party you can support which is also committed to invest more in the NHS, the police and the rest of our diminished social fabric, has policies to bring down excessive immigration too and has no truck with extremists. @TheSDPUK If you agree with us, join us. 
Given all the portentous lessons-of-history analogies being batted around over Brexit, I’m surprised no one’s talking about the difference between us crashing out of the EU in cold and rainy March vs postponing gridlock and food shortages until a balmy street-fighting June 
Every fucking single cell organism calling for us to crash out of Europe on @lbc right now are harking back to us "surviving the blitz" or "been through worse in war." This, despite the fact that they've all seen as much "action" as Mark François... #brexit 
Liz Truss dismissing a Second Referendum: “I don’t think people have changed their minds."Eddie Mair: "You have."Liz Truss: "I have, that's true."@eddiemair | #Brexit 
Nigel Farage should be arrested for treason. He is actively encoraging foreign powers to veto a delay (and eventual overturning) of Brexit.When you stop respecting our democracy, you should lose the right to vote.#brexitmayhem 
Seems #Art62 #ViennaConvention ruse floated by Rees Mogg & Barclay at end of Tuesday’s #Brexit debate is to be dressed up as enough to justify #MV3. Ludicrous sophistry. I trust ⁦@Geoffrey_Cox⁩ integrity can survive this pressure 
Theresa May: A second referendum is undemocratic and against the nations interestsAlso Theresa May: We will keep voting on this piece of shit deal until you prannocks agree with me, I don't care if it takes 100 different votes to change your minds this is democracy you fucks 
looking at the results of last night's votes on Hansard.parliament,my MP on all 3 occasions voted to take NO DEAL off the table!I I’m furious that he contributed to frustrate the will of the people & Brexit .If anyone wants to see how their MP voted go to www.Hansard.parliament 
I will be voting against extending Article 50 this evening in Commons. Genuinely concerned how so many Remain MPs are trying to prevent will of British people. Important to leave EU on time as promised. #Brexit @StandUp4Brexit 
Brexit myth 9: “Labour can represent Remainers” No. Labour is led by Corbyn. Corbyn is a Brexiter. He has consistently voted against every piece of UK/European integration since 1974, which is before I was born. He defied the whip to vote Brexit consistently. He will not save you 
Brexit myth 4: “what’s the point of elections if you don’t implement them? Democracy is dead!” No. This was a non-legally binding referendum. Not a General Election. Gov tried to implement for 3 yrs. Another vote by Parl. or people (like another GE), is more democracy, not less 
Brexit myth 3: “the gov. promised to implement the vote in a once in a lifetime choice&Parliament must do so”. No. Parliament is not government,nor bound by it. Parliament *elects* government. And *this* gov. is not *that* government. Take it up with Cameron, if you can find him 
Brexit myth 2: “Leave means leave”. No. Brexiters themselves disagree on what Leave means. May’s deal, Norway+, No Deal, Canada+. You’re telling us to drive a taxi without telling us where to go “Just Drive!”, “but where to, sir?” “Drive means drive!” Meantime, metre’s ticking... 
Brexit myth 1: “the people have decided”. No. Nobody (Brexiter nor Remainer) can claim to speak on behalf of “the people”. 52% of those elegible to vote chose Brexit. 48% chose Remain. That is NOT “the people”. You couldn’t get a more divided “people” than in this vote. 
Just torn up my @Conservatives membership and joined the @TheSDPUK  I know many others doing the same. Brexit far more important than traditional party loyalty. Tories are going to pay for their betrayal. @damiangreen @AshfordCCA 
Brexit is that cheese sandwich at Fyre festival 
Why a no-deal Brexit is not even close to being off the table yet  
Brexit was leading the news in many of the international media bits I did yesterday. It's so painfully embarrassing   
Whilst the country is preoccupied with Brexit BBC1 gets away with saying “when people are out shopping they can really feel the benefit of wages going up!” If you think they should mention small fact real annual wages are £800 a year LOWER then in 2010 RT!  
Democracy is the key reasons the British people voted for Brexit; last night we saw it torn down. Elected representatives refusing to listen to their constituents... Ministers refusing to adhere to collective responsibility are now squatting in the cabinet.#StandUp4Brexit 
Good to hear Philip Hammond clarifying what we should do on Brexit on @BBCr4today. A man who said yesterday that a No Deal would be catastrophic then failed to vote to remove it as a possibility. 
In the context of #Brexit, the "will of the people" really means the "will of some people who were systematically lied to, cheated, conned and duped by the super rich political elites who will do ANYTHING -- even destroy the UK -- in order to not pay their fair share of tax." 
The only thing that has been disastrous for UK democracy is to have held a non-binding plan-free referendum on a hugely complex issue that was riddled with illegality and had a marginal result. #r4today 
Several columnists this morning blaming MPs for putting our democracy at risk. Surely the cause was a poorly designed referendum which divided the electorate in two, ignited a culture war and separated the ‘will of’ Scotland and N.I. from the ‘will of’ England and Wales? 
Verhofstadt - "We have a problem.....I call them the cheerleaders of Putin....Farage and his friend Banks....who colluded...with the help of the Russians....to have Brexit.  
'Weak', 'Dishonest', 'Deceptive', 'Duplicitous', 'Proven Liar'  - have these words ever felt so appropriate to hang around the neck of the PM of this country?May must go.No it won't solve our Brexit problems, but it will relieve us of a national disgrace.#LeaveMeansLeave 
In this faction-ridden parliament can our MPs please start forming a group that puts #democracy and the national interest above personal ambition and party politics. No #Brexit will ever be credible or uniting now unless, having seen it, we the people vote for it. 
The Brexit process has finally collapsed and it cannot be rescued. Until further notice, it needs to be scrapped  
It finally happened!Talking to my dad on the phone about Brexit and us being blanked in Parliament, and my Rangers-supporting, ex-military dad comes out with “Ken what? I cannot bloody wait until Scotland is independent!”I nearly burst!!  
I am sick of Brexit and I just want schools and youth services to receive the funding they desperately need. 
Today they begin the big #Brexit con in Westminster.Yesterday was only a whingefest, to test the waters.No pretence anymore, democracy is dying along with any credibility they had.We replaced the thieves of the Expenses Scandal with a cabal of corruption.#DrainTheSwamp. 
I've given this a lot of thought & come to the conclusion that only one person can now sort out this ridiculous Brexit mess: @realDonaldTrump.He'd take no sh*t from the EU, or Parliament, or anyone. And he definitely wouldn't lose his voice. Mr President, my country needs YOU. 
Parliament must act to end the chaos of May’s Brexit; the country deserves better than this.  The TIG amendment, calling for a Final Say referendum on May’s deal, does exactly that.  Every MP looking for a way out of the gridlock should support it.   
Today there is also a cross party #PeoplesVote amendment co-sponsored by @Dr_PhilippaW & myself.  Time is running out for this option to be viable & its time for those who support it in @HouseofCommons to speak up #Brexit  
Heading back to Westminster bubble shortly wondering what arrogant & anti-democratic MPs will do next. They’re determined to override the referendum result & remain subservient to the EU, despite the fact that our country voted to leave.  Truly astonishing elitism @Conservatives 
Can you all stop comparing Brexit to being in the army you mad bastards  
A masterclass from EU Commission VP, Frans Timmermans, using his training as a Dutch military intelligence Russian interrogator to expose the idiocy of the #TreasonWeasels that follow Farage; flag waving nationalists masquerading as patriots. FULL CLIP -  
BREAKING: 'There is likely to be a vote in the House of Commons this afternoon on whether or not to rule out a second referendum' - Mark Francois MP #GMB 
NEW- Sarah Newton’s Brexit Resignation Is Nothing To Rejoice About.Sarah Newton may be gone but, that doesn't excuse the utter contempt she showed towards disabled people.Plus, someone equally as bad will just come in & replace her. 
Dear @GuyOpperman,If it is democratic for the HOC to vote 2 or 3 times to get the required result on Mrs May’s #Brexit deal, why would it be undemocratic for the nation also to be have another vote?Please comment.Regards from a genuinely baffled constituent. #PeoplesVote 
#Brexit Diagram V17, after yesterday's votes. No Deal was already priced in, so little change on that.No Deal 32% Gen Election (req Art 50 ext.) 26% May's Deal 1% Spiral of tedium 13% #PeoplesVote (req ext.) 19% Rescind Art50 3% UK in EU until 2020 7%  
For Nick Timothy to blame PM May for the shambles that is BREXIT is pretty rich in my book. I blame you, Sir, for that appalling election campaign and it’s shocking manifesto for the Conservatives losing their overall majority, which made the PM powerless to negotiate! 
Your daily reminder that if @jeremycorbyn hadn’t led Labour to its largest increase in vote share since 1945, in all probability the Tories’ Brexit deal would already have sailed through Parliament. It’s his leadership that has left their deal in tatters. 
The votes yesterday made clear what Parliament doesn't want, while doing nothing to suggest what MPs would support 
@Sandbach please support Amendment H. We have to stop those with ulterior motives threatening the country with No Deal.Trust that the electorate now know there is no upside to Brexit.  
Amidst the social and economic turmoil the Brexiteers are getting rich off Brexit whilst ordinary people bear the cost. 
Brexit clarification:The pellet with the poison was in the vessel with the pestle, the chalice from the palace had the brew that is true. But it broke and now the flagon with the dragon has the pellet with the poison. The vessel with the pestle has the brew that is true! 
The Tories took us into the common market. The Tories campaigned heavily to remain in the EU. Labour pledged in 1983 to leave the EU without a referendum.17.4m people are not represented by Jacob Rees-Mogg.Brexit isn't a 'Tory coup'.Brexit is a people revolt.The End. 
Blistering article in Germany's Handelsblatt: says after MPs rejected negotiated #Brexit deal again this week with no another prepared plan up their sleeve, even (the more conciliatory) Angela Merkel snapped. EU prepared to be tough on Brexit extension     
Brexit is now so toxic that it has tainted the U.K. permanently. Scotland has done her best to ease its passage - to no avail. Time now for us to look to our own future and become an independent nation once again. 
Another day, another Brexit something or other. I hope I love another 40 years to see what history makes of whatever the hell this is 
Given that the UK has successfully negotiated a Withdrawal Agreement with the EU, and parliament has twice voted it down, has the mandate of the referendum been discharged yet? 
My column in the ⁦@RutherglenRef⁩ - time for Nicola Sturgeon to stop the calls for another independence referendum. Need to concentrate on stopping the cuts, tackling poverty and getting the trains to run on time.  
#r4today @bbclaurakPlease report the following:@jeremycorbyn and @UKLabour have saved us from No Deal Brexit.@jeremycorbyn and @UKLabour have saved us from No Deal Brexit.@jeremycorbyn and @UKLabour have saved us from No Deal Brexit. 
We need a Brexit Party Alliance now.Put away your differences now & unite in a grand alliance.You're Country needs you. 
.@SusannaReid100 Why do you keep making the point to Labour politicians that 60% of Labour constituentcies voted for Brexit? Do you realise these were bc of Tory voters and that polls show not one Labour constituentcy would vote Leave now? 
When I did my politics A-Level in 1990, collective cabinet responsibility was an inviolate foundation stone of our democracy. It isn’t anymore. Whatever happens next, we will be sifting through the wreckage of Brexit for years & the men responsible for it will barely be affected. 
Brexiters may now have scuppered their own Brexit.We are in grave danger of crashing out with No Deal by default. Our bargaining power is in the bin. And all because swivel eyed loons were on TV day in day out screaming “ARTICLE 50! NOW!” 
Ach, German headlines #Brexit #BrexitMayhem @theresa_may 
On CNBC late last night after the Commons #Brexit votes:May's Brexit deal is 'terrible' for Scotland: Scottish politician  
"We're in a Hotel California Brexit, where we've checked out, but never get to leave."ERG member @ABridgen says parliament is "completely out of step with the British people", after it voted against a no-deal #Brexit. Follow the latest fallout here:  
All attempts to resolve the #Brexit crisis simply make matters worse. Revoke Article 50. Better to save the country than to chuck it off a cliff to save face. #RevokeArticle50 
SHAMEFUL: Remainer Ministers face calls to quit after abstaining on No Deal Brexit. “They should resign, or be sacked.”  
The death of irony: while Brexit is the most expensive & divisive act of stupidity in British history we get this from Brexiters: “Cross-party MPs led by the Tory ERG have tabled an amendment branding the idea of a second poll 'divisive and expensive’.” - Beat that! 
.⁦@nnougayrede⁩: ‘Brexit saga isn’t just about a negotiation gone awry..the wider question is about what kind of world we want to live in..Trump’s US is intimately intertwined with the Brexiter vision of Britain’  
A few of us, based on wide reading & talks with civil servants, have tried to convey true extent of UK's no-deal preparations. But our voices unheard as gullible anti-Brexit MPs and hacks promote "crash-out" nonsense - as @PhilipHammondUK did yesterday. 
Clearly time for this shambolic Tory government to step down and let Jeremy Corbyn implement Tory Brexit. 
Only 88 of 650 MPs voted against Theresa May's dreadful 'Withdrawal Agreement' and to keep a 'no deal' WTO Brexit on the table. There is an yawning gulf between most of the current batch of MPs and the people. It's time they got the boot. 
No referendum from Labour, they lied.  
Is this it forever now? Never-ending Brexit, biology prohibited, Corbyn eternal leader of the opposition, sanitized Tories 'in charge' by default, BBC liberals charging the country for daily reminders of how thick and racist everyone is? Enjoy! 
Brexiters are an inch away from their inevitable final reckoning. Do they cling to their impossible, contradictory dreams or vote for the only achievable Brexit, which is rubbish by all their own measures? I think they’ll mostly fold & forever lie that it could have been better. 
Dear @RegSprecher,Dear @HeikoMaas, The UK parliament wishing away no-deal #Brexit will not actually make it less likely. You must now finally instruct the @EU_Commission via the @EUCouncil to ring-fence the #citizensrights part of the Withdrawal Agreement. #RescueOurRights 
Any Member of Parliament who voted to take #NoDealBrexit off the table is the type of individual who would pay full price for a DFS sofa.The ability to walk away is the most powerful strategy in any negotiation toolkit.#Brexit #StandUp4Brexit #WTOBrexit 
The default position for ANY @Conservatives should always be #democracy & #freedom#Brexit has PROVED the Party has been hijacked by otherwise unelectable centrists. 
Millions of working-class people voted for Brexit because they have the most to gain from Brexit. The reason the elite hate Brexit so much is that it has given ordinary people a voice, writes @jowilliams293 
Liz Truss said there shouldn't be a 2nd referendum because no one has changed their mind about Brexit...What about people who have changed their minds on Brexit? - “I don’t think people have changed their minds” You have - “I have, thats true…”#BrexitCrisis 
MPs 3 votes, The People 1 vote to hand over a blank cheque, no second, better, more informed chances allowed. This is a travesty. “Brexit votes latest: Theresa May to hold third vote on deal next week after two humiliating defeats” - Evening Standard  
Then perhaps Mark Carney should have encouraged the government to get on with Brexit, instead of doing his best to sabotage it, yeah? Not that I believe these figures of course. They are based on projections the bank repeatedly gets wrong. Totally unverifiable.  
"Would having a new referendum & voting to remain in the EU after all respect the outcome of the referendum?"Would 22%Would not 57%Don't know 21%Leavers 81% "would not", Remainers break 43-37 "would not"YouGov Mar 13 
Dark humour for dark times #brexit #unicorn 
So the exciting new socialist, principled, Labour leadership of Jeremy Corbyn is taking it to the Tories ..... by proposing to cooperate with them to deliver Brexit? Ignoring Labour members and voters, and Labour policy as decided by their Conference?Have I got that right? 
We have been betrayed by conservatives.We have been betrayed by Labour.We have been betrayed by remoaners who can’t accept Brexit.Shows they do not represent no one apart from selfs interests.Like I’ve said before do not vote for conservatives and labour vote for UKIP. 
Last night's 'no deal vote' is NOT legally binding. However the spectacle of the British Parliament in open rebellion against the democratic outcome of a referendum should be remembered by us all for many years to come.  
No my friends, EU leaders will not ‘demand #Brexit is delayed for years’, in fact, they may not all agree in the vote when asked by the UK, for which unanimity is needed....  
Well its looking pretty certain now that the @UKLabour leadership is about to totally abandon its unanimous voted for composite party motion option of a public vote aka the 2nd Referendum/peoples vote.@Keir_Starmer = your a huge disappointment 
Yes please kiss it or kick it goodbye: “MPs to vote on Article 50 extension as May warns they might be kissing Brexit goodbye” - Sky News   
I actually voted the way this guy asked me to. The madness of BREXIT means he will figure this out at some point today and call me a ‘hero’. Who would be an MP example #562:  
The reason for a 2nd referendum is *not* about a different result. Reason for it is to have a referendum that is no based on lies--deceit--& total lack of information. (Quite apart from possible criminal interference). In that sense it would actually be a first proper referendum. 
Hi @JeremyCorbyn,I want you to know I'm not stressed about putting pressure on you to support a new referendum; because I know that you know what happens if Brexit happens and you haven't convinced your overwhelmingly pro-EU party that you did all you could to get a Public Vote.  
GIVE Radio 4 ‘Thought for the Day’ fans a taste of their own medicine by interrupting a church service and wanging on about Brexit. 
Woman on Radio 4 currently making complex comparison between Lent, moving house and Brexit. It’s 2019, the government is one fire, and we are still giving airtime to Thought For The Day. 
It's not just Theresa May: the Conservative Party, in general, is squandering the opportunity of Brexit. Leading article in the new @spectator: 
May’s gamble seems to be that by the time the ERG headbangers realise what is obvious to sentient beings - namely, that the EU has been telling the truth for 3 years - the only Brexit left will be hers. From a Remainer perspective it is, in the short term, the least bad Brexit. 
The route to a second referendum lies through exhausting all Brexit options - here's why the Tories are evaporating in office  
What a treat. A (personal) opinion on Brexit from the British Advocate-General at the ECJ... for free and without a case even being brought! She thinks British elections to the European Parliament might NOT be needed for an extension beyond 23rd May.  
Excellent interview by @Femi_Sorry just now on @bbcworldservice - calmly demolishing the myths and misconceptions around Brexit and the necessity of holding a #PeoplesVote. Keep going, Femi - we need you! 
Funny that Theresa May says of a second referendum, it would be “politicians telling people they got it wrong and to vote again”, but has no embarrassment at putting her deal to a vote again and again and again 
I will do all I can to respect the democratic decision to leave the EU which was made in the 2016 Referendum and Parliament’s decision to trigger A50 and take us out of the EU on 29th March 2019.  
Magic #brexit moment! Countdown symmetry!15 15 15 15#satisfying @GMB 
On @BBCr4today just now @johnmcdonnellMP arguing for a Tory-Labour ‘compromise deal’ on Brexit.No, John... not more of this. Anything substantially different from May’s deal is a whole new long negotiation.Stop going in circles.It’s time to #RevokeArticle50 
.@BBCr4today Why are you quoting the Telegraph lies about a ‘secret plot’ to stop Brexit? Our MPs are making decisions in the open, unlike the Brexiters who are travelling to European capitals plotting with their far-right friends to undermine Parliament’s decisions 
Listening to @johnmcdonnellMP selling out on a @peoplesvote_uk on @BBCr4today in defiance of his @UKLabour party policy to put #Brexit back to the British people. More broken promises, more broken politics. The only way forward is #PeoplesVote#TimeForChange @TheIndGroup 
Brexit debate rather scary in how it shows how belief in democracy has been diluted. Many reasons to criticize process but those I hear are deeply authoritarian: 
The political significance of @JeremyCorbyn cannot be underestimated or denied.If he wasn’t leading @UKLabour there would have been no General Election.Because of that General Election, @CONservatives lost their majority and their path to a Tory Brexit.JC is now the key. 
Good morning Mr Bridgen."We're not gonna Brexit.#RevokeArticle50 #StopBrexit 
"No regrets" from activist Gina Miller after more #Brexit drama last night in the commons:"We are where we are because we have a prime minister who is disrespecting her colleagues and bullying the house."#5liveBreakfast 
Just a reminder for TIG, the Lib Dems, @SNP #FBPE and the media...there has never been a majority for a 2nd referendum in parliament. That is why the only show in town is Corbyn & his customs union. The only deal that can get through & has EU backing. #GeneralElectionNow 
“Has he gone to Oxford, to the Mini plant, and said ‘I know what BMW are thinking if there is a no-deal Brexit, but I want it so badly, this no-deal Brexit, that I really don’t care about your job’?”  
Listening to UK media this morning about today's "delay" vote, it's sort of generally presumed the EU will of course accept any demand, because "they need us more etc etc" Not necessarily so :) Only "yes" if for 2nd referendum according to this poll :) Otherwise, it's a "no"  
Interesting take on Brexit by an Aussie who has been living in London for a while, eg.“the truly strange thing about the constant accumulation of information on Brexit is that it never amounts to knowledge”  
Competition time!!  To enter just comment 'win' on this post (A RT isn't essential but would be nice!) - Ends Friday 6pm - Good luck!#competition #giveaway #lovebooks #Brexit #win 
Breaking news. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg will try to filibuster any attempt to block a no Deal Brexit on March 29 by talking about his collection of English-only spoons for 15 days  
It is black and white. Anything that causes this much social, political and economic damage is manifestly evil. Nothing will magically turn Brexit into a good. 
Seriously @SusannaReid100 why do you never mention the at least £10m criminal electoral fraud that stole the EU referendum referred to the police and National Crime Agency?  
Meaningful Vote 3 confirmed for next week, then potentially a Meaningful Vote 4 just before the March 29th deadline if the government loses Meaningful Vote 3.Brexit means Banana Republic.#MeaningfulVote 
Do lawyers get to charge two fees if they give two different pieces of advice on the same document? ERG signals it could back May's Brexit deal if legal advice is clearer | Politics | The Guardian  
Emotions running very high amongst politicians both sides of Channel with days to go now till official #Brexit day   
It should not be up to a crowd-funded group of ordinary people to remind the country of the blatant lies uttered by the Brexit politicians (though, it's brilliant that they are doing so).OUR MEDIA SHOULD BE DOING IT.  
Last night @Kirstene4Angus in favour of a No Deal #Brexit. Angus voted 55% to Remain in the EU and Scotland as a whole voted overwhelmingly to Remain by 62% - Kirstene Hair and the rest of the @ScotTories are ignoring the will of the people of Scotland and of their constituents. 
Day #3 & here is @theSNP amendment. Extending #Art50 must be for a purpose - a #PeoplesVote with #Remain on the ballot paper. #Scotland’s voice must be respected & the best way to protect #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope is #Independence. #Brexit #Indyref2 
The Bank of England announced that voting to leave the EU has cost Britain more than £440 million a week in lost growth since the referendum, thats £727 per second.We have created a running total to show how much that figure has totalled so far. 
Brexit  
Alongside a cross-party group of 110 MPs, I’ve signed an amendment that proposes that Parliament rules out a second referendum on Brexit.As I have said previously Parliament must honour the decision made in 2016.  
Hi @AngelaRayner.You called a #PeoplesVote a 'disaster' on You promised to look at our letter, we've not had a reply.We can only assume that means you have chosen to cut billions from your planned education reforms to back #Brexit instead?   
Good morning, everyone. Another #Brexit day ahead.  
Never mind a Hotel California Brexit. We now have a Spice Girls Brexit.                                               EU: So TELL us what you want, what you really, really want.      UK: We wanna.. we wanna  wanna.. we wanna ..we really, really REALLY wanna..  zig-a-zig hah?? 
Rules clear that motions can’t be tabled twice in a session. Mrs May was able to hold Meaningful Vote 2 because of legal changes to her deal since MV1EU won’t agree further legal changes so she needs another substantive change. An idea: say it will pass subject to a referendum 
'Like Titanic voting to remove the iceberg': How Europe reacted to MPs' rejection of no-deal Brexit #BrexitMayhem 
French delegation of honorary members of Parliament, representatives of municipal authorities arrived in #Crimea to celebrate the 5th anniversary of the All-Crimean #Referendum and the Day of the Reunification of Crimea with #Russia.#CrimeanSpring 
What I don’t understand is that government won’t allow a second referendum as it’s not democratic: we’re told we must respect the first vote. Then Why can the PM’s deal come back for a third time after being beaten twice! Just asking?  
Commentators are now admitting the numbers simply aren’t there for a second referendum. Months and months of abuse thrown at @JeremyCorbyn and they finally admit what we’ve been saying, and what we’ve known, all along is true. No wonder our media is not trusted. 
Extraordinary Question...Corbyn “how will the Prime Minister be voting tonight?”Theresa May “I’ll be voting for the motion standing in my name”But she voted against herself, Theresa May voted for the carnage of No Deal Brexit the Prime Minister voted to Destroy Britain   
There never was a mandate for Brexit. 50 million Brits never voted to leave the EU.Now parliament has ruled out the deal we negotiated and has ruled out leaving with no deal as well. Any further prevarication is unseemly. Either revoke article 50 or have a referendum.  
If May can ask the same question three times, the people should be able to vote a second time#brexitmayhemTheresa May issues ultimatum after MPs ditch no-deal Brexit  
May has indicated in her Brexit delay motion today that she intends to get her deal passed by next Wednesday. Safe to say, given how PM has handled deadlines, that MV3 will be on Weds then  
Those accusing @UKLabour of betrayal, here is what was in our manifesto:“Labour accepts the referendum result [to leave]... and will put the national interest first... leaving the EU with ‘no deal’ is the worst possible deal. We will reject ‘no deal’...” #r4today #skypapers 
Bored of this narrative of ‘betrayal.’Brextremists made undeliverable promises in the referendum. They can’t now deliver them.Game over. 
Translation - Cairns voted for the Tory party to compromise with itself The future of Wales is collateral damage in a #NoDeal #Brexit#brokenwestminster 
I’ve just read the funniest tweet ever! Some bloke on here reckons that if there was a second referendum then Remain would win! Almost as deluded as @theresa_may thinking she can survive as PM! #DrainTheSwamp 
Yet again, NO mention of a #PeoplesVote in Jeremy Corbyn’s amendment to today’s #Brexit motion - still pushing his plan to facilitate a job destroying #Brexit. Support a different approach and a clear commitment to a #PeoplesVote here  
Tory Brexiter John Redwood threatened a public revolt against Parliament if MPs voted to block a no-deal Brexit. Redwood is hardly a man of the people - he is a self-interested expenses cheat who advised investors to take their money out of the UK because of Brexit #BrexitChaos 
One of the many annoying things about #BrexitMayhem is how no-one in the establishment - politicians, journalists - seems to have predicted the mess.BUT SOME OF US DID.I wrote about the backstop problem in 2016 - just ONE MONTH after the Brexit vote: 
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you  
Brexiters, you’ve had more than your chance and so much more respect than you deserved: £Bns spent, lives upended, jobs gone, rights threatened, reputation damaged, division set in... Truth is.... *real* Brexit is shit and no-one should want that for our country.#RevokeA50Now 
People who are saying but *Labour lost in 2017*The moment we took away her majority is the moment a tory Brexit was impossible. 
So far, the people haven't seen a lick of benefit from Brexit, only cost and uncertainty. If it were cancelled and positive things immediately started happening, all over the country, it's easy to imagine the collective mood swinging back towards a semblance of normality. 
Despite Geoffrey Cox’s magical unicorn, Mrs May’s deal will not deliver Brexit 
As I have repeated ad nauseam there was never any intention to take us out.The political class are dedicated remainers.Supported by MSM, with your BBC taking the anti Brexit lead role.  
IF WE DON'T LEAVE THE EU THE UK IS NO LONGER A DEMOCRACY. Westminster politicians do not have the right to trump the will of the British people with regard to Brexit. Millions of us have had enough of their shenanigans and the interminable delays and game playing. #LIBERTY 
Essential reading. May’s former adviser Nick Timothy’s devastating analysis of the errors made by May. She has indeed been a total disaster in how she has botched Brexit. She must accept responsibility and resign.   
I see little prospect of any likely government being able to negotiate a remotely sensible post Withdrawal Agreement Brexit Deal.We will be marooned in transition for the foreseeable future.Time for a long delay. 
A Brexit voter speaking about Brexit while sitting in a pub in Benidorm: “Europe needs us more than we need Europe.” 
This will drive people nuts, and I stress that I don't have a view one way or the other — but surely the only role now for MPs is to tell the electorate they are voting to cancel the result of the referendum. I just can't work out any logical alternative. 
I must be one of the biggest Brexit connoisseurs in the country but the storyline isn’t half getting confusing. 
There should have been an intelligence test to be allowed to vote on Brexit with a very high threshold 
4. The only secure way to avoid no deal completely, other than with a deal which may not survive its full term, is revocation. Legal experts are clear that revocation requires law due to the way Brexit was authorised. Revocation is not yet being voted on with 12 sitting days left 
Brexit Explainers for Thurs March 14 2019:1. Last night’s vote does not prevent no deal: only having a deal in place or revocation does this. Even extension only shifts the date until one of these two things occurs. 
Let’s be clear what Geoffrey Cox is rumoured to be preparing: advice that the Irish backstop could be junked by Britain withdrawing from its Brexit treaty with the EUWhy would the EU, or anyone bigger than us, ever negotiate with us again if we junk agreements we don’t like? 
“The simple truth is she knows she has to deliver Brexit. That's a duty, and she will do so. And she'll have to weave her way through all sorts of obstacles put in place by Remainer MPs who are being disingenuous” @DavidDavisMP#StandUp4Brexit 
After everything that has been said of the carnage  No Deal Brexit would cause, the apocalyptic harm it would cause.. Theresa May voted for it... Why is this not the main headline??? Just extraordinary!!!Theresa May Voted to Destroy Britain  
12 of our Scottish MPs voted for a disastrous no deal BREXIT. They ignored their constituents and they ignored Scotland.  
Andrew Bridgen at his most ‘will of the people’ moronic on #r4today - not that he’s prepared to test that will... or admit that Brexit is a failed liefest of epically shameful proportions. No. Just ‘will of the people’. So fucking boring and irrelevant now. 
After betrayal of majority public vote on Brexit by self serving MPs in #Parliament which political party will you vote for in general election?Please Retweet#Brexit #BrexitVote #BrexitMayhem #BrexitBetrayal 
Finally, the penny is dropping.Parliament has the moral mandate to #RevokeArticle50Now as it is sovereign, the referendum was advisory (and would have been overturned if it was binding) and MPs job is literally to make decisions for the country. 
What's particularly upsetting about #Brexit is that we are suffering the old curse of "May you live in interesting times" except it is also *really boring*. 
BREXIT: WHAT IS GOING ON?! LAST NIGHT: MPs voted to reject no-deal Brexit TODAY: MPs vote on a #Brexit delay NEXT FEW DAYS: MPs vote on Theresa May's deal for a THIRD time 29th MARCH: if nothing changes the UK still leaves the EU without a deal  #BBCBreakfast 
Yvette Cooper:-- opposes a 2nd referendum-- ardently opposes freedom of movement-- doesn't seem to stand for anything at all except continuity Brownite machine politics.Don't get me wrong, I rate her pretty highly.But she is not what these people are looking for!  
Vote this deal or lose Brexit.Dear Prime Minister.  If we wanted this deal, we’d have voted to Remain!Thanks but no thanks! #TeamBrexit must hold firm! #BrexitinLegalTextOnly  
Theresa May the Tories and their media militia would rather YOU lived in No Deal Brexit armaggedon than cede an inch of power.. trick is to convince you armaggedon is a nice place  that’s the media job  
What a joke: @BBCScotlandNews #bbcgms Andrew Kerr talking about a ‘Brexit Dividend’ City boy guest: ‘UK finances much better’ that’s crap, debt higher than 2007; posh says: agriculture insignificant part of ‘the country’s economy’ What country? Scotland?Biassed state radio 
The sheer absurdity of Theresa May holding Meaningful Votes until she wins one despite heavy defeats......while insisting the UK is forever bound by a nearly three-year old referendum result which only had a flimsy 52:48  majority. 
Want to know why Theresa May’s deal won’t die? One reason is that Labour refuses to back a second referendum and says it wants to find “consensus in the House”.  
Pump up the Jam,Pump it up, Pump it up,Yo pump it.#BrexitMayhem#Brexit#nodeal#jamforbrexit 
Praying for all tweeps, for an end to the #Brexit chaos, and for the comforting of the families of the children killed in the #Lagos school collapse. #prayer 
Jeremy Corbyn’s Manifesto of Hope of change took Theresa May’s majority and saved the country from Brexit, Corbyn offers Customs Union to Unite the country parliament and the EU and save our economy, Corbyn will back a People’s Vote.. he’s the only one  
Spot-on Lionel Shriver. It’s neither right-wing nor extremist to want to leave the EU. The referendum told us what a lot of us knew for a long time: wanting to leave is normal and mainstream. It’s the politicians now blocking it who are the hideous anti-democratic extremists.  
Signed by @CarolineFlintMP and @gareth_snell, here's the wrecking amendment designed to kill off a 2nd referendum for good today. Speaker will  surely select with lots  of names.  
The lone MP who noted yesterday: "Does the will of the House trump the will of the people" states the key point in the Brexit debacle. The Commons is now acting in an anti-democratic fashion. #LIBERTY 
Never give up your right to vote. Should a second referendum be put on table vote leave again. I have been in countries where people risk their lives to vote. This is not the country I have fought for, Treacherous MPs have betrayed us and hamstrung our negotiations it’s not over  
‘I will repeat what I have said before’ - the title of Theresa May’s memoirs. Maybe the only words in the whole book, after ‘Brexit means Brexit’ 
The Corbyn compromise could be the way forward. European council president signals Corbyn’s deal is the only way to stop no-deal Brexit  
#Westminster has become a swamp full of Quislings & traitors who have forgotten who they are, who put them ther & why they are there.The next election will be a political bloodbath.This whole rancid nest needs purging of those who hold the #British public in contempt. #Brexit 
“They defied the people, they defied democracy, they are not fit for purpose” – Our #Brexit verdict on last night’s Remoaner nonsense. Read it here: #GoWTO 
John McDonnell tells GMB that Labour would back a second EU referendum "if there was a logjam in Parliament that had to be broken ... that's the only reason it would happen". 
The SNP have called on the “shameful” and sleekit Fluffy Mundell to resign after he failed to stand up for Scotland and didn’t vote against a no-deal Brexit 
With MPs trying to thwart Brexit, what should Leave voters do now? @JuliaHB1 |  
So if the EU refuses to extend article 50 then there's only a few options left for the UK. Which of these options do you think are the most possible to happen? #BrexitMayhem #BrexitVote #BrexitBetrayal #BrexitShambles #Brexit #PoliticsToday 
Why?! I mean why?! Because everything’s so bl**dy perfect now?! What is she on?!What about all the young people that couldn’t vote in 2016 but can vote now? It’s the young people who will have their careers f*ck*d by Brexit.   Don’t they deserve a vote now?  
HOUSE OF TRAITORS: Britain's Elite MPs BLOCK No Deal Brexit Despite Mass Support  via @Politicalite 
There is nothing sane or responsible about the way May’s govt is behaving. It deserves condemnation for bringing the country to its knees. The only sane and responsible step to take now in the public interest is to accept Brexit failed & revoke Article 50. 
(Sorry poor Audio)Yesterday on @BBCRadioScot I got the chance to tell Andrew Bridgen that "we're not  going to Brexit".He says that donkeys bray - I said that "We're lead by donkeys"lead @ByDonkeys 
Quite remarkable that Theresa May can take her own terrible Brexit deal back to parliament for a third meaningful vote to try and force it through, when she insists it would be anti-democratic to give the public a second vote on the actual terms of Brexit. #r4today 
Could I please swap Meaningful Vote 3 for Meaningful Referendum 2? 
Mrs May’s loss of control of Brexit intensifies today when MPs vote for an extension of the Art 50 negotiating period 
Latest:There will be a FREE VOTE on the government’s motion this afternoon to delay Brexit for an indeterminate period Decisions on amendments will happen later when they’re selected 
Nobody wants this Brexit - it's time to grow up, and ditch this miscarriage of democracy - Mirror Online.  
Two weeks to BREXIT! Another day of political chaos dawns: We shall be trying to make sense of it out on Parliament’s green at 7 on 4 
Brexit is already dead. But May is determined to trap us in a dungeon with its corpse. 
As someone who voted remain, but wanting the whole Brexit debacle over with, so that we can get on with the business of repairing our country, this, by @jeremycorbyn shows more leadership than the PM ever has.#GeneralElectionNow #JC4PM2019  
So just a quick Brexit recap:* The deal (Δ) is what May wanted* No-deal (¬Δ) is what will happen by default on March 29* No no-deal (¬¬Δ) is the motion introduced by May* Against no no-deal (¬¬¬Δ) is what May instructed her own MPs to vote.* ¬¬¬¬Δ is what eventually happened 
Good morning! Please join me for my #NoNonsense @talkRADIO breakfast show from 6.30am to 10am. We’ll be talking about how MPs have decided that they know better than us silly voters & are planning to stop Brexit. Plus knife crime cash, grounded planes & Cyril Smith abuse.  
Extraordinary times: - May’s ultimatum to MPs: her deal (it’s not dead - it’ll be back next week) or a long delay to #Brexit - extension vote could see MPs take control- cabinet ministers defy the PM as party discipline breaks down - new talks with DUP for final push 
Brexit has shown MPs are out of sync with the electorate + it’s not just on Brexit it’s on many levelsNeed more direct rule, more referendums. Most of these MPs are fools. We can procure more collective wisdom from a referendum than from the zoo that is our Houses of Parliament  
Brexit has broken the government. Even IDS says so.And it's breaking businesses and families and the UK too.Mate... if something causes such massive collateral damage to absolutely everything it touches, then maybe, just maybe, it isn't a wonderful idea?  
Tick-tock: #Brexit is coming to its H-hour...  
Brexit: how would an extension to article 50 work?  
Where’s our second vote when May’s giving MPs a third and possibly a fourth on a Brexit bad deal? Discussing the PM’s desperate hypocrisy on @GMB in a mo 
Opinion: Theresa May has lost control of Brexit. She's in office, but not in power  
'The nightmare #32. Ad nauseum'. @roweafr's latest cartoon. For more:  #Brexit  
Apparently a second referendum is outrageous, but @theresa_may is allowed to ask MPs to vote for her deal THREE times?  #BrexitMayhem #Hypocrisy 
Excited to be part of debate this morning with Danish Foreign Minister @anderssamuelsen and pioneer tech ambassador @DKTechAmb. But after following overnight Brexit coverage that cursor has been flashing for some time ...  
Can you Owen Paterson show us one instance during the referendum campaign when the Leave campaigns promised a no-deal #brexit? I recall you lot saying it would all be easy. It is #LeaveLies that are wrecking our democracy. The worst of the liars should be jailed. 
Brexiteers against Brexit  
NEW PODCAST PLEASE RETWEET. Theresa May isn't the only Traitor in Westminster. Why don't our leaders like @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn and the rest not love and value our country like we do? They are all traitors. We need to #brexit on #WTO terms.  … 
Sammy J helps us flex our foreign muscles with a brand new flow straight out of Europe. #Brexit #SammyJ 
(Links to cost of 2016 Referendum  and sum allocated to No Deal prep ). 
I note that Brexiters are now complaining about the cost of a public vote ().We spent £130m on the 2016 referendum, less than 4% of the £3.5bn Hammond allocated to prepare for the No Deal Parliament yesterday ruled out.  
Am I the only person in the world who is bored to death about this Brexit saga?  
#BrexitBetrayal 17.4 million people voted leave the crumbling EU. We all voted to leave on March 29. All you POLITICIANS do is argue with each other in Parliament. All trying stop and derail Brexit. No one trusts any of you all say one thing do something different.   
Drama turns to farce and now inclines to tragedy as Brexit shambles onwards. 
If the latest Tory revolt against Brexit kills referendumresult the party will never be forgiven by voters 
Croydon North MP @SteveReedMP voted against a no-deal Brexit against the wishes of the biggest vote in British history.  Steve stands guilty of betraying our democracy.  
British lawmakers overwhelmingly rejected leaving the European Union without a deal, paving the way for a vote to delay Brexit to seek a way out of Britain's worst political crisis in generations.  
Croydon Central MP @LabourSJ voted against a no-deal Brexit against the biggest vote in British history and the wishes of her leave voting constituency.  Sarah stands guilty of betraying our democracy.  
If anybody thinks that an Article 50 extension of 3 ,6 , 9 months 1 or 2 years will stop this Parliamentary bickering is either stupid or naive. It could however give the ’Establishment’more time to plot the downfall and general betrayal of the EU Referendum Vote?Your Views? 
The latest Brexit developments summarised:The government whipped against itself and lost. This may increase their chance of passing their deal.We’re through the looking glass. 
“Eighty-six per cent of MPs were elected in 2017 on manifestos promising to honour the referendum result. ...This goes beyond Brexit: they are delegitimising our system of government.” 
It’s #ThrowbackThursday, this #comicstrip from the archives now feels somewhat #Brexit inspired... #tbt #webcomics 
Don’t like it when played at their own game, do they? Speaks to wider issue of precedents being set. Remainers happy for Parliament to revoke #Brexit. What happens when it’s a cause they’re in favour of? Democratic principles are not issue dependant. @SamWhiteTky @Fox_Claire 
'If the EU was hated by 17.4mn people on Referendum Day it only got more visceral not less' (Op-Ed by @georgegalloway) 
Jeremy Corbyn address parliament after #Brexit vote takes no-deal option off the table  
Delighted to join the lively dinner panel last night with @Alltech’s @mpl17, Matthew Smith and Philip Wilkinson OBE. From Brexit and bugs to sustainability and supply chain, we covered much ground and stellar hosting from @jy_simpson. #VIVAsia 
#Brexit chaos - is that your interpretation? Tell us what you think #BBCTheBriefing - we are at Westminster again this morning.  It’s warmer but wet  
I seem to remember that the day AFTER the referendum, the remoaners were trying to push the 'but the people have now changed their minds' argument, THE VERY NEXT DAY.Does that not hint at dishonesty and desperation? It also devalues the claim. 
The Brits couldn't even Partition right, what makes you think they're gonna do Brexit right? 
The next steps in Brexit's unfolding drama  
Theresa May has lost control of Brexit -- and now anything is possible  
Within hours of the 2016 vote, Jason Kenney was happily proclaiming Brexit a wonderful idea for the British people. Less than three years later, he's too circumspect to figure out his position on his home town's top infrastructure priority.  #yyccc #Springbank 
China offered on Wednesday to help #Venezuela restore its power grid, after President Nicolas Maduro accused U.S. of “sabotage” that plunged the Venezuela into its worst blackout on record#VenezuelaCoup #RegimeChange Fail Ted Cruz #MarcoRubio #Pompeo #Brexit #YellowVestUk 
MPs to vote on Article 50 extension as May warns they might be kissing Brexit goodbye  
Frankly, we need more politicians like @jessphillips with the honesty & courage to talk straight and treat people like adults, and less like Angela, too frit to even ask her constituents if they want a form of Brexit that would mean less UK sovereignty in decision-making.Ugh 
European council president Donald Tusk has signalled that Jeremy Corbyn’s proposals are the only way to stop a no-deal Brexit.  
"Put it back to the people." "These proposals must include another EU referendum"  
Britain’s agonizing national humiliation over Brexit continues:  
Peter Hall argues that any hope in the United Kingdom for a better Brexit deal has always been a fantasy: 
Brexit is 379 hours away. #brexit 
Hopefully nobody will see #Brexit.  Brexit is no longer the will of the people. #PeoplesVote 
Parliament rejects no-deal Brexit, now will vote on delaying  
Nearly 3 years after the Brexit vote…has anyone calculated what the UK has burned through trying to figure out how to make this exit work?  
A little bit from my London walkabout today...I had a great time in the city and the people were amazing! Good luck with all that Brexit stuff too... @davematthewsbnd…  
How did the British Parliament end up in this incompetent Brexit mess? They could learn from some of the colonies 
The next election will be a referendum on wages. It will be a choice between the Morrison government, who is pursuing a deliberate strategy to keep wages down, and Shorten Labor who'll get wages growth moving again.  
Can Parliament oppose the Prime Minister, or will it always toe the PM's line? UK votes on Brexit show how legislature can maintain its independence, and even vote against things that the government proposes. Our MLAs and MPs, on the other hand, are completely bound by party. 
The call for a Unity Referendum was heard on the streets of Toronto at its annual St. Patrick's Day Parade.  
British voters want Theresa May to resign as prime minister following the humiliating defeat of her Brexit deal, according to our poll with Habury of 500 Britons  
Going tae make a prediction. Brexit will not happen. UK will remain in the EU, but like a cowed dog after a beating. Scotland will get it's referendum and will not want to be part of this broken Union (of thick arseholes)We will vote for Independence. I'm never wrong. 
Every month we extend #Brexit by the EU want to charge us £1billion per month. On top of the so called £39b divorce bill. That's 160,000 hip replacements, 16,000 social homes or 22,000 teachers. How about we just leave. And keep all our money & spend it on this country?#WTOBrexit 
 #instagramdown #PZvQG #FalseAllegations #Brexit #CKMKB #InstagramBlackout2019#JohnnyDepp is one of countless victims of fake molestation allegations. MeToo is a failure, a tool to harass men. I take pledge not to believe   again. Punish those fake accuser women 
Theresa May says she will allow MPs a vote on whether to extend the Article 50 negotiating period to delay Brexit beyond 29 March.Prof Bruce Wilson from @RMIT_EU_CENTRE: There will certainly be an extension, the question is, what is the purpose of it.  
UK MPs have voted to rule out a no-deal Brexit in all circumstances. Prof Bruce Wilson from @RMIT_EU_CENTRE: You've got a very divided set of opinions in the House Of Commons and the country about the best course of action.MORE:  
OPINION: Bill Shorten is trying to make the federal election a referendum on wages growth, posing as the worker’s friend by championing a boost to the minimum wage. But don’t be fooled. Via @MirandaDevine 
Turns out, if you look at the #Brexit situation entirely from the #EU perspective and speak only to operatives of its institutions and citizens of its member states, #Britain doesn't come out well. And they all liked and respected us so much before!  
17 per cent of those who voted Yes in 2014 would vote No in any future referendum if SNP go ahead with their proposal to dump sterling in favour of a Scots currency. @cultfree54 @2351onthelist @JohnLeoNo1087 @edglasgow59 @CompoundAye @mik61scot @carmic3 @athomsonkinross @BRRSC 
i met ariana today but the highlight of my life so far is ... talking brexit with joan grande. 
Corbyn could kill Brexit in its tracks if he wanted to do. He doesn’t. All he wants is his version. He is despicable in his ideological selfishness 
Aussie Brexiteers offer great comic value. Having clamoured for Brexit, they blame the current shambles on Brexit's implementation, not Brexit itself. They remind me of old coms, who will admit communism has never worked anywhere but say that’s because communist govts sold out. 
Is Putin happier with how Brexit is going or Trump? 
I've heard some ridiculous stuff in the Brexit debate, but the idea that Jeremy Corbyn genuinely believes his Brexit deal could win a majority in the House of Commons is a strong contender for the top spot. 
my dumbass just learned brexit's not a person 
Brexit can only be considered, in its psychosis, as a quasi-religious 'folie en masse' . The political analogie of the St. Vitus Dance craziness. Brexit cannot be solved by politics or by legal means: it resides solidly in the realm of psychiatry. 
Theresa May and Brexit. #MontyPython #theholygrail #brexit #BrexitBetrayal #BrexitVote I was wondering if this needed a caption. I  prefer no captions. 
People may not agree with it, but Labour have a Brexit plan that would likely be acceptable to both the EU and the Commons.It’s completely disingenuous for the media (BBC in particular) to ignore that and instead seek to apportion half the blame for the Brexit mess on Labour. 
How inappropriate, so very UN. Why on earth do we allow our politicians to associate with this faction of bureaucratic deplorable monsters! Whilst the UN exists then so does the undermining of all sovereign capitalist democracies! Oz needs a referendum this election cut all ties!  
#Brexit - never before have so many been misled by so few 
Speaker John Bercow set to rule on blocking Theresa May's Brexit deal being voted on third time  
I am desperate to put my stupid vote for Brexit right . If #labour want my vote it will support a #peoplesvote with a #remain option 
During the whole brexit episode the UK govt has acted in absolute bad faith, to the British people, to Parlt and the EU, exploiting every nook & cranny of parliamentary procedures to get its way, informed by spite, party egotism , xenophobia and disrespect for the people. 
Brexit: facing up to consequences - the media is loving this mess, making them as bad as the politicians. But, while chaos reigns, the nation watches in despair. We are close to parting with democracy for good...  #Brexit.  
We are not a single issue Brexit only party. We are centrist and moderate, so would appeal to Lab and Con voters alike. We want to eventually govern this country, which we can only do if we avoid extreme politics. Britain is fractured and our hope is to heal that rift. 
A reminder for all the #Brexit people out there - the people of Western Australia in 1933 voted with a 66.23% majority to leave the Commonwealth. Keep up the pressure. 
Opposition leader Jeremy Corbyn addresses UK parliament after British lawmakers vote to rule out no-deal #Brexit  
#Brexit ? I'll let the cat talk.  
The British elites just stole Brexit away from the people  
The ERG should leave the party, collapse the rotten government, join a pro Brexit party and win by a landslide.Even the best in this worst group of conservative ever, won’t have the spine to do the right thing for the country and stop the betrayal. 
Lived in Italy 5+4 yrs; USA 23 yrs (Princeton: Boston, NYC; Denver); Mexico 1 yr; UK 17 years. Until recently felt comfortable as wordly Londoner. But Brexit broke my heart. This week fell in love again with NYC. A truly open city, with many defects, but no border/wall mentality.  
@AngelaRayner, there is nothing to respect about the outcome of a gerrymandered, advisory referendum, fought and won on proven lies and illegality. Stop trying to protect your career and start putting the INTERESTS of your constituents and your country first. #StopBrexit 
Th #Brexit is being blocked by legislators...Shocking that elected officials would promise to execute the will of the people, and then shirk their responsibility when the going gets tough... 
Nigel Farage, in what he hopes is his penultimate speech in the European Parliament, accurately predicts the outcome of Wednesday’s shambles in the UK Parliament. He also explains very clearly why a No-Deal Brexit remains the best way forward..  
Brexit crisis presents opportunity for Theresa May  
For this fishing town, Brexit can't come soon enough  
Billy boy hoping to ride EU gravy trainHe's jealous cause FF had d best corrupt Brown Envelopes collectors Haughey,Flynns,Bertie Lawlor,Bourke all paid by Banker & Developer friends then bailed out & foisted debt on Irish citizens,no fear of Brexit as Holidays approach 4 them  
After passing their vote against a no-deal Brexit, MPs are expected to demand that the government ask for more time  
One thing I will say about #Brexit; my appalling cynicism all these years stands utterly vindicated. 
It really has become the Parliament VS the people. They will do anything to steal #Brexit away from the British people in the greatest betrayal of democracy in the history of our country. It’s time to stand together and send them a message. Be in London on 29/30th march.  
Imagine if 17.4 million voted for a single “Brexit” party or coalitionThey would gain approx. 400 seats@Conservatives & @uklabour would be finishedWell deserved 
May and Corbyn will never back a second referendum – but MPs must | Anna Soubry  
Last night I voted to keep no-deal on the table. 75% of MPs voted that way last year,  but many MPs have now done the exact opposite & want to stop the UK leaving the EU. The duplicity is astounding at times. I’ll continue the fight to respect the referendum @Conservatives 
Brexit has been betrayed.  
Poland - we need you to veto any request from the UK government to extend Article 50. @PolandDaily #Poland #Brexit 
MPs voted to trigger Article 50 and leave on 29th March with or *without* a deal. The 'No deal vote' should never have happened. It happened so Govt could share blame for economic impact (No deal) or civil impact (Brexit delayed). Zero leadership. Party before democracy. 
May is insistent that non-binding votes by parliament on a No Deal Brexit do not need to be adhered to.May is insistent that the non-binding 2016 referendum results must be adhered to.Please unravel and reconcile that dichotomy #r4Today #C4News #newsnight #bbcnewsten 
Firstly, you won't.Brexit is dead because people like you were supposed to have the plan.You haven't. You never did.  
@andrew_lilico @UKLabour @Conservatives both EU fawning Treacherous Globalists maybe the Brexit Party will give us a voice 
The Tories are dead now, absolutely dead, I’ll never ever vote for you again.  I’ll be looking for a Brexit Party to vote for, hopefully Farage’s.  Hard to imagine that no party wants umpteen millions of Brexiteer votes come the next election.  Labour and Tories are finished. 
This sums up just about every conversation I’ve ever had with a British person. This is why I accurately predicted 2 yrs ago that #Brexit would never happen. It’s a very screwed up society.   
Am I the only one who finds U.S. media's coverage of Brexit amusing? The false sense of understanding British politics by virtue of speaking the same(ish) language coupled with utter ignorance about what the EU is about and how its legal order works. 
I suggest that every 5 November, Guy Fawkes be joined on the pyres by Nigel #Farage for the next 400 years. #Brexit #GunpowderPlot #Treason #Celebrity 
So many variables now . My mind is blown with Brexit .Been passionate supporter of you Steve but I’m losing the will now if honest.These remainers in Parliament seem to have every chess move, then the numbers to back it up.Any chance speaker selects 2nd ref amendment by Dodds? 
The Brexit clocks have been reset, but time's running out for the PM  
I asked this question several months ago, with mixed results..I’ll ask again with an added extension....do you believe May deliberately set out to sabotage Brexit and should she be arrested for treason? 
Watch #CBCTheNational LIVE for Wednesday, March 13, 2019 — 737 Bans, Ethiopia Investigation, Brexit No-Deal Vote  
"the conference decision was very clear".  Yeah it was, it said you'd back a second referendum. 
In plain sight..... Whilst treason-weasel Farage openly conspires against a sovereign Parliament with fellow fascists on the continent Closer to home, Vote Leave crook and far-right headbanger Steve Baker continues to revel in subverting UK democracy..... 
The 47 Tory MPs who rebelled against Theresa May and rejected no-deal Brexit  
6 new professor positions in Media and Communication at RMIT. Huge investment in the field and a great place to work. Escape Brexit, flee Trump, come and work with me: 
Our leaders don't believe in Britain, they don't think this country can stand on it's own two feet.Our democracy is being destroyed and the politicians we trusted to protect it are prepared to give it away.Make no mistake, we will defend our democracy. #Brexit #backbritain 
What do you know Kirsten ..you didn't even vote for Brexit or Remain, Why not?   Oh yeah you didn't understand it 
One of my fav podcasts that isn’t me listening to myself talk is ⁦@novaramedia⁩ and this episode on how Brexit is shaping Northern Irish and republican politics—hosted by ⁦⁦@michaeljswalker⁩ w Dan Finn and ⁦@ChrisHazzardSF—⁩is so good. 
May owns Brexit and we can get this float from Germany in time for the March. If you all chucked in a fiver or a tenner, we'd get there. Need the dosh super quick, but then its ours to use whenever. 2.8m tall btw!! #BrexitMayhem #BrexitCrisis 
Govt Ministers who broke 3 line whip to abstain on the main #Brexit Motion last night.AfolamiBucklandBurtClarkEllwoodGaukeHarringtonHammondJamesMundellRuddPerryDepending on their role, they get an extra £20k to £72k ON TOP of their MPs salary for these positions. 
How much longer are you going to pretend Labour proposes anything substantially different to May? Your promises about another referendum have proved to be false. You are offering to collaborate to deliver Brexit. Snake oil. 
Congratulations to the British Tories, who have now voted for Brexit and against Brexit on the very same day  
Tragic Grandpa is now the biggest obstacle left in stopping Brexit.He needs to be replaced or circumvented somehow. 
Mad this brexit mock fest is still on going  
Ex-Lib leader Lord Steele said today (under oath) he DID know that Cyril Smith abused children, because Smith told himIn1979Steele hushed it up, and has lied since; so it's a shame this news is being coincidentally drowned out by Brexit.  @MailOnline 
Should the 4 Cabinet Ministers who abstained in the #Brexit vote resign? Please retweet after voting for greater sample@SocialM85897394 #Brexit #StandUp4Brexit #Conservatives#BrexitDeal #NoDealBrexit 
Here on the other side of the world people still want to talk to me about Brexit with a LOLOLLLL UK AMIRITE? LOST THEIR DAMN MINDS, SRSLY WTF AHAHA kind of vibe.And listen, no. I can’t.It is a tragedy beyond speaking. I am genuinely afraid & manifestly heartbroken. 
BREXIT means - One advisory vote is sacrosanct, even if illegalbut for a meaningful vote, you can have three or maybe even four do-overs to get what you wantUK Democracy a laughing stock 
Watching Yes/No-Inside the Indy Ref. It occurs to me that Better Together went from a 30% lead to only a 10% win. Which doesn't bode well for them for #indyref2. They're not going to increase support for the union, in the post Brexit world. 
Pound soars against euro and dollar after MPs reject no-deal Brexit  
This day of parliamentary blubbering was nothing, compared to the delights that await us when the corruptatrons of Westminster awake & resume their war on #Brexit.It's good they sleep, let's the nation breathe some clean air for a few hours.#OnceMoreUntoTheBreachDearFriends 
It is indeed, Nigel. Your Russian backed and US hedge fund bankrolled Brexit is a betrayal, and when this shameful chapter of history is written, you be forever associated with it.  
Very disappointing from a man who knows more than most how corrupt the Brexit referendum was.  
HELLO!!! 
Periodic reminder that changing her Brexit red lines - which lots of people are calling on May to do - makes no difference to the binding bits of her deal, the Withdrawal Agreement 
When you have a Prime Minister who votes to block Brexit, & her ministers willfully ignore a three-line-whip, with impunity, you must KNOW blairites together with other parties are deliberately destroying democracy. This is third world politics. She MUST be removed. @BrandonLewis 
After twice defeating Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit plan, Parliament has rejected the idea of leaving without a plan. It is clear on what it opposes, but what does it want?  
Dear @BBCnews please get a new contact book. Your reliance on a tiny pool of commentators for virtually every programme and channel (approx 50 - 100 people) does not reflect the the diversity or expertise available in this country. #Brexit is the result of group think. 
May delivering her deals #brexit  
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar tells The Ireland Funds dinner we are 16 days from Brexit and “we need our friends in the United States more so ever.” He says Ireland will remain at the heart of the EU  
"...if that doesn't crystallize the argument for Scottish Independence then I don't know what does." Nicola Sturgeon gives her take on tonight's Brexit vote and what this means for Scotland's future. 
Although I am not totally convinced by Brexit (re: Remain or Leave), there are no truer words.  
I'm trying to work out:a) how a second referendum would be a disastrous reflection of the failure of parliament to find a consensus, but a snap general election wouldn't beb) how spending months demanding a general election aligns with trying to reach consensus  
Article 50: What Europe makes of granting extension for Brexit  
The brass neck and the cloth ears of Theresa May. She proposes bringing back her twice-rejected deal for a *third* vote, yet insists the 2016 EU referendum result is sacrosanct.  #NoDealBrexit #BrexitMayhem 
Though I'd ask Ruby what she thought of tonight's Brexit vote. Shes quite perceptive for a labrador!#MyYearInTwitPics (Day 256a) 
Pretty sure at this point Brexit is just a slide show of various pubs on fire or overflowing with septic waste. 
15 days to freedom.The anti-UK frothing minority, backed by the strength & basic corruption of UK establishment & her media puppets, stopped NOTHING.Only Theresa May can now thwart #Brexit, ALL betrayal from here on is squarely on her alone.She'll not see April in Downing St. 
Gone but never to be forgotten. Rt Hon Tony Benn. Socialist internationalist leader and teacher, Labour MP, best Prime Minister we never had. Lifelong opponent of the European Union, anti-War leader, a prince amongst men. RIP #Brexit #Labour #Corbyn 
This is now officially a dog's Brexit. 
A couple of hours ago Remainers were telling everyone who would listen the vote against No Deal was a Brexit game-changer. They’re now frantically spinning the line nothing has changed, and there’s no justification for holding a vote on MV3. 
“There are only two ways to leave the EU: with or without a deal. The EU is prepared for both" said the European Commission after the UK parliament voted against no-deal #Brexit  
We had the Brexit Deal in November. I knew THEN that a new referendum was inevitable as Parliament couldn't vote for a deal that Brexit voters hate and couldn't afford to be blamed for the effects of No Deal.If I figured that out, so did they. They're going through the motions. 
265 Tory MPs that did back a no-deal Brexit being kept on the table.  #NoDealBrexit #LetsGoWTO #Brexit  
Hello. My name if Jeremy Corbyn. You may have forgotten me as the fuss in Parliament over #Brexit has been huge yet my contribution to it has been anonymous, indifferent and inconsequential. Anyway, I’m the Leader of the Opposition. Just so you know. 
This election is a referendum on wages. Labor is committed creating good, secure jobs that pay a fair wage. Creating jobs is what Labor governments do.Scott Morrison and the LNP are too busy fighting amongst themselves to save their own jobs to fight for yours. #auspol #qldpol 
The mismatch between the older generations that voted for Brexit and the younger generations that will have to bear the consequences is unsettling:  
Turns out #RedKIP was lying about supporting a free & FAIR referendum. Who'd have guessed it?Me. That's who. A nest of vipers, the lot of 'em.I'd say they were as bad as the Tories, but at least the Tories don't run around pretending *not* to be evil. 
Brexit stupidity confirmed we are ruled by fools of the lowest level of intelligence, integrity, honesty or competence. If unionists are seriously defending forced economic decline against decency, facts or their own worth, we won't, we can't, it's not normal.#UseTheMandate 
Brexit has shown up the Establishment as a bunch of small-minded, mediocre bullies' | via @telegraph 
4/10 Scots voted for #Brexit but the #SNP wants to airbrush those 1 million votes out of the debate #BBCDN 
France is beating her citizens off streets, taking eyes & limbs.Germany's covering up the rape of her children, to avoid "ill will".Then they tell us these Italians, who threaten to help UK defend her democracy are "fascists".But hey, we're the thickos.15 days to #Brexit  
There was nothing in Cameron's rash commitment to delivering a referendum that provided any considered thinking, planning or enabling work. And anybody that voted for it - either as legislation or in the actual referendum - wasn't behaving responsibly.  
NEW- Sarah Newton’s Brexit Resignation Is Nothing To Rejoice About.@SNewtonUK may be gone but, that doesn't excuse the utter contempt she showed towards disabled people.Plus, someone equally as bad will just come in & replace her. 
.@Peston ends the programme by asking "is Brexit going to happen?"@SamGyimah: Yes@andreajenkyns: Yes@LucyMPowell: Yes@AngelaRayner: YesFinally, something everyone agrees on!  
The inconvenient truth is that Corbyn and Labour have killed a No Deal Brexit.  Defanged the ERG.  And killed May's deal. The strategy has worked.  the BBC cannot admit this, but its the reality.#Brexit 
It’s fascinating how MPs who have spent the last three years demanding parliament “must have its say” on Brexit are now demanding parliament doesn’t have a say on MV3. 
Chris Howarth: Here's why Brexit cannot be stopped  
Baffled and bothered by the Brexit shambles, holidaymakers in the UK and the Continent won't commit to travel on or shortly after 29 March.So air fares and package holiday have sunk to absurd levelsThousands of seats to France and Spain for less than £13 
Additional insight not mentioned here I picked up from a UK official.As Brexit seeks a 90 day delay, there is almost no possibility of delaying past June 30 as the EU will not permit the UK to be in the Union when EU elections begin.  
This BBC documentary on the independence referendum is nothing but a trick to get us crying into our beer as the British state shafts us again with a no-deal Brexit. 
Interestingly if you listen to her tonight the “ no Brexit” line has disappeared. She’s offering her deal, no deal or long extension. She believes she can’t allow no Brexit to happen on her watch.  
.@joannahausmann is no ordinary Venezuelan. Not only is her father a neoliberal economist who influnenced austerity policies in the 80s & 90s, her mother @anajuljatar worked for a USAID funded group which failed to overthrow Chávez through popular referendum in 2004.  
The heat of the moment misses this: NO version of Brexit will endure- because political demography is so massively against it. The assumption that younger generations will come round to it is just a delusion. Their life-long cause will be to overturn it. 
If you’ve recently arrived here because Facebook is broken, we’re just in the middle of laughing darkly at Brexit in order to stave off the horror. You’ll pick it up 
A helpful summary on where we are with Brexit. No Deal is better than a bad deal... except for when you can’t have no deal and a bad deal is all you’ve got.  
I didn't vote for a 2.5 year waiting period. I didn't vote for a dealI didn't vote for mps to drag this outI didn't vote to rely on a foreign country to veto the extending of article 50I voted to LEAVE#Leavemeansleave #Brexit #BrexitVote #BrexitMayhem 
Tonight’s Brexit vote makes it clear – the PM must end the parliamentary dance and put it to the people - The Independent  
I’ve not really got into this #Brexit thing.  This is more my idea of amusing late-night viewing.  
Brexit is when your leg is not in a bear trap, but you saw it off anyway. 
The EU Referendum was carried with the votes of 37% of the electorateIn the 2017 General Election the Tories lost their majorityThe ERG only accounts for 10% of MPs at mostOpinion polls show consistently 55% now want RemainTHERE IS NO FUCKING MANDATE FIR BREXIT 
6. Changing the leaving date in UK domestic legislation will NOT be sufficient to stop the ‘Brexit clock’ ticking down to zero. 
1. Following two successive votes rejecting the draft withdrawal agreement (DWA) (432-202 against and 391-242 against) and this evening’s vote (321-278) to reject any no deal Brexit, here is a personal reflection/contribution on possible extensions of time under Article 50 TEU. 
Urgh *When not *Why. Stupid Brexit nonsense... 
Me thinking about Brexit  
#BrexitCatGIFs #NoDealBrexit SPECIALWhy you try to understand what on earth is actually happening next with #Brexit#BrexitMayhem #BrexitChaos #BrexitShambles 
16 days until Brexit, About 10 sitting days to try and pass legislation through both houses to change the law whilst still getting permission from the EU for an extension. I can’t wait to see what the ERG have up their sleeves to protect democracy.  
This is Brexit:  
There does seem to be a contradiction between May’s insistence that a second referendum would be futile but her insistence that a parliament keep voting on her plan until they vote the right way.  
I confess at this point I do not understand what Brexit even is. Or what the options are. Or why. Good news is, I don’t think anyone in the UK understands it, either. 
I can think of no greater tragedy than the sabotage of Brexit by a political class entrusted to deliver it, 100 years on from the Representation of the People Act, this, the outcome of our country’s biggest ever vote, being overturned because they can’t be arsed with the result. 
I think Nigel Farage's #Brexit march on the 29th March may prove to be illuminating. I've never taken to the streets in protest before, but this march looks like it will be the first of many. 
If Parliament votes to extend Article 50 for a lengthy period (I hope not), we will need to prepare to participate in European electionsIf so, Brexiteers will need to turn out in force to ensure new British MEPs are predominantly anti-EUThe fight for Brexit isn't over 
Reading the news on Brexit and remembering when British friends would tell me how, despite some boredom, British politics was much more sensible than in America. Or France or Italy or... 
The betrayal of Brexit is one of the most shameful chapters in our country’s history  
I seriously hope some of the ERG do bring your rotten Gov down. As much as you’ve done your best Michael your party can’t govern, they’ve betrayed Brexit and 17m voters. You’re party is unfit to be in office. From a now former voter 
Did any brexitears see 'EU interference" in our sovereign parliament tonight? Or just British democracy? But brextremists happy fir European interference to ensure Brexit happens. The far right are trying ri run the country. They'll fail.  
Keep being told that Corbyn can't support a fair referendum in which cheating is neither encouraged or allowed because "he hasn't got the votes".Doesn't stop him banging on about an election though, does it...? 
EU on no-deal Brexit motion: 'like Titanic voting for iceberg to move' | Politics | The Guardian  
Is Brexit driving you mad? Here’s my wee dog for smiles  
John Bercow may be gearing up to kill an attempt at Brexit MV3, using principles laid down in Jacob Rees-Mogg's favourite book, Erskine May. Hugely controversial of course, but on the face of it, the rules would absolutely support him.  
Tory MP says "Now it’s effectively a bad Brexit deal or no Brexit at all, which is absolutely ghastly.” But what did you all think?! Brexit was never going to work, in any form. We've told you this for 2 years. 
As usual, @DanielJHannan cuts to the chase.  Brexit for Yanks.  Exactly right  
Totally sums up #Brexit #BrexitMayhem #BrexitChaos 
“You say to the British people, on the basis of what you now know - do you wish to proceed? That’s a perfectly democratic thing to do.”Former political aide Alastair Campbell explains why he thinks another referendum will not lead to civil unrest#newsnight | @campbellclaret 
This is quite the savage burn:EU on no-deal Brexit motion: 'like Titanic voting for iceberg to move'  
I don't want Theresa May's rejected Brexit deal debated or voted on, yet again in Parliament. It's time we made progress by considering other options. Please RT if you agree. @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn 
It's time to end this madness now and adopt Labour's plan, or better still lets have a #GeneralElectionNowEuropean council president signals Corbyn’s deal is the only way to stop no-deal Brexit  
Philip Hammond spent several hours covering his Spring Statement, including multiple dire warnings of a no deal Brexit. That same evening, he's voting in favour of keeping a damaging no deal on the table. Unbelievable. 
Another day of #Brexit Madness is over and once again I find myself precisely equidistant between elation on one side and depression on the other. Night night tweeps. 
NEW EPISODE! We try to cut through the Brexit fog and see what's really out there, from new deals to no deal. Plus: What is the true role of lawyers in politics? Does the EU want regime change? And how will future historians explain this period? →  
A bad day for Britain and a terrible day for democracy, with anti-Brexit MPs ignoring the will of 17.4 million Britons. There is a massive divide between the political elites in Britain and the British people.  via @WSJ 
.@agcolehamilton of the @ScotLibDems hates feeling like his friends are being used as bargaining chips for Brexit #bbcdn 
The ongoing slow-motion car crash that is #Brexit is a perfect example of what happens when people are put in charge through their extreme privilege instead of any aptitude or genuine qualification for the job. 
Tory @jamiegreeneUK is really struggling to connect his own parties opposition to freedom of movement and their backing of Brexit with labour shortages in Scotland.There’s real corrosive societal damage being caused by the Tory party and they’ve buried their heads in the sand. 
A proper bill, with real backbone, that would kill Brexit as a last resort. Literally a backstop on the negotiation process. Short. Sweet. Functional. Something like this needs to be passed by Parliament ASAP.  
In 100 years time, some unfortunate kids in an exam room will get an essay question about Brexit. Poor bastards. We can’t make sense of it and we’re living through it. 
Alistair Campbell says that if there is no deal, Remainers will riot. The Newsnight consensus seems to be that Leavers will do nothing if Brexit is lost. They are too stupid no doubt to organise resistance. 
Thank God we were able to negotiate a free trade area massively larger than the EU within two years of the referendum otherwise we’d sure be in the shit. 
The huge number of Labour Members who want to REMAIN but are prepared to back Jeremy Corbyn & the Labour Leadership, regardless of whether we end up leaving, is fantasticIt demonstrates grassroots Labour party unity that the media would have you believe is in tatters!#Brexit 
I've just thought of a new bantz heuristic scenario. Nigel Farage persuades a fash-adjacent European leader to veto a Brexit extension. Bercow blocks another vote on May's Deal. Then the only option left is revoking Article 50, in what is named the Farage Bill. 
Thank you @MaireadMcGMEP and @TimmermansEU for standing up to the ridiculous  #Brexit bully boy @Coburn4Brexit and , as we say in #Scotland “gien him his character” . 
Brexit - and we’re going over to John Pienaar at a dog fight in Crawley where he’s going to gauge the mood amongst the people. 
I keep reminding myself of all the wonderful, hard working, honourable  MPs and MEPs who are busting a gut to honour our Brexit. A big thank you to them. 
Sounds good.  14 days to try to form a govt.  Brexit happens on meantime.  General Election follows.  Time to throw the scoundrels out  
That was a bit of a tour de force from @AamerAnwar there. Great defence of the benefits freedom of movement has brought to Scotland and is going to lose because of Brexit. #bbcdn 
Sterling rose to its strongest level against the Euro for two years tonight after MPs rightly defied the Government & voted to take a no deal #brexit off the table.  
It's embarrassing, being British. #Brexit 
“If the betrayal hasn’t yet happened, then it’s underway.”Welsh Cllr Vincent Bailey tells #newsnight the referendum felt like “a chance to kick back at a distant, detached elite in Brussels" but that MPs are currently "doing a good impression of replicating that distant elite.” pic.twitter.com/JQc0vO4RDG 
Jeremy Corbyn, leader of the Labour party, speaks after UK parliament votes to reject no-deal Brexit  
Liars like the bus lie about the NHS? Like the “no down sides only considerable upsides” lies? Like the elecrhal fraud lies? Like the “jobs fits brexit” lies? Like the fake ferry company lies? Like the advisory is actually mandatory lies? Away with you, you utter crook.  
'Skint' Nigel Farage's company assets grew almost £400k last year. Coincidence???  #lbc #fbpe #conservatives #labour #libdems #snp #plaidcymru #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #brexit #itvnews #bbcnews #BBCNewsten #bbclondonnews #londontonight #c4news  #dup 
Imagine Brexit is just a big hoax, it’s a reality TV show hosted by Peter Andre on ITV2, and we’ve all been lampooned. Wouldn’t that be gas ? 
MPs rejected no-deal Brexit by a majority of just 4 votesLet that sink in.Only 4 votes.Only a 4 vote majority to avoid the biggest political self-catastrofuck imaginable.  Fucking. Tory. Twats. 
Surreal Brexit moment No 386759A Welsh guy in Port Talbot blaming the SNP for Teresa May's messWhat a time to be alive 
 WATCH: @JeaneF1MSP says that after facing multiple embarrassing defeats, Theresa May has no integrity left. Throughout the Brexit process, she has been putting her party interests ahead of common sense, and ignored Scotland's interests all along the way. #bbcdn 
If House of Commons Speaker John Bercow blocks Theresa May's Brexit deal being voted on for a third time he is going to have a big fan club. @LBC 
If the BBC spent week after week questioning Government Ministers on the number of fatalities caused by Tory Austerity instead of holding the opposition to account over the Governments failure over Brexit then a TV licence might be worth paying for. #BrokenMedia 
Post-Brexit trade partners ask UK to lower human rights standards  
The Oireachtas today fully passed the government’s no deal #Brexit omnibus legislation. It’s the law Ireland hopes never to use. It comes from painstaking work across 9 departments. It couldn’t have been done without responsible opposition politics   . 
The MPs who were never reconciled to Brexit, ‘Have finally come out in the open and done it in.’  
I can’t believe a woman Who will not give us a2nd referendum will be allowed to bring her deal back for a3rd vote. There is an onus on our courageous MPs such as @Anna_Soubry @heidiallen75 @ChukaUmunna @hilarybennmp @YvetteCooperMP @JustineGreening @jessphillips to stop this now 
A deliberative forum before the Brexit vote would have identified the need to have a second process after the negotiation, writes @RSAMatthew #OpenFuture 
What happened tonight? No deal went down in successive votes. Mrs May, forced ultimately to choose between responsibility & irresponsibility, chose irresponsibility & shredded what was left of her integrity. But she still lost, with ministers voting against herBrexit RIP 
Brexit is to become a Europe-wide effort then, if it comes down to Italy and/or Poland to helpfully force Britain out. 
Well done @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer @UKLabour Brexit Team & all who support @UKLabour manifesto. 
What do you think the outcome of the current #Brexit farce will be? 
I guess if Westminster can defy voters on Brexit there’s no need for a federal election. Clive has done his dough.#youknowitmakessense 
Brian, I respect what you are doing, but I worry there will be too many anti Brexit parties, and of course a split vote, that’s not going to help anyone. I for one could never vote for the two main parties again, and my wish is, that there are more like me, millions more. 
No Brexit doesn't need a referendum. It can be achieved by tomorrow lunchtime, leaving May the entire afternoon to resign.#RevokeArticle50 
.@AamerAnwar says the UK government's Brexit negotiations are "a shambles" #bbcdn 
Nick, are you mad? Your deficit reduction plan has strangled growth, pretty much destroyed whatever social fabric Britain had left and delivered Brexit (oh, and barely touched the underlying debt). What in God's name do you Treasury types think of as a failure? 
Brexit is 384 hours away. #brexit 
Has anyone else noticed that government spokesmen are now talking of "the Will of the People AS EXPRESSED IN THE REFERENDUM".They clearly recognise that #Brexit is no longer "the Will of the People".Let's #PutItToThePeople & stop this. 
Well, well!!Labour abandons support for referendum on Theresa May's Brexit deal  
You knew this was coming, that's why the Brexit party was put in place. Flying around on private jets, calling the working class tattooed thugs. Let's see how this all plays out Nigel, because believe me we are not taking this. We will be leaving on the 29th, or god help them!!!! 
Thank God this Brexit deal is the easiest one in history because if it wasn’t we’d sure be in the shit. 
No, the last thing Scots want is an airhead that didn't vote on Brexit because it was 'too complicated' daring to try to speak for them, when that person can't even think for herself! 
I don’t understand Brexit developments at all now. Which is possibly marginally more bearable than being able to understand them. 
Col Bob Stewart calling May's new EU Treaty (deal) "treacherous" in call to @lbcAccuses the party of bad management of the Brexit mandate to leave and is "ashamed" that we have arrived at this point The Col voted against May's deal  (good man) 
I hope MPs now realize May has been conning them into improperly rubber stamping Brexit. Remember Davis on the EUNoW bill?"It's simply about MPs empowering May on a decision already made"That was a lie, but they fell for it. Now they see what she's like when she's not obeyed. 
This is interesting and most democratic bodies have a similar rule including local authorities. It would surely be an abuse of democracy to try for a 3rd time.....An old rule means Bercow could take drastic action on Brexit | Politics News | Sky News  
Too right a new referendum would mean “no Brexit at all”.56% of people now want to #Remain - a 12-point lead, and growing.Brexit is not the will of the people. 
This will be forgotten. Quickly. But let's get this right. The Tory government whipped their party to support a no deal Brexit. How can industry now back the Tory party? How can people support Tories who were prepared to throw their jobs under the bus? #GeneralElectionNow 
Theresa May says people can't have another referendum... But she gets as many goes as she wants when it comes to voting on her deal 
 @JeaneF1MSP talking about the ongoing Brexit chaos on #bbcdn: "What we've seen, time and again, is that the voices of people in Scotland are consistently ignored." 
Rochdale Heywood Middleton MPs have bretrayed you on brexit  
The British Parliament was, is & will remain sovereign. Its will is the only representative of the British people. If parliament votes to block a ’No Deal’ Brexit & to extend or suspend article 50 notification, that is -by definition- the decision of the sovereign British nation. 
*MAY PREPARES THIRD VOTE ON BREXIT DEAL: TIMES... and with the same outcome 
Honest opinion poll retweet for wider result. How will you vote? Any Brexit party means any party that promises to honour Brexit.If other please comment. 
So  is going to ask Labour yet again what our Brexit policy is........ Maybe he will fucking listen this time its been the same since last September when it was made at party conference and hes been told loads of times but it doesn't seem to sink into his thick skull. 
Kind of amazing that if you went to sleep the day after Brexit, and only woke up tonight - 993 DAYS - you'd have missed absolutely 0% progress by the British government towards delivering it. 
Surely I am not alone in finding it bizarre that the UK government keeps repeating votes on the Prime Minister’s Brexit deal, but says there cannot be another Referendum!! UK history is full of repeat elections a year or two apart. It’s now time to put it to a People’s Vote. 
Mrs May is responsible for losing control of Brexit, says Nick Timothy  via @Telegraph 
This 2012 #Brexit cartoon (by @blowercartoons) has been on my office door for seven years, now. It has aged extremely well ... 
Surely our based Polish friends can just veto any extension to Article 50 and we leave No Deal on March 29th. #Brexit 
My stepdad, who voted Brexit came up with a real gem today. He said that if there’s mass unemployment in the UK because of Brexit it’ll be fine because people who really want to work will be able to go to Germany and work like people did in the 80s. 
Question: Many would risk an election and a Corbyn govt in the hope of getting proper Brexit MPs to see Brexit through. How about you?PLEASE RETWEET 
Total Betrayal of the leave referendum - how do we know you will honour any result that does not suit you? Parliament has failed.  
Thursday's Daily Telegraph front page: 'Brexit delayed until further notice after gang of four rebels' #tomorrowspaperstoday 
I hear on Newsnight that @TheresaMayPM is going for 'meaningful' vote III. A question, how many times do you have to repeat a meaningful vote before it becomes a meaningless vote. #Brexit becomes more chaotic and damaging by the day #GEnow 
Am doing my best trying to make Giggles out of Brexit but trust me no amount of #janeygodleyvoiceover is going to get us through this to be honest 
Can't we just all have a cup of tea and a biscuit or two and call off Brexit and get back to solving the real problems in our society? 
Parliament is in open betrayal of the Referendum result, of the 2017 general election manifestos and the overwhelming majority to trigger Article 50. The people and democracy itself have been betrayed. @SteveHedley3 @labourleave @LeaveMnsLeave @Nigel_Farage @PaulEmbery 
So, to sum up, and cut through the detail, parliament says:- No to "no deal"- No to the only available dealAnd hence- No to BrexitHard to see this as anything other than a rebellion of MPs against their own electors. 
All low-ranking middle aged white male Tory MPs with a view on Brexit currently look kind of look the same, and I’m vaguely worried that means I’m racist 
Theresa May could well be losing her way to Brexit victory - my @FinancialTimes take on why tonight’s rebellions might help the prime minister get her deal through the Commons next week (or the week after!)  
Hold your horses @Nigel_Farage - as of tonight no money is being spent on the UK taking part in May's European Parliament elections, Downing Street confirms. Brexit on March 29 is not over - yet. 
Conservative MP David Davis tells Nick Watt that Theresa May “knows she has to deliver Brexit” but that “she will get there, people like me will help her get there”#newsnight | @nicholaswatt 
Very unusual for a medical Royal College to be political, but this statement opposing a no deal #Brexit is ultimately about protecting patient care. Well done @RCPLondon 
The Europeans really do have all the good Brexit sound bites  
May could be losing her way to Brexit victory  
Fifteen days from now, who knows what we’ll have. The EU is - by far - the most important export market for Scottish seafood. There is not a Brexit deal out there that could be better for our exporters than the one we already have in the EU.  
UKIP members will be out in force outside the Houses of Parliament ahead of the Article 50 extension vote.They will be joined by UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP, Deputy Leader @mikehookemmep, UKIP Wales Leader @NeilUKIP, Lord Pearson and others. Brexit now!#ToDelayIsToBetray 
Thursday’s FT: May issues ultimatum after MPs seize control with vote to ditch no-deal Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
Turn over if u like Iain ... but we brexiteers are not for turning ... we will not agree to a faux brexit ... we will prevail ... the political tribes will be destroyed if they are unwilling to deliver our democratic mandate that is #Brexit  
Apparently Govt was surprised by vote on Spelman amdt which was unexpectedly moved by @YvetteCooperMP after Spelman agreed not to. Cooper argument that vote needed cos ministerial assurances were insufficient reflects extent to which trust has broken down over Brexit... 
Thursday’s Guardian: May’s final warning to Tory rebels: back me or lose Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
OK, I'm going to call it. I don't think Brexit is going very well. 
Possible Brexit solution here."Physicists reverse time using quantum computer"  
Prime Minister who keeps telling Scotland to "respect democracy" is preparing for a 3rd vote on her #Brexit deal.#DissolveTheUnion  
Theresa May and voting, latest summary:Theresa May’s deal where absolutely nothing has changed since first vote = to be voted on not just twice but 3 times.Second referendum where pretty much everything has changed since previous referendum = must not go ahead.  
This Brexit thing is so similar to the bs that goes on in this country. The people of Britain voted for it years ago, but since the elites don't want it, they're just going to drag it into the gutter forever and refuse to do it. A govt that openly defies the people and the law. 
A PM instructing her MPs to vote against her own motion, & still losing.A Cabinet where you can ignore the instruction & keep your job.A Government losing votes on a major issue by majorities of 230 & 149, yet carrying on.Brexit has become an act of constitutional vandalism. 
In spite of Brexit and in spite of the weather @WASPI_Campaign were in Westminster today to make a racket when @PhilipHammondUK made his Budget Statement. When asked about #WASPI he said they'd "settled the issue".  We think there are many, many WASPI women who would disagree 
This is becoming a really bad Brexit habit #nodinnerisbetterthanabaddinner 
My thoughts to @bbcworld on today's #Brexit shambles and what comes next - most likely a vote tomorrow for extension, a third meaningful vote in coming days, then either short extension to implement deal or long extension to do...?  
“Brexit is a bit like the #FyreFestival but without the guy who can get the Water easy” #janeygodleyvoiceover 
Extend the Brexit process indefinitely, English clubs seem to be doing very well under it. 
UK parliament rejects no-deal Brexit  
If there is a general election you must think only of this. We are voting to govern ourselves. We fought wars to protect this. Vote for a pro Brexit party. We can worry about policy after that. Democracy is everything. 
NEW Downing Street at war with whips after ministers given free pass over no-deal Brexit vote 
Researchers studied how Brexit is already affecting UK businesses’ growth, sales, and productivity. 
I knew today would take 'no deal' off the table.Although, I am disgusted with the cheers from MP's tonight after May said 'there might be no Brexit'... 17.4 million who put our faith in our elected MP's have been, basically, fucked. 
Footnote: no, the govt did not "whip against its own motion" – its motion had been amended by Spelman/Cooper, so that it ruled out no-deal Brexit for ever, which is contrary to what the govt wanted 
The Guardian front page, Thursday 14 March 2019 | May’s final warning to Tory rebels: back me or lose Brexit  
Anyone who actually votes for a no deal #Brexit should be locked up. It is a criminal act.  
Your nightly reminder that the referendum was created by the Tory Party, was campaigned for by Tory ministers, the crap deal was negotiated by a Tory PM, voted for by Tory MPs, and is now paralysed by Tories.Take your ‘both parties as bad as each other’ and stick it up your... 
MPs are allowed to vote on May’s dud deal week after week.Yet apparently after a referendum three years ago, the public aren’t allowed a final say on the deal done in their name?What nonsense. MPs must hold a #PeoplesVote and campaign to #Remain. 
Brexit hasn’t been betrayed. It has just been understood, and this has led to some having second thoughts. 
Scotland rejected Brexit. Letting us be taken out of the EU by a state-suicidal England is an absolute failure of any notion of Scottish popular sovereignty. 
Brexit has finished me as a voter.These MPs should be locked up for treason. 
UK as #Brexit end game nears.   
Tomorrow's back page: Liverpool made sure there was no Brexit as all four English clubs marched into the #ChampionsLeague quarter-finals. 
Remain campaigners have been gas lighted for nearly 3 years. Thank you, each and every one, who had the courage to fight Brexit, when so many politicians and the media refused to even acknowledge our existence xx 
#TreasonMay has always been a #Remainer EU 5th columnist & a #TrojanDonkey. Most useless PM since time began has destroyed any remaining vestige of authority of this rotting corpse of a government; destroyed the Tory Party & is destroying #Brexit 
United beat Bayern to win UCLChelsea beat Bayern to win UCLLiverpool beat Bayern at home to Qualify for QFBut Arsenal Football club, lost 5 -1 away, needed 5 goals to qualify, lost 5-1 again. TufiaBrexit Enugu Rangers 
Well it looks like MPs are being given *another* vote on the same deal. Yet, 3years on the public aren’t allowed a #PeoplesVote on a defined Brexit.The hypocrisy. As I said “There just needs to be parity between young people & elected officials.”  
REVEALED: Secret backdoor plan for beef into Britain - this week's  @farmersjournal front cover exclusive! #Brexit @PhelimONeillFJ @IFJCaitriona @potooleifj @amyforde6 @ajwwoods 
Sack ministers who abstained on no-deal Brexit vote, says Monmouth MP @DavidTCDavies 
The betrayal of Brexit is one of the most shameful chapters in our country’s history.  
Shazam but for finding out how to turn back time and stop Brexit. 
PM Threasa May voted for no deal why are you not calling for an investigation into a conflict of interest ? Why are you not calling for an investigation into reforundum ? Why has Labour helped Brexit against 75% Labour party members that voted remain @tom_watson help us 
Labour abandons support for referendum on TM deal . . working to build a Commons consensus behind a softer Brexit that would see the UK stay in a CU with the EU & maintain close ties to the single market.Lexit: no mandate, no support, no future #RevokeA50 
Fuck Brexit,here’s a brilliant story,wee Ben the dug has been rescued   
This will be the *third* meaningful vote by 650 MPs on the Brexit deal. They’ve rejected it twice.The public was asked to vote once, two years ago. Yet, apparently asking again is undemocratic? Time for Brexit to get a new mandate. #PutItToThePeople in a #PeoplesVote. 
It's now very clear. #Brexit is the biggest confidence trick in history. Fortunately, it's struggling to survive. It's time to switch off life support! #RevokeArticle50 
If you had told me in 2016 that the EU referendum would culminate in a crazed losing side overturning the vote while screaming "Nazi" at anyone who objects to their machinations, I'd have laughed and said "Don't be silly. This is Great Britain. We're a democracy". That was then. 
The UK political one flew over the cuckoo's nest - @theresa_may three whipped her own MP's to vote against her own motion. She then lost the vote against her own motion and a minister. Theresa May has no authority, no respect, no Brexit and no future. #GeneralElectionNow #JC4PM 
UK Economy Defying Expectations (video) - House of Commons Votes Thursday on Brexit - LIVE Video  #stocks #FTSE #investors #investing #GBP #USD #EUR #economy #Brexit  
We now go live to Brexit pic.twitter.com/vY7yU8CYiA 
Given that we appear now to be heading for #MeaningfulVote3, I’m not sure this campaign narrative from @ScotTories is ageing particularly well... #Brexit  
MPs reject no-deal Brexit by majority of 43 in second vote  
There has to be a general election. We need a clean Brexit passed by a clean Parliament. All the major parties need to be replaced. Prosper UK fortunately has just been officially registered as a political party by the Electoral Commission. It intends to change British politics. 
The UK car industry, says the #BBC, will be hard hit in case of a no-deal #Brexit The state run and state funded Corporation forgets to mention that the UK car industry is wholy owned by foreigners who take out all the profits. 
When the dust settles, remember this govt, including May, just voted for something they admit would hurt millions of their own people...then remember that they do it all the time. #GTTO #Brexit 
Treaties EU say #Brexit shall happen from the date of entry into force of the withdrawal agreement or, failing that, two years after the notification of 29 March 2017, unless the European Council, in agreement with the UK, unanimously decides to extend this period. 
Liam Fox majored in House of Commons today on denying that UK handling of Brexit is perceived very negatively around the world. Methinks he did protest too much. In fact Meprettysure  
I have to say this season of Brexit is interminably boring, feels like the writers are just repeating plotlines and hoping something sticks. Next season I hope they bring in some new characters and a big twist, like Brexit was secretly the bad place all along, etc 
Brexit: We need certainty.  And the only way to provide that quickly is to Leave the EU on WTO terms in sixteen days. 
Spike in sterling tonight.  The nearer Corbyn gets to No. 10, the stronger the pound gets.  My heart is bleeding for all the uber-rich hard brexiteers who have bet on sterling crashing, like they did on Referendum night. 
I'm just going to drop my favorite article on Brexit right here:  
Oh so suddenly the law matters? The law says Brexit was won by criminal activity. But you conveniently seem to forget that because it inhibits you from lining your pockets. Politicians like you have stained Britain long enough.  
Next time someone says we should not have a second referendum because "you can't rerun a vote until you get the result you want", I'll laugh hollowly. 
DUP says May's Brexit deal is dead  
The irony of a UK Prime Minister telling the Scottish Government and Parliament that there can’t be a second independence referendum despite election mandates, while aiming for a third vote on her flawed Brexit deal #BrexitBritain 
Away from Brexit, a sitting lord. Lord Steel, has admitted to knowing that Cyril Smith was a child sexual abuser and not only did he do nothing to stop Smith, he nominated him for a Knighthood.If you think he should lose his peerage, sign here: … 
As Brexit rolls on, Britain is breaking. >> Thousands of homeless patients are being discharged onto the streets - some with tuberculosis or cancer, report @pgreenfielduk @sloumarsh. 
Brexit: the undefinable rendered undeliverable by the unelectable. #PeoplesVote 
A superb contribution from my friend @IanBlackfordMP tonight expressing what is undoubtedly a huge and growing Scottish sentiment - time to have done with the Tory farce of #Brexit ….  
When you live in Australia and you check the news in the morning to find out how things went in the UK whilst you were asleep. #Brexit  
Your proposal is indistinguishable from the government’s. Stop trying to pretend you’re holding the government to account on Brexit when you’re a pro Brexit ideologue, using this issue for your own ends.  
European council president says Corbyn’s deal is the only way to stop no-deal Brexit 
MEP reporting from Strasbourg. We’re the laughing stock of the world, the EU was truly frightened of a No Deal. On Monday May demeaned the UK, the EU couldn’t believe their good fortune. My constituents are so angry and most unprintable. The Conservative gov has ditched Brexit. 
Scottish Tories tonight have betrayed the hopes and wishes of the people of ScotlandThey voted to make Scotland worse off despite the British govown findings on a no deal Brexit consequences for Scotland I struggle to find any other words other than they BETRAYED SCOTLAND 
It's funny because it's true...  #Brexit  
Maybe May’s voice is fine. Is it all a ploy for sympathy? I no longer take anything on face value in all this Brexit chicanery. Did she just swallow a pint of pepper?  
My feeling on a second referendum, at the moment, is basically: Don’t you DARE kick this back to us to sort out 
Disgraced Fiona Onasanya votes against Brexit 'while wearing tag'  via @MailOnline utter madness this is the standard of politicians deciding on our countries future 
A very good interview with the sane and sensible @GeorgeFreemanMP (and the equally sane @GeorginaEWright) on what a pivot to EFTA+EEA would mean for #Brexitcc. @EFTA4UK 
Dad: I just heard on the news that there’s problems with BrexitKevin, Scampi, Mum: Have you tried turning it off and on again#TwitterIsStillWorking 
Theresa May right now #brexit  
don’t understand #Brexit you want to leave Europe for freedom to make your own decisions and be your own country or whatever but have you considered that all your important economic decisions will be left to your own politicians who currently couldn’t tell an arse from an elbow? 
All the ministers who broke three line whips to support Brexit were required to leave office.Most ministers who broke three line whips tonight to undermine Brexit are staying in office.They lost the referendum but this government is letting Remain MPs call the shots. 
What a shower.  Despite every single prediction, despite, billions of capital leaving every day, despite Scotland voting 62% of Scotland voting to remain, just consider this.  Tonight nearly every single Scottish Tory voted to destroy our economy with a #NoDeal #brexit  
Respect @GreenJennyJones, it's ok to change your mind when facts change. It's vital that high profiled people like yourself speak out in this. Check out @RemainerNow for many leave voters who are now calling to out #brexit to bed. 
An old rule means Bercow could take drastic action on Brexit.Deep  in the Commons rule book is a line that gives John Bercow the power to block a third vote on the PM's Brexit deal. 
Brexit  
Well Done Nigel. The Establishment, The Majority of The 650 MPs, the MSM, have all consistently ‘fought’ against The Electorate, since The Referendum. Yes, let’s get some EU Officials to Veto our Extension Request. We then LEAVE on 29th March, with NO DEAL, WTO Terms.  
Four cabinet ministers defied Theresa May by abstaining from the vote, while Sarah Newton resigned as work and pensions minister in order to vote in favour of rejecting a no-deal Brexit under any circumstances   
After tonight it is totally clear to me that the country needs to stand back and reflect on the total farce which Brexit has become. We need a significant pause and chance to test whether leaving the EU at any price is really what people voted for in 2016. 
summoning circle, hope this works                           BREXIT VOTES                 TO BE OVER          
Full list: The Tory MPs who voted to reject a no-deal Brexit  
'Whatever happens deal or no-deal we need to respect the result of the referendum'MP Theresa Villiers speaks after the no-deal Brexit motion and hopes her 'colleagues will not seek to frustrate' leaving the EU  
And Bannon never far away..... 
May's final warning to Tory rebels: back me or lose Brexit  
Anti-Brexit stance from the English clubs. 
This is actually a replay of the underlying issue. Brexit was really about going back to kicking ass, not being just part of the EU. Alas, history has happened. And the EU probably isn't going to beg either. In fact, no prolly. They're not going to beg.  
Man of the people.......enemy of the establishment and the elite.....any offshore news????? 
BREAKING: Liverpool reject referendum and opt to stay in Europe  
Possible route to a no-deal crash out Brexit on 29 March...1. Theresa May tries MV3 next week Tuesday - fails2. Vote of no confidence called & won3. Tories as largest party have 14 days to try & form a Government (i.e up to 2 April 2019)4. Oh, look... 29 March passed. Brexit! 
Nearly all the Scots Tories vote for a no-deal Brexit. Think about that. They would allow the absolute chaos of leaving without a deal be visited upon their constituents. If you are represented by one of these people tuck this away and vow to ensure they are never returned.  
At @Cambridge_Uni debating Why #Brexit is a #feminist issue. Excellent engagement with Cambridge students & fluid discussion with fellow panelists @vnbateman & @bellathetwin of @FFSake_ on the implications of Brexit on women, the economy and ethnic minorities. #BrexitMayhem 
Serious credibility gap @DavidMundellDCTWhat is the point in having a Scottish Secretary who never stands up for Scotland?Who says one thing then does the oppositeWho votes for a No-Deal Brexit, which could make 100,000 Scottish people redundant - when Scotland voted Remain  
Because of jus sanguinis and both UK + Italy allowing dual nationality, I can acquire Italian citizenship meaning that if and when brexit happens I will be able to retain my European citizenship. In this respect, I am extremely lucky. However, this is not the case for my peers. 
"Saving Britain:  Brexit and how it can be stopped"  @Somerset4Europe are delighted to welcome Andrew Adonis to visit Taunton this coming Saturday 16th at 1.30pm as part of his nationwide tour.   Get your tickets here:   
I know my anti-Indy friends are going to hate this BUT if #Brexit isn't stopped, then I WILL vote for an independent Scotland that plans to rejoin the EU. My daughter's life is far more important than the UK Union, and that's the bottom line. #StopBrexitSaveLives #RevokeA50Now 
The Breunion Boys, are on a mission to stop Brexit. One pop song at a time.Watch our full chat with the boy band on #VICENewsTonight at 7:30PM EDT on @HBO. 
Britain’s Remainer elites have declared war on democracy itself:  #Brexit 
The Brexit you people wanted is failing  lmao 
People voted for Brexit in part to vote for something disruptive. There was an instinctive sense that the tired “process” that excluded the people had to be shaken up. Parliament’s behaviour is only causing that feeling to grow and it may grow in unhelpful directions. 
3 - For the first time in the history of the @ChampionsLeague, 3 German teams are eliminated by English opponents in the knockout stages of a single campaign in the competition. Brexit. #UCL #FCBLIV #FCBLFC #BVBTOT #MCIS04 
Like, it's awesome that you also think Dragon Age 2, a game about a penniless refugee who becomes a heroine, is the best game writing out there! Me, too! But you voted Trump or Brexit because fuck refugees/immigrants? pic.twitter.com/tBNbGkSXlw 
Labour should be campaigning for a #PeoplesVote and to #Remain. Instead, Labour seems intent on more of the same old Brexit.Millions of Remainers will never vote for your party again.  
A No deal Brexit would catastrophically damage Scotland’s economy and it’s essential that all of their constituents know exactly what they tried to do tonight. 
The decision - after Theresa May's Brexit deal was defeated for a second time - means there will now be a further vote on delaying Brexit until at least 30 June  
Worth remembering that after the referendum, Jeremy Corbyn called for Article 50 to be invoked with even less preparation and time than we've had. 
brexit just 2 weeks away and all 4 english clubs through to the last 8 of the champions league. not felt this proud to be british in years 
It is not enough for the British parliament to vote against no-deal Brexit, the European Commission said on Wednesday. To prevent such an option, Britain had to actually accept some kind of a deal  
Brexit is going so well.  
I’m impressed by Brexiteers’ unyielding determination to stop Brexit. If they keep this up we’ll be in the Eurozone by this time next year.  
It should be revoked. Brexiters can have another crack at it when they’ve got a genuinely workable plan (if it exists). Then they can have another referendum to try and get a mandate. They’ve had nearly 3 years and enough is enough. 
Remoaner MPs have seized control of Brexit tonight.The same MPs voted to allow the referendum, the same MPs voted to trigger article 50. Now they've not got the result they wanted they have cancelled 17.4 million votes.This is about more than Brexit now.#NoDealBrexit 
You cannot negotiate in a serious, grown-up, meaningful way if you do not reserve the option of walking away:  #Brexit 
312 MPs have voted to weaken the UKs hand in any future negotiations,  undermine trust in democracy and make us look weak and indecisive on the World stage. Hang your heads in shame #Brexit 
Germany says Britain's rejection of no-deal Brexit 'sign of reason' #RevokeA50 #Remain #PutItToThePeople #fbpe 
Sorry, how is it that May gets to bring back a comprehensively defeated deal for a third time whilst maintaining - with a straight face - that a second referendum on what was a wafer thin Brexit vote would be a betrayal of democracy?! #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Will anyone have the courage to say that Brexit is a disaster and undeliverable? Corrupt contracts are unenforceable. 
That's why we have come to this crisis, PM has never looked to compromise. This is why it has to go back to the public in some form. #Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn is looking more like a Prime Minister in waiting every day.We need a leader who will reach out and engage with all sides to find a solution to the Brexit impasse.Corbyn is doing this, May is not.  
FM @HeikoMaas: "London just sent a sign of reason. The House of Commons has made it clear that, in its majority, at least it does not want a no-deal brexit. We have always said that a no-deal scenario is in nobody's interest. 
“Corbyn did nothing (to defeat the Brexit deal and crashing out with no deal)” are you kidding me?He’s been the leader who has whipped against the bad Brexit deal consistently and has opposed no deal from the very start.Give the credit where it is due. Well done Corbyn.  
On the Labour side, Kate Hoey and Stephen Hepburn voted to try and knock down the amended Government motion this evening so as to keep a no-deal Brexit on the table. Actively courting catastrophe.  
In the context of the Brexit farce, the number for Labour is truly extraordinary. How can an opposition party possibly do this badly when the government has virtually ceased to exist?  
No-Deal Brexit has now been rejected by UK Parliament. Almost certain Brexit will not happen March 29. But will there be a short or a long delay? No Brexit or new Brexit deal? It’s all up in the air. New drama follows tomorrow.  
I am ashamed to call myself British. We are just a laughing stock. Have your precious second referendum. I voted remain last time, but this time it'll be a resounding LEAVE from me and many disillusioned others who once believed in democracy. #Parliament #NoDealBrexit 
“The UK will leave without a deal unless something else is agreed.”Theresa May warns Commons that a second referendum on her Brexit deal "would risk no Brexit at all".  
This isn't Parliament taking back control: by taking 'no deal' (ie a clean, global Brexit on WTO terms) off the table under any circumstances, MPs have signalled that the terms of our departure will be those which the EU dictates – that is, if they permit our departure at all.  
Are there alternatives to Theresa May’s proposal? Yes, a second referendum and a soft Brexit that would keep the UK in a customs union with the EU are other possibilities. What do these options mean? More here:  
And enter the Johnson...? Because if her deal goes through and she goes, whoever takes over will he overseeing the next stages of Brexit so really...really do be careful what you wish for...or inflict on this country... #brexithaos 
12 Scottish Tory MPs voted for a disastrous No-Deal Brexit tonight - against the clear wishes & interests of their own constituents.A No-Deal Brexit would cause a recession & cost up to 100,000 Scottish jobs. Surely, @DavidMundellDCT has to resign - no credibility left #Brexit  
just looked at my bf’s laptop and he’s been watching an astrology youtube vid regarding the possibility of a brexit no deal I-  
UN is the most corrupt organization on the planet, sign and share the petition to stop Government of Canada from signing further UN agreements without public referendum #UNexit#VotePPC #PPC2019 
Now we arrive at box 3 on the Brexit votes flowchart  
See you all in Sunderland next Saturday 16th for the #MarchToLeave  #LetsGoWTO #BrexitBetrayal #NoDealBrexit #LeaveMeansLeave #Brexit  
you might be processing a grief of unimaginable magnitude but i’m quite upset about brexit and things of that nature. so why don’t you think on that ROB 
0830 tomorrow morning, I'll be hanging around outside Parliament, talking to Sky News about why a no-deal Brexit would be catastrophic for the NHS, and why Brexit with any deal is likely to be very bad for the nation's health. @TheBMA 
The U.K.’s problem after Brexit won’t be the loss of the substantial tariff protections that come with being an EU member. The bigger danger is being kept out of European markets by all sorts of other means applied to outsiders (via @bopinion) 
EU pros and cons of delaying Brexit beyond March 29  
Pissing myself there at Mundell saying ministers should resign that voted against gov but no him cause he just abstained. What a roaster man!  #Brexit 
brexit summed up: the nation that colonized/ruled/stole from third world countries and split many countries apart are now the same nation that wants to leave the EU bc they’re “afraid” to let refugees in THEIR nation? a fucking joke. 
We now go live to Brexit  
Since becoming PM Theresa May has:Lost the Tory majority Lost 35 ministersLost 39 HoC votesLost 2 Brexit deal votesLost all authorityLost control of cabinetLost control of parliamentLost control of partyLost respect for the UKBut she has not lost her job. Amazing 
This #Brexit debacle has gone on long enough. Time for a #PeoplesVote. Cross-party Amendment H tabled this evening to instruct the PM to request Article50 extension, so the public can give their consent for leaving or staying in European Union. 
No point turning Gavin Barwell into the scapegoat. PM knew full well that he hated Brexit when she appointed him to help her kybosh Brexit.  
British PM Theresa May has no plans to return to Brussels for more negotiations after lawmakers voted today to avoid a no-deal Brexit, her spokesman says  
There is something beyond obsession with the *the will of the people* that makes May repeat the Meaningful Vote until she gets her deal through. It is Brexit or die for her. Is she compromised? May is determined to have her *will* over Parliament. That is autocracy. 
This. Stop this catastrophic Brexit shambles. MPs must vote to #RevokeA50 and #Remain in the EU - and start working to reform our country for the better. 
Today I learned that "to table" something in British politics means the literal opposite of what it means in American politics, which has cleared up some but not most of my confusion about the Brexit state of play  
Brexit latest: Theresa May launches bid for third 'meaningful' vote that would delay EU departure until JuneOh dear oh dear. Insanity "doing the same thing over and over again and expecting different results  
All 4 English teams in the Top 8Brexit means Brexit 
Why should we allow foreign powers like Russia, Italy, Hungary & the USA demand a brexit in Britain so their billionaires can create their tax haven here?Brexit is NOT the "will of the ppl", it is a massive CON. These foreign powers are demanding we Leave on the 29th March 
The David Brent of Brexit  
Not legally binding... you know what else wasn't a legally binding vote - The fucking referendum vote! pic.twitter.com/hPNvttQy8Z 
On Thursday, UK Parliament will vote on another motion over whether to delay Brexit beyond the March 29 deadline. Here's what you need to know:  
“Since the last vote, I've canvassed Brexit campaign groups to find out their opinion whether in the light of this, we were right to vote down the deal. Unanimously the opinion is the deal was so rotten, we were right to vote it down and we should continue to do so” @SteveBakerHW 
So ... if the UK doesn’t ask for and/or EU doesn’t agree to extend the Brexit deadline, and Parliament doesn’t massively backflip and vote for the deal in next 15 days, MPs have effectively ordered Theresa May’s govt to withdraw #Brexit (the Article 50 notification)  
Parliament votes against a no-deal Brexit  
Can you help us make sure that 'The will of the people' can no longer be used as the Government's defacto position to ignore parliament, time and time again? Please support our campaign if you can. #Malthouse #spelmanamendment #Brexit  
Jim Mellon's M-ELON 3/13/19 London-Brussels (49m landing)-Cannes-Brussels (30m landing)-LondonWho did he drop off/pick up from Brussels?"Jim Mellon introduced Brexit ‘bad boys’ Nigel Farage and Arron Banks, and was a Leave EU ambassador"#Brexit 
Hello world! Our little boy arrived yesterday. Born into #Brexit chaos, we’re pondering suitably European names...  
Opposition leader Jeremy Corbyn speaks to UK parliament after lawmakers reject no-deal #Brexit  
Absolutely spot on and @UKLabour has allowed those in the Party who have always wanted  to stop Brexit force @jeremycorbyn to capitulate 
Theresa May says clear majority against no-deal Brexit – video  
Labour abandons support for second referendum on Theresa Brexit May's dealParty now says it would not be right for public to be given Final Say vote on the Prime Minister’s Brexit plan after it was again rejected by MPs  
Who's this Italian @nigel_farage wants to ride in & save Brexit? In an AMAZING coincidence it's a man facing EXACTLY the same questions over Russian funding as @arron_banks. His party offered almost identical deal. Well done chaps! All in it together 
Just tell me how much a season ticket costs. Quick, before Brexit means I'll have to pay in carrots.  
The leaders of Plaid Cymru, SNP, Lib Dem and Green in parliament have written to Jeremy Corbyn inviting him to discuss moving to a new Brexit referendum. 
1/ Hang on - Children’s services have been cut by £2billion+ and yet the Chancellor has just declared a Brexit ‘war chest’ of £26.6 billion? Here’s an idea - plug the funding gap - add another £2billion to really start to sort SEND & redevelop youth services & early years & he 
What a farce.Have you had enough of Brexit?Time to #TearUpArticle50Just rip it up and bin it.  
Brexit Leave campaign & European Research Group lead Steve Baker wants to push an incompetent Brexiter such as Boris Johnson, Esther Mcvey, Dominic Raab or David Davis to be the next Prime Minister... He wants them to "work it out between themselves"! #BrexitCrisis  
Footage of the UK carrying out Brexit right now...  
With a #NoDeal #Brexit off the table, Jacob darts off to start moving his barrow loads of money back to the UK #BrexitCatGIFs #NoDealVote 
*Brexit Dividend*  
Parliament right now is channelling one of my eldest’s most memorable toddler tantrums, that time when he wanted a clear drink with no flavour but water was too strong and he didn’t want his teeth to get wet. #brexit 
Theresa May launches bid for third ‘meaningful’ vote that would delay Brexit until June  
So how is it that we were only allowed one binary vote on the actual referendum and even though it wasn’t binding we have no choice, whereas May is allowed a Groundhog Day of Meaningful votes till she gets the right answer? #RussianDoll 
MPs reject no deal Brexit, May humiliated again, Cabinet revolting, Minister quits, Corbyn taunts weak PM, Tory hardliners surrendering, 29 March missed, exit extra time and  3rd + maybe 4th vote...fab night to be on @SkyNews with @toryboypierce 
Meaningful vote 3: This time it’s personal MV4: XXLMV5: Groundhog day MV6: The reckoningMV7: The reckoning againMV8: The squeakwelMV9: Tokyo driftMV10: I still know what you did last referendum MV11: The final insult 
No matter what happens we MUST leave the EU on the 29th of March, no ifs no buts! Sign the petition now!#Brexit #brexitmeansbrexit Sign here now: 
Still believe all this theatre tonight could easily have been stage managed to make ERG members vote for her sham Brexit when it comes back to the vote again.30 MPs were missing from the first vote. Did they all abstain? Shocking. 
No matter what happens we MUST leave the EU on the 29th of March, no ifs no buts! Sign the petition now!#Brexit #brexitmeansbrexit Sign here now: 
If Brexit was a shoe, it would be a croc. 
Financial Times: May issues ultimatum after MPs seize control with vote to ditch no-deal Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
So let’s get this straight. The House of Commons has ruled out the only Brexit deal we had, and now it’s ruled out the possibility of leaving without a deal?I’m sure I’m not alone in believing that what little democracy we had is now in tatters on the floor of Westminster. 
Finally, no-deal is off the table! As the UK government and MPs are unable to break the deadlock we need to move on to a #PeoplesVote and let people living in the UK steer the country away from this party politics game  #Brexit  
Concerned chonk is concerned about Brexit.  
Analysis: No one should be happy with the rejection of a no-deal Brexit. CNN's @LukeMcGee explains why:  
Who's been fucked more:Debbie, in "Debbie does Dallas"OrBrits, in "Politicians do Brexit"(Please RT out of despair, frustration, anger or because you know good porn from bad) 
She can push her failed deal perpetually but we cannot have a second EU Referendum.  This smacks of hypocrisy and double standards. #PeoplesVote 
"#AngelaMerkel-"For the UK, the EU is the question for another generation." “The #EU27 is tired of the UK and #Brexit. It's done. "All  via @BBCNews  pic of letter to @eucopresident via @kitty_donaldson#BrexitChaos#DonaldTusk 
God I am absolutely sick of #Brexit, May, Farage (rhymes with garage), Ree-SMOG, “the will of the people”, backstop, the phrases “Theresa May is/will go to/is in Brussels”, the bloody necklaces. Just revoke Article 50. Remain.Let me eat this entire packet of biscuits in peace. 
Oh lawd Mark Francois is going to Brexit us with his bare hands.  
Everyone seems to be focusing on whipping. I mean fair enough people are annoyed. But it's not like Eurosceptics haven't also broken quite a few three line whipsI wish MPs hadn't voted the way they did tonight. But they did. Now what? The deal is best Brexit on offer 
#Brexit thoughts: - Will Italy, Poland or Hungary veto an extension of Article 50?- It only takes one of the 27 EU members to veto an extension of Article 50 and force a no deal Brexit.- What will happen after a no deal Brexit? 
Democratic:Making MPs vote on the same deal they hate 4 times in an attempt to get a different result by scaring the shit out of them when a no deal Brexit loomsNot democratic:Allowing the public to vote twice  
Watching #killimanjaro rebalances  much of my anger and cynicism about life infected by the polarisation created by Brexit. There are many reasons to think there are still decent people wanting to do the right thing for unselfish reasons. @mrdanwalker @ShirleyBallas & co! 
My modest proposal for the most perfectly British solution to Brexit: never rescind Article 50, just delay leaving repeatedly, routinely, indefinitely. Fifty years from now, it’s a political oddity and pub trivia question, like not having a constitution. 
I’ve always said that I could never support a no deal Brexit, and so I could not in good conscience vote against the motion tonight.I backed the Withdrawal Agreement last night and will continue to support the PM's objective of leaving the EU with a deal. 
Meanwhile in the real world outside the Brexit bubble appalling things are happening.  
The Ladybird book of HOW TO KEEP WARM IN #BREXIT BRITAIN  
Democracy isn't keep putting it out until you get the vote you want, surely Bercow will have to block it! She won't allow another referendum but can keep putting a dead deal infront of parliament Insanity is doing the same thing and expecting a different result - May needs to go 
£65 billion of portfolio funds have been transferred out of the U.K. so far as financial firms prepare for Brexit (via @bopinion) 
If Brexit was a penalty. 
There was talk today about the country was getting the Army ready, well i tell you what if Brexit dosent happen i think they will need the troops. A Democratic Vote has never been dishonored in British Politics but i can see this going that way defying 17.4 British Citizens. 
Decision time for #Labour leadership.#Brexit in any form is opposed by a huge majority of our voters.#Brexit in any form will make the country poorer & more insular.#Brexit in any form will hit hardest those who have least.We must back a #PeoplesVote and do it unequivocally. 
If May can put meaningful vote before parliament a 3rd tine to try and get the right result why on earth can’t we the people have a 2nd referendum ? 
Would you support the intervention of Her Majesty the Queen suspending Parliament to let the 29th March pass & Brexit occur?#Brexit #StandUp4Brexit 
Just finished work and seen the news.We’re led by a party that can’t even govern. Two defeats.Jeremy Corbyn is the only leader actually offering a sensible solution to bring all sides together and wanting to seek a mandate for a sensible Brexit position.Election now. 
If it’s like university essays, any extension request will be accompanied by largely spurious evidence but approved by a ‘mitigating circumstances committee’ anyway #article50 #Brexit 
@LukeGrahamMP the Tory MP for Perth and Kinross is deleting comments against him and blocking folk from commenting. This is the man who went against 61% of his constituents and voted for the Brexit last night whilst shouting out that Scotland is not a country but a principality. 
13 July 2016: Theresa May comes to power promising to fight the burning injustices facing Britain.13 March 2019: Theresa May votes in favour of keeping a catastrophic no-deal Brexit on the table.What a journey! 
Honestly, at this point, the only amusing thing about Brexit is John Bercow's collection of ties#Parliament 
Hi Esther. Please see and share @carolecadwalla's below thread on fifth columnist Farage, his set-piece speeches, Youtube and RT (Russia Today).Alvast bedankt! 
The 2016 referendum was a farce because the Leave option was a vacuous catch-all slogan that could attract the support of groups with bitterly opposed visions of #Brexit. Now these chickens are coming home to roost. There has never been a majority for any real #Brexit.#FBPE 
Many voted for the first time in their lives in the EU referendum, believing that for once their vote would matter. Now we learn our vote has never meant so little as our politicians break every Brexit promise that got them into power. #BrexitBetrayal 
11 Scottish Judases who voted to kill farming , fishing and families voting for No Deal Brexit. Bought and Sold for English GoldAndrew Bowie.Stephen Kerr.Luke Graham.Douglas Ross.Colin Clark.Alister Jack.John Lamont.David Duguid.Bill Grant.Kirstene Hair.Ross Thomson. 
Here is the cross-party amendment that has been submitted for tomorrow by Tory MPs along with Labour’s John Mann and the DUP’s Nigel Dodds seeking to rule out a second referendum  
EU countries to veto Brexit extension, jolly good. 
wrote this earlier today + u should read it + get angry + not let the brexit shenanigans distract you from the brutality and inhumanity that the tories have woven into the fabric of our society  
WATCH | "We're not going to vote for the Withdrawal Agreement, because it keeps us in the EU!" - Mark Francois confirms that he will not be back May's rotten Brexit deal on a third vote  Stay strong - we need a proper WTO Brexit!Support us at  
Brexit: How did my MP vote on no-deal?  
A delay to Brexit is "now inevitable," opposition leader Jeremy Corbyn says  
May, having stated that it would be disrespectful to the 'will of the people' to hold a second referendum, proposes to put the disinterred and stinking corpse of her own deal to a third vote. It appears the nadir of politics is not a fixed point but a state of infinite regress. 
Who cares really?Our govt & civil service are a shower of duplicitous lying EU lemmings.There's little devious left they haven't explored.16 days to #Brexit & nobody has halted anything yet.  
What's interesting to me is that the option of revoking Article 50 and simply not doing Brexit remains on the table and yet it is regarded as preposterously naïve to think there's a way to avoid the most absurd self-inflicted wound in modern political history. 
Tbh, I used to think pretty badly of people who didn’t bother to turn up to vote at election time. Now I’m beginning to think they might have a point. If we don’t leave the EU, what IS the point? And if we don’t leave the EU after a referendum to leave, how the hell do we leave? 
Analysis has shown any form of Brexit will be damaging for Scotland's economy and yet @DavidMundellDCT abstained on the #NoDeal vote. He must resign - he has proved himself utterly incapable of standing up for Scotland's interests. 
In the Tim Burton film of #Brexit, Mark Francois and Andrew Bridgen will be angry because someone European stole their necks. 
If MPs don't want to leave it's time to march. Join the #MarchToLeave to show the establishment they cannot betray Brexit. 
The betrayal of Brexit is one of the most shameful chapters in our country's history - @Nigel_Farage 
All he has to do is Really push for the referendumReally push for article 50 revocationOr, hit her hard over the referendum fraud investigations she is actively suppressing and hit hard over it 
The writer for this series of Brexit is insane. 
An off the wall idea:Extend article 50.Hold the European elections.Use them as a quick de facto referendum #PeoplesVote @bbclaurak 
True. In any case, if Brexit is delayed, people are not going to blame the Brexiteers. They’ll blame the MPs who, you know, voted for a delay.  
Brexit's a big earner for "skint" Nigel Farage  
It's noticeable how I'm getting more aggressive, sometimes downright xenophobic tweets now than at any time since the referendum; this, despite weeding out many, many UKIP (and Momentum) trolls from my TL since then. The tweets I can ignore. How bad it's become I can't. 
The Brits are being served some long overdue karma.The groveling & pandering to Europe re. #Brexit The eyes of the world seeing what actually happened on #BloodySunday & the #Ballymurphymassacre The British army being brought to task over their crimes.Long time coming! 
Tory austerity and cruel policies have devastated our country.Now the Tories' dire handling of Brexit is putting the wellbeing of millions of workers and vulnerable people at risk.The Tories are unfit to manage Brexit, and they're unfit to govern. 
The unending saga that is Brexit is the strongest evidence I've yet to encounter in support of the thesis that empires insist on one thing above all: never being forgotten. Only a people once at the helm of the world's largest empire could expect the rest of us to care this long. 
A very emotional and angry ⁦@TomTugendhat⁩ tells me how ashamed he is that MPs haven’t been able to decide on #Brexit and says if ⁦@theresa_may⁩ can’t forge a consensus perhaps she should make way for someone who can...here: 
The metaphysics of tables has now entered Brexit discourse  
Brexit summed up in one video 
I’m loving seeing #BrexitBetrayal trending at no. 1. The betrayal took place with the lies, illegality and interference in the run up to the referendum.  
Could Brexit break up the UK?  
BREXIT IS COMING! And just like the Brits we've bottled it. Available at a store near you on Brexit Day the 29th of March. *Unfortunately not available in the UK due to limited or non-existing trade-agreements.  
I yearn for a day like this. #brexit #trump 
My first opinion piece for @AlJazeera is now online.“Britain's political system is at the breaking point”Written before tonight’s votes.#Brexit #MeaningfulVote 
MPs inflict further Brexit defeats on May in no-deal votes – video  
Next, it is in the balance as to whether we leave at the end of June with the PM's deal or not. A third meaningful vote will be held next week, and there will be huge pressure on MPs to back Brexit and see the referendum result honoured... but 3/ 
Article 50: Why delaying Brexit is not as straightforward as you think  
“The year is 2049: Britain and Germany are the last remaining members of the European Union, and the Prime Minister is promising the #Brexit vote will be implemented at last after the coming election – MPs just need ONE MORE six-month extension to finalise the negotiations...”  
They'll resign over Brexit, but not deaths,homeless and poverty that already exists. 
Nobody can predict with absolute certainty what will happen next, or between now and March 29. Exhibit A: me saying this would hopefully be a short thread!  But Id do know that tonight, we are closer than ever to a general election; closer than ever to a 2nd referendum too. 
This BBC News update on Brexit is everything.  
May seems to be asking MPs to vote on her heavily defeated deal for the third time in three months. But we're not allowed to vote again almost three years after a narrow referendum result which has divided the country and made us a laughing stock.#democracyfail 
Anyone missing the significance of this now . .  . . is a Brexit change denier.It's time for reason.Thanks @JonathanCoopr, your team's bill with Helena Kennedy QC and @JolyonMaugham with his own draft are ahead of the game again!#RevokeA50 
Upon hearing brexit will more than likely be delayed. 1000s more Romanians Bulgarians will flock over to Britain. All the illegal Afghan Iranians and Eritreans will continue to enter by dinghy and lorry and be given asylum.  Government is F..King us over in every way possible 
The significance of tonight's votes on Brexit do not seem to have been fully grasped, so let's have a go at the analysis... 1/ (sorry another thread) 
What just happened in the UK? - Theresa May proposed a motion rejecting a no-deal Brexit on March 29th. - Parliament voted to amend it, rejecting ever allowing a no-deal Brexit. This was a surprise.- The government then tried to whip against its own (amended) motion. It lost.  
Theresa May Says Brexit Will Be Delayed After MPs Voted To Reject No-Deal Under Any Circumstances. Pathetic. Absolutely pathetic.   
Again, if the people who want Brexit won’t vote for Brexit then there is less of an imperative for other people, who do not like Brexit, to vote, however reluctantly, for Brexit.  
"Should we do a Brexit" - the greatest argument in the history of parliament, locked by the speaker after 12,239 years of heated debate, 
Wrong. The Leave campaign never argued for leaving the EU without a deal and a no deal Brexit is what the House of Commons rejected this evening.  We now need to find an alternative way forward. 
 i suppose this shouldn’t blow my mind, but it does. at every turn Brexit has exposed the ineptitude, irresponsibility, and idiocy of some of our most prominent political leaders. our derelict political establishment needs a complete overhaul. join @WEP_UK - let’s start again. 
Wow!! SNP MP Neil Gray stands to comment on Brexit motion and mentions the result last night at Ibrox. They are a joke of a party. What ⁦@RangersFC⁩ fan is voting for them?RTID  
Brexit chaos in the Commons: what just happened?  
Taking back control, eh? No-one mentioned it involved cosying up to Italian fascists.How many people who voted to restore sovereignty to UK Parliament thought it meant Farage & Co plus Tory MPs going to Salvini to ask they block what Parliament decided via the EU.#brexit  
An ancient rule means Bercow could take drastic action on Brexit  
Theresa May whenever she brings her Brexit plans to a parliamentary vote  
Tory MP Simon Clarke has just expressed his anger on BBCNews at MPs taking No Deal off the table; which has put a gun to his head requiring him, under duress, to decide between voting for Theresa May's wretched deal or facing No Brexit.Theresa May simply has to go. 
 If a Panenka penalty ever summed up Brexit... 
Work and Pensions Minister Sarah Newton has resigned after she rebelled by voting for a motion to reject 'no-deal' Brexit 
One of the things that we can do at this stage with the political debacle going on is make sure that if article 50 IS extended, & we are voting in EU elections one more time, we don't let a single fucking UKIP or Brexit supporting %&^$ represent us there.We need ALL REMAIN MEPs 
 Tired of watching Westminster descend into more #Brexit chaos?Why not join the SNP and help us fight for a better future:  
Chief Brexit negotiator Olly Robbins just headed through Central Lobby #brexit 
You literally had the hardest Brexit in the palm of your hand and you refused to vote for it because of an insurance policy you claimed was unnecessary because autonomous drones patrolling the border - IE TECH -  would solve it.  
Eighty-six per cent of MPs were elected in 2017 on manifestos promising to honour the referendum result. Now Labour - helped by a handful of Tory Euro-zealots - have gone back on those promises. This goes beyond Brexit: they are delegitimising our system of government. 
One other thing that’s going to start to happen. Labour MPs in Leave constituencies have been spooked by “Corbyn backs 2nd referendum” headlines. If MV3 becomes close, they will move. 
Extension now inevitable in one form or another. Brexit not going to happen on March 29th - was one of my new year predictions.Only EU forcing it could change this; when push comes to shove they wont want to be blamed for ND so clearly as would occur in these calamitous circs 
Can I please ask a question of our MPs? Why do you get all these votes on #Brexit & you are allowed to change your minds as more *facts come to mind.But the rest of us only got the one vote which took place before many of us knew very many of the *facts? #JustAsking #Brexit 
“I have seen Ministerial colleagues come out of that lobby, voting to take ‘no deal’ off the table to prevent us from leaving.  If Cabinet can’t vote for a longterm Government position on Brexit, on a 3-line whip, then they need to go, frankly” @bbradleymp#StandUp4Brexit 
Sarah Newton becomes 15th member of the govt to resign over Brexit 
We Remainers have long known that we were lied to during the referendum. When will it dawn on the Leavers that they were lied to as well? The sooner we all accept this was just a ruse to keep the Tories together, the sooner we can sort this mess out.  
If they had the gumption to recognise it, their vote also sealed the fate for any referendum on Scottish Independence being successful. Stupid doesn't even scratch the surface.  
The evil that lurks in Westminster produced another betrayal of the voters. Removing the no-deal #Brexit means in reality the blocking of the switch to the WTO rules that was the only sensible thing to do for Britain. We have EU puppets in British #parliament calling the shots. 
NEW: The British pound is up around 2.07% after U.K. lawmakers rejected a no-deal Brexit, the biggest surge in nearly two years - CNBC 
It takes a fucking nerve for Theresa May to float the idea of bringing her abysmal deal back for a THIRD vote, yet insist that the the 2016 referendum is sacrosanct and there's absolutely no possibility that anyone has changed their mind.#NoDealBrexit 
I’d say this was peak Brexit but there’s still tomorrow 
Ok I've done some reading now and I think I almost sort of vaguely understand what's happening. Basically, 'Brexit' is the process of Britain (Br) leaving (exiting) the EU. 
Breaking: The Taoiseach @campaignforleo has given his first reaction to tonight’s #Brexit vote telling me: “Things look a bit brighter today than they did yesterday”. Tune in to @rtenews at 9 to see the interview. 
British pound surges the most in nearly two years after UK lawmakers vote to reject a no-deal Brexit  
Even if @theresa_may gets her Brexit deal through at the 3rd attempt she is now under huge pressure to set out timetable for her exit date 
If you aren't pro Independence by now, I honestly have to ask if you're paying enough attention.The UK Government is a collapsing clown car.  For the love of God, Scotland, get us out of here #Brexit #indyref2 
Livid ERGers blaming everyone except themselves. But they did this. All of it. They grossly overreached on a flimsy 52-48 mandate at every point. To force premature A50 notice. To force Hard Brexit. To force no deal. Brexit was in their grasp. All they had to do was vote for it. 
The risk of a no-deal Brexit has not been eliminated. It remains the default course in the absence of a withdrawal agreement  
This is surely Peak Brexit. Surely. Please god surely. 
in case you are wondering what the beans is going on with brexit:deadline is the end of the month. we’ve said “no” to no deal. but we’ve also said “no” to yes deal. so now we have no no deal and no yes deal which is a paradox and now we have entered T H E  V O I D 
This is the man the EU fear most.This is the man who gave us #BrexitThis Conservative man has taken & continues to take bullets for our country.Like it or not #unlikelyhero #wednesdaythoughts 
Update for those watching the #BAYLIV game.The political establishment is now up 2-0 against the people and it may go to 3-0 if it decides to extend Article 50 tomorrow.If you voted for Brexit be aware that UKIP is ready to fight again and punish the establishment.#PARLPPL 
What one thing can we do, leaving here tonight? @SelinaRStone - echoed by Lord Glasman "Make some space in your diary for a dinner, conversation, coffee with someone in your local area who you don't agree with. Open your heart and be prepared to change." #Tawney19 #Brexit  
No one is confirming it, but lots of MPs now seem to be suspecting they'll be voting again on Theresa May's Brexit deal on March 20, @emmarossthomas says 
How's Brexit, neoliberalism, privatisation, unsustainable house prices, western military (humanitarian) intervention, austerity and the Tory party working out for everyone? All good? #Brexit 
I will not vote to extend article 50 tomorrow in order to allow the remainer MPs  to steal the people’s Brexit ! 
EU spokesperson on tonight's Brexit votes: "To take no deal off the table, it is not enough to vote against no deal -- you have to agree to a deal."  
Voting against no-deal #Brexit is not enough, UK has to agree to a deal, says the European Commission  
If Sarah Newton has resigned as a junior minister at DWP, that's:- 24 ministerial resignations since #GE2017 (25 under May)- 17 of those have been over policy/political disagreements- 15 of those have been over #Brexit.That's one more than in Thatcher's *entire* premiership  
Jacob Rees-Mogg MP: ‘Law unchanged’ by no-deal Brexit vote. 
Brexit has further exposed the faultlines showing that ordinary people will bear the cost of economic turmoil whilst its leading proponents will continue to do nicely. 
At this point we may as well just get Noel Edmonds in to open some boxes and give Brussels a call  #Brexit 
#Scotland man in the UK Cabinet no longer agrees with his Government ...& probably keeps his job! Travesty #Brexit reality  
Steve Baker says “come what may we will continue to vote down this deal.” But wonder if that will hold for other MPs if Brexit starts to look in very grave peril next week.... 
Shameful: MPs vote against a WTO Brexit. They have defied the will of the people seeking to overturn the democratic will of the British people. 
#EastSurrey @Conservatives members who want to let @SamGyimah know how they feel about his #Brexit betrayal pop down to @EastSurreyCons AGM onFriday 22nd March 2019 7:30 pmThe Wilberforce HallCaterham SchoolHarestone Valley RoadCaterham  CR3 6YA Show him #NoSafeSeatForSam 
When the excoriating annals of Brexit are finally compiled, the historians may excuse May’s xenophobia on account of pathology and Johnson’s nihilism on account of psychopathy, but nothing and nobody will excuse the sheer, unending cowardice of Philip Hammond 
Opinion: Tonight's Brexit vote has made it clear – May must put it to the people  
"Gee, Brain, what do you want to do tonight?""The same thing we do every night, Pinky - have a vote on Brexit!"  
To get your #brexitpornname name, take your first pet and add the Brexit phrase you’re most sick of hearing. Mine is Bernard Backstop. 
Actual footage of the UK attempting to leave the EU #brexit  
Triple whammy defeat for government tonight and an utterly contemptuous response from the PM. Time to listen or time to go. Time for #FinalSay @peoplesvote_uk #Brexit 
Extraordinary! Labour frontbench MP @JohnHealey_MP has just told @afneil that @UKLabour accepts the #Brexit Withdrawal Agreement and will not seek to renegotiate it! Instead, they will seek to negotiate the future relationship. Is this now formal #Labour policy? Utter shambles. 
#BrexitMayhemStupidly hypocritical anti-democrat Rees-Mogg who campaigned for UK's Parliamentary Sovereignty in EURef 2016, now says that Sovereignty, the foundation of our representative democracy, should be ignored and swept aside - due to the sacrosanct advisory referendum. 
How ironic does the strong and stable slogan feel now #brexit 
Since No Deal is the worst solution, and May's Deal is a rubbish solution, a second referendum is a muddled solution, and a general election a confusing one, I propose we default to Chaos with Ed Miliband instead. 
The extreme mad fucking irony of Brexit backer Arron Banks and his sidekick Farage desperately seeking the help of European politicians to overturn the decisions of our sovereign parliament. pic.twitter.com/b2zrobRANf 
17.4 million people can now sleep easy knowing for sure that politics is something done to them, not by them, and never for them. #skypapers @Fox_Claire #brexit @DPJHodges 
The Chancellor Philip Hammond has tonight failed to find the courage to vote decisively against a No Deal Brexit.Businesses & workers fearing for their jobs this evening will be in despair at the weakness of this Chancellor and incompetence of this government. 
Keep finding myself genuinely praying to a God I don’t believe in that Brexit be cancelled. I’d give anything 
"brexit will be bad for GDP"  
The betrayal of Brexit is one of the most shameful chapters in our country’s history, writes @Nigel_Farage 
May’s plan isn’t Brexit. That’s why it keeps getting annihilated.  
Brexit  
Suzanne, as you are fully aware I have been Purple and Proud for 7 years now, sat in Tim's Office watching the Brexit votes LIVE until 6am 23rd June, never ever did I think we would be ignored by our own Government. Time to hit the streets, hope you are well  
The middle ground underpinning a compromise on Brexit has been deliberately shredded, torched, carpet-bombed from both directions. That's why this column will go down like a cup of sick.But this bitter, vicious, distracting culture war has to end.  
Brace yourself @Nigel_Farage you’re about to go from zero to hero in epic style.You’re the only one whose remained consistent & on the rightside of the argument.  Your reward is on its way which will be a cherry on the top of an already delicious Brexit cake #BrexitPrediction 
I think its now safe to say that brexit, anticipated by so many, has now been lost. No deal which the EU would sign will be anything less than imprisonment for this country. Now let's see what 17.4 million people think. 
What PM is saying is she will only ask for a short Brexit delay if MPs back her deal next week. MPs, including many in her own party, will be incandescent 
Brexit vote: UK parliament rejects 'no-deal' option  
Because poor/little information was available at the time of the vote... And lies were told.If there was a second referendum "Vote Remain or Leave", people may actually have an understanding of what they are voting for this time round. 
#BrexitCrisisParliament just decided no #Brexit without a deal, but it has also rejected the only deal on the tableOnly 2 possibilities left:A. an Alternative Deal, which needs govt to drop its red lines  (precious little sign of that)B. no Brexit, which needs referendum 
Time to play this again #Brexit  
6/ The next 24 hours will see the sh*t hit the fan in Toryland. The reactionary fantasy of hard Brexit just evaporated. Here's a guide to why it's happening  
Only two Labour MPs in final vote backed keeping No Deal on table: Kate Hoey and Stephen Hepburn. Labour MPs representing areas like Doncaster and Stoke have said their constituents are increasingly in favour of WTO Brexit. Working class Leavers won't forget this. 
I’ve always opposed a no deal Brexit. The House made its view clear by agreeing the Spelman amendment, I didn’t think it was right for me to oppose that.The PM has my full support in her objective of leaving the EU with a Deal to deliver an orderly Brexit 
Laura, #RevokeArticle50 is the default option now. It is all that is left if Farage gets his way lobbying right wing governments to veto an extension.This NEEDS to enter the narrative. No Brexit needs to be the new normal. 
of course @MarkLancasterMK & @iainastewart voted AGAINST rejecting no deal Brexit  you weak pathetic little boys. do you not have your own minds? if Mrs May tells you to walk off a cliff you just go ahead and do it yeah?you're both an absolute embarrassment to our town. #GTTO 
Were the next big steps on #Brexit hidden in plain sight in the penultimate paragraph of the PM’s statement from LAST night?  
UK PM May Pushes Delay After Parliament Rejects No-Deal Brexit  
MPs have effectively just voted to block #Brexit, because without no deal the WA is the best the EU will offer - because our MPs have made so plain that if the EU plays ball they will hold up their end in London to block Brexit. Utter, utter disgrace. 
How did your MP vote on no-deal Brexit? A full list now online.  
Remainers in Westminster treat democracy like a game, treat Brexit like a disease and treat the British people like fools. We will never sit by whilst they betray our vote. Never. 
The govt has a majority. The govt is trying to Brexit. If the Brexit headbangers on the govt benches had backed it, you'd be Brexiting now. Go and say stupid things to Jacob.  
Today we witnessed the most treacherous act of treason within a corrupt parliament We as citizens have a right to enter in to LAWFUL REBELLION!!!!!BREXIT OR REVOLT!!!!  
Not NOW FuckSake Kim we’re dealing with #brexit here and by the way one eye looks shonky and you’ve got a used condom spraying out your top knot  
Your regular reminder that the EU does not have settled view on how long Brexit cd be extended for - lots of ideas, but leaders to decide next Thu. European commission think short extension off the table b/c  last night's defeat for WA 
This Parliament was elected more recently than the referendum, so, for the PM to ignore Parliament is to flout the will of the people.  To ask her to put her deal to the people, and let them vote on it, is not. 
The @FT late night #Brexit team has decided to begin drinking. None to soon.  
I've little doubt that the PM would take the UK into the abyss if it meant she delivered Brexit, but I can't quite get over the Govt whipping for No Deal. Think about that. The official Government position was to vote with the ERG against ruling out what they know is a disaster  
The betrayal happened when we took the voice of 17.4 million people who were lied to, on an advisory referendum, fraught with overspending and foreign influence, and subjected the other 49 million to the 'will' of these people. 
News: BREXIT IS 400 HOURS AWAY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Theresa May:  
So tomorrow Parliament votes to try to delay Brexit. I cannot vote for this.  
Meanwhile, in the UK.... #brexit  
Hang on @Anna_Soubry Corbyn actually put down a vote to pave way for a second referendum a few weeks ago and YOU actually voted against it!  
Boris - in charge of foreign relations. Liam - in charge of trade deals. Davies - in charge of Brexit talks. Mogg - in charge of the PM, effectively. All have voted against the government, and all but one have run away. Tell me again how the Remainers screwed it up?  
Full list: The Tory MPs who voted to reject a no-deal Brexit  
4/ I support having a second referendum, in which I would vote Remain. But I see the path to that now as exhausting all other possibilities by 20 March. MPs - and thru them UK civil society - now have massive leverage to stop hard Brexit, and force either Norway or PV and Remain 
The last roll of the dice for the PM’s Brexit deal. She is saying in her motion for tomorrow that either MPs vote for her deal by next Weds or the UK may stay in the EU for months - and possibly forever - and UK will have to participate in elections to EU parliament. There...  
Goldilocks and the Brexit.My @smh @theage cartoon. 
Have genuinely spent the last 3 days doing nothing other than watching and reading the news and I STILL do not understand what is going on with Brexit 
Never been prouder of the grown up in the House. Thanks @jeremycorbyn and Labour for always putting both the 52% AND the 48% first. #Brexit#BrexitVote 
Government is falling apart when a weak PM's powerless to sack rebelling Cabinet abstainers and a middle-ranking minister, Sarah Newton, quits anyway to vote against a no deal Brexit 
Theresa May says #Brexit options "are the same as they always have been"  
The Government has lost control of Brexit, losing vote after vote in Parliament.  Labour has put forward a credible alternative Brexit plan to protect jobs, rights and our security.  That should now be the basis for building a broad consensus across Parliament. 
"It’s time to put the decision on our EU membership back to the people.”SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP calls for Article 50 to be extended or revoked to enable a second EU referendum - with Remain on the ballot paper #Brexit  
Since Scots Nats are gloating over Brexit chaos, a reminder that they pledged to set up an independent Scotland within 18 months, for £200m, with a $113/barrel oil price, automatically a member of the EU and, when told No, threatened the residency rights of European nationals. 
2/ Tonight's defeat was bigger than yesterday's. With one more shove, MPs can take control of the parliamentary agenda, and the Brexit process, away from the government. This is what Labour Whips doing tonight...  
Parliament has frustrated Brexit since day one. Our elected representatives hold the 17.4 million people who voted for independence in contempt. Help us take the fight to the Establishment once again:  
Leave constituency MPs who betrayed their electors tonight are going to be punished at the ballot box at the next available opportunity.  #Brexit #BrexitVote #BrexitBetrayal 
There’s only one way I can deal with #Brexit... by making needlessly cruel, mean-spirited remarks about key participants. It’s a Brexit Roast, round one here we go; 
Are you a @UKLabour or @Conservatives member? Did you vote for #Brexit? You no longer in good faith can support a party that doesn't follow the will of the people and more importantly, they don't represent you.Tonight, resign your membership and stand against them. 
Can’t believe Instagram is failing us on the darkest Brexit day yet. So desperate for distraction I might have to talk to my husband. 
I'll tell you what compromise I'll accept.If we stop Brexit, I'm prepared not to prosecute the people who tried to inflict it on us.There's your compromise. 
Dear @BBCNews Perhaps use the term "non-binding" for all results including the 52-48 referendum? 
Only Labour has a way out of this Brexit omnishambles the Tories have created. Time for the #BrokenMedia to start giving it fair and proper treatment. Enough of the eye rolling and hectoring, proper coverage please. 
One day. Re Brexit.  
Eddie: “What about people who have changed their minds on Brexit?”  Liz Truss: “I don’t think people have changed their minds” Eddie: “You have” Liz Truss: “I have, thats true…”  
MPs Now Overtly Betraying Brexit!Join us! Support #MarchToLeaveShow MPs you won't take their treason any more!Newcastle ~ Friday 15th ~ 1200Get yourself down there!  
Tory MP - “we just threw a hand grenade into our own house” #brexit 
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn says "Parliament must now take control" of the #Brexit process, after UK MPs vote to reject leaving the EU without a deal 
well todays brexit news has certainly cleared everything up for me thank u britain 
The British government effectively fell apart tonight. Yesterday its flagship Brexit bill defeated. Tonight, defeated by MPs who have committed Britain decisively to avoiding No Deal by 43 votes... THREAD 1/... 
When you gave money to the Conservative Party, for years and decades, what you were really seeking to do was bring about a govt that wld set up a referendum on EU membership, try to keep us in, then when that failed overturn the result of the referendum. Amirite? 
At a presser in Washington DC today, the Taoiseach's frustration with the UK over #Brexit was pretty evident. In combative tones, he referred to chaos in the UK, Brexiteers chasing unicorns, no further concessions & the "supreme irony" of the tariff proposals.Chaos remark:  
If there is a 2nd referendum, I will vote leave again.Regardless of the result of that referendum, I will never ever vote in any election or referendum again. Democracy would be dead. 
Am now hearing May is not even going to sack the ministers who just cancelled Brexit. She’s been in on it all the time. 
Still firmly of the opinion that if David Bowie hadn’t died we wouldn’t be in this mess. #brexit 
Until now, I’ve been very dubious about the idea of another referendum. But last night, Brexiteer MPs comprehensively voted *against* the Brexit deal. Brexiteers literally stopped Brexit. They had their chance. Now hand it back to the people for a proper legally-binding decision. 
Brexit is a most grotesque caricature of the noble concept of sovereignty. Promising what you cannot deliver, debating what you cannot negotiate, postponing what you cannot resolve.#Brexit 
Parliament, dominated by Remainers, is now actively trying to stop Brexit happening. Staggering, unprecedented.. and disgraceful. 
summoning circle, hope this works                                   BIN BREXIT    
Brexit_Withdrawal_agreement_v4_final_amended_finalfinal_FINAL-2.doc 
Confused about what just happened in the UK parliament over Brexit? I certainly was. Here's a nice summary from the FT's live blog to sort it out:  
When the news feels overwhelming #brexit  
“British politics today is a complete and utter disgrace… It’s a completely broken system."@ChukaUmunna says he thinks Theresa May should no longer be leading Brexit.Hear all the latest Brexit updates from 5 Live on @bbcsounds:  
Last night David Mundell proclaimed he'd vote to take no deal off the table but appears to have caved under pressure.If he's not sacked, he should resign for the simple reason that his party thought it was a good idea to inflict economic calamity on the Scottish people. #Brexit 
308 MPs voted for “no deal” Brexit.They lost, but 308 MPs felt like leaving the EU with zero trade deals and just expecting everything to be fine was an acceptable thing to vote for.COOL. COOL COOL. COOL. 
#BREAKING British government proposes new Brexit deal vote by March 20  
Despite utter chaos from the Government, Parliament has voted to rule out a no-deal Brexit, which would have been catastrophic for our city and country. The only sensible way to proceed is to withdraw Article 50 and give the British public the final say on Brexit.  
my fave thing about this whole brexit fiasco is John Bercow screeching “ORRDEEEEEEEEEHHHHHHH”  #Parliament 
Is there anyway the EU can vote to leave Brexit? Because we really need to start looking at other options here and fast. And by fast, I mean yesterday. 
Some people mint it during all this chaosThe Disaster Capitalism Club: Vote Leave Backers Who Made Billions from Brexit  via @BylineTimes 
BREAKING: Tory DWP minister Sarah Newton resigns after defying Theresa May to reject a no-deal Brexit Four other Tory ministers also defied the Prime Minister and have refused to resign - meaning Theresa May will have to sack them#BrexitVote  
Ken Clarke has just made a remarkably misogynistic comment in the HoC, implying that "this is not another debate by the Women's Institute". Maybe he thinks that he's conducting manly business here, whereas women focus on things like curtain colours and shit #Brexit #misogyny pic.twitter.com/IF0tW4zitq 
A Government fast forwarding us towards disaster  Less than 400 hours left  It's time to press pause - and fix this mess #Brexit  
Theresa May's deal won't get through, if amendedThe EU won't extend Article 50 for fear of Brexit MEPs clearing up in May electionsThere's 12 working days till March 29th, no time for a 2nd referendumMarch 29th is the day we leave, and it's set in lawWe're out!  
I’ve given up trying to follow Brexit, and I stuck with frigging WESTWORLD. 
brexit latest: government tables motion. whips against it. loses.  
So that, my Conservative activist friends, was what you canvassed houses, phoned around, stuffed envelopes & stood on the street greeting people for: so the govt could cancel Brexit if it cldn't get a deal through that gave away NI to the EU. Well done. I'm sure you're v proud. 
If Brexit doesn’t happen, remember, the ERG could have had it, but they chose to let it slide through their fingers.Which in a way is very Brexit. 
If we have to have another referendum I really want one of the options to be "chaos with Ed Miliband"  
If there’s one thing the Brexit referendum has acheived, it’s exposing our politicians’ contempt for the electorate. 
Eyes to the left. Nose to the right. Bloody Europeans. #Brexit  
The Secretary of State for Scotland @DavidMundellDCT abstained tonight - to keep his job - from voting to ensure Scotland doesn’t face a no deal Brexit. Political cowardice of the highest order. 
Parliament has voted to express what everyone with any sense has always known: no deal is unthinkable.But there needs to be a plan to make sure it’s not what happens. It’s still the default.- softer Brexit- revoke A50 
Tonight's events have made it clear that the only option now is to give the people the final say on the Brexit deal and option to stay in the EU.It's time to end this mess. Demand a People's Vote > 
This season’s finale of Brexit is fucking incredible. I’m not even halfway through. 
This is the moment MPs voted to block no-deal Brexit in all circumstances  
The picture that shows how little control of Brexit ⁦@theresa_may⁩ retains: Tories who abstained on no-deal vote against her orders, including four members of the Cabinet, ⁦@AmberRuddHR⁩ ⁦@DavidGauke⁩ ⁦@GregClarkMP⁩ and ⁦@DavidMundellDCT⁩ 
BREAKING Tory minister Sarah Newton resigns after defying Theresa May to reject No Deal Brexit  
Sarah Newton, well regarded DWP minsiter, has resigned. I understand she was told she could abstain and keep her job, and has chosen to vote against and resign. #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement 
DISGRACEFUL: 17 Conservative MPs voted against No Deal Brexit. Totally ignoring the pro-Brexit Conservative grassroots!  
I think Parliament has made itself clear: Brexit with Deal  Brexit with No Deal  Brexit with Asteroid Apocalypse 
17.4 million fuming uk residents right now & I bet some of the remainders must be annoyed & can see democracy is dead & we are fast becoming a communist country!! It absolutely stinks to high heaven absolutely sickening!! #BrexitBetrayal #brexit #YellowVest 
All the Parliamentary parties have shown their disregard for the people who voted #Brexit, its time to abandon the traditional parties and choose new direction. @TheSDPUK can be that change. Join us. 
Jeremy Corbyn says from tomorrow he will hold meetings with MPs from across the House of Commons to draft a Brexit deal that could pass #BrexitVote  
I may be biased but this is in fact the best rolling coverage of Brexit available   
The British House of Chaos & its Cabinet of Confusion have gone & done it again. Right mess they’ve got themselves intoTheresa, there’s a solution. Get Karen to work (diff I know) trigger that border poll. You know the test has been met. It IS the solution to the Brexit mess  
Just heard Mogg’s Hard Brexit ally, Nigel Farage, telling BBC’s Andrew Neil, that he’s actively lobbying EU member state(s) to veto May’s request to EU to extend withdrawal agreement - one veto is enough ! Italy’s populist Salvini seems his best bet. Yet he complains about Blair 
I did.  I wrote how people should vote in the referendum at the time.  Millions read it.  I believe it still stands the test of time - it's here...  
nice no-deal Brexit you got there, would be a shame if somebody [lowers shades] took it off the table 
Matthew, if the WA was Brexit, Eurosceptic MPs would have voted for it. It wasn’t. 
if they do extend article 50 tomorrow brexit will be so late they might as well have put Chris Grayling in charge of the timetable 
BRILLIANT result tonight - parliament voted to get no deal off the table, with some Tory remainers voting against the government or abstaining. It really is time to make sure any deal agreed by Parliament gives the people of our country the #FinalSay on Brexit  
Just put Brexit out of its misery. It needs to be scrapped. It’s the stupidest idea ever and obviously unachievable. The vote was never democratic anyway. So what if some racists are upset for a bit. That’s better than trashing our whole country. 
Imagine being remembered as the generation of Conservative Eurosceptics who had Brexit within their grasp and then ... lost it. 
BREAKING: Brexit plan finally revealed  
UK MPs overwhelmingly reject leaving the European Union without a deal, paving the way for a vote to delay #Brexit  
#Breaking Sarah Newton has resigned as a minister at the Department for Work and Pensions over the Brexit vote, a DWP source says  
Every time I think America has engaged in the most flagrant act of national hari-kari in recent political history ... the wind cries BREXIT 
Brexit - the process, the rhetoric, the gridlock - is now the biggest enemy this country has. And we have created it entirely for ourselves.Just kill it. Put it out of its misery. Forget it ever happened.And let's get back to being a functioning nation once more. 
European council president signals Corbyn’s deal is the only way to stop no-deal Brexit.By @wrightismight 
#breaking British Queen announces new #Brexit coin #BrexitVote via mtr72 
So... MPs voted to give voters final say on Brexit in EU referendum.MPs promised to respect result of the EU ref.MPs voted to trigger Article 50.MPs stood in 2017 general election on manifestos promising Brexit.And tonight, MPs just voted to STOP Brexit.Yeah, seems legit.  
Parliament has acted decisively this evening to once again rule out a ‘no deal’ #Brexit by 321 to 278 votes with Cabinet Ministers breaking their whip to abstain. The Government must now finally accept the will of the House of Commons and legislate to enact it. 
A poll of 33k Britons found they’re “overwhelmingly bored of Brexit...frustrated...things have not been explained to them in a way that was accessible or that resonates.” As a British TV news anchor, this should bother you, Alastair. Sad that it doesn’t and that you prefer snark.  
It’s the year 2089. Half of mankind has starved, the other half victims of World War 5. One lone man sits in the House of Commons, cursed to speak the last ever words uttered by humanity.As he takes his last breath he opens his mouth to speak...“Brexit...” 
Brexit is the kind of thing that gets forced upon countries when they lose a major war, and the UK is doing it because of a bus ad. 
Confirmation sought & obtained by @Jacob_Rees_Mogg that tonight's #NoDealBrexit shenanigans do NOT override statute law (ie, we leave on 29th March, deal or not).Note a hint towards the upcoming #Brexit con from Papa Smurf, in response.  
After this, I shall certainly seriously consider the United Kingdom for my next Brexit. The views. The vistas. The spills, thrills, and suspicion you and those around you are experiencing a serious iodine deficiency. 
British lawmakers reject leaving the EU without a deal, paving the way for a vote to delay Brexit.  
So Jacob Rees Mogg, after all this, needed to reassure us that he knows that motions are not legislation, and Ken Clarke has expressed his respect for Women's Institutes. This. Is. A. Farce#Brexit 
So if I'm following the news from the UK:1. Parliament successfully voted they will not do a No Deal Brexit.and2. Theresa May immediately pointed out that this is still what will happen....have I got that right? 
62% voted remain in Scotland, likelihood is most of us would like to actually hear @IanBlackfordMP point of order, yet, again @BBCNews @BBCPolitics #BrexitNoDealVote cut off as soon as he stands to speak, again. Utter crap. #Brexit #BrexitVote 
JUST IN: UK parliament rejects no-deal Brexit  
PM made commitment that No Deal Brexit would only happen with the consent of Parliament - not clear where we are on this promise... 
The poll tax riots will seem like rock, paper,scissors compared to the potential backlash from cocking up Brexit. The Commons no longer acts on the will of the electorate. 
He’s oiling the wheels so he can get Lexit faster. I could not be angrier. Without him Brexit would be finished 
Jacob Rees-Mogg is straight onto #skynews to tell us that the Spelman amendment is non-biding, conveniently forgetting that the #Brexit referendum itself was non-binding and advisory, what a hypocritical weasel he is in his desperation for a #NoDealBrexit #NoDealVote 
Lawmakers just voted to have no Brexit without a Brexit deal in place. There is clearly no confidence in May. She should be voted out and a referendum held to to have the people re-vote on Brexit. I think you’ll find, after three years of chaos, that public opinion is different. 
Bercow, in response to JRM's question, has just indicated he is aware of the steps being taken behind the scene by Remainer MPs to overturn BrexitHe is clearly an agent of Remain, not the impartial holder of the Speaker's OfficeThis is outrageous! 
Man of the people, Dennis Skinner, voted for a no-deal Brexit. Can people stop idolising this man? 
So it looks like a 2nd Referendum just became more likely #Brexit #BrexitVote #WTOBrexit #StandUp4Brexit #NoDeal #EU #EUREF #FBFE #Democracy everyone RT and vote. Lets get a really big picture of what a 2nd ref could show... 
Of all the abysmal cant Theresa May speaks, perhaps the ugliest is her suggestion that we need to deliver her Brexit to preserve trust in democracy. Here is what almost three years of her Premiership has done to trust in politics. What trust, @theresa_may? 
“The government whipped its own MPs against its own no-deal Brexit motion. And failed.” What a clusterfuck of a govt. 
May clearly seeking to bring her deal back to Parliament a third time, pushing MPs to change their opinion, openly recognising the public may not vote again for Brexit. Yet she won’t allow a second public vote.Hypocrisy, incompetence & manipulation by a barely functioning govt. 
Made the mistake of telling my kids to be quiet so I could watch the news for ten minutes and then faced a barrage of Brexit questions from a six and a nine year old none of which I can answer 
A non binding vote to not leave without a deal as a result of a non binding referendum is peak Brexit. 
Shocking.Cheers from Labour MPs as PM mentions the risk of possibility of no Brexit at all in event of a 2nd referendum.  
I've just witnessed the biggest betrayal of democracy in this country I've ever seen. The duplicity of these self-serving MPs is staggering in its enormity! They've just turned this by-election into a vote on Parliament and a mini-referendum on Brexit. #McLeanBrexit #WTOBrexit 
There's no point getting upset about #brexit anymore. Tonight's votes are meaningless, like our MPs. Now is the time for direct action. Burn the fucking country to the ground. #NoDealBrexit 
After British lawmakers rejected a possible no-deal Brexit, Prime Minister Theresa May reminded them that the default is that in the absence of a deal, Britain will still crash out of the EU on March 29.  
Brexit has done more damage to the UK in three years than the EU did in four decades. Amazing really. 
#Brexit latest:- MPs voted to take a no-deal Brexit off the table- Parliament will vote on a temporary extension of Article 50 
Brexit = do you want chicken or fish? NoChicken? NoFish? NoDo you want no dinner? No 
JUST IN: British lawmakers reject leaving the EU without a deal, paving the way for a vote to delay Brexit.  
A vote against no-deal Brexit isn't enough to stop a no-deal Brexit, EU says  
The Prime Minister votes for a no deal Brexit. She should resign. She has prioritised her party before the welfare of the country. 
I'm ready to work for the Brexit party now. We don't have to wait until 29 March. 
Good news tonight for The Brexit Party at next GE.@UKLabaour are clearly now 100% in favour of #REMAIN.@UKLabour have totally betrayed the UK Electorate!Rich pickings in @UKLabour seats in the North & Midlands for the #Brexit Party come the next GE!#DrainWestminsterSwamp 
The Prime Minister warns a second referendum “would risk no Brexit at all, damaging the fragile trust between the British public and the members of this House”.So there's a danger that the public could vote against Brexit, and therefore lose trust...in themselves? 
I've heard that "May you live in interesting times" is an ancient curse... and now I know why #brexit 
Right, so British friends - stupid American here with questions:1) what the fresh hell is happening with Brexit?2) I’ll be in London March 29, so am I missing a riot, or what? 
How’s Brexit going guys? Must be nearly sorted by now? 
I will be voting for the most extreme eurosceptic MEP possible should there be UK European Parliament elections.#brexit #EP2019Burn that place downWe need a General Election now 
Imagine if Brexiters last hope, having voted against the Brexit deal that delivered Brexit, is a Peoples Vote? Now not impossible. 
If you voted Brexit, we must now vote UKIP at the next election and get rid of this cess pit of MPs 
#BREAKING May says Britain could face lengthy Brexit delay  
Corbyn just doesn’t get it. YOU CANT HAVE AN EXTENSION TO ARTICLE 50 JUST SO YOU CAN PLAY AT BEING PRIME MINISTER AND HAVE YOUR OWN WEIRD BREXIT.Brexit is damaging and destructive. End of. Article 50 should be revoked. 
The Commons has rejected a no deal Brexit. Theresa May whipped her MPs to vote *against* rejecting no deal. Tonight again she has been utterly humiliated. Tory MPs look ashen. It’s obvious this hopeless Tory govt is simply unable to govern in the national interest 
The Tory Party, much like the whole Brexit process, is in tatters tonight. 
1. MPs just voted clearly to say we should never leave EU without a deal2. Govt lost cos so many Tories, inc ministers, ignored what told to do by party bosses3. May warns if MP s don't accept her deal v soon reality is that means a long delay to Brexit4. Votes on delay tmrw 
Brexit is 387 hours away. #brexit 
SNP's @IanBlackfordMP "...Let's be in no doubt that we are in a constitutional crisis... She's faced two defeats... Her deal is dead and I am glad... We don't need a time limited extension to Article 50... Scotland will not be dragged out of the EU against its will..." #Brexit 
Parliament have voted to tie Britain's hands in any EU negotiation and want to prevent Brexit from taking place. This Saturday we launch our March to Leave in Sunderland to show those elite in Westminster we will not let them betray Brexit. Join us:  
The cheers heard from the opposition bench, at the suggestion of cancelling #Brexit, acts as a disheartening display of parliaments lack of regard for democracy. 
Every time you hear the word compromise spill out of an MPs mouth tonight remember this - the only thing that has been compromised is Brexit. The only people who have been made to compromise are Brexit voters. This is not a compromise - it’s a betrayal. 
UK MPs support amended government motion which rejects no-deal #Brexit at any time by 321 to 278 
The Pound is rising quite fast as a result of Parliament's rejection of a no-deal. Rees-Mogg and those who took John Redwood's advice to move their money out of the country, will be seeing their profits draining away :)#PeoplesVote #FBPE #Brexit 
Thankfully the House of Commons had the sense to rule out a no deal Brexit, even though the Prime Minister and 277 other MPs felt it was a sensible thing to vote for.   
We have twice rejected the Prime Minister’s bad deal and have now decisively ruled out no deal. But still the Prime Minister will not listen. The only way forward now is to seek a compromise position across the House and put that back to the people for a #finalsay #Brexit 
The UK Government are now against their own idea on No to No Deal ...the mad-hatter Gov of #Brexit#indyref2 is this climate is very winnable 
Why did the British public only get one vote on leaving the EU, but MPs get to vote 2 or 3 times per day on it?We never knew the facts at the time of the referendum. Now that the MPs know the facts of the deal they still can't decide.#BrexitMayhem 
Corbyn you bastard. You could end Brexit now. And you just keep harping on about your Lexit. COMPROMISE?You are a traitor to our country. And I use the word very carefully. Labour is a pro Brexit party. Fully. #remain is so close. You need to go 
Unless you’re going to give us a second referendum, you can fuck off, Corbyn.  
Dear @eucopresident, despite UK MPs having voted against no-deal #Brexit it does not mean it will not happen. If not now, when will the @EUCouncil finally instruct the @EU_Commission to #RescueOurRights via ring-fencing of the #citizensrights part of the Withdrawal Agreement? 
Whatever side of #Brexit you are on, the chaos in Westminster shows that being governed by English MPs playing games of thrones is not in our Welsh National Interest. #sovereignWales 
Tonight, anti-Brexit MPs passed a motion they think will lead to Brexit being blocked: the first steps towards many MPs breaking their election promises to honour the #EURef result are now being taken. A sad day for democracy. @StandUp4Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn correctly points out Theresa May must take responsibility for the Brexit delay but she'll share that with Boris Johnson, Jacob Rees-Mogg, Nigel Dodds and the other Brextremists 
Lab had already betrayed Brexit voters. Tonight’s story is the Tories totally betraying Brexit voters in the most shocking and cynical way.  
Now that parliament has voted not to #Brexit with no deal (ever), tomorrow is MPs' chance to extend article 50 long enough to hold a #PeoplesVoteNow so WE can make the case for the UK to advance women's equality across the EU. 
.@jeremycorbyn says "let me take charge of Brexit". Some might argue he is pushing Tory Brexiters into the arms of the PM, that they'll now vote for her deal, and he is doing her work for her 
Anybody else feel like Brexit has turned into #Bandersnatch and we’re at that point on the second viewing when you realise that every single option leads you back to a fucking shitshow? 
NEW: Mansfield’s @bbradleymp says ‘I’m angry’ after tonight’s #Brexit votes. Argues Theresa May should sack cabinet ministers who have not supported her.@itvcalendar 
Another big Government defeatIf she listened to the country rather than ERG she’d know there’s NO GOOD BREXITLies people were sold in 2016 can’t be deliveredMPs get a final say, why not everyone else?Demand #PeoplesVote #OptionToRemain #StopBrexitSaveBritain#DemandBetter 
Brexit and Trumpism Have Failed Because Conservative Populism Is a Lie  via @intelligencer 
In fairness to May, she seems to understand the consequences of ignoring the referendum result. The braying MPs cheering the prospect of no Brexit do not. 
EXCLUSIVE BREXIT UPDATE:  
May shows no contrition and harangues Parliament for not just accepting her form of Brexit. She has failed and she needs to be replaced, I’m afraid. 
Extraordinary comments by Nigel Farage getting lost amid the noise: he is lobbying EU governments (possibly Italy) to *veto* any British govt request to extend A50 so as to force a No Deal Brexit on March 29.That's Farage lobbying foreign govts to oppose Britain's parliament 
Here’s a plan: cancel Brexit. None of them want the blood of it on their hands, we’ve all come to our senses, Jeremy has nothing, let’s all just call it off and plan a good April Fools for Farage. 
Theresa May warning that unless her Brexit deal is passed "in the coming days", the EU will demand a lengthy delay, and insist the UK takes part in the European elections in May. 
By 321-278 the House of Commons has voted against a no deal Brexit. Theresa May has been humiliated. She has lost control. 
Brexit not invent yet, so just pointless set on fire of own cave for now. 
.@theresa_may now threatening MPs with potentially long delay to Brexit - and prospect of UK participating in European parliamentary elections. Huge moment. She is putting the screws on Tory Brexiters to back her deal next week 
#BREAKING: UK parliament rejects no-deal Brexit  
The PM, hoarse and defeated, is talking about a second referendum which “would risk no Brexit at all damaging the fragile trust between the British public and the members of this House”. Plmnt has no idea what it wants nearly 3 years later. Ask us again. 
MPs vote to reject leaving the EU without a deal at any time, by a majority of 321 to 278 #Brexit  
UK parliament accepts amended #Brexit motion, which calls for the government to rule out 'no deal' in any scenario, by 321 votes to 278  
Voters approved Brexit, but not Brexit no matter what the cost.The cost is now a lot clearer than it was.There should be a new vote.UK lawmakers reject no-deal Brexit  
AYES  321NOES 278HoC votes to Remove No Deal in ALL circumstances.I'm enjoying watching Liam Fox's Face!#RevokeA50 Revoke May Revoke Tories Revoke Labour #Lexiters Revoke #Brexit #Remain in Control in the EU..Patience & trust has finally run out for this discredited PM 
Theresa May says a #PeoplesVote would damage the fragile trust between the British public & members of Parliament. That trust has been wrecked by the lies, crime, abuses of democracy and foreign interference involved in #Brexit. Only a #PeoplesVote can start restoring democracy. 
JUST IN: British MPs have voted against a no-deal Brexit.The result paves the way for a vote on Thursday on whether to delay the divorce process beyond the March 29 deadline. 
No haircut til Brexit!  
Brexit today reminds me of a conversation I had with my daughter when she was five. 'Do you want pasta?' (deal)'no' (no deal)'But you want dinner?' (no hard Brexit)'yes' (no Hard Brexit)'and you want spaghetti?' (deal)'yes, but not pasta' (no deal!)or...  
"We could have a second referendum" (loud cheering) "but that would risk no Brexit at all-" (deafening cheering, no audible booing)#NoDealBrexit #NoDealVote 
Cheers from Labour benches as PM mentions the possibility of no Brexit at all if the house doesn’t come together an support a deal. 
Wow. May has just directly acknowledged that one of the options is putting her deal to a referendum. #Brexit 
BREAKING: MPs have voted to pass the government motion by 321 votes to 278.The government motion had been amended to include ruling out a no-deal #Brexit completely. Follow live here:  
The government whipped its own MPs against its own no-deal Brexit motion... and failed.  
The numbers may be closer than the meaningful votes but these votes tonight are even more damaging to @theresa_may to her deal and to Brexit 
Instagram is down, Facebook is down, the Government has just voted against a 'no-deal' Brexit, yet Fabinho is the top trend on Twitter. Liverpool fans are angry. #BAYLIV 
My 16  yr old daughter & 20 yr old son, too young to vote in the referendum, see themselves as British Europeans. Both say their generation will repair the damage done to our relations with Europe & take us back into the European Union. I enjoy saying that to Leaver gammons!   
.@theresa_may - "legal default remains in UK and EU law that we leave without a deal unless a deal is agreed" - she signals she will put her deal to the Commons AGAIN. Are Tory Brexiters now so frightened there'll be no Brexit that they will back her deal at the last? 
Excellent...Motion passes 321 to 278.Now I need a meal with this wine!#Brexit 
Government Minister resigning in the lobby. We counted at least 17 Tories voting against a no-deal Brexit. Division sheets will tell how many abstained and whether an Government Ministers. 
CLARIFICATION: Remain-dominated Parliament removes option of purest form of Brexit.  
MAY: OPTIONS INCLUDE A DAMAGING SECOND REFERENDUMJust as planned all along 
MPs have rightly rejected a disastrous no-deal Brexit, but they’re still miles away from the agreement the country needs. Crashing out of the EU in just over two weeks would be a disaster. Delaying Article 50 is an absolute must to save public services. 
HORRIFIC: Government defeated on No Deal Brexit. Hardline Remainer MPs have shown their true colours tonight.  
You know that scene in The League of Gentlemen where they play the card game Go Jonny Go Go Go Go - and just make up bullshit rules that change all the time and are deliberately too impossible for anyone to understand.Well, that’s Brexit 
UK: Parliament vote on preventing UK leaving the EU without a deal (non-binding motion)For: 321Against: 278#brexit #brexitvote 
OK phew - despite Govt whipping, victory for common sense - majority of 43 against No Deal #Brexit.Parliament has rejected the disastrous fantasy of extreme Brexiteers.Now MPs must support extension of Article 50. The only way forward is #PeoplesVote. 
Brexit: MPs vote to rule out no deal by majority of 43 in blow to May's authority – Politics live  
More Brexit free news...The road outside our house is closed for 11 days. With no passing neighbours I am not able to sell eggs. I’m down £3/day on income. The man who drove into my car has admitted he was responsible. He has also, when asked to, apologised. 
YES!!!!! No Deal Brexit motion REJECTED!! comfortably too!! 321-278now here's @theresa_may: "However, i will repeat what i've said before-" (drowned out by booing) (May gives up and sits down)#NoDealBrexit #NoDealVote 
Parliament has just voted 321-278 to prevent a No-Deal Brexit in March, despite government whipping against its own motion after it was amended earlier in the evening: four cabinet ministers abstained. Chaotic scenes. Again. 
The British House of Commons has voted again to confirm its rejection of no-deal Brexit at any time, against Theresa May’s wishes.Yes 321No 278  
Government has lost the vote on its own no-deal Brexit motion (!) by 43 votes. Resignation watch for ministers now  
AlrightNot quite rightA bit iffyA spot of botherA bit trickyA bit of a messA messA big messA big fucking messA complete fucking messCompletely fucked upFucked up beyond all reasonable doubt Brexit 
UK votes twice against no deal: Parliament Confirms Vote to Rule Out No-Deal Brexit 321-278 
Brexit has broken the back of parliament and it's time for a #GeneralElection 
jacob rees-mogg out here saying that the rejection of no deal brexit isn't law so we don't have to follow that vote but the referendum result wasn't law either, stop only having morals when they benefit u mate #brexit #nodealvote 
Strong and stable NOT when May's whipping against her own amended motion and Cabinet ministers abstained to avoid voting against a no deal Brexit 
Fuck Brexit, I’ve no idea what’s going on. Visit #Dartmoor pic.twitter.com/Tj7G8ZbLLx 
Funny Brexit tweet goes here. 
We need to take a good long hard look at ourselves. Brexit has crumbled so many of our assumptions and foundations. What an absolute disgrace of a govt. What an absolute mess.  
The pound extended its gains after the U.K. Parliament rejected leaving the EU without a deal, opening up the way for Britain to delay Brexit  
These are the anti-democratic,anti-British,treacherous Tory in Name Only Bastards who are trying to stop #Brexit. Everyone of them should have the whip removed & everyone should be de-selected. @JulianSmithUK @BrandonLewis If they’re your MP, or they’re in Twitter, give them hell pic.twitter.com/eqkXOyXF9e 
Brexit will now most likely never happen, but that was always the plan, that's why they put a Remainer in charge...  
A shameful moment for the party of business. In the grip of the #ERG #Brexit @Conservatives @TheIndGroup 
The UK Parliament voted for an amendment to reject leaving the European Union without a deal, but also declined to delay Brexit until May  
I have no idea what is going on.More worryingly, I don't think anyone else does either. #Brexit #Commons #Fiasco 
Now I’m no fan of class notions and class politics, but it still staggers me that so-called “working class” people see the fabulously wealthy, upper-class millionaire Rees-Mogg as a man of the people who’s fighting for their currently indecipherable dream of Brexit. Remarkable. 
May’s Brexit summed up #NoDealBrexit 
Britain will do just fine outside of the European Union under a No Deal #Brexit. Outside the EU, the world’s fifth largest economy will be a leading force for free trade, free markets and economic liberty.  
My Dutch girlfriend has suddenly taken an interest in Brexit and has been watching parliamentary debates. She was completely flumoxed by "Eyes to the left" - "Nose to the right". 
Some were upset that the results of the referendum, which were 4% (1.3 million votes) apart.But today MPs voted to end Brexit (both a no deal, and a good deal which cannot be negotiated without no deal on the table), 50.3% in favour and 49.7% against, or 4 votes apart.Shameful. 
They don't want May's Brexit deal.They don't want to leave the EU with no deal.They can't coherently articulate what deal they're prepared to accept.May's government has perfected the omnishambles.  
Take Brexit away from the government and give it to the nerd kids who do the Duke of Edinburgh scheme by choice 
May has been defeated again. MPs backed the Spelman amendment ruling out a no-deal Brexit for good by 312 votes to 308. Unfortunately.....No Deal remains on the statute books, because if you have ruled out May's deal, then you No Deal is the result.Over to you, Nicola. 
“The law is unchanged and, by statute, we leave on March 29 2019.”Jacob Rees-Mogg responds to the vote that saw MPs reject a no deal Brexit in a non-binding decision.  
British MPs vote narrowly by 312-308 to reject "no-deal" Brexit option. The vote is a further blow to PM Theresa May's Brexit strategy  
We will leave with no deal unless there is a deal. Or Brexit is cancelled.MPs voted for this situation in huge numbers when they voted to trigger Article 50. No deal is not off the table. Everything else from Westminster is guff. 
As many are saying, the votes on motions and amendments are not in themselves "binding". Nor was the referendum! But Parliament is narrowing down the acceptable options, and as I say above what's left is delaying (if EU agrees) or revoking A50. 
I'm SO confused! It's going to be a long night, involving lots of reading and re-reading...We'll try to unravel the latest #Brexit votes/chaos for you from 0600 @BBCBreakfast 
Waiting to hear if @FionaOnasanyaMP accounted for one of the Brexit-blocker majority of four despite the big Leave vote in Peterborough.  
How many Brexit no-votes will British Parliament hold before they do what’s right — hold a new referendum now that the voting public has seen what a disaster for the UK #Brexit will be?  
Whenever someone tries to explain Brexit to me, it sounds like someone trying VERY HARD to explain the plot of a ludicrously complicated anime series where everybody's been complaining about the writing for ages 
BREXIT UPDATE:#NoDealVote #Brexit  
Parliament is now voting on the government motion, which has been amended to include ruling out no-deal completely.Follow live updates on #Brexit here:  
The government is now whipping against its own motion so that we can have no deal as an option (despite the fact the govt has said it would be a catastrophe) and if they lose then nothing will have changed but some ministers will probably end up resigning. Brexit is great. 
A few times recently I’ve wanted to say something meaningful about Brexit. But I’m stumped. Unsure what’s going on. Unsure what it means. Unsure what to think. So tonight as debate rages & decisions are made that will shape all our lives for years to come, I’m praying this...  
A Conservative Government is voting for a no deal Brexit. Imposing a 3 line whip despite a promise to give Conservative MPs a free vote. #Brexit #Shambles 
Absolute utter disgrace. Parliament is making our country into a laughing stock on the world stage by having no confidence in this country and making us look weak by voting down No Deal. They show disrespect to the legal default position - totally corrupt! #Brexit 
One of the main reasons I voted for Scottish independence back in 2014 was that I was disgusted with Westminster politics. Let me tell you, everything I’ve seen since has just increased that disgust. What an absolute shower of shit this is. #brexit 
#Brexit #Deal #NoDeal #PeoplesVote If we had a second referendum and these were the options, what would you vote for? Please answer and RT  
Iain Dale’s message to those calling MPs "traitors" because they voted to take a no-deal Brexit off the table @IainDale | #nodealvote 
No-deal would be excellent for Rees-Mogg who has most of his money outside the country and would be presented with excellent disaster-capitalist profit opportunities by a no-deal collapse of the Pound.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
"The law still says we leave on 29 March"Jacob Rees-Mogg says motion passed by MPs does not take no-deal #Brexit off the table 
Brexit has been betrayed... The politicians in the United Kingdom just made the biggest mistake of their lives, we will now gather on the 29th of march 2019 in response. It's all about to get very messy!!!!#BetrayedThePublic 
Just been told that the Scottish Tories are all voting *against* taking no deal off the table. Extraordinary.Scotland voted 62% to remain! Reckless devotion to PM's deal will have electoral repercussions for them all. Shameful.#WithdrawalAgreement #NoDEAL #Brexit #NoDealBrexit 
BREXIT IN A NUTSHELL TODAYThe bus is rolling towards the cliff.NO DEAL: Means fuck it, we're going to drive off the cliff.DEAL: There is none that can be agreed upon today.DELAY: slow down the bus headed to the cliff.REVOTE: Stop the bus and let's figure this shit out! 
Liverpool spent £108 million on midfielders last summer only to field the same Brexit midfield they used in the Champions League Final. 
Let me guess...A winning majority of 4% (1.2m votes) in EU Referendum is a margin to close to allow to stand as a democratic mandate.But 4 MPs who have completely abandoned the terms by which they accepted Article 50 and elected on party manifestos in 2017 cannot be ignored? 
So now HMG is effectively voting for no-deal Brexit on March 29. What a mess. 
This is the moment of truth for cabinet and other ministerial opponents of no-deal Brexit. If they don't vote for the government's motion - as amended - which Tories are now being forced to vote against (!!!) - then there may not be promised vote tomorrow on Brexit delay, if... 
I am going to really miss #Brexit when it’s all over .... Oh Wait a minute .... !!! 
In Strasbourg with a bunch of Brits munching salt and vinegar crisps watching our country throw itself down the toilet. Love UK, hate Brexit. 
According to legend, Rasputin was poisoned, stabbed, shot, strangled, shot a bit more, and then drowned.He probably still felt more wanted than Brexit. 
Tories are now whipping against the amended motion. So that means that they are whipping  for a No Deal Brexit. Astounding irresponsibility 
the Malthouse proposal for a no-deal Brexit (after a two year delay) has been rejected by 164 to 374 votes  
Wow! How can 308 MPs still believe that ‘No deal is better than a bad deal’ when people are stockpiling food and medicine and companies are already leaving the UK? And #Brexit day is still to come 
I was so on top of these parliamentary votes half an hour ago and now I have no idea what's going on or what it means or whether I should start a vegetable patch. #brexit 
The #Brexit Omnibus Bill passed all stages in the Seanad today. It will now go to @PresidentIRL to be signed into law. Read more here:  
JUST IN: British MPs have rejected the amendment which sought to delay Brexit until May 22 for further preparations to take place in order to mitigate the impact of a no-deal Brexit should no agreement be reached.  
Remarkably, the Prime Minister has just walked past me to vote AGAINST her own motion and FOR a no deal Brexit. #BrexitShambles 
MPs reject no-deal Brexit by majority of four  
So can we still go to Ibiza after Brexit or do we have to go Butlins? 
The good news is that No Deal is off the table. The bad news is there isn't a table. #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Spelman amendment isn’t legally binding. Neither was the referendum. #RevokeArticle50 
"The noes have it"U.K. Parliament rejects Malthouse B for a no-deal Brexit by a 374 to 164 vote  
Why is that man who bangs on about referendum results being sacred also banging on about how only legislation counts? #JacobReesMogg 
Calling all our Followers, Tomorrow parliament will be debating something other that #Brexit,  something important to you all,  your HCPC registration fees -  which i’m sure you are aware will be going up by 18% this year,  if we don’t stop it. 
How come MP’s have got to have 1432 Brexit related votes and we just got one. Three years ago. When a bus told fibs. 
MPs have voted against delaying Brexit day to May 22 by 374 to 164  
Commons votes 164 to 374 to reject @DamianGreen's Amendment (f) to the #NoDealBrexit debate motion.This proposed a 21-month transition to no deal and a guarantee of rights of EU citizens in the UK, subject to agreement from EU27. If no agreement, no deal #Brexit on 22 May 2019.  
MORE: UK MPs reject Amendment F of today's #Brexit vote, which calls on the government to pursue a managed no-deal exit on May 22nd, by 374 votes to 164. Watch the vote live:  
.⁦@NFUtweets⁩ President ⁦@Minette_Batters⁩ on BBC Brexit special explaining the importance of avoiding a no-deal Brexit for British food and farming.  
MPs reject the so-called Malthouse Compromise, setting out the process of a "managed no-deal" #Brexit, by 164 to 374 
let's check in with how brexit's going shall we  
Parliament votes to betray the Referendum by a margin of only 4 votes. And yet Remainers objected to the Ref result of 52% to 48%. MPs can redeem themselves tomorrow by voting against an extension of Art 50. Default position is we leave on 29th. Will they?  
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "The law is not easy to change, the default position remains, as the Prime Minister pointed out, that we still leave on March 29th"#MoggMentum #Brexit 
There's your #MalthouseCompromise lads. Defeated by plus 200. Now can you stop this ridiculous charade. #Brexit 
5 votes from utter catastrophe. Stop this country, I want to get off. #brexit  
House of Commons ‘belt & braces’ rejection of No Deal is another key step towards a referendum to stop Brexit. The crowd at my meeting in Coventry is delighted! 
Govt defeat: Peers vote 193 to 154 for a Labour-led amendment that would not allow the Trade Bill to come into force in the event of a no deal Brexit 
MP’s have voted AGAINST amendment F covering “malthouse compromise” for a managed no deal Brexit.  Ayes  164 Noes   374 Majority 210. No surprises here 
“We are told that unless we [enter the Common Market] we are going to have a terrible time. That is no way to go into a negotiation. You ought to go into a negotiation on the basis that they have need of you, not just you of them..”Clement Attlee, 1962. #Brexit  
164 v 376 for Malthouse. This vote for me is interesting not so much as a measure of support for Malthouse Plan B, but as a likely measure of Conservative MPs that will reject a softer Brexit or second referendum. Govt would lose at least half Party as I predicted in Telegraph. 
#BREAKING: British lawmakers have narrowly rejected a "no deal Brexit" (which would have meant leaving the EU without any deal at all), just a day after rejecting British Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal.So no on "no deal" but also no on the deal. 
So, 312 MPs have voted to reject a ‘no deal’ Brexit. If it comes down to it, those 312 should back @JeremyCorbyn in a Vote of No Confidence and bring this Government down. 
Rees-Mogg is (correctly) making the point that tonight’s “no to No Deal” amendment is advisory, not legally binding. But it’s amazing he thinks the 2016 referendum (which was also advisory) is set in stone. The law is binding when it suits him. 
Great! “MPs reject no deal Brexit 'under any circumstance' - “Evening Standard  
Vote on Green/Malthouse amendment in favour of managed no-deal Brexit - beloved for ERG and @BorisJohnson - lost by 164 to  374. Remainers taking over Brexit 
The only consequence of this whole mess is that my daughter now runs around the living room pointing at both people and inanimate objects and shouting “order! Orderrrrrr!” #brexit 
Calling all Brexit voters. Now our votes count for nothing.Now we’ve been betrayed what next?Just shrug our shoulders & say ok?Traitorous lying MPs are deliberately delaying & obstructing democracy. We live in a dictatorship. 
NEITHER WAS THE FUCKING REFERENDUM  
Brexit: A daily apocalypse shitshow in slow motion. 
Theresa May and her Brexit process. #BrexitVote #Brexit  
Did you vote leave?If so would you be pleased with a #NoDealBrexit #Brexit Rt and vote 
#Brexit means... well we don't know yet just wait a minute or more.  
BREAKING: Britain's Parliament votes to reject having the country leave the European Union without a divorce agreement, a decision that lessens but does not remove the chance of a chaotic "no-deal" Brexit.  
Govt loses again - on an amendment to limit tonight's main vote to Brexit with no deal. Govt wanted to tie this in with accepting their deal (tina). We won by 4 (4 Plaid votes) 
I'm not saying Brexit is a waste of time, but I'm not sure if I'm more excited about the amendment that has no legal weight or the amendment that the EU absolutely won't allow to happen 
JUST IN: British lawmakers vote 312-308 to reject a no-deal Brexit in any scenario. 
 Warning to Labour If you cynically think that you can facilitate Brexit then win a GE by substituting Corbyn you can absolutely fuck off.I will NEVER vote Labour again if we Brexit. This goes way beyond Cleggs betrayal. 
A bit like the fucking referendum that caused all this  
Translation - MPs vote to reject Brexit.The political establishment must now prepare for a political earthquake. UKIP is ready to punish our Members of Parliament for betraying Brexit at whatever elections may come, across the country in every seat. 
Nothing has changed.The law of the land remains No Deal Brexit in just 15 days. Nothing has changed.  
When is May going to get thrown out? British Prime Minister May under siege as Britain takes step closer to Brexit delay 
Very shortly, the list of MPs who voted against a No Deal Brexit will be published. We will know, once and for all, the names of the treacherous snakes who sit in Leave voting seats. They demonstrate contempt for democracy & no understanding of negotiation. #BrexitBetrayal 
Complete Brexit meltdown has only one winner: Putnam 1988.  Even if theory is busted, still gotta cite, right? [Also spare a thought for the game theorists who have to model this.] 
Brexiter hopes of clean Brexit, ie crashing out on schedule on March 29 are shattered. Rightly.  Now we need a long extension and a Brexit rethink is @FT view 
Brexit  
Im deffo not an expert, but am I right in thinking the original 2016 referendum wasn’t technically legally binding was it? So if this vote wasn’t legally binding, it would be terribly hypocritical for Brexiteers to act on that fact wouldn’t it?! 
Walthamstow - here’s a quick update before the votes start on what to look out for when the bells start ringing in tonight’s Brexit debates. Will update on what it all means after! #brexithaos 
Democracy is dead, Brexit is finished & those MP's will be unelected at the next election! They are about to face the wrath of the millions who wanted to Leave.... The Establishment is finished, let the revolution begin 
MPs reject no deal #Brexit. They should be made to vote again. 
BREAKING: UK lawmakers voted to reject leaving the EU without a deal.Just over 2 weeks from the planned Brexit date, PM Theresa May has yet to secure a deal. The EU says any extension would require a unanimous vote by all 27 EU members.  
Overshadowed by #Brexit:The UK is set to ban all porn in April.The default is restriction on all porn; you can only access by submitting a mass of personal info to merged govt+corporation interests, which will be stored.All because porn is somehow now magically harmful.  
I'm pleased Parliament has voted this way as now no one can be under any illusion that it's Parliament vs The People. They didn't want the WA and now they oppose the only alternative Brexit on the table. Excellent. Your move again. 
Profits in Jacob Rees-Mogg's investment firm soaring while UK braces for Brexit - Mirror Online -  #brexit #NoDealBrexit #BrexitShambles #brexitdeal #politicslive #c4news 
Ok, we're about to descend to a deeper circle of Brexit hell. Looks like the Government may be about to whip against their own motion (the one they'd promised a free vote on) to kill the Spelman amendment. Nobody in the universe can tell you what will happen in the next 20 mins! 
So British parliament voted against leaving without a deal against which they voted? This is the most nonsensical script for a political satire I have ever read. #Brexit 
BREAKING: British PM Theresa May reportedly planning to seek a Brexit extension of about 2 months - Bloomberg 
Parliament’s decision to reject a hugely damaging no-deal Brexit is a victory for common sense. MPs have rightly voted in the interests of businesses and households by taking a step away from the brink. Article 50 now needs to be extended to give time for a solution to be found. 
Neither was the referendum! 
Tonight SNP MPs have voted against a no-deal #Brexit. Theresa May must now extend or revoke Article 50 and allow the people to make a choice on their future through a second referendum.  
As Parliament votes to reject a No Deal Brexit, it’s never been more important to join the ‘Put it to the People’ demo on 23rd March. See you on the streets! #peoplesvote 
It becomes more and more clear is no Brexit option that can garner a majority in the Commons. The only solution is going back to the people.  
Watching the #brexit chaos in the British parliament and can’t help but thinking that the whole idea of “rational states” being in charge of nuclear weapons is pretty stupid. 
Peter Bone. A man so dodgy Arron Banks caught him and called him out for dipping his hand in the Leave EU/GO 'donation' bucket....... 
I know it doesn’t change the law... but it’s yet another step forward against the madness.Tonight we celebrate. Tomorrow we get up early and fight again with renewed vigour.#Brexit 
MPs have supported an amendment to reject a no-deal Brexit at any time and under any circumstances by 312 votes to 308, a majority of four  
We’re on College Green outside Parliament tonight where our President @Minette_Batters will be appearing with @afneil on @BBCTwo shortly to talk all things Brexit.  
More than half of the HoC doesn't even understand how negotiations are meant to work. Brexit has really revealed a lot of deep-hidden weaknesses in our political system hasn't it? How did we come to allow people who don't understand the basics of negotiating to negotiate? 
BREAKING: The House of Commons has voted to reject a no-deal #Brexit under any circumstances and at any time - by a majority of just four.  
That the economic & social catastrophe of a ‘no deal’ Brexit is being enthusiastically pursued by some is the height of masochistic self-indulgence. MPs need to stop being played for fools, and urgently initiate a Mueller-style Inquiry into illegalities & Russian interference.  
If "No Deal" wasn't an option...#Brexit #BrexitVote#TheOffice 
Retweet if you have no frigging idea what's happening#brexit 
Let's not forget that in Brexit terms, 312 to 308 is a massive majority. A huge mandate. 
I mean, literally, now what..? #brexit 
#Brexit negotiations  
The Brexit deadline is in under 400 hours, and our amendment passed - finally, Parliament has taken back control! Parliament has just voted against a ‘no-deal’ Brexit. 308 Hard Brexiteers did vote against completely ruling out a ‘no deal’ Brexit though - reckless.  
Just in: UK parliament has just passed an amendment that would allow them to rule out a no-deal Brexit at any time, 312 to 308.  
MPs Reject No Deal Brexit. I Reject Our MPs. Get Your Vests Ready.  
Note: this was the "Never Leave with no deal under any circumstances, ever" - ie cancel Brexit altogether - amendment, not the "Pretend we're not cancelling Brexit yet but just delaying it for a couple of months" motion. They didn't bother pretending. They just voted to cancel.  
Am I the only one that doesn’t give a flying fuck about Brexit?, the country is fucked regardless and Theresa May will always be a slosh pot. 
Crashing out of Europe means crashing our country. No deal and WTO is worse than a bad deal, and now it has been voted against. The ONLY option remaining is to extend or revoke article 50. #brexit 
I'm so stupid I should be part of our Brexit negotiating team...  
EXCLUSIVE: Theresa May plans to ask the EU for an extension to the March 29 Brexit deadline lasting about two months, sources say  
Madness!!! : Remainer Parliament votes against No Deal Brexit  
this is my understanding of brexit  
“If Theresa May doesn’t sack remain ministers tonight after this it will confirm she has totally lost all authority” - Brexit-backing MP 
No deal remains the default outcome until a deal is passed or Brexit is cancelled - the amendment passed has no legal force and no deal is not “off the table”. 
BREAKING: Another defeat for the UK Government. MPs vote in favour of Caroline Spelman's motion to rule out a no-deal Brexit at any time, not just on March 29. It doesn't actually rule out no deal.The motion passed by a narrow 312 votes to 308. 
4 votes in it. Did @Plaid_Cymru just successfully block a no-deal #Brexit?   
So does this mean a no deal Brexit can’t happen? If so, my larder now looks like that of a maniac prepper. Can you sell tinned goods at a car boot? 
"In any circumstances"That's to revoke Article 50 and cancel Brexit if EU says no to extension and withdrawal agreement can't get through Commons  
JUST IN: British MPs have approved an amendment that rejects a no-deal Brexit at any time in any circumstances.  
We are delighted to see that #NoDeal has been voted off the table by #Parliament. We now urge the government to take a #timeout, stop the clock on #Brexit and have a meaningful extension to #Article50 and give the public the #righttovote 
This vote is advisory, and does not have legal weight. It does not derail a no deal Brexit on March 29 or later.  
May suffers fresh Brexit defeat as MPs rule out no deal for good by majority of four – Politics live  
Screw all this Brexit bollocks....... insta & Facebook are down mate!! That’s the real issue right now  #instagramdown #facebookdown 
MPs reject a no-deal #Brexit by 312 to 308 in a non-binding vote 
U.K. lawmakers vote to block a no-deal Brexit in any circumstance, likely delaying the departure from the EU  
Theresa May whipped Tories to vote against the Spelman Amendment - which would take No Deal Brexit off the table as an option. Against removing No Deal: 308 & For removing No Deal: 312 -> Tories need to take note - sovereign Parliament says it doesn't want to jump  #NoDealVote 
No deal defeat for May further evidence PM has lost control of Parliament and Brexit policy 
14-point lead in favour of No Deal Brexit in ComRes poll at weekend. MPs just voted to reject it under any circumstances.This utter disconnect between voters and politicians is not sustainable.  
JUST IN: UK MPs accept Amendment A of today's #Brexit vote, which calls on the government to rule out leaving the EU without any deal in any scenario, by 312 votes to 308. Watch the vote live:  
Commons defies Theresa May to demand she permanently rule out no-deal Brexit  
LATEST: Britain's Parliament backs an amendment ruling out a no-deal Brexit at any point 312-308. Pound rises   
BREAKING: UK parliament rejects 'no deal' option on Brexit.  
The British House of Commons has voted to reject no-deal Brexit at any time, against Theresa May’s wishes.Yes 312No 308  
Commons votes for no no deal Brexit full stop. Not end of argument. But hugely significant step. Arguably most important thing that has happened since the referendum.# 
There's currently a 15 minute Brexit special on German TV. It's damning conclusion: "The Brexit debacle is out of control."  
BREAKING: U.K. Parliament votes to reject 'no-deal' Brexit 
Neither was the referendum, remember? 
There are 312 idiots in the House of Commons who have voted against a 'no deal' Brexit at any time. That incentivises the EU to offer us the worst deal possible. One of the proposers was Jack Dromey. Look up his historic links to the Paedophile Information Exchange. #Brexit 
It’s not binding but the #Remainers in Parliament pass a motion that No Deal be taken off the table. That would cripple Britain in its negotiations with the #EURemainer MPs will do anything to keep us in the #EU despite the Referendum. 
308 MPs want to keep a no deal Brexit on the table. Shocking. They lost but the scale of the vote for no deal beggars belief 
MPs who vote against 'no deal' now are voting against Brexit. 
Not binding but shows slight majority in principle against Brexit no deal lunacy  
BREAKING: MPs have supported an amendment to reject a no-deal Brexit at any time and under any circumstances by 312 votes to 308, majority four.  
MPs vote to reject no-deal Brexit  
UK MPs reject a no-deal #Brexit by 312 to 308 in a non-binding vote  
BREAKING: Britain's Parliament backs an amendment ruling out a no-deal Brexit at any point, a move opposed by Theresa May's government  
MPs have rejected no-deal Brexit by a majority of just 4 votes. #BrexitMayhem 
Spelman amendment (moved by Cooper) wins by 4 votes (312 v 308). MPs reject a No-deal Brexit completely. 
Another humiliating defeat for Theresa May!A No Deal Brexit has been COMPLETELY ruled out!!!The vote pass by a slim margin, by 312-308!Will be very interesting to see which Cabinet Ministers (if any) broke the whip! 
INSANE: Remainer Parliament votes against No Deal Brexit. MPs badly of touch with the pro-Brexit majority!  
YES! The "ayes" have it! We can't leave the EU without a deal "AT ANY POINT"! #Parliament #brexit #Remain Could this be the beginning of the end of this madness? 
Vote to reject No-deal #Brexit at any time in any circumstances:-For: 312-Against: 308-Majority: 4Triumph for @YvetteCooperMP Another defeat for May 
This amendment rules out no deal Brexit in all circumstances - not just on March 29  
BREAKING: MPs vote 312-308 to take no-deal Brexit off the table forever. Another huge blow for Theresa May. 
U.K. PARLIAMENT VOTES TO REJECT NO-DEAL BREXIT 
Completely ignoring the fact that vote leave ruled out leaving without a deal during the referendum campaigning, so not really cretinous, more judicious.  
the most accurate representation of may’s approach to brexit so far pic.twitter.com/go5gXuYTgx 
Was thrilled to be invited onto the @RemainiacsCast podcast today to talk about Brexit, the border, and why the news just keeps coming back to Ireland  
Brexit Crisis Live: MPs vote on ruling out a no-deal Brexit  
I’m addicted to these #Brexit votes. It’s like a political version of X Factor or Strictly. I do think they should make it more exciting by introducing eliminations for MPs though. Three every night, kicked out by a public vote and replaced in a by-election. #BrexitFactor 
I made the concious decision to tune out of Brexit news 6+ months ago, but whenever I briefly tune back in it seems things are still exactly where they were  
International Trade Secretary @LiamFox "There is no worse outcome for this House and this country and our democracy than to have no Brexit... In the days ahead we in this House must decide who in our democracy are the masters and who are the servants."  
MAY SAID TO PLAN TO SEEK BREXIT EXTENSION OF ABOUT 2 MONTHS 
anybody actually know what’s going on with brexit? 
I could get behind No Deal Brexit if it meant all MYPs were arrested as political prisoners 
It's wrong to assume that a no-deal Brexit can be killed unilaterally by Westminster. The only way of avoiding the March 29 deadline is through the support of EU members, and it’s not clear for how long and under what conditions a delay would be granted  
How to describe the #Brexit situation?Conservative MP Trudy Harrison says she's "torn between a pig's ear, a dog's dinner, or a cat's arse"[tap to expand]  
Theresa May's #Brexit deal has been twice defeated by massive majorities.Yet apparently she can bring it back for a third vote.If that is democratic why is a #PeoplesVote undemocratic?Remain was only marginally defeated in 2016.A vote to confirm that result seems fair#C4news 
Yvette Cooper trying stop Brexit again.Roll on GE Day. 
Look - and I promise this isn't a cheap shot - imagine what she would have done with Brexit as leader of the opposition. We would be in a very different position today. 
Theresa May has "lost all of her authority with regards to Brexit," Tory MP James Gray tells @GaryGibbonBlog."We no longer respect what she has to say on the subject at all."  #BrexitMayhem WATCH LIVE: 
Brexit has shown up the Establishment as a bunch of small-minded, mediocre bullies  via @Telegraph 
I wouldn't blame the EU if they refused an extension. The people to blame are the supporters of Brexit. They've acted criminally, arrogantly, ignorantly, undemocratically and dishonourably. #TheresaMay never stood up to them but appeased them and we know how that ends. 
I see the “Brexit” midfield has wound people up again. Reality is, we need a smash and grab, not a rout. This is the right choice 
10/ No Deal is Brexit. We take back immediate control of our borders, our money, our laws and our fishing waters.No Deal means we leave the EU as one UK.I will vote to keep No Deal on the table - after all it is the table! 
This is what happens when you go into cohorts with Labour @spelmanc. Yvette Cooper backs #Brexit Amendment A: to make it the Commons view that they oppose No Deal at ANY point in time aka forever! Cooper has never had a proper job, if she had she’d keep No Deal on the table. 
Liam Fox now claiming 87% of imports will now be tariff free in the event of no deal.....perhaps Liam could explain what percentage of imported goods are currently tariff free as a result of our membership of the EU, their FTAs and their policies? 
The European Parliament just voted that Russian state actors interfered in the Brexit referendumWith this damning revelation, its about bloody time @theresa_mayrevoked Article 50. She proceeded with this ref. knowing it was vitiated by corruption. @A50Challenge#StopBrexit 
I can’t ever vote to make #Portsmouth poorer and a no deal Brexit will make our great city poorer, our nation weaker and hit the poorest the hardest. That’s why I voted in @UKParliament to force the Government to take no deal off the table tonight 
How will Brexit affect the cosmetics industry and will the UK laws against animal testing change if we leave the EU?Just two questions I researched in my new post. It's taken hours but it's relevant to everyone who uses makeup or body care #BrexitVote 
Brexit withdrawal agreement no longer negotiable: Macron  
Brexit has Klopp on strings, I can’t take this.  
Reminder that @YvetteCooperMP’s constituency had a 70% Leave vote in the EU Referendum 
More than 50 MPs have signed the ERG's 'no second referendum' amendment so far. Labour's Caroline Flint and Gareth Snell agree to be lead signatories. 
Robert Shrimsley: So many people hate Theresa May's Brexit deal because it shows that a perfect Brexit doesn't exist  
What the fuck was the point of us voting for #Brexit when our instructions are being ignored. These Mp's need to piss off, & as OUR servants, do what WE instructed them to do #WTOBrexitnow the EU do enough dictating without us being shafted by our own!!! 
Klopp’s two brain cells when he starts the brexit midfield or Lallana and everyone is fuming  
People may not agree with it, but Labour have a Brexit plan that would likely be acceptable to both the EU and the Commons.It’s completely disingenuous for the media (BBC in particular) to ignore that and instead seek to apportion half the blame for the Brexit mess on Labour. 
Well that's another four hours of pointless Brexit debate done. If you didn't watch it: Brexit is rubbish. They all know it's rubbish. They don't want to do it. 
House of Commons now voting on Spelman amendment (no no-deal Brexit ever), moved by @YvetteCooperMP 
MPs are now voting on the Spelman Amendment. It rejects a no-deal #Brexit under any circumstance.Go to Sky News for the latest on tonight's vote:  
LIVE: Fresh vote on whether UK should leave EU without a deal on March 29, day after PM Theresa May's revised #Brexit deal was rejected for a second time.May is expected to set out next steps following crucial vote.Read more:  
MPs are now voting on Amendment (a) which seeks to rule out a no-deal Brexit - result circa 1915  
The Government has completely lost control of Brexit.It's time to give the people the final say on the deal and the option to stay in the EU. 
Sinn Féin’s leader says Irish reunification is now possible thanks to Brexit.By @Bryan_WallVia @TheCanaryGlobal 
 MPs are voting on whether to rule out a no-deal Brexit on March 29. An explanation:  
Liam Fox: No worse outcome ... than no BrexitApart from every other outcome. 
"I have to say to the right honourable lady that the only way to take no deal off the table in the longer term is to have a negotiated Brexit'says @LiamFox. He will not reassure those agonising whether to press to a vote what was Spelman amendment taking no deal off table forever 
Why do people call that a ‘Brexit’ midfield when Gini is Dutch? 
Enemies of Brexit  
HONKINGLY, stonkingly proud that the mighty Klaus Flugge and @AndersenPress are publishing my BREXIT picture book, illustrated by @robstarlingart  #TheLittleIsland will publish later this year... watch this space #LBF19 
Soubry delivers blistering attack on the politicians who lit the Brexit touchpaper and ran away  
This is a national emergency. If you believe in Brexit sign this petition below immediately.Be quick uk unity org going to push to government.We must leave on no deal terms.I’m only 16 and support Brexit and feel betrayed and feel for much future. 
Liam Fox the last of the Brexit true believers. Every bit as delusional as a die hard Branch Davidian  - praising the messianic Brexit  - even as the ranch burns all about him #NoDealBrexit 
“We will not support anything which endangers integrity of United Kingdom.”Mate... that’d be #Brexit.  
Heidi Allen MP with NO mandate under 'The Independent Group' also known as 'The 'Undemocratic Group', still REFUSES to hold a people’s vote in her own constituency, BUT embarrassingly grovels with her begging bowl for a people's vote to Verhofstadt in an attempt to stop Brexit.  
Brexit vote LIVE: Brexiteer warns of PUBLIC REVOLT if MPs block no deal in tonight's vote  
Wow! Berlin set to hold referendum on banning big landlords and nationalising private rented housing  
Now Liam Fox is lying, saying the referendum result was an instruction not a request. In law it was just advisory, not binding on Parliament. #BrexitVote #NoDealDebate #Commons 
Voters Back Malthouse or Delaying Brexit Over May's Deal  
No, it’s just “Britain’s Future” p—ing money up a wall....trying to get constituents to email their MPs in favour of no-deal Brexit - with uniform email style, meaning MPs spot the astroturfed effort a mile off.Send your MP a personal handwritten letter - worth so much more.  
I will be speaking on Brexit in Crowborough with @WealdenInEU this Sunday (17th) at Crowborough Community Centre TN6 1FE at 7:30pm. All welcome! 
No Deal can’t be taken off the table. It’s just the logical conclusion to a certain set of prior decisions. To avoid it, different decisions have to be made, pretty fast. (Jesus. This is all so dysfunctional.) #brexit 
Taking no-deal Brexit off the table would be a disastrous betrayal of referendum' | via @telegraph 
Nice to win the Madame de Staël Prize today, while being otherwise consumed with the Brexit tragedy-- a prize named after a woman who "fought for the soul of Europe"...  
In relation to the risk of a no deal #Brexit, I know many people must be very worried. To our exporters, our fishermen, our farmers: the Government has your back. We will protect incomes, we will protect jobs & we will support business, whatever happens in the next few weeks. 
Although Parliament's minds focused on Brexit right now my adjournment debate on the unbuilt garden bridge with £50million+ price-tag to be held on 15th getting closer. Get in touch by email if any ideas for me in highlighting this scandal  
Thought we voted no to #Brexit #LFC 
I'm the trouble starter, #Brexit instigatorI'm the fear addicted, a danger illustratedI'm a Brexit starter, twisted brexit starterI'm the bitch you hated, filth infatuated, yeah#TheresaMay #Brexit#nodeal pic.twitter.com/bYYfiMSobc 
Labour's Pennycook just lied to the House.Claimed that majority of voters want No-Deal taken off table.Flatly contradicted by this data earlier.Majority of UK voters back either Malthouse Transition or No-Deal Brexit.  
I can tell you who is worried about a No Deal Brexit.Foodbanks. No Deal Brexit  higher food prices  more food poverty  more demand at foodbanks  but higher food prices  fewer donations to foodbanks. The most vicious of vicious circles. 
The 'will of the people' is a false argument. The Brexit camp can't  decide what it means amongst themselves. Each member uses it as an excuse to put forward their own vision, in doing so taking our country closer to the abyss. We need a #PeoplesVote. It's OK to change your mind. 
Brexiters are actively lobbying other EU27 governments to try to persuade them to veto an Article 50 extension, forcing the no-deal Brexit that remains the default outcome of Article 50. I wouldn't go as far as to call it 'treason', but maybe 'trea'? 
HOW CAN YOU DROP FABINHO?! THE BREXIT MIDFIELD WILL BE THE DEATH OF ME 
So, Jurgen Klopp has only gone and selected a full no-deal Brexit midfield. That will go down well.... #LFC 
Leave voters are increasingly frustrated with Remain MPs' efforts to diminish the referendum result, as well as the EU's total intransigence. They will be deeply unimpressed tonight if MPs vote to rule out 'no deal' altogether.  
Has Labour forgotten why Britain voted for Brexit? It was to control immigration and retain rule from Westminster. Now Corbyn & Co say they can get an EU deal - by staying in the single market, agreeing to the Customs Union and keeping our borders open with free movement. Eh? 
Nearly four years after legislation was passed to hold a referendum on EU membership, our public service broadcaster looks at what becoming an independent country again might mean.  
UK parliament votes on whether to pursue no-deal #Brexit  
Anyone who describes the midfield as a Brexit Midfield is a prick. 
I am *cackling* that Geoffrey Cox put the killer line in the very final paragraph of his Brexit advice to make sure it got the attention of “stupid people and journalists”  
Anti-Brexit on College Green in Westminster are chanting “There’s only one @Anna_Soubry” while a van is driving around blaring out “Brexit on Fire” to the tune by Kings of Leon. Everyone has lost it. 
Beginning to wonder what the EU is going to want from us after Brexit, seeing as they've "stood by us" so solidly apparently. #EUarmy #PESCO... Oh wait, that bank bail out they landed on us wasn't so friendly 
HOT OFF THE PODCAST PRESS New show / BREXIT: FINAL FANTASY? Dealpocalypse Now with special guests ⁦⁦@LaylaMoran⁩ MP and ⁦@TimMacAndErny⁩ of ⁦@PassportIrish⁩ + ⁦@IanDunt⁩ ⁦@NinaDSchick⁩ @Dorianlynskey⁩ 
 Tory austerity is stifling Scotland's potential and hurting our economy - Brexit only amplifies that. Independence gives us the opportunity to get rid of austerity and invest in Scotland's communities.  
This begs the question will Theresa May ever resign??She's literally become a laughing stock. What will happen Northern Ireland and Republic of Ireland border? & will the EU accept a new Brexit deal?So many questions, so little answers.#BrexitDebacle 
Hearing Russian TV report that “Ahead of Brexit, the British are stocking up on toilet paper & painkillers” has brought home to me the drama of what’s happening in the UK. I’ve seen shoppers in Russia stocking up before possible crises. But not back home.  
Instagram is down. How the hell am I supposed to follow the brexit vote now 
I spoke today in the European Parliament in the debate on #Brexit So far the ‘solidarity’ that the EU has shown Ireland has not cost them a single cent. In the case of a hard #Brexit true solidarity needs to come in the form of hard cash.  
#NEW European Commissioner for Agriculture Phil Hogan tells RTÉ the UK tariff plan is "very ill-thought out" and "beggars belief". He says it is an attempt to "break the European Union unity" and "will fail". #Brexit 
Oh dear.The SNP Brexit minister shows his true colours. 
Brexit 101: The policy cannot fail the voters, only the voters can fail the policy.#BrexitVote 
I used to worry I wouldn't live long enough to see Scottish independence....now I'm doubtful I'll live long enough to see the outcome of #Brexit 
A #Brexit primer for Americans and other confused individuals, by me, featuring rage. . 
Yo Brexitcasters! We are taking a night off tonight but we will be back tomorrow (Thurs) with ourth EDITION!  Any ideas how we should mark it? Any #Brexit celebrities want to send us a centennial congratulatory voice memo perhaps?  
What have the DUP achieved in the Brexit fiasco.                                           1. Tariffs on local produce .                          2. No tariffs on goods from the South .                         3. Vetoing economic advantage for the North   
‘#Brexit Britain is an object lesson in how a modern nation fails. It's the last act in a familiar unhappy marriage plot, with ruthless neoliberal economic orthodoxy wedded to the genteel thuggery of old-school conservative entitlement.’  
Class Politics: While the rich either abandon ship or grow richer, the rest of us are stuck with Brexit. 
Plaid Cymru Westminster leader @LSRPlaid will be voting against a no deal #Brexit in tonight's key vote. Unleashing a no deal Brexit on Wales would be disastrous.  
We will find out which MPs don't respect law and order. Retweet! #Brexit  
Never thought I'd say this, but such is the chaos inside Government that I'm looking forward to seeing which way the Brexit Minister Stephen Barclay votes tonight on the Brexit motion for which he is responsible. 
Opinion: A no-deal Brexit, despite the considerable economic disruption, might be the least-bad outcome left, writes The Editorial Board  
In case any constituents are wondering, I will be voting to prevent a No Deal Brexit & all the damage it would entail this evening. If you'd like my email updates on Brexit send me your home address & request to Neil.Coyle.MP@parliament.uk 
@Anna_Soubry giving pro-#Brexit MP 'Andrew Bridgen' both barrels.. I hope the good ppl of L'shire seek to put blame where it lies, with him.  
After sitting in the commons since 1.45 to speak on why we must rule out a No Deal Brexit I learn I won’t now be called. I’ll put in to speak tomorrow’s debate()but when front benches spoke for over an hour it sucks that parliamentary process prevents me saying my bit today!  
MPs who vote to take 'no deal' off the table are voting to disable the UK's negotiating leverage, to scupper Brexit and to undermine public trust in politics.  
Before long the Tory Reversers will be revealed. Only a reverser would vote to remove no deal from the table.They know this, we know this.It’s pointless to pretend otherwiseTime to make a list.#Brexit #StandFirm 
Brexit and Trumpism are both failing because conservative populism is a lie  
No-one shld pretend that a vote to "rule out no deal" or to "extend Article 50" is a vote for anything other than cancelling Brexit - whether that be in the form of simply revoking Art 50, extending Art 50 for yrs & yrs, a Kangaroo Vote 2nd euref or non-voting Remain / "Norway+". 
 WATCHTonight I‘ll be voting against leaving the EU without a deal. Leaving with no deal would be disastrous for my constituents and for Wales. #Brexit  
Dave Brown on Theresa May's defeated deal #BrexitVote #TheresaMay #Strasbourg #BrexitDeal #BrexitShambles #Brexit #Tories #BrexitShamble #Brexitdeal #backstop #FinalSay #PeoplesVote political cartoon gallery in London  
I agree with @GMB_Union - a No Deal Brexit would be a disaster for many UK jobs, industries and communities.But Parliament can block this cliff edge Brexit.So tonight I will vote to rule out a No Deal Brexit.  
"The deal is dead, this game is finished."German MEP Elmar Brok says "the hard Brexiteers and the Remainers will not accept anything" after voting down Theresa May's Brexit deal.  
MPs know most Brexit-voters expected a deal.MPs know @TheBMA, the top UK medical authority, says #NoDealBrexit would be 'catastrophic' for the NHS.MPs know an NHS catastrophe would cost countless British lives.Are UK MPs willing to pull the plug on their own constituents? 
Why is it Keith gets it.But Parliament doesn't? Simple negotiation 101.#Brexit  
It is 15 days to Brexit Day: We Brexiteers must stand firm. We have recorded history on our side. June 23 2016. Remoaners hate this irritating truth.“When there is no enemy within, the enemies outside cannot hurt you.” - Winston Churchill Stay Strong. Don't You Dare Flinch.   
Pound climbs ahead of no-deal Brexit vote  
Just a short thread on the "will of the people" all the leave MPs, May included talk about people voting for the first time in the 2016 referendum. Spelman today read a letter from a man who won't vote again if Brexit is stopped.... 
So, which MPs really want to crush the UK? Which ones are disaster capitalists looking to make a profit? Those choosing to keep No Deal Brexit as an option are choosing to hurt the UK... #BrexitVote 
Once again by pulling the Spelman amendment for the Govt CON amendment Parl is failing to wrest control from the PM & her now invalid #Brexit.This DOES NOT rule out a No Deal #BrexitShambles.How the hell can we trust these b'stards.Tory #Remain MPs FFS RESIGN & #RevokeA50 
Anna Soubry says "I will not be part of that", as she berates & blames Andrew Bridgen for the legitimate #Brexit vote of 17.4 million UK citizens.You're correct, Anna.You'll be getting a P45, next time we get a say.#NoDealNoProblem 
With Brexit on the horizon, and negotiations going so smoothly, why not celebrate with this commemorative Brexit T-shirt?  
Tonight @10DowningStreet Brexit conspiracy is being finally be exposed by govt putting down an amendment to take No deal off the table on the 29th March. The British people are watching, MPs can no longer hide from their voters everything now is in public view. @adamboultonSKY 
I don’t understand brexit but now I’m pissed off  
Emily Maitlis's eye-roll sums up everyone's mood about Brexit.  
Eddie Mair’s grilling of Cabinet minister Liz Truss over austerity, knife crime and Brexit sparked a big reaction from LBC listeners. Relive it here: @EddieMair | #Brexit 
Caroline Spelman attempts to pull her no deal Brexit motion to prevent cabinet resignations only to be told by John Bercow no.Will any Cabinet Members actually have the balls to follow through?I very much doubt it...#NoDeal #brexit 
MPs set to reject no-deal exit as Brexit unknown looms  
I keep reading that "an election wouldn't change the Brexit problem". That's not true. First of all, it could make everything a whole lot worse:  
A few delays due to the confusion over Brexit. We've asked all incoming flights to circle until the 29th of March when we'll know whether to follow U.K. or E.U. aviation rules. #SafetyFirst 
How to describe current Brexit situation? Trudy Harrison brings some Cumbrian creativity to the mix  #brexit #cumbria #catsarse @BBC_Cumbria 
Listening to the voices of farming and business. The DUP’s reckless Brexit stance has provoked deep hostility to the party. The anti-Rights party seems intent on fracturing its relationship with every element of civic society- Unionist, Nationalist & Other. 
Hooray: Caroline Lucas She tells the (near-empty) House that Arron Banks is busy going around European countries lobbying them to stop us extending Article 50, and mentions Russian interference. How can Parliament plough on with Brexit as if this is not going on? 
Yesterday I met with representatives from the chemicals industry who told me just how damaging a no deal brexit would be to this vital sector of uk economyAnother reason why I will be voting to take it off the table tonight and why I am calling for a @peoplesvote_uk 
Throughout this whole tawdry, galling Brexit process, Steve Baker MP @SteveBakerHW has emerged as a shining example of what a politician should be - a principled and intelligent champion of individual liberty, fighting to return power to the voters who put him there. 
The English aren’t allowed to celebrate saint patricks day bc it’s their fault the north is fucked bc they voted for brexit 
Brexit has shown up the Establishment as a bunch of small-minded, mediocre bullies' | via @telegraph 
Hurrah, Caroline Lucas referring to the illegalities in the Referendum and Aaron Banks tour of the European Right. About time. 
Dominic Grieve - "It seems plain to me that no-deal would be very damaging to this country" #EU #Brexit #BrexitVote 
European council president signals Corbyn’s deal is the only way to stop no-deal Brexit.By @wrightismight 
Jess Phillips - If MPs cared less about elections & more about the national interest, then we'd be having a really serious conversation on how to make this stop.. my constituents will be angry when they find out there's no #Brexit golden era.#SpringStatement #FinalSay 
This speech by Anna Soubry is brave, passionate & true. The #Brexit liars & frauds should listen & hang their heads in shame (but of course they have none).That's you, @BorisJohnson, @DavidDavisMP, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg, @LiamFox @MichaelGove#PeoplesVote #NoDeal #RevokeArticle50 
If MPs delay Brexit and take no deal off the table they have all broken their manifesto promises including Theresa May.They are all in Parliament by false representation. 
Whereas 'no-deal Brexit' has the considerable advantage of accurately describing the act of Brexit without a deal. 
May's inability to manage the Brexit process is an embarrassment. She needs to go.Time to call a General Election.Time for #JC4PM 
So #Philip Hammond warns Brexit is a 'cloud of uncertainty' over the economy,Au contraire. It is he and May who have deliberately and cynically created clouds of uncertainty! 
'Many-deals Brexit' is also a very bad name on account of the fact that it is a) ugly and b) completely misleading. 
It seems to me that Brexit imperils Northern Ireland’s place in the Union like nothing else in my lifetime. The DUP’s support for it is baffling, to say the least. 
British lawmakers set to reject no-deal exit as Brexit unknown looms  
May's deal is dead and MPs want to cancel Brexit - but nothing will stop us leaving in the end 
Redwood is now apparently against the concept of naming arguments. But he only believes in this view for a matter of seconds, because he then immediately uses the name 'Brexit', and then goes on develop an entirely new name of 'many-deals Brexit'. 
Before he was made head of Vote Leave, Michael Gove's pal wrote a long rant claiming poor people are poor due to bad genetic stock and rich people are rich due to genetic superiority. The key group they targeted to vote Brexit were the poor 
OK so there are lots of things I’m angry about.  1. That the Govt were surprised at the referendum 2. That not enough work was done prior to the Referendum 3.  That we have got this close to the deadline and the end of March is not going to be the end of it 
If Brexit was an animal....it would def be a cat, greetin tae get oot, then standing at the open door looking out at the pishing rain...and standing...and standing....and standing.... 
Not only did Brexit not work, but it broke government, it broke parliament, and it cut us all off from our optimum future. Can any other policy even touch it for sheer harmfulness? 
. @johnredwood "I'm not here to recreate the arguments of the referendum - the public are heartily sick of this Parliament going over and over and over the same arguments that we've had... They expect us to be purposeful, serious and sensible..."  
Note to non-Brits: I am not screaming about the current parliamentary Brexit shenanigans because I have NO CLUE what the hell is happening.I think most of us right now—whether leavers or remainers—would welcome a Martian invasion over the current crapfest. 
Italy’s far-right Gov’t remains the only EU member still believing Brexit is a good idea. A position they take as a means to justify their own economic recession/ political failures at home.Surprise, surprise, Putin is secretly funding Italy’s Deputy PM Salvini for EU elections.  
Michael Gove, one of the chief architects of #Brexit is now telling us of the perils of a #NoDealBrexit, he was busy blaming everyone else for voting down the May #BrexitDeal, this backstabbing creep was part of project lie, him Johnson and Farage, deceitful bastards #RevokeA50 
Tonights vote isn't legally binding, the leave date is. Enjoy the facade, we're heading for a WTO Brexit. 
“You’re looking at a country without any leaders.” — @brhodes on the ongoing Brexit conversation on #podsavetheworld 
my mood while attempting to write about Brexit is pretty similar to the look on Jeremy Corbyn's face here, nevertheless, I tried  
No-deal Brexit tariffs: Car prices would rocket by up to £1,500Would not buy any of these any way!  
A #NoDeal Brexit would be disastrous for small businesses - a fact recognised by Business Secretary Greg Clark at @CommonsBEIS this morning. The House of Commons must act decisively tonight in voting against it. 
I agree with @GMB_Union - a No Deal Brexit would be a disaster for many UK jobs, industries and communities.But Parliament can block this cliff edge Brexit.So tonight I will vote to rule out a No Deal Brexit.  
BREAKING: Second Govt defeat today at #TradeBill Report - this time on Labour-backed amendt making it negotiating objective to enable all UK/EU citizens post-#Brexit to exercise same reciprocal rights to work, live & study for purposes of provision of trade in goods/services 
LISTEN: Katie supported leave in 2016 (although was too young to vote) but since then she has learnt so much more about the UK's place in the EU and the ramifications of #Brexit (such as effect on @BorderIrish) and she has changed her mind. She is a #remainernow#PeoplesVote 
Group of MPs plan to force indicative votes on Brexit options  
What does ​Emily Maitlis's Brexit eye-roll really mean? That all @BBCNews presenters & editors are doing everything they can to prevent a @UKLabour govt which would reverse the flow of wealth & power which has flowed from poor to rich for forty years. 
Lab and Cons MPs pressing for a compromise are convinced govt has made big concessions, lots of focus on Gove comments on indicative votes. Their hope is big majority for govt motion followed by SI to change Brexit date + amendments tmrw 
"A unicorn is still a fantasy creature whether painted red or blue." - @Adamprice nails it once again. Tory Brexit deal has been rejected twice. Fantasy Labour Brexit is legally impossible & exists only as an excuse for not supporting a People's Vote.  
Yep, sums it up #Brexit #adnauseum 
The only thing MP's should be taking off the table tonight is Remain. Most of them were elected to Parliament on a manifesto promising to respect the referendum result. Taking No Deal off the table gives them an excuse to plot, delay & frustrate. Enough is enough. No extensions. 
Wera Hobhouse makes the point that Brexiters have stopped pretending that Brexit is in UK's interest, It is not the will of the people, so there is no obligation to deliver it. MPs changed their mind on the May deal vote. Are the people not entitled to change their mind? 
Brexit is a complete clustershambles and we’re heading towards the cliff edge  — I’m voting it down. Here’s what I said after the first meaningful vote, and I will say the exact same thing today! #NoToNoDeal 
No deal Brexit would be a risk, but it is the best option we have left. My take:-  
"How you do you want to solve an existential problem like Brexit if it is used by both parties to kill each other?"The European Parliament's Brexit co-ordinator Guy Verhofstadt says "Britain seems to be spinning out of control, instead of being back in control".  
In the time Facebook has been down, I've learnt a list of Grammy winners, written a sequel to Hamilton, and sorted Brexit. 
#Brexit the gif  
Kay Burley to Mike Gapes: “So you want a 2nd Referendum but not a Byelection? ... Parliament’s in stalemate, there isn’t an overall majority for the Govt, surely the way to sort that out is a GE? But you don’t want a GE as you know you’ll lose your seat!”  
This is worth watching to hear about the realities of trade and tariffs from the point of view of arable farming. Potential for no-deal Brexit to cause real problems for UK producers.  
Last night I voted against Theresa May's disastrous Brexit deal, and tonight I'll be voting to rule out a deeply damaging no-deal Brexit. I also want to find out what my constituents think about Brexit. Please fill out the survey below  
Brexiteer cognitive-dissonance syndrome. Also, demonstrated recently in meticulous legal scrutiny to the backstop, while also supporting the "fuck all the laws and renege on all international obligations" position by calling for No-Deal Brexit.   
“No Deal” #Brexit Omnibus Bill has just been passed. Thank u to politicians from all parties & none & fantastic officials from all Govt departments for their cooperation and work. These are challenging times - together we’re working to protect #Ireland. 
Did my ears really hear this? Tory MP @SCrabbPembs - we're in a 'bloody great mess' because politicians never thought through how they were going to do Brexit.  (Please can you confirm that this is a Tory MP speaking sense?)  
Brexit means Brexit, but taking no deal off the table doesn’t mean taking no deal off the table. Theresa May is appalling. Her only interest is keeping her party together. The consequences of her actions are suffered by us, not them. 
Michael Gove is now betraying Brexit, says Charles Moore  
Theresa May is a compulsive liar, and a proven xenophobic authoritarian nationalist. Why do people keep on assuming she is not aiming for a no-deal #Brexit? 
"The impact of a no-deal #Brexit would be massive and both major parties are trying to run down the clock" says @gavinshuker. Support us to stop the disastrous impact of no deal #Brexit:  
Taking 'no deal' off the table would be taking Britain's leverage off the table. It is a ruse to kill off Brexit altogether.  
I’m muting Brexit. I can only deal with one circus country at a time. 
George Eustice - recently resigned minister appears to say that the UK ambassador to Norway was “armed with a letter” that sought to retain our membership of the EEA. Says there are other interpretations of EEA treaty than it automatically lapsing on Brexit day.Blimey. 
Westminster #snp leader @IanBlackfordMP not hiding from the locals over #Brexit this afternoon unlike many other party politicians.  
Why can’t theresa just mind her business and focus on brexit ? 
Make it stop, please. This is just cruel. #Brexit 
My comment piece in today's @guardian: 'Parliament is betraying voters, but a clean Brexit is the best option': . Britain should offer the EU a trade agreement similar to those with Japan and Canada, and leave on 29 March. 
Czech prime minister tells May to hold second Brexit referendum and support remain  
No, we should refer to Leave voters as BEARS: Bigoted Evil Abominable Reactionary Scum. If that doesn’t persuade them to vote Remain in a second referendum, nothing will.  
It would seem all borders down the Irish sea aren't created equally. The DUP appear prepared to put up with being treated differently from the rest of UK if they can get a hard no deal Brexit, whereas they were implacably opposed to it under the backstop.#BrexitChaos 
THERESA THE TURNCOAT TRAITOR .  First she said 'No Deal better than Bad Deal'. Then 'My Deal or No Deal'.  Now 'My Deal or No Brexit'I say 'No Deal and No Theresa'#Brexit #BrexitBetrayal 
Every MP must judge what is right for the country & their constituents. I have voted - twice - to leave the EU with a deal. Tonight I’ll vote to keep #NoDeal on the table. It gives certainty & honours the referendum result. It’s time to come together and move on  
At this stage in the Brexit referendum, Theresa May isn’t so much a busted flush as a deck of cards that has been shredded and stomped into the dust, @JohnCassidy writes:  
I'm literally at a loss for words for how stupid this is. How utterly fucking insipidly STUPID this is. The ones making money off Brexit are like shipbreakers who stood on shore waving lanterns to crash and loot a ship.  
Channel 4 News is live from Westminster tonight as MPs make more key Brexit decisions. Will they vote to rule out the UK leaving the EU without a deal?Tune in tonight at 7 on 4 and here on Twitter. #BrexitMayhem 
Can't be fucked to get out of bed ngl x #Brexit 
Just a thought, maybe the British Parliament is actually being highly functional, not dysfunctional, in its digestion of Brexit. Refusing to let a system-changing act be rushed through by short term party concerns and a Brussels timetable. 
Theresa May's approach to Brexit  
Why were the Heritage Foundation and Putin’s favorite Congressman, Dana Rohrabacher, seemingly so invested in #Brexit? via @Phire2Fire @profcarroll @peterjukes @carolecadwalla @VickerySec 1/ 
From the #VoteLeave EU Referendum campaign... "Taking back control is a careful change, not a sudden step - we will negotiate the terms of a new deal before we start any legal process to #Leave."#Brexit #PeoplesVote #FinalSay #FBPE #PutItToThePeopleMarch 
'We've moved from wanting to be a growing economy etc.. To surviving. Ppl are even talking about shooting rabbits/growing potatoes." #Brexit  
What a prick, if anything shows we should not reject no deal this is a prime example. Hold your nerve show some f**king steel and tell them to move out the way we are coming through #whodareswins #nodeal #brexit  
Voted into power & then turns his back on the voters #WASPIVotes against Scotland's best interests re #BrexitAttacks the Scottish Parliament from WestminsterShames his country with his drunken sexual assaults on men in WMVotes as instructed by English Tories = Lobby Fodder 
How many hundreds of thousands of migrants have gained entry to this country whilst the farce of brexit has been going on? The government claim they they have no way of knowing the figures. 
The week in which we were finally going to have some real certainty on Brexit has plunged Britain into further political turmoil (via @bopinion) 
After a great deal of thought about brexit, I’ve decided not to support a deal to take a deal which isn’t a deal off the table as there is no table to put the deal on.If we can’t find a table to put the deal which isn’t a deal on I suggest we have a meaningful vote. 
And so in the end, the principle opposition to Brexit came from the people who wanted it most desperately. Read my Guardian article here:   
Eddie Mair: "What do you think about a second referendum?"Liz Truss: "I don't think people have changed their minds"@eddiemair: "You have"Liz Truss: "Well, the opposite way"@lbc #PeoplesVote 
Farage's Brexit march is a fake grassroots sham being paid for by millionaires. Of the course much of the media won't report it like that. So let's get in the story by accompanying every mile of the march with @ByDonkeys ad vans. We're £8k off the target. 
Hilary Ben has just given the game away. “This house will never vote to leave without a deal, now, in two months, or in six.”What he means is that they will stop #Brexit altogether, if they can. 
So, let’s get this straight. We have an MP,  #FionaOnasanya just released from prison on a tag, voting against #Brexit  in the House of Commons. An MP.On a tag.In the House of Commons.Kick her & her tag right out now.  
The Tories just attempted the most appalling trick in today's Brexit debate. Tory Caroline Spelman attempted to withdraw the amendment in her name which makes the rejection of no deal absolute and not just on 29 March. Bercow told her she can't and any other signatory can move it 
Hilary Benn is Chair of the Exiting EU Commitee. This sums up this pathetic & duplicitous Parliament. He is Chair and he doesn’t want to leave. #Brexit.  
An 80 minute catalogue of actual examples of the impact Brexit has had so far on business in this country.  Devastating. That means jobs, families and homes - in other words: lives.#RevokeA50 
Today I raised the serious issue of unaccountable 'dark money' being spent on social media advertising to influence UK politics & the Brexit process. Govt has failed to act with urgency on recommendations of the Electoral Commission. This is a serious threat to our democracy >>  
What does ​Emily Maitlis's Brexit eye-roll really mean? - video  
My MP is worried. He says that most in parliament have completely failed to understand the anger there is among the people over what they perceive as a brexit betrayal and feels its going to be something many are going to regret for a very long time. He should include himself. 
21/ Thread. Dana Rorahbacher was the head of the #Brexit subcommittee in the US! Talk about a compromised investigation.. 
The #Brexit Omnibus Bill has just passed all stages in the Seanad. It will now go to the President to be signed into law. Once again, I want to thank politicians from all parties & none & officials from all Govt departments for the cooperation and work in the passage of this bill  
Brexit is a mess, nobody cares.Instagram goes down for ten minutes and everyone loses their minds. 
of a no-deal Brexit, it's no longer clear to me who he is trying to influence or pressurise. Because senior DUPers seem neither fussed by what he said or any keener than they were to support the PM's Brexit deal. 
There *is* a cross-party majority of MPs in the House for a sensible Brexit. We have a duty to deliver it. That’s why I’m working with Labour MPs like @SKinnock @LucyMPowell @HelenGoodmanMP @JohnMannMP @IanAustinMP to find a pro-jobs #CommonMarket2.0 Brexit that respects the vote  
20/ BTW, @carolecadwalla is another must follow re: the synergy between the Brexit campaign and the Trump campaign. She and @peterjukes, @profcarroll, and @VickerySec. TY. 
Skilled speech there from @StephenGethins  - all fluid, succinct, no notes  - says that a no-deal Brexit should have been ruled out straight after the referendum. 
Noticeable lack of anticipation, excitement or triumphalism among Labour MPs at May suffering two of the three heaviest defeats by a PM in Parliamentary history. Reflects the party’s own Brexit splits, poll deficits and continued doubts about Corbyn’s leadership 
How Brexit is affecting mental health  
Brexit blockage sounds like a turd that won’t flush! 
“They will never be held responsible, but it should be to their eternal shame because of the damage they have caused to this country.” @Anna_Soubry condemns the leading politicians who helped construct the #Brexit chaos, only to walk away. Support us:  
It's clear that all the work of Nigel Farage & co, what their & our Brexit has shown us.Is that Parliament really doesn't represent the people.They represent big business, the establishment & special interests.Brexit has shown that we desperately need change in this Country. 
me on 29th March leaving to cross the border into Donegal when we get a no deal brexit  
Michael Gove's response is rightly greeted with a storm of derisory laughter. The proposition in a #PeoplesVote would also be "significantly different" from that in 2016: - Accept May's #Brexit deal? And if not...- Exit the EU with no deal?- Remain? 
Ken Clarke: We have got absolutely nowhere in the three years since the referendum. Now revocation being discussed by Ken Clarke and Dom Grieve.Grieve asks: Is the government trying to pull the wool over our eyes? We need to make sure that no #NoDeal means no #NoDeal 
EU law recognises animals as sentient beings but animals are at risk of losing these legal protections post-Brexit. Please help get a #BetterDealForAnimals by signing this petition, which calls for the UK government to pass our own animal welfare laws.  
.@OECD analysis shows the UK is one of the worst performers among developed countries.Our economy will suffer even if we leave with a deal, but a no-deal #Brexit would push us into recession, inflicting great damage on jobs & living standards. We need an #ExitfromBrexit now! 
The tragic irony of the UK government now requiring the help of the EU and 27 EU member states to extend the Brexit deadline to avert a no deal catastrophe.Take back control. 
The No Deal Brexit UK tariffs, first independent ones in 40 years that are ....denominated in the currency of the European Union  
Labour members agree with Plaid Cymru that Labour’s policy on Brexit is ridiculous and dishonest.  Mark Drakeford agrees 100% with Corbyn.  This is not the leadership Wales needs or deserves. Mae Cymru yn haeddu gwell.   
It wasn't (only) a joke. It was also a serious comment. The arcane and technical nature of the Brexit debate makes it inaccessible to many. No one's saying the debate doesn't matter. The opposite, in fact. And it's 'dumb' of you to not understand that point and resort to insults.  
Michael Gove is right that a No Deal Brexit would be a disaster. He must be so furious with the leaders of Vote Leave like Michael Gove. 
Michael Gove is now betraying Brexit, says Charles Moore: 
"The referendum was conducted in bizarre terms, with leading figures on both sides using dishonest arguments to make their case - which had little to do with the merits or otherwise of the EU"Ken Clarke on why voters feel disconnected from MPs on #Brexit  
This is the bit I understand:Any referendum can be either democratic or irreversible, but not both.Just as no parliament can bind a successor, it follows that no electorate can do either.Any democracy can change its mind.  
Brexit has shown up the Establishment as a bunch of small-minded, mediocre bullies  via @Telegraph 
May's deal is dead and MPs want to cancel Brexit - but nothing will stop us leaving in the end  via @Telegraph 
This dopey @UKLabour MP @CatMcKinnell is on @SkyNews right now warning that people are going to have to shoot rabbits to survive after #Brexit - when did superstitious and paranoid individuals actually get elected to Parliament? Did I miss something?  
May’s Brexit deal collapsed. UK govt proposing new tariffs. Business investment falling. Growth stalling. UK political system in gridlock. Why is SNP not calling IndyRef2? Passivity NOT an option.  
BREAKING: Govt defeated 285-184 on @PeterHain -led, cross-party backed amendt (22) to #TradeBill to prevent creation of new barriers that didn't exist pre-#Brexit day, which aren't subject to UK/Rep. of Ireland agreementOppn. Maj 101  
Theresa May keeps on holding the Meaningful Vote so she can get a different result......when the UK is saddled with a close referendum result now almost three years old and is not allowed to reconsider. 
A reminder that Ireland’s interests will never be served by the chaos at Westminster #Brexit  
Mark McVitie will be marching on Saturday 23rd because he believes young people deserve a final say on this #Brexit deal. Join him:  #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
Since 2008 the British media have increasingly shown a neoliberal & pro-Tory bias. They've soured our opinion of foreigners & the vulnerable & undoubtedly delivered us Tory governments, austerity & Brexit. None would have happened without their connivance. Do only I see this? 
On one hand I don't ever want to see a Scottish referendum againOn the other, because Sturgeon isn't particularly liked by anyone, I know they'll lose & we'll never have to see her face againThe division and hatred these people continue to inflict on Scotland is unforgivable. 
Bossing the chamber in the No-Deal Brexit debate. The problem is for many colleagues they may be listening but there doesn’t appear to be anything between the ears. As if no-deal could possibly be ‘desirable’. Cretins. 
Cunning plan alert Oliver Letwin and Yvette Cooper are planning to table an amendment tomorrow to allow for indicative votes on alternative forms of Brexit during a delay. Ball is in PM’s court now. More on @FinancialTimes live blog 
The ONLY Tory MP I have any modicum of respect for is Ken Clarke. The singular voice of common fucking sense in the UK government.Excuse the spelling but I am raging right now at the UK govt and the shitstorm that is Brexit. 
 What I want to know is why this has been published by a Brexit website and not by the government. It gives the lie to "crashing out". Why does the government not want to give comfort on no-deal? You don't have to be a Brexiteer to be suspicious. 
If Hammond’s promise to end austerity after Brexit seems familiar, here’s why  
"Crashing out" of #EU on No-Deal Brexit would leave UK food-regulation in hands of US agri-corporations, says Europhile Ken Clarke, whose lucrative business career consisted of flogging ciggies  made by US tobacco corporations to the third world.Words cannot express the contempt 
"[V]oting to cancel Brexit will be the most politically toxic act since backing the Jacobite rebels in the 18th century. Every MP that votes to do so will be remembered in infamy. "  
Theresa May's #Brexit deal has once again gone down in defeat. It is high time for investors to start thinking the unthinkable.  
I was on @SkyNews earlier discussing Labour's Brexit position ahead of #PMQs and the #SpringStatement and why Jeremy Corbyn has the most credible plan to unite parliament. #AllOutPolitics 
The litigants, lawyers & journalists (!) who have challenged the 2016 law-breaking are heroines/heroes. @abcpoppins @Suewilson91 @shahmiruk @JMPSimor @JolyonMaugham @WomaninHavana @carolecadwalla to start.There will be a Brexit inquiry. They're on the right side of history. 
Britain heads into Brexit unknown as parliament votes on no-deal exit  
Post #MeaningfulVote, new Brexit Flow Diagram! V16No Deal 32% Gen Election (req Art 50 ext.) 23% May's Deal 1% Spiral of tedium 16% #PeoplesVote (req ext.) 17% Rescind Art50 3% UK in EU until 2020 6% As ever high res on my blog!  
Ken Clarke making a good job of promoting Labour policy on Brexit. A customs union, single market access, regulatory alignment on food, rights etc. Unlike @maitlis he understands that although he wanted to Remain, the decision now is how we leave. Jot that down, Ms Maitlis  
.@ScotGovFM @NicolaSturgeon has announced £2 million funding to help more businesses in Scotland #PrepareForBrexit.The Brexit Support Grant will now be available to help SMEs manage a wide range of #Brexit impacts with funding of up to £4000 each.  
My article in @FT on UK economy in context of Chancellor's budget speech today. Too bad main problems (low productivity, lagging investment, stagnant wages, crumbling social fabric) have nothing to do with the EU--and will only be made worse after Brexit.  
For what? Respecting democracy? The results of a referendum?People are being locked up for political disagreements all over the world by authoritarian regimes... Thought being a so-called "liberal" you would oppose it, yet you seem to advocate it for Boris Johnson.Crass.  
Nothing will have more of an impact on the poorest and most vulnerable than Brexit, especially a disorderly Brexit. Economic downturns always hit those closest to the precipice first. 
Surely the most obvious way of taking back control over Brexit is to revoke and reconsider. The idea that a short extension would lead to any kind of grand political compromise is... just... have you seen who is leading the parties?! 
Clues to the shadowy funding behind  #Brexit can be found in “The Brink,” a fabulous new documentary on Steve Bannon coming to theaters Mar. 29.  
I am 16 years old and fully support Brexit and a no deal.The reasons are clear that we being controlled by EU.They treating us horrendous.We need our freedom.I want to prosper without the EU and to see our great nation on its own without being disadvantaged thanks to EU!! 
#BrexitDo you want the deal: NODo you want no deal: NODo you want a GE: NODo want a 2nd Ref: NOThe DUP says: This is all Europe and Dublin’s fault. 
Most common response to the Brexit debacle these days- whether from Piers Morgan or Joe Public, is "l blame ALL politicians"... not just the ones who called for & held the referendum, campaigned & negotiated for it & who've been in power for the entirety of the process... "ALL!" 
Good thread from @Michaelacbenson on the reporting of the British abroad in the wake of Brexit. She has been studying this for years and knows what she is talking about. Anti-migrant retirees are not the full picture.  
Some of the biggest names in the food & drink sector in Scotland here, urging *all* MPs to reject disastrous #NoDeal #Brexit outright tonight - which way will Scottish Tories jump?  
Ken Clarke on the period since the EU referendum: “Three years of futility.” 
With the Irish Prime Minister being feted in Washington this week, good time to remind our friends in Britain that a Brexit deal that doesn’t completely protect the Good Friday Agreement will find few friends here. 
*MACRON SAYS BREXIT CHOICE IS SIMPLE; NO NEW NEGOTIATION 
Another BBC News Brexit Special at 7pm tonight, this time on @BBCOne @BBCNewsChannel and @BBCWN. Now the Commons has rejected the May Deal (twice) what chance leaving on no deal? 
Astonishing disrespect from Emily Maitlis, repeatedly interrupting and rolling her eyes as she tries to dismiss Barry Gardiner clearly reiterating Labour’s Brexit plan, a plan that has been in the public domain since last September. #Newsnight #BBCbias 
6/ “The following month, Leave EU publicly launched a campaign aimed at convincing British voters to support a referendum in favor of exiting the European Union. The UK narrowly voted 4 the so-called Brexit in June, 2016. The tumultuous fallout has roiled the U.K. ever since...” 
I live for this video#brexit #theresamay #uk 
If I have got the numbers  right (I think I have) Conservative and DUP Brexit supporters in the Commons were responsible for stopping the UK deciding yesterday definitively to leave the EU this month. Well done. 
A No Deal Brexit would catastrophic for jobs, investment and security in our country. I'll be voting against it tonight. @GMB_Union 
Hello @guyverhofstadt, my niecephew Freya has drawn this beautiful picture of her teddy bear handing you a gift filled with friendship and tolerance to signify her regret at the bigotry and hatred #Brexit has caused.  
John Baron MP urges the Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer to not "rest his case on predictions - economic reality is dictated by comparative advantage... and that's why this economy is doing so well despite the prospect of no-deal." 
So @michaelgove has said that a “no deal” #brexit would lead to a Direct Rule returning in Northern Ireland... only way, with no decision making institutions to manage ‘no deal’ chaos. As one source puts is “that puts rocket boosters”  under constitutional question. 
I have collated links to all the relevant UK government documents and guidance notes published today on its proposed no-deal Brexit tariff schedule for ease of reference - please let me know if I have missed anything  
#Brexit of any form will hit our business investment and tax revenues, creating austerity for a decade ahead, says our Treasury spokesperson @ChrisLeslieMP. To help us stop this disastrous process become a supporter here:  
"The desperate claims of Remainer MPs are risible since they cast serious doubt on their ability to read or even take note of the masses of no-deal Brexit legislation that has already been passed by Parliament to ensure there is no “cliff-edge” on 29Mar."   
I’ve been going through my notebooks for the referendum campaign, looking for any warnings that we might just crash out of the EU with no deal of any kind. Haven’t found a single hint of it.  Just lots & lots of assurances that it would be dead easy to negotiate our departure. 
Keir Starmer says Brexit impasse at “hopeless end"“That is why we support a public vote….I’m proud that we are doing that” #FinalSay 
The Malthouse Compromise:1) Has already been rejected by the EU2) Means we give up £ without anything back3) Is just another way to No Deal.And is brought to you be a man with a history of bad ideas.Malthouse =  Only way forward now is a #PeoplesVote#FFS#Brexit  
Petition: Halt Brexit For A Public InquiryThe UK's departure from the EU looms but questions remain about the legitimacy of the Referendum. The Electoral Commission said illegal overspending occurred. Did it affect the result?  Was the referendum legal 
If the SNP want another referendum, that's fine by me. Only this time, we insist Scots in all parts of the UK are allowed a vote. 
Keir Starmer: The Govt has failed to bring the House behind its deal. It's nobody else's fault but the Govt. They should have looked for the consensus 2 yrs agoWiping the floor with the the Tories' pathetically blaming Labour for failure to achieve a Brexit deal#BrexitShambles 
Given the Brexit situation, this is a day when I feel so gratefully at home in a country that has welcomed and supported me as an EU citizen. I felt the same before Brexit but the precipice that has opened on the other side of the Irish Sea has put in sharp focus my gratitude. 
Labour’s John McDonnell accuses the government of “callous complacency over austerity and grotesque incompetence over the handling of Brexit” in response to the Chancellor’s spring statement.  
AMW will be chatting with Mike @thebestcloser tomorrow morning at 8 am.  Lots to discuss, including the latest #Brexit chaos.  Tune in. 
Labour's Keir Starmer says a no-deal #Brexit could be "terminal for Britain's manufacturing" and the "vast majority" of businesses and trade unions are against it 
Nearly all the MP's in Parliament today who are vehemently arguing against No Deal voted AGAINST the Deal. If you want a Deal vote for a Deal. Their motivation is simple: Stop Brexit.It's so transparent it's embarrassing. @Keir_Starmer 
No foreign interference in Brexit say Farage, Banks and Wiggy - while celebrating foreign interference in creating a catastrophic No Deal.  
For the second time since the Brexit vote, I replay the heartfelt piece I wrote way back then. In the meantime, we have elected Trump so we are not entitled to smug sanctimony. But please try to work this out Britain while we struggle with our own lapses.  
What do Salvini, Farage, Brexit, and Trump have in common? Steve Bannon and his weapons-grade data analytics (Cambridge Analytica now called Emerdata). 1/  
Dear anyone who believes a no deal Brexit will be fine, the difference between a unicorn and a dog with a traffic cone on its head is around thirty psilocybin mushrooms. Good luck, and stay hydrated. 
@Jacob_Rees_Mogg points to the core problem in British politics and #Brexit. MPs do not represent the people anymore. But time works against us so that we can't even afford to have general elections right now. #BrexitChaos 
This is what I predicted here a few months ago... Parliament would reject any deal because the nature of a potential Brexit is so divisive, reject “no deal” as it’s too damaging, go for an extension which EU will refuse without a GE, so article 50 gets revoked and Brexit dies  
WATCH | Brexiteer John Baron shoots down @Keir_Starmer's No Deal scaremongering: "He will remember during the referendum, dire economic warnings, 500,000 extra unemployed by Christmas. So bad were the predictions the Bank of England had to publicly apologise!" Quite right!   
Things got heated when @jchatterleycnn challenged staunch Brexit supporter MP Mark Francois over whether there should be a second referendum. He said voters “knew what they were doing” the first time around.  
NEW PODCAST PLEASE RETWEET. Theresa May isn't the only Traitor in Westminster. Why don't our leaders like @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn and the rest not love and value our country like we do? They are all traitors. We need to #brexit on #WTO terms.  … 
What Farage fails to say in the event of a no-Deal Brexit is that said that the NHS will have “no choice but to prioritise” which patients receive cancer treatment, according to the Royal College of Radiologist.He doesn’t care about the country or his constituents.  
Brexit quote of the day to Mark Rutte.'Voting for no-deal is like the Titanic voting for the iceberg.'Sabine Weyand quoted him this morning (after Rutte made the remark in a recent phone call to Jean-Claude Juncker). 
Business back a No Deal Brexit - that's why MPs must vote for it tonight. A World Trade Brexit means lower tariffs, saving £39bn, being about to do our own Free Trade Deals and so much more!  
This has been the #Brexit plan from the beginning - present a deliberately terrible deal which everyone rejects, then "rule out" #NoDealBrexit, and suddenly the UK has to #Remain.Manipulating the public till they ask you to do what you planned to do all along is politics 101. 
My name is Mike Gapes, the dishonourable member for Riyadh.I was elected as a Labour MP, but being a neoliberal without a socialist bone in my warmongering body, I decided to leave & join The Funny Tinge Group.I want a second referendum.But I don't want a by-election.OK?  
1/2 Four and a half years BEFORE the referendum back in the 2012 Euro Parliament elections I explained to Iain Dale on LBC that the Article 50 two year period wasnt enough time. 
Brexit has convinced me the Japanese were on to something with seppuku. There needs to be a face-saving way for elites to admit they catastrophically fucked up while permanently removing their ability to fuck up again. 
#DennisHayes  who ?  ... anyway on Sky News he recons MOST people want a no Deal Brexit, he’s WRONG, plus he’s an Education Professor, at the University Of Derby.  It’s his title of Education Professor that’s troubling me, he came across as a total bigot 
If Brexit happens, the campaign to rejoin will begin less than two seconds later. Brexit is futile; if it happens it won’t last long. But it will have done a great deal of damage to our society & economy. (Already has, alas.)  
I just chaired a #Brexit event with 100+ representatives from the Dutch logistics sector, public & private.NL does logistics pretty well.50% of participants said they would prefer the certainty of No Deal on 29/3 than the uncertainty of a #Brexit extension.#justasample 
A second referendum is close to impossible without a general election first (there aren’t numbers in commons). The likes of @MikeGapes know this but they have to pretend otherwise because every TIG member will lose their seat. 
To all spreading false rumours about Poland planning to veto a A50 extension:  Foreign Minister Jacek Czaputowicz just said a no deal Brexit would be 'the worst possible outcome' & 'maybe we will need to (...) extend this period; maybe they need more time to reflect on this". 
May voting against No Deal is the final nail in the coffin of the idea she wants to respect the result. She is an out and out remainer trying to get the worst Brexit outcome and tie us to the EU. 
Everytime @hilarybennmp pushes for a 2nd referendum I can't help but feel desperately sad that this is the son of the great Tony Benn, who would never have demanded the people keep voting until they submit and accept the will of the European Union. 
Anyone from Scotland watching the No-Deal Brexit Debate at WM, will see the blatant ignoring of intervention from the SNP We now see what regards Tories especially Gove has for Scotland the land of his birth This is no way for the so called mother of Parliament should behave  
No to be outdone by Brexit buffoonery, Irish isolationists have resorted to using stock photos instead of living candidates.  
Labour's Hilary Benn asks why it's "democratic" to bring back a deal to the House that's been defeated, but "undemocratic" to have a fresh #Brexit referendum 
Gove said "I think we've had more than enough from the circus acts of the SNP", called SNP members "part-time partitioners" and has just said the SNP are the "hokey cokey party" who want to be "in, out, in out and shake it all about' This is 2019, 16 days until #Brexit 
Brexit getting you down? Looking for something to distract you from the soul-destroying incompetence of our political leaders? Come celebrate Brexit-eve with me instead, at the Hello World paperback launch party:   Optional group therapy session included. 
Chap from Derby on #SkyNews: "Most people now want a no deal #Brexit." Really! Why is that? Very few people voted for that in 2016 and Michael Gove admitted that in the HofC today. The no deal advocates conned us in 2016 and they're still conning us today. #RevokeArticle50 
Anna Soubry gives her former Conservative colleague Michael Gove a fiery answer after he takes aim at her career as a barrister as MPs debate a no-deal Brexit  
We spared no effort to try and reconcile UK red lines and demands with our duty to protect the EU, the integrity of Internal Market, and the interests of EU citizens.The Withdrawal Agreement is the best and only possible solution.FVP Timmermans on #Brexit  
Breaking: Michael Gove speaking at the despatch box in the Commons just said DIRECT RULE may need to return to Northern Ireland in the event of a No Deal Brexit. 
Theresa May is using UK jobs, industries and communities as gambling chips. It’s time to put an end to her games.That’s why I will be voting to rule out a No Deal Brexit disaster. @GMB_Union 
#ToryEconomicFailure Hammond dangling necessary and badly needed cash, like a carrot, if May’s catastrophic Brexit deal is voted for, is at best immoral.Typical behaviour of this putrid Government, who have been shown to be totally rotten time and time again.#JC4PM2019  
MPs and some ministers will be voting tonight for an amendment that seeks an extension to article 50 to negotiate a deal that the EU has already rejected.There are 16 days to Brexit. When EU27 leaders meet to decide on granting an extension (or not) there will be 8 days to go.  
My advice to the EU would be to refuse an extension request from the UK unless it agrees to use it to hold a new referendum with an option to remain. The UK would then be obliged to agree or else to revoke A50, because it's isn't going to leave with no deal. 
A 'short' extension to Article 50 is not only a betrayal of the British people, it is also utterly pointless. UK Parliament is on recess from 5th - 22nd April, & the EU Parliament is closed for elections from 18th April - 2nd July. MPs must obey the people & deliver a WTO Brexit! 
Guy Verhofstadt: "Brexit is being used by the Conservatives and Labour to kill each other. For them, Brexit is a bullet in a weapon, not an existential problem of a country and a whole continent."  
#Brexit of any form will hit our business investment and tax revenues, creating austerity for a decade ahead, says our Treasury spokesperson @ChrisLeslieMP. To help us stop this disastrous process become a supporter here:  
"Brexit means Brexit"  
Taking 'no deal' off the table is simply a means to stop Brexit.  
.@michaelgove just said there would or could be direct rule in Northern Ireland if no-deal Brexit, because Westminster would have to negotiate directly with Dublin to keep border open in line with Good Friday Agreement. That  sounds like a threat to the DUP to fall into line... 
Tariffs help to protect higher standards in UK #agriculture and we share @NFUtweets fear for unprotected sectors & exports. Vital that UK #farmers are not undercut by lower standards. #Nodeal #Brexit remains the worst scenario for #British #farming  
There aren’t the numbers in Parliament for May’s deal, no deal nor a second referendum.It’s clear Parliament should reject no deal today and accept the call to extend Article 50.Then all parties should agree to put their Brexit plans to the country via a general election. 
“The NHS currently, in real terms, increases its budget by only about 1% per year [across the UK1]Things would be worse if we have a no-deal Brexit, ... I’m afraid the magic money tree that was promised probably doesn’t exist" 
Hey you, yeah you, the "Love Corbyn Hate Brexit" crowd. You have to pick one. 
Amongst the many Alice in Blunderland things that make no sense to me around Brexit is that fact  I'm life-long Labour and yet I have come through this process to bloody love Anna Soubry and bloody loathe Corbyn 
I've said it before and I'll say it again. We're not asking for a second referendum. We're asking for the first referendum without cheating. 
“We don’t know what we actually want.” Anti-#Brexit campaigner @thatginamiller says mood in Brussels has gone from frustration to anger after Theresa May's withdrawal deal fails to get through parliament, warning that the EU won’t wait for the UK to get its house in order. 
Michael Gove says support for the union in Scotland has grown since Brexit. Points to Scots Tory gains from the "part-time partitioners" of the SNP in 2017 as proof.  SNP benches v v unhappy. "They don't like it up em" says Gove. 
Call me old fashioned but I am not prepared to wrench the UK out of the EU just so the already wealthy can get wealthier. That is not a valid reason to carry on with Brexit. Applicable legal maxim that may apply here is "Out of fraud no action arises".#Justmakeitstop 
My remain voting mum has cancer in 3 locations in her bodyBrexit risks the supply of isotopes being used to treat her. 
What would you like to see? #brexit #nodeal #BackStop 
WATCH: Fiery exchange between Environment Secretary @michaelgove and MP @Anna_Soubry at the No-deal Brexit Debate...  
Parliament could “instruct” Theresa May to revoke Article 50 and suspend Brexit altogether - even if it’s against her will, Remain MP Chris Leslie says @ShelaghFogarty | #Brexit  
No-deal #Brexit would mean sheep and beef farmers instantly facing EU tariffs of at least 40%, Michael Gove says, affecting the "economic and social health" of the countryside 
The @BBC has contributed more than perhaps any other organisation to undermining our democracy. The BBC was the place where people could go to fact check claims made in the press. Now it is a largely uncritical mouthpiece for lies. @RobBurl @bbcnickrobinson#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
The EU's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier says 'the risk of a no deal has never been higher.'  
Irony being redefined at the moment in the House of Commons, Michael Gove, a main architect of the crime of the Brexitscam at Vote Leave, is explaining to MPs all the problems a no deal Brexit, i.e. Brexit, will cause the country.  
Gove says that the Vote Leave campiagn said in the referendum that UK would leave with a deal (it was there on the leaflet) 
Brexit for Dummies: An American’s guide to understanding Brexit -- with guest @IanDunt (BONUS full episode, no paywall) @UnPresidentPod @cliffschecter 
Last night, these MPs voted for the Gov's Brexit deal, but voted against it just a few weeks ago.They've changed their vote, but refuse to give you a say on Brexit in a #PeoplesVote.March with us on 23.03.19 to demand a #PeoplesVote:  
The best way to understand No Deal Brexit is your org doing an overnight "Lift and Shift" of entire infrastructure to Oracle Cloud. 
This is the EU in action.Get used to it all you Remainers because if Brexit is stopped you will notice more and more how inflexible they really are.They would continue to penalise the U.K.That’s why we must be prepared to leave at any cost.  
The @UKLabour party keeps saying a peoples vote is the will of their supporters, yet only 0.09% of Labour voters attended the party conference where this second referendum policy was voted on. 
I will be voting to keep a WTO Brexit on the table tonight.  
Michael Gove: MPs "now face a number of unattractive choices" on #BrexitEnvironment secretary opens debate before vote on no-deal by warning it risks "significant economic, political and constitutional challenges" 
The same Salvini whose party was recently revealed to have arranged for Putin's mafia state cronies to covertly fund its EU election campaign?Go Team Putin! #Brexit means Brexit!(Or should that be "Brexit means opportunities to buy into Russian goldmines", Andy?)#StopBrexit 
Option 1: Vote for a #NoDeal #Brexit and blindly plunge the UK into the abyss of decades of uncertainty  
Interestingly, the pound is almost 1% higher against the US Dollar and the Euro today. Why is that, when the PM's deal was comprehensively trounced yesterday? Is it because they believe #Brexit is going to fail? 
The Labour Party is backing every bid to block 'no deal' and opposing the only amendment that could deliver a real Brexit. They aren't acting in good faith to deliver Brexit. Labour is simply the party of Remain.  
Brexit is a textbook example of the cognitive dissonance process. It's what happens when people never adjust their thoughts (I love the EU!) to deal with reality (we're leaving the EU!). So instead they try to change reality - by battering Brexiteers into mental submission 
Brexiter Tories are now lobbying foreign governments to veto article 50 extension. And they argue Brexit is democratic!!! 
Blimey. Anna Soubry says Caroline Spelman will not put her amendment ruling out a no-deal Brexit forever to a vote tonight because Tory MPs are being whipped to oppose it. 
Rather blows out of the water this idea that Brexit is the "will of the people" though. Why is TM blocking an investigation into the Leave campaigns activities during the EU referendum, including the role of hedge funds? Or maybe she doesn't want to know?  
In four hours time MPs will vote no deal off the table. It means we could end up with a harder Brexit, a softer Brexit, a new Prime Minister, a, General Election, a second ref, an extension, or God knows what. Whatever happened to the vote to leave? Just a distant memory now, eh? 
Taking “no deal” off the table would be catastrophic for Britain. We know that.It's akin to Caesar handing Brute the dagger with which to stab him in the back.I don't believe MPs are naive so I prefer to think it's a cunning ploy to thwart Brexit.  
Dear @Steven_Woolfe I'm sorry about your uncle, I hope he's comfortable and at peace.My grandma isn't dying but she is 99 years old, blind and very worried about Brexit, which she knows to be a "terrible mistake". She is worried for the futures of her 10 great grandchildren.  
Tonight on Peston’s backbench we’ll be joined by @LucyMPowell, @andreajenkyns and @SamGyimah. They’ll be giving their thoughts on tonight’s votes and what tomorrow looks like for Brexit. LIVE at 10.45pm  
That means probably two votes at 7pm and 7.15. Spelman (no no-deal Brexit ever) likely to win, Green (Malthouse unicorn) likely to lose 
Liz truss gets it - she knows the Tory party is finished if the remainers in the party stop Brexit.  
'I think we should be friends': Donald Tusk shares Brexit letter from six-year-old Brit 
"To give us time to properly investigate allegations of foreign interference in the referendum, that could result in a conclusion that Article 50 was not consistent with our constitutional requirements."* breathes on finger nails ** polishes fingernails on chest * 
She keeps telling us it’s her duty to deliver the Brexit that the people voted for. She is a lair and a traitor. #BrexitBetrayal 
'She's Lost Control' | Latest cover for @NewStatesman#TheresaMay #Brexit #BrexitVote 
2/2 Up until now, the EU has presented a unified front in Brexit negotiations. But if just one member state rejects the idea of an extension — the opportunity is over, and the extension will be refused. 
#Brexit: What happens next? These are the next steps for MPs [tap to expand]  
"The story of Brexit since the referendum has in large part been the story of politicians finding out in real time what the thing they had already done actually meant, then deferring the admission or even acceptance of it"  
“Corbyn’s embrace of a #PeoplesVote was an opportunistic act of grand deception and if you don’t agree with that First Minister you’re either a liar or a fool." Watch the dramatic moment @Adamprice holds @fmwales to account over Labour's Brexit and People's Vote failures.  
The Tories have dragged us in to the biggest constitutional crisis in modern peacetime history, yet it’s popular to blame Jeremy Corbyn for Theresa May’s Brexit disaster. This is a damning indictment of much of the British MSM that refuse to hold the establishment to account. 
Updated #Brexit advice for #hospices via verbal update from @NHSEngland today: ‘Important for all organisations to undertake ‘walkthroughs’ to identify potential risks of #NoDealBrexit - it’s not just drug supplies that might be affected’ @hospiceuk 
The Commons clearly favours no single #Brexit option. Membership of #EFTA is a compromise both leavers and remainers can get behind, ridding us of the political structure of the #EU whilst maintaining access to the single market for job creation and growth #BackEFTA 
Between austerity and brexit, Britain has forfeited its future for at least a generation. #BrexitShambles 
A friend just reminded me of this line from Nietzsche which seems perfectly relevant to the world today...“Madness is rare in individuals - but in groups, parties, nations, and ages it is the rule." #Brexit 
What I say to all MPs today.A NO DEAL Brexit must remain on the table.Taking No Deal off will substantially weaken any British negotiating position further & just embolden the EU.MPs must act for the UK, not the EU tonight. 
And Amdt f) proposed by ERG figures Steve Baker, Jacob Rees-Mogg & Iain Duncan Smith; Tory Remainers Damian Green & Nicky Morgan; Simon Hart of the middle-of-the-road Brexit Delivery Group; & the DUP’s Nigel Dodds which seeks to put the Malthouse Compromise Plan B into effect. 
In sum:If a #NoDeal #Brexit would open a deep sore in N.Ireland’s economy, this is not even a sticking plaster.It is more like a folk remedy that would not only harm healthy tissue but would actively encourage germs to flourish.10/10 
Brexit is the new Fyre Festival 
I was unfortunate enough to hear some of @theJeremyVine's Brexit discussion on Radio 2 today. One caller after another saying we should just leave. An expert saying we don't make any of our own laws going completely unchallenged. This is no accident. This is corruption. 
Speaker confirms two amendments will be voted on tonight: Amdt a) from Caroline Spelman, Jack Dromey, Oliver Letwin, Hilary Benn, Yvette Cooper and Nick Boles to oppose a no-deal Brexit full stop and remove the reference to leaving without a deal remaining the default option 1/2 
Gove opening the Brexit debate in the chamber seems to be reading May’s obituary 
LISTEN: Hotelier Nicholas Mobbs explains how the uncertainty around #Brexit is hurting his business and the need for a #PeoplesVote. Join the #PutItToThePeople March on Saturday 23rd to demand a #PeoplesVote:  
My favorite British columnist — because she is such a good writer — on Brexit. @MarinaHyde, ladies and gentleman.  In American journalism only @petridishes comes close as a stylist. 
Lib Dem MP @EdwardJDavey breaks down the latest in the Brexit crisis."If people want to make this stop, let's have a People's Vote now." Agree? Join our campaign   
"She campaigned for Remain in national interest, now she tells us its national interest to leave. PMs made Britain a laughing stock" #Brexit  
The SNP will vote to prevent the UK from leaving the EU.The same UK they've no desire to be a part of.The same EU they would have left without a deal if Yes had won in 2014. Their policies on Brexit and Independence totally contradict each other.Work all of that out. 
Michael Heseltine on #SkyNews: He says  the original referendum, which is now almost 3 years old, is "out of date". People who supported Leave have died. Young people who support Remain can now vote. He supports a #PeoplesVote and says it's democratic. I agree! 
“I’m going to vote to keep No Deal on the table. It's vitally important we keep No Deal on the table, we hold our nerve and we keep pressure up because if we extend, if we allow the pressure to dissipate, I fear we won't end up delivering Brexit at all“ @trussliz#StandUp4Brexit 
Brexit Dipshit Of The Day Award goes to this chap: pic.twitter.com/4xgRpWbvyg 
Tom Brake, Lib Dem spokesman, point of order: Some MPs may have business interests that would benefit from a no-deal Brexit leading to a fall in the pound. Should they have to declare this? Jacob Rees-Mogg shivers as someone walks over his Dublin grave plot. 
Chief Secretary to the Treasury @trussliz "...we need to keep no-deal on the table otherwise we lose our negotiating leverage. What I really fear is there are many people in this country who want to stop Brexit... having a significant extension... would play into those hands."  
Looking forward to @Keir_Starmer, Labour’s #brexit spokesman, speaking shortly in today’s vital #Brexit debate & reaffirming our commitment to a #FinalSay #PeoplesVote on any #BrexitShambles deal, with the option to Remain. 
So, if you wanted to vote against a no deal Brexit you’d vote FOR the PM’s motion tonight. Except the motion also reaffirms no deal is the legal default... so you’d vote against! But then you’d technically be saying you don’t want a deal... so you’d vote for?!  
NO DEAL is the default legal option! Voting against it? Treason. It's the  legal basis we have agreed to leave in the event of a deal not being reached. MPs who vote against No Deal are in conflict with the law. Shows how much they respect law and order! #Brexit. Retweet.  
Do you think @theresa_may’s handling of #Brexit has damaged the credibility and reputation of the UK?Please RT for wide range of views 
So, had the Withdrawal Agreement passed and Britain was set to exit the EU in an orderly fashion, Labour would have called for a referendum. As it didn’t pass and we’re staring down the barrel of no deal, Labour won’t call for a referendum. That’s Labour policy?  
Because of your brexit fantasy my mother in law who was just diagnosed with mesothelioma may not get the drugs she needs.SitTheFuckDown  
The very same Treasury also stated, in 2016, that is Leave won the referendum within two years of the vote unemployment would rise by over 500k, wages would fall, house prices would crash & interest rates would be hiked.  
I've been shouted at by pro Brexit Nazis outside parliament and not flinched. Yet this has me crying.Please don't give up on us. I know right now the situation looks impossible but many of us in the UK are fighting against Brexit. We value the EU. 
"managed" no-deal Brexit. The mission of @theresa_may to keep Remainers AND Leavers in her government, and indeed in her party, looking more and more a desperate enterprise 
Striking that PM will order all her MPs and ministers to vote against the Spelman amendment, which would take no-deal Brexit off table forever and not just on 29 March, but allows free vote on Green amendment which is a vote for a... 
Hey Guys, here’s my first YouTube video in order to try and simplify what is going on in British Politics at the moment for the young & everyone.I’m only just starting out so please be kind!Peter’s Politics - Brexit Vote Day! (12/03/19)  via @YouTube 
These #Brexit at-all-costs zealots are working with fascists to destroy British jobs & livelyhoods. These zealots are working with extreme right-wing nationalists in foreign countries to undermine the will of the British parliament if it chooses to ask for an extension. WTF?!  
Britain’s agonizing national humiliation over Brexit continues:  
Rather than this appallingly ghoulish use of a dying relative elicit sympathy, I think I’ll save mine for those who may well die because Brexit means they don’t get the medical treatment they need to survive.  
Your "If" and "would have" encapsulate the last two years of Labour's handling of Brexit. No wonder you are 10 points behind in the polls!  
 ALERT  Important announcement below from Theresa May... Pls share. #Brexit  
Britain heads into Brexit unknown as parliament votes on no-deal exit  
I think I have managed to pinpoint what the Commons' approach to Brexit reminds me of and it is exactly like having a group of friends at a festival & you all agree you don't want to go to the main stage but argue for so long about where to go instead that you miss all the gigs 
You don’t have to be ecstatic with Labour’s handling of Brexit to think the ‘oh they’re as bad as each other!’ takes are insultingly class and disabled blind. This thread puts it achingly well:  
Brexit.  Having shot ourselves in the foot we now go on to aim at our ankles.....I hope our knees surrender. 
Opinion: A no-deal Brexit could still happen – even if MPs vote against it  
For much of my service, politicians lectured police officers repeatedly about things like:- Basic competence & capability- Individual & institutional prejudice- Integrity- The need for pay restraint- The need for reformThis, from the people who have given us Brexit... 
“There is nothing whatsoever to fear from leaving the EU without an agreement and reverting to WTO rules...Only then will the UK gain the leverage it needs to propose the kind of free trade deal with the EU that would maximise the benefits of Brexit”  
Am in a statutory instrument committee in parliament where the export of horse semen and brexit is being considered. Totally living the dream.... #brexithaos 
UK PM May says she will vote against a 'no-deal' Brexit  
Undertake an independent enquiry into the role of Russia in Brexit. - Petitions   
Exclusive: Leading European socialists urge Corbyn to back 'remain and reform' Brexit planAgain, @jeremycorbyn's European socialist colleagues have this rightBrexit is a project of the right; @UKLabour should mobilise its power to #StopBrexit 
I genuinely believe that a big part of the reason Brexit is such a mess is because it is so so so boring and technical a discussion - max-fac, customs union, Malthouse compromise, the backstop... kill me now.  
George, I assumed you'd blocked me as you have half of the Internet.Brexit will make everyone poorer.  This is a fact.If you support it in any way, I have no time for you.  
Twitter 2016:Tech person: I like gadgetsGames person: I like Dark SoulsHistory person: We discovered a tomb!Art person: *some art*2019:Tech person: Brexit and Trump are badGames person: Brexit and Trump are badHistory person: Brexit and Trump are badArt person: Brexit a 
Guy Verhofstadt - Those who started brexit wanted to take back control, but it seems to me Britain is spinning out of control instead of being back in control... Queen & country needs to be put first, instead of party politics..#PMQS #SpringStatement #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
... or they are respecting the result of the referendum. It's called democracy. 
The Commons voted 316/53 for a referendum & 492/122 to trigger Art 50. Parliament now seeks to defy the will of the people & overturn the result. The British people are being betrayed. UKIP is the only Party committed to #Leave #BrexitMeansExit #DemocracyDemandsBrexit 
On social media “What's the legal definition of treason? This must be sailing pretty close to it”. So it’s OK for Blair to collude with Macron to block Brexit, but not OK for Arron Banks to ask the Italians for help in delivering the Brexit that the British people voted for? 
Brexit has devastated Britain’s international reputation — and respect for its democracy, @anneapplebaum writes  
Taking no-deal #Brexit off the table is the "minimum" government should be doing, says Labour's Jonathan Reynolds #PoliticsLive 
Everytime the Brexit Ultras pull stunts like this, it just reinforces the view that they are fully aware that the will of the people has changed and they would lose a peoples vote! 
Liz Truss is the Chief Secretary to the Treasury  she is responsible for economic policy/growth in our country, but tonight she will vote for a #NoDealBrexit, think about that, she knows no deal will smash our economy, these are the extremists at the heart of govt #GTTO #Brexit 
The shadow Chancellor @JohnMcDonnellMP starts by telling MPs, “we have just witnessed a display by the Chancellor of this Government’s toxic mix of callous complacency over austerity and its grotesque incompetence over the handling of Brexit...” #SpringStatement 
I wrote about this the other day.  The £100bn wasted by Brexit so far could have funded Cancer Research UK for 150 years. We could therefore almost certainly have cracked many forms of cancer with the effort and money wasted on Brexit. 
I hear an interesting move is afoot by Tory/DUP/Labour Brexiteer MPs - tabling a joint amendment to rule out a 2nd Referendum in principle for Thursday’s voting. Plan is to spike People’s Vote’s guns early. 
At the current speed with which Westminster is adopting SNP policies, they’ll be campaigning for an English independence referendum by next year.  
May and Corbyn will never back a second referendum – but MPs must | Anna Soubry  
Extending Article 50 would create a breach of trust in politics and only serve to drag out the uncertainty around Brexit.  
1.  Britain remains part of the European family whatever happens2.  Don't leave it to the younger generation. We (British Europeans) still have a chance to change it now (with a little help from our friends) #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Our cover this week:Brexit meltdownWith James Forsyth, Katy Balls, Charles Moore and George Osborne  
As predicted the Hostile Environment for immigrants was just a dry run. Government planning to extend 'papers please' type controls on everyone after Brexit. We didn't vote for a surveillance state.  
Go WTO: Senior Leaver Calls for Clean Brexit, Govt to Slash Tariffs in No Deal  
'Will of the people'. 'Will of the House'.Over the past 15 years, @theSNP have been voted in on every election, General, Local and Scottish. Yet this does not come under the category of 'Will of the people'. The Scottish people want no Brexit, they have a mandate for indy2. 
“The US was central to the Good Friday Agreement. Brexit is a real threat. We need to work together to defend the agreement. There can be no return to a hard border” @MaryLouMcDonald meets with the Congressional  Friends of Ireland.   
Today, Philip Hammond promised to "end austerity" if a Brexit Deal is reached. Please take a look at the last 4 years of Newspaper Reports into Tory Budgets.  
If MPs thought #Brexit was such a horrendous idea, why did the majority of them vote to have a referendum? That is what I will never understand. They lied to us. They offered us something they would never, ever carry out. It was fake democracy then, and it's fake democracy now. 
Chancellor Philip Hammond weaponised #Brexit, dangling billions of funding before MP’s - but threatening to swipe it all away if MP’s don’t agree a deal. #SpringStatement2019#SpringStatement#ToryEconomicFailureKEY ANNOUNCEMENTS include: 
All forecasts suggest growth would pick up much faster with no Brexit at all. Gov’s own analysis shows deal would leave us £100b poorer by 2030. Long-term dividend is in staying in EU & a #PeoplesVote is democratic way to get there. 
This is simply dishonest. Over a wide range of non-EU imports, Brexit will mean LOWER prices in the shops.  
Of the millions of words written about Brexit - formal documents, commentary, tweets - the only things we should want to survive for future generations are the columns of @MarinaHyde. 
Growth forecast 2% or less every year is worst performance on record. Economy is going backwards, people are losing jobs & Brexit is a total shambles. Austerity means homelessness up & crime up. In Toryland #ToryEconomicFailure is "Robust" #SpringStatement 
“The desperate claims of Remainer MPs are even more risible than those of media pundits, since they cast serious doubt on their ability to read or even take note of the masses of no-deal Brexit legislation that has already been passed by Parliament ...”  
Preparations for any Brexit eventuality are well in hand, contrary to what Remainers in and out of Government would have you think.  
With news that the UK is attempting to avoid an 'absolute catastrophe' Brexit with an 11th hour vote in Parliament, what is the story behind #Brexit anyway?   
Oi, are you someone who plays video games? Do you support a final say on Brexit? And are you free on Friday lunchtime in London? I need your help!DM me if you're available to find out more details.Or, RT to help more people find out about this.#PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
For those Tory MPs currently being bribed by the Chancellor to support a Brexit deal for its potential to unlock up to £26.6bn of funds he is hoarding as a cushion against potential shock of no-deal Brexit, his official forecaster the OBR points out the true hoard is... 
Corbyn quite literally tabled a motion which included a second referendum. It was defeated. Why are you such a disgraceful propgandist? Why are you so scared of a Corbyn led Labour government?  
The Brexiteers are getting rich off Brexit whilst the rest of us bear the costs. 
 Today’s poll Please vote and retweet  Should a No Deal Brexit be PERMANENTLY ruled out as an eventual outcome? #SpringStatement #NoDealVote #PMQs 
You missed the party where you whipped the PLP to vote with the Tories to get us into this situation, You missed the part where your Brexit strategy is as much of a risk to the jobs & industry as the Tory strategy,You missed the part where you’re as culpable for Brexit as May 
Today I will vote against a no deal #Brexit that would cause untold damage to families & jobs not just in #Enfield, but across the country.The game-playing from both major parties must end. Britain deserves better & it's time to put our country first. @TheIndGroup #PeoplesVote 
Gold hits two-week high as investors seek refuge from Brexit chaos  
I'd rather run the risk of bots rioting than see babies dying from no-deal brexit.REVOKE 
BREXIT: UK PM MAY'S SPOKESMAN SAYS PM IS NOT GOING TO REVOKE ARTICLE 50 BREXIT NOTICE 
More government propaganda from RTE.  Despite Brexit .... It hasn't happened yet.  
BREXIT: UK PM MAY'S POLITICAL SPOKESMAN SAYS GOVERNMENT WILL NOT ALLOW FREE VOTE ON SPELMAN 'NO DEAL' AMENDMENT IF SELECTED 
We’re disappointed by today’s #SpringStatement – the Chancellor has missed a real opportunity to do the right thing & give people on the lowest incomes financial support & certainty before #Brexit >  
As Parliament is again deadlocked over Brexit, Theresa May suggests new foolproof way to decide best course of action:  
Will set out my full reasons later, but I will be voting to keep No Deal on the table this afternoon. I backed the deal last night as it would have ensured Brexit went ahead as per the Referendum. Just saying "no to no deal" is a soundbite not a solution. #TorbayHour #BoostTorbay 
Only 11  non pay roll #Conservative MPs in the chamber for the #SpringStatement Speaks volumes about the crisis engulfing the Conservative Party #Brexit @TheIndGroup 
Make no mistake: throughout Brexit dealings, the EU's number one objective has been to hobble the future prospects of Britain's economy, and bolster its own sclerotic, regressive, protectionist one. 
Opinion: The Brexit impasse reflects a broad failure of political leadership  
Government’s no deal #Brexit tariff is part of a “calamitous strategy”, says John McDonnell.He says the Chancellor should take no deal off the table and “come and join us” in discussing what happens next.#SpringStatement#SpringStatement2019 
.@Tim_r_dawson is a ‘freelance journalist’ behind “@Brit_Future” - a shadowy group which has spent up to £350,000 telling people to attack MPs for questioning #Brexit. Where does a *freelance* journalist get £350,000? Who is supplying #DawsonsCash?  #AskTim 
Brexit impact on the economy clear from Spring Statement. GDP growth revised down and business investment falling. All forms of Brexit bad for Scotland. No-deal catastrophic. #SpringStatement 
When India last lost a home ODI series, the UK hadn't even decided the date when the Brexit referendum would take place. #INDvAUS 
Major signed the Maastricht giving UK sovereignty away without the consent of the #British people.Brown signed the Lisbon Treaty, giving away further UK sovereignty without a #Referendum.We finally get a referendum, and now it's being ignored.Our politicians are despicable 
Why a no-deal Brexit is nothing to fear.15 days to go. So let's keep calm and deliver Brexit. 
“The perfect way to describe it is the fight of our generation. Every single generation has had its fight and for young people of 2018/2019, it’s the Brexit issue.” @bellathetwin 
Leaving a Westminster in #brexit meltdown for London Book Fair to hand out some free tampons and talk about my first book: ‘It’s About Bloody Time. Period.’ I’ve worn a hat and everything. And I may be a touch excited. #period #itsaboutbloodytime #periodpride #women #womb #lbf19 
Corbyn and May conspire to stop another referendum. It almost feels like spite. A plague on both their houses. They will go down in history as the worst combination of PM an leader of the opposition this country has ever endured. That will be their legacy.  
Brexit is not an isolated phenomenon; it's the result of a rotten political culture in a country where a large part of the population still longs for the Empire; its obsolete constituency voting system creates an atmosphere of extreme polarisation and endless, fruitless debates.  
Lab whipping their MPs to take #NoDeal off the table.Which means they are whipping their MPs to stop #Brexit.  
'Utter madness': Stunned British reporter ⁦@mehdirhasan⁩ blasts Theresa May as latest Brexit deal falls apart - ⁦@RawStory⁩ 
We’re in this mess only because MPs voted by 544 votes to 53 to ask the British people for an instruction on the EU but they will not implement the simple instruction  the British people gave them, because they don't agree with it. #simples#BrexitBetrayal #brexit 
This is sad in a number of ways. I’m sorry for his family, but democracy isn’t measured in uncles. It’s gratuitous and staggeringly cynical to try to conflate a family tragedy with the national tragedy of Brexit. 
#Brexit is not an EU failure, It is a coup built on lies, crime and foreign interference. It is just one part of an international hybrid war uniting Western kleptocrats, fascists and Putin in a campaign to undermine and destroy democracy. #Brexit is kleptofascism at work. 
also Remain lead a whole lot less narrow when you see the newly enfranchised youngest cohort are over 70% Remain - its their future. This is why ultimately Brexit will never be politically over until it’s abandoned  
Thank you Chris “I'm going to vote for the proposition that we could leave with No Deal on the 29th March, because I think taking that off the table completely compromises our position and essentially dishonours the referendum result” @CPhilpOfficial#StandUp4Brexit 
The second in our series is Murray Hawthorne: “I support a People’s Vote because Brexit threatens the hard fought for rights of the LGBT+ community. This deal takes away the right to live, work and love across the EU.”#eyesonthePRIDE let’s make the government #putittothepeople 
Chancellor @PhilipHammondUK says the economy is "robust", but warns that a no deal Brexit could mean "higher unemployment, lower wages and higher prices in shops". #SpringStatement 
Why a no-deal Brexit is nothing to fear. RT if you want to walk away from the EU! 
Hear Hear ........ Brexit has shown up the Establishment as a bunch of small-minded, mediocre bullies  
Brexit disaster capitalists are conspiring with foreign fascists to block an Article 50 extension. If successful there may be no time now for a Peoples vote. There is however time to REVOKE Article 50. It's either REVOKE or people dying from NO DEAL. 
Corbyn was lying about his support for a second referendum. Shocking, I know.  
Broadsword calling Danny Boy, Broadsword calling Danny Boy. @Feorlean is quite right. @ScotTories put party BEFORE Scotland, have ignored the express wish of their constituents, they know #Brexit is ruinous to Scotland. #RagmanRoll is apt and they should #RESIGN for shame! 
Despite what many MPs are saying "a vote against no deal does not stop a no deal outcome happening. It’s politically relevant, but legally irrelevant. No deal is the default outcome. It will happen unless a withdrawal agreement is approved or the notification is revoked." #Brexit  
theresa may serving up her brexit deal  
The SNP are loving Brexit. Gives them a chance to use constant grievance stories with the electorate whilst forgetting about education, NHS and Salmond. 
The Brexiteers are very fond of bandying around the word ‘traitor’ but this is the closest I’ve seen to anyone actually being one. 
#Brexit: How can Article 50 be extended?  
Note that if the EU is distroyed from the inside thks to the #fakenews fascists gang (currently organising its strategy -"nothing to do" w/ Bannon's movement surely) there'll be no need to drag the UK out.Brexit isn't needed: the "fight for Brexit" is 
I always said it was lunacy to go on overseas jollies two weeks from the Brexit deadline.If brexit is so important that we can't have an election, it should also have stopped our government going overseas.  
And yet Philip Hammond continues to sit happily in a government offering its MPs a free vote on this carnage. If the Chancellor had any courage he would have resigned today on the basis that Brexit is a historic economic mistake. #SpringStatement 
Are the same people in charge of Brexit leading the Giants' front office, too?  
Labour calls for confirmatory referendum *after* May deal passes... But if it did, that would be it. Game over. So, er,  
Just over two weeks till Brexit and #Chancellor’s Spring Statement offered no certainty or reassurance to businesses. He could eliminate no deal, increase investment and support the economy but has not. #SpringStatement2019 1/ 
VINTAGE Nigel Farage as he destroys the EU bureaucrats saying we MUST leave on the 29th of March!Emergency Petition launched demanding WTO Brexit/ No Deal kept on the table.#WTOBrexit #LeaveMeansLeave #MalthouseCompromise Sign here now:  
May and Corbyn will never back a second referendum – but MPs must  
Labour AM Lynne Neagle takes aim at Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit policy: "A pig in lipstick is still a pig, the idea of a jobs first Brexit is… ridiculous" 
This idea that Banks & Wigmore convince Salvini to veto Art 50 extension to hasten a No Deal Brexit...- 600k Italians live in Bang goes chances of those voting for Salvini if he does-  trade surplus on goods exports to  
.@KirstySNP Blackman responds to @uk_chancellor #SpringStatement #springstatement2019 "We need to take our lifeboat and get off this sinking Brexit ship"... 
Did you see this earlier?.. Brutal and extremely true. #EU #Brexit  
Gina Miller won her case in the S.C meaning we could not LEAVE THE EU without parliament having a say & THEY'VE HAD THEIR SAY & overwhelmingly voted to trigger A.50 & LEAVE THE EU! They're attempting to now repeal that act & ignore OUR VOTE entirely & WE CANNOT LET THEM! #BREXIT 
Not to be dramatic but this 6 year old girl would literally make a better brexit secretary than anyone May has had so far  
Opinion: Brexit has devastated Britain’s international reputation — and respect for its democracy  
Super strength needed. 
The UK votes today on a “no deal” Hard Brexit.  The UK government has already said it will eliminate tariffs on most goods imported into the country and will not require checks at the Irish border.  It’s the EU, not the UK, that wants to build a Wall. 
"Brexit has killed her and saved her at the same time," a former adviser to Labour politicians said about Theresa May, Britain's prime minister. "It's her job. She knows as soon as Brexit's done, she's done."  
Government's no-deal #Brexit tariff plan is part of a "calamitous strategy", says Shadow Chancellor John McDonnellHe says the chancellor should take no deal off the table and "come and join us" in discussing what happens next#SpringStatement updates:  
Just share this clip with second referendum FBPE types when they say ‘Corbyn was quiet on a People’s vote’ yesterday.They’re either being ignorant or malicious (in an attempt to damage Corbyn and Labour). 
No-one confirming anything, but Hammond and Barclay words on compromise and consensus suggest govt will move to indicative votes on brexit options - perhaps as early as tomorrow 
"Those people who want Brexit; I can't believe they keep voting against it": David Cameron on Sky this morning  
Me: Please don’t stereotype me. I am a true political scientist. A beacon of objectivity. Also me: Well, if you want to truly understand Brexit, I will need to take you back to 1169, when the Anglo - Norman’s first invaded our land....  
@lisanandy @JoPlattMP @Y_FovargueMP We would urge all on behalf of WiganBorough Leave electorate to vote to keep ‘No Deal’ on the table as this is our ‘leverage’ to get a improved Brexit Deal. It ‘must’ remain on that table!  RT#WiganBoroughVotedLeave #Brexit #Democracy 
Forget Brexit for one second and think about thisEmployment UP, with more full time jobs than ever before Deficit being ELIMINATED ahead of schedule Wages GROWING faster than EU Economy GROWN for nine yearsTax CUTS have keep coming You can’t argue that’s not a good record 
Plaid Cymru leader @Adamprice accused @MarkDrakeford of being either a "liar or a fool" if he did not believe Jeremy Corbyn had been "opportunistic" in earlier embracing a further referendum, in an urgent assembly question on last night's Brexit defeat in the Commons 
Adam Price tells Mark Drakeford he is either a "liar or a fool" if he doesn't see that Corbyn was deceiving people by pretending to support a People's Vote. Drakeford then claims that Plaid is in favour of Article 50 revocation without a referendum. Which is... untrue. 
Another referendum is “an idea that has been rehabilitated by the behaviour of the Brexiteers themselves. It might not be a good idea; it’s no longer obviously the worst.” The Brexiteers have blown it | Coffee House  
Juxtaposition of Spring Statement and another Brexit vote: let's be clear. The root causes of UK poverty are made here not by the EU. We can opt to cut poverty here and now. We've just seen the CX's choice to continue with the social security freeze for another year. 
I think people who have had their lives severely damaged by Brexit hold very different views about it to some of those for whom such a possibility is still theoretical.My company: closedBrother’s company: closedFamily: broken by loss of FOMHealth: will die if meds run out 
"He will die not seeing Brexit because of a political class that despise him and voters in Britain."Euro-MP Steven Woolfe speaks about his Brexit-supporting uncle, who has been diagnosed with a terminal illness.  
The Brexit situation is very interesting. If you were in a relationship where you’d be punished mercilessly if you decided to leave, that’s not a relationship. It’s a hostage situation. 
Spring Statement summary: Chancellor dangles a mammoth £26bn in front on MPs for tax cuts and departmental budget rises from the Autumn - but only if they endorse a Brexit deal. The biggest political bribe of all time. 
“Does the Prime Minister really want to be the first in history to deliberately plunge the UK economy into recession.”SNP Westminster leader Ian Blackford says a no deal Brexit should be taken off the table.  
For 2 years, journalists have  rolled their eyes when Labour people have explained our Brexit strategy.This was last June. Since then it's become ever clearer that May would fail & a customs union would be well received in Brussels & supported by MPs.Time to listen to Labour.  
If MPs take away No Deal tonight, they put Parliament AGAINST the people. They will take away Brexit & any remnants of faith in democracy too. These are dangerous times for Britain. Power versus the people #NoDeal 
‘How very British’ - EU papers exasperated by #Brexit  
Anti-Corbyn MPs (eg Owen Smith) and media commentators (eg Freedland) coordinated to spread the lie that Corbyn didn't mention a 2nd referendum in yesterday's debate. This is both shameful and antidemocratic.  
The black line at the bottom of this @OBR_UK graph shows the #Brexit drag anchor crippling U.K. business investment. Yet our main political parties are happy to enable a disastrous Brexit outcome and the #BrexitAusterity that will flow from it. 
So here's where we are: With 12 working days to go before a #NoDealBrexit, the chances of us getting an extension are very slim. Especially as the neo-fascist government in Italy may well block it. So the only way to stop Brexit is to #RevokeA50 
This morning, #bbcr4 had a tory on saying the current impasse on Brexit was "all Corbyn's fault" - I kid you not.  No-one disagreed.  I switched off, swearing. 
If MPs vote to take out the leverage of leaving without a deal then what does it do to our negotiating hand? Ruling out 'no deal' is ultimately a ruse to rule out Brexit altogether.  
“Even if there are a few short-term bumps in the road, we leave [with no deal] and both you and we can get on with the rest of our lives.”Former Ukip leader Nigel Farage tells Euro-MPs any request from the UK to delay Brexit should be vetoed by the EU.  
I remain totally committed to delivering Brexit, in line with the wishes of 76% of my constituents. That’s why I will vote to keep no deal on the table and against an unnecessary extension. See my full statement here:  
Hammond, with the prime minister sat next to him, basically just reached out to other parties to make a new softer Brexit policy.Either she knew he would do it and had her blessing or she didn’t and even her most senior minister isn’t paying attention to her any more. 
A no deal #Brexit could cost up to 100,000 jobs in Scotland, send the cost of everyday shopping through the roof and cause a recession worse than 2008.A no deal Brexit must never be an option. SNP MPs will vote against it and Theresa May must now order her MPs to do the same.  
The year is 2147, W. Buffett now has $500T in cash, but thinks you buy the $SPX, which just broke 2813. The Fed has achieved 2% inflation & Tesla announces they are close to making a profit. The China deal & BREXIT are on hold until after the Muller investigation is complete 
The will of the people is to Remain. Because there are 1000 different Brexits that split the Brexit vote. 
Hey Britain,We're friends, right?  So we can be honest?  The reason this Brexit thing is a catastrophe is because it is a terrible idea promoted by terrible people aided by terrible foreign governments and now entrusted to terrible politicians.  Does that help?Love,America 
Farage plots with Italian fascists to block an extension to Article 50. If this happens Parliament must immediately instruct May to revoke Article 50@Anna_Soubry@sarahwollaston@BenPBradshaw@thomasbrake@tom_watson@DavidLammy@vincecable#Brexit 
So now that Brexit MPs voted against Brexit because it wasn't the precise Brexit they wanted, can we all just agree to abandon Brexit because there is no Brexit that will appeal to 52% of people but there is one Remain that will appeal to 48% of people. 
Hammond ends his Spring Statement by calling on the House of Commons to "remove the threat of an imminent no deal Brexit" by backing A50 extension.He says this will help MPs "across this House" work towards a "compromise" deal.Hammond making it clear what he'd like to see. 
EU will not match zero tariffs - May's no-deal Brexit plan means hard border in Northern Ireland, warns CBI chief #PeoplesVote #Remain 
We'll be moving another step down on our @newyorker Brexit flowchart today. For those scoring, the first Parliament vote was a very big No. 
Hang on. So she’s just giving in to the threads? Instead of reporting threats to the police and doing the right thing for the country she’s saying give in to mob rule. Have I got that right? So if Remainers threatened to beat up their MPs we might get article 50 revoked? #brexit 
Parl't refuse to honour Brexit manifesto pledges & play fast & loose with democracy.MPs must work for the people, not against them.TIME for change.Londoner? We're setting up branches across Greater London. Follow us, join us, get involved.@TimePartyLDN@TimePartyUK 
.@PhilipHammondUK calls on MPs to come together in next 24 hours to at the last agree a negotiated exit from the EU. Although he is not explicitly disloyal to @theresa_may, no hint of regret that MPs set to take 29 March no-deal Brexit off table 
The American fund manager that employs Theresa May’s husband has said that it intends to use market uncertainty after Britain’s withdrawal from the European Union as a “buying opportunity”, raising a potential conflict of interest. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
"As we teeter on the brink of #Brexit, British people need more knowledge of our own history and more understanding of other cultures – not less."@Guardian editorial on #howhumanities are needed now more than ever: 
Brexit Series Finale- MPs vote against no deal- EU refuses to extend Article 50 deadline- Theresa May announces vote to revoke Article 50- MPs vote in favour- Article 50 revoked- Brexit cancelled- Life goes back to normalThe End 
Sturgeon told she was ‘not bright enough’ to understand Brexit deal: In other news, Theresa May explains that Sturgeon doesn't appreciate the fineness of the threads in her new suit 
"Its essential we Leave on March 29th for the sake of our social harmony" - Read my piece on social division from #Brexit on @Leavers_Britain  
Philip Hammond tells MPs they can 'tonight remove the threat of an imminent no deal Brexit'Sounds like Chancellor is issuing a rallying call to MPs across the Commons to take no deal off the table.He then suggests A50 extension will help build a compromise over Brexit 
What is the point of going to Hartlepool and doing the usual vox pop of the elderly and uninformed? @BBCNews caves in to this mindless populism constantly. We KNOW how damaging Brexit will be. Asking Jim from the pub his opinion is fucking pointless. 
Glad the most recent poll sees an @theSNP representative ahead in #EastRen. Our current representative @PM4EastRen has consistently voted against his constituents on #Brexit! The people who stopped to speak to us on Saturday in #Eastwood certainly weren’t impressed! 
Austerity never worked, it made things worse, gave us Brexit and was a con all along.The #SpringStatement = Yet another #ToryEconomicFailure 
His finger on the pulse, Corbyn has realised Britain is crying out for a PM 13% less popular than the current one, leading a party 10% less popular than the current one, with s policy of negotiating Brexit with the people who proved conclusively that negotiations are over. 
Vote No DealVote No BrexitVote Extend Article 50Or don't vote at all you bunch of traitors.We Voted once To LeaveWe Voted OutWe Voted Brexit17.4 Million Of UsYou corrupt bunch should be in jail for treason you bunch of traitors to DemocracyYes Democracy you Traitors. 
Here is what xenophobic white nationalist racist know-nothing delusional Trumpism, British-style, brought the "Brexit" crazed UK: As of this morning Britain’s reality is they have no functioning government at all. 
Farage plots with Italian fascists to deprive the UK of control of its own affairs. Farage is a traitor.#PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
By way of explanation....... 
Your attempt to sort out Brexit has lasted longer than my marriages to Anne of Cleves and Catherine Howard combined. It's two buggered-marriage lengths is what I'm saying. #wednesdaythoughts 
The clock is ticking and there are 5 essential steps businesses in the food and drink sector MUST TAKE NOW to prepare for a No Deal Brexit. They are here:   Please share this widely. 
BUSINESS4BREXIT | ABE supporter, Toby Baxendale, believes that businesses have nothing to fear from leaving the #EU on #WTO terms."Businesses need certainty, so let's get on with #Brexit". Please share! #despitebrexit 
Prime Minister @Theresa_May: "I may not have my own voice, but I do understand the voice of the country." #BrexitFull video here:  #PMQs 
Treacherously scheming with those who @guyverhofstadt famously described as 'the fifth column within the EU' in order to procure a veto against the will of the UK parliament; isn't it time for the smugness to be wiped off this lying toad faced twat's face by revoking Article 50? pic.twitter.com/6vo77o4dF5 
WATCH | Chancellor Philip Hammond describes the incredible strength of Brexit Britain's economy - consistent economic growth, job creation, and rapid wage increases. So much for the economic apocalypse that Project Fear liars predicted!Support us at  
Brexit and Trumpism Failed. Conservative Populism Is a Lie.  
I can see that will be the choice. My money is on the latter. If @jeremycorbyn had done his job and exposed the Referendum corruption by fascists / Putin etc we might not be in this position. 
The worms we elected and pay so well and reward with expenses which are not audited are now representing our interests in parliament by arguing among themselves as to the best way to cheat the majority of voters by denying them the brexit they voted for. This system stinks ! 
Phillip Hammond talking up the economy on the day he publishes no deal Brexit tariffs which will kill jobs and businesses is surreal 
One of the very few #MPs with pride and belief in this Great Country of Ours ! Thank Andrea you are respected and loved by the 17,410,742! Keep fighting the Good fight for #BREXIT! #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
This #SpringStatement2019 from arch remainer @PhilipHammondUK is nothing more than an attack on "no deal" Brexit, littered with #ProjectFear hyperbole with no evidence to support his fake claims. It comes on the eve of the vote! This is how this repulsive government operates. 
Just extending the Brexit process does not in itself prevent “no deal” from happening at a later date. That’s why EU keeps banging on about Parliament not just agreeing on what it doesn’t want but finally deciding what it does want: the PMs deal/another deal/elections/2nd ref. 2 
Tokyo continues to violate the will of the Okinawan people by tossing out the results of the Referendum. It's time for a change. Okinawa needs to regain its independence.  
I see arch  Philip Hammond insists “Leaving the EU without a Deal is not what people voted for”. The 2016 referendum on which we voted explicitly omitted any reference to “A Deal”. We voted to just Leave. It’s May and Hammond insisting there MUST be deal before we leave.  
If you want to know how ineffective Labour have been on Brexit for the lat 2 years replay this video again and again. Idiots like Gardiner are still hanging onto a pro-Brexit manifesto which LOST them the last election against the worst PM in living memory 
The fight for Brexit is only just beginning  
Outrageous - all pretence by May of wanting to deliver Brexit has been removed. She should resign. I bet Tory MPs are gutted they didn't get rid when they had the chance. She is tearing the party up & chucking it in the trashShe is proving to the world she is a fraud and a liar.  
Chancellor of the Exchequer Philip Hammond says that a no-deal Brexit "would mean significant disruption in the short and medium term and a smaller and less prosperous economy in the long term...higher unemployment, lower wages, higher prices in the shops"  
“We simply want to leave - and that applies to many who voted Remain as well.”Former Ukip leader Nigel Farage tells Euro-MPs any request from the UK to delay Brexit should be vetoed by the EU.  
.@Nigel_Farage to the EU: You've just lost £39bn.RT if you agree it's time to walk away from the EU!Join the historic rally in Parliament Square on March 29th against the Brexit betrayal:  
Oh look #Jezza has gone all #Brexit again.Did anyone actually believe it when the media claimed @UK_labour was backing a #PeoplesVote Because I sure didn't!#StopBackingBrexit 
Chancellor Philip Hammond warns no-deal #Brexit would mean "significant disruption" – with higher unemployment, lower wages & higher prices in shops"That is not what the British people voted for in June 2016," he says#SpringStatement updates:  
Brexiteer MPs were right to vote down May’s deal. But the handful of principled democrats in parliament cannot save Brexit. Leave voters need to organise, and quick, says @Tom_Slater_ 
It's such a ridiculous argument and the media never call out. Only the PM can call a referendum. Labour doesn't have a majority. There's no parliamentary majority for a PV. It would need a 6 month extension to A50. This rhetoric is only used to undermine JC. 
Sometimes it takes a child to put everything in perspective. What a terrible waste #Brexit is.  #IamEuropean @eucopresident 
“Has the time not come to look beyond this Remain-dominated Westminster bubble, to recognise that the default position of our votes to trigger Art50, is that ‘No Deal is better than a than a bad deal’, so that we can honour the referendum & leave the EU on 29th March” John Baron  
Hammond says it is the “solemn duty” of the Commons to seek a compromise Brexit deal. “Change your red lines, then!” shout Labour MPs. 
Today I talked to my MP, Stephen Kinnock, @SKinnock.Make sure that your MP knows how you feel about Brexit. You don´t have to find them in Westminster.You can meet them in their surgery, telephone, send an email or tweet them.  
Philip Hammond calls for Commons to “put aside our differences and seek a compromise in the national interest”; ie, a softer Brexit deal. This is pointedly not MV3, which is why PM has a face like thunder behind him. 
Wow. This is what Philip Hammond just said about a no deal Brexit.- Disruption will be significant- The economy will be smaller- Wages will be lower- Prices will be higherAnd still Tory Brexiters want it... 
Utter complacency from the Chancellor about the damage of #Brexit in any form - economic growth already downgraded from his Nov prediction of 1.6% for 2019 to just 1.2%. Less growth = weaker revenues = cuts for public services. 
Brexit is and always has been an internal Tory party fight, with us as collateral  
Sweet #Brexit   
 Last night I voted against May’s deal and tonight I will vote against no deal. I do so for the future of young people in #EastLothian and in the best interests of Scotland and the UK. #Brexit @peoplesvote_uk 
.@Anna_Soubry failed to back an amendment that would have given provisions for a second referendum. She’s a liar who thinks people won’t notice her fraudulent ways. Broxtowe deserves much better. They will get better when the seat turns to @UKLabour. 
Putin’s friends in Europe pulling the strings on Brexit should be a chilling wake up call. Article 50 should be revoked in its entirety.  
Labour have plunged to 10 points behind the Tories now that they're offering a second referendum. No Deal is consistently polled the highest as a voter preference. When are our damn politicians going to listen to what we want!?Enough is enough! #LetsGoWTO!!! 
The Chancellor confirms that GDP growth in 2019 & 2020 will be 1.2% & 1.4% compared to pre-2016 referendum forecasts of 2.1% for both years. Already the #Brexit vote has damaged our economy and we haven’t even left yet. The leaderships of the main want to parties facilitate it. 
Hammond says IF there is Brexit deal in next few weeks, spending review will start in summer and report in autumn alongside Budget as 3 year review 
PM obliged to criticise Malthouse amendment twice at PMQs saying can’t be negotiated. But she’s allowed a free vote on it.won’t pass, but it will serve as the first salvo of a leadership contest - with ministers seeking to cement their No Deal Brexit credentials with membership 
Corbyn literally proposed an amendment that contained a second referendum (which by the way, Soubry voted against).  
In other Brexit news, immigration minister Caroline Nokes has told a Lords committee that the sheer complexity of the post-Brexit immigration system could mean having to possibly introduce an ID card system. 
BREAKING: Britain's growth forecast for 2019 has been cut from 1.6% to 1.2% A "cloud of uncertainty" is hanging over the economy but it is "remarkably robust," Philip Hammond says in his #SpringStatement 
My @ESComment column: Time for MPs to be honest — the only true options are Brexit or no Brexit  
Corbyn put an amendment down to push for a second referendum. Anna Soubry voted against it.Today's soiling at the Guardian, nappy change time.  
This Malthouse “pay-as-you-go” #brexit amendment is utterly delusional. Unicorns really do have more chance of existing. Am on phone with EU source discuss extension and what might trigger leaders into harder than expected response?“That”. 
You can read the government's documents on the implications of a No Deal Brexit on government, business, citizens, and trade for yourself on their website here:  
I’m on the road again for #TracingtheBorder - find out where’s next on my #Brexit #roadtrip  
Why a no-deal Brexit is nothing to fear | The Spectator  
The utter hypocrisy of arch-Remainer Hammond, in effect praising himself for the preparedness of the economy for Brexit, when he's consistently blocked funds to make ready for a No-Deal Brexit.#SpringStatement 
Brexit and Trumpism are both failing because conservative populism is a lie  
No responsible politician would willingly inflict a No Deal Brexit on their constituents. Tell your MP to rule out No Deal tonight, and back an extension to Article 50. 
1 MPs defect2 Corbyn declares referendum now Labour policy3 Watson stops threat of further defections4 Corbyn stops talking about referendumI'm trying to work this thing out 
.@moneillsf speaking to the media after meeting with businesses and farmers this morning “There is nothing good to come from Brexit, Irish interests were never considered. The back-stop is the bottom line and it is time the DUP prioritised the needs of the people here.” #Brexit  
THREAD: Tonight MPs will be voting on a ‘No Deal’ Brexit. The Government’s own documents that @Anna_Soubry and I forced them to publish show just how reckless allowing it to happen would be. Here’s 10 reasons why MPs should rule out a No Deal Brexit. 
"The impact of a no-deal #Brexit would be massive and both major parties are trying to run down the clock", says @gavinshuker on #AllOutPolitics with @adamboultonSKY Support us to help #ChangePolitics  
Farage Tells Europe After May’s Defeat: Reject Brexit Extension And We Can All Get On With Our Lives  
“We’re very clear what should be done to fulfil the result of the referendum and our manifesto commitments and that is after all what as Conservatives we stood to do.“Remember that negotiation is a moveable feast. If only we would stand firm” @SteveBakerHW#StandUp4Brexit 
A version of fucking Brexit has ALREADY HAPPENED to the poor, elderly & disabled in this country. Tory austerity has pissed on them, devalued their lives & left them to literally die. 
An entire media culture that forgot to give a fuck what working-class northerners thought for 35 years has now panicked and decided that only what working-class northerners think matters, but only if it's about Brexit. 
What would you vote in favour for?MPs will vote on two different #Brexit outcomes over the next two days; leaving without a deal, or extending Article 50, prolonging Brexit. 
May and Corbyn will never back a second referendum – but MPs must | Anna Soubry  
Just in: Pakistan threatens that if any economic restriction is imposed on it because of its support to terrorism, it will withdraw itself from the European Union like Britain did last year. It says impact of it existing will be larger than Brexit & world’s economy will be doomed 
I say it again, the only reason to watch these Brexit deliberations is for speaker of the house John Bercow berating certain people and calling for order #Bercow #Brexit #BrexitVote 
if you mess up a brexit vote 3 times in a row the pope gets to come back and run your country again 
Only Theresa May could somehow manage to formulate a motion which both rules out and rules in a no-deal Brexit.  
Sangena sangena! My family will vote for BLF, KZN ANC members will vote BLF (nationally) and Zulus will vote BLF!  #StateCaptureInquiry #kurough #Ronaldo #woolieswater #TrippinWithSkhumba #Brexit  
May’s distraction plan.#Brexit  
I'd be willing to concede to certain folks that not everyone who voted for Trump or brexit are bad people, if only they had the common decency to express regret or remorse, but they want to be proud of their harmful political actions and considered good people.Can't have both. 
Both Labour and Conservative are willing to betray the Brexit vote, and they have betrayed the country on immigration, policing, schooling, NHS... they are every bit as bad as each other on major issues.  The only thing to fear is the status quo, we must vote differently. 
It's heating up here in UK. We are trying to defeat Globalism but our elected leaders are betraying us. Help us spread the word. #MAGA patriots! We need Trump! #brexit #PatriotsUnited #WWG1WGA#WWG1WGAWORLDWIDE #WeAreTheNewsNow #Trump #TWGRP 
My #SpringStatementThe word Holibobs should be abolishedBiscuits should be provided FOC by all employersWe need more dresses with pockets in the world Brexit talk at work should be banned, Everyone's an expert & I’m sick of hearing knobish viewsBeing kind should be a thing 
The Londoner spotted Siobhan McSweeney aka Sister Michael @siobhni from Channel 4's Derry Girls in the Strangers' Bar after the big Brexit vote last night. We can only imagine what she was saying to MPs...  
Has anyone considered just shipping the Dutch over to run #Brexit?  
An MP who refuses to call a by-election & seek a democratic mandate on her new platform is LITERALLY asking a foreign power to help overthrow the largest democratic mandate in UK political history.Why does @heidiallen75 hate democracy?#Brexit #StandUp4Brexit 
What would you like to happen in politics next? #brexit #PeoplesVote #WithdrawalAgreement RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
The coup d'état in #Ukraine and threat of ethnic cleansing pushed the people of #Crimea to exercise their right for self-determination as stipulated in the #UN Charter, which they expressed during the all-Crimean referendum conducted on March 16, 2014.#Russia #CrimeanSpring 
I find it very odd that unionists who voted No in the #indyref because it was a leap into the unknown seem perfectly happy with #Brexit even though nobody knows what's going to happen next. 
Theresa May blaming MPs for her unrelentingly shit deal not getting through rather than the quality of the deal itself is fucking peak Brexit. #PMQs 
For *years*, I + others urged politicians inc D Cameron + G Osborne to say openly what they believed; immigration is net +ve. That was basis of immigration policy, but its authors wouldn't argue for it.  Instead, they accepted the Ukip narrative.  Pandering + cowardice = Brexit. 
32 Times @theresa_may promised that No Deal was better than a bad deal. Her bad deal has been comprehensively voted down by Parliament, we must now leave without a deal. No second referendum, no Art 50 extension, but to leave on March 29th on WTO terms.  
All the key choices in season one of Telltale's Brexit  
Amazing audience for last night’s BBC News Special on the vote on Mrs May’s Brexit Deal on @BBCOne 
Theresa May to vote against a no-deal BrexitThe Prime Minister’s confession at PMQs comes despite her spending £4billion on no-deal Brexit planning and insisting no deal is better than a bad deal   
500 extra customs staff recruited in NL. Food safety body faced shortage of vets. Went recruiting in Eastern & Southern Europe - these foreign vets completed 18 week full time Dutch language course. Seriously. This is putting UK to shame (some might say) #Brexit 
Brexit will hit our generation hard. Read about how young people across the country are joining @OFOCBrexit and @FFSake_ to fight for their futures  
More than 4 million people watched last night's Brexit special with @afneil on @BBCOne. Who says people are bored of Brexit 
MPs, we've had enough. We're ready. Let's go.Distinctive daily #Brexit research & news : #GoWTO 
If there is money for #Brexit - no deal or otherwise - there should be money to stop child poverty rising. This is infuriating #PMQs 
A Brexit was bought, here are the salesmen in action.  
A nice chat with @CarolineLucas MP.It's clearer to her than ever that #Brexit is a fight within the Tory Party & the PM is putting  party unity before the people of this country. MPs must take control today, reject No Deal & deliver a #PeoplesVote@BHforEU #PutItToThePeople 
Tonight is historic. 'Honourable' MPs vote on leaving with no deal. lf they do, they will be voting to set parliament against the people. They will be voting to detonate Brexit. Trust in their own parties, and democracy will be wiped out. They will commit a Guy Fawkes in reverse. 
The shadows at Westminster Bridge say it all... #Brexit #PMQs 
Theresa May’s Brexit strategy is in tatters.Her deal has been rejected – twice.You’re out of time, Theresa.#PMQs 
Brexit basics #50: The date the EU treaties cease to apply to the UK is fixed by EU law. You can vote on no-deal, organise a sit-in and sing kumbaya or do an interpretative dance in Covent Garden. The only routes to take no-deal off the table is 1) decide on a deal or 2) revoke  
They concealed our oil revenues.They gerrymandered the 1979 devolution referendum.They deindustrialised Scotland.They dragged us into unnecessary wars.They promised "near federalism" and lied.Now they're dragging us out the EU.Seriously, what's the anti-indy argument now? 
Do you support a Scottish Independence referendum being held in 2019? 
I find it deeply unsavoury that Theresa May did not even bother to take  appropriate measures to 'fix' her voice by using a steroid spray. This  attempt to play on public sympathy as she betrays #Brexit is a disgrace. Nasty woman. Should have never been allowed to become PM 
#PMQs  Theresa May says revoking Article 50 would be to betray the vote in the referendum. This is the rhetoric of fascist plebiscitary dictatorship. A Parliamentary democracy has the right to change its mind, and the people can & should be consulted via a #PeoplesVote.#Brexit  
To EU27 friends:Farage’s threat to flood EP with “Brexit Party” MEPs is bollocks.Yes, he‘s stirred pot; there‘ll be many angry at UK being in EU.But his prospectus is lies, his party brand non-existent.UK and EU27 face common threat. We must face down far-right *together* 
The reason her deal is now dead is at every step on the way she's failed to listen, @jeremycorbyn absolutely right on this, the PM has arrogantly carried on with her twice rejected #Brexit deal and is now running out of time #PMQs 
There are a lot of Brexit flowcharts floating around. But there's only one that is also a calendar. Behold:  
“Does the PM want to be the first Prime Minister in history to plunge the country deliberately into recession?” @IanBlackfordMP asks the PM before challenging her to whip Tory MPs to take a no deal #Brexit off the table. #PMQs 
Jeremy Corbyn on #Brexit: "Does she now recognise the Labour alternative... is the only credible show in town"PM: "I may not have my own voice, but I do understand the voice of the country"#PMQs updates:  
Brexit on Mar 29UK currently begging the EU to give extension to work out a deal bec there may be trade chaos otherwiseNice to watch the UK grovelBrits left India in hurry in Partition chaos because they wanted the satisfaction of watching India suffer the moment they left 
PM: You can only take no deal off the table by doing one of two things. Revoke Article 50, which means betraying the vote of the referendum, or agree a deal. If the right honourable gentleman wants to take no deal off the table, he should have voted for the deal #PMQs 
Corbyn's final question was what plan May now has for Brexit beyond the votes today & tomorrow. She had no answer. #PMQs #PoliticsLive @BBCPolitics 
SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP says Theresa May risks becoming the first Prime Minister in history to deliberately cause a recession. She must whip Tory MPs to vote against a devastating No-Deal Brexit tonight #Brexit 
Theresa May confirms she will vote later to block the UK leaving the EU without an agreement later this month#PMQs latest:  #Brexit  
When you think our politics are tough, watch British politics.  #Brexit  
There is no Brexit that is good for workers' rights. There is no Brexit that is good for the NHS. There is no Brexit that is good for jobs. The best deal is the one we already have with the EU. #PMQsDemand a People's Vote  
I could weep with rage about this. Brexit is happening because politicians wouldn’t make the case for immigration & believed public opinion was unchangeable. More courage & honesty could have changed history.  
"The vote for Brexit being a revolutionary act, of course the Establishment would fight it tooth and nail, not least in devising the “deal” that Theresa May has spent the past few months flogging." 
Alun Cairns is considering voting for no deal when he should be considering his position as Secretary of State for Wales. He knows the damage a no deal will cause so why can’t he stand up for Wales just this once and rule it out? #Brexit #PMQs #Gower 
.@jeremycorbyn is making clear once again that he backs Brexit, despite the fact that the poorest in Britain will be hardest hit by this disaster. Corbyn's Brexit is a non-starter. Labour supporters who want to stay in the EU deserve better from their leadership. #PMQs 
John Baron MP "...has the time not come to look beyond this Remain-dominated Westminster bubble, and for all of us to recognise that the default position of our votes to trigger Article 50 is that no-deal is better than a bad deal, so that we can honour the referendum..."  
#PMQs. Theresa May is lying again before the House in claiming the people want #Brexit. If she is so sure of that why is she running scared of a #PeoplesVote? 
Insert 'the ERG' when the PM says 'the country' and suddenly it all makes sense #PMQs #Brexit 
May rightly points out Corbyn made no reference to 2nd referendum yday. Also points out she will vote for her own motion, says JC needs to read up on tariffs. I may not have my own voice but I understand the voice if the country. PM may be hoarse but she's winning this #PMQs 
Let's be absolutely clear: whether it's @theresa_may's bad Brexit deal or @jeremycorbyn's bad Brexit deal, leaving the EU will be a disaster for Britain. #PMQsLiberal Democrats believe Britain deserves better. Demand a People's Vote > 
NEW PODCAST PLEASE RETWEET. Theresa May isn't the only Traitor in Westminster. Why don't our leaders like @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn and the rest not love and value our country like we do? They are all traitors. We need to #brexit on #WTO terms.  
Paging @BenPBradshaw@thomasbrake@heidiallen75@Sandbach@SarahLudford@MollyMEP@guyverhofstadt@darrenpjones@Anna_Soubry@DamianCollins Banks & Wigmore have done a deal with the facists in Italy to prevent an A50 extension and help the ERG with a #NoDeal #Brexit 
Steven Camley on Theresa May's defeated deal #BrexitVote #TheresaMay #Strasbourg #BrexitDeal #BrexitShambles #Brexit #Tories #BrexitShamble #BrexitShambles #Brexitdeal #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote political cartoon gallery in London  
This idea that the Westminster bubble is predominantly remain-obsessed is nonsense. If we’re all being honest, Brexit being inevitable is a much more Westminster bubble opinion. Don’t @ me.#PMQs 
Forget Brexit, this is the most British thing you'll read today.  
If Brexit clarity doesn't come soon, the fallout will be savage | Analysis by CNN's @lukemcgee  
Theresa May confirms she will vote AGAINST a No Deal Brexit on March 29.THIS after telling us repeatedly that ‘no deal’ is better than a bad deal. She’s a compulsive liar. #PMQs 
I don't want an extension to article 50. I want Brexit on 29th March.However if there is an extension it must include for EU elections. The liblabcon will be wiped out by the Brexit Parties.The sight of Farage, Batten, Waters & Co in the EU Parliament would be quite something. 
#PMQs. A Tory claiming that we trade with the rest of the world largely on WTO terms. This is a lie. Much if not most of our trade outside the EU is conducted on the basis of agreements negotiated by the EU. No country trades solely on WTO terms. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Guardian journalist cosying up to BBC journalist who's cosying up to Tory minister, and all of them bashing the Labour panellist. Watching this lot, an alien from outer space might imagine it was the Labour party responsible for yet another huge Commons Brexit defeat last night  
The answer to chaos is not more chaos. Who is seriously looking at these Brexit negotiations and thinking, “I know what will make this easier, trying to negotiate for Scotland to leave the UK at the same time.”?  
If this is accurate fortunately the UK isn’t f**k*d as we have the option to unilaterally revoke #Art50 thanks to #CJEU lifeline obtained by #Scottish parliamentarians. I hope this will be remembered when @scotgov seeks #Section30 order for #indyref2 #Brexit  
Theresa May’s Brexit strategy is in tatters.Her deal has been rejected – twice.You’re out of time, Theresa.#PMQs 
"30% of our food is imported from EU, that's a 29% hike. It will effect ppl's houses etc... This has to go back to the people." #EU #Brexit  
I don't believe they can stop the HoC unilaterally revoking A50, tho. Which I expect it would do at zero hour if extension had already been requested. rather than fall into deal. So I think this is another one for the "Brexiters derail Brexit" chart. 
The relationship between Rees-Mogg and Odey highlights the role of up to 300 hedge fund owners, investors and city traders who actively campaigned for Brexit and cashed in on the result.  
Here’s the fun:Long extension - the far right team up and take down the EU from inside.Revocation - the far right harness the leave vote and become a main party forever and Brexit replays endlessly.No deal - far right seizes control in the power vacuum chaos leaves. 
I can’t speak for others but this is what I voted against. Can any remainers explain why a trading bloc requires a flag, an army, a President & insists on member states resigning their sovereignty? Its time MPs stopped ignoring the referendum result! 
No-deal Brexit still possible even if MPs vote against it, insist ERG 
Now is not the time for another independence referendum - that's the last thing that Scots want.  
This is most important tweet this morning. There is zero chance of Malthouse amendement even being considered as serious by EU27 - rightly so as it shows nothing but bad faith and contempt for all Brexit negotiations @JGForsyth @PickardJE 
Your daily @DealBook Briefing:• A college admissions scandal hits business leaders • Theresa May's Brexit deal is rejected, again• America keeps Boeing's 737 Max 8s aloft 
Watch live as Theresa May faces a grilling from MPs less than 24 hours after suffering a second defeat on her Brexit deal.  Follow #PMQs live here:  
UK gave ‘no warning’ of EUI withdrawalThe president of the European University Institute says he is shocked that the UK has decided to withdraw from the prestigious research centre located just outside the Italian city of Florence. (£) #Brexit  
I’m a proud supporter of a public vote on Brexit. So proud, that I put it on the front of my leaflet which is going out to the 100,000 people this week who live across Balham, Earlsfield, Furzedown and Tooting.  
The tariff plan for a no deal brexit means that most goods will be cheaper for the UK. Consumers will get lower priced goods & more choice. The start point for no-deal brexit. We can negotiate bilateral FTAs from that WTO(+) foundation, worldwide..  
#brexit Look at this halfwit Steve I like showing off Bray. I love shouting and screaming stop brexit all the time. Outside Parliament, yes I’m the one you can hear on news shouting stop brexit all the time. Any cameras around Look me now, look brilliant yes. Shut up  
They are slowly but surely waking from their Brexit comas. Pathetic. If the majority within Parliament had been behind our democratic decision to leave, this would have been done and dusted by now. Project Fear is slowly unravelling. 16 days to go and still no cliff edge.  
It’s the “businessman sitting on a park bench instead of admitting redundancy to his wife” of Brexit. 
And by the way @andywigmore - Salvini is not one of the EU leaders. He can’t veto anything. I know facts are not your strong suit but maybe actually knowing something about the EU would help. Love your work - you really have destroyed Brexit. Thanks.  
I've lived my whole life believing that I live in a DemocracyWhatever the risk of a #NoDealBrexit they are nothing compared with the risk of ending the legitimacy of ParliamentAny MPs who try to delay or cancel Brexit by excluding a #NoDeal betray our democracy, and the country 
“There certainly has been a monumental failure. I don’t think it’s the fault of the Eurosceptics, we’ve been very clear on what we want to do and how to do it. The political class is trying to deliver as little Brexit as possible” @SteveBakerHW#StandUp4Brexit #PoliticsLive 
"If the Moggists are not interested in Brexit it is not obvious why the rest of us should be interested in it either." As ever, @alexmassie hits the nail on the head. 
Scottish First Minister @NicolaSturgeon says any delay to Article 50 process must be long enough to allow for a second Brexit referendum. "A short extension that simply continues the deadlock and puts the cliff edge a little further down the line is not good enough." 
I'd laugh if I wasn't overwhelmed by despair at this whole sorry shit show. #Brexit #StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/ktSPWZP64F 
Why do Brexiters hate the European Union so much? James O'Brien debunked all their arguments one-by-one.@mrjamesob | #Brexit 
Leavers take the stance that neither Russian interference nor crime affected the referendum result, which I think really means that they don't give a damn whether the referendum was won by foul means, and that means they don't give a damn about democracy. 
A disgusting & repugnant lowlife, & a disgrace to this country. Are we going to let liars, crooks, charlatans & criminals, like Farage, take control of this country and lead it to catastrophe? I don't think so! This SHALL NOT PASS #StopBrexit #BrexitVote #BrexitDeeal #Brexit 
I've lived my whole life believing that I live in a DemocracyWhatever the risk of a #NoDealBrexit they are nothing compared with the risk of ending the legitimacy of ParliamentAny MPs who try to delay or cancel Brexit by excluding a #NoDeal betray our democracy, and the country 
Since no deal will be off the table, Corbyn needs to follow the will of the majority of his party and the country in accepting that the only way out of the #Brexit disaster is a #peoplesvote. His dithering shows why he could never be PM. 
Always lovely to talk to @AnnaMcMorrin MP for Cardiff North. She was adamant that we need to rule out a no-deal Brexit which we all know would seriously harm all of our communities & businesses in Wales.  @Cardiff4EU #Malthouse 
Not sure there'd be consensus in Parliament, but he can't stop UK revoking Art 50. Ironic if all the right's efforts led to no Brexit at all. 
NIGEL: European Council should veto Article 50 extension. WTO Brexit on 29th March!  
Until yesterday, I'd have disagreed, on the basis that the referendum had to be respected. But yesterday it WAS respected. Brexit-supporting MPs were given their chance to vote for Brexit. They rejected it. They had their chance & blew it. So screw them.  
"It has become a commonplace that Brexit has consumed all the energy and intellectual bandwidth of Whitehall..." 
WATCH: Frans Timmermans lays into Nigel Farage and Boris Johnson /#EU #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Remainers beware.'Malthouse B' is a way for Brexiters to push through no-deal Brexit and be able to blame the EU.Malthouse B 'solves' the NI border problem by using 'technology' to avoid a hard border.But this technology DOES NOT EXIST and has already been rejected by the EU. 
Here’s @theSNP amendment for today. Squarely putting revocation of #Art50 on the table in the face of @theresa_may sophistry. Wouldn’t have been possible without the #CJEU ruling obtained by #ScottishSix, @JolyonMaugham & @GoodLawProject & supporters #Brexit  
Hi I know there is a lot going on rn with #Brexit etc but I just need you all to know that I just had a really lovely satsuma. Thank you for your time. xoxo 
We were promised the result would be honoured. MPs have taken it upon themselves to hijack Brexit for their own means. There are MPs openly sneering at the 17.4 million British citizens who want out. Never can the UK be called a democracy again if Brexit doesn't materialise. 
Interesting piece from @DrGerardLyons, a leading Brexiteer economist, in @thetimes this week on the role low tariffs would play in UK after Brexit  
Wonder why @heidiallen75 tweet begging @guyverhofstadt to help her plot to block Brexit now unavailable. Surely it’s the IG “new politics”? 
It's deliverable if you have covered Brexit by never talking to anyone outside Westminster.  
Saw this poster for the #PutItToThePeople March by @peoplesvote_uk at Oxford Circus Station.Following last nights historic defeat (again) of the Government’s Brexit deal, it’s time to put the decision back to the people.Come along next Saturday -  
Look around the conservative world ... here in Australia we have the LNP doubling the national debt and 3 PMs in 5 years , in England the Tories and the Brexit crisis  and America  the Republicans and the Trump chaos ...we really need progressive governments back in charge. 
“We were yearning to find a way to vote for the deal…I am not in the habit of lying, I am in the habit of speaking the truth as I understand it” Conservative Steve Baker @SteveBakerHW on ERG view of PM's #Brexit deal#PoliticsLive  
brexit soop  
First draft: Dear Sophie, Thank you for your letter, but leaving a rules-based organisation based on a balance of benefits and obligations cannot - I repeat cannot - be without consequences. The brutal truth is Brexit will be a loss for all of us. Nice unicorn though. Donald.  
Theresa May lied.The Conservative Party lied.Labour always lie.Corbyn couldn't lie straight in bed ffs.UK media are paid to lie.But....we MUST believe they are doing right by UK voters over #Brexit  
The British establishment would do well to remember the Eurosceptic scene is a close-knit group across the continent and on the rise - some are now in power!If our politicians betray Brexit and vote for delay, @MatteoSalviniMI can defend the 17.4 million and veto!  
The squalid self-indulgence of the Tory Brexit Taliban today is one of the vilest manifestations of political irrelevance to a country's 's real-world problems you will ever see. These people are, in a very real sense, dirt to be scraped out of public life at all costs. 
I will vote to keep no deal on the table tonight. Having worked in business and the law, I believe the ability to walk away from a negotiation is vital - removing it undermines your position and makes it more likely that you end up with a worse deal or no deal at all.#Brexit 
Last night's Holby, which was dropped for the Brexit vote, will be shown next week. There will be two episodes of the popular drama: Tues 19 March and Wed 20 March at 8pm (Scot: Tues 11.05pm) #HolbyCity 
Julie Burchill today, voting for Brexit was a revolutionary act...  
If parliament scraps the March 29th Leaving date this week then parliament will have betrayed the people betrayed #Brexit and betrayed democracy. There will be consequences and they will disrupt and destroy the existing political settlement. 
Yeah, let's get rid of this party of racists, who are paralysed by in-fighting and have no idea what to do about Brexit and get a new government that…oh.  
A timely reminder to all Scottish MPs of what food and drink - one of Scotland’s most successful economic sectors – stands to lose from a no deal #Brexit.  It’s why tonight it must be taken off the table.  
MSM desperate to blame Jeremy Corbyn as much as Theresa May for Tory #Brexit shambles. Which is clearly bollocks. May called snap GE. May lost her majority. May gave DUP disproportionate power. May set impossible red lines. This is 100% down to May and the Tories. #PoliticsLive 
Excellent amendment which I hope the whole House will support. It reminds the House that we do have the option to revoke. It is revocation that is line with how the Scottish people voted in the EU referendum. We wanted nothing to do with their Brexit and rejected it explicitly.  
Tory MP's who are voting against brexit are doing so in the belief that people will not vote against them if it means a labour government. If the government we have is anything to go by I would have an African government before another tory one. Punish traitors. 
No the place of the UK has never been and will never be in the EU. Although I’ve no doubt our current government & much of Parliament also hope one day to bring the UK back in; this is why they have done everything they can to sabotage Brexit and keep us as close as possible.  
Plaid Cymru will be voting against a no deal Brexit tonight. We have also tabled an amendment which calls on the UK Government to honour the will of the National Assembly for Wales and Scottish Parliament and extend #Article50 and move to a #PeoplesVote.#BrexitVote 
Brexit has embarrassed our country. It's time to let Theresa May know you won't take this anymore.Join our march to stop Brexit  
No policy since the dawn of civilisation has been given more time - and more money - to try to get it to work than Brexit. Enough is enough. Brextemists whining now about wanting a 'Plan B Brexit amendment,' but, needless to say, they can't define what it is. Enough is enough.  
"It's crazy to disable yourself as you go into a negotiation, why would you shoot yourself in the foot?"Boris Johnson urges MPs to back no-deal in tonight's vote#Brexit latest:  
“This fiasco cannot go on - is absolutely clear that there must be an extension to article 50 to allow the public to vote again.”@drewhendrySNP demands a #PeoplesVote on the #brexit deal:  
Reality check.This govt accepts there are likely to be food and medicine shortages in the event of a No Deal #Brexit.This govt is also refusing to whip against No Deal.This govt is effectively saying it has no position on whether food and medicine shortages are a bad thing. 
#Brexit Secretary Mike Russell (@Feorlean) under fire for suggesting Scottish Tories are traitors 
A little update on what’s happening as we enter another chaotic day in Westminster #Brexit  
Rapist filmed sex attack on drunken unconscious studentWhy waste £45k a year in our Prisons. Deport him No Re-Admittance. When we get NO Deal Brexit, let’s clear our overcrowded prison back to their countries!  
'Farage’s narrative of “betrayal” pre-supposes Brexit was never given a chance. The truth is Westminster has been fixated with little else for almost three years and it has pushed other vital issues such as the NHS, housing and policing down the agenda.' 
As you know I'm not one for moaning! But we all know all this Brexit bollicks was unnecessary. Its all been a con from start to finish instigated by may and her remainder cronies. They have no intention of no deal and its never really been on the table. WERE BEING PLAYED PEOPLE!! 
Analysis: Brexit may no longer mean Brexit  
Labour’s Brexit plan is absolute shite. Please can we stop pretending like it’s not just because there’s a bunch of red roses around it. smh 
As the consequences and the realities of Brexit come home to roost, will its instigators, who ran away after the vote, do the same again or will they simple blame the big bad EU as they've always done?  
I'm as exhausted as May's Deal! I hope we can finally put an end to the #Brexit nightmare so we can all get some sleep! #PeoplesVote #ExitfromBrexit 
Obviously highly unscientific but I reckon there's a good mix of both sides who follow me. So, knowing what you know now, would you vote...#BrexitVote #Brexit 
The Malthouse compromise is little more than a delusional Tory plot, presenting an unworkable plan already rejected by the EU. The fact that May is letting ministers vote for this is just another example of who holds power in the Govt, not May but backbenchers hell bent on Brexit  
Remainers are odd. "There isn't a majority for May's deal so let's revoke Article 50/call for a Loser's Vote!"Errr...There isn't a majority for revoking Article 50 or calling a 2nd referendum either, but do carry on . 
16 days before the UK is due to leave the EU and the House of Commons is to vote on a completely new Brexit strategy which the EU has said - since 2016 and as recently as this morning - it can't accept. But yes, apart from that, all fine. 
We voted to leave the EU. Parliament voted for Article 50 and the EU (Withdrawal) Act, which committed the UK to leaving the EU on 29th March 2019, with or without a deal. We’ve had 3 years to prepare. The EU is ready for a no deal Brexit. Just leave..  
It really is staggering MPs deciding what sort of Brexit we're allowed.  It's as if they aren't aware we had a referendum and Leave won. 
“As it stands as it stands at the moment, my own personal view as I've said over and over again that we have to respect the referendum, we have to leave. I would prefer to leave with the deal, but if we have to leave without it, then so be it” @JamesCleverly#StandUp4Brexit 
May can't take back control for herself never mind Britain when a Cabinet backlash forcers her to allow Tories to vote how they like on the "Malthouse amendment" asking our European partners for a 2022 no deal Brexit 
Watch.A GERMAN MEP says Brexit is a disaster for the EU - because Britain is their biggest export market! The equivalent of 19 countries leaving at once in fact, so he wants the EU to engineer a second referendum!!  
I was thinking about David Cameron telling colleagues in private before referendum that a vote for Brexit would involve 3 years of and found this Jason Groves tweet from 21 June 2016  
Because I'm on a long train journey next to a manspreading guy with BO, and because Brexit Block is totally a Thing, and because the list of Things That Suck For Writers is growing by the day, let's have an early #TenTweets on WHY WE SHOULD KEEP WRITING. #TenReasonsToKeepWriting 
Tariffs to be slashed on many imports from outside the EU in no-deal Brexit  This is a huge opportunity to support developing countries and help lift them out of poverty. MPs who think this is a noble aim should vote to keep ‘no deal’ on the table today. 
I have also spoken to multiple EU27 officials & diplomats. Leaders have different views, but as one diplomat notes, throughout the Brexit process the leaders, if anything, have taken a tougher stance than the EU 
Significant because it is a standstill agreement to leave the EU without a deal on 29 March and keep EU regulations unchanged for 21 months while UK negotiates a trade deal.Put another way it is effectively a 'pay as you go' Brexit - with no EU permissions sought or required. 
If anyone wants to know why supposed “Brexit extremists” are so opposed to this Withdrawal Agreement it’s because having read it and the usual language that it deploys, it is apparent that it is just like Maastricht, Lisbon et al. Full of nasties cloaked in opaque language. 
Whatever your thoughts on Brexit, surely we can all agree that the arguements we heard during the referendum campaign are not the issues we've been wrestling with for the last 12-18 months. We've *all* been misled about what it meant.What an utter mess... 
Our Chair Dr Samantha Batt-Rawden @sbattrawden being interviewed by @StaceyPooleITV for @itvnews about the dangers of a no-deal Brexit for the NHS ahead of today’s vote. We are unequivocal that a no-deal Brexit will have serious ramifications for our NHS #Brexit #NHS #DoNoHarm 
1) an extension beyond May is legally complicated2) a long extension risks providing the UK with better terms than transition & damage functioning of EU3) an election or a referendum would solve little4) multiple short extensions would be the worst case scenario 
Dear @Conservatives MPs, are you reading the replies to @annietrev ‘s tweet!! OVERWHELMING support for Anne-Marie’s decision! We need you to vote FOR No Deal and AGAINST extending Article 50 to honour the referendum result to Leave the EU.  
“Good luck... whatever you finally decide dear friends...” — This from Merkel’s fixer-in-chief @peteraltmaier  who is clearly hoping it won’t come to a No-Deal Brexit.  
I’ll be supporting Nigel Farage with everything I’ve got if they stop BrexitThat’s not me saying I’m anyone or have any influence, but an indication of how people like me  will abandon main parties they’ve supported for decades.Price to pay for democratic votes being ignored 
Very strange how Aberdeen South MP Ross Thomson has failed to tweet a single tweet on Brexit in the past few days. It was constant from him at one point. The most vocal Brexiteer in Scottish politics has went rather quiet. What is he up to? 
Here's what we and some other #Brexit organisations sent to all MPs prior to the vote on the constitutional abomination that was Mrs May's Withdrawal Agreement.  Read it here: #GoWTO 
The only way to 'get it all over with' is to #StopBrexit! It is time to address the causes of Brexit: austerity; poverty; inequality; underfunding of the NHS; education and the  over-reachintg influence of billionaire media moguls. Let's wake up and deal with the real issues!!!  
If we do get a #PeoplesVote, we need to ensure that EU Nationals living in the UK and all UK nationals living in the EU get an opportunity to vote. Furthermore, 16 - 17 year olds should be able to vote as they were in the Scottish referendum. These are the people most affected. 
The Brexiteers' true quarrel is with reality, not Theresa May. My piece on how Brexit is defeating itself.  
“You can't go on with a situation where people who want Brexit keep voting against it.”Former PM David Cameron, who called the EU referendum in 2016, encourages MPs to “rule out no deal - that would be a disaster for our country - and to seek an extension [to Article 50].”  
Will the real @thatginamiller stand up - Gina Miller on #Brexit & ending the chaos | Unfiltered with @mrjamesob  James O'Brien...  via @YouTube 
It is exasperating that a PM would launch a referendum in 2016 without a clue of what he was doing, and the risks and consequences of the UK, and sail off into the sunset while the international standing and economic strength of UK are undermined by huge self-inflicted wound.  
Brexit sorted  
EU parliament chiefs welcome Jeremy Corbyn’s new Brexit plans | The IndependentWe’ve known this for a while now.The EU welcome ⁦@UKLabour⁩’s Brexit Policies.That is why we need a #GeneralElectionNow  
Excellent. We need May gone and for the Tories to split to the extent that reasonable Tory MPs become willing to ally with Remainer MPs in the Commons.#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
.@NicolaSturgeon has told Theresa May that #Brexit should be delayed long enough to hold a second EU referendum. 
HIGNFY repeats from before Brexit are revealing. Everything was so genteel & simple. The fact that the country was facing widespread hunger & expanding foodbanks, ravaged by austerity & the population already simmering with resentment, anger & desperation totally passing them by. 
How will Brexit affect health services in the UK? #Brexit will cause significant harm to the #NHS, but No-Deal Brexit presents by far the worst option @Nickf72 @martinmckee @TamaraHervey @scottlgreer @davidstuckler  
The latest figures provide hope that the UK economy is growing despite #Brexit uncertainty  
NEW: The EU thinks that delaying Brexit makes sense only in three scenarios:1) prepare for no deal2) to ratify the withdrawal agreement3) politics: an election or referendum 
"Those people who want Brexit; I can't' believe they keep voting against it": David Cameron on Sky News  
Also told that there sense from some that the fear of No Brexit will push Brexiteers to backing May given belief in camp Remain the PM is now against No Deal. “That’s progress” says one senior source 
Petition to make all discussion of #Brexit, & the word itself, illegal once this cluster**** is over. Anyone else? 
PREVIOUSLY ON BREXIT:"Will you agree to my deal?""Nope."(two months later)"What about this deal?""...that's the same deal.""Well, yes, but I put a smiley face sticker on it." 
One thing this Brexit business has done is destroy any sense that media commentators are impartial. Most are contemptuous of the decision of the people and make no attempt to hide it. @Peston, @jonsnowC4, @adamboultonSKY and @maitlis are the worst offenders. Shameful bias. 
I suggest these journalists have played a huge part in the #Brexit calamity the UK finds itself in, as they have allowed this @conservatives govt to control what’s aired, regardless of facts & evidence on lots of stories@SkyNews @BBCNews #PoliticsLive #PMQs #r4today #Newsnight 
Mr Timmermans, usually a calm moderate by Commission standards, is rattled and has lost the plot in the Brexit debate. Very poor today. 
"Which do you feel is main reason most MPs who support a delay do so?"Want to stop Brexit 55%Want Brexit to go ahead but want time to secure a deal 25%Don't know 20%77% Leavers break "they want to stop Brexit" (Remainers 39%)YouGov Mar 11 
For anyone who's not thoroughly fed up with the topic of Brexit and the WTO• The WTO as a weapon of war• What it means to trade on WTO terms• How the impact is not spread evenly• That magical GATT Article 24With walk-on bit parts from a handful of Brexit celebrities  
@MichelBarnier said this morning, the next phase of negotiations could take four years!More UK £billions to EU.4 years more subterfuge.Stagnation on the domestic front!Enough already!No deal Brexit on WTO terms!The UK electorate are way ahead of the political class! 
BREXIT FACTSSource: Professor of EU law1) Todays "Take No Deal off the Table" vote is meaningless. It is enshrined, together with the leave by date of the 29th March 2019 in the Article 50 Withdrawal Act.1/ 
Watch Nigel Farage, today, passionately addressing the EU Parliament, talking Brexit, £39 billion and the United States of Europe.  
We may be back sooner than you think. Different faces, the Britain the Brexit government tried to make invisible. Now UK & all in EU have to face the attack on democracy from Kremlin & assorted bad players. We need Mueller-type inquiries & reform. A cyclical down-turn coming 
The Scum and Daily Heil finally turn on Theresa May over her self-inflicted #Brexit fiasco. Only joking! They're blaming Jeremy Corbyn, obviously.  via @zelo_street 
#Brexit: MPs reject Theresa May's deal for a second time  
More than half the country think MPs trying to delay Brexit want to stop it, including 75% of Tory voters*.The public know exactly what MPs are up to. A vote to delay Brexit is a vote to betray it. *YouGov survey of 2,089 people, 10th-11th March 2019  
Would you give an extension Guy if we secure a second referendum please? 
Bad optics for May in that her deal lost in a landslide, but is this the result she actually wanted?  Negotiate a deal so unpalatable it loses, then push for an extension on the exit date?  That feels like the first step in killing BRExit altogether. 1/2  
Brexit shows us that popular mass opinion can be terribly naive and ignorant of consequences.  
The leverage of leaving without a deal has been a central element of the government's Brexit policy from the very beginning, and was a key promise of the 2017 election.MPs who vote to take 'no deal' off the table are voting to scupper Brexit and undermine trust in politics.  
"I thought I'd better stockpile, to make sure that we've got something to eat on March 30th."This British vegan is stockpiling Oatly ahead of #Brexit  
 “The Brexit Shambles, as told by JOE” 
Go WTO: Senior Leaver Calls for Clean Brexit, Govt to Slash Tariffs in No Deal  
We're busy promoting the #PutItToThePeople march to encourage people to march to Parliament to demand a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit You can help too! Download materials to help promote the march in your local community 
The ONLY rationale for extension is a referendum on Mays deal versus Remain 
Nicola Sturgeon: Brexit fallout means the case for independence has “never been stronger”  
Cabinet's spectacular dust up this morning over whipping tonight's No Deal amendments reveals the huge danger of giving free votes. Now the PM has let the genie out of the bottle on Brexit end game, she may never put it back in again. This is what happened to Cameron. 
As Ken Clarke remarked recently on the BBC’s Sunday Politics, once we are in the Transition phase Gibraltar will “make the Irish problem look like a picnic”. Spain will have a veto. Another case of #Brexit robbing the UK of power and control.#PeoplesVote 
Absolutely do not support this ammendment!! It keeps us in the EU until 2021 and we pay £59bn. We will not have control of trade deals and Brussels still makes our laws. It's a trap to stop "no deal" Brexit which they know, cannot be legally stopped!! 
"We cannot continue to be spectators in this process. We need to start working out how to defend Brexit, to defend our vote, ourselves – because the last 24 hours have made it all the more clear that no one in Westminster can do it for us." Me on #Brexit  
To people who say: "This is the first time I've voted in my life and if you stop Brexit I'll never vote again" I say GOOD.If you are 40, 50, 60 or 70 and you have never cared about your society enough to vote then screw you. You can't do f*ck all and then demand a unicorn  
This charlatan and his cronies should not receive apenny of pensions when the 39 billion are not paid..... not a penny. Let's see how they like it. 
@NicolaSturgeon - "I've had several convos with PM. I've given her suggestions/compromise.. She's practically ignored everything. #Brexit  
So it looks as if there may well be a third meaningful vote. Why do the MPs get to keep on voting on Brexit, but the public don't? Help to right this wrong by telling your MP you want a final say at  
Nicola Sturgeon says the SNP will be voting against no-deal Brexit and in favour of an extension of Article 50Follow all the latest #Brexit news here:  
The solution to avoid hordes of new Brexit Party MEPs being elected is for the European Council to veto any extension of Article 50 and ensure we leave on March 29.  
17.4 million people didn't vote for the EU to decide if and how we left.If no deal is taken off the table tonight the EU will hold us to ransom.The Brexit vote is more than just about leaving the EU now.It's about the people's right to have a vote that counts. 
In the run-up to tonight’s vote, it’s worth circulating this again. MPs, please take a read.  A No Deal #Brexit would be disastrous for farming, food and drink. It will cost our industry in Scotland £2BN based on the UK Govt’s own assessment. Reject it tonight.  
Let’s ensure there’s a crystal clear message that MPs reject a crash-out no-deal #Brexit Cross-Party effort today including all @TheIndGroup MPs to delete the Prime Minister’s caveats and game-playing. #timetodecide 
I will vote to keep ‘No-Deal’ on the table today, and will vote against extending Article 50 – and delaying Brexit - tomorrow. We just need to get on with it. @BrexitCentral @StandUp4Brexit 
Nicola Sturgeon says Theresa May's "whole government" would be out of office if the "conventional rules of politics" were applying right nowFollow all the latest #Brexit news here:  
.@NicolaSturgeon on #Brexit #indyref2:"My priority has been trying as FM to protect Scotland as much as possible, but if Scotland is to be taken out of the EU against its will, there is a mandate in Scotland won at 2 elections now to give people the choice of indy." @Skynews 1/2 
On Friday, it will be 2 weeks until Brexit. So what will the House of Commons be discussing? Nothing. That's right, nothing. They're persisting with their three-day weekend a fortnight before the most catastrophic day in UK peacetime history. Huge abdication of responsibility. 
Not choosing to whip on these crucial votes and amendments is tantamount to saying that the executive has completely surrendered Brexit to the legislature. Power has decisively moved. 
Lots of noise that May will bring her deal back for a THIRD vote. She's a glutton for punishment! Faisal Islam says doing so risks "turning widespread mistrust in the govt, into outright anger" & claims a "No Confidence motion can't be far off." #Brexit 
Just a gentle reminder to the Corbynista. Brexit is no longer a negotiation. We’ve negotiated. So Labour choices are1 Revoke Art50 2 Extend Art50 not for 3 months as suggested but for a minimum of 12 to 24 months 3 Except : EEA EFTA or Norway plus 4 Remain 5 No deal 
Better than a thousand words. #brexit  
Lord Heseltine - The defeat yesterday has opened up a number of opportunities that could lead to a 2nd referendum & a reversal of the disastrous brexit decision... we made a step in the right direction yesterday.#VictoriaLIVE #PMQs #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Scottish First Minister Nicola Sturgeon says Theresa May has "ignored practically everything that has been said to her" when she's asked for consultations. The First Minister also calls MPs to vote for an extension of Article 50 and a second referendum  
And all the social issues that caused brexit have just been allowed to fester for the past 2 years while all the time and effort and money wasted on this shambles 
Also in the European Parliament this morning @duponline MEP @DianeDoddsMEP calling for ring-fencing of #citizensrights of EU citizens in the UK & @BritishInEurope in line with what has been agreed in the House of Commons in case of no-deal Brexit.  
ANDREW PIERCE: How Geoffrey Cox sank the prime minister's Brexit deal   via @MailOnline 
Today I’ll do everything in my power to stop a no deal Brexit. Prime Minister’s motion allows her failed deal to be brought back again & that’s not acceptable. I’ll support amendments which are unequivocal that no deal is off the table & must be avoided by extension of Article 50 
I have always said #Brexit is also a failure of the European Union. The place of the United Kingdom is in the European Union. I am sure a younger generation will one day take another decision and bring Britain back into the European family. #EPlenary 
1. Request an extension for a ratify vs remain referendum. They are the only 2 options that actually exist, and that are non-catastrophic. I don’t see EU27 agreeing to an extension only for No Deal or a new request for renegotiation to still be a possibility. 5/ 
Again & again we talk about #Brexit at the European Council. While we should be talking about #China, trade with the #US, #security & #migration. Instead, we only talk about uncertainty in the #UK. Our leaders should be discussing the future of Europe, and of our peoples. 3/3 
The #Brexit vote yesterday was a disaster! Entire generations, especially young people, will suffer from this failure to deliver by the political class in London. They will not have the same opportunities and benefits that their parents had. This is wrong. 1/3  
I love how some people are excited by a no deal Brexit because they nostalgically think we’ll get to dig for victory again. If you want to live off potatoes and rabbits so much get an allotment you mad fucker. 
No-deal is nothing to be scared of – it’s just Brexit with many mini-deals  
Britain should not take part in EU elections in any circumstances, whether in May or at a later date with a longer extension, says @guyverhofstadt “European elections will be hijacked by Brexiteers and Brexit issue." 
Speak for yourself. Why does Emily Maitlis blame Jeremy Corbyn's Labour for this 100% Tory-owned #Brexit shambles? It's a complete mystery.  
MPs who vote to delay Brexit are simply voting not to Leave, and breaking their own election promises to their voters.  
UK tariff plans, and Northern Ireland border plans, are simply not sustainable. Most likely that one of the big losers from a no-deal Brexit will be the DUP, who find that Northern Ireland has to be treated differently after all  
A periodic reminder that this book will be publishing in June and that it’s 100% Brexit-free.  
MUST-WATCH: Lord Heseltine nails exactly why we need to put Brexit back to the people on #r4Today. Please RT & sign up to march on 23.03.19:  
I've voted @UKLabour in five of the last six GEs, including 2017.But I'm simply not voting for Brexiteer @jeremycorbyn under any circumstances. And if he enables Brexit, then I will never vote Labour ever again. 
Nigel Farage has just come out of the first EU Parliament session since last night's Brexit vote. Here is his immediate reaction.@Nigel_Farage | #Brexit  
Taking #NoDeal off the table is madness.EU will then just offer the worst deal possible & we'd have to accept.Those MPs who want to ditch #NoDeal really want to ditch #Brexit but aren't honest enough to tell us.We need to stay strong & EU will buckle. 
It is, to coin a phrase, this deal, no deal, or no Brexit.As Parliament has rejected this deal emphatically, and will, I think, reject No Deal (even more) emphatically today, that leaves limited options.4/ 
“I’m against any extension if it is not based on any clear opinion of the House of Commons for something” says @guyverhofstadt in European Parliament. The parliament has no say on whether  grants  #Brexit extension but views here reflect thinking of  leaders who do have say  
“As economics, Osborne’s cuts were always going to be a failure; as class war, however, they were a triumph. Until, that is, the Brexit vote came along and the victims of Osbornomics got a chance to take their revenge”Great piece by @chakrabortty 
#brexit If you voted #leave, please please please tune into @LBC & listen to @mrjamesob this morning.  As close to clarity on the situation that you will get on any media slot 
#BrexitCatGIFs: The Morning AfterBrexiteers had #Brexit right in front them last night but didn't know what to do. Now they are shouting at everyone else for their own mess!  
I’ve been looking through social media & the absolute anger & rage (in words) felt towards the bad deal that’s been force fed to parliament & which looks to be heading for no brexit at all has got a cross section of voters very very angry, I’ve never seen such venom towards MP’s  
If it burns down his whole garage too, I think it might certainly encourage him to offer a reasonable price. Ppl who think EU would be nice if we just rolled over have clearly not paid any attention, whatsoever, to how the EU operates. Ask the Greeks. #brexit  
BREAKING: Queen sacks entire government over Brexit mess.“What a bunch of useless cunts,” she told reporters pic.twitter.com/LZ0Uj8jPtp 
The Tories have dragged us in to the biggest constitutional crisis in modern peacetime history with their internal arguments, yet we still have a number of commentators blaming Jeremy Corbyn for Theresa May’s Brexit disaster. I wonder if they realise how silly they look? 
Tonight British MPs will vote on whether the UK should leave the EU without a Brexit deal. Here's 60 seconds on why it matters for human rights...  
16 days to #Brexit, but this current govt has no intention of seeing the job through.UK is governed by corruption & incompetence, who simply cannot bear the thought of accountability to UK voters.Previously a massive @Conservatives supporter, the party literally disgusts me now 
There are 314 Conservative MPs at Westminster.Last night 75 of them voted AGAINST May's appalling Brexit in Name Only deal. But 239 of them voted for it in the full knowledge it keeps us IN the EU. Conclusion? The Conservative Party has betrayed the people and MUST fall. 
The government's no-deal Brexit tariffs are 'madness', say British businesses  
.@NicolaSturgeon on @SkyNews:“Parliament has failed... and it (leaving/staying in the EU) must go back to the people.”  The PM has “indulged the Brexit extremists long enough.” It’s time for some common sense. #Brexit 
Theresa May put the Conservatives' top team on Brexit...the top team... #BrexitShambles 
The FT View: Theresa May's Brexit deal is dead after two years of torturous negotiations – and now it's up to the rest of parliament to stabilise the political situation  
Brexit has shown up the Establishment as a bunch of small-minded, mediocre bullies, who would rather defy democracy itself than risk any adjustment to their own sense of entitlement:  
*Brexit Explained*  Pic via > @w41gy 
‘I think we need a new prime minister and a general election’Brexiteer @ABridgen explains why he voted against her #Brexit deal last night 
Millionaire pro #brexit journalist @afneil makes jokes about stockpiling.It’s all a big piece of fun for you. Not for my house-bound father who takes 14 types of medication & is extremely anxious if he can get hold of the medicine with no deal.I’ll neve forgive these people. 
Imagine if Scotland hadn’t voted in those Tory MPs. Corbyn would be PM,  SNP would be in the position of the DUP.  We’d have Corbyn’s softer Brexit prob with Scotland getting control of immigration. Scotland really did shoot herself in the foot by electing Tories 
The Minister for BEIS has admitted that #Brexit could result in thousands of job losses & that a no-deal, or “harder” Brexit would be disastrous for industries!No-deal must be ruled out. End the Brexit uncertainty with a #PeoplesVote & the chance to #ExitfromBrexit. 
The opportunities with a clean break and a WTO Brexit are obvious as we'd actually be taking back control. Unfortunately, we have a Parliament full of remainers determined to block this.  #WTOBrexitNOW 
‘We should stop treating a #Brexit result from three years ago as sacrosanct’Lord Heseltine says a second referendum could produce a different result 
hate to get political but a rap battle would settle brexit 
I love this speech from @Steven_Woolfe, powerfully sums up what the fight for Brexit is all about. We must not sacrifice our democracy to Brussels  
Something Cambridge Analytica and AIQ know well: it is hard to completely reverse someone's view, but you can suppress turnout or boost it by skillfully pushing someone's apathy button or the one labelled "angry".If there is another referendum my plan is this:Continued.... 
Dear #Remain MPs who know #Brexit's an endless pile of ordure but are cowed by theRESPECT THE REF BSRespond:I respect votersI CAN'T RESPECT A REF based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o ConsentNon-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 
Live from EU parliament Evans “we need an extension to Article 50. We need a People’s Vote”Anderson “who would sit on a train that was about to crash. Irish Unity is the only solution. We need a referendum on Irish Unity” No one knows WHAT they want in here.  
The probability of (a) extending Article 50, (b) a soft Brexit, (c) a second referendum, and (d) no Brexit at all have all risen ... but so too has the probability of a fresh populist revolt. Brexit was supposed to squash populist Euroscepticism. That now looks very unlikely. 
Ian Paisley is lingering in the corner of the Newsnight outdoor studio like the fucking Ghost of Christmas Past.#newsnight #brexit pic.twitter.com/ZYTyDDa2Ed 
An angry listener told Boris Johnson: "It is catastrophic the humiliation you've caused in this country with your lies in the Leave campaign."@NickFerrariLBC | #Brexit 
‘It would be very entertaining if it wasn’t so serious’Ken Clarke says he’s never known anything like the #Brexit ‘shambles’ in his entire political career. 
Brexit happens on the 29th March. The Porn Ban begins on 1st April. The gap between shall forever be known as the Great British Freedom Wank Weekend. Godspeed you nation of reckless fools 
Watch @Nigel_Farage leave another #Brexit debate after he himself spoke (and recorded his YouTube video). This so-called leader of the Brexiteers never attends a full debate, never comes up with solutions and puts the future of ordinary citizens at risk #fail 
Can the House vote to bring back Firefly and just pretend that Brexit never happened? 
"The risk of no-deal has never been higher" - EU chief Brexit negotiator, Michel Barnier tells the European Parliament.  
I literally wrote the Brexit cookbook and now seems like a good time to just...mention it. 
I’m just puzzled @JohnnyMercerUK why it is okay for Conservative MPs to change their minds and have a series of Brexit votes and yet you persist in not allowing the British people to change their minds and vote again. It is profoundly undemocratic. Unforgivable.  
Every morning I wake up with a sinking feeling about Brexit. But this morning I woke up thinking: By god was Anna Soubry unscripted?Quite a few heros in the historic 12 March parliamentary debate. Joint top perhaps @IanBlackfordMP @Anna_Soubry but to many others. 
Is our MPs real concern over a WTO Brexit just that us Plebs might enjoy a decent standard of living? 
When this Brexit farce is over maybe the Government will take these figures seriously and look at how we should nurture and educate creativity at a young age in schools… instead of concentrating on STEM subjects so heavily  
An amendment to block a no-deal must stipulate that before exit day, whether that is on March 29 or later due to an extension, there must either be an agreed WA or the PM must revoke Article 50 within 24 hours. Nothing less will suffice to block a no-deal.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
I mean, honestly, the gall of the key petetrators of the Brexit fantasies that have divided and split this country for the foreseeable future to weigh in like philosopher kings never ceases to astound me.  
Calling all MP’s vote for No-Deal Brexit today for your constituents.If you don’t then you are truly going against the British people and democracy.You have not consulted any your constituency to see their views.We will ask for you lot to resign and call for you to be sack! 
Confused about what happens next with Brexit? The latest Private Eye makes everything clear. In shops now, or subscribe to never miss an issue:  
Tonight, @Theresa_May will show to the world, yet again, what a liar she really is.She has spent the last couple of years telling us, “No Deal is better than a bad deal”.Her deal is a bad deal.But tonight she will vote against a “No Deal” option for Brexit. A total fraud. 
voting against No Deal come what may opens the door to an even worse deal being imposed on the UK - one that takes our money in perpetuity and dashes any hope of regulatory independence.anyone who votes against the prospect of No Deal is simply voting against Brexit. 
Pathetic.. Somewhat predictably, Brexiteers like Nigel Evans are now blaming everybody for the mess THEY have caused. #EU #Brexit  
Brexit and Bad Faith - My long article on the Chagos Islands sat unfinished yesterday, despite my passion for the subject, as I was horribly fascinated by the Gothic twists and turns of the Brexit debates in the House of Commons. I seldom write on the  
‘We’ simply have changed our minds because whatever version of Brexit that was promoted by @Nigel_Farage is miles away from the reality. This is all the fault of the Brexiters who over promised and under delivered. 
Worth reminding ourselves again:408 constituencies voted leave242 voted remainYet around 500 MPs are fighting for No Brexit/BRINOAnd only 150 are fighting for proper BrexitThis isn't "parliamentary democracy" this is parliament ignoring the democratic will of the people 
The Prime Minister of the UK prepares to vote to stop Brexit. The mask has been removed. She voted Remain in 2016 and she has spent almost three years sucking the joy out of Brexit. Now she prepares to hammer the final nail in its coffin. Sickening.  
Once more. It is perfectly legitimate to end all this unforgivable chaos by revoking A50. The referendum was advisory, the result criminally procured, there was foreign interference. The government has tried to respect the result, but all options harm the country.#RevokeA50 
“We will remain respectful, calm, determined and united until the end of this extraordinary negotiation. We shall defend the Union’s interests and all our citizens.”@MichelBarnier in #EPlenary about #Brexit  
Resign, Prime Minister @theresa_may - you've reduced this country to a global laughing stock. Do the honourable thing & let someone else now try to fix this hideous Brexit mess. 
When is the real Brexit deadline? #Brexit #ChinaDailyCartoon 
Welcome to the latest brexit Hot Take: "We'll survive no deal. We have plenty of rabbits."  
"You pushed your luck too far," Nigel Farage tells Michel Barnier and calls for the EU to reject any request to delay Brexit  
The Tory started Brexit is almost deadThe stake sticking out of its chestJust requires the final hammer blow from @UKLabourWhy won't @jeremycorbyn deliver the coup de grace?Instead he seems on set resurrecting it in its labour lexit form which as we know is badly flawed 
The role of a practical politician is to take something the public wants and to convert it into workable policy.But what May did with Brexit was to take a referendum vote and convert it into something impossible, in timing and substance.And Parliament and the media let her. 
Far Right voted BrexitRacists voted BrexitXenophobes voted BrexitPutin wants BrexitTrump wants BrexitRegardless of what you actually think of Brexit as a concept. I'm happy I've picked the right side... 
The collapse of the UK economy has started. A Dutch tv-station yesterday revealed that hundreds of British banks and financial institutions move their activities to EU-countries because of #Brexit.  
After defeating May's #Brexit deal again last night, today MPs will be voting on whether to back crashing out with #NoDeal.No deal would be a disaster for the country.Share this graphic which highlights just some of the reasons it needs to be taken off the table for good. 
Tariffs on 87% of imported goods are to be slashed to 0% in the event of a No Deal. MPs should be embracing cheaper prices for consumers, and voting for a World Trade Brexit tonight.  
Should MPs vote to keep No Deal on the table? #Brexit 
Daily Briefing:- UK parliament crushes Prime Minister May's #Brexit deal again- EU says no more Brexit talks with UK- Italy to defend its interests in China 'Belt and Road' accord  
The Government cannot ignore the key challenges facing London and the UK because of the chaos of Brexit. Today’s Spring Statement is a key opportunity for the Chancellor to take desperately needed action on policing, air quality and affordable housing. 
Hard Brexit Risk? Not visible on the Pound  
Northern Ireland 'hung out to dry' by UK 'no deal' #brexit plans... my latest with @Annaisaac and inputs from @Freight_NI@ManufacturingNI & Declan Billington. 
Michel Barnier questions Brexit delay: ‘Why would we extend Article 50 when negotiations are over?’ 
“By taking unilateral measures on tariffs and on regulatory recognition” we can mitigate the disruption of a ‘No Deal’ Brexit, that’s better than “locking ourselves into a highly suboptimal deal”, says the IEA's @MissVHewson 
Huge respect for all those in @UKLabour pushing for a #PeoplesVote who are being let down by a eurosceptic leader who failed to even mention the idea in Parliament yesterday. Today he wants to facilitate #Brexit with his Brexit plan which will see jobs and businesses put a risk. 
Soft Brexit is the least popular policy with the public. It would oblige the UK to take all rules and regulations while abandoning a seat at the decision-making table.Labour has a better option: join the mass movement to stop Brexit. @michael_chessum 
David Cameron and all the Remain campaigners could not have been more clear during the referendum: leaving the EU means leaving the Single Market. They must not renege on that commitment now.  
Emily Maitlis' Brexit side eye summed up what the entire world was thinking  
#Prepare4Brexit with our Checklist for traders.#Brexit  
With just two weeks to go, maybe it’s time that @theresa_may considers a simple, comparatively easy way for Brexit to proceed without NI border issues . .  
Throughout this brexit shit show shambles @Coldwar_Steve keeping us sane  
A No-Deal Brexit would be a disaster for Wales.I look forward to another general election when people in the Vale of Glamorgan will be able to vote for a candidate who will always stand up for their best interests - @Bel4Vale.@WelshLabour @ValeofGlamLab #StandingUpForWales 
The idiot Brexiters don't understand that the EU may see a no-deal as an excellent way of bursting the populist bubble and getting the UK just where it wants it in the negotiations to come, as a desperate country deep in recession and begging for a trade deal.#Brexit #FBPE 
Brexit is the worst episode of deal or no deal I’ve ever witnessed 
Me on May Brexit and Cooked Geese #Brexit  
Brexit isn't even a good fantasy.It's not middle-aged man wants to divorce his wife so he can spend weekends in upmarket hotels with 20-year-olds.It's middle-aged man wants to divorce his wife so he can live in a shack in the woods and do his own dentistry. 
I think this is the definitive "being a journalist during Brexit" gif.  
"What does that mean for the working man? All we can see is businesses leaving the UK." David is worried about the impact of #Brexit on his dad. That's why he's demanding a #PeoplesVote.Join the #PutItToThePeople March to demand a #PeoplesVote:  
So my understanding is that the vote today to rule out No-Deal Brexit is meaningless, as No-Deal is the default position on 29/03. So I have to ask, why are MPs wasting their time voting on this then? Someone corrected me, if I am wrong. 
Brexit Update:  
MPs do not have any legitimate power to cancel Brexit. They have only the power of control of force, not the powers of justice or consent. 
“The risk of a disorderly no deal has never been higher and I urge you not to underestimate that risk or its consequences” says  chief #Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier 
We have to solve these problems TOGETHER. Neither the climate crisis nor the economic challenges can be met alone.Which makes #Brexit even worse. That is the frustration that most of us feel.  
Last night the Prime Minister failed to get her dangerous deal through Parliament.There is simply no deliverable version of Brexit.It’s time to take to the streets and demand a #PeoplesVote!Join us at the #PutItToThePeople march  
Guy Verhofstadt:  It seems to me Britain is spinning out of control, not taking back control.  For the 2 big parties in Britain, Brexit is being used as a bullet in a weapon against each other, rather than a threat to UK as a whole. 
After last night’s big defeat for the PM, tonight we’re voting on a no deal Brexit. Hope it goes without saying that I will be voting against no deal! It would be a devastating mistake for this country. 
J Major signed Maastricht giving UK sovereignty away without the consent of the British people.G Brown signed the Lisbon Treaty, giving away further UK sovereignty without a referendum.We finally have a referendum, and now it's being ignored.Our politicians are shameless! 
Live feed from EU ‘We have to stop BrexitBrexit is a disaster for the EU Britain leaving is equiv to 19 small countries leaving. Without Britain the EU will be uncompetitiveThe EU must help the U.K. get a 2nd referendumWe need a trick to keep Britain in the EU”Henkel 
“A series of mini-deals between the UK, the EU and non-EU countries, plus unilateral preparations by the UK, means many of the building blocks for a managed no-deal Brexit are in place” @ShankerASingham & @LilleyPeter#StandUp4Brexit #NoDeal 
WATCH: Richard Burgon insists that a second referendum "has always only been an option" and that Labour's priority is delivering Brexit.  
INDEPENDENCE: UK would slash tariffs after WTO Brexit. “If we leave without a deal, we will set the majority of our import tariffs to zero, while maintaining tariffs for the most sensitive industries.” 
"We are at a critical point - the risk of no deal has never been higher" EU's chief negotiator Michel Barnier says it is now "the responsibility of the UK" to suggest a way forward for future relationship with EULatest #Brexit updates:  
“More people want “no deal” than want a second referendum but labour would be 20 points ahead if they backed it.”  
A word on LabourThey have ruled out a long extension/EU elections because they believe a short extension until end of June will allow Gov to select their customs union Brexit.Remainers will be furious if that happens.Brexit will be Corbyn’s tuition fees. 
I guess a rational parliamentary leader would have come to the House after the Referendum and called for a period of discussion, reflection, a variety of proposals and sought a consensus. The my-way-or-no-way method with a country fairly evenly split wasn’t a great approach. 
Meanwhile, @JamesCleverly, Deputy Chairman of the Conservative Party, says No Deal Brexit shouldn’t be taken off the table in case it stops the EU27 from « blinking » in a negotiation taking place entirely in his head and/or within the Conservative Party.  
Nicola Sturgeon and the SNP are using Brexit to push for #indyref2 Remind them that we said no here: 
Another German MEP saying that Brexit is stopping us from fixing the real problems on this continent: climate change, jobs and migration. They’re totally bored of it all and want to move on. 
Politicians got Britain into this EU mess by signing over further sovereignty to Brussels, without a referendum. Now many are simply refusing to bring that sovereignty back. 
An interview with a Brexit voter on BBC 5Live this morning:“I want a no-deal. We’ll be fine. We have rabbits in our fields and potatoes in our gardens. We managed before and we’ll manage again.”Official confirmation that Britain is now completely through the looking glass. 
This is the doughnut of doom - the European Parliament in Strasbourg. Facing inwards, listening to themselves, not paying taxes on their cash, hopelessly out of touch  #Brexit  
There will be a few enraged little wannabe Thomas Mair's out there getting upset that their precious Brexit is under threat but: 1) We can't give in to violent extremists 2) The reason Brexit is failing is because it is a bad idea, driven by ignorance and enacted badly  
I think it’s a bit rich of Theresa May not wanting no deal off the table - she’s constantly demanding I get off the table... #Brexit 
“We remain respectful of  & its people. We remain determined, calm, united until the end of this extraordinary negotiation. We shall defend the ’s interests & all its citizens. That will remain the line of your negotiator.” @MichelBarnier #Brexit @Europarl_EN 
The amount of people who have replied to one of my recent tweets asking me to explain Brexit is SO telling. IF I was to attempt a video on my own YT channel explaining the situation to young children, would you and your family watch? 
Dude, your dad created a REFERENDUM PARTY in 1994 specifically to call for a re-run of the 1975 result, to render those votes 'essentially worthless', hoping to subvert the then pro-EU Major Govt & bring about the tax-dodgers' Brexit that you still enthusiastically support.  
More and more people are getting behind a 'no deal' Brexit thanks to the EU's intransigence.  
May has now said she won't leave without a deal. She'll be voting against her own manifesto commitmentWe voted for the @Conservatives because of their manifesto pledges to deliver BrexitShe no longer has a democratic mandate to remain PM, she defrauded us to get power 
The moral of the whole story is that Brexit is a lot harder in the real world than any of its advocates ever believed. A Brexit that isn't disastrous to the country is, in effect, undeliverable and we need to abandon the whole charade soonest and beg forgiveness. 
If MPs vote tonight against leaving the EU with no deal, they will be voting to set parliament against the people. They won’t just be voting to blow up Brexit. They’ll be voting to blow up their own political parties and faith in British democracy itself. 
The EU's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier says the risk of an accidental 'no-deal' Brexit has "never been higher" 
.@UKLabour should now say:1. Public opinion has shifted decisively against Brexit2. The cheating and illegality surrounding the vote were so widespread that the result cannot be considered sound3. When we fight the General Election we have called for, we'll do so as Remainers 
In Europarl for yet another Brexit debate. Weber claims to support the young generation. Has anyone told him about youth unemployment in EU? 
Why extend the #Brexit talks when the Brexit talks are over, asks @MichelBarnier hitting the nail on the head. 
"This treaty is and will remain the only available treaty"EU's chief negotiator Michel Barnier says if UK still wants to leave EU in an orderly manner the current treaty is the only one available Latest #Brexit updates:  
General Brexit coverage rule. It is safe to totally ignore any MP or journalist who talks seriously about:1. “Ruling out no-deal”2. The Malthouse compromise3. A “clean break Brexit”4. WTO Article 24 
Theresa May's Brexit deal was defeated again. Here's what could happen next:  
Barnier speaking in European Parliament: "Let me remind you that the responsibility for the Brexit decision belongs solely to the United Kingdom" 
UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP on the Brexit votes and the way forward.”On Thursday, ahead of the Article 50 vote I will join UKIP members and campaigners outside the Houses of Parliament alongside @mikehookemmep, @NeilUKIP and Lord Pearson.”IN FULL:  
What do you want to happen now out of available options? RT for bigger sampleComment any alternatives#Brexit #BrexitVote #BrexitDeal #BrexitShambles 
If Ms Onasanya votes again today - this time to block Brexit in contravention of votes of 60%+ of constituents - it will be an ugly moment.  
to the cross party campaign to keep the UK in the customs union, in whatever version of Brexit may (or may not) be ultimately agreed, that may not be fantasy or mad conspiracy. 
no-deal Brexit. To put it another way, my presumption is the Treasury's publication today of the tariff schedule for a no-deal Brexit will have an important political impact, on the Brexit debate. It will put wind in the sales of the Labour Party and rebel Tory MPs who believe... 
line that any negotiated Brexit with the EU has to enhance the unilateral ability of the UK to negotiate free trade deals with any country it likes. Why does she apparently value this unilateral ability to do free trade deals with other countries so little in the event of a... 
This government claims one of the great benefits of Brexit would be to negotiate free trade deals with countries outside the EU. So some would say it is EXTRAORDINARY that it has today announced that if the UK leaves the EU without a deal, it would voluntarily... 
How does Brexit manage to be so dramatic and yet so fucking boring at the same time?! 
At the Carrickdale Hotel this morning for the #Brexit The Future for Border Business event, a joint initiative between Louth County Council & Newry and Mourne District Council. Business in the border region is vitally important for this island & must be protected @BrexitReadyIRL 
We did not elect the SNP to futilely waste time trying to overturn how England voted on Brexit. We elected them on a manifesto of honouring how the COUNTRY of Scotland voted on Brexit, via #IndyRef2. We must respect England's vote & they must be made to respect Scotland's. 
The EU's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier says the decision of MPs to vote against Prime Minister Theresa May's withdrawal agreement prolongs and deepens great uncertainty 
We need a civil, independent inquiry into this Parliament's, Whitehall mandarins and the media's conduct on Brexit. Not appointed by the government, but by the people. Prominent, trusted figures should comprise the panel and it needs the power to act on its findings.  
PM can't even bring herself to whip her MPs against disastrous No Deal.It's now clearer than ever that #Brexit is a fight within the Tory Party & our PM is putting party unity before the people of this country.MPs must take control today, reject No Deal & deliver #PeoplesVote 
I love the BBC, I owe my career and therefore most of what I own to it. But it’s obsession with ‘balance’ when we are dealing with Brexit has become comical. There’s no need to find someone to oppose something that is factually correct otherwise you’re just promoting more lies. 
LEAK: EU set to drop out of global deal to make multinationals accountable for human rights abuses committed overseas.While Brexit continues to eat up the headlines, here's what's not being reported. #EU4UNTreaty #bindingtreaty #StopCorporateAbuse 
.@MichelBarnier #EPlenary #Brexit  “Yesterday’s vote in the House of Commons prolongs major uncertainty. We negotiated the #WithdrawalAgreement always WITH the #UK, never AGAINST it. The only way of leaving in an orderly way, is on the basis of this deal.” 
US college admissions scandal no surprise. In most countries people use money/status to speedy board their kids into elite education. Decades later,board rooms+parliaments are full of those boosted beyond their abilities + not up to challenges like Brexit, 9/11, financial crash. 
theresa may when her brexit deal got denied once again  
Check out today's Brexit vote, if you get the chance. Sound of the summer. 
Instead of letting him do his usual bollocks and bluster just read out his own statements from the referendum and his time as Foreign Secretary. These charlatans never had a plan. 
Emily Maitlis hailed for capturing 'mood of the nation' with exasperated 'side-eye' during Brexit interview with Labour shadow minister | London Evening Standard  
It’s 992 days since the EU referendum. And we’re now only 16 days away from Brexit and the Tory Government still can’t tell us what is going to happen. And this is the PM’s idea of “strong and stable” government. Worst government ever more like. 
An index of how little the UK political and media class know about Brexit and the EU is how many contend MPs passing a mere resolution can take "No Deal off the table".Only revocation of Article 50 or ratifying a deal can take No Deal off the table. There is no in-between. 
Boris Johnson tells LBC he stands by all the promises he made with the Leave campaign in the 2016 EU referendum. 
Her deal is not Brexit and let’s not pretend it is. @TheHirstComment @FoundationParty. 
2/2 ...the documents say they’ll consider checks at ports. In other words, a customs border between Northern Ireland and mainland U.K. in Sammy Wilson’s constituency. It’s time to wake up, no one wants this.”    #Brexit 
No-deal is nothing to be scared of – it’s just Brexit with many mini-deals  
We've been telling you that since he stood outside Parl the day after the Ref & said Invoke A50 asap..Then backed May & whipped for invocation w/o a clue & failed due diligence.Just leave the Party & help form the new Prog Alliance.#Brexit Britain & Labour FUBAR.#RevokeA50. 
I don't understand how political commentators can absolve @UKLabour of all responsibility for the mess we're in. Corbyn could have spent the last 3 years debunking the referendum lies & influencing public opinion against Brexit. He chose not to. An abdication of responsibility! 
No Deal Brexit means British government free to act independently, unilaterally without EU restriction. In other words, taking back control.   
1/2 #Brexit  Irish government source not holding back: “Under these plans the UK # could be flooded via NI with tariff free Irish beef, Spanish oranges, French cheese and Polish honey. Meanwhile U.K. produce becomes too expensive to export. If they get overwhelmed through NI... 
There are signs that Labour will still (in spite of policy) back soft Brexit over a public vote. This would be ruinous for us. If Labour had fought for Norway and free movement from the outset, it might have been different. But it didn't and it isn't.  
. Yet another Committee I am on this side of the channel passing legislation for a No Deal #Brexit  
Who knew that posting our own YouGov polling showing public/Tory voters back No Deal, are against delaying Brexit + think May's deal doesn't honour the ref result would annoy so many remainers?Full results: Do share, it seems to have touched a nerve. 
I know May's Brexit meltdown is continuing and #SpringStatement2019 is today but I'll still be putting out some tweets on #ClimateChangeas I do every Wednesday. It's too important to skip. I think Bernie would agree.. 
The IRA send a bomb to Glasgow University. Nicola Sturgeon the First Minister of Scotland and Humza Yousaf the Justice Secretary are too busy tweeting about Brexit and Independence to give it a thought. Classless but expected. 
I know Brexit is going on and all that – but here’s a government minister blaming the government for a huge error she personally made. The hypocrisy and cowardice are astounding  
Love a #Brexit flow chart but as you’ll see (at the bottom) almost anything could happen!  
Essential items stockpiled ready for a ‘No Deal Brexit’ Yorkshire TeaYorkshire BeerYorkshire WineYorkshire BiscuitsYorkshire PuddingsYorkshire (Wensleydale) CheeseYorkshire ParkinYorkshire Passport#Brexit  .@BBCLookNorth .@BBCLookEast 
Wanting to import everything from anywhere else than the EU to pretend no deal Brexit is all ok in the age when we know our carbon footprint and the air miles a product clocks up matter this kind of thinking is just plain stupid and our kids won’t stand for it. 
Emily's eyes speak for the nation when she gets a "we dont know yet" answer from the Labour party to the question - what would your Brexit policy be?  
Nearly every single member of my Irish family voted no in the 2008 Lisbon Treaty referendum. The EU inexcusably ignored them & made them vote again.They're about to do the same to us. And you side with the EU because... you care about Irish people?Do me a favour, ffs. 
This is appalling. Labour members voted for a referendum. It’s time for the @UKLabour front bench to represent Labour members. 
The Brexit Secretary: "No Brexit is worse than no deal." Is that Theresa May's position...?  
Brexit: No-deal tariff plan would be 'sledgehammer' for economy, says CBI – Politics live  
First vote was correct. Let’s hope it’s not a cynical manoeuvre to vote down No Deal option and then lead to a betrayal of the brexit vote. However I suspect the gang of snakes who know better than us mere plebs will vote down No Deal. #treacherous 
Now is the time to come back and form a party to represent the UK not just for brexit but for the people, we no longer have a party worthy of a majority vote if there's an election totally done with 3 main parties ignoring us the public. No deal n new party required ASAP. 
I just heard 'Dave' Cameron ( remember him?) say brexiteers keep voting against Brexit.Of course we all know the Doris WA is not Brexit.I mean 'Dave' if you put lipstick on a pig it wouldn't make it shagable, would it?Oh, but then....... 
#Brexit latest  
Labour’s Brexit ‘policy’ got us like....  
Anna Soubry delivers blistering attack on the politicians who lit the Brexit touchpaper and ran away  
Liberalising trade is a good thing over time - but overnight changes to #tariffs would create real problems for some UK firms and communities. Westminster must avoid this unwanted shock by rejecting a messy and disorderly exit on March 29th. #Brexit  
We're at the Fyre Festival part of Brexit aren't we? 
Broadcasting glamour #Brexitcast #Brexit @adamfleming 
If @theresa_may votes against #NoDeal, then she should resign. Clearly, she is against her own manifesto and the mask has fallen. This is a tactic just prolong her stay in #No10 at the expensive of kicking the can down the road. #EnoughIsEnough #Brexit #BrexitShamble 
NEWS! Theresa May insists Brexit deal isn’t dead, it’s just resting  
Dear @eucopresident, MPs have rejected the Withdrawal Agreement. We are now one step closer to no-deal Brexit. If not now, when will the @EUCouncil finally instruct the @EU_Commission to #RescueOurRights via ring-fencing of the #citizensrights part of the Withdrawal Agreement? 
The idea that a no-deal Brexit will deliver certainty is another myth. It will deliver no such thing, it will instead mean a blank sheet of paper for our global and EU relations, with immediate impacts and no set future path 1/ 
Brace yourselves. I predict @PhilipHammondUK will be pulling porkies out of hats later this morning to try and terrify MPs into preventing the referendum result being implemented.  
Brexit: Where we are at right now:4/ After almost 3 years, we still have no idea what Brexit actually means. It’s a series of catastrophic errors and disingenuous messaging from our politicians, who are so far out of their depth, they need a deep sea submarine to rescue them. 
Arrived Westminster for meetings on corporate governance, Scottish stock exchange, and humanitarian issues. But talk all about #Brexit and chaos. "There's no light at the end of the tunnel, because we can't find a tunnel". 
To sum it up: a very badly damaged May is going to have to persuade EU leaders on an extension. It is by no means a given. As MPs drop no deal Brexit, EU will do the opposite and step up the threat of no deal. It now has maximum leverage 
If we do not stop a No Deal Brexit, a whole generation of families will be impoverished. Jobs will leave and businesses will close. Project Fear will become Project Reality. Why I’m voting against #NoDealBrexit today and demanding a public vote. 
Today, Corbyn needs to man up and say:“Labour has looked at this long and very hard, and we have concluded that there is no form of Brexit which benefits the UK and its citizens in anyway. We are therefore moving to stop Brexit”. 
Leading European Socialists Urge Jeremy Corbyn To Back 'Remain And Reform' Brexit Plan 
I'll take it from here...#Brexit @Number10cat #LarryTheCat Pic: Toby Melville/Reuters 
I have unlocked my account again for two reasons.First, in case anything I tweet is relevant to today's important public debate on what happens next on Brexit.Second, I simply can't face going through the 700 plus follow requests I got overnight. 
A no deal Brexit is great for disaster capitalists, and catastrophic for everything we care about. MPs must rule it out today. My article from a few weeks back.  
love how all the news channels have a lil countdown to brexit in the corner of the screen like Disney Channel did for high school musical 
I do fear for my country. For the two past years 2016 referendum they’ve got nowhere and continues to betray us the British people. Seriously, if they vote against no deal tonight then all who do needs to resign immediately.They are betraying Democracy and not consulted constit 
Of all crazy arguments circulating around #Brexit, 1 annoying me most is we voted in #GE2017 for parties committed to Brexit. General elections never single issue, even when parties try to make them.Ludicrous, ill-evidenced argument when austerity, housing, welfare high on agenda 
Brexit: Where we are at right now:3/ Take the Article 50 extension - an extension for what exactly? Unless the EU & 27 member states see clear evidence of a plan as to why A50 should be extended, there’s a danger that an extension is refused. 
(South) #Peterborough voters are well represented in Parliament by my friend @ShaileshVara who is a great advocate for delivering a Brexit which honours the 2016 referendum result.  
Brexit: Where we are at right now:2/ Take today’s No Deal vote - it’s meaningless. We all know that most MPs are against a no deal, but without a tangible roadmap out of this mess, regardless of today’s vote, we may well still end up with no deal - as it’s the default. 
Aaron Wan-Bissaka has pocketed him once already this season. Put him in charge of Brexit.  
The unintended consequences of #Brexit multiply in every direction and damage business & individuals  yet the PM and her party continue to play political games. She should last night have ruled out a no deal , asked for an extension (not inevitable) and agreed a referendum.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg says that although a different prime minister would have "unquestionably" negotiated a better Brexit deal, Theresa May still has his support.@JuliaHB1 | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg |  
Salvini, June 2016: "Yes to #brexit, the start of the end of the European Soviet Union!"  
Leavers break 83% against EU referendum, 40-37 against May deal and 64% for a no-deal WTO BrexitInterestingly, Remainers break 42-36 AGAINST idea 2nd EURef would "honour" the 2016 result, 37-35 for May's deal but 51-26 against no-deal. Large numbers of don't knows though 
*Buried by Brexit klaxon* I reported last week how the DWP are piloting merging two disability benefit tests together. @Channel4News now say private companies could make £3 billion from the move. Alright for some, eh? 
This is HMG's plan if we Brexit with no deal. Nigel Dodds described it as "measured and sensible" on @BBCgmu.It *literally* treats NI differently to the rest of the UK. This would be laughable were it not so utterly, utterly tragic. 
And people saying that Jeremy should honour conference agreed Labour Party policy on Brexit and a people's vote should also fuck off and join the Tories. 
The EU has done far more to make Brexit practically happen than the UK government and parliament.  This is spot-on.  
an SNP MP i respect, but it was an awful intervention - there was a compelling need for the house to focus on the detailed pros and cons of May’s brexit deal - to use an intervention in that debate to bang on about indyref2 made him look like a tone-deaf, single issue obsessive  
Farage  right again ..........Nigel Farage: No-deal Brexit is an 'act of liberation' | talkRADIO  
Tories called a referendum on Brexit. Tories campaigned for Brexit. Tories trigger article 50. Tories refuse to release impact statements. Tories help in contempt of parliament. Tories lose two votes by huge margin on awful deal. Media : it's all Corbyn's fault this. #r4today 
The 23 May date is about pressure. One possibility is to set conditions, extend for 6 weeks with conditions that MPs must decide on revoke, referendum or soft Brexit to get a longer extension 
We now know there are no benefits to Brexit. Why is UK still pushing to leave? Apparently it's the 'will of the people'. But May and her Ministers now say that if the  British people voted again, we would likely remain in the EU. So IT IS NOT THE WILL OF THE PEOPLE!!! 
Let's go straight over to our Westminster correspondent for the latest on Brexit  
Jacob Rees-Mogg with his country estate and many many millions won't be personally affected by the consequences of no deal Brexit. He's the Pied Piper of Keynsham - leading rank and file Brexiters to an economic doom that won't so much as wrinkle his ludicrous suit 
I voted for the deal yesterday because without it now Parliament will take control of #Brexit... and Parliament doesn't want to leave! I'll vote for #NoDeal, Parliament will not. 
However it ends, the Brexit debacle has damaged the reputation of British democracy, at home and abroad 
All of eg the top 10 cars sold in the year to date apart from the Qashqai, are not made in UK and now face a 10% hike in prices in a fortnight - some have already indicated charges levied if No Deal Brexit...  
Waiting for @YvetteCooperMP to start a speech with “we come  here no to save Brexit, but to fucking bury it”. Been an absolute hero on Brexit so far. Why can’t this women be leader of the Labour Party and PM? 
"If a #Brexit deal cannot be agreed by March 29 what's your preferred option?"Delay leaving date for more negotiation 17%Hold new referendum 33%Don't delay & leave with no deal 37%Leavers break 72% for 'no deal; Remainers 59% for new referendumYouGov Mar 11. DK excl. 
So sick of this neverending referendum crisis, I must move away to a better country where politics is untainted by partisanship, bad faith or ideology, somewhere very like (drinks eight pints of meths) sCOtlAnD 
It’s going to be fun finding out who is bat shit crazy enough to use their seat in Parliament to vote for a no deal #brexit today. 
When you know leaving the apt means facing another day of Brexit chaos...  
The Sky News story headlined “Labour announces backing for a second Brexit referendum” had 32,000 Reddit engagements and 177,000 on Facebook.It was Sky News’ most viral political story in the last six months. And now...  
He thought he got away with it with his pathetic point of order, But he was heard, And by many he was heardTory MP @LukeGrahamMP, who during the Brexit debate he referred to Scotland as a "principality".How did someone so ignorant history and geography get elected as an MP?  
"Do you think the following would/would not honour result of 2016 EU referendum?"Having another referendumWould 23%Would not 58%Don't know 19%Leaving with PM May dealWould 35%Would not 36%DK 28%Leaving without deal on WTOWould 41%Would not 33%DK 26%YouGov Mar 11 
No it is not “this deal” or no Brexit. Right at the outset we should have announced our intention to leave on WTO terms & started to vigorously prepare for that. That is the course we should now be on after years of navigational floundering.  
The solution to #brexit   
People saying that Jeremy should not be facilitating Tory Brexit should fuck off and join the Tories. 
Remember #Brexit can be ended in an afternoon by #RevokeArticle50 and sending one letter to the EU to reverse the PMs letter of March 2017 ... But there are only 16days to do this. 
Heard a bloke on 5 Live stating that no-deal would be fine because "We're Great Britain - we've got rabbits in the field and we can grow potatoes in the garden".1. Brexit was supposed to make our lives better.2. I don't have a garden, so I guess I'm fucked.#brexit 
Like night follows day, we can be certain that the political class will vote to take WTO Brexit off the table today, and send the nation into a dark night for the democracy of the people.UKIP is ready to stand and fight in any election which comes. 
Tories saying "If no-deal is taken off the table then Brexit will be finished" is telling. No-deal threats were not just used to threaten the EU but us. If they needed a threat of carnage to push a Brexit deal then it tells you that Brexit is shit 
No ambiguity from @TheIndGroup in our amendments to the Govt’s ‘no deal’ Brexit motion debated in the Commons later: vote against ‘no deal’ +for extension indicative votes on the #Brexit options whichever option is chosen goes to a #PeoplesVote revoke Art 50 if needed 
I won’t vote to make #plymouth poorer and a no deal exit will make our city poorer, our country weaker and hit the poorest hardest. I will be voting to defeat no deal and I expect us to win that vote today. Brexit is a mess and it’s time to break the deadlock with a public vote 
Strange. He didn’t say anything about the person who didn’t want Brexit but called a referendum that enabled it to happen anyway and then ran away leaving everyone else to deal with the chaos did he! 
Right now @BBCkatyaadler is explaining the *basics* of Brexit process to Justin Webb on #r4today. Presenter - incredibly - did not know that EU would reopen withdrawal agreement if UK changed red lines. There’s a level of ignorance of basic of Brexit in key parts of UK media 
Looked at phone at 7am. 2 emails urging me to block no deal, 2 threatening Armageddon if I did! Welcome to another day in Brexit Central. I am resolved to act in the national interest but suffering from the slight disadvantage of not knowing quite what that looks like. 
A no deal Brexit is a "sledgehammer hanging over business" and needs to be ruled out today, says @cbicarolyn from @CBItweets which represents thousands of businesses #r4today  
No Brexit because Tory Brextremists are split three with Michael Gove(in Cabinet backing May’s plan), David Davis(quit then U-turned to back plan) & Boris Johnson(left to oppose plan and succeed May) 
Twenty years from now, a Museum of Brexit will open in some remote English market town and the exhibits will include a copy of the letter revoking Article 50, the handcuffs used to arrest Farage and a video installation of Theresa May dancing for tariff-free citrus fruit.  
The Looking Glass @UKParliament. Today’s ‘vote’ to stop a no-deal Brexit can’t stop no-deal. The ‘debate’ won’t be a debate but the same people saying the same things they’ve said for decades. At least with no whip at least we’re not pretending there’s a policy. #UKdeservesbetter 
EU ambassadors and a group of MEPs are being briefed on next #Brexit steps by Team Barnier  this morning. Sticking to tough line on potential extensions: Brits have to find a majority for something (anything) and only then Brussels will consider an extension 
David Cameron on #SkyNews this morning: "You can't have a situation where the people who want Brexit keep voting against it." Bottom line: There are MPs who will never be satisfied with anything. These people (ERG) are, and always have been, the problem. #RevokeArticle50 
I will be voting to keep No Deal on the table in today’s vote, and against extending article 50 and delaying Brexit tomorrow. @BrexitCentral @StandUp4Brexit We just need to get on with it. 
Give us the Brexit we were promised (superior trade deals, bigger economy, magic solution to the Irish border, substantially the same benefits as EU membership) - or have the honesty to admit it can’t be done. 
The first referendum was the most divisive political issue I've known, nothing has split society like it. It has utterly dominated and toxified discourse. An MP was murdered ffs. Anyone who's enthusiastic about doing it all again needs to take a long hard look in the mirror.  
By the way, how’s the Brexit Festival going? Are we still having that?  
I wish the @UKLabour leadership would understand that the country is not the same as 3 years ago and they are facilitating a Tory Brexit. 
EU's chief Brexit negotiator says Britain must finally get its act together as a chaotic no-deal departure from the bloc is little more than 2 weeks away.  
Idea:Hire a cruise ship and organise a Parliamentary Conclave (lock-in). The ship can only return to shore when the 650 guests have reached a consensus on Brexit.  
Some positions now in Commons:Tories who hate Brexit and keep voting for it.Tories who love Brexit but vote against a deal. Lab who want a referendum and feign loyalty to leader who doesn't. Lab who want Brexit, reject no-deal, but don't vote for only deal going. 
ENOUGH!! Dodds interview on GMU right now is horrendous- STOP this indulgence- he is Refusing to rule out No Deal!! A no deal that will decimate NI economy & stability.The DUP are not FIT! The amount of jobs Brexit has cost, anxiety it's causing. I'm angry that DUP are ruining NI 
The Cons ‘led’ us into this farago; but Corbyn-Labour, are wholly complicit in blocking the exit from Brexit: a #PeoplesVote.These old Parties deserve to fall apart & make way for something better. . .Most obviously, a Party attuned to the REAL crisis of our time:#VoteGreen 
U.K. financial firms are already setting up new hubs, moving staff or rebasing assets elsewhere in the EU in preparation for Brexit  
The new tariffs are out! (In a rubbish completely impossible to work with form, but at least they're out.) Now we know what tariffs the UK will impose after a no-deal Brexit. And from that, it's possible to infer which industries face a death sentence. 
UK says would cut tariffs, no checks on Irish border in no-deal Brexit  
Corbyn took you one massive step towards losing the next GE and out putting the Tories back in power for a generation by backing a fantasy Jobs First Brexit and failing to back a #PeoplesVote 
Today is a day of anxiety.Anxiety about the supply of insulin I've needed since age 3.Anxiety about me & my partner's work prospects (both EU citizens).Anxiety whether Scotland will leave the self-destructing UK or implode with it.There's only 1 good Brexit: no Brexit at all. 
Ever since the Referendum we’ve been hoarding vast quantities of Blue Nun in Choo Choo’s man cave. Tariffs hold no fears for us @bbcthisweek 
Theresa May is using our jobs, industries and communities as gambling chips.Time for all MPs to put an end to her games by ruling out a No Deal Brexit disaster.  
The Withdrawal Agreement was not Brexit. So, by voting it down, we did not lose "Brexit", we lost "Brino". 
A small plea to those outside (and frankly some inside) Scotland who look on at WM and Brexit and think Scottish independence is a delightful answer to the chaos and despair: it’s not. It’s Brexit x10,with the same chaos,same rhetoric,same interminable problems. But Scottish.  
British MPs rejected May’s Brexit deal - again- yesterday by 391 to 242 votes.So what's next for Brexit after May's latest defeat? More here:  
Belgian newspapers this morning. Belgians in Brussels airport said they were sorry when I told them I was British. Then I told them it was me who should be apologising. We all laughed ruefully.Brexit #MeaningfulVote 
The only proposal I want the Labour Party to put forward is to request an extension of A50 in order to have a confirmatory referendum with the choice between May's deal, no deal or remaining in the EU. And that Jeremy probably wins you the next General Election. You're welcome. 
I just spoke to David Cameron. He urges Parliament to rule out a No Deal Brexit and criticises MPs who want Brexit but voted against it @SkyNews @skysarahjane 
As Britain's political chaos deepens, we've looked again at the cost of Brexit so far. It's rising.  
Support the #PutItToThePeople rally.Join us in London on 23rd March for the ‘Put It To The People March’ to make the call for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit too loud to ignore. Let the people decide. Please RT:  Via @peoplesvote_uk 
And here are the No Deal Brexit tariff schedules. 10.6% tariffs on "fully finished" cars from EU (that’s £1,500 more for average family car points out @DailyMirror). And tariffs on beef, “cheddar-like” cheese & butter. But  87% of goods would arrive tariff-free, so cheaper prices 
1. Brexit seems to have transformed us. [Thread] 
I did a podcast, not directly on Brexit, but about religion and law and the nature of social media and why I am a small-a atheist not a big-A Atheist and why I don't blog or tweet about religion.With @TheosElizabeth. 
My @guardian column: Brexit obscures not just the collapse of public services, but the lack of ministerial will to fix them  
BBC News - Brexit: Foreign far-right Twitter users 'manipulated debate'  
By far the most important Brexit event today (even above tariffs). This is the PM's attempt to regain control / give an avenue to her deal still passing. Opponents of no-deal have to coalesce around a position otherwise by operation of the law it's no-deal  
Government's secret tariff plans revealed ahead of pivotal votes on scrapping no-deal Brexit - follow live  
The latest emergency #Brexitcast is ready for listening - where @BBCkatyaadler and @adamfleming joined live from the floor of the European Parliament in Strasbourg  #Brexit  
Remain MPs want to remove ‘no deal’ and to delay Brexit because they want the UK to have just two options: Hard Remain – where we go back into the EU Soft Remain – where we stay in the EU’s Customs Union and Single Market but with no voice, no vote and no veto 
More to follow - but here's 4 key points on #Brexit no deal tariffs: 1. No maths on what slashing import taxes means for the Govt's finances 2. No maths on biz/econ impact 3. It's for 12 months4. NI treated dif to GB = big disadvantage v Irish biz PLUS big legal Qs on trade 
Up next Jacob Rees-Mogg gives his reaction to last night's Brexit deal defeat and looks ahead to the other crucial votes going ahead this week.@JuliaHB1 | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg |  
So, correct me if I'm wrong here, but the outcome of a 'WTO Rules' #Brexit would have us breaking WTO rules on universal tariffs on day one and NI leaving on different terms to the rest of the UK?  
Theresa May's Withdrawal Agreement was not Brexit. Now MPs must vote to leave the EU on WTO terms. UK-EU tariff and quota free trade can continue by mutual agreement for up to 10 years under GATT Article 24 #LetsGoWTO 
Never seen such absolute craziness in news reporting, frankly.  Peston running with the Soubry agenda, Steven Barclay on Sky just now claiming Labour are going for a second referendum.  They are all losing their marbles at the idea of an impending Labour govt., aren't they? 
I think we can all agree, whether we're Leavers or Remainers, that this week Brexit has gone from a slow-motion car crash to just a car crash. 
“I don't think remaining is an option, I don’t think a second referendum is an option, we're going to leave. We have to make this work.“I don't think you can take No Deal off because it's a negotiation” @NickyMorgan01#StandUp4Brexit 
Lots of talk this morning about how removing no-deal will rid us of our strongest hand, all without the slightest glimmer of recognition that if committing economic suicide is the best we have to offer, then perhaps we didn't have much of a hand to begin with.#brexit 
Nigel,You and I campaigned in Nantwich for #Brexit in 2016.Last night you voted for PM's #BrexitBetrayal, which will keep the UK under the control of the EU dictators for evermore, with no exit door.What on earth were you thinking of ?????? 
We must defend our country’s biggest ever vote, it’s in peril. There’s a rot at the heart of our political establishment and institutions. Brexit was a vote by the silent majority that said they’d be silent no more, if there is an election I hope they shout until they get it. 
The more unpopular Labour gets, the clearer it becomes that its only route to power is via a Hard Brexit that blows the country up and the smaller the incentive for it to offer solutions rather merely than create additional problems.  
LATEST: UK Government confirm there WILL NOT be a hard border in event of a ‘No deal’ Brexit.  
Absolutely nuts. UK government is basically legalising smuggling. Everyone legally selling petrol, fags, alcohol, or even cars north of the Irish border can close shop. And former IRA, who nowadays operate smuggling business, will be richest men on the island. #brexit gone crazy.  
May’s deal is now off the table. I’m told that, later today, we’re going to ‘take no deal off the table’. What we’ll have then is an empty table. Maybe we should take the table back to the shop and think again about whether we needed a Brexit table in the first place. 
Absolutely hilarious the spin coming out of the media.  1. Labour are betraying the referendum result by asking for a People's vote; and, simultaneously2. Labour are dismissing the views of its members by refusing to ask for a People's vote.Utter cognitive dissonance.  
It’s not a failure of political class over Brexit. Remain dominated Commons was always going to try to stop Brexit 
There are too many people who think that the best outcome on Brexit can involve riding roughshod over the wishes of half the electorate. That’s not a good starting point for a pluralistic democracy. 
#r4Today reports Theresa May wants to bring her deal back to Parliament, after two of the largest defeats in British parliamentary history.If MPs can vote again and again on the same deal, isn't it time for the public to get its first chance to accept or reject the Brexit deal? 
Labour should now make the case for the EU unashamedly. It should be the anti-Brexit, pro EU party: every other option is now known to be a disaster. It should call for a second vote to justify extension of Article 50. It should command events. Its standing would be transformed. 
Btw - just in case - you were doing something normal like, being in your bed not worrying about Brexit late last night, #brexitcast there for you this morning to keep you posted - inc @Keir_Starmer 's takeaway choices 
Ah yes the tariffs. We so remember all this being discussed in the 2016 referendum.  
Solidarity with all the organisations that work with vulnerable people nervously awaiting funding news because Brexit has consumed everything and no funding decisions can be made till April. 
LET ME BE CLEAR (ahem, thanks Theresa May), the EU is not taking no-deal Brexit off the table, instead it is amping up its preparations.The UK is the only party that can avert it by passing the deal, an extension request, or by revoking article 50.  
I’m personally highly wary of having a second referendum without it being a manifesto commitment (and to be honest, a motion to have one isn’t going to make it through this Parliament anyway). I don’t think it’s democratic, and I don’t think Remain would win it 
While @sinnfeinireland published a comprehensive plan to protect farmers, SME’s and the wider economy through investment in infrastructure - @fiannafailparty sat on their hands and are mere commentators on Brexit. The Irish economy is exposed in whatever Brexit is delivered. 
Any idiots still want a no deal Brexit a fortnight this Friday?  
One lesson from Brexit.We should all take much more care examining the character of people we vote for rather than their party. To see MPs advocating a NO DEAL when they fully comprehend the damage to us is quite something. 
Good morning Britain. Your reminder that @nigel_farage & @arron_banks' LeaveEU campaign was referred to police nearly A YEAR AGO. After Electoral Commission established illegality to a criminal level of proof. And yet, nothing but nothing. Happy Brexit!  
It’s been revealed that @LiamFox spent £2.6m on an ‘Exporting is GREAT' campaign, rather than providing support to businesses struggling with #Brexit uncertainty.Stop wasting money on Brexit & start investing in our welfare services: schools, NHS, police, transport. #StopBrexit 
European #Socialists urge @jeremycorbyn #JeremyCorbyn to back 'remain and reform' #Brexit plan  
Labour’s Rebecca Long-Bailey on @BBCr4today just now making pretty clear that Corbyn’s second referendum backing was just a momentary fad. We’re now back to the line that pursuing a Labour Brexit is priority, and a people’s vote just an option being kept on table 
Have you noticed the inverse relationship in expectations of a no-deal Brexit - the more the UK rules it out, the more the EU expects it to happen. So do we. -  
Lots of head scratching at the European Parliament on UK border proposals - MEPs wondering why British Govt treating NI differently, when its objections to WA were about treating NI differently #Brexit 
Crimean Spring 5 years later: one of the most significant events has become a construction and opening of the longest in #Europe 19-km Crimean Bridge that symbolizes reunification of #Crimea with #Russia.#CrimeanSpring #March2014 #Referendum #Крым #Россия 
Government to slash tariffs to zero in case of no-deal Brexit  In effect, and let's not beat around the bush, we'd sacrifice British business and livelihoods to the fantasies of Jacob Rees-Mogg 
It is nearly three years since the British people voted to leave the EU and we’re still no closer to leaving. The political class’s mangling of Brexit is a historic slap in the face to democracy, says @Tom_Slater_ 
Why did he not respond to Mrs May’s second, historic loss with a full-throated call for a public vote, as that’s meant to be our policy now? Because he doesn’t want one. He wants Brexit. Always has. We are all being played for fools, I’m afraid.  
If we can't agree on Brexit, can we just agree that, going forward, everyone stops saying 'going forward'? @BBCr4today 
Today MPs will vote to take 'no deal' off the table (ie to reject a clean, global Brexit on WTO terms). They will thereby signal acceptance of whatever deal the EU offers. Except, of course, the deal which has been rejected (twice). Which the EU says is the only deal possible.  
I trust all the working class tory voters will be happy tonight when they see their @Conservatives MPs vote to smash our economy, make them poorer, cause chaos at the borders, increase food prices, cause shortages of medicines, don't moan, it's the Brexit you voted for #GTTO 
Why did @Conservatives persist with @theresa_may as a leader, but then fail to rally round & support her #Brexit deal, & ritually humiliate her? The Tories opened the #Brexit box & had the power to close it. Instead, the ERG have smashed it to pieces & blamed everyone else. 
#Remainers and alarmists everywhere don’t care to admit it, but a ‘No Deal’ does not exist anymore.Preparations on both sides of the channel mean that multiple deals are now in place to cushion #Brexit and ensure goods and services flow freely.  
Dear @BBCr4today - if a politician says ‘we’ve been quite clear about our Brexit policy’ can you just throw them off air immediately. 
That means a commitment to renegotiating a deal along the lines of its compromise soft Brexit position - and then putting it to a ratification referendum, a straight contest between their deal and Remain. 
Theresa May tried bribing MPs to vote for her Brexit deal. It didn't work.In his #SpringStatement, Philip Hammond’s resorting to extortion, saying he’ll only give police & schools the funding they need if we vote for a deal.These mob tactics must stop. 
The dumb Tories in the UK should install bonking Boris Johnson as PM and let him wear the wreckage he has caused through backing Brexit. 
‘Changing the person that sits behind the big black door at Number 10 won’t make any of these difficulties go away.’MP James Cleverly says Theresa May standing down will not solve Britain’s Brexit crisis.  
As the Spring Statement is buried under #NoDeal chaos, one is reminded of all of the crucial issues that have been sidelined over the last 3 years...the NHS crumbling, homelessness soaring & people dying on the streets, benefits being cut, life expectancy flatlining. #Brexit 
If there was a snap General Election, in my view, Labour would need to make a manifesto commitment on Brexit which would a) hold together a Leave *and* Remain voting electoral coalition and b) shift decision making power from its own fractious PLP to the electorate. 
GOOD MORNING EVERYONE TODAY I HAVE MAINLY BEEN INTERPRETING BREXIT VIA THE MEDIUM OF CONTEMPORARY DANCE LOVE FROM PABLO   
If Brexit promises are being broken then it's because (mostly Remain) politicians are choosing to break them. David Lammy admitted it   
Brexiteers are right that Brexit would bring back empire. This time, though, England would be the colonized, not the colonizer. 
Breaking: Live from Westminster as #Brexit talks continue.With apologies to JMW Turner (1834) The Burning of the Houses of Lords & Commons  
So even in the event of no deal there will be no hard border. What is nationalism going to gurn about now? #Brexit 
Tory Party and Labour both know the only way to make progress is a Second Referendum on the terms of the deal now they are in black & white.Neither will say though, because they put party interest first and are scared of losing votes.Westminster is broken.Join @Plaid_Cymru 
So Labour position is back to arguing for a General Election to resolve Brexit? ...Where we’d advocate a policy there’s no commons majority for and needs to be negotiated with the EU27 first? Feels familiar somehow #finalsay #StopBrexit 
#Brexit: @politico heute morgen auf die Frage, was passiert nun: We don’t know. I don’t know, you don’t know, they don’t know. She definitely doesn’t know. Seriously, nobody knows. We just don’t know. - Gut zusammengefasst. 
To MPs voting about No Deal #Brexit today: how are you actually going to guarantee No Deal doesn’t happen?Only rock solid secure way is to rescind #Article50.Are you ready to do that? 
Britain's strategy is left is tatters by another crushing Brexit defeat, with no-deal planning now firmly on the agenda  
WATCH | @Michael_Heaver: "A hard but smart No Deal Brexit is taking back control... but we've got a prime minister who might vote against No Deal! That's not a negotiation, when one side knows the other side won't walk away."Support us at  
Morrisons boss David Potts say sales of painkillers & loo roll have spiked with customers stockpiling before Brexit  
The Bank of England says the impact of the UK leaving the EU on the housing market could be significant.It has said house prices could fall by up to 30% from pre-Brexit levels if there was no deal, or a "disorderly Brexit". 
70% of Conservative constituencies and 60% of Labour constituencies voted Leave.Two thirds of MP's are Remainers.Brexit was never going to be straight forward with them at the helm.#BBCQT 
The EU Referendum was the largest democratic exercise ever undertaken here.33,577,342 voted. More than ever before.Turnout was 72.21%. Highest in a UK-wide vote for two decades.17,410,742 voted Leave. More than any other vote ever won.#BBCQT 
91% of MPs voted for the EU Referendum to take place. 78% of MPs voted to trigger Article 50. At General Election 90% of MPs were elected on manifestos committed to leaving the EU, including the Single Market and Custom Union.#BBCQT 
The Uk’s suicide note gets longer:Power over Brexit slips from May’s damaged hands  via @financialtimes 
Between The Devil and The Deep Blue Sea...Good Morning #wednesdaythoughts#Crocosmia “Lucifer” #Ocean#Brexit #Serial another day ?  
It’s unlikely to happen in a vote of no confidence because them wallies in the TIG have already said they’d vote to protect Theresa May.But it would make the most sense imo to call a snap General Election. And if that were to happen, Labour’s Brexit stance would need to change. 
THREAD: #Brexit - the view from Europe  
The state of the country! Paralysed by a referendum that's highlighted just how difficult it is to dismantle a long-standing political & economic union; division everywhere; an incompetent & exhausted government propped up by a cant-ridden second party. Scotland in 2019. 
Brexit Secretary Stephen Barclay has told Sky News no Brexit at all would be "catastrophic for trust in our democracy" 
The plan is simple. MPs will try to remove “No Deal” today. Then tomorrow they will vote to extend article 50. The Parliament is in open rebellion against Brexit. I’ve never despised them more.   
"I have one question for people in the Republic who said they want a referendum on Irish unity: Are you mad? Northern Ireland is radically dysfunctional, implacably divided and politically shipwrecked; insular and immature to a pathological degree." Jaysus  
Brexit is a lie. It is a mistake. It is a farce. We should not do it. There is no excuse for MPs who know this to continue to allow it. It’s time and past time: you are representatives, not delegates. Do your damn jobs and stop this. 
It's over for Theresa May and she has nobody to blame but herself (via @bopinion) 
I reckon what will happen next is Parliament votes down No Deal, and votes for Article 50 extension. But the latter is just kicking the grenade down the road. Parliament will be no better equipped to deal with Brexit in 3 months time. 
Brexit latest: You imagined all those interminable arguments, promises & debates about what kind of ‘deal’ we would get. ‘No deal’ was always our plan. 
Those Remainers counting on a long extension of Article 50 to prepare ground for second referendum should bear in mind that EU 27 have lost the appetite for “strategic patience”, my visit to Brussels concluded.  Lot of diplomacy/back channels needed here #BrexitChaos 
At this point, if aliens landed and said ‘take me to your leader’ we’d be all ‘can you come back in a bit mate, this is soooo embarrassing…’#Brexit 
Just checking in to see how The Sun's 'Brexit Breakthrough' is going  
Among the Brexit angst today is the ‘spring statement’ aka. a mini budget. I am hoping (without expectation) that there will be more money for our schools.    
Daughter at breakfast: “They need to have a second referendum and let sixteen year olds vote. We’re going to be living through this. Not the old people.” #PeoplesVote 
Most people who voted #Remain are decent, honest people who value living in a democracy. They too will view today’s crushing of the people’s will as a frightening reality check on the country they live in. MPs do not think it’s only 16m people you have enraged & betrayed. #Brexit 
Refreshing caveat. Put it at the top of all Brexit coverage imo  
The No Deal  plan for NI is shambolic & as I've said before, in a No Deal scenario NI will be biggest loser*  no tariffs on ROI/EU goods entering NI across border * tariffs applicable on goods entering GB via Dover, Holyhead etc* NI therefore treated differently #Brexit 
Watch Emily Maitlis expressing the same frustration most of the country feels about Labour's "Brexit Policy". Bless her, this needed to be put out there. Priceless.  
As tonight’s vote on No Deal approaches, this is your occasional reminder that the @vote_leave campaign *specifically* ruled out No Deal before the referendum.(billboard location: Parkfield Rd, Wolverhampton)  
Manchester, Leeds, Bristol, Bath, Ceredgion, Newcastle, London, all of Scotland, all of N. Ireland, Norwich, Cardiff, Cambridge, Oxford, Trafford, Lakeland, Brighton were always Remain. If the choice is no deal Brexit or Remain our nation chooses to Remain.  
I will be voting to keep No Deal on the table in today’s vote, and against extending article 50 and delaying Brexit tomorrow. @BrexitCentral @StandUp4Brexit 
Disgraced Fiona Onasanya votes against Brexit 'while wearing tag'How can she say She’s Innocent!  
Quite unbelievable that we are still wasting millions pissing around on a Brexit deal and yet our kids are facing their educational rights reduced due to funding cuts. Please support 'Keep our kids in school' and get our voices heard! -   via @gofundme 
Risk sentiment in global mkts turned neg on continuing growth concerns & w/another tumultuous day ahead in ongoing Brexit saga. Poor econ data from Japan (machine orders -5.4% MoM) & hawkish Lighthizer comments not helping. Pound >$1.31, Gold >$1300, Bonds unch w/10y Bunds at 5bp  
BREAKING: Britain won't apply tariffs on most imported goods if there's a no-deal Brexit, under a temporary plan  
Here's a brief summary of what happens next on the Tory's Brexit shambles.  We support calls from the Labour leadership and MPs for a general election - enough is enough of this lame duck government and their ineptitude.   
I do think the pretence that Brexit is a viable policy rather than a religion of self-harm is now at an end. 
“We need a completely change of approach” @cbicarolyn. Indeed. High time you showed leadership & came out for the only way out of this #Brexit crisis - a #finalsay #peoplesvote 
Pro-Brexit MP and Chairman of the European Scrutiny Committee Sir Bill Cash says the reduction of tariffs will help the British public "enormously" making "imports much cheaper" and has told Sky News the Brexit situation is becoming "increasingly grave" 
Britain will need 'justification' for Brexit delay, warns Donald TuskMay & MP’s Are Out Of Control!  
Good morning UK & Europe! After divisive debates & votes, today can become a turning point: Rejecting No-deal-Brexit by a large cross-party majority will unite millions in  the UK  & in Europe. Will create hope & solidarity. Whatever you finally decide. Good luck dear friends! 
Some breakfast reading for you - the 1.477-page temporary tariff schedule the Government is proposing for 12 months in the event of a no-deal Brexit on 29th March  
The government has announced that 87% of imports coming into the UK in the event of a no-deal Brexit would face no tariffs. Our economics editor @EdConwaySky has moreRead more on this breaking story:  
To hear the Brexit Secretary Steve Barclay say @BBCr4today that ‘No Deal is less of a risk than No Brexit’ shows how demented Tory policy has become. 
The only cheery thing on the radio this morning is John Humphreys calling the Brexit Secretary Steve Barclay “Steve Brexit”. 
Oh how times have changed..... #Brexit #BrexitShambles #BackStop 
Good to see that @MayorofLondon keeps his eye on the ball during the #brexit crisis. #airpollution, #health, #climatechange, or #youth deserve the attention of our leaders.  Coincidentally all high on the #EU agenda too. #LetLondonBreathe 
TODAY - the #SpringStatement at 12.30 - what to watch for & what Hammond doesn't want you remember... #Brexit  
#Chilling The mirror is that UK will be facing tariffs in sending goods to EU plus checks ...the need to #RevokeArticle50 before this #Brexit chaos grips is now 16days max  
price of food and cars from Europe would rise sharply under no-deal Brexit according to government plans set out this morning to spook (sorry, inform) Tory MPs ahead of tonight’s big vote  
#Brexit: MPs to vote on no-deal after rejecting PM's plans  
Translation:The EU has done everything it can to screw the U.K. into a ridiculously unfair, flawed and. one-sided agreement whilst exploiting its useful idiots in Parliament (ie Remainer MPs) to help force a reversal of Brexit.  
The government has announced plans to remove the majority of UK tariffs in the case of a no-deal Brexit, confirming this story by our economics editor @EdConwaySky from last week 
Some MPs will wake up 2day with apprehension abt overturning the people’s will at 7pm. Then they will think with #BBC drip-feeding fear, the plebs will soon return to their pigeons, beer, Emmerdale etc & allow them to continue on with the superstate project. #Brexit #TheyHateUs pic.twitter.com/aMev25Cbfa 
Maybe this is too simplistic but it sounds like: A company in France (EU) could send its good to Irish Republic (without tariffs), than transport them to Northern Ireland (without border checks) and across Irish Sea to UK (without tariffs). Taking back their borders?? #Brexit 
Brexit supporters, 2016: "we will be wealthier and better off than ever!"Brexit supporters, 2019: "we will all need to hunt our own food in the fields." 
Wow. Damning but honest assessment of Brexit from Vote Leave staffer."I can no longer commit publicly to being a Brexiteer. The pursuit for something I now consider unworkable is pointless. I refuse to be driven into madness by it all."#PeoplesVote 
17 days to go until the UK leaves the EU. The tragicomedy that is Brexit. 
Disgraced Fiona Onasanya votes against Brexit 'while wearing tag'   
Theresa May was never prepared to countenance a border down the middle of the Irish Sea. If she had, the DUP would in all probability broken off their agreement with the Conservatives. But in the event of a No Deal Brexit that’s effectively what we will have. 
It is now clear that thanks to our useless Govt & pitiful MPs, the UK is going to be forced by the EU to hold another referendum as the price of extending Article 50. And no doubt the Establishment will conspire to rig the questions this time to produce the result the EU wants. 
Simple version: In a no deal #Brexit, goods entering Northern Ireland from the Republic would not face tariffs (while negotiations take place with the EU and Irish Govt); but goods entering the rest of the UK from the Republic of Ireland would face high tariffs. 
SNP MPs step up independence talk ahead of Brexit vote  
Don't feel sorry for Theresa May - she introduced the Hostile Environment, pushes through further benefits cuts and drove the UK to the edge fo the Brexit cliff... Parliament should revoke Article 50 now - and end this Tory manufactured nightmare! #StopBrexit #BrexitVote 
EU Chief #Brexit Negotiator @MichelBarnier’s reaction following @theresa_may’s defeat in the HoC last night: “Again the House of Commons says what it doesn’t want. Now this impasse can only be solved in the UK” - more on @SkyNews 
The government has announced that there will be no new checks on goods moving from Ireland to Northern Ireland in the event of a no-deal BrexitRead more on this breaking story:  
Didn't you vote against Corbyn's amendment that made provision for a second referendum?  
I can’t wait for the next election. The DUP will to find out what the NI public think of their Brexit stance!  Farmers, businesses, pragmatic Unionists, you get out there & vote! This party have never, and will never put peace & prosperity on this island 1st. We deserve better 
English lawyer Robin Tilbrook @RobinTilbrook has begun legal proceedings to prevent the UK government from extending Article 50, thus ensuring Brexit on the 29th of this month. Please support this! 
The Government has announced no new checks or controls on goods moving from Ireland to Northern Ireland will be imposed in the event of a 'no-deal' Brexit 
One 5 Live listener has the solution to #Brexit..."We should stick two fingers up to the EU. We’re Great Britain - we’ve got plenty of rabbit in the fields, we can grow potatoes in the garden, we’ve managed before."#5liveBreakfast 
The Government has announced 87% of total imports to the UK will be free of import tariffs in the event of a 'no-deal' Brexit up from 80% now 
While the PM, astonishingly, is minded to disinter her twice buried deal, Jeremy Corbyn forgets to mention the second referendum his party conference voted for. Mediocrity. Betrayal. 
The Government has announced the UK will cut tariffs on a range of imports from outside the EU in the event of a 'no-deal' Brexit but some products coming from the remaining EU 27 member states currently free of tariffs will face levies for the first time 
May doesn't care how may she loses by - Brexit is a bluff for her main money maker. Each hour she stays in power she is cashing in on the misery, suffering and death of others.  
After the night the PM lost her voice, the second meaningful vote & control of Brexit, govt today kicking off with a publication of No Deal tariff plan (this via @EdConwaySky); 87% of imports will have zero tariffs. Only 13% of imports will face tariffs, inc beef, dairy, cars 1/ 
Big respect to the bloke outside Parliament singing an anti-Brexit song to the tune of Twisted Sister's "We're Not Gonna Take It" on BBC Breakfast just now. 
#bbcr4today Hump has a comfy chat with James (Notso) Cleverly: Humph: Isn't there a chance Brexit might not happen at all?Notso: (somber tone) Yes, that is the risk.Me: THAT'S NOT A RISK! IT'S MY RAISON D'ÊTRE!#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Is there some sort of embargo which prevents @BBCNews from reporting that there is steady evidence of a growing majority of people who think #brexit is a mistake? #r4today @BBCR4Today 
It is the @CONservatives who have had a majority every step of the #Brexit way. All those attacking @JeremyCorbyn either have an agenda or are ignorant. Or both. Brexit and all its ruinous mess belongs entirely to the Tories.#SkyPapers #r4today#BrexitDeal #BrexitVote 
The people will blame you if Brexit is lost, May tells MPsNo, Jacob is defending the Will of the People! May’s Withdrawal is Not What the People Want! 
So, the UK Government's plan for no-deal Brexit, to avoid a backstop that treats Northern Ireland differently, will be to treat Northern Ireland differently. I am not convinced no-deal would necessarily be beneficial to the DUP  
Whilst everyone’s distracted with Brexit the millions living in poverty & forced to use foodbanks, the kids going hungry, lives broken by despair, the soaring homelessness, malnutrition & destitution goes unreported. Please RT if you want to put that right  
#brexit Great Britain politicians are a laughing stock around the world. 17.4 million voted leave the EU. MUPPETS arguing with each other every bloody day. Doing everything to stop Brexit all politicians. You starting pissing off everyone that voted leave EU. MUPPETS all. pic.twitter.com/PbWW7NnZ5w 
British parliament rejects #Brexit deal again  Possible outcomes: 1) exiting  EU w/o deal2) delaying March 29 divorce date 3) snap election 4) another referendum My choice?  3) w/#PaperBallotsHow about you?#ReinInPutin 
Breaking: Under a no deal Brexit UK will not impose any border checks in Northern Ireland save for those on plants/animals coming from outside EU. No tariffs will apply. 
Irish goods entering the Northern Ireland market will not face tariffs in a no deal Brexit.However Irish product entering the rest of the U.K. would face high tariffs on a range of food products. 
Have the Brexiteers blown it...? "They may have missed the best and last chance to deliver Brexit" - @JamesCleverly #r4today 
The announcements Philip Hammond should make to prepare the country for a no-deal Brexit, writes James Heywood  
Breaking: UK government announces it will temporarily not charge any import tariffs on goods coming from the Republic of Ireland into Northern Ireland, in order to retain an open border in the case of a no-deal Brexit 1/ 
Brexit is 400 hours away. #brexit 
Brief UK Update:-Parliament voted against the same deal they voted against last time-17 days to Brexit-We’ve run out of rude words to call the largely incompetent, morally vacuous house of cowards who run the country  
A delay on #Brexit now looks likely - but what is the point without consensus in Parliament on any outcome!? Should we then be heading towards a more 'meaningful' political shake-up in Parliament....rather than another referendum? #Elections #letthepeopledecide 
The EU on extensions and finger-pointing at Theresa May. My latest #Brexit thoughts from Brussels:  
"I look at the facts and come to a view....Britain is more secure in the EU." ~ Theresa May, prior to the EU referendum. 
Even remainer Piers Morgan  says it’s time to leave the EU with a No Deal.Perhaps it’s time for a 2nd Ref as long as a NO Deal Brexit is on the ballot.The fury of the ppl will ensure that Leave would win.Many previous moderate Remainers would join us.Fuck the EU 
Every MP who voted for Article 50 notification, and every pundit who cheered and clapped, this Brexit is on you.What is happening now is a direct consequence of what happened then: allowing May to trigger a process with a hard deadline but without either preparation or a clue. 
Just pinched from a German guys Facebook ....."We Germans call it a "Polish goodbye" when somebody leaves without saying goodbye. Now we have a "British goodbye" too: It´s when you say goodbye without leaving! :D"Spot on mate. #brexit 
Hilary Benn delivers a few home truths on Brexit.Via @Haggis_UK 
I have just crawled ON MY HANDS AND KNEES to get to a meeting of the European Parliament Brexit Steering Group due to the weird design of this building. Could this get any weirder?  
Anyone who thinks that “we’ll be fine” if the UK crashes out of the EU with a no deal Brexit should watch this video and reassess their opinion. 
May driven to despair as Brexit plan is crushedSurely, She must realise her Time is Up? 
EU'S MOSCOVICI: EU STATES MUST PREPARE CUSTOMS FOR HARD BREXIT*EU'S MOSCOVICI: HARD BREXIT RISK HAS SUBSTANTIALLY INCREASED*EU'S MOSCOVICI: THERE WON'T BE NEW NEGOTIATIONS BY MAR.29*EU'S MOSCOVICI: EU DID 'EVERYTHING IT COULD' FOR A BREXIT DEALSell GBP and EURO.., 
BREAKING POINT: The Brexit elites have failed us all.(billboard location: Armley Rd, Leeds)  
Insurance against Brexit. Fearing market chaos as Britain exits EU, Namibia is firming other markets for its beef exports. 27 EU countries have committed to buying Namibia's meat products, and efforts are underway to enter China and US markets.  
Last night was a victory, but we must not lose focus. If we truly want to stop Brexit in a way that is democratic and puts this issue to bed we need the Brexit deal to be put to the public with the option to remain. An election, new government or extension solves nothing. 
.@roweafr's latest cartoon on the #Brexit debacle. For more:   
May’s deal is the best form of Brexit we’ll ever achieve. Which is exactly why we should stay in the EU. 
Why don’t Leavers say Take Back Control or Brexit Dividend any more? 
BBC has been accused of “routinely and deliberately” ignoring the SNP after cutting two Ian Blackford speeches from their coverage of yesterday’s key Brexit voteThe BBC routinely deny doing anything wrong 
The lunatics on the Brexit side have done their best to turn this into an outright war with the EU. They have no interest in negotiating a deal. They want to crash out, “that’ll show them!”. They are dangerously deranged.   
The future vitality and legitimacy of our democracy is a far more urgent concern that queuing lorries at Dover. Trade can be easily rebuilt. Trust cannot. #Brexit 
Leavers talk of ‘saving Brexit’ and ‘risk of no Brexit’ - the majority in the UK DO NOT WANT BREXIT (btw ‘the UK’ is Britain + Northern Ireland. And don’t forget Gibraltar’s wishes.) So as we see from job losses, businesses leaving, shrinking GDP, its BREXIT that is the risk. 
Today, I thought it would be helpful to remind ourselves how Brexit may affect health and wellbeing including the major direct and indirect impacts........Feel free to share widely.  
I’d urge MPs to keep no-deal on the table, we’d save our £39 billion and have businesses on both sides demanding Brussels offer a better deal. It would ensure we could exploit those opportunities of Brexit.But they won’t. Brussels trumps the popular will to these people. 
So. This is it. The day #Brexit dies. 
Parliament will now have to come out into the open & admit their plan is, & always has been to thwart Brexit.This is crunch time, there will be great numbers of abstentions as MPs try to thwart Brexit but save their seats at a general election.  
The problem with remaining is that the ones who lose are the ones who did everything they were supposed to by engaging with politics, forming a party and putting the work in. To remain is to tell those people they will never have a voice and they never did. #Brexit 
I'm with Fen on this, the Conservative Party have shown themselves fit only for the political scrapheap. You used to be the party of law & order but by not halting Brexit to properly investigate the corruption, fraud & Illegality in the 2016 EURef you now side with the criminals.  
Praying for all tweeps, esp those whose livelihoods are threatened by the continuing #Brexit chaos, and for the Church in #Australia. #prayer 
Former vote leave staffer turns against Brexit !"I'm now at the stage where I think if we end up not leaving it'll be a blessing. Let's face it, my side just doesn't deserve it." 
‘The word ‘catastrophe’ keeps resounding in my head’@ranvir01 breaks down last night’s events in the Commons after Theresa May’s Brexit deal was overwhelmingly rejected, and explains what happens next.  
Remainers didn't kill Brexit. The ERG did.Because they know Brexit is bullshit. 
Good morning from Westminster,  I have released what I will now be referred to as my Brexit coat. #BBCBreakfast 
#BrexitVote Had it with today’s politicians pathetic all. Theresa May lost her voice. Got worst Brexit deal in history. Jeremy Corbyn biggest clown  in politics ready be Prime Minister. Don’t bloody worry always got Sir Vine Cable old dinosaur  waiting come to rescue FFS.  
I love how bitter Brexiters genuinely believe there would be a popular uprising if Article 50 is revoked, rather than a few pasty, tattooed pricks in yellow coats swearing at buses, which coincidently is also how the "national celebrations" would look on Brexit Day. 
The view from abroad is:UK Govt is a laughing stockOur ability to self-harm has no limitsWe are thoroughly divided & Our overwhelming obsession with #brexit has taken our eyes off real problems of poverty, injustice & our economyThey pity us, they despair & they see no end 
Excellent piece.‘Every difficulty encountered in Brexit negotiations over the past two years was foreseeable.’  
If MPs are about to tell us after a twenty year long campaign for a referendum - which we went on to win, that we're not leaving because they don't fancy it, then they'll be feeding the social contract into a shredder. They cannot expect normal treatment after that. #Brexit 
I may have solved the Brexit impasse.1. We leave on the 29th March2. We rejoin on the 30th March3. We start a doomed, EU wide, campaign (paid for by Aaron Banks and Tim Martin) to get the EU to adopt the Union Jack  as their new flag. 
Brexiteers had Brexit in their hands yesterday and chucked it away. Discussing on @GMB in a mo how trade taxes to be published today by the Govt show why a catastrophic no deal Brexit on 29 March won’t happen 
Britain right now #Brexit  
Thinking of Brexit I remembered JFK quote “The great enemy of truth is very often not the lie – deliberate, contrived, and dishonest, but the myth – persistent, persuasive, and unrealistic. Belief in myths allows the comfort of opinion without the discomfort of thought.” 
I have campaigned relentlessly in favour of leaving with a deal. It is now abundantly clear that parliament never had any intention of honouring its referendum obligation. They have made it a binary choice between remain and no deal. If that's the only way to leave then so be it. 
#Brexit demonstrates to electorate that parliament is truly overdue reformWhen our country is endangered, apparently, those in power are enabled by self-serving mechanisms -to put their party &themselves first- whilst astonished observers brace for yet another #NIF raid perhaps? 
1, Promise to deliver Brexit.2, Get worst deal known man.3, Get it rejected by Parliament.4, Take no deal away.5, Extend Article 50 for 12 months.6, Get a second referendum.May's plan almost complete. 
Reese-Mogg and Farage two stupid dangerous men who plotted to Turn Brexit into a takeover of the U.K. by use of Cambridge Analytica Dark Money! Get them out of Politics.  
MPs voting today on No Deal need to know that in legal proceedings around the lawfulness of so-called Serious Shortage Protocols Government has admitted that No Deal Brexit involves a real risk of "serious drug shortages".  
My EU membership is 4p a day and for that I get maternity rights and European workers directive, no roaming charges when I go on hols to EU, no VISA travel. Can you guess how much of your tax bill contributes to EU membership?  #Brexit via @EU_worth_it 
I watched @BBCNewsnight and presenter @maitlis. The programme was pro-tory despite the catastrophic mess they've made of #brexit & she attacked @BarryGardiner for not providing full details of a future @uklabour manifesto in the event of a snap GE! What is #EmilyMaitlis on?  
‘Brexit is divorce, unemployment & homelessness, all in one. There is no way it can be done sensibly. Just don’t do it.’ My @TheNewEuropean column out tomorrow 
Wake up UK! We need to talk. Up and running here in my little booth at BBC Millbank. @NickyAACampbell is squelching in the mud on Cokkege Green. Question is, what next???? #Brexit @bbc5live 
I have a dream that MSM reporters stop pretending they don't know what Labour's Brexit policy is, and then I turn on the TV or radio - and the boringly mind-sapping nightmare just keeps recurring  
Barry, do we have to draw you a diagram? Perhaps in crayon? There is NO Brexit deal that will win parliament’s support, let alone the people. The EU won’t negotiate further. They’re done with us.May’s deal is dead. Tonight No deal will be dead. Honour your conference pledge  
It's time we leavers listened to the other side of the debate. Last night remain MPs overwhelmingly told us that they did not want a withdrawal agreement. Message received loud and clear. Lets get on with leaving without one.#Brexit 
‘May, ill & in despair, proposes a pause to seek agreement on some other deal. No. There is no workable deal because Brexit itself is impossible without catastrophe. This is obvious after 3 years in search of the holy grail only to end up in Mordor.’ My @TheNewEuropean column 
Telly On!BBC News Briefing!1st “Tame” Guest States Categorically!“Nobody!Wants A No Deal Brexit!”I Speak Up To The Telly!“Hold On Mate!I Do! Surely That’s One For A Start! “But Then I Forgot!I Am A Nobody! 
Brexit being ignored and probably not going ahead,independence referendum result being ignored and probably being run again.What happened to our country, when did losers get to call the shots? I'm thinking about never voting on any subject ever again, except against independence. 
Talking @GMB @piersmorgan @susannareid100 about end game for @theresa_may after  2nd humiliating defeat for HER Brexit deal 
Onto matters Brexit #stillMAY 
A piece on my frustration and exasperation that I know many in business share.My thoughts on No-Deal BREXIT:  
Morning!!!!! Hahahahaha!!!! Watch live reaction from Theresa May’s crushing Brexit Deal Defeat  
It is hardly a new thing for the British to watch Theresa May struggle. But when her attorney general issued a damning legal opinion of the last-minute deal she had struck with the EU over Brexit, the blow was "probably fatal" to her efforts, analysts said  
The ref was advisory.  After two years of looking into the viability of Brexit, it’s been shown to be entirely destructive.It’s the governments job not to oblige masochistic wish fulfillment, but create a better, fairer nation. We advised,They investigated,It was a dumb idea.  
After a week of claims about hidden histories - hidden in books that is - to a Brexit where no one did the research before voting, can we finally put to bed the idea that all humanities degrees offer are generic ‘skills’. Clearly the CONTENT matters! We need humanities research. 
If you want an idea of how 'honourable' our diversity MPs are or what this bodes for our future then check this... disgraced former convict Fiona Onasanya votes against Brexit 'while wearing tag'  @MailOnline 
You may have seen a viral post with a list of claims about the Lisbon Treaty, or "what will actually happen if we stay in the EU".Most of the claims are wrong. Read more:  #Brexit 
Matt, first thing, can you please deconstruct this ludicrous Malthouse Compromise, a dangerous distraction from the only way out of the crisis without massive national self harm - a referendum with the option to stay in the EU 
Brexit: MPs to vote on no-deal after rejecting May's plans  
Why we must stop Brexit - so we can change Britain for the better!  
Actual footage of #Brexit (2019)  
The madness of Today’s instalment of that political flesh eating disease that is Brexit. I am on a tube and off to a brexit briefing and it isn’t even 5.15am....Job rewards! 
Brexit stupidity?If the no deal exit is rejected as widely expected, what happens if on Thursday the vote on the A50 extension fails?We have no deal, we have no extension, and we cannot leave without a deal.That can only mean: WE CANNOT LEAVE. What a shame. SOUNDS LIKE A PLAN 
He needs to go... We have provided him with the hammer AND the nail, but he still wants to line the #Brexit coffin with red silk... 
First of all... Why should we give any crap about UK and Brexit?... Its because Jingos at @Republic have no news and no reporters that they use "Fillers" like this...  
Well said. Sneering commentary has replaced objective journalism for coverage of Brexit - Trump too. It’s now a default position that news anchors have slipped in to 
Brexit: UK parliament rejects Theresa May's deal for second time 
Photographer @TolgaAkmen joins anti-Brexit protestors outside the Houses of Parliament in London ahead of the second vote on the government's Brexit deal  
2nd referendum is winning here. Vote for NO DEAL and share  
Sophy Ridge asks at what point does Mrs May's admirable ability to endure turn into sticking your fingers in your ears? - Probably July 2016. 
.@peermusicUK's Nigel Elderton (@MusicmanUK1) joined @UK_Music's @MichaelDugher, @PRSFoundation's @vanessa_prsf, @PPLUK's @PeterLeathem & Lord David Watts for a deep discussion of a post-Brexit UK music industry today at @sxsw. Thanks to all our colleagues who participated! #SXSW 
Just spent day in Turkey discussing serious security issues with serious NATO people. Just spent last night watching silly people in Parliament rendering my country incapable dealing serious issues or being taken seriously. What a bleeding Brexit mess. What a bloody disgrace 
Theresa May’s Brexit deal defeated again — ‘A waste of two years’  
Pound edges up after May's Brexit defeat, more volatility expected  
‘A midnight flit to Strasbourg & a theatrical display on both sides of the channel. But nothing has changed. That’s why we now need to delay Article 50 & prepare for a referendum.’ Here is the plan to get out of this crisis  
A second referendum is the best option for the UK economy .#Brexit  
Christ almighty !!! The fcukwit really doesn't know when it's over. BREXIT IS DEAD, YOU PRAT! It's pining for the fjords! Get out of the way, and let someone in touch with the real world take over!  
#British Prime Minister #TheresaMay's #Brexit deal was rejected again by MPs in the second meaningful vote in the UK Parliament since January, increasing uncertainty about how the country will leave the #EuropeanUnion 
Brexit is distracting lawmakers from examining the controversial use of facial recognition technology  
Will Britons end up stranded abroad? Will UK shops run out of Swiss cheese and French wine? #AFP looks at some of the possibilities of a no-deal Brexit  
#FBR #FBSI #FBPE I deactivated my original Twitter account permanently.This is my only active Twitter account.I'm here for Scottish independence, joining the resistance against Trump and brexit...Above all, I'm here for animal rights and human rights..Also for fun  
Theresa May is set to vote on Wednesday to block a no-deal Brexit after she suffered another humiliating defeat. The decision to vote against no-deal follows her repeated insistence over the past 2 and a half years and a manifesto pledge that no deal was better than a bad deal. 
This is a puzzling question How come english tories are voting against Brexit And yet Scottish MP's are voting for itWhat the fuck is wrong with these tories in Scotland 
#Brexit #2ndreferendum I have been saying this for nearly two years!A second referendum is a must. The British public did not vote for this shambles!Get rid of @theresa_may who has shown no respect for the will of the people, and let the voters choose with clarity. 
Don’t despair. The path out of this crisis is for Parliament to authorise an immediate extension of Article 50 leading to a referendum enabling us to stay in Europe.  
I am going to the UK for the first time ever in July. How bad is Brexit gonna mess with me? If it’s not full on Judge Dredd, V for Vendetta dystopia by then, I think I’m gonna feel a bit cheated. 
Brexit crisis: Another day and more humiliation looms for Theresa May  
This is the Brexit commentary you need  
This podcast is the greatest piece of aural public service in my lifetime. #Trump #Brexit 
May tells Parliament it would be undemocratic to ask people to vote twice on Brexit, while contemplating asking MP’s to vote for a third, even a fourth time on ‘her’ deal. Does anyone think that’s just a tad hypocritical? 
Thank you to the Lumberton community for supporting our bond referendum today. We look forward with excitement to taking our facilities to the next level. We will share more info as it becomes available. Final unofficial vote tally is 572 yes 409 no. 
Brexit: EU points finger at UK for Theresa May's deal defeat  
What's next for Brexit after PM May's latest defeat?  
Boris Johnson’s new haircut probably means he is preparing to mount a leadership challenge #Brexit  
Sales trader Alvin Lee at IG tells me there's been a stark change in the way Asian investors view the sterling since Brexit referendum. "Previously Asian clients held the sterling as a safe haven currency, to mitigate against risk of assets held in Asia - now it's too volatile". 
To understand BrexitWhenever you see the word Brexitreplace withTELEPORT BRITAIN TO ALPHA-CENTAURI 
ah “No Marshall Plan for Britain” Kawczynski strikes again .... champion twerping for Brexit - does he have ANY clue about the truth of anything?  
WATCH: With 17 days to Brexit deadline, PM May's withdrawal deal fails again in UK Parliament; casts further doubt on whether Britain's departure will occur as scheduled — or even at all.  pic.twitter.com/QRefDBNZeJ 
Just ensure an extension is a minimum 6-9 mths incl EU elections..We need to get that #PeoplesVote & Stop #Brexit. 
Met with Ambassadors from a number of EU countries today to talk about trade, Brexit and the development of an AUS-EU FTA #auspol 
Stocks in Asia drop Wednesday as the week's optimism starts to fades  Indexes across the region posted modest declines The pound weakened on Brexit woes Gold rose 0.2% 
So now Brexit Deal 2 Vote is done & motions to extend (delay) will be put on the table, one thing doesn't change. Europe is slipping into Recession. Has the market figured it out yet? The March 29th outcome of Brexit simply means EU Recession quicker or 6-9 months later (delay). 
The LIAR @theresa_may! #MayMustGo @CCHQPress @cabinetofficeuk @ConHome @Number10press @TheConWom @BrandonLewis #Tory #Tories #ConservativeParty @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns #TheresaMay @BrexitStewart #Brexit  
A Brexit update from @iresimpsonsfans 
#GeneralElection probably isn't too far away now #REMEMBER  if you are a #REMAINER you must not vote for @jeremycorbyn 's #LABOURPARTY because that is a vote for #BREXITVote for a #REMAINPARTY @LibDems #LibDems #theindependentgroup #SNP #plaidcymru Make sure you are registered 
This is part of the frustration. A country has just finished the most successful two decades in its history and is driving itself into ruin, but not in a way that will ever make a remotely watchable movie. There will be no "Downfall" rant-meme of the Brexit era  
wrexit: they had one job - We could have stood the prime minister making a mess of Brexit, but when MPs follow suit, we have a real problem on our hands. Much more of this and people will seriously be asking what parliament is for...  #BrexitVote . 
She's been flogging the same dead horse since July. And the ERG have been flogging the same dead horse since December 2017, when the die was cast.Meanwhile, Labour have the only plan which would get Brexit through - and the media... blames Labour.   
There are only 16 days left until  #BREXIT and #FREEDOM for #BRITAIN ! If @theresa_may & the @Conservatives extend or delay #Article50 for any reason... then the 17,410,742 must not vote for the #ConservativeParty in the coming elections! #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
Oh Barry you bad man! This is collusion corruption spying treachery!!! Investigate Obama.#MAGA #Trump #Collusion #TWGRP #WWG1WGA #Brexit#WeAreTheNewsNow #PatriotsUnited #WednesdayWisdom #KAG #LisaPage 
Timeline of what could happen next in the make-or-break Brexit votes @AFPgraphics 
You realize how much of a powerless figurehead the Queen of England is,  when it's clear that she can't even vocalize an opinion about Brexit. As  it's been said she "rules without ruling". Which, if you ask me, is utterly pointless. 
Dear future generations in the UK: if you are ever stupid enough to vote in a referendum to leave the EU, *FIRST* undertake proper impact studies, THEN get parliament to debate & vote on what kind of Brexit will be supported. Once all in place, THEN start negotiating with the EU. 
Great Brexit thread. Worth a read. But spoiler alert -   
Theresa May should never have been Prime Minister she has proven to me that she had no intention of delivering The Brexit Result. She should stand down and let a true Brexiteer takes us out of the EU on WTO. Once we have left there will be other countries that will follow.  
There is only one way forward for Britain: a new referendum, free from the thumb Putin put on the scales for the first one 
Brexit is 405 hours away. #brexit 
'@theresa_may ’s distraction plan for her #FakeBrexit:  @CCHQPress @cabinetofficeuk @ConHome @Number10press @TheConWom @BrandonLewis #Tory #Tories #ConservativeParty @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #TheresaMay @BrexitStewart #Brexit 
EU says no more Brexit talks with UK, risk of no-deal increased  
#SammyWilson, "During the referendum the #Irishborder was never raised. Is that not an indication that the problem has been manufactured? The EU is using the NI border as a way of keeping the  UK in the #CustomsUnion and the #SingleMarket!"  
Funnily enough, I originally had the Brexit 50p in the list. Bloody 280 character limit! 
Brexit can still happen with a no deal we don’t want your meager handouts in Theresa May’s begging bowl she may not be strong and proud of her nationality but we the majority are and we will not be silenced like she is  
It was an honour to address the @BrehonLawNYC dinner tonight in NYC Great reception for the @McPrinciples & a lot of concern expressed by the lawyers in attendance about potential impact of #Brexit on the Good Friday Agreement Comhghairdeas to the honourees too   
We could still mint some commemorative coins and hold the Festival of Brexit on 29th March each year to keep the pretence up. 
UK Parliament rejects Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal for a second time 
A sad thought but put aside the whole Brexit shitshow and describe this government: inept, inefficient, bigoted, cruel - I cannot think of one positive thing to say. The only difference with Brexit is the shade of excrement they're shovelling onto us. 
Watching the BBC indyref documentary series and it brings back fond memories of the Yes campaign and the positive energy Scotland was bursting with at that time.Nearly five years later we stand on the brink of a No Deal Brexit. :(We were right in 2014 and we're right now. 
Opinion: Why 2020 must be a referendum on Trump  
British PM Theresa May’s Brexit deal has just failed for a second time. With just days until the UK officially leaves the EU, NBC’s ⁦@BillNeelyNBC⁩ & Sr. Contributor for the Intercept, ⁦@mehdirhasan⁩ , join me to discuss what’s next 
When is the real Brexit deadline? #Brexit #ChinaDailyCartoon 
Missed this (9th March)."Judge crushes remainers’ claims that Referendum result is invalid"  
EARLIER: Taking a swipe at Theresa May's failed Brexit deal, a member of Parliament says a prime minister hasn't been defeated that badly since "the American War of Independence"  
Revoke Art 50 Sarah. You and the @TheIndGroup have the platform...... 
U.K. lawmakers will decide Wednesday whether to tear the country out of the EU with no agreement in place, or give themselves the chance to delay Brexit in the hope of securing better terms  
I've said it before, but every effort you make to save the planet is an effort to save the human race. Think about that for a moment...We currently have the Tories, Brexit and Trump.If you take down the human race, you take down all these cunts with it. 
Theresa May’s #Brexit deal fails again...how long will she last as #PrimeMinister???? #Cartoon: @theheraldsun#TheresaMay #PM #UK #BrexitShambles #BrexitDeal #BrexitCrisis #politics #Europe @cartoonmovement @actualiteitjunk @procartoonists #MPs 
Tomorrow’s @nytimes tonight (after a Trumpless news day): Pressure on U.S. to ground Boeing jets; F.B.I. accuses rich parents of college entrance fraud; May’s Brexit plan soundly rejected. #nytimes 
The specter of Brexit alone has made the UK measurably more unsafe for people of colour. What a gutturally repulsive waste of all our time, mental health, financial security, welfare state and sense of identity. What a fucking waste. 
Here's me on @MSNBC talking with @AliVelshi and @BillNeelyNBC about the crazy Brexit vote in parliament today and what happens next: 
And so endeth another day of #Westminster ridiculousness, another day #Wales has wasted by remaining locked into this absurdly broken and disunited kingdom when it could have been another day of building a better future for ourselves as an independent nation. Nos da. #Brexit 
UK parliament rejects PM Theresa May’s #Brexit deal by 391 votes to 242  
Then a helicopter crashes on them, the solid block of ice they slipped on breaks free and the all slide off a cliff. THATS Brexit.  
stunning to me that the admissions scandal is the top headline--above the Brexit vote this afternoon, above plane crashes, above latest on Mueller investigation. Shows just how meaningful selective college admissions is to Americans #cheatingscandal 
What a fucking mess Brexit is ... and remember Brexit was a referendum promised by the Tories, delivered by the Tories, the majority of MPs campaigning for Brexit were Tory.  The Tories have been exclusively in government and have conducted Brexit negotiations incompetently. 
Why do Labour keep trotting out Barry Gardiner as their main Brexit spokesman? They've got an actual QC as their Brexit secretary but they seem to want someone far less qualified who looks daft & waffles on like a ferret talking about nuts. Who the fuck keeps sending him out? 
@bencorke in case you haven't noticed, Brexit has already cost us £800,000,000 per week. And we haven't left. Nobody put that on the side of a bus. You're banging on about £39b payment we've committed to pay? Really? 
Theresa May's Brexit divorce deal fails once again in Parliament  pic.twitter.com/kLyfFajVIR 
A recent @RANDEurope study explored the economic effects of different post-Brexit trade scenarios.We estimated that a no-deal #Brexit would lead to the greatest economic loss for the UK, reducing GDP by nearly 5%, or $140 billion, after 10 years.  
#WithdrawalAgreement #BrexitVote #NoDeal #CleanBrexit #WTOThe world is watching to see if Parliament will back No Deal on 13/03/19.MPs in Westminster take note.Have the courage to support No Deal + a Clean Brexit + get us OUT.The UK cd be free of EU shackles 16 days from now.  
How Theresa May has tackled Brexit.  
It was great welcoming ⁦@PearseDoherty⁩ to our state Capitol. Over fifty members of the PA House came to my office to hear Pearse’s analysis of Brexit’s impact on Ireland and also the long lasting economic and social ties between Ireland and the USA.   
No. I certainly don’t. That isn’t the point at all. The point is that if you are going to propose such a sweeping restructuring of that system, you had better be prepared to specify EXACTLY how it will work AND be funded. Otherwise, you get Brexit. Bernie’s had decades. 
65% of the Scottish public want a second independence referendum, says Survation Survey #indyref2 
Bla bla bla, next thing you know she’s gonna be claiming Spac Nation finalised brexit talks with the EU.  Just do us a favour please.  
"Let's hold a referendum on whether to blow up the country, require a simple majority, and make it a one-shot so if they win Brexiters can pull a massive bait-and-switch. I see no flaws in this plan." 
Ministers accused of using Brexit to 'bury bad news' over plan to scrap A&E targets  
I have no doubt the EU will allow #Article50 to be extended, but only for a good reason. A #PeoplesVote is a good reason. But, I suspect they won't accept a 3 month extension. They will insist on a 21 month extension up to the end of 2020. #Brexit will then be on life support! 
If Brexit is stopped, those dwindling few who still wish to leave the EU can of course still do so. Depending on the type of Brexiter, their favourite countries would appear to be :- Israel, Russia, Saudi Arabia, Syria or Venezuela 
Thanks to @CindyXiaodanYu from @spectator for bracing the cold to talk #Brexit #MeaningfulVote on @BBCOS & #BBCNewsday on @BBCWorld 
Competition is fierce for news organizations covering UK parliamentary votes like today’s on #Brexit. Winning is measured in milliseconds. Here’s how @Reuters and other newsrooms make do with an overwhelmingly analog voting process  #ReutersBackstory 
The U.K. is thrown deeper into political crisis after Theresa May’s Brexit deal was rejected once again by Parliament  
The country doesn't deserve Brexit and the harm it will deliver either. The country was given promises and assurances and 17.4 million people accepted those in good faith. It's time we saw more Brexiters owning the consequences of this failure. 
Responding to @CarolineLucas, Theresa May says, "There isn't evidence that the British people have changed their minds."Never mind the polls; does May really believe losing her majority in 2017 said nothing about Brexit?  
In response to numerous messages from overseas, here are my responses to questions on #Brexit:a) Maybeb) Unlikely but possiblec) Nobody has any ideaPick any one to answer your question, and you'll be up to speed on UK politics, and as well-informed as anybody here. 
'We're sick & tired of Brexit! Just vote it thru & get it over with!'Leavers - If we voted Brexit, it was obvious it would consume British political life for yrs. Remain would have been the end of it. You've inflicted this shite on all of us. Stop fucking moaning & grow up 
To quote Scarlett O'Hara, "Tomorrow is another day!" We must now ensure that a no deal #Brexit is taken off the table. Then, on Thursday, vote to extend #Article50. If all goes according to plan, we can then vote to #RevokeArticle50 or, if that's not possible, for a #PeoplesVote. 
It is curious that the government and some commentators are resorting to blaming Brexiters for losing Brexit, while failing to admit that they never supported Brexit in the first place, don’t want to leave the EU, and are in charge.You could call it brass neck.  
Since he's hell bent on brexit I'm sure some billionaire or foreign power will bankroll him 
The Irish in Britain who back Brexit: ‘In my circle, everyone voted Leave’  
Call a general election. It could solve the Brexit impasse. End of. 
When the history of Brexit is written, Brexiters will almost certainly come to rue this day. Night. 
British people when they were voting for Brexit  
If you want to #StopBrexit, you must look to a #PeoplesVote. A GE is not the way forward. Jeremy Corbyn is a Brexiter and Remainers will not vote for him. The Tories could gain seats and that will only make #Brexit more likely. The best option is of course to #RevokeArticle50 
Parliament's defeat of Theresa May’s Brexit plan throws up a bewildering range of possible outcomes  
Britain in #Brexit chaos: Parliament crushes May's EU deal again  
So May loses, Corbyn gets up &...tries to sell his own unicorn Brexit? What happened to the PV? Corbyn: I voted for you in your first leadership election. If I had known you would be such a pro Brexit turncoat I would never have voted for you. I want another leadership election. 
Amid the Brexit omnishambles I just want to say I am in awe of my Westminster colleagues @PickardJE @GeorgeWParker @Laura_K_Hughes and @SebastianEPayne, who must be exhausted after two years of this. 
UK your zugzwang is a shermozzle, and there is considerable schadenfreude #Brexit  
Today was my one year anniversary in Northern Ireland and what a big year it’s been for this part of the UK. Sometimes NI feels forgotten, but what happens here is now having repercussions for all of us #Brexit 
‘What’s going on in trans twitter’Well, we’re all reacting to this girl with the biggest dick any of us have ever seen, how’s ‘Brexit’ going 
Guy Verhofstadt welcomes Jeremy Corbyn's offer.Corbyn's Brexit is still the only show in town yet tin eared May continues to ignore it.Time for a #GeneralElectionNow#SackThePM 
#UPDATE The British parliament's rejection of the Brexit agreement makes crashing out of the EU without a deal much more likely, the bloc says  
So, is #Brexit dead? No, it certainly is not! Yes, it's on the ropes, but remember what happened in the "rumble in the jungle". We have won this battle, but we haven't yet won the war. We must remain vigilant. We only win when we #RevokeArticle50. 
On this one I couldn't agree less Ian.  It's not the SNP's job to ameliorate brexit or fix WM as it will only stomp all over us again and again.  It's time for NS to name the date and recall ALL SNP MPs from WM.  A good general strikes when the enemy are at their weakest. 
If it didn’t effect us Irish so much, I’d be breaking my bollix laughing at the Brexit shambles. It’s madness on top of incompetence on top of arrogance on top of stupidity on top of racism on top of cluelessness on top of greed on top of brinksmanship. And yet somehow not funny! 
The referendum was demonstrably criminal & outrageously gerrymandered, denying a voice to the tax payers who would be most affected by the outcome. To press on in such circumstances is an abuse of democracy. 
Ian Blackford mithering in Westminster today about the great act of Self Harm that Brexit was for the UK. This from a member of Nicola Sturgeon's SNP who would impose a far greater act of self harm on the Scottish people with it's crackpot Independence plans.  
I missed the Brexit vote tonight. How did it go, everything alright? 
#Brexit What happens next? #BrexitVote (Ps: God save The Queen always!) 
The answer to Britain’s Brexit question is not to just keep holding referenda until you get the outcome that you want. Mature democracies should be willing to listen to the wishes of their people and then find workable ways to turn these wishes into policy. 
Corbyn, of course, actually tabled an amendment ‘mentioning’ a second referendum. Really sad to see the extent of the Guardian soiling itself on a daily basis over Corbyn. Even today!  
As I said on CNN and Fox tonight Brexit mess largely predictable given unwise drawing of red lines by this government and failure to explain logical consequences to British people. Failure of leadership especially by Brexiteers like Boris Johnson who promoted magical thinking. 
Nightmarish day at work & then post Brexit vote, some prick walks past me & says, “you’ll be going home soon...”.   No you daft prick, because EVEN IF I were an “Indian foreign national” (which I’m not), India isn’t in the EU. I ignored him & left him to drink his 99p cider.  
Something went wrong at my blood tests this morning. A lot of blood escaped from my arm and then the room had to be surgically cleaned. Two puppies went to lovely new homes. Let me know if you need more Brexit free news tomorrow.  
He's battled through the most outrageous investigation in history, all because Hillary lost. Why did they go after him? because he was returning power to its rightful heirs, the people!#MAGA #WWG1WGA#TheResistance #Democrats#TWGRP #Brexit WATCH  
Here is my Brexit free news from the farm today....It was so wet and windy a silage bale blew off a cliff and into the river. No Sheep were harmed. A man crashed into our car while my son and I were sat drinking a cup of tea in it. He was most unpleasant and blamed my parking 
Shining a light into the dark and smelly orifices of Jacob-Greased-BobGovernment ordered to end secrecy over hard Brexit ERG lobby group   
Interesting analogy to explain Brexit to US followers  
In case it slipped your mind, just a few weeks ago Jeremy #Corbyn tabled an amendment calling for a Second Referendum. It was defeated by The Tories, The DUP and The odd, weird Blairite.This shit is owned by The Tories.#brexit #GeneralElectionNow #PeoplesVote 
Dear @theresa_may Have you considered giving up Brexit for lent? No one could criticise you if you said it was for lent because it’s so Church of Englandy - and nearly everyone secretly wants it. 
Very brave set of tweets tonight from Vote Leave staffer @OliverNorgrove.  We all need to think about what Brexit was - and what it is now.  
I have had enough. No more but calling you what you are.You hopeless, useless man. Be gone.Britain needs an opposition. Labour he needs to go. Get your head out of your arse.The ref result was fraud. There is nothing to respect. There is no mandate for Brexit. Oppose it. 
As a break from Brexit, I used a nifty machine-learning website to colourise this of my (maternal) grandparents, Carlo and Evelina Valdrighi. ( if you want to play) 
i literally have no friends stupid enough to support Brexit. 
and yet - objectively - the economic case for indy has grown weaker (because post Brexit we have to choose between rUK or rEU trade friction, fiscal transfers are massively favourable from rUK and of course *currency*)but hey: “sturgeon says”, so who cares about facts?  
no, you're lucky i'm still a member, the sheer cheek and ignorance of you and @jeremycorbyn. my monthly direct debit renews in a week's time, you've got 'til then to convince me you're going to listen to the membership and oppose ANY form of Brexit, otherwise i'm out. 
Oliver here was a vote leave staffer and a liberal leaver, he may not be a full #remainernow but this is an extract from a thread he did tonight where he explains how he can no longer support #brexit. Respect, @OliverNorgrove, you are not alone and thanks for your thoughts. 
If this nightmare ends and Brexit is canned, I reiterate my commitment to obtain British citizenship as a thank you. 
So Scotland by not being independent has left us victim to this utter #Brexit mess...had we voted YES in 2014 this would not even have happened even south of border... But let's resolve to push for #indyref2 and ensure we are safe from such folly of others in future!! 
Good time to recall that Pankaj Mishra had the most adept analysis of the elite mindset that led to Brexit. A love for brashly and incompetently carving new borders:  
Those campaigning for another Brexit referendum will see the defeat of the deal as a boost for their cause  
Spot on Michael. Also worth pointing out that austerity is the root cause of the public anger that delivered Brexit in the first place. 
Theresa May came to power promising to fix the broken economic model that helped cause Brexit and tackle burning injustices.Instead, we’ve got more austerity, low pay, flatlining productivity and rising inequality and household debt.She’s got to go.  
‘No Deal’ Vote Amendments Tabled:Spelman - Rule out ‘No Deal’MacNeil - Revoke Article 50Plaid - Second ReferendumSoubry - Second ReferendumGreen - ‘Standstill No Deal’ 
Amendment (b) led by striking combination of Angus Brendan MacNeil, Ken Clarke & Keith Vaz calls for A50 revocation legislation now; (c) from SNP/PC wants A50 extension with deal vs. remain referendum at end of process; 2/ 
Zac Goldsmith confirms he's going to vote for No Deal #Brexit tomorrow. A man who represents a heavily remain constituency, who has huge numbers of people & businesses that rely on EU & has thousands of EU citizens living there. He sticks two fingers up to them all. Disgraceful. 
The EU-preferred What Next scenario #Brexit  
Unbelievable."The business community need to learn how the economy works".This is the kind of anti-evidence, anti-fact, anti-experience, anti-expert BS that delivered Brexit in the first place. Then they accuse everyone else of arrogance.Sick to death of Brexit blowhards. 
Out of all the things that could have gone wrong with Brexit, all of them have. 
UK: Nothing is stupider than Brexit. US: Have you met the President?  
A United Ireland is the best solution for Ireland amidst the chaos of #BrexitThe British border in Ireland must be removed to protect Ireland’s economy & citizens' rights #TonightVMTV #Time4Unity #Think32 
a) We do have an Opposition. Labour has voted against almost every aspect of Tory Brexit, including May's Deal (twice).b) The Lib Dems are not irrelevant by chance, they are irrelevant because they backed austerity and kept the Tories in power.  
Brexit colliding with reality... "blinking in shock to see the world as it is, not as the leave campaign falsely promised it would be"  
I’m certain this guy could sort Brexit out too given half a chance!   
Not to be dramatic,(I actually find some politics really interesting) but does anybody ACTUALLY 1) have a clue or 2)care at all about Brexit anymore??Like I’m literally sick of hearing about it it’s the biggest mess and takes up far too much of my Twitter, new government plz?? 
Out in the lashing rain preaching the gospel of independence. We are missionaries taking the message of Hope to a people living in the darkness of London rule and Brexit. #JeggitOnTour Read:  
We wanted #Brexit, we were offered BRINO, and now @IainDale rightly says we’ve got DINO, Democracy in Name Only #Newsnight 
Theresa May's "first speech was all about coming into power to deal with the causes of Brexit - She’s completely failed to do that" - @graceblakeley #GeneralElectionNow #SackThePM 
Surely no MP in a Leave supporting constituency can possibly vote to delay #Brexit  
oooh #PeoplesVoteNow is trending  damn right, we DEMAND a #PeoplesVote!!do join us on the #PutItToThePeople march on Saturday 23rd March in London!we WILL have the #FinalSay on Brexit!   
Our Brexit red lines:• No one loses their job• No company leaves the UK• No one loses any rights or freedoms• No shortages of food or medicine• No profiteering vultures enrich themselves.Theresamay has crossed all of them, and we are extremely pissed off. 
As if PM doesn’t have enough problems... serious divisions within Cabinet emerging tonight too. Remainer ministers will mount a fresh push tomorrow for her to forge a softer Brexit deal with Labour instead.  
Britain is in a political crisis. To push brexit hard, declassifying the spy role of the David Cameron government on Trump and his team is paramount. Congress can not overlook the vital importance of London as the center of the coup attempt. 
#Brexit will long be remembered as one of the most self-destructive initiatives ever undertaken by a modern state, executed in the most breathtakingly incompetent way possible. Truly, comedy of errors from beginning to end. 
Those MPs who permit themselves multiple rethinks on #Brexit without permitting the people even 1 single rethink (& especially while invoking ‘the will of the people’ as if immutable) are complete hypocrites. They’re the ones prejudicing ‘trust in politics’, whatever’s left of it 
When Theresa May gets home tonight #brexit #BrexitVote 
That didn't take long.  How is so called journo of the year Emily Maitlis (lol)  of @BBCNewsnight allowed to get away with blaming the Labour Party for Brexit shambles. The BBC doesn't even try to hide its hatred for the Labour Party. Absolutely shocking bias.  
May saw to it the Brextremists - notably David Davis - ran the show since the referendum. It’s no use them now turning on her: own your  
Am Scottish. Was opposed to independence originally. Fully in favour of it in the wake of Brexit. Am I the kind of evidence you’re looking for here? 
.@M_AndersonSF speaking from Strasbourg on #Brexit tonight “The Good Friday Agreement needs to be protected in all of its parts, there can be no deviation from or diminution of the backstop and that remains our position.” #Spotlight 
Tory Remainer voting for Brexit and Tory Leaver voting against Brexit means Tory voters know who to blame if there’s no Brexit  
When UK House of Commons votes on Wednesday about a Brexit no-deal, I hope all MPs who might vote for a no-deal exit think carefully about how the UK could be fed when 41% of its food comes from or via EU trade. Food Brexit should concentrate minds. 
The ultimate decadence. MPs vote v. May’s deal(I agree)but they are for: what? Corbyn, decadence         personified, champions no referendum  today. Meanwhile Toryism totally broken. What Leave voter understood  Brexit meant total rupture? Few.Lies all round. System breakdown. 
Here's Larry's reaction when Theresa May returned to Number 10 this evening muttering something about a "ruddy General Election again".#BrexitVote #BrexitCatGIFs #BrexitDeal #Brexit  
I feel like Brexit is like Primark on a Saturday afternoon it’s a fucking mess, everyone’s shouting, i think my gran is probably responsible for at least some of it and some poor sod really really needs to clean it all up 
This this this. @robertshrimsley  nails the crucial flaw of May’s Brexit strategy for the past year.  
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg is making millions of £’s off #Brexit as pay for his banking masters who are making billions destroying U.K. like they did Greece.  
Theresa May’s Brexit lost to the ultimate adversary: reality | Rafael Behr  
#Newsnight #FBPE #BrexitWe are all.@KirstySNP when it comes to confidence in #TheresaMay  
We informed you last summer no deal is done.You were informed May would resign because of declas not brexit.Few listened, soon you will realise how right we were.Ask the questions & ignore the headlines.Fundamentals are important especially when it relates to understanding.  
If Great Britain is so hellbent on leaving the European Union, maybe they should just have their own freaking island! #smdh #brexit #itsspelledtheaternottheatre 
You've already broken your promises. May presented a Remain Agreement (breaking the promise of delivering Brexit) & now offers Parl't the chance to delay (breaking promise of leaving on 29 Mar). 
Brexit: Government has no plans for Irish border controls  
SNP Westminster Deputy Leader @KirstySNP tells @BBCNewsnight Theresa May must now whip her Tory MPs to vote against a No-Deal Brexit tomorrow - it would be devastating for Scotland and the UK #Brexit  
#FlashbackTuesday #BenGarrison #cartoon #BrexitVote #BrexitShambles  Prime Minister Theresa May loses her Brexit vote Cartoon from 2016 
Britain’s parliament rejects Prime Minister Theresa May’s revised #Brexit deal  
In order to lessen my exposure to Brexit-related shenanigans I’m shunning Newsnight and watching old episodes of Fingerbobs. I recommend it.  
Brexit extension coming. Or, as Larry the cat would say, paws in negotiations.  
Why I took the tough decision to vote down the PM's Brexit deal  
What has happened to @NickyMorgan01 ?  She has gone full on Brexit #Newsnight 
I have to say @SuellaBraverman incredibly clear on #newsnight re why she voted against Deal. Phew an MP who refuses 2B browbeaten into defensiveness by uncomprehending presenter. Points out she & @NickyMorgan01 want a compromise, but not sort of compromise anti-Brexit types get 
Theresa May's Brexit deal is dead. Now what? Via ⁦@ThereseRaphael1⁩ 
Donald Tusk has warned after the second big defeat of Theresa May’s deal that he expects a credible reason for any delay to Brexit #PeoplesVote #FBPE #Brexit 
3. Reconstitute the Government (GE or Tory leadership contest or whatever)4. Negotiate the best possible deal in the new time available5. If the new deal passes Parliament, Brexit on those terms. If it doesn't, revoke A50 and stay in.Focuses minds admirably. 
How to break the Brexit deadlock1. Make "revoke Article 50" the new default outcome, to be triggered automatically X days before Brexit Day.2. Extend A50 for a decent chunk of time (eg until the end of December 2020). EU may accept because 1. completely changes the equation. 
Never forget that this crisis is the product of the status quo that preceded it. The country is getting richer but most people are no better off. Brexit is primarily a problem of attribution: blaming migrants and Brussels rather than politicians in Westminster. 
Barry Gardiner making it very clear that Labour will go into the next election as a pro-brexit party. Quite clear now that policy shift was simply a short term lie designed to stop more defections.Those left in the Labour party are now enabling brexit. 
Aye right... More unionist pish #IndyRef2 #UseTheMandate Blow to SNP’s independence hopes as most Scots DO NOT want another referendum  
#Newsnight Ian Paisley: "Emily, you know politics in Northern Ireland. It's sectarian. That's how the referendum in 2016 was voted on. It was voted on sectarian lines."Does Ian know that Remain won the referendum in NI by 55%?Was it a dichotomy on the constitutional question? 
And what we are seeing now is the stark reality of that coming through. The Leavers are still clinging to the delusional idea that *their* undefined Brexit would be amazeballs. Meanwhile the cold bucket of sick that is the only option available is being rejected by one and all. 
'If we leave with no deal, we can get on with it, get behind what the majority of people voted for and once we've got on with that we've secured our future.' In Cheltenham it's Brexit, not the races, that has got tempers flaring  
4. Govt should abandon its red lines and initiate genuine cross-party discussions & converge on a soft Brexit plan as one alternative. 5 This should be put to country in a new referendum with Remain as the other alternative option#responsiblepolitics 
I voted for Brexit, and even I am sick of die hard Brexiteers saying leaving the EU (via a deal) is not Brexit. It clearly is. May dislike elements of it. But... it... is... Brexit. 
Grandpa Brexit still pushing his Lexit deal.So much for promises to campaign for a #PeoplesVote and to #Remain.He is taking millions of Remainers for granted. Instead of solving this shambles, he is making it worse. 
"This is London calling. We are in the third year of the War Of Brexit. I am the last surviving BBC broadcaster and I am speaking to you from a Remain encampment outside the Houses of Parliament. The Leavers are advancing from the north. We have no more heating fuel. Send help."  
COMMENT(S) OF THE DAY: Even within the scope of Daily Mail comments, these responses to the Brexit clusterfuck are properly mental. pic.twitter.com/LBVdzFIeAe 
Emily Matlis has managed to ensure that Barry Gardiner couldn't finish a sentence. I wonder when @BBCNewsnight decided that this Brexit ominshambles was caused by the Labour Party.  
Theresa May presenting her Brexit deal to Parliament  
I'm optimistic. Unfashionable. I know I should be despairing. The last 2.5 years have simply confirmed what anyone who was paying close attention from the start could have told you back then - Brexit was never going to be easy - it risks wrecking a perfectly decent country .... 
Emily Maitlis is 100% right on #Newsnight. She looks totally exasperated as is the nation. Barry Gardiner and his Labour colleagues have failed the UK on #Brexit as much as the Government. This is a collective failure of Parliament the like of which we have never seen before. 
Barry Gardiner telling Maitlis that Labour has a sensible Brexit policy - as. agreed. by. Junker and Barnier.  Involves a permanent customs union, removing the back stop issue.  Not rocket science.  She appears to want to shut him up & dismiss him like a naughty child  #Newsnight 
Consign Brexit to history - a brief strange nightmare that voters would reject, if only they were given the chance now, say all polls. 
Brexit in parliament increasingly feels the political equivalent of Game of Thrones. Impossible to know at any moment who is on whose side. Murder, mayhem and massacre as common and ordinary as a handshake. And clan leaders who you assume cannot survive stare death in the face 
Brexit vote defeat justifies @theSNP manifesto commitment to push for a fresh independence referendum. Fixed it for you @TheScotsman 
Thank yous to all #Cardiff MPs for voting against the PM's #Brexit deal that will make the UK, especially Wales, poorer and less safe. @KevinBrennanMP @AnnaMcMorrin @JoStevensLabour @SDoughtyMP 
Yeah, I expected that answer. Your government is a shambles, the laughing stock on Europe. You literally have no idea what Brexit will do to your country 
You voted against Corbyn’s amendment which had provision for a second referendum. If we didn’t have such a ridiculous media you’d rightly be called out on this. 
Brexit - a brief strange nightmare that history should forget. Brilliant by @pollytoynbee 
If Mrs May votes to take No Deal off the table tomorrow then the repercussions will be seismic for her personally, the Conservative party, Brexit and democracy. 
Brexit has been killed by a Parliament that never wanted it, says Rod Liddle 
Brexit: MPs reject Theresa May's deal for a second timeThe best deal is we run away in an orderly fashion!   Now they will taunt us a second time...  
Very good to join @bbclaurak, @ChrisMasonBBC, @adamfleming and @BBCkatyaadler on #Brexitcast. Lots to discuss after another huge defeat for Theresa May’s Brexit deal, including why I prefer an Indian takeaway to a Nando’s...Listen here:  
Exactly! @SuzanneEvans1 Parliament gave us the power via a referendum. We voted to leave the EU. Then Parliament worked tirelessly for 2 1/2 years to take back control, from us, the people, & have brought us to this sham position, where Leave may not be implemented! #BrexitChaos 
Corbyn calls for general election after May’s Brexit defeat  
Nope we have not blown #Brexit Iain ... we are refusing to take it watered down to nothing ... we will prevail ... we will destroy the tribal politics in Westminster to win our democratic mandate of #Leave 
If Nadine Dorries can change her mind in less than 2 months why can't the public who have had nearly 3 years? #Brexit #PeoplesVote #TheresaMay 
U.K. PM Theresa May’s Brexit deal was rejected once again by Parliament, throwing the country deeper into political crisis and raising the prospect that the divorce will be delayed or even reversed. Pound remains >$1.30.  
few things will ever make me go full Canary but the fact that at least a handful of respected political journalists seem to apparently still not understand the very basics of Brexit truly is one of them 
DUP having rejected the only basis for a deal - the Withdrawal Agreement - intend to vote to keep No Deal alive.Any illusion they are not chasing a hard Brexit with ERG has now been swept away.Utterly reckless. Ignoring the views of NI business, farming and voters.#shame 
A simple, merciless logic:•N. Ireland is aligned to the Republic and thus to EU•N. Ireland is aligned to UK•So UK must be aligned to EUBrexit became anaemic: 2nd-class EU membership. The Great Escape became a supervised stroll in the prison yard 
This man's commentary on Brexit Britain completely captures the surreal nature of what is going on in our country and politics right now.@Coldwar_Steve is a genius.#fraybentos 
Theresa May lie translator:“I will” = I won’t“Brexit Means Brexit” = “Brexit means Remain”“No deal is better than a bad deal” = any deal is better than no deal“Strong and stable leadership” - secretive, technocratic and obtuse power worship “I won’t” - I will #BrexitVote 
UK House of Commons Votes Wednesday on 'No Deal' Brexit - LIVE Video  #stocks #investors #GBP #EUR #BrexitCrisis #EU #UK #BrexitVote #Brexit  
Sic a parcel o rogues in a nation!#Brexit#DissolveTheUnion 
750,000 fewer tourists coming to the UK since last summer spending £1.3bn less according to the BBC.... Due to???? Who knows? Could it be, no, yes, BREXIT...!If you voted to leave, you voted to harm our hospitality and tourism industry. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Somewhere in the deepest depths of the Burmese jungle, there’s a lone Japanese soldier who still believes Jeremy Corbyn voted remain in the European Referendum 
Our political editor Nick Watt tells Emily Maitlis how “a backbench amendment" will be tabled tomorrow and rule out “no deal in all circumstances.”One leave minister tells him that it would mean “Brexit is over”@nicholaswatt | #newsnight 
Everyone.Stop saying the only way of stopping Brexit is another vote.Sovereign Parliament can reject bad advice illegally obtained! #RevokeA50 
Brexit vote mood, forever : 
'throwing Brexit plans into confusion'Yes it was so clear until now. 
The ERG hijacked the Brexit movement and through successful propaganda managed to turn leavers into willing servants of the disaster capitalist agenda - even to the point of having them almost universally opposed to an EU withdrawal agreement. 
Pleased to have added my own name to this amendment which brings both leave and remain together in a spirit of compromise in order to deliver #Brexit and enact the instruction of the British people #MalthouseCompromise 
Would the Daily Mail be so kind to a Labour PM?! Media in the UK is ridiculously partisan, which is one of the main reasons Brexit even exists.  
I can't believe Brexit is less than a year away and there's still not a plan for it. 
Brexit Britain is like a super-nova. The great star of the old British state emitted a huge pulse of democratic energy in the referendum and is now collapsing in upon itself, issuing toxic radiation as Westminster becomes a black hole of negativity.  
Dear @HeikoMaas, we are trusting that you will now support a proper bilateral ring-fencing of our #citizensrights. Taking them off the negotiation table for good and protect @BritishInEurope & EU citizens in the UK no matter what Brexit outcome. Time to #RescueOurRights 
The way that Brexit is treated as a Westminster story, as if we cared about whether May will 'survive' or not more than about our country will fare out of it, is perhaps what depresses me the most about the whole fucking mess.  
If Brexit gets a second season I’m cancelling my subscription to reality. 
Brexit fantasyland is over. Voted down again. All lies uncovered. UK has all the power in its Parliament. There is nothing EU can do. Hard Brexit or People’s Vote . We wanted to take back control , well now we have it. Our future, our destiny. Decide and bear the consequences 
Good luck “stopping Brexit”. The genie is out the bottle. Eurosceptics now know that at least 17.4 million share their views about the EU. They know they aren’t “fringe”. 
EU says no more Brexit talks with UK, risk of no-deal increased  
All that’s left to say about brexit  
Wednesday’s Mirror: “Brexit delay mayhem” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
The only way to save Brexit now is to put Chris Grayling in charge 
Brexit Meltdown!A free vote tomorrow: No Deal/Hard Brexit OR remain in the EU.Time to call for a second referendum, as PM Theresa May seems incapable of putting the UK’s national interests ahead of those of her Tory party.  
With her Brexit deal well and truly defeated (again!) by 391 votes to 242, Theresa May has shown just how out of control she is. Government is failing, Cabinet is crumbling, the threat of No Deal looms. We must never forgive the Tories for the way they have gambled our future!  
If Brexit has taught us nothing else, it is that humans are not very good at combining the premises "A or B or C", "not A," "not B", and reaching the conclusion "therefore C."By contrast, as the Stoics noticed, dogs are able to perform this inference with ease. 
In the same boat as you, though I've shifted to the Remain stance.Too much wasn't anticipated or expected. Things like 'brexit means brexit' and just leave show how little people understand the modern trade world and the EU. 
Just ponder this. After all those promises to honour the referendum, "no deal is better than a bad deal", standing at a General Election promising to leave the Single Mkt, "We stand ready", etc, on Weds & Thurs this week the Conservative Party leader will vote to cancel Brexit.  
Theresa May: I think we have a #Brexit dea—Parliament:  
24 hours between victory & despair.#TheTimes #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Four UK Farming Unions very blunt in their #Brexit assessment tonight : “There is no realistic possibility of achieving an orderly departure from the EU on March 29…..a .‘no deal’ exit from the EU would be a catastrophe for British farming and food production.” 
Nearly all the Scots Tories set themselves against their constituents on Brexit. Given they’re now due to lose 7 seats it’s a ‘courageous’ move.  
....and striking observation 2) from Charles Walker, pro-Brexit Tory MP: “To the day I die, I shall curse myself for ever thinking a referendum was a good idea. I’m an idiot. I’m happy to admit to your (@BBCNewshour) listeners, I’m an idiot.” 
Give the undeliverable promises made in referendum, the Tory party’s own red lines & the baying for the triggering of Article 50 from all sides (including Mr @jeremycorbyn) - this mess was was predictable & inevitable. It’s much bigger than @theresa_may. 
Dear @jeremycorbyn The Labour Party members, the trade unions, Momentum and the country don't want any type of #Brexit. What is it you don't understand. If you represent us you will support a #PeoplesVote it's the will of the people not yours. 
French sources say Tony Blair told Emmanuel Macron to “hold firm” over a Brexit deal, so Parliament will be forced to accept a customs union or even call for a second referendum:  
Rule Britannia and 'Britons never ever will be slaves' pales into insignificance following last night's Brexit vote as we lunge along with the minority into the arms of Brussels - now stronger after our nation's collapse. Remainers may have made us slaves of the EU forever. 
Cant actually believe it. Labour now actually admitting its all about them, not the national crisis of #Brexit Theresa May, defeated, offered options of people’s vote, extension and revocation of Article 50. So Labour instantly set up a vanity crowd funder. #WATON #FBPE 
Labour pushing for a three month extension means not pushing for a second referendum.  
We have spent the last two years and nine months arguing about what sort of Brexit people voted for in 2016. The public are rightly fed up of it. So here’s a radical idea; go back to the people and ask THEM what they want to do now. 
Finally a Brexit graphic understand - thanks @BBCNews 
In which Zac Goldsmith confirms that he will vote in favour of a No Deal Brexit tomorrow. Which is......brave.  
There is nothing to fear from a second referendum. Either it will provide a final mandate for Brexit or the country will decide the reality is unappealing. The problem is that neither Corbyn and May seem prepared to take that step. 
Channel 4 has done so much more to challenge the irregularities around Brexit, and doesn't treat 2 sides of an argument as both being valid as the BBC does. Brexiter nonsense is quizzed and not treated as fact. 
We live in an era in which most of the political class has ditched even the pretence of feeling a strong attachment to democracy:  #Brexit 
Brexit stuff is just making me super nauseous and anxious tbh. Am I alone in this? Is there a helpline for People Fearing Impending Doom? 0898-STOP-BREXIT? 
What now, Britain? Tuesday night feels like the day after the EU referendum 2016. There was no plan for #Brexit either. My comment @welt 
Not quite sure where the blithe assumption that the EU will agree to delay Brexit has come from. Tonight Brussels demanding "credible justification"  
"Germany has prepared itself in the best possible way for the worst case scenario. However, we still hope that we can avoid an unregulated #Brexit - it is still in the hands of the House of Commons to do that."  
The Conservative party has been captured by demagogues, economic illiterates, provincial nationalists and wild-eyed free marketeers. Power is passing to those who think diplomacy means shouting at foreigners.#Brexit 
“People like me were not voting against Brexit, we were voting against a deal that is not Brexit. Tomorrow you're going to see people really voting against Brexit. These are the MPs who were elected, very many of them on clear manifestos to honour the referendum“ @bernardjenkin 
IT'S TIME TO FIGHT BACK ! #Brexit  
Dan Reed can't handle the fact that not everyone is going to agree with him. Look how aggressive he got when @piersmorgan dared to ask him some questions. Look how disappointed he is with the Brexit reference. And that's after comparing MJ supporters to ISIS. #LeavingNeverland 
Brexit news is a bit depressing. Let’s watch the new @rickygervais comedy #AfterLife on Netflix. 1 episode later: 
The U.K. showing up to Eurovision after Brexit  
Seriously though. There is no answer to the mess we have gotten ourselves into since the vote for Brexit. I honestly don’t know how we get out of it now.  But don’t worry most people tweeting right now have all the answers.  
Because she is an extreme Remainiac. She too wants to cancel Brexit. She is truly toxic and duplicitous.  
Foreign Minister @HeikoMaas on today's vote in the House of Commons: we are moving closer towards a no-deal #brexit with this decision. Rejecting the Brexit deal amounts to jeopardizing citizens' and economy's well-being. 
The British government has FINALLY reached its own - more formal version -  of the Referendum of 23 June 2016. They must choose; No Deal Brexit OR Revoke Article 50. Leave. Or Remain. Time to deliver what their constituents tasked them to deliver. #BrexitVote 
This is not what your members want, you total and utter charlatan. This is the greatest betrayal of 'the many' in the history of the Labour movement. I'm sick & tired of your Labour Brexit unicorn bullshit. #PeoplesVote 
People didn't like May's Brexit deal because it wasn't very good, but guys that's because Brexit isn't very good. Remember when you begged your parents for Mr Frosty and when you finally got it it wasn't very good? Well Brexit is basically that. #BrexitVote 
This amendment is the 'standstill no deal Brexit' ie the UK leaves on March 29 with no deal but agrees to abide by EU rules unilaterally for 21 months.  
Tempers fraying - and little wonder. Govt Brexit policy and May’s premiership in free fall  
“Tonight on BBC News we go to a pool hall in a Brexit-voting area for astute analysis of the ‘yeah, let’s just leave with no deal’ variety, because it’s 10pm and market stalls are closed.” 
#brexit Today is high water mark of DUP Ulster Unionism, holding UK EU to ransom, yearning for Apartheid Statelet that can no longer exist.The Confederacy which went to war for the right to own other human beings, had it's high water mark at Gettysburg.Turning points happen 
I have solved the Brexit problem. An United Ireland. An Independent Scotland and Wales gets a a second Referendum. England would thrive and quite frankly, Ireland, Scotland and Wales are more than willing to let you go and conquer the world all over again. 
Sometimes you just have to let rip - these anti-Brexit MPs don’t seem to grasp the damage they are doing to democracy. 
Her Final Stand. She will vote to cancel Brexit date of March 29th. What a traitor  
Brexit could unravel. First time I’ve believed that possible. And it will be the hubris of the maximalist Brexiters who have opened the door to sanity through their lack of any. 
I'm so done with media circus & pantomime of the "defining day" of Brexit votes- a day that we've already had about a million times. Stop farting about and have a #PeoplesVote this indulgent crap is costing jobs, causing anxiety & seriously wrecking the economy & stability 
Even if the self serving remainers vote to take no deal off the table let's remember it is a motion, not a vote on a bill  & therefore is only advising the gov of the Commons view. They have no weight in law & it doesn't have the power to delay Brexit. Has May played a blinder?? 
U.K. businesses say "enough is enough" after another failed Brexit vote and call on the government to "stop this circus.”  
The Guardian front page, Wednesday 13 March 2019: Another huge defeat for May. And just 16 days until Brexit  
Owen leaves out the bit where Labour voted for the referendum bill, promised to respect result in GE2017 and whipped MPs to back Article 50 but   
Why the fuck is every @BBCNews voxpop about rabid brainless Brexit voters ?  Scotland, Ireland, Wales, London do NOT want Brexit. 
The penny finally drops. The various incarnations of Brexit are all either impossible or pointless.  
.@BBCNews "we take you live to YET ANOTHER Brexit-supporting town".Funny how hundreds of areas voted remain but the fucking BBC can't seem to find any. 
Wednesday’s FT: “May loses control of Brexit after MPs throw out revamped deal” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
In the spirit of other posters, I hereby nominate my 2yo to handle Brexit negotiations forthwith. She turned a hard bedtime deadline into:- one story- one imaginary unicorn (Irish backstop)- same story again- one threat of poo, yet poo withheld- dad lying prone on floor 
We are the 5th largest economy in the world. Yet incredibly MPs are behaving as though we are some pitiful little minnow. They are literally allowing the EU to order us to hold a rigged second referendum.  Astonishing.   
Britain's Parliament has issued a stunning new statement on #Brexit tonight: It won't buy the prime minister's latest plan to leave the European Union. What it will buy instead is anything but clear. Parliament rejected Theresa May's plan by 150 votes.  
The worst decision Theresa May made as the PM was to reject preparing for #NoDeal in 2016.It inspired both Remainers and the EU to disrupt #Brexit. It could've been a completely different story. #BrexitCrisis #BrexitBetrayal #BrexitVote 
UK plan to trade with Commonwealth nations after Brexit is 'utter bollocks', former Australian PM says  
Well, if you believe in accelerationism, you should be cheering for a second referendum right about now. If anything's going to bring this house of cards down, it'll be the globalist class overturning the biggest democratic vote in UK history. #BrexitVote #Brexit 
I'll always be a European. Even though I'm British. Even though my genes are almost entirely Celtic.We're always #bettertogether.Off for a sorrowful early night.#Brexit 
We don’t agree with chastising MPs who voted FOR the Withdrawal Agreement; many did so in sincere belief the risk of losing Brexit was too high.MPs who #StandUp4Brexit can now vote to keep ‘no deal’ on the table and against an extension, thus honouring their manifesto promises. 
I'm on @JeremyVineOn5 tomorrow at 9.15am talking about the utter clusterfuck that is Brexit. I won't be allowed to use clusterfuck on air unfortunately, but given the gravity of the situation, I really think they should make an exception. 
The BBC and the UK media are supposed to be at best impartial. Over the last few years they've allowed this shambles of a government to fail the public without scrutiny.They own this mess just as much as the tories. #Brexit #BBCBias #BrexitShambles 
17 days away from Brexit, Labour want a General Election. It beggars belief  
Spotted at my local station. In light of the current situ in the #UK, I fully agree ... :/(Credit: @LIEBtweet )#BrexitVote #BrexitShambles #BrexitCrisis #Brexit  
#Brexit in a gif  
This Brexit refrain of “Just get on with it” is as irritating as kids in the back seat of a car constantly asking “Are we nearly there yet?” No, we’re not nearly there yet. In fact we’re nowhere bloody near. 
British lawmakers overwhelmingly rejected Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal for a second time, plunging the UK into a further period of political uncertainty with the departure date from the European Union a mere 17 days away.  
EU says no more Brexit talks with UK, risk of no-deal increased  
Brexit meltdown. This week’s @spectator cover #BrexitVote 
The Second Referendum Vote sheet has been prepared. Two simple questions:Do you know what the backstop is?Do you like Camembert? 
Give it up Barry...you're backing a #Lexit = #Brexit based on LiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o ConsentThe Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the PeopleYou have lost the #Remain vote....To avoid No Deal #RevokeA50 
A referendum on Irish Unity will be absolutely essential in the event of a no deal Brexit. #UnityRefSign our petition to support our call. 
Dear News at ten. STOP asking for people on the street for THEIR views. It is tedious repetitive filler.#Brexit 
'The PM has won the gold and the bronze medals for government defeats'  @joncraig reflects on the third biggest defeat suffered by any government as MPs vote down Theresa May's Brexit deal. He tells us what happens next.Listen to special podcast here:  
Tomorrow & on Thursday the Remainers will take the fatal steps that will destroy their hold over the UK political system forever. Cancelling Brexit, as they will do, will be the most politically toxic act since siding with the Jacobite rebels. They will destroy themselves utterly 
Eurocrats Talk of Rejecting Brexit Delay, Tells UK to Prepare for No Deal  
This is something for all journalists covering Brexit to consider... All too often, it is the extremes of the argument represented.  
First Minister of Scotland Nicola Sturgeon: "The UK stands on the brink of a Brexit cliff-edge and Theresa May's government has essentially ceased to function."#DissolveTheUKUnion #ScotRef #IndtRef2 #NewScotland #ScotlandIsNow 
I have written a Song about Brexit. It is called “FUCK OFF JACOB REES-MOGG”Yep.It is sung to the tune of“FUCK OFF JACOB REES-MOGG”OFF OFF OFF FUCK OFF JACOBOFF OFF OFF FUCK OFF JACOBFUCK FUCK FUCK OFF JACOBFUCK OFFOOOOOHFUCK OFF JACOB REES-MOGG 
A huge sense of excitement as my daughter and I settle down to catch the latest episode of Brexit... 
Tomorrow's free vote on a no deal Brexit is the biggest for Conservative MPs since the free vote on gay marriage in 2013.Tory MPs who want to be leader know that a vote against a no deal will seriously damage their chances of succeeding. 
Tonight @theresa_may lost control.  She is no longer in charge of #Brexit.And the Government suffered total humiliation, after Parliament flexed its muscles.We must now follow through with a coherent cross-party plan to deliver a #PeoplesVote. 
Tories Somehow Ten Points Ahead Despite Brexit Shambles  
The ten o'clock news should just be one long vox pop of people across the country screaming into the camera #brexit #eternalscreaming 
Corbyn Loses Brexit Vote and Betrays Britain 
They say that divorce is almost as traumatic as having a spouse pass away. Guess those in England are experiencing that trauma with Brexit. 
More like Theresa May Not Do Brexit !!! 
A lot of people seem to believe that by saying something, it brings it into being. They are claiming that if only Corbyn shouted 'SECOND REFERENDUM' loudly and often enough, the Tories would say, 'OK, fair enough. Let's do it.' 
Here are key questions you've wanted to ask about Brexit -- and answers.Something we didn't cover? CNN's @lukemcgee is here for you. Tweet him your burning Brexit questions and he'll take a look.  
Oh shut up you bumbling incompetent fool, your take on Brexit is just as bad as Mays. Love from The Irrelevant Scots   
Spot on.The Government could have had a Norway-style Brexit signed, delivered and ready to go in early 2017. At that time, many Remain voters would have accepted it.But May's red lines went down, Hard Brexit folk took the Leave vote hostage, & resistance grew as a reaction. 
"May's done her best given the circumstances"No she's hasn't, remember she:- Set her own redlines - Refused to engage with other parties for years, then only as a token gesture - Put party before countryIt is how it is because May & the Tories made it this way. #Brexit 
Theresa May talks about, ‘The United Kingdom and Northern Ireland’. The answer to #Brexit is in that simple statement. Stop the occupation of N. Ireland right now. Go home. 
A no-deal Brexit would be "unlawful" and would be "very difficult" to include in a second referendum, former attorney general Dominic Grieve tells LBC@IainDale | #BrexitVotes 
The UK had to, at some point, face up to this. But its political system just couldn't cope. We fought the referendum like a general election, we triggered A50 without a plan, we never understood how the EU operated nor that Brexit wasn't a standard negotiation. 
Could the UK maybe have a vote on whether or not to vote again on Brexit? 
Today, had lunch on my birthday with granddaughter Myla. For an hour, didn't need to worry about #Brexit But dread to think she will be denied some opportunities I've had if UK madness continues.  
We’ve just seen how utterly broken our political system is. Neither #Tories or #Labour showing any leadership & both putting party over country. If you ever needed a reason to support @TheIndGroup, today is it. We deserve better than this #ChangePolitics. #Brexit #MeaningfulVote 
I still think chances of no deal no more than 10%. Parliament is starting to take control. Cross-party alliances of MPs are becoming important. If May resists Parliament's wish for indicative votes and then - perhaps - a preference for a soft Brexit, she will fall.  
After tonight’s fiasco in the House of Commons this is the only rational way forward : Nicola Sturgeon: 'People must decide' Brexit outcome - BBC News  
This national catastrophe has got to be stopped. Sensible ministers can’t possibly think there is further mileage in more of the same. It has to be an extension for a referendum. The only issue is how much agony they inflict on the country to get there 
Corbyn Loses Second Brexit Vote 
This is Tory MP for Ochil and South Perthshire, Luke Graham, who during today's Brexit debate referred to Scotland as a "principality". How did someone so ignorant of basic history and geography get elected as an MP?  
Light relief. Finally got around to listening to this podcast I did with the excellent @gaslitnation. In it, we explain why and how Brexit & Trump are a joint criminal enterprise. The difference here being - and I quote - nobody gives a shit. Enjoy!  
8/ There is still a chance that either Parliament or May's successor will trigger a second referendum which cancels Brexit. This is my preferred option and I give it about 20% chance. 
spent an encouraging event listening to @Andrew_Adonis in #Basingstoke - as the government defeat was announced. Very positive reaction. Good explanation on why #Brexit is a travesty which needs a  #2ndreferendum  before proceeding. 
'We've got a Government that has behaved incompetently, recklessly, has refused to listen and as a result the UK is teetering on a no-deal Brexit.' Scotland's First Minister Nicola Sturgeon has condemned the Government after latest Brexit defeat  
Of course MP do not represent their constituents.For example, MP are voting over Brexit deals etc and yet they consulted no one.Political correctness has essentially destroyed democracy.No one listens as they all have safe seats.WE WANT NO-DEAL!! 
Brexit will collapse like the Jarndyce v Jarndyce case in Bleak House - when every penny of taxpayer’s money has been spent on implementing it 
#UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP talks Theresa May and #Brexit with @Janice4Brexit:  | #UK #news 
After #EURef, remainers (including me) were resigned to leaving on Norway or similar. Polarisation & support for 2nd referendum came when some kamikaze-brexiters started with the ‘17.4m voted for no deal’ even though they’d told us no-deal was ‘Project Fear scaremongering’ before 
The next two days will be interesting. How many MPs will be like Turkeys voting for Christmas. If they take No Deal off table, they are removing Brexit. How many are so brave?Likewise, extending A50 to nothing is removing Brexit. How many want to end their political careers? 
Number 10 should now accept their "deal" is dead & stop entrapment strategies/games. A No Deal outcome is the only way left to respect the referendum result. Business lobbying groups should accept this too.   
You’re the GRA’s equivalent of Cameron and Brexit: you had no idea of the chaos you were unleashing, you were too arrogant to listen to warnings, and now you’re trying to walk away from the mess you created - a mess that will take decades to resolve. 
why would a second referendum solve what the first one didn't solve?  
FT editorial board view: May’s Brexit deal is dead: this is what Parliament should do next #BrexitVote (free to read)  via @financialtimes 
Government ordered to end secrecy over Jacob-Rees Mogg’s ‘hard’ Brexit ERG lobby group   @mrjamesob @ChukaUmunna @Anna_Soubry @catherinemep @BrexitBin @Haggis_UK @dontbrexitfixit @ResurjamTrev @Andrew_Adonis @RCorbettMEP @CharlesTannock @snb19692 @GDE60 
A vote against no deal Brexit won't stop Brexit. In fact it won't even stop no deal Brexit. Some people can't stop lying, I guess. 
I've always said the authentically British course would be to lie and pretend we never voted for Brexit 
TIME TO, SAY GOODBYE! #WalkAway MayMPs we elect to represent us must honour #Brexit by ensuring we Leave on the 29th March with #NoDealThat's why FFL will be supporting the #MarchToLeave to remind them!No Extensions to kick the can down the road whilst undermining democracy 
Theresa May’s Brexit deal fails again  
Must-read by @rafaelbehr: Theresa May’s Brexit lost to the ultimate adversary: reality  
That wasn't Brexit.  
.@THEJamesWhale on #talkradio is nuts. @B_HQ having to teach him the basics.Referendum was promised in 2015. The people voted for it.Referendum was held. People voted to leave.Election was held with the govt pledging to uphold the vote. It won.End of. March 29th. We're out. 
"...if that doesn't crystallize the argument for Scottish Independence then I don't know what does." @NicolaSturgeon gives her take on tonight's Brexit vote and what this means for Scotland's future. #TheNine 
1. Brexit shambles 2. Crime out of control3. Transport system archaic 4. Working hours and conditions getting worse5. Food, housing and energy costs risingThis is the most dysfunctional parliament and set of politicians (on all sides) in 40 years. Time for change. 
Hope you all got a little sunshine today not much about. Sending you sweet blossoms for a good night's rest. #flowers @BSBIbotany #nature. As I glance to the side of what is trending I think #Brexit is in #crisis Stay #Happy & Strong 
They called a referendum for their own internal party interests, their Brexiteers made impossible promises, then deserted, then Theresa May made more impossible promises, set self-destructive red lines, destroyed her majority, then bungled a deal. The Tories own all of this chaos 
The FT View: Theresa May's Brexit deal is dead after two years of torturous negotiations – and now it's up to the rest of parliament to stabilise the political situation  
Theresa May suffers another massive Brexit vote defeat  
ARE YOU KIDDING ME? #brexit  
Thread for non-Brits: WTF happened with Brexit? 1/ May failed yet again to get her 4 month old divorce deal thru because it is not rightwing enough for her own MPs and she has no majority.... 
Even though the metropolitan elite are pulling out all their tricks to block Brexit, they can no longer cover up the rotten core of the Westminster bubble - the toothpaste cannot be put back in the tube.  
"BREXIT! THE EU! THE DUP! MY LIFE!" #DerryGirls 
There is no deliverable Brexit. The only way to save us from the harm of the cliff edge is for Parliament to give  us a #PeoplesVote 
BREXIT FAIL: Lawmakers in Britain’s Parliament voted against Prime Minister Theresa May’s plan to leave the European Union today. Tomorrow, they will vote on whether to leave the EU without a deal.  
Not a chance. In fact I quit the party (and cancelled my modest direct debit) 48 hours ago. Totally vindicated in my decision when only one of Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn mentioned a second referendum this evening, and it wasn’t JC. 
At last Theresa May explains what she's up to - watch the Brexit Rap  
I’m sick of MP’s like you keep insulting peoples intelligence telling them May and Merkel’s BRINO is the Brexit 17-4 million of us voted for. It’s not, it’s not even bloody close. 
It’s time to stop this Brexit shambles.56% of people now want to #Remain - a huge 12-point lead, and growing.MPs must now: #RevokeA50 Give the people a final say with an option to stay in the EU. Please RT if you agree. 
Popular derision of politicians is not a 'problem'. It is a long-overdue awakening. Brexit has exposed these vain, tax-munching, expense-fiddlers. They love the EU because it shifts power from ordinary people to the political bureaucratic class of which they themselves are part. 
REVERSE BREXIT NOW DICKHEADS  
Didn’t he promise a new referendum last week? Flippity flop....no wonder May’s still clinging on if this is the opposition. How very tiresome.  
And 7 yr olds will chuckle at Boris’s bus, Cameron’s cop out, and all the politicians that will go down in history as utterly useless.. Next book after Brainless Brexit will be Broken Britain. By then the 7 year olds will be crying.. 
Exactly! If the Brexit referendum was truly democratic, then surely a majority in each UK country would have been needed to carry it through. Otherwise it's basically saying, England has the most voters so we can ignore Scotland, Wales and NI wishes. 
Theresa May 'should be out of office tonight', says Nicola Sturgeon, after the Prime Minister's revised #Brexit deal was defeated.More here:  
The British Parliament may actually vote to take No Deal off the table or that the moon is made of cheese, but neither will really happen. Either the Parliament revokes Brexit before March 29 or the UK will be out of EU without any deal on March 29Enjoy your tasty cheesy moon  
Leave minister tells me: Brexit is over. No deal will be taken off the table tomorrow 
We have negotiated a good deal: LieWe are not locked in: LieWe have negotiated a concession: LieWe leave on the 29th March: LieNo deal is better than a bad deal: LieWe will implement the referendum result: Lie 
4 hour council meeting attracted over 150 spectators, saw 2 student representatives threaten to quit the council, and drew tears from attendees, @CC_Columbia shot down referendum for student support for BDS movement. Big thanks to @SSI_Movement #BDSFail 
As I said on @Channel4News Labour believes that our alternative Brexit proposal can bring the country together, creating the consensus we need to defend jobs, living standards & our rights.  
Companies in the United Kingdom are suffering from a bad case of déjà vu after lawmakers rejected a second version of the Brexit deal negotiated by Prime Minister Theresa May  
I voted Remain. But like very many Scots my vote doesn’t mandate you to break your promises and solemn undertakings in 2013/14. No basis now to agitate for another referendum. Had you won in 2014 we’d have left EU in 2016. You were happy with that so have no basis for this now.  
What you are saying is that you voted AGAINST Brexit. That flies in the face of what you stood for in the manifesto. WE trusted you...........WE believed you.........and this is what you do to that trust. The ref never said the result was dependent on,  'a deal'. 
Another Brexit deal fails to pass. Now what?@TVietor08 and @brhodes explain what's next, plus the latest on Dick Cheney, Venezuela and more on #podsavetheworld. Come watch the stream: 
Also I've become very frustrated with myself for the lack of consideration I showed the Northern Ireland issue a few years ago. (More on this at a later date, but I think it's actually symptomatic of something much wider than Brexit) 
The problem here is MPs refusing to  go through with no deal.I can guarantee that if we was preparing for no deal the EU would be begging for a deal.The EU have known all along that Remoaner MPs wouldn't go through with it.Remoaner MPs have stopped Brexit We won't forget 
I'm going to repeat something I've said before: a second referendum would need a supplementary NI-only question to the effect of: if the UK votes to leave, do you accept special arrangements for NI to keep the border soft? 
The Guardian view on Theresa May’s Brexit: pause it and rethink | Editorial  
Theresa May’s Brexit lost to the ultimate adversary: reality | Rafael Behr  
 @StephenGethins says the current Brexit mess is entirely out of Theresa May's own making.While the SNP published compromise proposals and acted constructively, Theresa May chose to ignore Scotland and pander to the Brexiteer 'headbangers'.  
MPs gave the #Brexit decision to the people.We decided to #LEAVE.MPs just need to make that happen.What MPs think is now irrelevant. 
We must revoke article 50.There can be no second referendum until the illegalities of the first are fully investigated. Revoke article 50, fuller Muller style inquiry.Prosecute any who have acted illegally. 
'Vote Leave won on a blank piece of paper'@StephenGethins MP tells the #TheNine’s @rjcurran2 that there is cross-party consensus for another referendum on leaving the European Union.  
The year is 2789 and the latest BREXIT deal has been rejected 
And with Labour seemingly back to position A on their Brexit sequence (try to get a Labour Brexit, then election, then public vote) there isn’t going to be a majority for second referendum very soon. But it remains possible if delay still leads to stalemate. 
BREXIT eh! .. What another complete load of Bollocks .. Nobody cares anymore about IN or OUT .. the message from the people .. that's us working people .. to you MP's - mostly a collection of half-bakes - is JUST FRIGGING SORT SOMETHING .. then we can all get on with our lives 
Here was Dominic Grieve on @BBCBreakfast this morning. He's rightly explaining how, as brexit looks so different now to 2016 "people's opinions are evolving" and it's why he knows we need a #PeoplesVote He is right, so many who voted leave or abstained in 2016 are #remainernow 
SNP Westminster leader @IanBlackfordMP tells us the party backs a People's Vote on #Brexit, even if it means #indyref2 has to be pushed back @theSNP  
The EU were set to make clear that the UK now had 3 options:1. Leave with no deal on March 292. Ask for an extension, that could be denied by EU dependant on its reasons and length3. Cancel Brexit by revoking article 50There will be no further talks 
No deal? Another referendum? A general election? There are seven possible #Brexit outcomes after tonight's vote  
Die hard anti-Brexit Brexiteers are even starting to talk like Maoists.  #athousandmilejourney #ancientproverbsaywheninholestopdigging 
I hate to say it to those mightily sick of this but I don’t think either No Deal or Deal are dead. With long delay laid out before them within days - and the possibility of Brexit being overturned - more Brexiteers could sulkily switch sides if there’s a “3rd time lucky” vote. 
Update: UK MPs vote against Theresa May’s revised EU withdrawal deal by 391 to 242, throwing #Brexit plans into confusion#BrexitVote latest:  
 "The scenes tonight show the absolute disregard for the people of Ireland, for our rights, our economy and the Good Friday Agreement that is at the heart of the Tory Brexit agenda."@MaryLouMcDonald on #brexitvote 
Brexit explained  
It's looks clear from tonight @jeremycorbyn is determined to deliver Brexit, split the Tories and become PM.What he'll get with this is a Tory Brexit, a split Labour Party and a generation out of Government.There's no more than days to change course and support a public vote.  
Brexiteers quiet. Corbynistas quiet. Interesting. Almost like they’re on the same side Well too bad. #remain is loud and clear and the only way to safeguard the UK. #brexit is over and Lexit is stupidWell done you #FBPE. Heroes one and all. Let’s do this x 
Corbyn calls for general election after May's Brexit defeat  
The Brexit mess shows what happens when people are asked to vote for an idea rather than a plan. 
UK businesses say "enough is enough" after another failed Brexit vote and call on the government to "stop this circus.”  
Why can't British just accept they were targets of enemy attack on UK Democracy that was intended to cause their nation great harm and just forget this #Brexit nonsense? My guess is Russian money was put in Tories pockets.  We call that treason.  @KensingtonRoyal @theresa_may 
Brexit is so wild. Imagine voting to shoot yourself in the foot and then three years later still arguing about how to shoot yourself in the foot because you've come to realise it is going to hurt and you don't want it to. 
They still don’t understand. May has been dire but we have no cards to play under any circumstances. All we can do is alter the political declaration to provide for Norway Plus, legislate for a referendum, or revoke Article 50. Changing PM changes nothing. Grow up.  
It was obvious that Mays agreement was not going to happen. No matter what she had arranged it would have been rejected so as to provide the traitors with the ability to overturn brexit which now looks most likely. If they do . . . .shit . . . .fan. . . .lookout. 
Disregard for Ireland plain to see in Westminster - Mary Lou McDonald  @MaryLouMcDonald #Brexit  
Brexiteers against Brexit  
A thoughtful comment, thank you. I voted to remain and if Brexit is cancelled, I'm no mood for celebration. Every outcome is awful. 
Trump and Brexit: So far, mankind's two greatest self-inflicted disasters of the 21st century. 
Can't wait for the #Brexit episode of the Fyre Fest documentary series. 
All those saying Labour would walk a  #GeneralElection should think againWhat would Labour campaign for on #Brexit?If it is Remain they can kiss goodbye to Government 
Brexit is now dead, says Rod Liddle:  
BREAKING: Labour’s alternative Brexit deal sighted...  
Take your mind off Brexit. Consider the happier time of the Middle Ages instead.  
Take 91 seconds to watch this barnstorming attack on those who inflicted Brexit on us before running away. Totally genuine anger and passion.  
absolutely blistering attack by @Anna_Soubry  on boris johnson and rees mogg.nobody on the labour benches has managed to criticise parasites with this level of coherence. @IanDunt @faisalislam #brexit #stopbrexit 
.@ManfredWeber @EPPGroup on German @heutejournal: #UK must not participate in #EP2019 elections - no way a country that wants to leave the #EU can decisively influence the future course of the continent —> clear veto against #Brexit #Article50 extension of more than six weeks! 
Staggeringly complacent. These proposals won't work. Time to show real leadership, denounce the 2016 referendum as a fraud and propose a new referendum.  
It’s quite simple. The problem with Brexit is Brexit. 
As sterling plummets again the real winners in all the chaos of brexit are the hedge fund fraternity who profited by shorting the pound. One of the biggest is Lansdowne Partners whose senior partner was best man at Osborne's wedding 
This is the only sensible and deliverable way forward I can see. And it is what should have happened right from the off. It pains me as a Remainer to tell you how #Brexit can be delivered, but it is irresponsible to be locked in a winner-takes-all dance of death. Here goes. 1/ 
Brexit - what happens NOW? Her Deal is dead in the water. It was always BRINO!But what will Westminster now do to further subvert Brexit?Have a read of my thoughts here in this NEW article please and RT! #Brexit #altnewsmedia 
In years to come, Horrible Histories will bring out their new book, Brainless Brexit, likely to be as gobsmacking as The Barmy British Empire. 
Corbyn still banging on about a General Election he knows won’t solve Brexit. He should stand by his commitment to his members and the electorate and #PutItToThePeople. 
Not optimistic that many are listening, but here's a quick reminder of why official estimates of the economic impact of a #nodeal #Brexit can't be taken at face value...  
Now is clearly the right time for this appraisal of brexit - the author of this shall remain nameless  
Is Brexit and its aftermath really going to convulse and dominate British politics for the next 20 to 40 years? 
Funnily enough on the doorstep people are calling for a GE because they are deeply angry about public service cuts & fact Govt can shake the magic money tree for Brexit - but not public services, NHS, transport, benefits for disability & all we have lost to unnecessary Austerity 
We need to avoid a no-deal Brexit disaster. To do that, MPs must #RevokeA50 if no deal is agreed. Here is a draft bill to do just that: 
Mood music from the EU is that it will not agree to an extension which leads to no-deal Brexit in three months.  
The negligence of .@theresa_may  & .@Conservatives.The damage to The UK, its reputation, its influence and credibility will take at least a generation to repair, if ever.The gut wrenching thing is that young People and future Generations will pay the price.#Brexit #May 
Here are key questions you've wanted to ask about Brexit -- and answers.Something we didn't cover? CNN's @lukemcgee is here for you. Tweet him your burning Brexit questions and he'll take a look.  
Brexit antidote.  You’re welcome  
You’ve just solved Brexit. 
The night of the referendum, I thought Brexit would work out really badly. But it has gone so much worse than I'd ever imagined 
Barnier at 6.00pm: “Let me be clear: the only legal basis for a transition is the Withdrawal Agreement. No WA means no transition.”Steve Baker et al at 8.30pm: We propose a No Deal Brexit with an offer of an agreed transition till December 2021.They just don’t listen.  
#Brexit: Plan for Irish border if there's no deal to be published on Wednesday  
“Frankly, the easiest solution would be to have no border in Ireland.” - Gabi Zimmer MEP, President of the Left Group in the European Parliament @GUENGL & Member of the Parliament’s Brexit Steering Group#Brexit #Time4Unity 
This, from @IsabelOakeshott.No Deal #Brexit? MPs are stopping nothing tomorrow with their 'motion'.  
Honestly this Brexit is the absolute worst episode of deal or no deal and some of those episodes were pretty bad 
Been watching news after huge defeatonly argument any Brexit supporters / promoters have is 'the people instructed us to leave'No they didn't! They advisedWe know from court cases that had it been mandate it would be annulled due to illegality#NothingToRespect so #RevokeA50 
You’re as treacherous and slippery as May. You’re hell-bent on power so that you can do the work of the devil and implement Brexit - a Tory policy, when what you should be doing is pushing for a #PeoplesVote You are an insidious Brexiter through and through. 
But yeah, Corbyn didn’t mention a 2nd referendum... that’s what’s important. 
Theresa May’s government have taken us all down a Brexit blind alley, 2 years of failed negotiations, one humiliating defeat after the next and still she has no plans other than to just keep bringing her deal back....The country stands at a precipice due to her incompetence....  
This is the way that Brexit ends, not with a bang, but a wanker.  
Dear @MinPres, we are trusting that you will support a proper bilateral ring-fencing of our #citizensrights. Taking them off the negotiation table for good and protect @BritishInEurope & EU citizens in the UK no matter what Brexit outcome. Time to #RescueOurRights 
Hello Hotel California? I’d like to book the Brexit Suite, please. For everyone, thank you very much. 
Brexit Britain in a single tweet.  
So is Nadine Dorries a traitor for abandoning "what 17.4m people voted for" or a hero for trying to rescue Brexit in any form? Question to Leavers....  
What is almost certainly going to happen next is:- MPs vote to take No Deal off the table- MPs vote for an A50 extension- May tables her Brexit withdrawal bill again With No Deal off the table, DUP and ERG will be forced to vote for it or risk soft/no Brexit.Simples. 
Disappointed but not surprised by tonight’s #Brexit vote. I’ll be voting against a No Deal Brexit tomorrow, but what we need to deliver an orderly #Brexit is a deal and we now need find what deal can command majority support in Parliament 
My dad advocated for a #GeneralElection with an election manifesto that guaranteed a referendum on a Brexit deal but also within the manifesto were concrete plans to change society for the many whilst staying in the EU to reform it as well. 
Thank you, @NickyMorgan01 for putting differences aside and for trying to find a way forward to achieve #Brexit.  
Here are key questions you've wanted to ask about Brekit -- and answers.Something we didn't cover? CNN's @lukemcgee is here for you. Tweet him your burning Brexit questions and he'll take a look.  
.@ChukaUmunna sets out the #Brexit solution: The government should present all options to MPs, put them to the vote and then put the majority view back to the public in a #PeoplesVote. . 
Theresa May's Brexit deal was defeated again. Here's what could happen next:  
ComeOnPeople !Get this to 100K by Thursday morning please !"Hold a second referendum on EU membership" 
May and her corrupt MP's have just about defeated brexit. It really is time now for the majority of patriots to find their voice and be heard. Join the March to Leave - Sunderland to London - 16th - 29th March. Everyone needed. 
Brexit is 410 hours away. #brexit 
I dunno how much longer we're all supposed to live with this ambient Brexit stress. It's been nearly THREE YEARS 
A majority of Scots want a second independence referendum, according to the Survation poll 
Jeremy Corbyn doesn’t really want a second referendum because he is a life-long Brexiteer and knows Remain would win, Anna Soubry claims @Anna_Soubry | @IainDale | #BrexitVotes 
After today's #BrexitVote and Theresa May's talk of needing a "justification for an extension", I have to repeat this serious warning. The Brexit lot are just waiting to jump on this. Be ready.It doesn't matter that we've put OURSELVES in this position by wasting so much time...  
May be time for a NEW referendum on Brexit, don't you think?  via @HuffPost 
British lawmakers overwhelmingly rejected Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal for a second time, plunging the UK into a further period of political uncertainty with the departure date from the European Union a mere 17 days away  
Graham Brady says it would be “a clear breach” of the Conservative manifesto for MPs to vote for delaying Brexit. He’s right.  
Conversation at governors' meeting tonight about worsening gang crime in our area a useful reminder of the vast opportunity cost of this pathetic Brexit shitshow. 
Parliament may well vote for no deal, then vote for an extension to article 50 knowing the EU says that there will be no more negotiation.It appears both Parliament & the EU are colluding to try to kill Brexit. Those MPs won't be forgiven for defying the 17.4 million. 
This is what happens next  #Brexit  
The end of a quite extraordinary day is in sight. Time to pour a large dram, sit down and watch the excellent #Shetland #Takethemindoffpolitics and bloody #Brexit 
MPs have rightly voted down the worst deal in history tonight. It's now their duty to vote to keep No Deal on the table. The British public rightly expect the referendum result and manifesto promises to be delivered. We must leave on 29th March. #DelayMeansRemain #StandUp4Brexit 
my last big breakup dragged out over 8 weeks and culminated in us watching adele together + then cry fucking in a tent + then the whole thing stretching out for another agonising week + i still think that was less excruciating than watching may try to make brexit happen 
We don’t want Brexit! Any form of Brexit makes people poorer, why would you inflict that upon your voters?  
If we are betrayed and another referendum is forced on us. There must only be two options.May's deal No DealWe have already decided as a nation that we must leave. We now have two options, May's shambolic deal or No Deal and we leave on the terms promised to us in 2016 
Sir Bernard Jenkin tells @bethrigby "this is a very time limited admistration" with "very limited authority" but that issue is not the priority right now - its MPs delivering Brexit 
I have been clear all along. Brexit is a massive disaster for everyone but especially minorities and migrants who contintue to be  scapegoated for failed politics. We need #PeoplesVoteNow 
Got 1000 imaginary rubles + 1000 imaginary Euros says that communications exist from @KremlinRussia_E or cutouts to @JunckerEU and Co instructing them to make concessions in the hope of winning the #Brexit vote.If so, rest assured @RussianEmbassy;  @GCHQ already has them #FVEY 
Why? Just think about today's debate. 17 days to Brexit and:Some MPs are delusional, calling for what is basically the deal without the backstop Others seem to assume the 27 will just grant an extension out of pityAnd Corbyn is calling for an election 
This is a mightily impressive alliance and could yet hold the key to establishing what the House of Commons would vote FOR on the Brexit front   
The problem is Brexit itself says @DavidLammy No David the problem is parliaments refusal to deliver it!  You will all be deselected in the next GE. 
brexit is what happens when a dog finally catches a car 
The only referendum we need is a Unity Referendum. #UnityRef 
Americans: haha wow the UK is having some REAL PROBLEMS huh look at that whole BREXIT MESS, those Brits are really screwed!Americans: hahahah so screwedAmericans: hahahaAmericans: hahaAmericans: haAmericans: we're still so much worse oh my god we're so much worse 
FOI reveals @NigelDoddsDUP took a break from #Brexit to STOP homes being built in his North Belfast constituency where 1000s are homeless & Catholic families suffer long term religious inequality in housing supply. Why would an MP do that? @EqualityCommNI @LADFLEG @theresa_may 
Britain is a parliamentary democracy. The Conservative government has fallen apart in office. There has to be an election - with the final outcome of new Brexit negotiations put to a referendum - it's the only way out 
Reading playing Hotel California, which might be a joke about Brexit. Or possibly their season-ticket holders. #lufc 
Seriously, somebody needs to fucking help the people out here and get a grip of this madness @krishgm @StevePeers @mrjamesob @JimMFelton @JamesMelville @adamboultonSKY @theipaper @gavinesler @davidmacdougall @Stone_SkyNews @M_Markakis @StephenMangan @GeorgePeretzQC @nealerichmond 
What should happen now?#BrexitVote#brexit 
“No deal” is merely the term Remain has given to the Brexit we voted for in referendum & GE. There4, tomorrow our elected MPs, against their manifestos & the people, will vote to take the electorate’s #Brexit off the table. 16m voted to leave EU. 500 megalomaniacs refused it! 
A few thoughts:1) the chances of a "softer Brexit" are lower than most seem to assume. It's more complicated than MPs raising their hands once2) chances of no deal, possibly after a short extension, are higher for the same reason - you can't just "take no deal off the table" 
Brexit has been killed by a Parliament that never wanted it, says Rod Liddle: 
Zack smugly strolling into Parliament to sort out Brexit once New Japan Cup is over  
Enough with this Lexit nonsense, already. Negotiations are OVER. There isn't any jobs-first Brexit. There isn't any Lexit, or Common Market 2.O. We're done with that cakes n' unicorns shit. It's extend & #PutItToThePeople with an #Optiontoremain, or #RevokeArticle50. 
What’s done is done, nows the time to for all Conservative MPs to swing behind what the British people voted for and deliver on Referendum and manifesto promises. 
Dear @Conservatives MP’s Please remember that many, many @UKIP voters loaned you their vote at the last two GE’s. If you want to retain their votes, please vote FOR No Deal tomorrow, the ONLY true Brexit, many thanks. From Tory Voters. 
The UK only agrees on ONE thing about Brexit:We all want this #BrexitShambles to be over so we can move on.Well, we haven't got a *trade* deal yet, so unless you want THOSE negotiations to dominate the national discussion for the next 5+yrs we need a vote to stop Brexit NOW. 
Here's that Graham Brady interview discussing what comes next, including whether voting to delay Brexit without a deal constitutes a breach of the manifesto:  
In other Brexit news...  
"An Englishman, a Scottish man and an Irishman walk into a bar. The Englishman wants to leave, so everyone has to leave.” It's a joke. It's also the way a lot of people in Northern Ireland feel about Brexit:  
Found out. Isabel oakshott She is pushing all the time the mood of people is 'let's get on with it"No debate or even consideration that there were crimes in referendum.@campbellclaret said illegality contaminates referendum - she says both sides lied How does she get on? 
May of course should resign, a GE is pointless when the only 2 Parties that can form a government both want Brexit and neither wants a second referendum.So what is justification for EU to agree to an extension? 
The great frustration of this age is that the political classes keep treating the deliberate immiseration of so many people and places in Britain as a sideshow to the high drama of Brexit” Excellent from @chakrabortty austerity was simply to hurt the poor 
Brexit Meltdown: cover of the new Spectator.  
So, they seem to be set to rob us of our Brexit. This account always predicted 'they' would never let us become independent of the Euromonster. We live in interesting times. #LIBERTY 
I voted tonight against May’s Brexit deal. It’s a disaster for Britain, it was rightly crushed and is now dead. Tomorrow I will vote against no deal. Thursday I will vote to delay Brexit in the hope that will allow a people’s vote to break this disastrous political logjam 
New: Unionist propaganda fail as poll shows 60% support for second Scottish independence referendum  
Spot on. I really didn't want Scotland to leave the UK but now I can only apologise and wish you had escaped this utter madness. I hope you do, brexit has shown the utter contempt english mps have for the other union members, it was always probably so but what a disgrace. 
#meaningfulvote reaction from @ElmarBrok_MEP - from European Parliament’s Brexit Steering Group- he blames ERG: whatever EU could offer they’d vote against. - he says he *doesn’t* think EU will agree to long extension - @Geoffrey_Cox killed it all because he’s a brexiteer 1/2 
My wife and I have decided to take whole family to negotiate the deal for our next car. Before the garage put any deal out there, we’ve told our kids to make it clear we all want the car - whatever the price, or the finance package on offer #Brexit  
No deal is better than a bad deal, it’s not agreed until it’s all agreed, nothing has changed , brexit means Brexit , we are leaving the SM and customs union. Shambles on every conceivable level ...  
MPs have again rejected the PM’s #BrexitDeal, this time by 149 votes. The MU reiterates its support for a #PeoplesVote. Any future Brexit deal must enable musicians working in the EU to travel freely & easily across all member states. #WorkingInTheEU #BrexitVote 
May has achieved Phase 1 of her plan, by agreeing (and having rejected) the worst deal ever.Phase 2 will be to ensure #Brexit is delayed, with or without a second referendum. Phase 3 will be to show a deal is unachievable, so we may as well stay in! 
May to vote against No-Deal tomorrow.Thus repudiating her voters, party, MPs, election manifesto, Mansion/Lancaster House promises, & any residual pretence of wanting to 'deliver the Referendum result'.Reverting to the Remainer she always was and has never stopped being.RESIGN 
Someone on #gbbo just created Brexit in pastry form  
After MPs voted down May’s #Brexit deal again - by a huge majority of 149 - PM mentioned a new referendum as an option. Corbyn didn’t. Hopefully, Labour leader isn’t backsliding. @HugoDixon writes 
'Tonight we will table a motion for debate tomorrow to test whether the House supports leaving the European Union without a deal on 29th March.' Read UK PM Theresa May's statement to parliament after her #Brexit deal was defeated  
May 'profoundly regrets' parliament voting down Brexit deal – video  
Brexit’s going well isn’t it?Did yis ever think you’d see the day when we’d all be thinking “Brits In!” would be a good thing? #Brexit #BritsIn 
Voted remain in 2016 and been committed to leaving since the people's vote.Voted tonight to Bank what we had and move to the next stage fearing Brexit may be frustrated.  I will be voting tomorrow to keep no deal on the table. I will vote on Thursday against extension to A50. 
It would be a nightmare for Brexiteer MPs if tonight's vote leads to a second referendum, May's deal vs Remain, where they have to campaign for a deal they've been trashing for over a year 
Paul Ryan is an establishment weenie, but on this point, he's right: If 2020 is about Trump, Trump & Republicans lose.2018 was a referendum on Trump. Trump & Republicans lost.  
Theresa May is the General Melchett of British politics.#Brexit #BrexitVote 
2010 - Tories gave a cast iron guarantee on EU Membership - Election won2014 - UKIP won EU Elections 2015 - Promised EU Referendum - Election won2016 - Brexit referendum won with 17.4m votes2017 - 80%+ vote for Brexit supporting parties in GEWe've been very consistent! 
Today in Brexit news:  
Struggling to see the point of short A50 extension i.e pre-EP elections. HMG isn’t going to flip 149 with this WA. Increasingly feel there has to be big political change to avoid no-deal — Norway, GE, referendum. This needs a bigger delay. May hinted at it tonight, EU favours it. 
"Hold an #InformedConsent Referendum on EU membership" PetitionPASSES 85,000 SIGNATURES and IS REALLY SPEEDING UP after all of #TheresaMay's SHENANIGANS!!!!Please SIGN & REPEATEDLY ReTWEET as many people do not sign a petition on THEIR first sighting! 
I don't want to leave. There is no longer a majority in the country for any form of Brexit.Persist with any Brexit and you will throw the Tories a lifeline.@johnmcdonnellMP@Keir_Starmer@UKLabour@TheIndGroup@TheGreenParty@LibDems#WithdrawalAgreement 
I’m disappointed that the Commons voted against the Withdrawal Agreement. I genuinely worry that some MPs are using this as a Trojan Horse to stop Brexit and those voting against to get a “WTO Brexit” have inadvertently helped them. 
Theresa May putting her deal to parliament 17 days before Brexit #gbbo 
Meanwhile, amid all this excitement, did Jeremy Corbyn mention a second referendum this evening. Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha gulp ha ha ha ha ha ha ha! (Deep breath.) No, but he did find time to talk about a General Election again. As useful as a stinkbomb in a spacesuit. 
Clearly the Brits are in no position to make up their minds on an agreed #Brexit. Enough is enough. They can be suicidal if they so wish but the #EU no longer has the luxury to play their game. The stability of our Union is far more important than the instability of theirs #shame 
Insert own Brexit punchline...  
Theresa May's Brexit deal was defeated again. Here's what could happen next:  
A conservative minister (Cairns) continuing with the lie "we were instructed to leave"Referendum was advice, and fatally flawed by illegal campaigning and lies.We do not "have to leave"#RevokeA50 
We're rightly focused on Brexit tonight because of May's massive defeat. But don't forget #SpringStatement2019 is tomorrow. #ToryAusterity is another disaster they've inflicted on us.Be ready to call out the lies pushed by the Tories and their media pals 
By the end of this week parliament will be in open opposition to the majority of the electorate.This time it's Brexit.But remember this,  whether you voted leave or remain, who knows what it will be the next time?You've been warned. 
What will happen if we extend article 50 and the EU won’t budge anymore on the deal and then we have another referendum and people vote to leave again ? Just a thought because that’s a possibility!( I can’t think about an election)! 
BBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBRRRRRRRRRRRRRRREEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIITTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTCAN WE END THIS FARCE VERY SOON SO WE NEVER HAVE TO SEE OR READ THIS BRAIN DEAD WORD EVER AGAIN. THANK YOU.#brexit #BrexitShambles 
6% of MPs changed their mind on the Brexit deal after eight weeks and minor changes. Imagine how many voters have changed their minds after nearly three years and some MAJOR changes... #BrexitVote 
After the #BrexitVote Jeremy Corbyn seems to have forgotten his support for a People's Vote. Liberal Democrats have fought Brexit for nearly 3 years - and we're closer than ever to securing a People's Vote! If you're sick of Brexit, join our campaign  
If Brexit clarity doesn't come soon, the fallout will be savage | Analysis by CNN's @lukemcgee  
The UK to the UK, re: Brexit  
Currently, the things that’s annoying me most isn’t that a gang of disaster capitalists colluded with shady foreign interests to hijack a referendum for profit. It’s that in doing so they’ve made our country an international laughing stock. 
Jeremy Corbyn responds to vote on Theresa May's failed Brexit deal  
Just say it David: Revoke Art 50.Honestly, it's not that difficult. 
The British Parliament rejected Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit plan for a second time, with just 17 days before the U.K. is due to leave the European Union. The vote wasn't even close.  
Those countries are: Malta, Luxembourg, Cyprus, Estonia, Latvia, Slovenia, Lithuania, Croatia, & Ireland. Under Article 50(3) TEU all 27 EU members have a veto on the nature & duration of any Brexit extension, as Westminster is likely to vote in favour of requesting on Thursday.  
JUST IN: UK Parliament votes for second time against May's Brexit deal  
What would you prefer to see? Please vote and retweet #Brexit #PeoplesVote #WithdrawalAgreement 
.@asabenn: By voting down the deal again, Brexiteers have left Brexit at the mercy of Remainers and the EU 
NO BREXIT FFS 
ALL parties should be hanging their heads in shame. Not least the party that has difficulty endorsing two referendum results, yet apparently wants another two in the name of “democracy”.  
We’re now heading for a no-deal Brexit – but not just yet  
BREAKDOWN: How MPs voted on #Brexit deal by party:*FOR*- Conservatives: 235- Labour: 3- Independents: 4*AGAINST*- Labour: 238- Conservatives: 75- SNP: 35- Independents: 17- Lib Dems: 11- DUP: 10- Plaid Cymru: 4- Green: 1(Source: Commons Votes Services) 
Ummmm, no. Voting No Deal is NOT 'honouring the referendum'. We did NOT to vote to leave without a deal. If you think we did, put it to us. What are you scared of? 
How about holding a vote on whether there should be a second Brexit vote and put this matter to rest. 
Theresa May’s Brexit deal is dead — MPs must now take control  
Folks, it is as I have been arguing for 2 years: The biggest obstacle to Brexit remains the hardliners themselves. They crafted unsquareable red lines and continually moved the goalposts. This is their fault and their fault alone. 
We’re now heading for a no-deal Brexit – but not just yet | Coffee House  
I know this is petty. But I have a list of everyone who ever told me to move to Europe if I don't like Brexit.  I am going to have to try very hatd to not ask them where they have moved to if we Remain. 
Deeply saddened by the outcome of the #Brexit vote this evening. Despite clear EU-assurances on the backstop, we now face a chaotic #NoDeal #Brexit scenario. And time is almost up. We will intensify our #NoDeal preparation 
17 days.1 7  d a y s.Every day watching the government (& the opposition for that matter) is an abject disappointment.No hope of backbone, but real leadership would be revoking article 50 based on a referendum question being without vital nuance.(Also illegal campaigning!) 
I’m also hearing that Brexit killed the Panther Solo. 
A spokesman for EU President Donald Tusk said the result today increases the risk of the UK crashing out the bloc without a deal 
Absolutely. @jeremycorbyn is a Brexiter through and through. I also don’t believe for one second he voted to Remain in the referendum given this:  
Theresa May is still marching us towards a cliff edge Brexit.But Parliament can block the road to ruin.Time for all MPs to act in the national interest and vote to rule out No Deal. #BrexitVote 
Oh dear this is all so heavy and confusing, my brain is beginning to hurt.I think I’d catch up with the Archers. Dum de dum de dum de dah.........Ah, that’s better. #brexit #meaningfulvote #exitbrexit 
The EU has recognised Russian interference in Brexit vote - why don’t our MPs? 
If no deal remains the default outcome and an extension relies on the unlikely scenario of MPs convincing Brussels that they can find a consensus approach to Brexit, then the only unilateral option available to parliament is to revoke Article 50. 
Clear response to Theresa May's #Brexit deal from SNP MPs. Theresa May: "Does this House want to hold a second referendum?" SNP MPs [shout]: "YES!"  
Cancel Brexit.  
The United Kingdom played themselves. if only they knew or appreciated investments & wealth opportunities created by the Europeans they would never have championed the Brexit move. It was a selfish move that did more harm than good. Referendum gamblers #Brexit 
A politician person just said on Radio 4 that Infiniti was leaving the UK because of Brexit. He didn’t mention no one wanting to buy one of its cars for the past decade. 
Well we didn’t BREXIT today so I suppose we will see more and more of BREXIT in the news over the next few months or years or decades. BREXIT off willya. 
We deserve a second referendum now. You tried to deliver, you failed. STOP this nonsense already. 
Business leaders react with dismay to Brexit 'circus'  
Brexit Logic 101: Shoot yourself in the foot, repeatedly. Exhibit A: This is literally the best deal Brexiteers can get & they *still* won’t vote for it bc they want unilaterally exit a backstop that they say doesn’t need to exist because ‘tech’ will solve the border issue. 
#Brexit vote: What just happened?  
Tonight Parliament has voted against May’s Deal. Tomorrow, we will most likely vote against No Deal. It is now time for the leaders of this country to accept that the problem is not this deal or that deal. The problem is Brexit itself. 
The Prime Minister likes to pretend that she plays everything straight down the line, but tomorrow’s motion looks crooked as a cork screw: we can vote down No Deal - but it’s still the default option if we don’t vote for hers!! Parliamentary sovereignty is being crushed by Brexit 
Both Brexit and Trump happened in 2016, we need a do-over for both. 
May’s Brexit deal is dead — MPs must take control  
#Brexit deal: How did your MP vote? Use our tool to find out   
The MINUTE they offer a new public Brexit vote I hope every UK YouTuber makes a video telling young people to immediately get off their arses and vote. 
Tonight we have seen yet another historic defeat for Theresa May's hopeless Brexit deal.Labour has put forward a credible alternative Brexit plan to protect jobs, our rights & our security.  
EU v on message about extension tonight. In private some leaning to longish extension, but no default position on how long. Others impatient/worried about being tangled up in Brexit for too long.Wild card element is that EU leaders have never discussed the question 
Dear @Keir_Starmer,  @Remain_Labour supporters are alarmed at Jeremy's comments tonight.He implied #Labour would go back to pushing an alternative #Brexit plan.Please can you restate that party policy is to back a #PeoplesVote and support it in parliament?Thank you. 
Dutch PM “regrets” tonights #Brexit vote result. Says Dutch Gov will work to limit impact under the “now more likely case of a no-deal”. On a possible extension, says EU27 will “consider the request & decide by unanimity” - but would expect a “credible & convincing justification”  
Speaking Live from New York this evening on @cnni, Sinn Féin President @MaryLouMcDonald has said that a referendum on Irish Unity is inevitable in the event of a no-deal Brexit.#Time4Unity #BrexitVote #Tá32 
This is very *very* important: tomorrow's vote on a No Deal Brexit will not take no deal off the table, regardless of the vote outcome. Imagine it like a door that  can only swing one way. If MPs vote in favour of no deal, that confirms and accelerates that outcome. 
As MPs reject Theresa May’s Brexit deal by a 149 majority, here’s how every MP voted  
From top to bottom, from leftmost flank to right, from start to finish, Brexit is an obstinate refusal to look reality in the face. Each time a Brexiton is confronted with reality, it runs, or hides, or crumples.This can end only one way. 
The "Nos" have it: Latest #Brexit deal voted down in Parliament.  
Suella Braverman speaking on BBC News says she will vote to keep No Deal ON the table“I can still look people in the eye and say that I didn’t voted for something that wasn’t Brexit.“We should now honour our manifesto pledges and that no deal is better than a bad deal.” 
Busy today & decided to plough aheadNo surprise that the British House of Chaos has played fast & loose with the GFAPeople in Ireland are genuinely worried & concern about the impact that Brexit will have on their livelihood + society.There is only 1 solution #irishunity 
Oh good, @SkyNews have sought out Dr Death for a view on #Brexit.He always galvanises Leavers.What credibility does Alastair "let's go for a walk in the woods" Campbell actually have? 
Rees Mogg Straps Steam Powered Explosive To Chest, Demands Worst Brexit Possible  
This is how surreal Brexit gets:The Government is offering a *free vote* on its no deal motionBUT Labour is prepared to whip *for* an amended version of the same motionApparently Spelman, Dromey et al are preparing to table an amendment that rejects no deal outright 
During yesterday’s Brexit statement I asked the PM’s deputy what he’d be most proud of when the history books are written; Destroying the futures of our young people. Decimating the economy or;Super charging the case for Scottish Independence?He seemed a bit baffled  
They call Brexit Breatimeacht on the nuacht. Sasamach is a slang name for it.I hope that clarifies things. 
Imagine if all the money/ resources/ time that has been wasted on a useless  #BrexitDeal had instead been spent on the NHS. Or homelessness. Or housing. Or anything. Millions squandered, & all this based upon a corrupt referendum. #BrexitVote #PeoplesVoteNow 
Here's my prediction and it's not good for Brexit.MPs will vote to extend article 50, the EU will agree to but only if we have a second referendum.I think this has been the plan for over 2 years. 
UK: Parliament vote on May's (Con-ECR) Brexit deal:For: 242Con-ECR: 235Ind.-*: 4Lab-S&D: 3Against: 391Lab-S&D: 238Con-ECR: 75SNP-G/EFA: 35Ind.-*: 17 (inc. TIG)LDEM-ALDE: 11DUP-NI: 10PC-G/EFA: 4Greens-G/EFA: 1#Brexit #BrexitVote 
Only positive of Brexit? Theresa May memes.   
Play with me. If Brexit was a painting. The Raft of the Medusa?  
No deal Brexit, only option left that actually delivers on the result of the referendum. 
If you think the deal is bad, then presumably you think Labour acted in the country's interests this evening. Shouldn't you be pleased they opposed the government's Brexit successfully? 
No deal isnt better than a bad deal-it’s the only deal-the right deal.  Its Brexit!How many votes is it going to take til the penny drops!? Utterly depressing how many were prepared to capitulate #TheBrexitVote 
Why a no-deal Brexit is nothing to fear, says Prof David Collins  
Amid Brexit madness, today marks 25 years since women were ordained in CofE. I’m so grateful to the trailblazers. My day may not be typical but plenty of us are Ministers in Secular Employment. So here are the two parts of my life. #JustAPriest25 (#stilladeacontillJune) 
I would say the majority of Brexit voters want a WTO Brexit.Parliament doesn't want a WTO Brexit so in the end despite the EU referendum being about the will of the people we will end up with something most of us do not want.GE now so we can vote for WTO Brexit candidates 
Brexit was about taking back control, instead the UK spiralled out of control. Only cross-party cooperation putting Country first, can end this mess. If this happens we will fully engage. #BrexitDeal 
BrexitWhat a load of dogshit That’s the best I can sayGod knows how many years of doing nothing has produced nothingMassive surprise 
One day... one sunny day, you will get through a day of news without hearing the word 'Trump' or 'Brexit'. 
Some say we're 1 step closer to an election.Others say we're 1 step closer to delivering Brexit.Some say we're 1 step closer to  #PeoplesVote.Others say we're 1 step closer to No Deal.What we're not 1 step closer to is the certainty we deserve on #CitizensRights. 
Chandler is pushing for a hard brexit in order to crash the UK's economy so the government is forced to sell off its assets on the cheap just to keep the country afloat, and he'll swoop in to buy it up for a fraction of what it's worth. 
Today I cried because there is a more than 42 week wait for PIP appeals, my kids school is significantly underfunded, austerity isn’t over, 2.5 m is not easily found in a budget & because the PM has wasted 3 months flogging this brexit deal when she knew it was dead. #todayicried 
.@NicolaSturgeon says the PM and the UK Government should hang their heads in shame.  Says they pandered to Brexit extremists.  No deal must be ruled out and the Art 50 negotiating process must be extended to allow another EU referendum - which should have the option of remain. 
Ian Blackford on sky news has just said “it doesn’t really matter how the public voted in the referendum”. Well Mr Blackford I’d like to correct you right there, it fucking does matter. It matters a lot. 
Only 3 (yes, just three) Labour MPs voted in favour of Theresa May’s Brexit deal:Kevin BarronCaroline FlintJohn Mann  
UK has to leave the EU with a No Deal #Brexit.We've morphed into a nation of lily-livered institutionalised lemmings, happy in servitude to drunken corruption.Another generation & we'll be lost totally.Stand up straight, UK, you embarrass yourself with your slouching. 
Putin lost huge today. HUGE. #Brexit must be done right not done fast. We will #DelayBrexit, that’s clear. If @MichelBarnier @JunckerEU act up on Russia’s behalf, we just revoke A50 with a mandatory re-invoking before the end of the Parliament 
Seventeen days before the planned #Brexit departure date, Britain’s parliament rejects Prime Minister Theresa May’s deal  
My comment on tonight’s Brexit fiasco.  
With only 17 days left until March 29th, the Dutch government will keep working tirelessly to make sure the damage for NL and Dutch citizens living and working in the UK is minimised in the now more likely case of a no-deal #Brexit. 
I may be wrong - I often am - but I genuinely think most of the papers and TV will lead on May losing the Brexit vote. In fact I’d be really surprised if they didn’t. Let’s wait and see.  
Come on Dan we Brexiteers have never had control of Brexit. A Remainer PM, Remainer negotiating team of Civil Servants, Remainer Cabinet and Remainer Parliament!  @DPJHodges 
They're not rebels! They're trying to honour the referendum & manifesto that put them in their seats.  
The world is run by these feckless old white conservatives. #Brexit is and always will be a really stupid idea. An idea that a bunch of old white conservative Tory's adopted directly from Vladimir Putin, hook, line and sinker. All the while the younger generation is yelling NO!!!  
History of #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Andrew Lilico suggesting abolishing the monarchy for Brexit at 4.15am is a big mood.  
Andouillette is basically Brexit sausage. Looks horrible, tastes worse, full of crap but once you've ordered it you're apparently supposed to just get on with eating it even though there's better options.And even having a nice pudding can't erase the disgusting taste.  
Tonight Parliament resoundingly rejected the PM’s dangerous #Brexit.   Now it’s more urgent than ever that the people have their day.Together we must make the future we want. #peoplesvote 
The possibility of a second referendum was mentioned by the PM tonight, not by Labour. 
"We want Brexit with a deal.""This is my deal.""We don't like this deal.""Then who do you want as PM?""We want you.""But I want a deal.""So do I.""Here's the deal.""This is terrible I vote nay.""Then leave without a deal.""What are you crazy?" 
So what on earth happens now that @theresa_may has lost vote on her Brexit deal AGAIN?  
"We can't let Theresa May kick the can down the road again. Parliament must not be bullied into voting for a deal that leaves people worse off.he people - not politicians - deserve the final say on Brexit." @joswinson 
I suggested a penalty shootout to decide #brexit deadlock about 12 months ago. Still haven't seen a better idea...... 
He doesn't represent Tamworth but only himself, he has no opinion on Brexit. 
I asked Richard Burgon repeatedly if Labour would now move to a second referendum. Repeatedly said Labour’s policy would be to seek approval for its Brexit deal. Said Lab would only want to see an extension to A50 for a couple of months at most-something now likely not available. 
You sounded out of your depth and out of touch tonight @jeremycorbyn Ranting on about a Labour Brexit when the vast majority in our Party want NO BREXIT at all isn't good enough.With 17 days to go, stand by Labour Policy and campaign for a public vote or stand aside. 
Could we please, for the love of FUCK, have a functioning opposition who have something other than a fantasy Brexit deal and a pointless general election that they'll lose massively?? Anyone?? ANYONE?? The country is going to die on its arse, here. 
Time for Parliament to vote on all the Brexit options comparatively, knocking one out at a time until the most popular is left. If there is a majority for anything, take it to the EU. If not, take it back to the people in a general election or another referendum. And apologise. 
Nicola Sturgeon tells BBC Scotland that "there must be an extension [of Article 50] long enough to allow another EU referendum to take place" - "if parliament can't decide, and parliament has failed to decide, then the people must decide" 
The crack troops of the ERG...#Brexit  
The BBC is reporting that @theresa_may will vote AGAINST a Clean Brexit tomorrow in the free vote - now we see her true colours #MeaningfulVote #Brexit 
Here's the First Minister's full response to the Brexit vote result 
There’s a hole in my Brexit, Theresa, Theresa. There’s a hole in my Brexit, Theresa, a hole. 
The United Kingdom since the Brexit referendum was called nearly three years ago  
Just a reminder: David Cameron did this. #brexit 
Brexit just suffered another huge defeat — the UK now has about two weeks left to figure out what to do. Here's what would happen if they left the EU with no deal:  
As a militant abstainer, I can't for the life of me see why a second referendum would be any better than the first - which handed yet more power to the executive and resulted in what a lot of people have treated as a draw anyway. 
Brexit in GIF   
.@NicolaSturgeon says "by rights this PM and govt should be out of office this evening" - "failure to listen after first defeat & continuation of pandering to Brexit extremists made tonight inevitable". Says UK is "teetering on the edge" - Commons must now vote against no deal 
A Few Of The Times David Davis Dumped On Theresa May's Brexit Deal. Just Before He Voted For It.  via @MarkDiStef 
Any Brexit deal would be bad for London.  After the PM’s second huge defeat this evening it is more clear than ever that we should end this madness - one way or another.   
Hi @timloughton. Please could you explain why you have decided to vote for Theresa May’s deal after voting against her last time? The south east will be one of the worst affected areas post-brexit. This deal DOES NOT support our local jobs, many of which on the channel tunnel 
Quick! Just starting on @BBCTwo #InsidetheFactory from #BurtononTrent devoted to beer. Friendly faces spotted already @SchoolofBooze @jaegawise.Missed the start due to wretched Brexit... 
MPs cheer when Theresa May asks if they want a second Brexit referendum  
Dear @Conservatives MP’s, you’ve got a free vote on the No Deal Vote tomorrow. If you would like to retain your seat at the GE, please ensure you vote FOR No Deal & we will love you. Traitors to a real No Deal Brexit will lose their seat at the next GE. From Tory Voters  
Corbyn calls for a General Election after the #Conservatives lose the #Brexit vote by 149. Bring it on  #JC4PM 
The British people are being betrayed over Brexit.17.4 million voted to leave the EU.We need to leave the EU with a no deal.We know the government and the 650 MP’s will betray us!Come on Theresa stand up. 
BREXIT: Time for the UK to adopt the Icelandic  option #Brexit #efta  
The paperback of my Rise and Fall of the British Nation with a new preface with thoughts on Brexit is out 4th April @kingshistory @kingsah @kingscbh  via @PenguinUKBooks 
To avoid No Deal, @theIndGroup is arguing that the Government must hold a series of indicative votes in the Commons on all the Brexit options and the majority view should be put to the people in a People's Vote. We must make a decision, there is no time to waste.  
In life we can do whatever we like. For me the meaning of life is the pursuit of virtue. Virtue means knowing right from wrong, good from bad. #brexit is a total shamble. It is bad and very wrong because it will make the UK poorer & isolated. It’s a no brainer for me.  
No-Deal crash out represents the single biggest threat to the citizens that Nigel and the DUP are elected to represent - ordinary families, local farms, and small & medium enterprises all being used as a bargaining chip in DUP’s #Brexit roulette  
Brexit at Tiffany’s  #ReallySlowFilms 
I will never forgive Corbyn for the way he's handled Brexit, among other outrages.@UKLabour is dead to me as long as that man is their leader.@LBC #newsnight #PeoplesVote #r4today 
Editorial: Parliament has failed (again), so let the people decide Brexit in a Final Say referendum  
Smashing afternoon with some of my fab @BBCBreakfast family at the #TRICawards — now on way to Birmingham for tomorrow’s show talking to businesses about the latest Brexit shenanigans. #thepartyisover 
Ok. Das GIF ist auch ganz passend. #BrexitVote #Brexit  
MPs reject May's Brexit deal for second time by majority of 149 - video  
*Brexit talks collapse*Christopher Chandler: *laughs in disaster capitalist*  
take 5 seconds to just look at this strong horse which is nothing to do with #Brexit  
MPs can’t stop her without coalescing on a single alternative with majority support. And that can’t happen as long as 2nd ref and soft Brexit supporters each think the other one will drop out first. Ending May’s game of chicken requires ending her opponents’ game of chicken first  
There’s little to say. What’s the point in passing judgment on various deals that can’t pass? Increasingly looks like this parliament itself is at fault: it can’t agree on any legitimate form of Brexit. 
Fully respecting the result of the referendum. 
2nd referendum means civil war @theresa_may . Don’t ruin this country anymore than the remainers already have  @Smileygirl19681 @inthematrix888 @chatteris18 @JoeKerr52264597 @MOD418 @BluehandArea @white_arrow_uk @_jchr5667_ @HaroldSHill1 @Kalimeralynn 
Head of #Brexit @AndrewGray_PwC gives his reaction to the news of the #BrexitDeal failing to pass through Parliament: “the most pressing concern for business is no longer uncertainty, but the persistent threat of no deal.” Read more here:  
Theresa May's Brexit approach summarised in cat form... #BrexitVoteCheck out the rest of my #BrexitCatGIFs  
Can someone explain to me in childlike terms what happened. No more brexit? No more Teresa? Delayed brexit? 
Our President on #Brexit: “A no deal Brexit would erect barriers to working together and clinical trials; it would seriously undermine our ability to attract and retain talented researchers and would mean losing access to up to half a billion pounds a year in funding.” 
Brexit Update: Time is splintering into multiple pathways, all damned.17 days to go.  
Me watching the Brexit vote.  
That wasn't 'Brexit' so they haven't. Brexit means not having to ask EU permission for things 
If Brits cannot even agree on Brexit, how will they be able to agree on a strategic course for the country once they‘ve left the EU? 
Theresa May became PM to lead us through brexit.She's failed.Since then she's also lost their majority, had to apologise for Windrush & Grenfell, been baited fit her hostile environment, overseen uncountable resignations & been condemned by the UN for austerity.#SackThePM 
Love how David Cameron said the Brexit referendum would settle the issue once and for all, and all that’s happened is wall-to-wall Brexit for years and years and yea 
BREAKING: Britain's Parliament overwhelmingly rejects Theresa May's Brexit deal  
Tory Brexiteer Jacob Rees-Mogg blames #Brexit impasse on a "historic disconnection" between voters and MPs - "52% of voters voted to leave, but probably 500 out of 650 MPs voted to remain"#BrexitVote latest:  
Continental take from @TomMayerEuropa  “It’s not not only Theresa May who has a huge problem, but the EU-27: who have to decide unanimously (!) whether to let the Brits impose an extension on  Brexit negotiations without knowing what they really want. Very, very delicate.”  
.@afneil on  tonight, tells @Jacob_Rees_Mogg “You cling to the false notion we can leave on No Deal terms, you are playing games with our future, you have let the country down tonight.” Rees Mogg is no friend of the working man or woman. #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Forget Brexit for a bit, Acaster is on #BaleOff 
Sir Graham Brady says he is ready to vote for NO deal Brexit tmw on grounds it will offer certainty for business and respect referendum result. Well, driving off a cliff gives you certainty - in a wacko way #BrexitCrisis 
EU leaders and senior officials have expressed dismay as the UK parliament rejected the #Brexit deal for a second time  
Senior Tory tells me there’s not an ‘immediate appetite’ for a messy leadership election but that TMay is toast #brexit 
Iain Dale takes aim at Brexiteers who voted against Theresa May’s deal tonight: “Well done everybody you’ve blown Brexit!” @IainDale | #BrexitVote 
I'm one of the biggest remainers out there and I think a 2nd referendum is a disastrously bad idea. What makes you think it's a solution to anything? 
UK PM May's Brexit deal has reached the end of the road: Boris Johnson  
If you voted leave and your MP votes against leaving without a deal it’s time to give them a kick in the ballot box! Vote for a party that will deliver the democratic will of the people! #SDP #brexit #LetsGoWTO 
Brexit is 411 hours away. #brexit 
“Parliament must now move swiftly to rule out a disastrous No-Deal Brexit, and extend Article 50 long enough to hold a second EU referendum - with Remain on the ballot paper”SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP on the way forward after the defeat of Theresa May’s Brexit plan  
That was sneaky, eh?Did we have a referendum on that? A constitutional amendment? Is #UN alignment just a bluff, that will be illicitly cemented in place as time goes by?Is that why #Trudeau cheats & sabotages #Canada?#cdnpoli #LPC #CPC #NDP #PPC #GreenParty #Treason 
In case it’s useful to have it all in one place, here’s a quick summary of all the progress Theresa May and her government have made on Brexit over the past 28 months:1. None at all.2. See point 1.3. That’s it.4. No, really.You’re welcome. 
The party will say it still backs a public vote as a way of blocking May’s deal if it somehow passes Parliament. But that’s it. No referendum on a softer Brexit, and no mention at all of one in Corbyn’s statement. 
As the world watches #Brexit continue to circle down the drain, Canadians really need to stop and think about whether or not they want a politician who still openly brags about "being pro-Brexit before it was cool" to become Prime Minister. #cdnpoli 
People of Britain: if you want all the Brexit news to JUST FUCKING STOP, then the only way is to stop Brexit.Otherwise you have it for the next fifteen years. At least. 
DUP Westminster Leader Nigel Dodds has told Sky News the best way to get a Brexit deal is to keep the "threat" of a 'no-deal' on the table 
is brexit cancelled yet  
Friendly reminder #brexit #fpoe #epicfail 
The scale of the defeat tonight was entirely foreseeable and foreseen. We’re at a critical moment. I’ll vote however I can to stop the UK crashing out without a deal and to give the public the final say. We have years and years of this ahead if we continue down this Brexit path. 
Theresa May has made such a pig's ear of Brexit, I'm surprised David Cameron hasn't tried to fuck it. 
#GrouchoMarx : "I’ve Had a Perfectly Wonderful Evening, But This Wasn’t It" #TheresaMay#Brexit  
That Brexit referendum was a really good idea. Everything went so smoothly afterwards. Hardly heard a thing about Brexit since. 
This is a pointless and unconstructive tweet but I just want to say to a sizeable proportion of my fellow Brexiteers: You utter idiots. You total fools. You had Brexit within your hands and you - through your bone headed idiocy - threw it away. 
To be clear, the deal on the table tonight did not deliver Brexit. It opened the doors wide to our being trapped in the customs union. I regret this as much as anyone. Everyone now has to make their next moves in the open: deal or no deal, extension or not. The public can judge. 
This is the moment MPs voted down the Prime Minister's Brexit deal for the second time, defeating it by 391 votes to 242 #BrexitVote 
Dear @NicolaSturgeon Please accept Scotland is not able to save England from itself...nor do we have any right to impose our view on them.Our MPs should singularly pursue the logic of dissolution of Scotland's Union with England, not reversal of a very English Brexit.#SNP 
There IS a majority to leave the EU on No Deal, it is what we voted for Now stop this pantomime, accept the referendum result and stop costing UK Billions due to uncertainty over business. 
I was waiting for the Brexit choose your own adventure story.  
at this rate the racist 85 year olds who voted leave to stop immigrants coming will die before brexit even happens. poetic justice 
Hey, @jeremycorbyn Where’s our referendum? 
With latest defeat of soft Brexit plan, time to accept there is no meaningfully better soft option in the cards. Only choices are no deal/hard Brexit or remain; time for PM May to put national interest b4 Tory unity, embrace remain as least bad choice, and call for 2nd referendum 
It is beneath the dignity of this country to have two main parties so utterly without talent, intellect, agreement or vision debating something as mind-bogglingly complex and dangerous as Brexit. 
BBC News: "People whose job it is to know about Brexit are running round like ferrets with their cock on fire, so let's interview some people in a snooker club who know the square root of fuck-all about Brexit" 
No Brexit should be going ahead at this time, given that the 2016 referendum has been proven to be corrupt, & police/ NCA investigations ongoing. Theresa May needs to stand down. If this farce continues, a #PeoplesVote should happen, & not more years wasted on “negotiations.” 
One thing people need to learn from Brexit is that referendums are bad. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: "Many people who supported Remain have accepted the result, and are willing to see us leave"Leading Tory Brexiteer says the "moral authority of 17.4 million people who voted Leave" means MPs must still find a way to deliver #Brexit 
The undead Brexit stumbles on  
Enough is enough Parliament. We urge you now for an A50 extension to avoid a very damaging #NoDeal, and for a cross-party consensus to emerge quickly for a new and more pragmatic #Brexit 
A serious & disappointing setback this evening in @HouseofCommons My hope is that before the end of this week, British politicians will realise how high the stakes are for millions of ordinary working people and start putting the national interest ahead of #Brexit politics 
Put a headteacher in charge of Brexit! they'd sort out this unruly mess! 
A No Deal Brexit is the equivalent of a 5 year old running away from home with nothing but a Capri sun. Except instead when the 5 year old gets to the end of the street and wants to go back home his parents have already moved house and no cunt gives a fuck anymore 
To lose one Brexit deal may be regarded as a misfortune, to lose both looks like carelessness. #dear #brexit #nodeal #brexitvote #parliament 
The results are in: Find out how MPs voted on Theresa May's Brexit deal  
Wanting to reiterate my suggestion that Theresa May call off Brexit but just not tell anyone 
The House of Commons voted tonight to reject Theresa May's Brexit deal. Here is the story we ran last month revealing that 111 out of 121 UK opinion polls since the start of 2018 have favoured remaining in the European Union.    
Tomorrow’s Govt motion presents a false choice, it fails to note that Govt could also withdraw A50, as a last resort if no other deal or referendum agreed, in order to prevent No Deal  
If I understood the order of the votes to come correctly:Wednesday: Should we just do Brexit without a deal and be legends?Thursday: Should we seek an extension?After that: What should we do with the time—2nd referendum/revoke Art. 50, general elections, more negotiations? 
No surprises here. There is no renegotiation of the WA by the EU. What Cox/ERG/DUP is demanding on the backstop is impossible for the EU-27 to agree to.Ball in London’s court. It’s really this deal, no deal or no Brexit. 
Not You, Scotland! Theresa May loses Brexit Deal by huge majority. BBC shows May's speech and Corbyn's in full, but cuts dead SNP Ian Blackford soon as he stands up. BBC - Waging Propaganda War on Scotland on behalf of the British People  
Brexit: MPs reject May's deal by 149 votes: May's deal was a shit sandwich.MPs now vote on whether to eat the plateful of shit (no deal), or stir the shit with a fork but delay taking a mouthful (postpone brexit). Not eating shit isn't on the menu. 
Dear Diary, Today we lost the Brexit deal for the second time, not surprised. Just disappointed 
4/ When he got off the train, I said "If you don't laugh about it.... You just want to cry."He smiled & agreed. Said goodbye.Humour is undoubtedly a brilliant tool to engage the apathetic - don't ever let anyone dismiss it's value.And keep laughing! #Brexit will be stopped! 
1/ On the train into London, I was sat with my placard on my knee scribbling this cartoon of @theresa_may & the guy sat opposite me said it was really good he asked if he could take a photo - to put on FacebookOf course, I obliged!  Then I started to chat about #Brexit...  
If anyone thought Corbyn backed a PV, tonight showed he never will. Offering a defeated May his customs union Brexit and off we go. 
Well, we might just have seen the Brexiters putting paid to Brexit 
Brexit reminds me of that episode of Friends where Chandler tries to quit the gym but just ends up signing up Ross. 
Stay strong Brexiteers, even if the betrayal becomes complete & we end up remaining, we will flood the EU with pro-REAL Brexit MEP’s & Parliament with Euro sceptic MP’s until we get a proper Brexit. Remaining is still better than May’s deal which would keep us under EU control 
Richard Burgon confirming Corbyn's Labour priority will be to avoid a #PeoplesVote if at all possible & go for a Fantasy Pay & Obey No Say #Lexit...and LOSE THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION#RevokeA50 Stop #Brexit & #Remain in Control in the EU!! 
After a SECOND huge defeat for May's disastrous deal, the @LibDems are campaigning harder than ever to hold a People's Vote and give the people a chance to exit from Brexit.Make sure you LIKE and RETWEET this post if you agree, and spread the word as widely as possible.  
It's a funny aspect of the dynamics of Brexit. Under any other reality, a PM who had been rejected, failed, humiliated this many times wouldn't just have resigned but possibly exiled to one of the few remaining overseas rocks the UK still retains. 
This #BrexitVote and the ones to follow demonstrate that the political establishment will simply not allow the nation to leave the EU on March 29.UKIP, the Party of Brexit supports leaving - no ifs, no buts and we are ready to fight for the 17.4M in whatever election may come.  
Jolly simpleton Richard Burgon is STILL talking about Labour's 'Brexit deal' which is something that DOESN'T EXIST 
In better times, both the Prime Minister and the Leader of the Opposition would be resigning tonight. May for a second crushing defeat. Corbyn for choosing a red Brexit deal over a dead Brexit deal, ignoring his own party’s policy of a People’s Vote. Westminster at its worst. 
Only three Labour MPs voted for the Brexit deal - Kevin Barron, Caroline Flint and John Mann. Those bribes on workers’ rights and a £1.6bn towns’ fund worked a treat. 
#BrexitVote latest:- MPs vote against Theresa May's #Brexit deal by 149 votes- 75 Conservatives voted against the PM- Parliament to have a free vote on whether UK should leave EU with no deal 
The promises of 2016 Ref, the vision for it by Leavers, is fritting away. The reality is nothing like the fantasy constructed. #EU #Brexit  
Richard Burgeon just said Labour’s priority is their Brexit deal. Not a #PeoplesVote.Not us.#BrexitCrisis 
You are a disappointment , you were instructed to get us Brexit but you've ratted on the manifesto & the voters trust . 
Theresa May's Brexit is now in tatters, she's lost twice now by two of the biggest margins in Parliamentary history, she must resign tonight, we've had enough, her party have made us an International laughing stock, she has to go, she's a disgrace #WithdrawalAgreement 
No big surprise, but still a vastly difficult situation now with Brexit Withdrawal Agreement defeated again. Now a free vote tomorrow on whether to crash out of the EU without an agreement or not. Meltdown.  
Good to see On BBC News Special Andrew Neil really sticking  it to Tories James Cleverly and Jacob Rees Mogg: “Historians will say this is the night you lost Brexit ..  “ so much for those numpties who claimed he’s biased @afneil 
Forget #Brexit . I’ve just watched two owls sparring while a shooting star dropped to earth behind them like molten metal. @BarnOwlCentre @37squadron @Laurels_Wood @TheFenlandReed @JDS9_Photo @VirtualAstro 
A reminder that ten days ago, Nigel Farage got whoops and cheers at CPAC for jazz-handing Brexit like some magical isolationist pixie dust that America too should snort before checking if it is laced with rat poison. 
PM confirms the NI No Deal border plan and tariff schedule will finally be made public tomorrowBusiness orgs have been bound by a NDA due to its sensitivityAny MP's who back a No Deal #Brexit in tomorrow's vote clearly don't really care about NI or playing a dangerous game 
If it wasn’t for Corbyn we could stop Brexit right now. He’s determined though. 
#BrexitCatGIFs Live footage of MPs voting against the #Brexit deal#BrexitVote 
Another resounding rejection of the #Brexit deal that would be disastrous for London. It’s time to give people a final say. #peoplesvote 
enough is enough- #brexit is a fucking national embarrassment. We are the laughing stock of the world. Let's just forget all about it and we promise to never mention it and pretend this shitstorm never happened? Deal? 
Tory Party is finished, not resting or sleeping, but as dead as Monty Python's Parrot. From Cameron to May. Read them the last rites,  get rid of this failed generation of useless Tory leaders that have failed our country #Brexit #ToryBrexitShambles #Tory 
EU washes hands of Brexit deal: 'We have done all that is possible'  
No-deal Brexit, here we come!I wonder if pending 28-days-later-esque crisis that will ensue will be enough to pierce the radically isolated information environment of American far right that cheers Brexit as freedom--or if they'll just drink whatever next sovereignty koolaid is? 
MPs have rejected Theresa May's Brexit deal for a second time by a majority of 149. That's a narrower defeat than the record 230 majority they inflicted on 15 January but it still leaves the question about what happens next wide open.Next steps?  
U.K. Parliament just turned down another Brexit deal 17 days from the deadline  
I think people were mislead and lied to. No one understood or knew the real implications of leaving the #EU Sadly #brexit was used as a solution to the UK’s problems by scapegoating the #EU and blaming immigration. What a shamble! 
Lots of analogies for esports people on brexit being thrown at me which, if it wasn't such a terrible situation would be hilarious.The UK is streaming in 360p right now and it's lagging. 
If Brexit happens and the UK is forced to leave the EU, they can still pay $500,000 to go to USC as an alternative 
Trying to remember a time before the news was dominated by Brexit. #BrexitVote 
@MaryRobinson01 Please vote to block a No Deal outcome. Vote to extend Article 50 and call for a confirmatory referendum. It’s the most democratic solution to this almighty mess. Please tell your constituents how you will vote ASAP. 
In 17 days Great Britain is taking back control. #Brexit 
Maybe they shouldn't do Brexit? just spitballing 
Dude, this is the same legislature that brought about the Brexit  
Just in:   UK parliament rejects Theresa May’s #Brexit deal. May defeated by 149 votes in vote. PTI 
Brexit outcome on 29 March 2019? Vote and retweet 
On my regular-ish 2-day trip from Uppsala to the UK, likely for the last time as two nations within the community of the EU. Regardless of wider views on Brexit, I think the UK’s leaving severely weakens the EU’s potential for driving a Paris-compliant global mitigation agenda. 
Andrew Neil to Rees-Mogg:"This is the night you lost Brexit!"Because the Brexit Rees-Mogg and the ERG want does not and cannot exist.It's an illusion. 
The British Parliament has rejected the Prime Minister Theresa May’s Brexit deal. What happens next? Another vote. Here’s our guide:  
Imagine how silly we'd all feel if somebody suddenly pointed out that the referendum was only advisory and this gargantuan shambles is entirely unnecessary. #brexitvote 
BOSS: You’re late againME: Well with this latest Brexit news, who’s to say, really 
EU elections in UK on the 23/5 just became far more likely.I'll stand @ForBritainParty in the North West.My main pitch to voters will be to deliver the #Brexit the 17.4m voted for.Most MPs, of all parties, have betrayed the 17.4m.#LibLabCon will be wiped out in EU elections. 
ICYMI: @amy_hoggart does the impossible and explains #Brexit to you in less than 7 minutes. #BrexitVote 
EU washes hands of Brexit deal: 'We have done all that is possible’  
So why didn't Corbyn mention this? Instead again pushed for Lexit and a GE.Fuck's sake, why is he being allowed to get away with this?! He's going to ensure Brexit and Labour Remainers don't seem to challenge him!@RCorbettMEP @SebDance @jessphillips @OwenSmith_MP 
Tonight the PM lost the #BrexitVote, failing to get her deal through Parliament. Now it’s time to fight for a #PeoplesVote!Join today and help us fight for a public vote on the Brexit deal:  
"If the #Brexit deal doesn't get through tonight there will have to be a General Election"Senior Tory MP Charles Walker says he can't see how Theresa May's government can continue in office. I agree with Mr Walker.#GeneralElectionNow 
Estimated 70% majority for Remain & against Brexit in elected Commons.Estimated at least similar majority for Remain & against Brexit in unelected  Lords.Parliament has become the Cradle of Anti-Democracy.#WithdrawalAgreement#BrexitVote 
So sad but this is what @HouseofCommons has done to its public image! Self serving elites who HATE what the public voted for! #Brexit  
After brexit, Windrush, Grenfell, the hostile environment, rising violent crime, austerity, NHS crisis & so much more, it's time to #SackThePM 
Tory deputy chairman James Cleverly just told the BBC he would "probably" vote for a no-deal Brexit tomorrow 
After this #BrexitVote we are closer than ever to securing a People's Vote on the Brexit deal.We're almost there - join our campaign to give the people the final say on Brexit and the option to stay in the EU  
British people clinging to their passports as Theresa May pulls them towards a no-deal brexit.  
Chamber reaction to the latest #Brexit developments & what it means for our businesses coming shortly...  
Alexa, show me a picture of an Arsehole. #Brexit #brexitvote #BrexitShambles 
#BrexitCatGIFs #BrexitVote SPECIAL. Results are in:It's the end of the line for #Brexit and the end of the line for Theresa May  
Theresa May's Brexit deal is rejected once again by Parliament, throwing Britain deeper into political crisis  
Taking a swipe at Theresa May's failed Brexit deal, a member of Parliament says a prime minister hasn't been defeated that badly since "the American War of Independence"  
You guys see this Brexit news? These latest developments? The ramifications sure are complex, no doubt about that. Lotta ins, lotta outs, lotta what-have-yous 
Westminster: "We can't agree on #Brexit".Reality: "Nobody cares. We had our vote, you only have to deliver it you lying swine excrement." 
If I never hear the word #Brexit again it will be to soon... I haven't a clue anymore what's going on....#BrexitVote #BrexitDogsDinner 
1. Leave the EU with no trade deal and become the only major economy in the world without a trade deal with its neighbours.or2. Stay in the EU.I'm pretty sure few if any would have voted for option 1 had they known when the referendum took place. 
The people.... the country... the parliamentarians do NOT want May's Withdrawal Agreement from the EU. They've NEVER wanted it. It is a national betrayal.May defeated on the second meaningful vote on her Brexit deal by 391 to 242. A majority of 149 against, reports Guido Fawkes 
Is Labour listening. The EU are not going to re start negotiations on a deal .. after 2 years I don’t blame them. So... stop using Brexit To drive your GE Agenda and while you are at it stop using meaningless phrases like “ we will sort this mess out” HOW!!! 
Brexit so far."Wow, 51.9%. We have won!""Great, let's leave the EU.""How do we do this?""Just trigger Article 50. Simples!""Done.""Yay!" [Pause]"And now what?" #BrexitVote 
The cheating Leave Eu official campaign which cheated in the Eu referendum backing serial cheat Boris Johnson who has cheated on wives, friends and now the British public. A den of vipers.  
BREAKING: UK parliament rejects PM Theresa May’s Brexit deal. Opposition Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn says the deal is “dead” - agencies 
My hot take on Brexit is that they should not do it.  
Noooooooooooo! It’s over.The deal is dead. Brexit should be too. One referendum but this bollox again and again and again?Just stop. Enough is enough.  
#BREAKING EU has done "everything it can" to get Brexit deal through, says Barnier  
Not that long since we in #PeoplesVote were being told it was all over. We've won nothing, yet, of course - but the PM just asked the house if they wanted a referendum and there was a big cheer - not dead yet! Priority now is big turnout on #PutItToThePeople march on March 23 
May crystal clear. When House votes against a No Deal Brexit, that will become the position of the UK government. Brexiteers, you have blown it big time. And you have no-one to blame but yourselves. All you had to do was tap the bell over the line. And you put it in the stands. 
her brexit deal has had more rejections than me at this point tf 
Still hoping that I will one day wake up from this nightmare. #Brexit 
Britain and Brexit in chaos: Parliament rejects May's EU deal again  
Why are the government treating Brexit like a uni deadline? You cannot sort this with an all nighter on March 28th. 
This is brilliant #brexit #EUWithdrawalAgreement 
NEW: Following defeat of Theresa May's Brexit plan, opposition leader Jeremy Corbyn says, "They must now accept their deal...is clearly dead.""Maybe it's time instead we had a general election."  
A bad deal is a BAD DEALNo deal is a BAD DEALAny Brexit is a BAD DEALGoing back to the people is the ONLY dealLabservatives: stop #PartyAboveCountryTime to #ExtendA50 #LetUsDecide #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #StopBrexitSaveDemocracy 
MPs reject Theresa May's Brexit vote again - what happens now?  
"It's difficult to see what more we can do," EU spokesman says after Theresa May's revised Brexit deal is rejected  This was Michel Barnier's response: 
During 2 years of Tory Brexit incompetence, people have been dyingIn our cities - knife crimeOn our streets - homelessnessIn homes & hospitals - austerity cuts & UC sanctionsAround world - climate change@Conservatives are guilty of Mass Manslaughter by Gross Negligence! 
Theresa May’s authority is in tatters along with Brexit as a project. We must extend Article 50 and pass legislation for  #PeoplesVote the Lib Dems have long argued.Public opinion looks to be firmly behind remaining in the EU rather than accepting this friendless deal. 
"These are unenviable choices... But they are choices that must now be faced."Theresa May says MPs must choose between revoking article 50, holding a second referendum, or #Brexit with a different deal.More here:  
In the “my country can too be just as dysfunctional as yours” competition, the UK is now neck and neck with the US. Parliament’s full-throated rejection of PM Theresa May’s negotiated Brexit deal with the EU signals a bit of bother for our friends.  
May's 'last-chance' Brexit deal is killed off after MPs vote NO 391 to 242: Brexiteer rebels humiliate PM a SECOND time and say 'it is time for no deal' as May faces calls to quit after losing historic vote via  
Brexit is destroying Brexit. The Brexit that was promised by the liars is undeliverable. The Brexit May negotiated is a dreadful deal. MPs cannot agree what Brexit means. And the only way to resolve this is to Put it to the People @peoplesvote_uk 
Il pensiero di noi eurofobici o sovranisti si riassume in questi 11 secondi o se preferite in questi 151 caratteri:“If we stand up for democracy we will be speaking up for hundreds of millions of people around Europe who agree with us but who currently have no voice “ #Brexit  
Theresa May's Brexit deal defeated for second time by MPs  
#BrexitDeal agreement once again fails in Parliament. #Brexit is to the UK what Trump is to America - unnecessary, deep & serious self inflicted wound brought about by identity angst. A self inflicted wound that without question undermines the country's future 
Missing Simon Ricketts' take on today's parliamentary shit show. He was totally convinced that Brexit wasn't going to happen. 
Anna Soubry on C4: Jeremy Corbyn is ‘pratting around’ and ‘talking out of his rear end’ by pushing Labour’s alternative Brexit deal and not mentioning a people’s vote - unparliamentary language but probably spot on. 
Crushing defeat again as MPs have rejected Thersea May's #Brexit deal for 2nd time. 391 voted down the deal, while 242 voted to pass it. Another vote tomorrow pathetic useless Tory Government  
Brexit: May defeated by 391 votes to 242 as MPs reject revised deal – Politics live  
The impasse has been caused by the EU’s intransigence. If the EU really wants a deal, then they need to offer an acceptable solution to the backstop, which Parliament voted in favour of through the Brady Amendment in January.Amend the backstop or lose £39bn and a #Brexit deal. 
Imagine if you had a bowling ball with a Union Jack on it, and you dropped it into a swimming pool full of treacle and watched it sloooowly sink to the bottom. That's Brexit. 
It’s the little things in life that make this situation that bit less painful #Brexit #BrexitDeal 
MPs have rightly voted down the worst deal in history and should now vote to keep No deal on the table. The mood of country is growing for a WTO Brexit. We can leave on March 29, save £39bn & be free to run our economy in our own interest. 
Kind of funny to watch same people who whine about the nonexistent US presidential popular vote easily dismiss the valid UK referendum for Brexit.I guess votes only matter when convenient? 
Tomorrow’s no deal motion is non-binding. Even if Parliament votes to reject no deal it makes absolutely no difference in the absence of a statutory instrument to alter the default exit date set in law in the European Union Withdrawal Act. #Brexit 
BBC: Now over to Number 10 for live reactions to the Commons' crushing #Brexit vote:  
This is the moment MPs rejected Theresa May's Brexit deal by 149 votes  
The most important part of @eucopresident’s response to the PM’s lost MV.EU27 need a “reasoned request” and a “credible justification” for an extension and its proposed duration.With 149 votes in it, it’s hard to see how 2-3 mths is more credible than 6-9 for a referendum. 1/  
Theresa May loses another #Brexit vote. Only one thing left to do: pick up the phone and tell the E.U. you'd like to reverse the decision based on a fraudulent referendum.  #Brexit  
New Brexit plan:1. Cry Havoc.2. Release the hounds of war.3. Slag the PM for a bit. 
PM announces new Brexit plan  
#BREAKING British MPs' vote "significantly" increases chance of no-deal Brexit, says Tusk spokesman  
As Brexit deal gets hammered again, a reminder from @PostRoz, @thamburger, @BoothWilliam & me of those days when the biggest Brexit backers were cozying up to Donald Trump and the Russian ambassador - at the same time.  
Time to wake up from this nightmare, cancel #brexit and get on with our lives. We have wasted so much time and money. What a disgrace the whole thing is!  
Does @UKLabour back a second referendum yet? 
At this moment of deep uncertainty for the UK, I’m offering to take over Brexit negotiations. I couldn’t exactly do any worse... #BrexitVote 
UK government and Brexit process in total meltdown. Scotland voted to remain in the European Union. We deserve better than this shambles. #BrexitChaos 
maybe brexit should apply as a lacrosse player 
Not one MP wants Brexit as their epitaph, but this catastrophe will certainly be the legacy of @theresa_may & I have absolutely no sympathy for her. She doesn't listen. She promised the impossible. She acted too soon in triggering A50 & so this is just desserts!#BrexitVote 
Cowardly. The PM has called this vote so she can abdicate responsibility and claim ‘I didn’t stop Brexit, Parliament did’.  
Agree.  A second referendum without Russian influence. 
MPs reject Theresa May's deal by 149 votes. Let’s get real, Prime Minister. Brexit does not mean Deal. Brexit means Brexit.  
I don't trust the Tories to hold a second referendum. General Election please. #SackThePM 
Let’s be clear about what’s happening in the #UK with #Brexit. * The PEOPLE voted to leave the EU. * Theresa May is trying to SABATOGE what the people want. Globalists Macron and Merkel need STAY OUT of it.End. FULL STOP.  
Another huge defeat for the Prime Minister. We must now rule out no deal, extend Article 50 and put this back to the people for a #FinalSay @peoplesvote_uk @LabPeoplesVote #Brexit 
One Tory MP tells me his colleagues will consider whether they will go to see Theresa May in a delegation to say that it is time to resign to reboot the Brexit talks. It could be a long night. 
i feel like brexit is like general hospital where like it's been on so long and you had to have been a fan from the beginning and it's too late to start now 
Can't we just pretend the whole brexit idea never happened? Like in one of those soaps when someone comes out of the shower and realises it was all a bad dream from eating cheese near to bedtime. 
okay, I’ll bite: what is brexit 
BREAKING: British lawmakers again reject PM May’s Brexit withdrawal agreement.@BillNeelyNBC on PM May: “She has just lost again by historic proportions. Last time, she lost by 230 votes. This time, she lost by 147.”  
La classe politica inglese, adesso, la peggiore d'Europa, e Dio sa che ce ne vuole #BrexitUK political leaders easily win all the negative records right now in Europe and God knows it is hard 
Theresa May has lost tonight’s #Brexit vote by 149 votes. In January, she lost a Brexit vote by 230 votes, the largest defeat in the history of Parliament.  It’s clear that she has no power, and no mandate. She must call a #GeneralElectionNow. 
Theresa, stop trying to make Brexit happen, it’s not going to happen. (Mean Girls voice) 
How does a general election solve Brexit?  
Extension and second referendum surely? Or do we really leave with No Deal? No. Deal.  Bonkers that that’s even a prospect.  
May seems to have finally taken a  side on a No Deal Brexit. Says she’s “passionate” about getting a deal, warns of “potential damage” to the Union of No Deal & offers ministers a free vote so can vote against No Deal tomorrow 
The EU's response: "Today's vote has significantly increased the likelihood of a 'no-deal' Brexit... Should there be a UK reasoned request for an extension, the EU27 will consider it and decide by unanimity".  
Labour's backing for a fresh referendum appears to have lasted a matter of days. A cynical political move to avoid further defections, promptly ditched. 
Yet again the BBC think Andrew Neil's response to #Brexit developments is more important than the first response from @IanBlackfordMP. Beeb continue to fail the people of Scotland. 
Remember any MP who votes to take #NoDeal off the table tomorrow is either stupid ( and shouldn't be near public office ) OR a traitor for blatantly disadvantaging #UK in any negotiations moving forward, you have to conclude they have the EU at heart not our great nation #Brexit 
For many months I’ve been arguing that a no-Deal exit was far likelier than the general pricing. Now it’s either that or an unprecedented Commons revolt against the Govt to impose a CU-style “soft” Brexit... which still seems marginally less likely 
Did I miss Jeremy Corbyn backing a second referendum, there? 
“Two months may have passed since the last vote, but the PM’s bad deal remains the same. Her failure to negotiate a better deal risks a catastrophic no-deal Brexit that would crash the economy and harm public services.” My statement on the latest Brexit defeat for the PM  
How many times did Theresa May say we'd leave on the 29th March? She's useless. Brexit can't be a compromise, we either Leave or Remain, & we've a Remain PM & Remain Parl't that simply refuse to deliver Leave. 
Prime Minister Theresa May's EU withdrawal deal has been rejected by MPs for a second time, throwing her Brexit strategy into further confusion.MPs voted down her deal by 391 to 242 - a smaller defeat than when they rejected it in January. 
Mays deal now in tattersNo Deal will be avoided on a free voteOnly way out is to adopt Corbyn/Starmer Brexit plan .@jeremycorbyn is now de facto Prime Minister of the United Kingdom & Northern Ireland .  #BrexitVote 
This is literally insane that nearly three years later nobody has any idea WTF they voted for on #brexit. A most unusual affair but then the Brits do like to obfuscate with elaborate, ornate and arcane pageantry so perhaps it all makes sense to someone somewhere?  
A majority of 149 against @theresa_may's Brexit deal. Enough is enough. We need a new Brexit negotiating team. We need a new government. We need a LAB government.#GeneralElectionNow 
Brexit bombs. What's next? #TheHistoryBoys on 'Brexit: the Rise and Fall of the EU'. Now available to all: @adamgarriereal #TheresaMay #Britain #UK #EU 
BREAKING: British Parliament Rejects Brexit Deal For A Second Time.  
Labour’s 10 point Brexit Deal in 1 tweet• A Customs Union• Single Market Access• Shadow EU Regs• No Backstop• No NI/ROI hard border• No Regulatory Divergence• Frictionless Trade• Skills Based Immigration• Workers’ Rights enhanced• EU Co-Op on crime, sci & env 
Is there anything less Prime Ministerial than giving your MPs a free vote on allowing a No Deal Brexit? If there was ever any leadership, it has all drained away. 
Not acceptable from @jeremycorbyn.Two weeks ago he pledged to back a #PeoplesVote, now he appears to be trying to facilitate #Brexit in another form again.This must stop. #Labour must back its voters & members and support a #PeoplesVote. 
Main points from EU reaction (line to take) to #Brexit vote: * “It is difficult to see what more we can do”* EU continues to stand by backstop * The EU “will expect a credible justification for a possible extension and its duration”* Chances of no deal increase significantly 
So now, there should be a second referendum, since it appears the only viable options are a hard Brexit or Remain.  
Oh god the New York Times accidentally published both versions of the Brexit vote in its story  
Brexit or Remain?The House of Commons has again rejected the Government's #BrexitDeal in the second #MeaningfulVote.The Commons voted 391 to 242 - a majority of 149.#BrexitVoteWhat would you prefer to happen now?Please vote and retweet, thank you. 
Can someone please explain what's going on with Brexit? 
Not one word, not one word  from #Corbyn   about the need for  #PeoplesVote. Corbyn spouts about  #labour Brexit and zero else!  
UK Government had two years to write their Brexit disso and look at them. 17 days left and still no words.Shambolic. 
BBC journalists working on this programme are all anti-Brexit, with the exception of Andrew Neil, who is genuinely impartial when he's at work. They seem to be taking it for granted that an extension of Article 50 will be granted by the EU 27 states. I am not so sure #Brexit 
How many times must the UK Government lose a vote in the House before May realizes she does not have its confidence on #Brexit?  
There was a time when all this #Brexit drama was bizarre and sometimes shocking, but strangely exhilirating. That time has passed. I really don‘t enjoy watching a country that I love and admire damage its reputation, its economy, and possibly its democracy like this. What now? 
Graham Brady says it would be “a clear breach” of the Conservative manifesto for MPs to vote for delaying Brexit. 
Ireland: “The kidnapping of Katy in #FairCity was the most ludicrously long-drawn-out storyline in soap opera history.”The UK: “Hold my beer..”#Brexit 
BBC talk over Ian Blackford MP again. Apparently a presenter's chat is more important than hearing from the leader of the UK Parliament's 3rd biggest party at such a serious moment in history. #Brexit 
Brexit deal REJECTED 242 for deal 391 against. Defeated by 149 votes.We need a General Election now.#Brexit #BrexitVote 
Theresa May outlines what will happen now, after MPs voted against her #Brexit deal. She says there will be a free vote on the Conservative side.Sky News breaks down the possibilities here:  
Britain, can y'all wake up and just admit, "You know, Brexit was a terrible idea. Terrible, terrible, turrrrible. Let's just do a do-over please." I can't bear to watch this act of utter self immolation. 
Fuck off @JeremyCorbyn with your general election. We want a referendum in which CHEATING IS NOT ALLOWED. Ta. Dickhead. 
That's probably the point at which much of the Labour party would have liked Jeremy Corbyn to say something (anything) about a referendum, tbh. 
I don't know why people are still watching any BBC News coverage of Brexit. 
1948 :: Earl Mountbatten ,  Last Viceroy Leaves India  #Brexit  
In outlining possible options, Theresa May mentioned a second referendum. Jeremy Corbyn didn’t. 
Strong and Stable Leadership -> Lost the vote on her deal tonight and announces a free vote on a no deal Brexit tomorrow -> Weak and Wobbly. Utterly pathetic. 
Extraordinary to give Parliament a free vote on no-deal. Extraordinary, knowing the UK’s lack of preparedness and with the economic forecasts they have, for the government to basically not express an official view on it. Complete abrogation of responsibility. #Brexit 
A massive defeat for Theresa May on the #BrexitVote tonight. She has made an absolute mess of Brexit and led the country into a national crisis.The British people deserve better than this mess. It's time for a People's Vote >  
Seventeen days till Brexit  
At this point, if you still think Brexit is a good idea, you're a fucking idiot, and I've got some Magic Beans I'd love to sell you.#BrexitVote 
In case anyone outside the UK is wondering, no, we have no idea what’s going on with Brexit. NONE. 
"The noes have it!"Theresa May's government loses crucial vote once again on flagship Brexit deal:  
The Remain parliament will now vote to extend A50, and the public will see very plainly that our honourable representatives have no intention whatsoever of honouring the referendum. #brexit 
Absolutely right for May's deal to be defeated tonight.Absolutely wrong for @jeremycorbyn to respond by proposing another #Brexit deal.Brexit must be opposed in all forms. Labour's policy to support a #PeoplesVote must be honoured.#BrexitVote 
If you Jeremy Corbyn fail to back a #PeoplesVote to Confirm whichever #Brexit Deal is available & if you do not allow a #Remain option then you will reap a #Remainer whirlwind in the next GE...We will bring you down!! There is NO #LEXIT ..it's a Temporary Pay & Obey No Say CON 
#BREAKING: British Prime Minister Theresa May's #Brexit deal has been defeated in parliament by "historic proportions" (391 to 242 votes). 
SHE'S TALKING ABOUT REVOKING ARTICLE 50 AND SECOND REFERENDUMS AND YOU'RE STILL BANGING ON ABOUT YOUR  UNICORN BREXIT AND A GENERAL ELECTION YOU'D LOSE, YOU MAD TWAT 
my future descendent reading through the brexit wikipedia page entry in the year 2180 #BrexitVote 
Corbyn Saying he will put his unicorn-based ‘benefits of the SM but not in the SM, in the CU and with a say in the EU’s trade deals’ back to the house.Odd, I thought that had been rejected and @UKLabour was now in favour of a referendum. 
Theresa May deal defeated by huge majority; maybe we can now find a way out of the Brexit self-destruction, stay in the EU and get on with solving some actual problems... 
Brexit latest  
I've said it before, I will say it again: If Brexit still happens now, it will be because of @jeremycorbyn.It's that simple.It's that tragic.#BrexitVote 
British Pound jumps to session high vs. dollar after May's Brexit deal is defeated for a second time, announces vote on no-deal for tomorrow  
Dann eben harter #Brexit. Leave means Leave.  
I don’t understand why the choice we have is between May’s awful deal or no Brexit at all?Why can’t we have a Brexit which allows us to take back control of our laws, borders & sovereignty? You know the one we voted we for 
This terrible deal is dead. Tomorrow, No-Deal will be overwhelmingly rejected. MPs can't solve this crisis. Its time for a #PeoplesVote. Its time to cancel Brexit. #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Is it too early to hit the whiskey?  #Brexit 
Referendum is the ONLY way out.The ONLY way out.It’s been the only way out for about a year; now everyone can see.#PutItToThePeople#RevokeArticle50 
Corbyn makes no mention of Labour putting forward referendum option in wake of May Brexit defeat 
Theresa May has betrayed Brexit.She is giving a free vote to rule out a No Deal Brexit tomorrow regardless of it being established end without a deal.Friday there is a vote to extend Article 50.Houses of Commons has a majority of Remain MPs from Leave voting constituencies. 
Brexit-exit  
Corbyn says PM must accept that her deal is dead. But no deal must be taken off the table.Labour will put forward its permanent customs union idea forward again.Calls for General Election. Not referendum... 
BREXIT DEAL DEFEATED AGAIN!242 in favour 391 against A crushing 149 majority. May can’t pull back from this. It’s time to take no deal off the table, extend article 50 and let the people have the final say on Brexit#FinalSay 
The country is now at risk of a catastrophic no deal Brexit which would have a devastating effect on our communities. MPs must put in the place the measures needed to ensure a no deal Brexit doesn’t happen. The longterm effects of anything else are unthinkable. 
#BREAKING on @OANN: British Prime Minister Theresa May’s Brexit deal suffers a major defeat as MP's voted down the proposal in the House of Commons along a 391-242 vote. The Brexit deadline is March 29th. #OANN 
BREAKING: The UK’s parliament rejected Theresa May’s Brexit deal — 17 days before it was scheduled to happen. The result paves the way for votes on a no-deal Brexit or a possible delay to the EU withdrawal.  
Theresa May suffers 149-vote defeat as MPs reject Brexit deal for second time  
No-deal Brexit remains the default option for Britain unless MPs choose otherwise, Theresa May says after her agreement is defeated by 149 votes  
Breaking #FoxNews Alert : Theresa May's Brexit deal suffers another defeat in Parliament just weeks before Britain is set to leave European Union 
“... throwing UK’s Brexit plans into confusion” - was there a key bit of this that I missed where everyone knew what the plan was?  
He thinks there might a majority for them. "The prim e minister has run down the clock and the clock has been run down on her." He then mentions a general election. He does not mention a second referendum. 
May loses and @jeremycorbyn stands up to talk about how a @UKLabour Brexit would work. What did we ever do to deserve these two? 
May has finally shown her colours by allowing a free vote on no deal and confirming she will put forward legislation to seek an extension of Art 50.  Brexit is being betrayed before our very eyes. 
.@jeremycorbyn says Labour will again push its version of customs-union based Brexit 
UK lawmakers vote down Theresa May's Brexit deal with just 17 days to go, plunging nation into further turmoil. Follow live updates:  
Deal rejected. Treacherous MPs will now vote to take no deal (ie Brexit) off the table. Then an extension. This is a swindle and a shambles. We MUST stop voting for them. It’s our only chance. Join us  #Brexit 
Theresa May just asked “Does the House want a second referendum?”And a chorus of “Yes!” goes up...  
Tusk's spokesman: 'On EU side we've done all that's possible to reach an agreement. It's difficult to see what more we can do. If there's a solution to the current impasse it can only be found in London. Today's vote has significantly increased the likelihood of no-deal Brexit.' 
History GCSE Exam question 2080;“Following the EU Referendum vote in June 2016, what the fuck happened?Discuss.” #BrexitVote 
Mrs May announces free vote on ruling out no deal tomorrow - then motion on Thursday for extension to Article 50. Only sensible course now is a second referendum - loud cheers in House of Commons when she mentions the referendum option 
another brexit deal defeatedit's a wild suggestion but, it's almost like we should have never left  
May: “Does this house want to hold a second referendum?”House: “Yes!”  In case you were in any doubt about how out of touch our politicians are. 
Government defeated by 149. May ploughs on. Vote on no deal tomorrow. Potential vote on extending article 50 on Thursday.Remember, anyone who tells you they know what happens next, hasn’t been paying attention #Brexit 
"Does the house want to #RevokeArticle50? Does it want a second referendum?" (EXPLOSION OF CHEERING) #BrexitVote #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May now needs to accept that her botched Brexit deal is dead.Labour has put forward a credible alternative Brexit plan to protect jobs, our rights & our security.That can be the basis of a consensus to bring people together, however they voted in the 2016 referendum. 
Huge defeat for the Government’s Brexit deal. We now need to find an alternative way forward. 
Brexit overwhelmingly defeated for the second time in Parliament.It's time to stop polishing the turd.Time to put it back to the British people whilst we still have some industry to protect.#PutItToThePeople 
ALL OF THIS IS MAD. It’s just completely surreal that the prime minister just says the same shit again and again about an orderly Brexit while the house falls down around her, then sets itself on fire. And then gets run over by a fucking bulldozer. And then falls into the Thames 
Another huge catastrophic defeat for the Prime Minister on #Brexit - it’s now time to put this back to the people for a #FinalSay @peoplesvote_uk - she concedes that is now an option - but when will she actually listen??? 
PM defeated again by 149. We can't go on like this. Something has to break the deadlock. What else can it now be, other than putting the question to the public - do we go on with this mess? For two more years? #brexit 
BREAKING: Theresa May says Parliament will hold a vote on no-deal Brexit tomorrow and another vote on getting an extension of leaving the EU on Thursday. 
Breaking News: Britain's Parliament rejected Prime Minister Theresa May’s Brexit plan, adding to the confusion as a deadline nears to leave the E.U.  
"I profoundly regret the decision that the house has taken tonight"Theresa May is addressing MPs after they voted against her #Brexit deal.Live updates here:  
Another HUGE defeat for Theresa May's Brexit deal. It is time to put power back in the hands of the British people and give them the final say on this mess - with the option to stay in the EU.Add your name for a People's Vote >  
I’m not even being funny or nothing... but does anyone- the UK govt. included- have a fucking CLUE about what’s happening with Brexit 
Brexit: May defeated by 391 votes to 242 as MPs reject revised deal – Politics live  
Theresa May not even whipping Tory MPs to back No Deal Brexit. Why would the EU grant concessions when they know she won't walk away? 
BREAKING: Another absolute drubbing for Theresa May. Her Brexit plan is obviously dead as a dodo. But how in good conscience can she carry on as Prime Minister? She’s lost her vote, her authority, even her voice. Surely the only option left to her now is to resign?  
Breaking: British lawmakers overwhelmingly reject Prime Minister Theresa May’s Brexit deal for a second time, plunging UK into further political uncertainty with departure date from EU European just 17 days away. Vote was 391 to 242 
BREAKING: Theresa May’s Brexit deal suffers another huge defeat  
Is there anything more boring and deeply annoying than Brexit at this point? 
Wooohoooo!!! Theresa May and the Tories Brexit Deal defeated AGAIN!!!!!  
LONDON (AP) — Britain's Parliament strongly rejects prime minister's Brexit deal in major blow to her EU divorce plans. 
Wooo hooo We're not leaving, you Brexit motherfuckers- Suck on that! #Brexit 
Theresa May’s #Brexit deal rejected by a huge majority 242-391. Failing Prime Minister, failing Cabinet, failing Government. We need a #GeneralElection now#JC4PM 
Catch me on BBC News Channel at 2000 and Newsnight on 2230 talking about the death of May’s Brexit deal and what comes next. 
UK: Parliament vote on May's (Con-ECR) Brexit deal:For: 242Against: 391#Brexit #BrexitVote 
BREAKING: UK MPs reject PM Theresa May's Brexit deal  
Anyone feeling bad for the PM that's she's losing her voice or would you prefer she just shuts the hell up & let someone else take over? 
Free vote on no deal. May justifies it by the referendum precedent, but for the governing party to have no position on this issue is remarkable 
I welcome tonight’s vote to wholly reject the Government’s bad #Brexit deal. The Prime Minister needs to put our city and our country first, and withdraw Article 50.  It’s time to give the British public the final say.  
BREAKING: Theresa May's Brexit deal defeated in parliament by 242-391 
I’ve lost track, do we want Brexit plan to pass or do we not? 
Theresa May's Brexit deal suffers second defeat in Parliament as MPs reject Withdrawal Agreement by 149 votes  
BREAKING: British lawmakers again reject PM May's Brexit withdrawal agreement.  
.@theresa_may "I profoundly regret the decision this house has taken tonight" - but says her deal is the only deal on offer. Tomorrow there will be a vote on whether MPs support no deal Brexit on 29 March. They will vote down. And it will be free vote, so Rudd, Gauke and Clark... 
BREAKING: The government has lost the meaningful vote on Theresa May's Brexit deal by 391 votes to 242.For more, head here:  
Might invade France to distract everyone x #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement 
No deal.Hard Brexit. 
Tonight, the Commons has decisively voted again against a deal that failed to honour the promises made for Brexit both during & since the last referendum.It's time to #PutItToThePeople & demand a #PeoplesVote. March with us on 23.03.19:  
U.K. lawmakers reject Theresa May's Brexit divorce deal, making a delay in the country's EU departure all but inevitable  
me watching theresa may’s brexit deal get rejected (frank’s car behind symbolises the reality of brexit come crashing down again)  
I'll stop tweeting this meme when it stops being relevant. #BrexitVote #Brexit  
BREAKING: British lawmakers again reject PM May's Brexit withdrawal agreement.  
BREAKING NEWS: May suffers crushing defeat by 149 votes.  Brexit stopped by hardline Brexiters  No deal to be tested in commons tmw 
British Parliament overwhelmingly rejects Theresa May’s Brexit deal, diminishing the chance of withdrawal on March 29  
MPs ignore May's pleas and defeat her Brexit deal by 149 votes  
BREAKING: Britain's Parliament strongly rejects Prime Minister’s Theresa May's Brexit deal. It's a major blow to her EU divorce plans.  
#Breaking: Parliament just voted down Theresa May’s Brexit deal for a second time.Now, with less than three weeks until the March 29 deadline, British lawmakers are expected to vote on whether to leave the EU without a deal — or ask for an extension.  
JUST IN: UK parliament rejects PM Theresa May’s #Brexit deal by 242 votes to 391  
BREAKING NEWS: U.K. PM Theresa May loses BREXIT Deal vote in U.K. Parliament by more than 149 votes.Approve: 242Reject: 391 
BREAKING: THERESA MAY'S BREXIT DEAL HAS JUST BEEN REJECTED.The Prime Minister must extend Article 50 as promised to avoid a No-Deal Brexit Disaster. But if Brexit has made one thing clear: it is that Scotland must become an independent country. #WithdrawalAgreement #BrexitVote 
For the second time, Theresa May's administration has suffered a humiliating defeat on its Brexit deal, losing by 149. Enough is enough! Ditch the deal and get ready for a clean break from Brussels on March 29!  Support us at  
(Second) House of Commons vote on the Prime Minister's Brexit deal, result:AYES: 242 (+40)NOES: 391 (-41) 
UK MPs vote against Theresa May’s revised EU withdrawal deal by 391 to 242, throwing #Brexit plans into confusion#BrexitVote latest:  
Govt defeated once again on the #Brexit meaningful vote 242-391 , this Tory government are a shambles but they bumble onwards in the interests of the Tory party, hanging on with parliamentary business almost grinding to a halt because they are afraid of losing votes #BrexitChaos 
 Theresa May suffers yet another historic defeat.  Scotland needs a way out of this Brexit mess, join us and help make that a reality.  
Honestly don't even give a fuck anymore x #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement #BrexitVote 
BREAKING: Theresa May's Brexit proposal defeated again by U.K. lawmakers  
The government’s plan for Brexit has been voted against by a huge majority. Again.I don’t know about you, I’m starting to think chaos with Ed Miliband might have been the better bet...#BrexitVote 
“The post-apocalyptical fiction section has been moved to current affairs.”#brexit#brexitthemotherofallmesses #brexitvote 
Thank you to those Brexiteer MPs who voted against the Withdrawal Agreement tonight.We know you will have done so after careful consideration, having listened to the legal advice.You made the right choice and the country stands with, ready for clean Brexit.#StandUp4Brexit 
Theresa May’s Brexit deal is defeated for a second time. 391 to 242 a Majority 149. We counted over 70 Tory MPs voting against the #MeaningfulVote 
May's Brexit deal defeated by 391 votes to 242.We need a #PeoplesVote 
.@theresa_may loses her Brexit deal vote by 391 to 242. Another historic defeat for the PM. She's collecting them like the rest of us collect parking fines. Oh well, we have 17 days to sort all this out before no-deal Brexit. That's got to be more than enough time, innit? 
U.K. PARLIAMENT REJECTS MAY'S BREXIT DEAL, 391 VOTE AGAINST 
I’ll be on @MSNBC with @AliVelshi in a minute or two to talk about the big #brexit vote in the UK. Americans want to know what’s going on. The problem is that...none of us Brits know. 
BREAKING: MPs reject @theresa_may’s #Brexit deal for a second time.AYES - 242NOES - 391Humiliation. 
 The result is imminent in Britain's Parliament, which is voting on Theresa May's updated Brexit deal  
Now that the House of Commons has rejected the Withdrawal Agreement, which would have delivered Brexit on 29th March, I shall be voting tomorrow for Britain to leave the EU without a deal. If that is rejected then I shall vote against extending Article 50. 
Brexit won’t put other countries off leaving the EU. They’ll just know how to do it better 
.@Anna_Soubry delivers a blistering attack on those politicians who lit the #Brexit touchpaper and then ran away. We need a #PeoplesVote now. 
This debacle is the stupidest thing I’ve witnessed in my lifetime. And I paid to see ‘Dude where’s my car?’ in the cinema #Brexit 
I'm watching with a bottle of wine & expect to be drinking in celebration, rather than disappointment! #brexitvoteJUSTSTOPBREXITand if Parliament can't/won't do the job, #PutItToThePeople 
The United Kingdom is not better than everyone else. If we learnt to be a team player then we, and the world, would be a better place. #Brexit 
This remains a deeply flawed Brexit deal that will not protect jobs, rights or living standards in #Portsmouth. The PM has failed to deliver any substantial change. Not a single word is different in the withdrawal agreement or declaration. That’s why I voted against it tonight 
Watching 50 ERG @Conservatives Brexiteer MPs vote with the Corbyn & the SNP against Brexit is quite something. Feels like the end of the road tonight.  Majority 100 against?  
Very full chamber. Surprising it was so empty during the debate. That says to me that a lot of MPs were hiding from their whips. #brexit #BrexitVote 
There are only two stories in my professional life I thought (wrongly) would not happen because obvious sense and the threat of catastrophic consequences would stop them. The first was the invasion of Iraq. This is the other #Brexit  
I've watched in horror as our PM went timidly to the EU to request a deal, then return virtually empty handed yet distribute a leaflet we paid for to get us to vote to stay in the EU! I've witnessed his successor PM fudge Brexit and attempt to portray it as Leave! I am disgusted. 
As another Brexit vote looms, let us again revisit the best synopsis of the logic behind the Leave argument - the Parable of the Cheese Submarine  
WATCH: British lawmakers vote on PM Theresa May’s revised #Brexit deal  
Wow.Brexit was THREE YEARS AGO.This disaster has been ongoing for THREE YEARS. 
It's fine for maybot to have 2 meaningful votes but a betrayal of democracy to have a second referendum? BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT 
The Banana Republic of a very British Brexit is truly busted #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement @ScotNational @theSNP 
STAND BY for the results of the U.K. Parliament vote on PM Theresa May’s BREXIT Deal. If she loses Britain will leave the EU on 29 March, without any remaining EU rules. If she wins, the U.K. will ‘leave’ the EU, but trade deals and other deals with the EU will stay in place.  
Think about this.Theresa May sat on her hands when it came to human rights in Northern Ireland to preserve parliamentary arithmetic with the DUP on crucial Brexit votes and they still screwed her over. Two years of legislative paralysis on equal marriage & abortion for nothing. 
Always surreal to find yourself in the same lobby as Boris and Rees-Mogg. The PM must now revoke, extend or resign. #Brexit 
This whole Brexit thing’s getting a bit political isn’t it?! Some people want to stay, others don’t and now the government is getting involved. It’s all very confusing!! I like crisps. And certain types of cake (but not ones with raisins in). Ooh look, a spider! 
I. Dont. Feel. Sorry. For. #TheresaMay She has a bad throat. Boo hoo.The country is entering into a generational malaise due to her incompetence & self-serving ambition.Why should anyone feel sorry for her? I feel sorry for Honda workers losing their jobs.#Brexit 
Brexit: May faces fresh defeat as MPs vote on revised deal – Politics live  
I note that some in the media are blaming pro-#Brexit MPs (who are upholding the party manifesto commitments & the referendum result) for the debacle that is wholly and solely Theresa May’s mess. “Brexit Means Brexit”“No Deal is Better than a Bad Deal”...  
Andrew Neil interviewing Julia Hartley-Brewer.Brexit coverage from the world-renowned BBC. 
And yet, they were asked to vote on Brexit  
Right now I’m voting against Theresa May’s Brexit deal. Here’s my thoughts on why, once again... Nothing has changed!  
You'd be forgiven for being confused by Brexit.A big reason it's been so contentious comes down to Ireland.Here's a 106 second primer.  
May's Brexit deal has been rejected for a second time. What happens next?#BrexitVote 
British lawmakers vote on PM’s revised #Brexit deal  
I can safely say the no lobby is absolutely rammed.... the PM is about to face another huge defeat. #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
We're keeping an eye on the pound while MPs vote on Theresa May's revised Brexit deal  
David Davis just voted with the Govt on Brexit. This is not a drill. 
HAPPENING NOW: British lawmakers are voting on Theresa May's Brexit deal  
This is bloody brilliant by @chakrabortty. Angels dance on the heads of Brexit pins while the country has been deliberately, savagely deflated for nearly a decade. Deflated economically, emotionally, and metaphorically, like the proverbial balloon.   
In voting lobby on #Brexit Deal ...there is no way Theresa May can win mobbed and I m in middle 
Anyone worked out what @DavidMundellDCT has achieved for Scotland in three years of endless #Brexit deliberations? Two threats of resignation & he seems to have  achieved nothing beyond making the post of SofS for Scotland irrelevant & redundant. 
Tommy Robinson has announced that he wants to stand for parliament — either in Brussels, as an MEP, if Brexit fails, or in Westminster 
Latest from my Brexit sources: ERG split 40/60 for/against. Couple of people told me now (on Brexit side) loss of 70-100. Some ERG, some Tories (30-40) you’d have expected to vote with her last time, plus Labour abstentions.... 
Can't understand why folks call No Brexit a risk or a defeat. Would be an unexpected blessing. 
Here we go...@SkyNews live now - MPs voting on PM’s #Brexit deal  
Senate Republicans are unlikely to be permitted to dramatically amend the House-passed resolution overturning Trump's national emergency, suggesting they will be confronted with a simple referendum on the president’s declaration later this week  
In five years we are going to be living in a country where 11 of the kids in an average 30-child classroom are living in poverty. Don't let Brexit distract from the Tories' other legacy of absolutely shredding the poorest communities in the UK and leaving them to rot. Again. 
Just watching news .. Brexit seems to be very important .. Are these people i’m seeing on my tv real? Please don’t tell me they run the country ... 
LIVE: British lawmakers to vote on whether they will support the Brexit deal that PM May spent nearly 2 years negotiating with the EU.  
Will Theresa May get her Brexit deal through? MPs are voting on it right now. Watch the result live: #BrexitVote 
Extraordinary last-minute statement from @SteveBarclay in reply to planted question from @Jacob_Rees_Mogg,  Brexit sec seemed to argue that in circumstances where the EU was effectively at war with us we could rip up the Withdrawal Agreement. Absolutely bonkers stuff. Desperate 
.@ChrisLeslieMP says the government should make time for a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal put in front of MPs tonight.  
Who else is watching Parliament on TV, with a beer in hand?#Brexit  
Politicians in the UK are voting on Prime Minister Theresa May's EU withdrawal deal - again. The second meaningful vote is an important part of the #Brexit puzzle. Confused? Here's what you need to know:  
 MPs are voting on Theresa May's revised Brexit deal  
Britain is trapped in the purposeless austerity that gave us Brexit. My column  
Brexit secretary takes planted question from Jacob Rees-Mogg saying attorney general has amended his advice. Unfortunately attorney general isn’t here to answer questions & even more unfortunately question was held back till there’s no time left to debate. Shameful. 
Q: How did TM try to sell her shabby deal to UK voters?A: She didn't. She threatened us, accept it or she'd take our toys away completely.Q: Is that democracy?A: No, it's pseudo-tyranny.#Brexit in 17 days, BRING IT. 
Brexit is rather miserable so here is a picture of Biscuit with his little friend White Cat.  
“A choice between a turd of a deal....which is now a polished turd but,  which may be the best turd we’ve got.”Watch as Tory MP Steve Double speaks for the nation about the horrible Brexit choice May’s incompetence & the treachery of Remoaners have presented us with.  
Theresa May has spent so much effort in trying to deliver a corrupt referendum result that she has put no energy into checking the 'will of the people'. Time to revoke Article 50 or go to a PeoplesVote... #BrexitVote #FinalSay 
I’m told Mrs May told meeting of backbench Tory MPs this morning that she keeps being asked by other European leaders: ‘why don’t you call a referendum now the situation has got this bad?’Why not indeed? The clue is in the word LEADERS 
Brexit Secretary Barclay has one last 'clarification' of AG's advice, in response to Mogg question. You can tell he thinks it's important, cos he's reading from a script. Talk about last minute! 
According to this logic, an "in-out" referendum offered us a choice between:1. Remaining in the EU, or2. Making a compromise with people who want to remain in the EU.In other words, it's manipulative nonsense.  
Keir Starmer failed to mention a People’s Vote at all in his wind up speech.  So much for the alleged Labour leadership shift of two weeks ago.  It’s clear they want to facilitate Brexit. 
Mr Barnier millions of us understand that. We want to #remain. Any assistance Europe can give us in this regard would be much appreciated. We are trapped on an island with a dictator, and a Brexit which has become a cult. Democracy is dead in the UK. 
Just a reminder: the backstop was the U.K. government’s idea. The referendum was the U.K. government’s idea. Ten years of austerity, neglect of public services and scapegoating immigrants was the U.K. government’s idea. The only meaningful vote is a #PeoplesVote 
"Regarding any extension-Parliament will use any added time in the same way it has until now, to frustrate the will of the British publicThere is nothing more the Government or Parliament can add to the voice of the British public - we leave on March 29th-or else"@B_HQ#Brexit  
Nothing has changed.I agree with @GMB_Union - this deal fails to protect jobs, rights and industries.I will be voting against Theresa May's bad Brexit deal tonight. #BrexitVote 
BBC Reporting Scotland there seemingly found every Leave voting English person in Scotland for its Brexit vox-pops from around 62% Remain voting Scotland. 
Watch as MPs vote again on Theresa May's Brexit deal  
It’s increasingly obvious that Corbyn is leading his party towards facilitating Brexit.  He will never be forgiven by the voters who pay the price with jobs lost and reduced living standards.  
#Labour @Keir_Starmer never mentioned @peoplesvote_uk once in his closing speech on the crucial #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement debate. #Shameful @TheIndGroup 
Do they imagine Brexit will be cancelled & Leavers will all just say "Oh. Well I guess that's that then." 
I find it remarkable that some commentators affect to believe the idea eccentric that when Brexit's cancelled Leavers that were formerly constitutional Conservatives will switch to backing major constitutional change, including of the Lords, civil service & perhaps even Monarchy. 
Not long now and l will be voting against Theresa May's bad Brexit deal. #BrexitVote 
Only in Scotland would 52% of Scots backing independence over any Brexit scenario and 7/10 Scots wanting another referendum would be classed as a "blow" to the SNP.  
Former Foreign Secretary @BorisJohnson cannot accept "what I believe would be a humiliation and subordination of our democracy" - unless and until the EU agrees to a reasonable change, then a 'No Deal' Brexit must be kept on the table.  
We've got 3 Brexit Refugee T-Shirts to give away. Please RT to win.  @HairyBabyTees T&Cs:  
Don't fall for the "there'll be no Brexit if you don't vote for X" threat. There isn't a majority for revoking Article 50, and we are legally bound to leave on the 29th unless there's a majority for its revocation or extension. Brexit won't be stopped, vote AGAINST her non-deal. 
English Bloke "In 1960's my Grandmaw went to shops & bought 3 eggs & 3 tomatoes to feed her & my dad & my uncle. We are a strong nation. I am 24 and an Electrician. We are stronger than other nations." In support of Brexit. ..This level of stupidity makes me cry. 
We voted for it; Now deliver it! Retweet. #Brexit  
Brexit: Foreign far-right Twitter users 'manipulated debate' - BBC News  
As May's voice fails like her Brexit deal, calls for a general election grow louder.By @JoshuaFunnell2 
1975 referenda for a 'Common Market'2016 referenda for a 'European Union'See what they did there...“Fool me once, shame on you; fool me twice, shame on me.”#Brexit#WTO 
If you agree with our position and want the Brexit chaos resolved for the good of the country, sign up to support us here:  
The Speaker hasn’t selected any amendments for this evening’s #Brexit vote. So what does this mean? MPs will be voting on just @theresa_may’s deal in the next 20 minutes. The Independent Group will be voting against this bad deal for our country which will leave us poorer. 
Just want to take a moment to recognize that the @guardian has literally been live blogging Brexit for three years. 
"It is an absolute disgrace."@IanBlackfordMP accuses Theresa May of laughing in his face as he argues that Brexit will reduce opportunities for young people. #BrexitVote 
How could any MP even consider voting for this deal? Seriously mind boggling dereliction of duty and sense.#brexit 
East Lothian MP stands up to tell us of his opposition to Bexit. He talks of the damage Brexit will do to the people of East Lothian All very well and true This same MP will still support a Tory gov against our will and failed to mention the people of East Lothian voted remain 
Where’s most of the Cabinet as we approach the crucial vote on #Brexit? Absent. PM alone at most critical moment. No doubt all plotting their leadership bids. @labourwhips 
One of the most sensible MPs on Brexit - proud to vote with him tonight.  
Imagine being stuck in a theatre and being forced to watch a grotesque pantomime with the same amateurish dramatics on a loop over and over again, for almost 3 years, and with no end in sight. Well folks, that’s Brexit. A never-ending theatre of the absurd. #BrexitVote 
Put this on billboards around Britain & if there is another referendum we will vote out by 80%.  
Anyone feeling sorry for PM should remember she is the architect of her own downfall. She decided to pursue #Brexit in the most partisan manner. She created an alliance between those opposed to the Tories and her own hard right who will never vote for anything the EU agrees to. 
Some people in England don’t know that “Brexit” could possibly be a reality. They are clueless as to what it is, they think “Breakfast” is the topic.  #BrexitCrisis #BrexitDeal #BrexitVote #Woolieswaterchallenge #England 
Tonight at 7 on 4 - Bollocks, Cox and Brexit#MayBeTroubleAhead 
The Brexit deadlock reflects a grim truth: there are simply no good options for the UK.  
Sturgeon has enjoyed telling every cunt and their granny how she is holding wee “Resiliance Meetings” to make sure theres enough tampons & paracetamol after Brexit.Why no special meeting when the IRA claim responsibility for planting a device in a University?Fucking fraud. 
What a pleasure to be on @BBCPolitics with the brilliant @anandMenon1 as the sound of “You can shove your Brexit up your arse!” rang out from the crowd behind us.  
Level of debate on Brexit deterioratingSteve Double, Tory, St Austell and Newquay, in House describes it as a "turd", a turd that has been taken away and polished" so now we have a polished turd" but it might be "the best turd we have. 
The way the BBC has adopted government posture over Brexit makes me think they've got an institutional problem there, some deep rooted misunderstanding of who they serve. 
Opinion moving “firmly” in the direction of a united Ireland, says @MaryLouMcDonald.“Brexit or no Brexit, we will pursue Irish unity,” she tells me.“But you’re quite correct to say that Brexit now politically, legally, constitutionally puts these questions front and center.”  
ALSO, BREXIT.  
ok ive had enough of this shambles. as an original no voter in the Scotland indy ref  i now want out of this 'union' #indyref2 #Brexit #BrexitVote 
The last few days compound one thing. This was the moment a Tory Brexit became impossible. It was possibly the end of the thing altogether.  
As a debate the prime minister billed as the most important in recent history wraps up, cabinet notable by their absence. “No minister wants to be on the frontbench for this”. The “this” is another humiliating Brexit defeat 
Please sign my petition calling for the UK to hold EU elections in May so that we have time to organise a second referendum. Without doing this, we will be leaving the EU on July 1st (day before EU Parl. sits), no matter what. Please sign and share!  
Exasperated EU message to the PM is: “Throughout this Brexit process, you’ve kept looking to us in the EU to provide magical solutions to your domestic political problems. That can’t and won’t work.” 2 
Tony Gardner, former US ambassador to the EU, talking incredible sense on CNN International right now. US trade deal will be no substitute for UK losing frictionless access to its major market, the EU, he says. Calm, brutal honesty about the consequences of Brexit. 
I think we should have a 2nd Referendum if :1/ All Remainer MP’s who voted for Article 50 resign their seatsForthwith2/ The PM resigns3/ All MP’s have their expenses and monies from Donors are audited4/The question to be askedA/ leave on WTOB/leave on May’s WA 
One of few parliamentarians heading away from Westminster at moment!  On train to Basingstoke for another @euromove Brexit rally. We are heading towards a referendum. It’s hugely important we build a mass movement to fight to stay in Europe, & that’s become my mission 
Video: BBC inadvertently(?) exposes May’s false Brexit claim as she’s speaking  
The dreadful thing I am contemplating is that if there is a second #PeoplesVote I will be forced to vote Leave thanks to the SNP.They are trying to use my Remain EU vote as a proxy independence vote.They are shameless.Brexit has nothing to do with independence. 
- The EU Referendum was unnecessary- The 2017 general election was unnecessary- The negotiation red lines were unnecessary- Wasting almost 3 years of negotiation time was unnecessary- The content of the Withdrawal Agreement is unnecessaryBrexit is completely unnecessary. 
"I think, frankly, the country is fed up of Brexit." @EdwardJDaveyMake it stop now, with a People's Vote >  
But the sovereignty argument for Brexit goes out the window. Truth is you either follow EU rules or US rules. You can be rule taker or rule maker. You actually lose sovereignty with Brexit as regards trading. 
“We’ve run out of ideas” EU diplomat tells me what EU could do if/when deal rejected tonight #Brexit 
Sorry Michel, may I apologise for our crazy MPs. I think 95% of the population understand the situation. Please, when you’re asked for an Art50 extension, insist on a referendum and a year or two in which to hold it. Thanks!#PutItToThePeople 
Let’s just have an independence vote in England, Scotland and Wales. A unification referendum across Ireland. Each country votes on their future, rather than England and the DUP deciding everyone’s future! Brexit has divided us! Independence will politically free us!  
Reminder from EU Chief Brexit negotiator: no transition period for UK if no Brexit deal agreed   
17 days to go, the day of the big vote, and Brexiter MPs are still at the "make shit up about the EU" phase of Brexit they've been practicing since 1992pic.twitter.com/70sJe0aGRk 
If Mrs May goes down again, this national catastrophe has got to be stopped. Sensible ministers can’t possibly think there is further mileage in more of the same. It has to be an extension for a referendum. The only issue is how much agony they inflict on the country to get there 
This deal fails to protect jobs, industries and workers' rights.Nothing has changed.It's time to reject this bad Brexit deal. #BrexitVote @GMB_Union 
Imagine if we had spent the hours, energy & money we have spent on Brexit in the last 3 years actually looking for solutions to the “burning injustices” in our country. .#JustMakeItStop 
On @SkyNews for the next few hours as the Brexit implosion continues ... might mention @peoplesvote_uk once or twice. 
But, Mr Barnier, the majority of people in the UK don’t want a transition, because we don’t want Brexit. We want to stay in the EU. Have a word with Theresa, please, and get us a new referendum. Thanks.  
This is what happens when you narrowly win a referendum and then refuse to compromise with 48% of the population, Brexiters. All this mess is on you. 
“Brexit has laid bare the reality of partition. A new and United Ireland is emerging. A referendum on Irish unity must be held if there is a crash out #brexit” @MaryLouMcDonald 
"Britain had a seat at that table, Britain was there for those decisions; Britain was the European Union!" @JessPhillipsMP for Birmingham Yardley on the impact of Brexit on working class communities. #StopToryBrexit 
DEVELOPING: U.K. Parliament will have a vote on PM Theresa May’s BREXIT Deal tonight. If May’s Deal loses, the U.K. will have to leave the EU on 29 March. British leaders could ask EU to change that date, but the EU hasn’t indicated support for that. Results expected at 2:15pm ET 
IT'S LIKE "HOTEL CALIFORNIA." ONCE YOU CHECK IN, YOU CAN'T CHECK OUT. Theresa May begs MPs to back her Brexit deal even after her own lawyer torpedoed plan because it could tie Britain to EU for good  
#BREAKING No Brexit transition period without withdrawal agreement, says EU's Barnier  
"What we are going to get bears no relation to what was being debated in 2016."Dominic Grieve explains why it is vital people are given the final say on the #Brexit deal. Join the #PutItToThePeople March to demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
A new poll has found a majority of Scots want a second independence referendum – here are the details 
May heading for defeat. Then what? A delay to Brexit, a third Meaningful Vote? A cross-party customs union? > Cabinet source tells me if the vote doesn’t pass tonight I suspect tonight the next stages will not necessarily be in our control. 
Former Australian PM Kevin Rudd  calls Brexit trade plan ‘utter bollocks’, the UK striking deals with Commonwealth is not ‘magical alternative’ to EU: ‘Think the Commonwealth can save Brexit Britain? That’s utter delusion’ 
If the Prime Minister and her Government lose their meaningful Brexit vote tonight under s.13 of the EU (Withdrawl) Act 2018 surely the PM’s position is utterly untenable? She will have lost the confidence of the House; surely she must act with honour and dignity and resign? 
How derogatory, what an awful thing to say from @theresa_may Scotland’s First Minister was told she “simply wasn’t bright enough to understand how good [Theresa May’s Brexit] deal was” in a meeting with the Prime Minister, MPs have heard. #PeoplesVote 
Brexit 101: no WA, no transition  
Uk has taken three years to conclude Brexit and still unsuccessful Our Nehru and Gandhi took 48 hours to divide killing many innocents This is reality. Nehru was in too much hurry to grab power.  
For the avoidance of doubt, the EU is warning that if @theresa_may’s Brexit deal is voted down, as far as they are concerned it’s full steam ahead with planning for a no-deal Brexit  
 It’s argued that the alternative is no Brexit at all.I don’t believe that risk is tangible or has crystallised. To loose Brexit the Government would foolishly have to decide that it will no longer deliver it.I still have faith in the will of the British people to leave. 
 Voters gave us the clearest possible instruction in 2016 to leave the EU.The Withdrawal Agreement does not deliver Brexit but Brexit in Name Only. It delivers a kind of Remain that locks us into the EU without a vote or voice. It betrays the Brexit people voted for. 
I have thought long and hard on how I will vote tonight.I asked the PM a question at the 1922. I listened to the Attorney General. I read the legal conclusions of the Star Chamber.I want to support a Brexit Deal. However, here is why I cannot support the deal on the table 
Lol. @theresa_may saying @NicolaSturgeon's too stupid to understand her deal. Nicola is a lawyer.Theresa has a second in geography (and recently experience suggests she must've cheated)That's funny.#Brexit#DissolveTheUnion 
May has never been straight about the choices Brexit inevitably brings bcos she has put her Party interest above the national interest. If her deal is voted down & A50 extended then we must use time to be honest about these choices & give public final say on where we go next.  
A rejection of the government’s deal isn’t a rejection of the 2016 EU referendum, it is a rejection of this Conservative government and their current negotiating position. 
The only thing any Leave supporting MP needs to know about this deal is that the vast majority of Leavers consider it to be a dreadful BRINO and despite the threats of “No Brexit” do not want to any Leave MP to support it. 
If you say "Brexit" three times in the mirror, Jacob Rees-Mogg appears and starts patronising you in Latin. 
You don’t believe in Karmas?Watch Brexit debate. How England divided us to help peaceful religion Today that peaceful religion is their biggest headache. 
BREAKING: UK Prime Minister Theresa May is forecast to lose tonight's vote on her Brexit deal by more than 100 votes - Sky News 
Would YOU support Theresa May’s Brexit deal tonight? I know I wouldn’t. #FarageOnLBC 
Theresa May is accused by SNP minister of telling @NicolaSturgeon she "simply wasn't bright enough" to understand how good PM's brexit deal was. No 10 reject the claims as "ridiculous" . But it's clear relations between Holyrood and Westminster at an all time low 
I've had to ban people editing my Brexit Spreadsheet as unfortunately people began to try and destroy it and used racist language.You can still notify me of changes by DM'ing me or using Ctrl+M to comment on a cell.It's sad that some have to ruin it for everyone else...  
Never forget. This man asked people to vote on #Brexit. Without defining what Brexit meant. Without carrying out any projections of consequences. All in an (unsuccessful) attempt to settle an internal Tory party feud. He then knighted all his mates and f***ed off into the sunset.  
A referendum result should NOT always be ‘respected’. We could ask the descendants of the people who voted Hitler into power if it wasn’t for the fact they didn’t get the chance to exist. #RevokeRemainRebuild 
One of the questions for the Public Inquiry will be, “Did individuals - like Rees-Mogg - who campaigned for Leave make a personal and secret large financial gain from Referendum result?”  
This Brexit stuff is so big they've just bumped The One Show *and* Eastenders off BBC One. Tune in to BBC2 at 7pm tonight to see Dara O'Briain talk about the return of Blockbusters. 
Some #Brexit news i can understand. The great Dick Clement & Ian La Frenais just recorded an interview for @BBCFreeThinking today - and filled out a leave/remain ballot for their greatest characters. Results announced 28 March. 
“Tereeza said Nicola wasn’t bright enough to understand the Brexit” #janeygodleyvoiceover some angry swearing 
Brexit actually means Brexit?Not in Yorkshire!!! "Brexit" (noun) 1: When a fat bastard sits onna flimsy plastic chair!#BrexitVote 
Heads up Parliament.The UK people voted to LEAVE the EU.]We did not vote for a deal.If you DARE take LEAVE (WTO Brexit) off the table then we, the people, should no longer recognise you as chamber of democracy but as a crucible of contempt. 
After much consideration, here I set out how I will be voting on the Meaningful #Brexit Vote this evening and why.   
Conservative MP Charles Walker warnes a general election may be the only solution to the Brexit impasse if the Prime Ministers fails to reach a majority in favour of her Brexit proposal this evening.Bring it on.#GeneralElectionNow 
This deal fails to protect jobs, industries and workers' rights.Nothing has changed.It's time to reject this bad Brexit deal #FinalSay #BrexitVote @GMB_Union 
I mean, lots of us want to stop Brexit. But would you be prepared to grimly act like Andrea Jenkyns for TWO WHOLE YEARS and not even be able to tell your friends it was only a pose? Keanu in Point Break has nothing on her. 
BREXIT: Parliament to vote to decide fate of Prime Minister Theresa May's hard-won plan to leave the EU.  
Did they actually *sew* an *apron*? Where did they get the needle and thread from? Wasn't it just one big fig leaf each? Has Boris promised Adam and Eve £350 million pounds worth of embroidery after Brexit?  
Moral of the last month for Theresa May: if you send your Attorney General in to take over the Brexit negotiations, you make the test of success legal rather than political. You can’t then turn around & say to your MPs “Ultimately this is a political not a legal judgement”. 
Brexit vote switches at this stage feel a bit 'Oscar in Belo Horizonte'.  
So good from @Anna_Soubry - piercing the charlatans who led Brexit, resigned when it got tricky,  
Now @10DowningStreet has now secured greater clarity on the NI backstop, I will be voting to support the #WithdrawalAgreement. To do otherwise would be to risk capitulating on the instruction of the British people, risking 'no Brexit'.  
German Chancellor Angela Merkel says that the European Union had made far-reaching proposals to Britain on #Brexit, and this was the final offer  
Are you an MP thinking about voting for May's deal tonight?Watch @StevenEdginton to find out why you must vote AGAINST this deal to save Brexit.The public are with you, it's time to #GoWTO!  
You voted 42 times against more EU integration, 5 times for the referendum itself, 12 times against the rights of EU nationals in the UK & 13 times against UK membership of the EU. You're the biggest Brexit head going, Anna. 
Hard Brexiter Owen Paterson before the EU referendum.  
Whatever we think about Brexit, we can at least all agree that if Brexit ends up not happening because Tory Brexiteers wouldn’t vote for Brexit that would be *hilarious*. 
MPs must support the PM's imperfect deal, or risk losing Brexit altogether | @HenryNewman 
I considered writing about Amber Rudd's disastrous appearance in committee yesterday but due to brexit I thought it'd be swamped and missed.I will put out something in next few days though. 
I voted against the PM’s deal in January. Whilst I believe this deal to be only marginally better, I believe it is the best deal on the table to deliver Brexit. The alternatives are too uncertain. 
Former Australian PM calls #Brexit trade plan ‘utter bollocks’:  
Boris Johnson is demanding a No-Deal Brexit, as it 'is the only safe route out' of the EU. Of course, this would put him in position to become PM! A 'safer route' is to revoke Article 50 and stop Brexit for good. It is the quickest way to put us all out of our misery! #BrexitVote 
Jacob Rees-Mogg is in favour of Brexit. He thinks Brexit is imperilled by not supporting Mrs May's deal. He does not support her deal. Logic, ERG style. 
Funny howBrits voted for Brexit because they didn’t want to hand their country over to a fundamentalist minority  
WATCH | Sammy Wilson, telling it like it is: "During the referendum the Irish border was never raised. Is that not an indication that the problem has been manufactured? The EU is using the NI border as a way of keeping the UK in the Customs Union and the Single Market!"   
Big fan of the ERG doing what they can to derail Brexit. Top Snape game there, guys. Britain thanks you. 
sure, we can judge theresa for holding another vote on the same brexit deal. but which gay man can honestly say he’s never spotted a hot guy on grindr who previously rejected him and decided to try again a few months later with a slightly superior set of nudes? good for her i say 
“It's a disaster as Divorce Referendum turns around and simply runs off the track.”#CheltehamFestival #CheltenhamFestival2019 
Tories now have a 10-point lead over Labour despite  Brexit in Kantar/TNS poll.  imagine how far ahead they will be if and when we leave EU 
As an SNP member I was a counting agent for the EU Referendum, now known obviously as #brexitGlasgow voted OVERWHELMINGLY to remain. I took a pic of the votes board at the Emirates stadium.Leave ~ 84,474Remain ~ 168,335Our votes meant NOTHING. #IndyRef #DissolveTheUnion 
"It would be the People's Choice."WATCH: Hilary Benn argues that if the Commons comes up with an alternative Brexit plan, that it should go back to the people in a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
Sinn Féin Deputy Leader @moneillsf has said that the Backstop remains the only way to ensure the interests of citizens on the Island of Ireland are upheld & to ensure the protection of the Good Friday Agreement.Meanwhile the DUP are ‘hell bent’ on blinkered & reckless #Brexit  
Breaking : Laura Kuenssberg will offer her resignation if she can't get the #Tory #BrexitDeal through tonight.- #Brexit - pic.twitter.com/x4Fzr3ZN6d 
So, with the #DUP rejecting the Deal and the backstop, and with very little chance of it passing tonight in the House of Commons anyway, I shall vote with my heart and vote ‘No’ even though it might, just might, jeopardise #Brexit itself.The ‘Deal’ is far from ideal. 
Same @katewilsea and @skynews team that predicted a 225 majority against the first Brexit Meaningful Vote has been doing the same count this time... a few more unknowns this time, but results on @skynews at top of hour... 
Remind me again exactly where the "Leave the EU (but NB only on a deal that a 70% Remainer Parliament approves of if it can't succeed in overturning your vote)" option was on the Referendum ballot-paper?#WithdrawalAgreement #BrexitVote 
During @joannaccherry's cracking speech during the #WithdrawalAgreement debate @LukeGrahamMP shouted that Scotland wasn't a country, it was only a principality.Just highlights the contempt with which the "Scottish" tories hold the nation/"region/principality" of Scotland#Brexit 
Britain's May tells lawmakers: back me or lose Brexit  
"The concentration of wealth in London is what got us into this Brexit mess but it is the concentration of power that is trapping us in it. Giving people a final say on our future is the only remaining answer: Democracy as our salvation" @LSRPlaid#BrexitVote #PeoplesVote 
Joanna Cherry, yet another shining voice of reason. It's good to have a few of them dotted across Parliament. If nothing else, Brexit has separated the wheat like her from the chaff that make up the bulk of MPs. 
One day I hope there will be a full Public Inquiry into what happened in the UK over Brexit.Cameron and May will be held to account.And the Press Barons.And the BBC.And the rest. 
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you  
If the PM loses the #BrexitVote again by a large margin then I think "her deal is dead" - Labour MP @hilarybennmp expects EU to be asked for an Article 50 extension#Brexit latest:  
People in America, run by DONALD TRUMP, are tweeting at how stupid Brexit makes Britain look. DONALD TRUMP'S AMERICA. Well done everyone. Well done. 
Boris Johnson says the prime minister and attorney general have merely sowed an "apron of fig leaves" to cover the embarrassment of the Brexit deal  
“The Brexit reality of 2019 bears no resemblance to the Brexit fantasy promised in the 2016 referendum.” Hugo Dixon, deputy chairman of @peoplesvote_uk, makes the case for another referendum #OpenFuture 
It doesn't matter how they voted in the referendum - people across the country now just want us to get out!  
This proposed #Brexit deal is the exact opposite of what was promised in 2016. We're still #NotBuyingIt. Tweet your MP and tell them to Vote Down The Deal:  #PeoplesVote 
It's "pretty clear" that Theresa May will lose the latest Brexit vote shortly and then "we're in a big mess," Tony Blair says  
Here were my thoughts on Theresa May’s deal in November(!!!), clear proof that nothing has changed. We absolutely need a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal with the option to remain to break the deadlock and get us out of this mess.  
Boris Johnson doing a poundshop Trump speech in the Commons. Not even he believes the empty words he speaks about Making Britain Great Again. Brexit has made Britain a laughing stock, and Johnson is a key clown in that sad sad affair. 
Far from “No-Deal” (or as it should more correctly be termed, a return to full sovereignty trading under WTO rules) being a disaster or a “cliff-edge” scenario, a deal based on #WTO rules looks more and more like the best deal on offer. #brexit #news 
You know there's only one thing decisive that will come out of Brexit and that is the demise of the Torie party!! Its time for Gerard to pull his socks up now!The tories don't think they stand a chance. You just watch their seats disappear!!Gerard Batten prepare for  BATTLE!!  
#Brexit meets #StormGareth. The expression on my face sums up both. (There are unconfirmed reports my umbrella has landed in Scotland.)  
Jeremy Corbyn says Theresa May's Brexit deal is "a case study in weasel words and obfuscation" - and parliament should reject it.  
Boris backing a WTO Brexit to preserve our "self respect"While saying he's not in favour of crashing outNo explanation of how a majority can be found for that in Commons 
So @jeremycorbyn IF I understand this1) You don't give a damn about the effect of #Brexit on Scotland2) You couldn't care less about Scotland having a say in WestminsterYET, you seem to think that a visit with Bob n Dick will secure votes for your party? 
MPs walk through the Commons lobbies tonight to vote again on May's Brexit Deal. Worth remembering that *both* this deal and no deal will be damaging to Scotland's economy. Watch my question to Finance Secretary @DerekMackaySNP about how this will impact Scotland: 
After #Brexit, the Irish, UK & EU authorities have agreed that the Common Travel Area will continue to operate. Under the CTA, Irish & British citizens can move freely between the two countries & also have other rights.  More at  
I can tell you right now which subjects trigger bot-reactions: Brexit, Corbyn, Islam, anti-semitism, feminism, Jess Philips. With this Tweet, I have essentially set fire to my timeline for the next three days. The bots swarm, cause chaos and fury, and stifle debate. This is 2019.  
Remain MPs and the Mainstream Media are saying,‘No deal Brexit will be catastrophic for Britain’But none of them are explaining why it will be. I believe it’s just an empty threat and fear tactics. I believe Britain will positively thrive outside of the control of the EU. 
Labour's plan for Brexit:A customs unionClose alignment with the single marketAlignment on rights and protectionsCommitments on EU agencies & funding, including environment, education & industryAgreements on future security arrangements 
“If this vote is not passed tonight...then Brexit could be lost”: UK PM Theresa May urges parliament to vote for her #Brexit deal  
Yes, that is a unicorn floating over Westminster this afternoon#brexit  
It's going to be ANOTHER catastrophic defeat for Theresa May tonight! Surely she must then do the decent then, resign, and allow the Conservative Party to put someone in charge who BELIEVES in Brexit. She's done. 
A non brexit related issue... can someone pls explain to me wtf happens in the Magic Flute 
Various folk on here saying they feel sorry for May. I don't. I can't feel even slightly sorry for someone who is willing to destroy the UK, its economy and the lives of millions by using a bent advisory referendum as a tool for removing their rights. 
Not just 2016!No surprise that during Dec 18 - Feb 19, fake, foreign & far-right accounts have been pushing a pro-leave #Brexit agenda on social media.#leave inclined voters are being manipulated by those who wish UK harm| Science & Tech News | Sky News 
I am extremely concerned that a motion proposing that @LeedsUniUnion should combat antisemitism was not agreed earlier this week. Leeds University prides itself on its diversity and it's hugely disappointing that this will now be put to a campus-wide referendum. 
The BBC did not broadcast Ian Blackfords speech but brodcast all other leaders speech.  unnaceptable We are witnessing an attempt to silence the SNP & the people of Scotland on Brexit from the BBC We are second class citizens with in this Union We can accept it or get out  
Dear Twitter.  I know it’s all about the #Brexit this evening but I just had to show you our #sunset. Look, it will lift your soul  
Only statute can override statute. A non-binding vote against no deal does not alter the default legal position, which is that we leave with or without a deal on 29 March 2019. #Brexit  
May tells MPs: back me or lose Brexit  
What parliament should do next1. Revoke article 502. Set up parallel criminal and public enquiries into the referendum campaigns and subsequent events3. Enquiry to investigate how to move to proportional representation4. New laws sanctioning MPs for blatently lying 
Shout-out to the multicultural internationalists in Westminster currently chanting ‘we want a no-deal Brexit’ to the tune of ‘Guantanamera’ 
Throughout the Brexit debate, the SNP have been all too eager to ignore the fact that 1 million Scots voted leave in 2016.Their votes, and the result of the UK-wide vote to Leave the EU, should not be ignored. I am determined to deliver a smooth and orderly exit. #BrexitVote 
While everyone's watching them fuck up the country with brexit they are also quietly fucking up the NHS ..... has there ever been a more duplicitous, inept government ?  
My theory is that some of the brighter Brexiters now realise that any Brexit is a disaster.  However, since the first rule of politics is never admit, the best they can do to avoid forever being held responsible is to vote down the deal on the vague hope that we end up remaining. 
The cameras were filming for a Channel 4 documentary on Brexit, coming out later this year. One to look forward to. ERG meeting well underway now. 
Thick Scots - Arrogant EnglishTheresa May told Scotland’s First Minister she “wasn’t bright enough to understand how good the Brexit deal was”.Constitutional Sec. Mike Russell told Westminster’s Scottish Affairs Committee the incident happened the last time the two met.  
Although undoubtedly contentious, a second referendum would offer the public a chance to put Britain back on the path to sane and orderly government (via @bopinion) 
Sarah Woolaston intervenes. "Would he also agree that if our constituents had seen the actual Brexit deal they too would have rejected it?" 
*Somebody* around here is not very good at doing Brexit and (spoiler) it’s not me 
"We are being encouraged to recommend for our constituents something that we know is not in the interests of the country. If there hadn't been a referendum none of us would recommend this to our constituents." 
Fake, foreign and far-right: Dodgy accounts uncovered pushing Brexit agenda on social media  
Turns out the cameras were in for a channel 4 documentary set to air in September...assuming of course tv programmes still air in the post-no deal Brexit wasteland that will be the UK. 
BREXIT JUDGEMENT DAYTonight - a Channel 4 News special programme from Westminster as Britain's future is decided live on air – with result of the Meaningful Vote expected just after 7.15pmStay tuned - #MayBeTroubleAhead 
“I respect the Prime Minister’s attempts to improve the deal. However, it’s been a failure. We need to leave the EU on 29th March and deliver on the referendum promise. As a sovereign country we need the ability to leave the backstop unilaterally” @andreajenkyns#StandUp4Brexit 
Sam Gyimah, Tory: "There is a difference between where we all were during the referendum and where we are now. That is that today we all now know what is negotiable." 
Neither am I, I was fined by a puffed-up regulator that doesn't like the outcome of the referendum. No one other than those engaged in the Remoaner movement Twitter circlejerk is suggesting that I am, that includes a High Court Judge and the police.  
Parliament owes it to the people of this country to reject Theresa May's botched Brexit deal.  
Whichever way we voted, we didn't vote for Theresa May's bad Brexit deal. I will be voting against it tonight. #BrexitVote @GMB_Union 
It is much more serious than that. This is the meltdown of the UK. A point the Westminster political classes & media forget. Scotland & N Ireland have other choices if we so choose. #Brexit #indyref2 #Irishborder 
In light of the ongoing Brexit saga, my mate Mark Lockwood just sent me this pic which kinda sums it all up:  
The political class is at war with the largest democratic vote in UK history. Some of them want to soften Brexit, some want to stall it, and others want to kill it. It is time we stood up to these betrayers of the people’s will, says Brendan O’Neill 
Absolutely nothing to do with Brexit whatsoever. Diesel innit?  
PM Theresa May said in the HoC this afternoon that ‘polling shows that support for a united Ireland would be higher in the event of a No-Deal Brexit’ – she, & her team, must have reviewed LT’s Dec18 NI poll (the only current NI polling research about this issue) – see below:  
Senior Brexit Tory tells me around 25 Tory MPs will switch to support PM + lots of abstentions. Not nearly enough for PM 
He's like an algorithm built from the tweets of Brexit trolls. 
"There seems to be legal trickery to keep us in the EU & its institutions"  @SuzanneEvans1 and her take on the botched #Brexit deal  
I bet Klopp tackled Keita in training just so he could start the Brexit midfield tomorrow night 
Owen Paterson just said that if the deal goes through "it will not be the end of it." I.e. he and others will continue to campaign against the new arrangments. The idea that passing the WA tonight settles anything is for the birds. Brexit will never, ever stop. 
Uncertainty over Brexit is killing UK car industry. After the rhetoric & performances from PM last night & today, it’s time for the people to have their say.  
I think May should just troll all of them now and announce that a general election and second referendum will both happen on the same day as reinstated euro elections. And throw-in re-runs of the referendums on PR and Scottish independence too. 
Visited a small engineering firm in Vantaa today for a story. They're already feeling the negative impact of Brexit and it hasn't even happened yet: because no country is an island, we're all deeply connected. What happens in UK has a ripple effect even in Vantaa. #brexit 
Whatever happens with #brexit we will still be making these little watch components in the #uk @bremont #watchmaking  
I, and millions, have spent 3 years fighting #Brexit. Exposing illegality fraud and foreign manipulation. The xenophobic lies fuelling hatred of the EU. Fighting for our economic stability. Facing constant abuse. Only for Corbyn to say today let’s do Lexit. NoEnough is enough 
Fiona Onasanya arrives in parliament. Presumably to vote against Brexit- but what time does she have to be home? 
State of this fraud. Let it never be forgotten that @Anna_Soubry voted AGAINST Corbyn’s amendment, which had a provision for a second referendum. If that’s what she was so keen on, why did she reject it? She’s a total fraud.  
I am now absolutely 100% certain that if there was a second EU referendum the establishment would rig the vote. Too many voices confidently assuming there would be a Remain vote. The establishment won't make the same mistake they made in 2016. The result has already been decided. 
.@Anna_Soubry's anecdote in parliament about the woman in her constituency is very telling - essentially saying she is deluded for thinking Brexit will make her life better. 'They were lied to, tricked and conned.' Watch these anti-Brexit MPs sink lower and lower. 
Dominic Raab - who as Brexit Secretary couldn’t find time to read the Good Friday Agreement - appears to be running for Tory leadership & calls for a “second chance” society. Great. Let’s have a second chance to vote on Brexit now we know how botched it is by Raab & his cronies  
Dominic Grieve doing the rounds and giving an interview to LBC. He has said that Article 50 should be extended and we should hold a second referendum. Upon a Remain vote the Leave side would have to accept the result and we should stop having referendums because they don't work. 
Theresa May has remarkable capacity for doing U-turns in a very short space of time & in an entirely shameless fashion.Boxed into a corner, she might well decide #PeoplesVote is the only way out of the #Brexit mess she's created.My @standard interview: 
"The emperor has no clothes. None at all. Not even a codpiece" SNP's Joanna Cherry on Attorney General Geoffrey Cox's legal advice on last-minute changes to #Brexit deal   
Silence from Labour MPs. They plan, as a block, to vote against Mrs May’s deal. Given they certainly don’t want a no-deal Brexit, this can only be to reverse Brexit; or to trigger a General Election and try to win power; or both. Disgraceful games at a time like this.  
In the chaos of Brexit the pointless suffering incurred by austerity is being ignored... The “human cost” of the Govt’s benefit cap was slammed by MPs who found the policy had created hardship for already vulnerable people. 
Brexit feels like one of those awful training videos where they show you a completely unrealistic exaggeration of the wrong way to do something. 
I am out of the loop. Pls sum up the current state of Brexit for me in a gif? 
Plans to merge member states' armed forces and create an EU Navy move a step forward as Angela Merkel backs plans to build a common European aircraft carrier:  #Brexit 
A common point in favour of Brexit is trust will be broken if we do not Brexit. But the Irish had two referendums on the Lisbon Treaty. Did they lose trust in democracy? Certainly not. They learned a lot about the EU, influenced it, and are very happy & prosperous IN. #MayDeal 
When Westminster, 17 days before Brexit, and hours before another vote, is still discussing whether the ‘Irish’ backstop is necessary or not. #TheLordisTestingUs  
Small business owners are typically very optimistic people, yet even they are struggling to be positive about the future due to #Brexit.The current wave of negativity from small firms is worse than during the economic crash!We need to end the uncertainty with a #PeoplesVote. 
Pure livid here Brexit chaos going on. Took my neighbours greyhound out a walk to calm down. One of my citizens walked past and said ‘nice dog, do you race him?’, ‘no chance’ I replied, ‘have you seen the speed of these bastards, it would beat me easy!’ HaHa whitma like?  
BREXIT: Fake, foreign and far-right - Dodgy accounts uncovered pushing pro-Leave #Brexit agenda on social media  
#Brexit"There is no unilateral exit mechanism, there is no time limit, there are no alternative arrangements.So let us be clear, the withdrawal agreement is unchanged.The political declaration is unchanged..."        Jeremy Corbyn.#BrexitVote #JC4PM 
Whether you liked it or not, the campaign for the five words ‘remain in the European Union’ lost.Remaining should not be an option on the table to resolve this Brexit impasse.  
Some seem to think a general is now likely Possible that would mean a Tory majorityIf it didn't Brexit almost certainly lostIf it did DUP almost guaranteed to lose influence over Brexit process 
.@ChrisLeslieMP attacks the "alchemists who believed they could conjure up this pretence of Brexit." #Timetodecide 
This is directly contradicted by the article, which shows only 32% are against another referendum ever. Delete the tweet and amend the headline in the article. 
Don't fall for the spin from the establishment and their lapdogs in the press. Brexit was NOT a working class rebellion. Most working class areas of the UK were REMAIN strongholds: Liverpool, Manchester, Glasgow, Newcastle, Peckham etc.#truthhurts#exitbrexit#BrexitVote 
Thing about #Brexit is it could never have been anything other than an embrace of risk and uncertainty. Risk and uncertainty is where both total failure & great opportunity await. The idea that you could de-risk #Brexit upfront was always something of an illusion. 
This morning I tried to explain to the guy in NYC who I buy my morning tea from that Brexit is scheduled for the 29th of this month and we still don't have agreed terms on anything. He thought I was joking 
In 2016, Brexit was 4 words "Leave the European Union".In 2019, Brexit is a 585-page treaty.The politicians have had about 5 chances to judge that treaty.The PEOPLE have had NONE AT ALL!#BrexitVote 
Brexit is just a toxic political death warrant for any and all that touch it Note that, those that covet May’s job as it slips from her hands in these coming hours.  The brexit bell will toll for you too if you embrace it. 
Help get a #BetterDealForAnimals after #Brexit by signing the #petition urging government to pass a strong law that recognises animals have feelings and emotions, and protects their welfare:  #Cats #CatLovers #AnimalWelfare #CatsofTwitter 
And again MP Daniel Kawczynski has just now repeated proven lie that "EU countries will be forced to adopt Euro".Needless to say @BBCSimonMcCoy didnt even try to correct him.This is why Brexit happened. How can the population make rational choices when truth no longer exists? 
May's deal isn't Brexit. We will remind you of that at the ballot box 
For Unionist politicians, the Union was never about union with Britain but domination in Ireland. The DUP don't even have the sense to do domination cleverly. The absolute disaster of Tory hard Brexit, covered in curried yoghurt, is a fitting end to their opposition to equality.  
Nestle are one of our biggest employers in Halifax. Read their letter to me about the implications of Brexit. Just one of the reasons I believe people need a final say. May’s deal is not good. I cannot in good faith sign it off.  
Nothing has changed.I agree with @GMB_Union - this deal fails to protect jobs, rights and industries.I will be voting against Theresa May's bad Brexit deal tonight. #BrexitVote 
Dominic Grieve tells @HouseofCommons #Brexit debate, the devolved administrations have been disrespected by UK government 
Well Nick - blame your Tory chums for that.  Civil war in the Con Prty morphs into Brexit and splits the nation in two - well done you and your pals. Nobody seriously gave a fuck about the EU until farage put the willies up Cameron - Bill Cash /Rees Mogg  seen as a  mild lunatics 
“It is absolutely imperative that we don’t allow this Withdrawal Agreement through. It undermines the referendum, it is in denial of our manifesto commitments & the rights of this House to legislate in line with the wishes of our own constituents in general elections” @BillCashMP 
UK lawmakers rejected first #Brexit deal, won’t approve revised deal, will deny delay in brexit, don’t want hard brexit, don’t wanna continue with EU, don’t want second referendum, don’t want to change PM but will defeat her every proposal. 
Don’t remember his exact words but senior Tory MP Dominic Grieve says the Brexit process has not recognised that the UK is made up of four diverse nations. 
He argues that if there was unanimity of purpose he might go along, even though he thought it a serious mistake. "But this is simply not the case... What are we going to do with Brexit when we have it?" 
“I cannot allow this further ratchet in the destruction of this country to take place” says Dominic Grieve of @theresa_may’s Brexit deal 
And yet the evidence has been overwhelming in the last two and a half years that there is a very substantial majority in this House who consider that there is no form of Brexit better than remaining in the EU." 
Who is "brighter" - more intelligent and able to understand brexit ? 
Once again Corbyn shows he wants Brexit to happen.  
Fake, foreign and far-right: Dodgy accounts uncovered pushing Brexit agenda on social media - Sky News  
Who needs enemies with so called friends like @NickBoles. The Tories need to start deselecting remainers who are clearly working for the EU & constantly trying to sabotage Brexit & UK democracy..  
Grieve just indicated that because 10% of referendum voters don't normally vote in general elections, they should be ignored. Not appealed to as potential regular voters... ignored. What a *******. 
Former Brexit Secretary David Davis said that this 'proposed deal is against our national interest & will harm our country'.Now he's planning to back the deal on the basis of the texts agreed last night where nothing changed. MPs must vote down the Brexit deal tonight.  
Whereas Boris Johnson and Theresa Villiers, then the NI Secretary, both said Brexit would make no difference to the NI border. This was blatantly untrue unless UK stayed in SM/CU which both of them now say wouldn't be proper Brexit.  
Dominic Grieve says in the Commons today: ‘there is no form of Brexit that is better than staying in the European Union.’ 
With just a few hours to go before MPs vote on Theresa May's Brexit deal, we have analysed exactly how many votes the British prime minster needs to win – which now seems very unlikely. Read more here:  
If we #RevokeA50 unilaterally, Stop #Brexit, #Remain in the EU + Best Poss Deal, Vetoes, Opt Out, Current great trade deals & prevent the Removal of Rights w/o Consent & #Reform UK.1. 1/3 ppl, Trump & Putin wld be pissed off2. The £ wld Rise3. 2/3 ppl & Companies wld rejoice. 
Fake, foreign and far-right: Dodgy accounts uncovered pushing Brexit agenda on social media  
When Theresa May's deal is rejected tonight, she must resign.She tried to deliver Brexit, she has failed.If she has any self respect, she'll do the honourable thing.A Brexiter must take over and lead trade talks going forward. 
Remember - when the Tories refuse you a #peoplesvote: over 32 months have now passed since 2016 referendumThe PM demanded 2017 general election only 25 months after the last oneDemocracy is not a one-off event nor is it the privilege of one generation 
Look at all the love for Europe on display.. Countless flags in support of the Union. This is NOT a country ready to quit. #EU #Brexit   
Currently, a second referendum doesn’t have anywhere near enough support amongst MPs to pass.Therefore, the only feasible way to get one is for a General Election to be held and Labour to propose a public vote on their own negotiated deal in their manifesto. 
And on it goes. Time to draw a line under this whole #Brexit nonsense, revoke article 50 and hope it's not too late for other businesses to choose to remain.  
Hold a second referendum on EU membership.The Brexit process has been a failure. No one voted for this to happen #BrexitVote #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote 
Let’s just have a referendum, general election, European election, local elections, town & parish elections, North of Tyne mayoral election, dancing on ice, X Factor and strictly competition all on one day #SuperThursday23May  
Brexit news: Fury as 'negative' Dominic Grieve claims UK NOT leaving on March 29. The Tories need to start deselecting remainers and begin with Dominic Grieve. They are working for the EU & constantly trying to sabotage Brexit & UK democracy..  
NEW VIDEO!Brexit: PragerU vs. Reality 
Britain Enters ‘Holding Hands In Toy Story 3’ Stage Of Brexit  
Good! ‘Pass this deal or Brexit could be lost' - Sky News  
Brexit is a bad deal. MPs need to find the courage to vote it down.If #Brexit is such a great idea, why not see what the people think about it - now we know the first  campaign was based on lies?#PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople@women4PV @spaceangel1964 @Ferretgrove 
"Members of this house are faced with a very clear choice: vote and support this deal, or risk no deal or no Brexit."Theresa May, while struggling with her voice, says her "improved" Brexit deal "deserves the support of every member".  
MPs are voting on May's #Brexit deal tonight.They should reject it, step back from the cliff edge and seek real clarity about our future in a #PeoplesVote.Still not sure why the deal is bad? Take a look at the graphic below.Please RT. 
Nothing has changed.I agree with @GMB_Union - this deal fails to protect jobs, rights and industries.I will be voting against Theresa May's bad Brexit deal tonight. #BrexitVote 
If these you girls represent the future then it is looking very bright!#WTOBrexit #WithdrawalAgreement #Brexit  
.@IanBlackfordMP: "The best future for Scotland lies in it becoming, like so many of its neighbours, a full, equal, sovereign, independent Member State of the European Union." #Brexit 
Just watched a blistering speech from Ian Blackford at Westminster on Brexit. The Prime Minister sat and laughed at Scotland’s leading MP standing up for Scotland. #DissolveTheUnion 
@IainBlackford on fire in the HoC right now if the Scottish TORIES vote for Mays Brexit Deal then are going against the wishes of their constituents and are selling SCOTLAND out for financial gain for their own pockets...  
Thanks everyone for following Brexit so I don't have to. It just sounds like a lot of baboons in a blender. 
It's not reasonable or fair to force the Government's #Brexit deal on us without a #PeoplesVote now we know the real facts about the costs of leaving the EU. Tweet your MP to tell them to Vote Down The Deal tonight: 
Whatever you feel about the SNP or Scottish Independence you have to admit it was refreshing to hear plain speaking; brexit in human terms; passion for the EU and conviction politics @IanBlackfordMP 
Listening to Nicky Morgan in the Commons now, I can only conclude that Gove/Johnson/JRG have offered her a Cabinet position in any future Government they might form, because she has gone full Brexit. 
Theresa May is putting the same deal to a vote as before. All she has done is drag the country deeper into this Brexit crisis and burden the British people with greater uncertainty.It's a shambles and it must stop. Let's end this now with a People's Vote 
Time & again I hear @IanBlackfordMP making pro-EU speeches that ought to be coming out of the mouth of Jeremy Corbyn..Fat chance..which is probably the same JC has of becoming PM w/o backing#RevokeA50 Stop #Brexit & #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal. 
A Question of Democracy:If we owe something to the 34-37% of the electorate who voted Leave, what do we owe to the 63-66% who did not?And which percentage is "The Voice Of The People”?#UKPolitics #StopBrexit #Brexit #leave #remain 
"Theresa May urges MPs to vote for her deal or risk no Brexit at all."sounds a lot like"Agree to be punched in the face or risk no punch in the face at all."to me. #BrexitVote 
A no-deal Brexit would threaten human rights--for UK citizens in the EU, EU citizens in the UK, and UK residents who currently enjoy EU-based rights protection on workers rights, discrimination and privacy.  
Whilst we are all fixated on Brexit the Tories think it’s a good day to bury bad news: they’ve scrapped the four-hour NHS waiting time target.Make sure people know  
If I had told you 2 years ago that with 18 days to go until #Brexit there would be no consensus on a deal in Parliament you rightly would have told me that this would be impossible. Parliamentarians would have put their divisions aside 4 the best of the country. I feel sad today. 
DUP Brexit spokesman Sammy Wilson tells @KayBurley that the DUP will vote against Theresa May's plan tonight, despite the £1 billion given by the government in 2017 in exchange for their supportGet live updates here:  
Guys and Girls get your yellow vests out because you are going to need them, because we have as much chance of getting Brexit on the 29th of March as i have of winning the lottery on Wednesday. We have been conned, and deceived, and lied to by these traitors from day one enough. 
‘We’re Financially Ready For Brexit’, Insist Team Behind Children’s Hospital  
Through the dark clouds of the EU a WTO #BREXIT is brewing. The future's bright, the future's #WTO 
What a weird situation. I'm depending on the DUP and ERG to do the right thing and kill Theresa May's brexit. Not because I agree with anything that's ever passed between their ears but because, if they do so, there's an excellent chance this whole brexit fiasco can be binned. 
Sammy Wilson describing the hideous position Tories have put Britain in.. Having to rely on a small bunch of 'rabid ideologues'. #EU #Brexit  
Meanwhile Irish Parliament putting through a #Brexit Omnibus Bill- millions being spent, further destabilisation of politics in N. Ireland  -thanks a whole pile UK-next time you want regime change-do some due diligence  
Tonight I will vote against the Prime Minister's failed Brexit deal. Nothing has changed since the deal was defeated in January: The deal still threatens jobs, rights and livelihoods.If the PM loses again, she will have lost any remaining shred of authority. #BrexitVote 
Snap YouGov poll finds that the public are split on whether MPs should accept or reject the Brexit deal tonight36% want MPs to reject the Brexit deal32% want MPs to accept the Brexit deal32% don't know 
I'll tell you what's going to be hard to take... the stomach-churning eulogies to May's utterly disgraceful political career that will follow her looming demise. From the hostile environment to the Brexit fiasco, the wizened old rat deserves neither respect nor sympathy. #vile 
Intransigent? From the @duponline? Come on. What’s your realistic #brexit counter proposal?  
is it funnier if Brexit happens or doesn’t 
ERG say they will only vote for deal if Brexit In Peril. Which it certainly will be tomorrow when No Deal taken off the table by a stonking majority. Path to winning MV3 there? Go to Brussels next week, try hammer out something from 27.. then put it back to MPs? 
The one person in Britain still convinced that Brexit will be a good thing  
After nearly 3 years of Brexit talks and wrangling's. What is your thoughts on the EU now?Do you hold them in high regard?#WithdrawalAgreement#BrexitVote 
RT if you're a football fan who didn't vote for Brexit  
Theresa May’s legacy1. Ran the worst GE in history2. Destruction of Brexit3. Destruction of the Conservative Party4. Destruction of democracy5. Britain’s first Marxist GovernmentThat’s where capitulation, appeasement and duplicity gets you! 
If you want to feel just a little better about the U.S. right now, you could follow the Brexit clusterfuck in Parliament today. Watching a nation punch itself in the face repeatedly is perversely fascinating (and depressing).  
While listening to DUP's Sammy Wilson and his insufferable lies, I wonder if he thinks he lives in an alternative universe where Northern Ireland voted to Leave.The DUP does not represent Northern Ireland's vote in the EU referendum. This can't be said often enough. 
Brexit has taken the entire efforts of the Tory government for 3 years, and has achieved absolutely nothing at all.Nowt. Diddly-squat. Bugger all.So now we know for certain that Britain can cope perfectly well without a Tory government for 3 years. 
Parliament this week is obvs all about Brexit, but next Wed it gets to debate the *really* important issue of this era: #INSECTAGGEDON.Props to @alexsobel for securing Westminster Hall debate on insect population declines, Wed 20th March, 11am:  
Latest from the Betfair exchange - 1547Article 50 extension - 83% chanceUK to leave on March 29  - 15% chanceNo deal Brexit - 12% chanceCommons pass Brexit vote in March - 21% chance 
Ian Blackford still running with the old commentariat idea that anti-EU feeling was a private pursuit of a few Tories. Doesn't explain UKIP winning 2014 Euros, let alone 17.4m votes for Brexit in 2016. In other words, total rot. 
Only this Guy can save #Brexit now   
65% of the Scottish public want a second independence referendum, says superlative Survation survey -  #ScotRef #indyref2 
The simple fact is when Brexit has made toff Jacob Rees Mogg richer by at least £7 million; you should know it's a crooked deal that is going to leave you poorer. #BrexitVote 
"To stand here today with only 17 days to go until we Exit the EU – to know that Scotland’s historic place in Europe is under threat, is devastating"The SNP's @IanBlackfordMP speaking about why the majority of Scotland's MPs will vote against Theresa May's damaging deal #Brexit 
An astonishing day, but what happens after the Government's deal is voted down again this evening? Is this the end of May's premiership? Is it the end of #Brexit? Is it the end (please God) of the Tories as we know them? More importantly, does this herald the end of the UK? 
May told MPs if they don’t back her deal, there may be no Brexit. Truth is if they do back her deal, there will be no Brexit. We’re being swindled. Time for a clean sweep of Parliament. Join us #ForBritain  Support us 
Well done @IanBlackfordMP calling out @theresa_may for sitting there laughing when he mentions Brexit denying British people, especially the young, opportunities and rights #NoBrexit #StopBrexit  
Proud to see #FFS Supporters like @kiramillana stand alongside @OFOCBrexit & @euromove activists to say that we’re *still* not buying this government’s bad brexit deal. Vote it down, and back a #PeoplesVote#PutItToThePeople#FFS 
UK plan to trade with Commonwealth nations after Brexit is 'utter bollocks', former Australian PM says  
May is looking at (another) historic defeat on her shambolic Brexit deal tonight.This Government have failed the country in every way possible.It’s past time they were replaced by @UKLabour - for the many.#GeneralElectionNow  
I predict:- May to go- Brexit suspended - General Election- Hung Parliament - Second Referendum- Another ‘Leave’ result And round we go again for another 3 years ...We ‘ain’t ever leaving Europe folks!#WithdrawalAgreement 
And if it’s a pointless Brexit, why are we doing it?I'm pretty sure what happens next is our media will ignore just how far away the people who pushed this thing are from their original positions.  
Given the shambles that is #Brexit and the disrespectful way Scotland is being treated by the UK Government, I'm not surprised people want the chance to choose #Independence #voteSNP 
Still M.A.Y feat. Snoop MoggProbably the best thing you’ll watch today.#Brexit #BrexitShambles #BrexitVote 
Why hasn't Corbyn mentioned the growing evidence that the referendum was poisoned by hostile forces that wish to see us divided. If he wants to bring the country back together again, he needs to side with our people, and not those who would do us harm. 
The right to Freedom of Movement in 30 countries is being removed without any due constitutional process, no explicit referendum vote, no supermajority and no proper debate. This is not democracy it is robbery and theft. 
After 40 years win a referendum agreed by Parliament 6 to 1, both major parties stand on a manifesto of leave at a general election, Article 50 triggered by a massive majority...still don't leave. We have a very very serious problem on our hands. A problem with democracy. 
It won’t be a ‘Hard Brexit’ it will be a ‘pointless’ Brexit, if those who backed it were telling the truth in 2016.  
I honestly don’t know what I want least: a no deal Brexit or a Corbyn government. 
"We are in historic times... This is chaos. It's ridiculous."MP Charles Walker says a general election is inevitable if tonight's vote is lost. Follow the #Brexit latest here:  
Tonight at 7pm, Brexiters will kill Brexit. In doing so, they will also kill the betrayal myth that Remainers are responsible. 
No - you don't 'have to deliver Brexit' and certainly not when it is this half baked crock of bull droppings. The British people were promised something 'better than we had' not 'worse than we had' - anyone backing this deal does not have the UK's best intentions at heart  
No extension.Referendum clearly not safe and #NothingToRespect in its result.So #StopBrexit and #RevokeA50.Treat it as if it were mandatory - and chuck it out Tell people they were conned 
This deal fails to protect jobs, industries and workers' rights.Nothing has changed.It's time to reject this bad Brexit deal. #BrexitVote @GMB_Union 
"It is possible that every single vote this week will fall. "Then you have to have a general election."Conservative MP Charles Walker says Theresa May's government cannot go on if it loses tonight's #Brexit vote:  
What a betrayal. Not a word used lightly. @jeremycorbyn will never accept the nation do not want Lexit or Brexit; they want the madness to end. Corbyn is not representing his party or the people. A Brexiter, pursuing selfish ideology, as Brexit destroys jobs & lives #PeoplesVote 
If the Conservative Party allows itself to have a leader that permits the cancellation of Brexit, it has failed as an institution just as much as the Lords, Civil Service & Monarchy, & deserves to come to an end as they will. 
We started the 4th innings at lunch on day 5, chasing 600 on a road. Someone convinced Root to let the team vote on whether to bat on for the draw or go for the win. We're now 100-9 at tea and some pundits still claim we're in a strong position to win #Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn is, unfortunately, part of the chaos we are facing. This has been so ever since he three line whipped his MPs in support of the A50 trigger when there was no workable or supportable Brexit Plan. He is co-owner of the chaos no matter how much he seeks to avoid it. 
A general election won't change anything on Brexit as the UK's main political parties are led by 2 kinds of people.-Those who hate the EU as they think it's the Soviet Union.-Those who hate the EU cos they think it isn't the Soviet Union. 
If ever there was ever a very strong case for cancelling the TV licence and privatising the #BBC and #Channel4 it is now after their disgraceful role in the undermining of #Brexit  These state propagandists can no longer hide behind slogans of free speech and free press. 
So Number 10 is not preparing for:- a defeat in #MeaningfulVote- a General Election- a EP election (according to @BrandonLewis)- a Brexit Delay- a No Deal BrexitProblem: it's going to have to do at *least* one of those...  
I am realising many Leave enthusiasts don't want any kind of Brexit deal at all, unless it involves the rest of Europe sinking to the bottom of the sea – rising again only when they want to go on a summer holiday. 
Stripping this Brexit debate down to its most basic issue:This is what happens when you take a questionable, wafer-thin mandate & stupidly treat it as the inalienable & unchallengeable decision of the vast majority, whilst refusing to face the reality of changing circumstances.  
fucks sakethere is no "Jobs 1st brexit"there never ever was! 
Get real people. In his 25 minute speech in the #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement @jeremycorbyn didn’t mention @peoplesvote_uk once. Not once. That’s because he doesn’t  want or believe in  #FinalSay Once a #Brexiteer always a #brexiteer 
So @jeremycorbyn didn’t mention #PeoplesVote once in his 25 minute speech....Terrible to see @uklabour leadership colluding in the drift towards such a disastrous #Brexit 
'Literally nothing has changed.'Jeremy Corbyn attacks Theresa May's Brexit deal as MPs prepare to vote on it tonight  
We've created an Eventbrite page for the March on the 23rd. If you are Remainer Now and can make it to London on the Saturday, please register here to join others who've changed their minds about Brexit and now support a #PeoplesVote  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Hard to disagree with Corbyn’s charge that May’s achieved nothing(or very little) in the past 3 months. Parliament’s winning her game of Brexit Blackmail 
'We're not having a 2nd referendum. The will of the people is clear. You can't just keep have referendums until you're happy with the result,' says Theresa May as she submits her deal for the 3rd time. #BrexitVote 
.@jeremycorbyn "There is a majority in this house for the kind of sensible credible deal Labour has set out". These are not the words of a Labour leader who in his heart wants a #PeoplesVote or EU referendum 
7 out of 10 people in #Scotland want a Referendum on Scottish independence  
#Brexit jargon: A bluffer’s guide to the key terms - all your questions answered about the UK leaving the EU   
You know the terrible thing is about all this Brexit bollicks and the catastrophe its caused!! It could of all been avoided if we had a brexiteer as leader. It would have ended two years ago!! But it was not to be because of our politicians corruption. We must get rid FOREVER!! 
This deal fails to protect jobs, industries and workers' rights.Nothing has changed.It's time to reject this bad Brexit deal. #BrexitVote @GMB_Union 
Lib Dem Brexit Spokesperson @thomasbrake on the latest melodrama in Westminster, and why a People's Vote must now be the way to avoid the Brexit cliff edge.Demand a People's Vote now >  
Today's campaign task is simples: T W E E T   Y O U R   M PTell them to vote down the Government's #Brexit deal tonight. Use the tool below. It's quick and it's easy. 
Watching the latest Brexit debate in the HOC is so depressing. Has there ever been such a motley crew of 3rd raters gathered together in one place. Surely the country deserves so much better than this pantomime. 
As the Brits prepare to vote down another Brexit agreement, a snapshot of UK-EU relations to date:  
History in the making! Don't miss us at 7.00pm tonight...Brexit's moment of decision 
I am presently watching the British Parliament debate Brexit.And I am absolutely convinced that we’re witnessing the most advanced democracy on Earth.I say chaps, can I get a ”Hear”! “Hear”!  
Jacob Rees-Mogg tells @KayBurley that the ERG are to meet this afternoon to discuss the risk to Brexit if they vote down the deal. Is that a “serious risk or is that a phantom? My current view is that it is basically a phantom and it’s safe to vote against this deal”. 
Brexit lost means Britain can be found again. Take back your country! Work with your neighbours for peace and prosperity #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Well yes, we remainers have said (correctly) all along that it would all end in tears and that there were no possible solutions to the problems created by Brexit that would be acceptable to the Brexiters. But even we didn't quite realize the depths of their ineptness. 
Theresa May's pleading to half-full benches reminds me of story about GAA club meeting which was addressed by a local priest who spoke about community spirit and the like and then the chairman said "Thanks father for that, but that's the kinda shite that sickens my hole." #brexit 
The DUP's latest No is a major threat to Northern Ireland's biggest exports; Harp Lager, people who speed on the M1 and bigotry. #Brexit #Backstop 
Pound falls sharply on #Brexit deal advice  
Theresa May saying “It’s my deal or no Brexit” is yet another attempt to cajole the ERG and DUP. For the record No Brexit is fine by me and the large majority of my constituents who don’t want any kind of Brexit. Neither she or my MP has done nothing to reflect our voices in 3yrs 
Jeremy Corbyn has outlined the chaos we are facing. Given that chaos, I intervened to ask if he agreed with me that it would be undemocratic for the UK Government to block a referendum on Scotland’s independence so we can stay in the EU. He replied that it was ‘not relevant’. 
Corbyn has just stated Scottish Independence is irrelevant in the context of Brexit. He clearly has no clue the rising support for Independence due to Brexit or perhaps he is just in denial 
MPs will vote against May’s Deal and against a No Deal. But what is to be gained by a short Art 50 extension? Without a genuine cross-party compromise or another referendum or GE, it will just postpone a No Deal outcome for a few more months. 
I hope the farmers, the business people ,the people on the border and the working class Unionists in the North of Ireland REJECTS the DUP at the May election.They have VOTED for a hard BREXIT with their millionaire ERG mates.SHAME ON THEM 
Lot of people saying this is the moment the Prime Minister loses control of Brexit. I suspect it’s also the moment the Brexiteers lose control of Brexit. 
Look how empty the chamber is for a vital debate on the ditching of A&E waiting time targets. Perhaps the biggest cost of Brexit has been the opportunity cost. Public services have been left to run down while the Conservative party continues a destructive argument with itself.  
The benches behind @theresa_may are half empty.Where are the Tory backbenchers and who are they plotting with?Could this be the last outing as Prime Minister for Mrs May?Looks like #Brexit is about to destroy its second Tory PM. 
Labour's Jeremy Corbyn accuses the government of "trying to fool its own backbenchers" over the #Brexit deal - "there is no unilateral exit mechanism, there is no time limit, there are no alternative arrangements" #BrexitVote updates:  
The Tories’ disastrous handling of Brexit leaves us less safe.Today I challenged the Government on their failure to secure full security and justice cooperation once we leave the EU.  
The deal is finished, May is finished and brexit is dying.Lets put this mess back to the people to decide the future. This time without criminality. The facts are out there for all to see - WTO is suicide, no deal is suicide. We already have the best deal, Remain and Reform  
Why did the People’s Vote campaign never call for a full public inquiry into cheating during the Brexit referendum? Why didn’t Corbyn and his cabinet unanimously call for an investigation when senior Tory MPs were found to have taken part in criminal activity? Anyone? 
Indeed. A nasty, insular, racist country.  #Brexit #FBPE 
Such a disingenuous argument. We were voting in 2016 on a fantasy prospectus where each individual’s unique aspirations for Brexit would be fulfilled. Now we have a concrete deal which delivers only the certainty of rule-taking and reduced prosperity. Let voters compare the two  
A second referendum would make the UK look like one political bitch lmao. 
My husband has a serious heart condition that means it's crucial he avoids stress: she made him apply to live in his own home of 22 years. She has put us both through hell. I do not have a deep well of sympathy for this woman. 
Listen carefully at the last second.May: “Or even moving to a second referendum, with all the damage that would do to trust in our democracy”.Unknown MP: “It’s too late for that”Unknown MP is all of us. Thank you!  
I still maintain Theresa May wanted No-Deal all along. Of course as PM she could never advocate for this reckless outcome. But like I've said before her hubby stands to make a fortune from No-Deal Brexit. 
Whichever way we voted, we didn't vote for Theresa May's bad Brexit deal. I will be voting against it tonight. #BrexitVote @GMB_Union 
BRITAIN: We can stop Brexit, together.  At 7pm today, the House of Commons holds perhaps the most important vote on stopping Brexit.If May's deal fails, and Parliament votes to extend the deadline for leaving the E.U., there will be time to schedule a #PeoplesVote. #BrexitVote 
We now find ourselves in a position where we are not voting for or against the deal because of its merits or flaws, but because we are either in flavour of implementing Brexit or betraying it. 2/2 
In embracing a second referendum, Labour is treating voters like children who must have the chance to rectify their ‘mistakes’. This is a tragic line for Labour to take, says @BrendanChilton of @labourleave 
Exhibit A in acknowledgement that the conditions for triggering a unity referendum, as laid out in the Good Friday Agreement, have been met  
BREXIT: DECISION DAY.Britain's future decided live on Channel 4 News at 7pm. Watch live on 4 and here on Twitter.#MayBeTroubleAhead 
I have decided to vote in favour of the deal despite my deep reservations and concerns about the backstop. I am disappointed that we have found ourselves in this position as a country, but there is now a real chance that if we do not take the deal Brexit could be lost 1/2 
MPs must vote against this deal tonight.Tories thinking about their party above country are going to face a public who increasingly are fed up with their Govt offering endless concessions to the EU.Just 12% think May's deal delivers on the referendum. Vote down this deal. 
Depressing and shocking. We can’t have #brexit that leaves us in disarray like this. I’ll be voting against the prime minister’s deal tonight  
dont do brexit it is a bad idea dont do it 
Tweet your MP to vote down the Government's #Brexit deal tonight using this simple tool: Then demand they #PutItToThePeople, and join us to march for a #PeoplesVote on March 23rd:  
Don't feel sorry for @Theresa_may croaking her way though the #Brexit debate. All her problems are of her own making. Had she been at all collegiate, she could have returned with an agreement that Parliament could have voted through. 
[Thread]Teresa May: I want to BrexitDungeon Master: What does it do?May: Brexit means BrexitDM: But what does it do? What's the effect?May: I don't know, I didn't bring my character sheet 
So, @theSNP 's @joannaccherry patiently explains to @theresa_may and #UKGov about the implications of the Withdrawal Agreement being a treaty. Good work Joanna, but I fear the pupils aren't listening. #Brexit #indyref2 #WithdrawalAgreement 
There's no point blaming the EU if Brexit doesn't happen, responsibility would be with this House. It would've been a failure of this House to deliver the 2016 referendum, says Theresa May. Well, that I can certainly agree with. 
Listening to May list the problems of a no deal brexit ..... financial, security, jobs all in dire risk. While Rees-Mogg and his cronies sit back safe in their wealth and greed egging the country into it purely to feed their over stuffed bank accounts. This is a disgrace #liars 
“Brexit uncertainty? No, the uncertainty that has plagued UK businesses has been created by an intransigent government that sees Brexit as a crisis that must be managed, rather than a precious catalyst for change.”  
In the Chamber listening to the Prime Minister defending the #Brexit indefensible badly. But I'm really struck by her lack of self awareness. Never has there been anyone less suited to being PM. It's time for her to go and for Scotland to leave this disfunctional union. 
LATEST The UK prime minister Theresa May has told MPs that a no-deal Brexit would lead to increased support for an independent Scotland and a united Ireland, weakening the union. 
Theresa May says the EU might insist that Britain takes part in a second referendum in exchange for extending Brexit. 
May says voting down this deal could lead to no-deal or a second referendum. "If any of these things were to happen, it would be no good blaming the EU. Responsibility would lie with this House. Our failure to come together in the national interest." 
May’s voice is like a metaphor for Brexit and her Government: falling apart, but desperately clinging on, despite it being obvious to everyone that it will soon be game over.May should take this advice from @CarolineLucas and hold a People’s Vote. It might rescue her dignity. 
Commons feels like a funeral parlour right now. Extraordinary mood. On what should be May's biggest day on Brexit. 
This feels like the end of the Poll Tax.We had the London march, which was very large, the government drifted on for a bit but everyone knew the Poll Tax was dead.Most know that #Brexit is dead now.Someone just needs to put it out of it's misery.#RevokeArticle50 
#FakeNewsMay's plan does not ensure brexit and u know it 
The problems with the #WithdrawalAgreement are so much deeper than the backstop. I cannot vote for any form of Brexit because every form of Brexit is bad for jobs and bad for Britain.  
* Many people that voted for Brexit didn't know what they voted for & some have changed their minds to remain. * We don't all talk like the Queen like Americans think about the UK or like "roadman" like the rest of the UK thinks about London.  
Reasons I could not be an MP, number 343453: I would at this point be openly playing bingo in the House during Brexit debates. 
And the answer (as PM well knows)  is that the Kyle-Wilson amendment ensures that the result of the confirmatory referendum - it doesn’t come back to parliament, it goes straight into law, so that’s exactly where it ends!  
I have 8 bottles of Dom Perignon 2000 left.  Everyone round to mine if a referendum amendment passes tomorrow 
Hands up if you want these sad, salty losers to stop trying to reverse the result of the referendum with their silly Loser’s Vote that wouldn’t even have #NoDeal on the ballot  
Worth thinking on this again. Boles & Letwin clear that if May fails tonight it will be the legislature that takes control of Brexit. How could a British PM allow this to happen? (Hence the argument by Walker that we heading to General Election)  
Green Party's @CarolineLucas tells PM "the public might have changed their minds" on #BrexitTheresa May: "Where would it end? So you have another referendum, then everybody says let's have a third one?" #BrexitVote updates:  
Incredible how many Conservative MPs seem to forget this. They were happy to run on a hard Brexit manifesto to win votes...  
PM’s latest Brexit deal means Irish backstop is both simultaneously permanent and temporary, insists government’s new legal advisor, Erwin Schrödinger. 
 @Feorlean: "This Brexit deal will cause a crisis in the labour market across Scotland. And problems for Scotland in terms of competitiveness with Northern Ireland."  
Just as long as it’s not you @Anna_Soubry and your LIAR group (liars, intolerant, arrogant, remainers). Had you not spent your time trying to subvert the Brexit process we might now have an acceptable deal..  
Thread: London is one of my favourite cities in the world, I loved my friends & living there. It’s sad to see it fall apart over Brexit so let’s just enjoy its architecture & world class galleries (although Dublin is my )The London Eye & Westminster Bridge  
Theresa May, who has spent the past three months failing to pass her Brexit deal, tells MPs that trade deals "often take shorter than people think." 
While people lose their jobs and our country is turned into a clown-car that’s too broken to  even laugh at, the Brexit elite - screaming how they are the ones standing up to the elite - cash in. £7m since 2016 for Jacob Rees-Mogg. 
My dad called me from Portugal just now, asking "What the f**k is going on in that place?", meaning Westminster. I suspect many European households will be witnessing similar expressions of despair, as the world watches the utter shambles of #Brexit today. 
The “new” Brexit Withdrawal Agreement is identical to the old one — but it “has just been reformatted with a different font size”   
This is huge. This is absolutely key and ignored at the peril of an entire nation. Leaver or remainer, it makes no difference. If I were a leaver, to know that a Russian attack pushed through brexit,  
Although I voted agnst PM deal in Jan, I am #voting for @theresa_may #Brexit deal this eve. Changes made to #backstop are welcome.We can be puritanical &risk disaster of 2cnd referendum or be pragmatic- get EU deal thru with GB leaving on 29 March & therefore deliver #Referendum 
Unanswerable intervention by @CarolineLucas  - if MPs are expected to change their minds over a matter of a few weeks, why can't the public change its mind over nearly three years? May returns with the rubbish about "honouring the result of the referendum." She looks broken. 
Some MPs are folding and backing May's awful deal even the Attorney General says could trap us in the Customs Union. Well done to @andreajenkyns for supporting Brexit.  
I think they are just exhausted & bored having heard it all before. Nothing has changed. This wretched deal needs to be put out of our misery. We’ve had enough. We need to leave with no deal on 29 March & May must stand down to allow a new PM to take over who believes in Brexit 
I will support the deal in order to deliver #Brexit. It's a promise we must keep. Here's why:  
Theresa May: "There isn't evidence that the British people have changed their minds."Ignoring nearly 3 years of Brexit polling since the referendum there... Support for Remain has never been higher. 
Whichever way we voted, we didn't vote for Theresa May's bad Brexit deal. I will be voting against it tonight. #BrexitVote @GMB_Union 
The @10DowningStreet PM has deliberately created a situation in which MPs can vote for her deal, which is an awful deal for the long term future of the UK - or no Brexit, which would fly in the face of the referendum. She's blackmailing MPs. They should now insist on #NoDeal 
I will of course be voting against Theresa May’s hopeless Brexit deal tonight - it’s not in the national interest. As an aside I’ve never known an atmosphere like this in Chamber on a big day. Utterly flat, sepulchral on the Tory benches. Prime Minister really looks finished 
Didn't expect to be tweeting the Morning Star on Brexit, but..."A leading barrister has warned Labour MPs that the pledge on workers’ rights that Prime Minister Theresa May made to persuade them to vote for her Brexit plan is meaningless." 
IRA apparently have claimed responsibilty for letter bombs sent to Glasgow & London. Quite frankly who is going to beleve it? All  to do with Brexit all to do with distraction event created by the British Intelligence. 
Theresa May will yet again lose the #BrexitVote the ERG/DUP will not support it so it's dead, she must go to the Palace tonight and dissolve Parliament for a GE, #A50 must be extended, we @UKLabour then put a 2nd referendum in our manifesto, then sweep the tories from power. 
Charles Walker tells me he thinks general election ‘inevitable’ if deal defeated. She can’t win parliament so she has to win support of public > this, obviously, is NOT what No 10 are planning but senior govt source acknowledges vote today key for our future & delivering Brexit 
YouGov:63 per cent of Conservative voters support UK’s leaving date not being delayed and the UK leaving on WTO terms instead82 per cent of Conservative voters are opposed to a second referendumGood luck to the anti-democrats  
UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP speaks on Theresa May’s latest trip to Strasbourg and the final act of her Brexit betrayal.  
If Brexit dies, #FBPE folks everywhere please stand for MEP positions. I’ve had enough of the UK being represented by hard-right nutcases. 
"Many in this country do not trust the #EU - or many #MPs in this place -  to deliver the referendum result. The only option now is to get a clean break on March 29 and get our country back!"  #RichardDrax saying it like it is!   #StandUp4Brexit 
TIG MPs are saying the government should have pursued Norway-style single market membership - but they rubbished this kind of relationship during the referendum.Remainers like them have not acted in good faith throughout this Brexit process.  
Prime Minister @theresa_may is making a final pitch to MPs, urging them to vote for her #Brexit deal.  
Her best route out of this is still to say “Bollocks, I tried. Cancel Brexit. I resign” 
I have the honour of being elected to Parliament to represent my hometown of Ashton-under-Lyne.I promised to always put them first & fight for our area.This #Brexit deal will not deliver for my constituents so I cannot vote for it.I want a deal but the PM won’t listen to reason. 
It's official! The DUP have confirmed that they will be voting against Theresa May's rotten Withdrawal Agreement tonight - it's time to deliver the Brexit that 17.4m people voted for with a clean WTO exit on March 29.Support us at  
.@Anna_Soubry asks May to confirm she rejected an offer 2 yrs ago to back a soft Brexit with a single market and customs union. May refuses to deny it. 
Ok , if you had to choose one word to describe the mess we've been led to, and one word only,what would that word be? I know mine! #brexshit #brexit #kbj #mess #EuropeanUnion pic.twitter.com/jTdPrzgjVX 
"What’s extraordinary is that no-one knows what happens next" Eh? Why is that "extraordinary"? Nobody's had a scooby what happens next since the referendum. 
@joannaccherry having to explain international law to @10DowningStreet #brexit 
I suppose it's better than the president inserting himself into the Brexit debate drama in Westminster 
Looking forward to a peaceful, Brexit-free timeline after a smooth transition come the end of the month  
Another bit of bad news which no doubt Brexitshambles supporters will claim has nothing to do with Brexit -Probably because their idea of Brexit has nothing to do with reality  
Don’t worry, we have 17 days until Brexit. I’m sure everything will be fine...  
Attorney General wrecks May's 'last chance' Brexit dealBrexit is Not Lost, Leave No Deal, WTO Rules!Our Referendum was :To Remain                                               To Leave.  Leave won, no mention of a Bad Deal!  
If the governments Brexit deal is voted down tonight, and if the rumours about a general election to follow are true, I predict the biggest shake up in British politics in decades. Parties splitting. Quickly put together manifesto's. And the most hung of hung parliaments. 
Because a Corbyn premiership is more terrifying than any amount of Brexit related chaos. “Simples.”  
Never forget: by refusing to accept all-UK backstop that was cooked up at UK request to avoid Irish Sea border, the DUP is doing its darnest to make a No-Deal Brexit (& a border across IRE/NI) ever more likely.    An affront to the people of NI who they supposedly represent.  
Hi Robert - You may be right in saying that Brexit will have been lost, but I would prefer to say that sanity has won. #PeoplesVote 
Depressing question from Scottish Tory MP John Lamont. At this crucial time, on the very edge of the #Brexit cliff, he offered the PM a silly soft ball question on the @scotgov Talk about never rising to an occasion.... 
Wohoo! Scotland didn't vote for it, won't be sorry to see the back of Brexit! Let's hold the PM to her words...  
Speaker John Bercow told MPs he has selected no amendments to the Government's Brexit deal motion.A vote on the deal is expected at 7pm, with the result at approximately 7.15pm. 
would happen. For her it's tonight for her Brexit deal or it has gone forever. Or so I am told.  Will she stick to that? 
One minister, discounting loss tonight by PM of vote on her Brexit deal, encouraged @theresa_may at this morning's cabinet meeting to hold another meaningful vote on it tomorrow - and therefore not to surrender. I understand the PM gave the minister no hope that... 
If brexit affected WiFi, it would be voted down in ten minutes 
Brexit deal DEAD: Jacob Rees-Mogg’s ERG tells MPs NOT to vote for deal - letter in full  
If May squeaks it on the basis of the growing voices of surrender, then Brexit goes through on time and the deal collapses by Christmas and we get late no deal. Alternatively, Parliament takes the ball and fumbles it all the way to March 29th and we get no deal on time. 
There is now no way through for the PM in tonight’s vote. DUP has abandoned her. Whole strategy has failed. Minister says “wheels have come off” #brexit 
No brexit it is then. Woo hoo.  
Don your lab coats! Grab your goggles! Ready your placards!Get ready to march and make some noise for UK science at the #PutItToThePeople People's Vote March on 23.03.19Join us as we take to the streets of London to march for a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit. 
As much as I feel sorry for her I can’t excuse her fatal decision with Hammond to reject preparing for a No Deal in 2016. It gave so much hope and power to Remainers who worked with Brussels to ensure the worst deal or No Brexit.Huge error. 
DUP criticism of failure of PM to secure what it sees as adequate backstop changes are so trenchant that very difficult to see any way back for her Brexit deal  
‘Can we get over feeling sorry for Theresa May?’This #bbcqt audience member criticises the prime minister’s handling of Brexit. 
Hoarse May’s voice fading is the sound of a declining PM and visibly weakening case for Brexit 
We've made a Brexit show but it's not about Brexit: it's about what it means to make a place like Hull your home #UsAgainstWhatever 
Yes, Theresa May's damaging plan certainly does send a message about the sort of country she wants Brexit Britain to be - but its definitely not the sort of country Scotland wants to be #Brexit  
No more Brexit at #Sodem 
Tobias Ellwood explains brexit:'Members should remember who they signed up to serve, the Conservative Party.'#RevokeA50 
During PM's speech, @StewartMcDonald asks the Prime Minister what changes to the Brexit agreement she has made after devolved nations' suggestions. Answer?  None. 
As Brexit chaos strikes and rumors of a General Election is Theresa May's deal fails tonight. Which party would you vote for in a GE? #WithdrawalAgreement #Brexit #BrexitVote 
"The danger... (is) if this deal is not passed then Brexit could be lost" PM Theresa May tells MPs ahead of tonight's #BrexitVoteUpdates:  
PM - It's clear for those who want to deliver Brexit, that if this deal does not go through tonight, then house risks no #Brexit at all.  
Theresa May says her Brexit deal "sends a message to the whole world about the kind of country Britain will be." 
Theresa May opens #BrexitVote debate: "Tonight, members of this House are faced with a very clear choice - support this deal, in which case we leave the EU with a deal... or risk no deal, or no Brexit"Updates:  
I will only respect her when she stands up and says that the best option is to revoke article 50 with all she knows including the illegality of the referendum. 
Theresa May says that if her deal is not passed tonight "then Brexit might be lost"Get live updates here:  
Why is the "Irish backstop" complicating Brexit? pic.twitter.com/vxJJiHjY5W 
It's important to remember who ripped up a Tory Brexit. Jeremy Corbyn & Labour. 
DUPFull statement from DUP spokesman giving reasons for rejecting Theresa May’s brexit deal  
Well this Brexit business is all going very well don’t you think? 
#BrexitCatGIFs *** #BrexitVote SPECIAL ***Is #Brexit now confined to the dustbin of history? Was a stupid name for a cat anyway!#WithdrawalAgreement #MeaningfulVote #TuesdayThoughts 
No one can doubt that the PM has busted a gut for BrexitPeople can be annoyed with where we are, and about mistakes we've made so far in the processBut she has given the negotiations her all as her voice betrays 
Fine by me. Put it on a ballot and let the public decide. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
May claims in Commons that "if this deal is not passed then Brexit could be lost". There was no "we might not deliver Brexit" in her general election manifesto as I recall. There was however "no deal better than a bad deal". 
LIVE: UK PM Theresa May takes questions in parliament ahead of planned vote on her revised #Brexit deal.   
What #May doesn't understand is that Brexit is what the electorate voted for and therefore whatever this shambles of a govt do that mandate remains ... we will prevail 
PM says its her deal or No Brexit 
“Brexit is your choice, not mine.”The Prime Minister of Luxembourg showing more compassion in 1:10 than the UK Government has shown in the last two years. 
It's difficult not to contrast moments like this with the promises of respect that Scotland was given ahead of 2014's independence referendum. 
.@theresa_may  "If this deal is not passed, then Brexit could be lost" 
I'm not convinced the DUP/ERG ever intended to support the WA regardless of what the revised text said, there are elements that have been running the clock down and stalling for time with a WTO crash out their preferred option #Brexit 
Speaker Bercow announces he has not selected any amendment to be voted upon tonight so there will simply be one single vote at 7pm on the Brexit deal. 
The only sensible response to defeat tonight is Theresa’s resignation. She’s failed. Her plan can’t be implemented. An election or a referendum can’t  change the EU’s intransigence, but a new leader means a new plan, a new negotiation and a new start. Time to go 
Currently in the #Seanad taking second stage of the #Brexit Omnibus Bill; look forward to engaging with Senators on this important piece of legislation - you can watch live by clicking the following link -   
We've teamed up with 35 other UK animal welfare organisations to call for a #BetterDealForAnimals post-Brexit.Sign our petition and help us to ensure that animals don't lose vital protections as we leave the EU   
Today seemed like a good day to watch this again, by far the most powerful and compelling thing produced in the 2016 referendum campaign. Strange to think now, I'd have him back in a heartbeat if it were possible 
“We weren't going to support this in the beginning and we're not going to support it now…How it could have got to this is incredible. But the message from Scotland is: It’s got to stop."" SNP's Mike Russell @Feorlean on #Brexit#politicslive  
I voted against the PM’s deal in January, but I will vote for this improved deal tonight. The changes *are* significant (not nearly as much as I would like), but the other likely options of a Corbyn-style Customs Union Brexit or art50 extension are very undesirable. 
I know there's seriously exciting stuff going on with Brexit and all that. But I did a cartwheel on the beam at #gymnastics! Needs improvement, but it's there. 
James O'Brien's brilliant summing up of Geoffrey Cox and the current Brexit situation is a must-watch.@mrjamesob | #WithdrawalAgreement 
If there is a general election, what would Tories' Brexit policy be?  Noway, Canada, No Deal, Second Ref? I have no idea how its leader  (whoever that may be) can pick one of those without splitting the party. 
Shorter version: 'You cannot respect a referendum result that I didn't vote for..'  
A General Election won't solve anything. What's required is for the vote to go back to the people. The Westminster Parliament has proved incapable of sorting this out. Time for the public to choose, now that we know the facts of Brexit. 
Everyone in parliament is asking questions about what happens if the EU should break faith. The truth is, the backstop is there so that the UK can't break faith! We are the rogue nation here. It's the UK who is no longer dependable.#Brexit 
Not to depress anyone’s, but just a helpful reminder:The Brexit “Deal” is not a Deal. It is a BLIND Brexit. It’s a Withdrawal agreement - but NOTHING about the future relationship is agreedEven if the deal is passed, “Brexit” is only just beginning. Years more of this to come 
The most popular outcome in the UK when PM May loses her vote tonight is a No Deal Brexit. 
The government and MPs wanting to push #Brexit through without a #PeoplesVote are seeking to profit from the proceeds of crime. They must be prosecuted and jailed. 
WATCH | "Many in this country do not trust the EU - or many MPs in this place - to deliver the referendum result. The only option now is to get a clean break on March 29 and get our country back!"Richard Drax saying it like it is! Support us at  
You cannot respect a referendum arrived at through disreputable means, dishonoured in its execution, and which dismays all those who look upon the absolute state of it. You should disrespect Brexit, hard.  pic.twitter.com/OOAymH9Z6z 
In case you were wondering whether Brexit was really just about Britain's relationship with the EU.   
What are you wittering on about?? This is not brexit! And if you support this your as guilty as appeaser may in betraying the British people 
Norton Motorbikes boss; "We would have preferred to remain but reviewed our business model in the light of Brexit..& now have the potential to be bigger, better and stronger across a wider range of export territories than we would ever have looked at if we had stayed Remain." 
Every two years Britain will ceremonially Vote To Extend the Brexit Deadline, until 100 years from now it's just another quaint British political tradition 
Ben Bradley is a fantastic MP that cares deeply about his constituency and constituents, completely respect his position here and am deeply saddened that it has actually come to this. Where those who believe in Brexit fear they must swallow vassalage, or lose Brexit altogether.  
3. We promised to leave on March 29th. I am convinced that will be impossible if this doesn't pass. Parliament will seek to take control, & Parliament does not want us to leave. I will not risk 'no Brexit', which I could not justify to my constituents. Let's get it done. 
1. I will support improved #WithdrawalAgreement tonight. We have to deliver #Brexit, and the balance of risk has shifted. Risk of being tied in against our will is reduced, whilst risk of #Article50 delay, referendum or election forced by remain Parliament increases every day. 
Remind me again! Can anyone think of any statement made by a Leave supporter during the EURef 2016 that foresaw the potential problem with the NI border in the event of no deal #Brexit? Or indeed, any statement that even advocated a no deal #Brexit? I can't! 
“The legal risk I set it out in my letter on the 13th of November remains unchanged.”Attorney General Geoffrey Cox says the risk of Britain remaining subject to EU laws would not change under Theresa May’s revised Brexit deal but is adamant that MPs should support it.  
@Nigel_Farage said he would push for another referendum if the result was 52-48 in Remains favour. Incredible hypocrisy. 
With defeat looming the fundamentals have to change:-a referendum-an election-a new prime minister.Traditionally when there’s a bottleneck in the British system the remedy is an election and that’s where I think we’ll inexorably end up. 
The way to answer the question is quite plainly a referendum. Because it takes the unusual step of asking people to pass the deal or not. 
A general election does not answer the question. Strong chance of ending up with another hung parliament. And no basis to claim a mandate for anything on either party, given MPs will operate independently on Brexit issue. 
Nicola Sturgeon told she was 'not bright enough' to understand Brexit deal  
#ToppleTarotI'm predicting May will have her Ides of March this week. Not endorsing her assassination, obvs. Just her political one... :) "Infamy! INFAMY! They've ALL got it in for me!"Game over, Theresa. Game over #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement #BrexitVote #ToppleGalloway 
... and their elected government at the time at Holyrood, if it took the view that indeed those fundamental circumstances had indeed changed, then it has an undoubted legal right to withdraw from ANY treaty." | #Scotref #indyref2 #brexit 
That moment when the attorney general of the UK in #brexit debate talking about the #backstop, makes the case for Scotland to hold a second independence referendum to leave the United Kingdom. In England parliament is sovereign, in Scotland, the people are. | #scotref #indyref2 
#andrealeadsom This So Called Deal, does Not Deliver Brexit!There are no guarantees or protection from The EU Bullyboys!  
The possibilities for the Brexit right to spin a stab-in-the-back myth of elite betrayal grow greater by the minute 
Brexit negotiations: Darmok and Jalad at Tanagra, except without any arms wide open 
Mrs May is done. Should have been ousted long, long ago. By far the worst PM for decades - closely followed by Mr Cameron who created this mess. The British political class is quite simply inept. And yes Tory austerity was a big catalyst for Brexit. #brexitshambles 
It enables them to go their grave saying “Proper Brexit was never really tried”, much as generations of those on the left have done saying “Proper Socialism was never really tried”.  
Interviewer: so, Jacob Rees-Mogg, will this Brexit deal do?Jacob Rees-Mogg: CAECILIUS EST IN HORTO 
Remember what the #Leave campaigners said:- no downside to #Brexit - we hold all the cards - easiest deal in history - they need us more than we need them- it’ll save loads of money - no problem w NI border Do the #Brexiter politicians have any credibility left? 
.@paulmasonnews: “The Orcs are at the edge of Hobbit Town and we have to fight them.” Tory Brexit is a manifestation of a right wing, alt-right, fascist push that most of us will be fighting the rest of our political lives. Failure to defeat it will be a strategic level defeat  
Revoke A50. If the referendum was illegal/interferes with, the decision should be nullified. 
NOBODY MENTION BREXIT  
Life support for Brexit will be switched off this evening.Get your Cava ready for a celebratory tipple.@bremaininspain 
The word you're looking for is 'integrity', Dan. Lacking in politics & journalism these days, I know. A pseudo Brexit isn't justification for shelving integrity. May is selling a fake, & Brexiters shouldn't be buying it. 
Government ordered to end secrecy over Jacob-Rees Mogg’s ‘hard’ Brexit ERG lobby group | openDemocracy  
Once again, Brexiteers don’t like Brexit which they themselves campaigned for. It’s like vegetarians not liking the vegetarian menu in a restaurant. Call the whole thing off! 
Juncker has said in a press conference that it's either Mrs May's deal or 'no Brexit'.And yet people still ask me why I loathe the EU so much. 
No idea what happens now but if your job requires involvement in an election/referendum/leadership contest, probably start apologising to family & friends for your forthcoming absence 
RTÉ Europe Editor @tconnellyRTE reports on the disbelief in Brussels at the latest turn of events in #Brexit | Live blog:  
This is so refreshing! Kids being taught how to play #Chess in #Nigeria. Beats all this talk about #Brexit  
One of these days I'm going to stop crying and start tweeting about these tossers running Brexit and those tossers ruining football. Today is not that day though. #MIssingYouV. 
At noon: Talking #NancyPelosi #Brexit #MuellerReport #2020 and more with our #OLG @SteveHiltonx.  He joins @MelissaAFrancis @LisaMarieBoothe @JessicaTarlov and @kennedy today on #outnumbered.  TUNE IN! 
WATCH | "If we negotiate under this agreement, we will either find ourselves trapped indefinitely in the backstop or we will have to agree a customs union contrary to our manifesto."@SteveBakerHW hits the nail on the head. This Withdrawal Agreement does not deliver Brexit!  
The conclusions of the group of lawyers under the Chairmanship of @BillCashMP regarding the documents published by the Prime Minister last night, and their impact on the legal position of the United Kingdom under the proposed Withdrawal Agreement #Brexit  
BREAKING: An influential group of Brexit-backing lawmakers in Britain won't vote for Prime Minister Theresa May's EU divorce deal because they say the changes she secured are not good enough.  
PM had a responsibility to build consensus, to get clarity & agreement on what Brexit will look like and to ensure we don’t end up with no deal & no plan. She has failed. Here’s my speech from yesterday at ⁦@CER_EU⁩ on next steps 
Love all the demented 2nd Referendum campaigners asserting 'The People are so much better informed about Brexit now..' Nobody's got a clue what's going on, not even the supposed experts. If anything, I feel like I understand it less now than in June 2016. 
With a wry smile the Attorney-General *refuses* to confirm to me whether or not he gave the PM preliminary advice over weekend she wasn’t going to get advice she needed. I am told he did - yet she ploughed on regardless with the irresponsible theatrics of last night. #Brexit 
Northern Ireland says “Yes”The DUP & ERG say “No”Extending Art. 50 & announcing a referendum for this tiny place might solve it all.“Pro Union with Europe” or “Pro Union with Britain”Why would anyone fear letting the people of Northern Ireland decide for selves?  
Cox’s legal opinion triggers Brexit deal domino collapse.Via @GaryGibbonBlog 
I made this in 2014. Thanks for making my fart joke political, Brexit  
The moment Theresa May's Brexit hopes were crushed by the attorney general's legal advice.Read more here:  
the UK´s EU membership timeline so far #Brexit #BrexitVote 
All this teeth-nashing on the ‘backstop’ comes courtesy of those hubristic Leave campaign leading figures who thought they could hoodwink everyone about exiting the EU and maintaining an open Irish border simultaneously. This #Brexit pretence has finally unravelled. 
Brexit. #BrexitVote 
I've never been a fan of Brexit, but maybe, just maybe if the whole sorry process hadn't been handled by someone who saw it just as a means of stopping foreigners coming into the country and closing doors on Brits wanting to live elsewhere, the UK wouldn't be in this mess. 
To all my fellow Brexit supporters: this is the moment, we wont get a better chance. Outside the EU with only the backstop between us and total freedom or stating inside the EU fighting Article50 & the establishment.  
BREAKING: DUP 'about to announce they cannot support Theresa May's deal', so the deal is DEAD - @skydavidblevins (and he's never wrong..) #Brexit 
The UK secretly wants to trap me in Brexit indefinitely oh yes it does 
#Brexit Star Chamber advice: changes not legally binding, do not provide exit mechanism, bad faith legal route “not credible”, arbitration would be “too lengthy”... #ouch 
DUP sources: “The party cannot support the Prime Minister’s deal in tonight’s vote.” #Brexit 
'Star Chamber' group of #Brexit legal eagles: changes don't go far enough & is recommending that the WA isn't supported.Incl DUP leader in Parl.Talk about cliff hangers!May's deal must failMay must failCorbyn must be overruledRevokeA50 or ExtendWe must elect MEPs#Remain 
The UK economy grew faster in January and is now growing faster than the Euro area, France, Germany & Italy. Thanks to Brexit! 
Looking good. Looking good. The Scottish people have had a chance to look at the performance of Scottish Tory MPs and their constant questioning of another Parliament and failure to represent their constituencies on Brexit, and they do not like it.  
Banks and other finance firms have shifted £900 billion of assets to the EU27 as a result of Brexit. 275 firms have moved some or all of their business, with Dublin the most popular location. via @Williamw1 @NewFinancialLLP 
Let's not forget that a large majority of the people of Northern Ireland would welcome or tolerate the backstop. An extreme fringe of the Tories, alongside the DUP, are pushing us towards the Brexit cliff edge. None of this is in the national interest. None of this is democratic.  
The Attorney General talks of the right to end a treaty if there is a significant and fundamental change of circumstances - something he may agree with @theSNP benches on... #Indyref #indyref2 #Brexit  
#UPDATE The pound tumbled after the UK government's top legal advisor cast doubt on Prime Minister Theresa May's last-gasp changes to her #Brexit deal, hours before a vital vote  
Theresa May's deal is unchanged. It is still bad for jobs, bad for our NHS, bad for Britain's future. No version of Brexit will leave us better off. Join our campaign to get out of this Brexit mess >#WithdrawalAgreement 
I'm in France at the moment. It's wall-to-wall mass ignoring of Brexit here; not a peep. There's more in the papers about a pétanque tournament than Brexit (this is true). I recommend it. 
PM's hopes of Brexit deal success suffers another big blow as ERG lawyers deem the backstop legal advice does not meet the government's own tests  
Yeah, this is fair. Labour’s politicking is essentially totally incoherent with any of its various Brexit positions (of which it still has between two and four, depending how you count).  
Actual storm clouds have just burst over Westminster as Tory Brexiteers and the DUP announced they would not back Theresa May's Brexit deal 
European Research Group has recommended MPs do not back Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal after it determined the Government's new Brexit agreement does not meet the tests set for it 
Brexit: Foreign far-right Twitter users 'manipulated debate'  
Brexit breakthrough: Most Britons see no improvement in May's latest plan, poll finds  
Brexit 'Star Chamber' says no: May's new deal doesn't meet the tests the Government set itself and they cannot recommend accepting the Government's motion today  
That’s it! DUP to abandon May as Cox torpedoes her 'last chance' Brexit deal: PM's hopes of winning tonight's crucial vote fade after Attorney General REFUSES to change his legal advice  
Peek #Brexit - Row brewing in Dublin over this pic! FF claim Coveney & Barnier were involved in choreographed “strident walk” to Ireland v France rugby match. Says ’the optics’ was antagonising to Brits. Asked for comment, Tánaiste’s spox replied: “Give me strength!”  
if this carries on much longer brexit will have been more difficult to organise than an office meal out for 10+ people 
Why will it delay Brexit if we don’t support her crap deal we should just leave clean cut Brexit for goodness sake it’s not bloody rocket science it’s what we voted for  
"When national leadership is required, this PM always puts party before country"Labour's Nick Thomas-Symonds says nothing has changed in latest #Brexit deal, saying Attorney General Geoffrey Cox "is a lawyer, not a magician" 
BREAKING: ERG and DUP will say NO to the deal!We salute your integrity!#Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement #WTOBrexitNOW 
Ironically, the ERG has done more to stop brexit than the entire people's vote campaign 
Brexit legend @Nigel_Farage has confirmed that he's spoken to US President Donald Trump about a No Deal Brexit, and says the US "are hugely keen on the defence, security and indeed business relationships that exist between our two countries."Let's go WTO & do a big trade deal! 
BREAKING: Brexit 'Star Chamber' Advises MPs Against Voting For the Deal  
Or to put it another way, two thirds of Scots want a second independence referendum!  
The 2016 Referendum result took Remain off the table. If the UK is a democracy then tonight is simply the choice between May's deal on March 29 or WTO Brexit on March 29.If the UK is not a democracy then we need to get radical to change that. Not long now till the big reveal. 
Farage urged Trump to back a no-deal Brexit earlier this month. That's Nigel Farage asking a foreign President to back a deal that would probably benefit American farmers and Hedge fund managers but which would cause havoc for most British people 
Majority of voters do not think PM's deal delivers the type of Brexit people voted for, YouGov poll reveals 
With Brexit negotiations in tatters, the Tories reckon it’s a good day to bury bad news: they’ve scrapped the four-hour NHS waiting time target.Make sure people know.  
I will be voting against the #Brexit deal today because it makes us poorer, less safe and the chaos will continue for years ahead - not suddenly end. It’s time the public had their chance to have the #FinalSay @peoplesvote_uk #BrexitVote 
After months of us all banging on about Brexit, This. Is. It. And if (when?) the deal is voted down this evening, everything really is back in play...  
"We can't keep having votes until people get what they want" - Theresa May in 2017 on holding a second referendum. Funny that. Just saying, but @theresa_may has already held two votes on her flawed Brexit deal..... 
Today, the emperor has no clothes, none at all.. Not even a codpiece . #EU #Brexit #BrexitVote #MeaningfulVote 
For all the chaos, confusion and noise, fundamentally nothing has changed about Theresa May’s bad #Brexit deal. With Parliament in gridlock, the only way to make progress is to withdraw Article 50 and give the British public the final say.#PeoplesVote  
Three way deal. We get Tudeau. You ship May to Australia (which will be an improvement) and we’ll loan you Pelosi who could fix your Brexit thing in about two weeks. 
"The emperor has no clothes. None at all. Not even a codpiece" SNP's Joanna Cherry on Attorney General Geoffrey Cox's legal advice on last-minute changes to #Brexit deal  
Even Before Parliament Has Voted, EU Prepares to Delay Brexit by Another Year  
Foreign far-right Twitter users 'manipulated debate' -  Foreign Twitter accounts have recently tried to influence the debate around Brexit, with pro-Leave tweets receiving the most support. 
It is high time MPs of all political stripe accept Parliament seems unable to agree or control Brexit. It has failed. They have failed. The only way fwd now is to agree to a proper extension (not 3 months) which enables a #peoplesvote. Or, to avoid a #NoDeal, to revoke #Art50. 
Cllr. Brian SilvesterBrexit Spokesman. For The For Britain PartyJoin us Please Follow @ForBritainParty Please share 
Outside interference in the referendum was an attack on the whole EU.  
#Brexit now officially on the agenda for next week’s summit (quelle surprise). It’s in article 50 format which means EU27 leaders and not the PM.  
“Please listen to what I am saying because it is really important… She just does not listen. All we get is the same deal nobody wants in a different font” Labour’s Emily Thornberry @EmilyThornberry tells Robin Walker about PM on #Brexit#politicslive  
Despite endless doom and gloom stories about Brexit uncertainty hampering growth, the UK economy recorded its fastest growth in 25 months in January - more than twice as fast as expected  
Zinger from @joannaccherry re Attorney's legal advice on Brexit:"Today the Emperor has no clothes...not even a codpiece". 
Once Theresa May's deal fails we must give the people the final say on this Brexit mess, with the option to stay in the EU  
It's all kicking off between the Judean People's Popular Brexit Front and the Popular People's Brexit Front of Judea.  
Second referendum (removing don't knows and would not vote):Leave: 44%Remain: 56%  
Because by those number alone, it means that AT LEAST 10% within the 52% would have voted for Brexit, but didn't vote for the Brexit they're getting. If that doesn't prove that Brexit means Brexit is utterly meaningless, I don't know what does. 
The journey of Theresa May's #Brexit deal since this morning.  #WithdrawalAgreement #BrexitVote 
ERG likely to indicate no imminently and publish their legal advice on Brexit CentralHere’s a senior ERG-er  
MPs guffawing on #politicslive when talking about Brexit - this is just a party political game for many of them. Don't lose sight of that when watching what happens this evening. 
The legal risk of #WithdrawalAgreement "remains unchanged" but MPs face a "political judgement" about whether to enter into those arrangements - Attorney General Geoffrey Cox makes Commons statement#Brexit latest  
Only about two years late, but at least the EU Parl has acted, more than can be said of the UK Government who seem to be acting as a 'fence' for the stolen referendum result.  
The deal the PM has brought back has not changed. Tonight, I will be voting against the deal. If defeated, I will be voting against a no-deal Brexit, voting in favour of an article 50 extension and keep pushing in parliament for a #PeoplesVote 
The Prime Minister should advise Her Majesty the Queen to prorogue Parliament suspending the current parliamentary session until 2nd April 2019 to prevent any attempts by Parliamentarians to thwart Brexit on 29th March.Preparations for WTO will continue. 
#BBC impartial as ever. #PoliticsLive defining politicians who want to uphold the Brexit vote of leaving the EU, Single Market & Customs Union as being "Hard-line Tory Right Wingers".Meanwhile I guess that makes Remainers who want to reverse the result "Fluffy Liberal lefties"? 
The latest figures provide hope that the UK economy is growing despite #Brexit uncertainty  
Germany's August 2015 opening to 1.2 million refugees a crucial milestone on the road to Brexit.  The case for less immigration to strengthen liberal institutions: me in @TheAtlantic 
Geoffrey Cox confirms the legal risk remains that Britain could be permanently stuck in the Irish backstop after Brexit  
A great quote from Julia Hartley-Brewer which exactly describes the Brexit situation........."Our elected representatives are cowering in the face of EU bully-boy tactics. Let's cut our losses, walk away with our heads held high, and save what is left of our national pride." 
So from what I understand, the current status of Brexit is: Brexit is completely fucked up 
Stripped of legal cover, feels like now it all comes down to how much Brexiteers will cave to the fear tactics (deployed by May and Juncker) that a Commons defeat tonight risks no Brexit at all. Mark Francois has effectively said he's not scared by threats. He won't be alone. 
The house was clear we wanted legally binding changes to the backstop, it has been confirmed today that has not been secured & we’re asked to take a political judgement or as was put ‘a leap of faith’. I cannot in good faith back this deal #Brexit #MeaningfulVote 
You've admitted that there are different versions of Brexit.If 58% didn't want this Brexit. you're admitting that the 2016 referendum wasn't a clear mandate FOR ANYTHING!!!! Meanwhile 48% have been sat here waiting with our clearly defined treaties.  
Geoffrey Cox: Last-minute changes to #Brexit deal "extend beyond mere interpretation of the #WithdrawalAgreement and represent materially new legal obligations and commitments" 
BREAKING.... Geoffrey Cox - "Let me make it clear, the legal risk as I set it out in my letter in Nov remains unchanged. #Brexit #BrexitVote 
I smell something cooking here. Brexit??  
4. things 1. General election 2. 2nd referendum 3. One year extension (for what?) which would mean we go into EU elections4. May runs down clock and has 3rd MV then back to 1. 
(very much a side note but I'm writing this big piece running through the Brexit timeline for Americans and it's really interesting how, even looking at past events, it's really hard to conclusively say which bits of the past three years mattered and which didn't) 
The choice is clear, says Jean-Claude, it’s this deal or no Brexit. He seems to have forgotten the possibility of a WTO Brexit on March 29th.  
First Amber Rudd and now Geoffrey Cox assert backing May's Brexit deal is a political judgement. They're right. It should be rejected 
Just one reactor in Holland produces 60% of Europe's medical isotopes.Any disruption to the supply chain will be fatal - literally - in some cases.Brexit ONLY INCREASES DISRUPTION.It does nothing to reduce it.Brexit is massive backwards step in the history of world trade 
UK parliament debates Prime Minister Theresa May's revised #Brexit deal  
Listening to #YouAndYours asking people how they’re preparing for Brexit & my heart is breaking at what the UK, in peacetime, in 2019, has become on the back of a suspect & corrupted vote that was more about *feelings* than facts.We have lost our minds. 
Why aren't EM currencies trading better, given a dovish Fed and likely China-US trade deal? Explanations I hear: (i) tail risks like Brexit; (ii) bad muscle memory due to the 2018 EM sell-off; (iii) my favorite - an EM positioning overhang in many places after 10 years of G-3 QE.  
I am receiving many emails and letters about the Brexit vote tonight. I will be voting against Theresa May's bad brexit deal - it puts our economy, jobs, workers' rights, environmental protections and future prosperity of our country at risk. #BrexitShambles 
Cox - "The legal risks remain unchanged" says it is a political decision now.Has this destroyed May's deal?Or her premiership?Or Brexit? 
How should the British People respond, if Brexit is not permitted to happen?Please RT for a big response.(if your preferred option is not listed, or you would employ several tactics, please comment) 
Is May not *totally* embarrassed that her AG has just publicly stated the most important detail of the deal remains unchanged? This govt are impervious to shame. #Brexit 
N no no, nothing has changed, it’s still a betrayal of the referendum result, the deal is as bad as it ever was. You have gone down in my estimation, and no doubt others. Concentrate on sorting the lack of police out, more stop and search , much tougher sentences for knife crime. 
We had an absolute blast with @Coldwar_Steve @thamesandhudson presenting #TheFestivalofBrexit book with some live collaging on our Leonard Street site in Shoreditch #brexitbook#brexit  
Brexit Debate LIVE: Attorney General makes statement on Brexit legal advice  
Democracy died when an advisory referendum, won on a pack of lies, became a legal one with no vote. Scotland & NI voted remain. We're supposed to be equal partners in this so called union. We've been treated as a colony. There is NO democracy in the UK 
D***en Gr**es doesn't care about food shortages after a No Deal Brexit because you're always guaranteed three meals a day in prison, send tweet 
"Not a jot or comma, other than linguistic interpretation, has actually changed in the #WithdrawalAgreement" Conservative MP Crispin Blunt says he does not expect MPs to vote for Theresa May's #Brexit deal tonight 
Have lost count of the number of times @mrjamesob has thought, with completely understandable desperation, that we've reached the nub/peak madness/the point at which it is all utterly beyond bonkers #Brexit  
Potential game changer if DUP against deal, then it’s basically going down, but we need Labour unity to fight Brexit + as many moderate Tories to come out, vote against the deal and fight to extend article 50 + get us out of this mess. Time for brave MPs to do the right thing   
5 years ago from Castlemilk to Cambridge, myself & many others warned that Brexit was on the horizon if Scotland voted No. Political change is constant & always brings risks. The question  still faces is who is best placed to take control in an uncertain world.  
Is it just me or is the term #Jexodus a bit redundant? Wasn’t the OG Exodus already about a mass exit of Jews/Israelites? Seems like Jexodus is like saying “British Brexit” or “ATM Machine.” I think “Exodus 2.0” would make more sense from a messaging standpoint.   
This MP will vote against the democratic wishes of those he represents and instead allow England's Brexit to be foisted onto those he should be protecting in Scotland.This is unionism and the disdain for all things democratic by the Scottish people.  
Thought for the day #BrexitVote #backstop #Brexit  
Makes me laugh how people like James O'Brien can see how the press and real elites can gang up and lie through their back teeth to get Brexit, but believes those same press and elites wholly when they talk about Labout anti-Semitism. 
Remember, May’s Deal *is* a hard Brexit.It will hurt the country, cause a loss of jobs - especially in areas that have suffered already - and ends key freedoms that will set back UK citizens for decades.What might seem expedient today will be seen as terrible tomorrow. 
If you're in London this Friday, @streetskitchen is organising a march to protest homeless deaths. Meet up: 6pm, Downing Street.Adding #Brexit so you pay attention.#NoMoreDeathsOnOurStreets 
I'm not saying Brexit was a bad idea, but at present our economic future appears to predicated on whether Andrew Bridgen thinks some legal language he probably doesn't understand is a rabbit or not 
Of all the politicians that I have listened to sharing their thoughts on #brexit @vincecable has expressed the most sensible attitude of them all @trevdick @trevorw1953 @abcpoppins @lewiscoughlan #stopbrexit 
Two Leaver schools of thought, on a high-stakes call. Some say get out, even with a bad deal that you can fight against later, or else risk Remaining. The other says don't vote for a bad deal, fight on and challenge MPs to cancel Brexit if they dare.  
Of course you haven't met any leavers who want a second referendum.....They know they will lose.They know it's not the will of the people.They do not actually believe in democracy.  
no shit sherlock. Only taken them 33 months to say a negative word on the referendum  
Scottish #Brexit minister @Feorlean has just got “cluster bourach” onto @SkyNews @adamboultonSKY 
So, on top of everything else, the IRA are back now? This Brexit thing is going just great, isn't it? If the Tories really try, maybe they can bring back the Baader-Meinhof Gang, the Yorkshire Ripper, Colorado Beetles, Dutch Elm Disease, Polio and Humphreys while they're at it. 
PM very good at Parliamentary Meeting. I did not support WA in January. Her new assurances over Irish backstop aren't perfect but they are a significant improvement. So I will 'unenthusiastically' support the deal. Dangers: no Brexit at all, ext of Article 50, if vote is lost.... 
Tory MPs leaving meeting with PM suggest half of those who voted against deal last time will switch to support. #brexit 
Historian says other countries economically benefitting from our incompetence on Brexit & even more so if we are stupid enough to actually leave  
Don’t mistake the Irish government here: they want the deal to pass and they want to avoid the backstop. But they want Irish peace, stability and prosperity more - and they are now more powerful in the EU than a post-Brexit UK will ever be. 
@Jacob_Rees_Mogg to the Brexit Secretary: “But that’s absolutely no change from what was there before… it simply says ‘we could ask’ to leave the backstop, we’ve always been able to ASK to leave the backstop!”  
Beginning to suspect Brexit might have been a bad idea. 
I could do a detailed thread about the serious policy implications of this morning’s calamitous Brexit happenings. Or you watch this and have more fun  
1. Need to accept May's deal dead. 2. Therefore need to take stock and look at options - a much softer Brexit agreed across Parl, a referendum or v long period of reflection. Simple revocation easiest and quickest but too inflammatory. Hard to see how gen elec solves anything. 
Britain ticking down to the crucial vote on a Brexit transition. I posted in The Atlantic - how the British reached this impasse  
On both @BBCNews  & @SkyNews outside Parliament it appears that a remainer is flying the EU flag above our Union Flag.This is totally unacceptable. This is one of the reasons to keep fighting for Brexit & freedom.No foreign flag flies above our own.Agree? 
A new YouGov poll from Leave Means Leave shows just 12% of the public think May's deal delivers on the kind of Brexit leave voters wanted in 2016. MPs cannot vote for a deal that is Brexit in name only. RT if you think MPs must vote down this terrible deal!  
Jacob Rees-Mogg makes it clear he thinks there's been no significant change to Theresa May's Brexit deal  
Shame that Labour's approach to Brexit has been represented by performative shrugging in the media for so long isn't it?  
F-Secure analysis of 24 million tweets finds suspicious activity in Twitter’s #Brexit #socialmedia conversation “At the very least, our research shows there’s a global effort amongst the far right to amplify the ‘leave’ side of the debate.” 
Me watching #WithdrawalAgreement #Brexit news today  
'Today we say it is judgement day... it could technically change things,' @IanDunt tells @bevvo14 #TheWorld #Brexit  
'The legal risk remains unchanged'Even the Gov's own legal advice reveals that nothing has changed.MPs must vote down this Brexit deal tonight. Please RT:  
#Polls #BrexitCrisis #BrexitVote #WithdrawalAgreement What is the most likely outcome of the upcoming votes on #Brexit? 
 With the vote on Theresa May’s Brexit deal set for tonight, Westminster descends into chaos, Tories are ripping themselves apart, and the UK Government continues to ignore Scotland. Keep up with the latest news with this timeline of events. 
ICYMI: ERG is set to torpedo May’s Brexit deal. But who is ERG? Jacob Rees-Mogg’s pro Brexit lobby refuses to name members - and neither would DExEU. But after months of fighting from @openDemocracy information about watchdog ruled Brexit dept much publish list of ERG members  
we now go live to the brexit debate  
Calm, clear and rational - Grieve has been a joy to listen to in the national Brexit debate.Just a shame he'll be ignored by the media in favour of Boris' cretinous prattlings and Jacob Rees-Mogg garbling out some gratuitous Latin.#withdrawalagreement 
Breaking ! The Key point from the legal advice from the Attorney General Geoffrey Cox QC MP. All of this fuss for nothing. We must now go for a WTO Brexit  
I will be voting against Theresa May’s deal because I do not think that it is the right deal for our country. #Brexit 
Having Steve Barclay -- a man whose sole function is to know nothing -- before the Brexit select committee trying to explain why Geoffrey Cox's advice may not be terminal is something Theresa May could do without right now 
Q. - So your prediction now, is we are remaining in the EU?Vince Cable - Well the odds are moving in that direction. #EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
Poll: 1 in 3 Scots say there should never be a second independence referendum#indyref2 
Brexit is a shambles, David. The concept is flawed and now our gov’t is making a hash of it. The UK economy and its citizens will be the big losers, and our standing in the world will be permanently diminished as a result.  
Lib Dems table 4 amndmts including 2 which offer chance to remain (one through PV and one simply revoking art 50).Meanwhile Labour have decided to table 0 amendments. Thats right, 0 from our official opposition, who are still more interested in Brexit/Lexit rather than remain.  
Live: UK lawmakers vote on Prime Minister Theresa May's revised Brexit deal  
UK attorney general issues legal advice on Theresa May's claimed Brexit breakthrough, says it does not change the legal risk that the UK could be trapped in the Irish backstop indefinitely. Follow live updates:  
WATCH | Brexiteer @JWhittingdale corners the Brexit Secretary on May's horrific deal, and the fact that we could still be trapped as an EU vassal state in the outrageous backstop. Stephen Barclay is trying to defend the indefensible!Support us at  
Justice Minister has just admitted that European Arrest Warrants will not be valid post-Brexit. How is this making us safer? All our villains will be hot-footing untouchable back to the Costa Del Sol, just like the good ole days. 
"Mum, can I have an ice cream?" "No.""Mum, can I have an ice cream?" "No.""Mum, can I have an ice cream?" "No.""Mum, can I have an ice cream?" "No.""Mum, can I have an ice cream?" "No.""Mum, can I have an ice cream?" "(slowly) No."Theresa May 'negotiates' Brexit. 
Your Mole has noticed that he “new” Brexit Withdrawal Agreement is identical to the old one – just reformatted with a different font size...  
.@AdamBoultonSky you just asked @VinceCable if he would 'sleep easy' if Brexit is stopped, do you sleep easy never reporting that it was only won bc of indutrial scale criminal fraud when Remain stopped spending to stay within the law?  
#GeoffreyCox QC has confirmed my earlier verdict. Theresa May’s deal is OFFICIALLY bugger all use to anyone #Brexit  
Brexit Sec Steve Barclay is having a v hard time trying to defend legal advice right now - instead of making it easier for PM to get her deal thro, seems so far that that Attorney General's advice is making it harder-  one influential Brexiteer says it's 'devastating' 
Agreed. My current assessment of Brexit probabilities: May’s deal 5%; no deal 10%; softer Brexit 40%; general election, 25%; second referendum, 20%. @CER_EU 
European Parliament just voted that Russian state actors interfered in the Brexit referendumLet’s hope @eucopresident and council members agree to a lengthy extension of Art 50 so that we can reverse this attack on the integrity of the EU#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Well, EU membership costs me 8p a day, but I lost £17000 in consulting work since the Referendum due to Brexit. Tell me how I'm supposed to be happy about it? 
Brexit: Foreign far-right Twitter users 'manipulated debate'Brexiters who argue that we should 'respect democracy' really should be saying that to themselves.  
*Brexit metaphor alert*: May is addressing Tory MPs but one present tells me she has almost totally lost her voice. 
WATCH: @joswinson explains why she won't be supporting this #Brexit deal - this is still a bad deal and we must vote it down. Demand a #PeoplesVote at the #PutItToThePeople March on Saturday 23rd:  
Sorry Damian but your own Attorney General says the legal risks to the backstop remain unchanged. So we could remain tied to EU rules indefinitely. Ashford voted leave. This is not Brexit and support for it will not respect the referendum outcome.  
Fianna Fáil Brexit spokeswoman Lisa Chambers says it is easier to exit the backstop today than it was yesterday. Says the party is "extremely concerned" by Geoffrey Cox's legal advice @IrishTimesPol 
Shouldn't the Daily Telegraph be taken to the press complaints commision @pccabout the lies in its scare story on #Brexit delay? @InFactsOrg 
Bit of invaluable advice for @NicolaSturgeon and our Scottish friends; hold your own non-binding advisory referendum, procure the result through corruption and overspending, then claim the result was mandatory and declare independence, job done!!!! 
When parliament vote down Mrs  May's Brexit deal. She should do the right thing and call a snap general election. She has had years to negotiate a deal and has failed. She needs to make way for a new government to sort this mess out. #BrexitDeal 
On Brexit...why would the EU want to "trap" the UK into a deal which gives the UK full market access without responsibilities? Bizarre thinking. Particularly as no one significant wants to do a meaningful trade deal with them anyway! 
Tory Brexiteer John Whittingdale on legal advice “that final paragraph is pretty terminal.” #brexit 
Full significance clear of that Labour victory(with DUP support) to require Brexit legal advice publication, Con rebel Dominic Grieve demanding a meaningful vote and Gina Miller’s Supreme Court victory to assert Parliamentary sovereignty. Theresa May’s been done up like a kipper 
#Brexit: Foreign far-right Twitter users 'manipulated debate'  
Of course you would want Brexit supporting MPs to vote for the deal. It leaves us trapped within the EU for decades to come. You are a disgrace. Your constituency clearly voted leave and you are flagrantly disregarding that opinion as unimportant in comparison to your own. 
Here's about 5 or so Leave-voters who want a new referendum, that I met while I was out in Hull...  
I imagine most ERG MPs would rather be on the historic list of those who voted against May's deal, who'll always be heroes of the Brexit cause, even if it means Brexit never happens. 
Possibilities rising: -May resignation-general election-long a50 extension-second referendumOr some combination thereof. 
Leave supporting minister tells me: I do not see how DUP can support PM’s brexit deal after Geoffrey Cox’s legal advice. Can’t see it passing without them 
Working from home today and listening to #Brexit updates on @LBC with @mrjamesob like ......... 
Yet again, May's govt indulged the extremists, raising expectations, surely knowing the legal conclusion would have to be this for the backstop to retain any meaning or value. The shocking mishandling of every single stage of Brexit reflects charade over reality to the very end.  
Pleased to share my Karlsruher Gespräche lecture on "Brexit and Global Britain". Starts off in German, but is mostly in English. Loving the first comment to the video: "She has the choice stay in the UK and accept Brexit or return back to Germany."  
No change. We’re going round again with the same deal being offered by the government. Let’s just stop Brexit.  
No matter what happens with #Brexit, things need to change fast to protect the ocean. Can you sign the #GenerationSea petition?  UK must become oceans protection world leader, fast. 
Strong Cabinet backing for the PM’s deal - with new legal force. Now’s the moment to come together & make Brexit happen - to move forward & build the UK’s exciting new future out of the EU 
Todays Brexit phrase fellow Tweeters is ........“In Good Faith!” Are they having a laugh as both our own Parliament and the EU have treated us Brexiteers as something on the “Bottom of their Shoe!”for the last 3 years !“In Good Faith!” ....................”My Arse!” 
If I were an ERG MP, I really would vote for the agreement tonight. A "harder" Brexit deal is now clearly not negotiable, and Parliament will block a no-deal. So it can only get softer from here - or closer to Remain. 
If things go as I'd now expect to tonight then there is no longer any Brexit compromise. Its either much softer Brexit or 2nd referendum or no deal. One side is about to lose very heavily 
Imagine how different everything would've been if our Parliamentarians who are supposed to represent us backed the UK public and all worked together to ensure we got the best possible deal, rather than 50% of the house doing everything they can to sabotage Brexit & defy democracy 
More entries for your glorious Heroes of Brexit partwork. Do make sure to collect them all.  
A handful of Greens hold more sway in the Scottish Parliament. Your argument is nil and void. Get on with the day job and stop using Brexit to further your independence agenda. Scotland would not be independent if it was tied to the EU.  
I don’t know what’s happening in Brexit and the “IRA” letterbombs are the biggest load of bullshit I’ve ever seen 
The pound plunged after the U.K. Attorney General said the revised Brexit deal doesn’t remove legal risks on the Irish backstop  
David Cameron went to the EU and got fuck all Theresa May went to the EU and got fuck all.The EU don't wish to negotiate.Time to leave without a deal and negotiate with the rest of the World Theresa May’s Brexit deal torpedoed by her own top lawyer  
The term #backstop  was devised to confuse people by govenment spin-doctors. Just like the  term 'no-deal Brexit' which actually means switching to WTO rules that  80% of the world trades on. This dishonesty of politicians and hacks who are all pro-EU is very revealing. 
Geoffrey Cox has just released his advice that nothing has changed legally with the PM's awful Brexit deal.Our Chairman, John Longworth responds: "The ERG , DUP and Parliament must now surely reject what is in any case, a terrible deal for the U.K."  
Attorney-General Geoffrey Cox just put the nail in the coffin of Theresa May's Brexit deal: 'The legal risk remains unchanged'.  
So, essentially all that has been going on for two years on this, is that the UK have been trying to entrench in international law the notion the Good Friday Agreement is of secondary importance to #Brexit and the EU have been saying “not if you want any sort of deal with us”. 
Can we just cut all the crap and agree that the only people who will not be substantially worse off after ANY KIND of Brexit will be tax dodging oligarchs 
May's eleventh-hour Brexit 'concessions' are a farce – MPs must NOT vote for her deal. The whole principle of the backstop, not merely its legal details, deems the UK not sovereign over the key economic laws in Northern Ireland, which is in breach of GFA..  
So: May's bad deal will be defeated tonight a 2nd time, no deal ruled out followed by a UK request to extend Article 50 and delay Brexit.Then: Theresa May ousted? General Election? Lab Govt & PM Corbyn? People's Vote? No Brexit? Britain saved in Europe?Everything has changed  
Listening to James O'Brien's mentally unhinged accusations and thought I'd heard it all. But to listen to him desperately trying to link IRA bombs to Brexit and intimating that if you continue to support Brexit you are effectively supporting the IRA is a whole new level of crazy! 
Remember: they're leaving. That's a huge, costly decision. Why would they want to compound it by rubbing the noses of up to 52%* of potential customers by going "Yeah, and it's all because of your stupid, sinking Brexit, so there!"*well, you know what I mean 
new Brexit deal going well  
Well, I guess that's that then. #Brexit #GeoffreyCox #bollocks 
Imagine historians writing a hundred years from now about 2019.Although we all knew about the urgency of climate change, our politicians spent their days fighting over brexit and a border wall. How to explain that to the next generation?#15March2019 #FridaysForFuture 
'People like boring politics. Constitutional law should be boring, but it isn't. And we are being cursed by living in interesting times.'Lawyer and writer @davidallengreen takes on Brexit in episode #34 of the @sacred_podcast. Out tomorrow. 
All Cox could do was advise based on the legal facts of the proposal put in front of him. The difficulty for Leavers (including him) now is what MPs who are seemingly willing to do *anything* to avoid honouring their promise to fulfil Brexit might do next if the deal falls. 
BREAKING: UK Attorney General rules Theresa May's "breakthrough" Brexit deal could still leave the UK trapped in the Irish backstop indefinitely  
“If you enjoyed the last two years and want more of the same, vote for Theresa May’s Brexit deal”.  Excellent from @sjwrenlewis 
Brexit delivers. Each and every time. #WithdrawalAgreement#GeoffreyCox 
The Brexiters have shown us time and time again that they cannot be trusted. They have told lie after lie to get Brexit across the line.  They have just one objective: to get to 30th March.  We cannot allow these corrupt politicians to win. We need a #peoplesvote. 
Voting down May's deal will certainly lead to Brexit being cancelled. But that will not mean the UK does not leave the EU. Brexit is the result of Eurozone decisions, not UK decisions. Nothing done in the UK (short of joining the €) can change that we will eventually depart. 
 @IanBlackfordMP says there's no such thing as a 'good Brexit' or a 'jobs-first Brexit'. It's an act of economic stupidity and it's depriving young people of rights and opportunities.  Scotland does not want it, and @theSNP will vote against Theresa May's deal tonight. 
Nearly there now #Brexit  
We think a lot of people will be waiting to see @StevePeers @Uni_of_Essex assessment of the latest legal situation on Brexit. Watch out for it this afternoon plus analysis from Professor Michael Dougan @LivUni 
The Attorney General just destroyed Brexit, thank God  
It all boils down to a vote of confidence in the government.  Do Boles and co side with Corbyn to stop Brexit by bringing down the government, or not?  All else is waffle 
Declaration of War is an example of a 'Unilateral Declaration'.The EU is a peace project.#Brexit is a crime.Where do you guess this is going in a decade?#StopBrexit to show we 1. learned from history2. respect our grandparents3. are strong together.We need the EU. 
Whatever happens next there is no Brexit crisis. A crisis is the moment before resolution. In this feedback loop there is no such moment. 
every brexit negotation report has the same aura as a 9-year-old lying unconvincingly about why they haven't done their homework. 
BREAKING: UK attorney general says changes to Brexit deal reduce but don't eliminate risk Britain could be tied to EU indefinitely.  
By the end of this week, MPs will have rejected two models of Brexit - the PM's Withdrawal Agreement and No Deal. And if they are invited to vote on some other model, by amendment selected by the Speaker, they will reject that too.So where next?  
I still refuse to believe Steve Barclay is a real MP, I reckon they just ran out of Brexit secretaries and hired an out of work actor.  
Let this serve as a reminder of why we voted Brexit.All the UK needed was clarification that we'd not be locked into a treaty without an exit clause.@Geoffrey_Cox's advice makes clear that Brussels decided to keep up its disdain and contempt for this ancient island democracy. 
In a state of great suspense about tonight’s vote as I wait on tenterhooks for Seamus to tell me what I think. #Brexit 
Even if Cox had changed his mind, May's deal was in severe danger.Now he's not changed his advice there's not a hope it passes tonight.#Brexit 
The time for #consensus will come. It must.@MPphilwilson and I will work flat-out to deliver a plan that breaks the political gridlock and offers a final, definitive end to the Brexit withdrawal process.Tough for the big parties, but needed by our country #CountryFirst 
'Postponing Brexit would be a disaster' - Bristol businesses speak out ahead of meaningful vote Some business owners who voted remain are now calling for the UK to leave on March 29   
But no one asked for this deal, so no, it doesn't honour the referendum result. Nobody voted for an ailing NHS.Demand a #PeoplesVote 
You see, you know someone's making a fucking FORTUNE out of the markets during Brexit. I'd love to see a Venn diagram of those guys and "the architects of Brexit."  
Bring on the No Deal Brexit and let’s be done with the EU autocrats for good >> ? 
JUST IN: U.K. Attorney General Geoffrey Cox says the legal risk of Theresa May's Brexit deal is unchanged  
Attorney General Geoffrey Cox says "legal risk remains unchanged" in updated #Brexit deal and UK would have no legal means of exiting without EU agreement 
What do you mean at this moment?Labour have always had a vastly superior team.The media have a lot to answer for.Their dismissive attitude to Labour, & to Labour's leadership, has robbed the British public of a sensible solution to problems with the Tory inspired referendum.  
Why do so many keep harping on about respecting the referendum?There were illegalities.There was fraud.There were British citizens living in the EU and elsewhere in the world denied a vote.No vote for EU in UK.Morally accepting it is wrong!#StopBrexit#RevokeArticle50 
Sod Brexit. Certain members of the @HuffPostUK team have got their priorities in order this morning: nailing the #TRIANGLEDANCE 
The ERG now have a decision to make over a problem entirely of their own making. They obsessed over the backstop and no fundamental changes have been made. Now they must go back on everything they’ve said or risk no Brexit at all. They may come to rue not voting for it in January 
No piece of legal advice I have ever seen is unequivocal. My colleagues are going to have to make a decision on THE BALANCE OF RISK. Boost the economy, respect the referendum, back the deal 
Geoffrey Cox just killed off whatever slim chance May still had of passing her Brexit deal tonight.  
A reminder that Theresa May doesn't understand her own Brexit plan.  
Breaking Brexit News: Game over for May Deal after advice from Attorney General warns that ‘legal risk remains unchanged’. #BrexitShambles 
D-Day for Brexit! I’ll be back later but in the meantime....  
BREAKING Cox has surely sunk May's deal, declaring legal risk on Irish backstop remains unchanged #Brexit 
The demoralising truth is we as a country are totally fucked because almost none of our politicians bothered doing the bare minimum of research on Brexit before taking strong positions on it.It’s so deeply fucking shameful. 
The idea of an EU “trap” in the Brexit backstop is nonsense.   They don’t want it; and we don’t want a hard border in Ireland. The problem with May’s deal is that it solves NOTHING.  The deal is the trap, not the backstop. #PeoplesVote 
RIP Theresa May's revised Brexit deal. 11 March 2019 - 12 March 2019. 
I wonder how much has been spent on #Brexit? I imagine 10s of millions. Imagine that money was rather spent on the less fortunate in the UK. Maybe on housing, food, creating job opportunities etc...Now there’s just a horrible divide! Urgh!  
BREAKING: With 5 words, Attorney-General @Geoffrey_Cox hammers nail into coffin of Theresa May's Brexit deal: 'The legal risk remains unchanged'.  
The House is in no mood for compromise, it‘s angry that the prime minister promised to “replace the backstop” but hasn’t. Angry at the ‘blindfold Brexit’ on offer.So the ‘Kyle/Wilson’ #Compromise won’t be tabled today, but WILL on MV3 or before. 
Oooph. Is that game, set & match for tonight's vote? #Brexit  
Taxi for May. Attorney-General's Brexit legal advice can be summed up as nothing has changed. Para 19 on the backstop is there's "no internationally lawful means of exiting the Protocol’s arrangements, save by agreement."  
Surely the 'sensible' hard Brexit play is- vote for the deal- get rid of May- push for general election- pray you win by enough to jettison DUP- negotiate Canada for GB; NI can have different provisions b'cos you never really cared that much about it before Brexit anyway. 
The brazen temerity of these two tinpot totalitarians is utterly jaw dropping. Openly collaborating to subvert the greatest democratic exercise in the history of the #UK.  Juncker – "It is this deal or #Brexit might not happen at all."  Simply stunning…  #LeaveMeansLeave 
If a Brexit deal cannot be delayed...UK's leaving date should be delayed so as to negotiate more with the EU: 17%No delay, UK should leave without a deal: 37%A new referendum should be held: 33%via @YouGov 
Geoffrey Cox appears to kill @theresa_may deal by giving legal advice that her concession doesn’t alter anything #Brexit 
 The legal risk remains unchanged  - with those five ominous words @Geoffrey_Cox may have sunk Theresa May’s Brexit deal once and for all 
Theresa May has delayed and obfuscated, told untruths and misled all around her - all in contempt of Parliament. If Brexit was about sovereignty, how can the Prime Minister treat the House of Commons & the British public with such disdain! #BrexitCrisis #WithdrawalAgreement 
By pushing #Brexit forward on the strength of a referendum corrupted by crime the government has broken the normal rules of politics. We must stop acting as if those rules still applied. Retrospective prosecutions of politicians colluding in crime must be on the cards.#FBPE 
Do we want a year of turbulence, or decades of subjugation? The question is now that simple. #brexit 
BREAKING: Attorney General Geoffrey Cox publishes his updated Brexit advice: “The legal risk remains unchanged." 
The Brexit deal negotiated by Theresa May [X] deliver the type of Brexit those who voted leave in 2016 wanted:Does: 12%Does not: 58%via @YouGov 
WATCH: While everyone will be speaking about the backstop today, don't forget that it's not just the backstop that makes this a bad Brexit deal.There are so many reasons why this Brexit deal should be voted down #PeoplesVote Pls RT: 
As I understand it, a significant number of the constituencies that voted to #Leave the EU in 2016 would now vote to #Remain. If that's true, going ahead with any form of #Brexit will be against the will of a majority of the British people. And this is democratic??? 
It is not a deal and it is not Brexit. Please do not vote for this abomination. 
Brexit deal “A lot worse than I’d hoped for, but might be just about acceptable” says man who spent two years negotiating it:  
Brexit Day! Again!  
FactCameron tried & failed to get any concession from the EU pre referendum.Fact May has failed to get any real concession from the EU post referendum.On both occasions the EU has shown itself up for what it really is.Poll.What should the UK choose now? 
Conservative MP @andreajenkyns says her initial take on Theresa May's updated Brexit deal is that some concerns remain  
"PM says public can’t change its mind on Brexit despite so much changing in the 3 years since the referendum. Yet she wants MPs to change their minds despite nothing changing since they last voted on her deal in Jan. Her double standards are breathtaking." 
Brexit backstop: No 'fundamental' change in PM's breakthrough  
It's decision day for Brexit in Britain's Parliament. Well, sort of.  
Ian Blackford, leader of the SNP in Westminster, says the party will vote against May's deal and stressed that Scotland voted to remain in the EU in the 2016 referendum. 
That this guy and Boris "Cathaginian terms" Johnson positioned themselves as anti-elitist is one of the biggest mirthless lols of Brexit. All populists secretly hate their people; these two do it openly.  
GREAT: Farage 'discussed No Deal Brexit with Trump'. “I said in the case of Vietnam that No Deal was better than a bad deal and I gave my opinion that the same principle applied to Brexit” 
This #Brexit Withdrawal Agreement Just Got Worse!  
Peston: In backing the Brady amendment, May promised to guarantee that the backstop could not be forever.She has failed.Tory Brexiter MPs will view May's Brexit as a pact with the EU that no independent nation could ever sign. I see no victory for her.  
Brexit is 420 hours away. #brexit 
A reminder as the #WithdrawalAgreement takes centre stage today. The UK government has already diverged from the agreement by stipulating that NI born Irish citizens are to be exempt from the Settlement scheme #Brexit “NI born Irish citizens are ‘British’"  
I am proud to have added my name to the @theSNP amendment to the PM'S #Brexit Deal, calling for Scotland to become an independent country & remain a member of the European Union. For the 1st time ever, a majority of Scottish MPs will vote in favour of independence in the HoC   
If Theresa May's Brexit deal is voted down in the Commons she will lose a lot of sympathy in Brussels and 'there will be no third chances for the Prime Minister,' writes @anguswalkertalk 
EU's former top judge tweeting WhatsApp screenshot of what he thinks about the Brexit deal.  What a time to be alive.  
"Brexit is those who feel they have nothing to lose led by those who will lose nothing" as @fotoole wrote. 
Scotland rejected Brexit. Allowing ourselves to be torn from the EU is silly. The effects on Scotland will be catastrophic. It may even be fatal to independence. 
Voters agree - by a 3:1 margin - that after Brexit the UK should position itself as the lowest tax, business-friendliest country in Europe. Let's make it happen, says @rcolvile  
The new bauble from Brussels is largely worthless, still allows the EU, very easily, to keep us locked in indefinitely. MPs must not be fobbed off with this PR stunt. It's still a colony pact, with no serious unilateral exit - no MP should vote for this. #brexit 
A new YouGov poll shows just 12% of the public think May's deal delivers Brexit. MPs must vote against it tonight.  
"For young people Brexit was a watershed moment. They have been politicised by it. This is a fight based on values & how we want our country to be."Students are mobilising for 2nd referendum, even chartering a train to London for the march against Brexit. 
We did a bit on @BBCTwo's #PoliticsLive yesterday talking about #EtonAlive, the Tories and fucking #Brexit.Skip to 35:00 if ya can be bothered.  pic.twitter.com/joDfq8PXtC 
She looks like one of those victims of 'coercive control'. Cameron had the same look in his eyes when he came back from his "renegotiation" before the referendum. We've got to get away from this organisation. It's corrupting on a primal level.  
The New Financial think tank reports that financial firms are spending up to $4 billion in preparation for Brexit  
The truth about post BREXIT trade according to one who knows: Kevin Rudd former Australian PM: 
Big day for BRExit. Backstop wording still looks pretty mushy to me.   
To betray the 17.4mTo eviscerate BrexitTo divide the people even further from those in ParliamentRory is a disgrace.  
No-deal would be a stepping stone to breaking free from EU tariffs:  #Brexit 
Thank you for early sight of this @bricksilk. I respectfully agree with everything you say. The Attorney General @Geoffrey_Cox is in very tricky territory now....#Brexit  
About to teach some lovely students, but I hope to publish Professor Michael Dougan's analysis of the Brexit legal developments about 1pm, and my own assessment later this afternoon.  
The pound has surged to a 22-month high against the euro on hopes after last-gasp changes to Theresa May's Brexit deal  
Brexit, June 2016 -  
Some people who pretend to oppose this deal, clearly want no Brexit at all, or want no deal at all. But if you accept the referendum result, and want a serious future relationship with the EU - then this is the only deal - and the time has come to vote for it. 
If you want to know why people do not trust politicians & think of them as nothing but lying, third rate snake oil salesmen, I give u Nick Boles - a true reflection of all that is wrong with our establishment & a great example of ‘Brexit Derangement Syndrome’ at its worst. U ok?  
So very much of Brexit is a psychodrama that Leavers are playing in their own heads against an imaginary evil empire, because it makes them the goodies, when much of the evidence indicates the contrary proposition.  
Blimey! I appear to have got an awful lot of new followers. I feel I will lose a fair few of you when I start moaning about Brexit and angry political stuff and writing but I definitely make up for it with interesting stuff about my bin day and sprained arm. 
WATCH: While everyone will be speaking about the backstop today, don't forget that it's not just the backstop that makes this a bad Brexit deal.There are so many reasons why this Brexit deal would be damaging for our country. MPs must vote it down. Please RT:  
James O'Brien on Geoffrey Cox's awaited legal advice: "We are waiting for a single unelected expert to tell us whether or not foreign judges sitting in a supranational court will allow us to take back control."@mrjamesob | #Brexit  
A hectic Brexit week is upon us yet again, so what's going on? Follow all the latest updates in this helpful thread:First up, Theresa May flew to Strasbourg last night in a last-ditch attempt to secure a customs union deal ahead of tonight's vote  
A word of Brexit caution for musicians, cabinet makers, antique dealers, pallet makers etc. When we leave the EU..you will need CITES certificates most times you take wood products into the EU. If you cant.. items of certain value will be confiscated and destroyed. 
MPs may be daft enough to vote for it, but since it manifestly fails to deliver on the Brady amendment, which said the #backstop should be replaced or provided with a unilateral exit mechanism, Brexiteers would be crazy to accept it. #brexit 
Looks like a day of debating legal semantics about the backstop to satisfy party politics. To recycle a phrase ‘nothing has changed’. MPs must reject this deal #brexit 
Ahead of this week’s Brexit votes, many MPs and their staff have received abuse. Ahead of this evening’s vote we have an opportunity to send a kind and positive message to our MPs and their staff, committing to holding them in prayer. Find suggestions at  
. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg "Ultimately it is political; does this deliver enough of Brexit to be worth accepting against the risk Michael Gove has highlighted of not leaving... That's today's debate essentially."  
Not a lawyer in Scotland either #Brexit  
One thing I don't get. If you look at the way the Remainers are currently reacting, they can see it all finally slipping away. They know if this goes through tonight, it's over. People's Vote, overturning the referendum, the whole ball-game. Gone. So why can't Brexiteers see it? 
The analysis by @mrjamesob this morning is brilliant and important. Brexit hinges upon an unelected expert & foreign judges. But that’s what they voted for, right? 
Proud of @EmmaSJacobs for this motion and to have put up with being questioned on it for over an hour. Being 1 of 2 other Jewish students to stand up and speak in favour was beyond intimidating and I will never understand how our safety on campus is being put to a referendum vote  
Everyone who voted for Brexit now needs to vote for a Nationalist Party in every local or general election to rid parliament of these self serving traitors. This is the respect they have for the biggest mandate in British political history. This comment is the final straw.  
This is nice: a referendum on whether Jews are worth protecting  
Voting down the deal today means a softer Brexit or possibly an eventual second referendum. Brexiteers that vote it down deserve absolutely everything that happens as a result. I'm fascinated to see what they do. 
There is no more important issue than that we take part in euro elections. Doesn't matter what you want: May deal,  managed no-deal, referendum, election. We need more time and flexibility than hard May 23rd deadline. 
 To heal the country To honour the result of the referendum To protect the economy To move on with pressing domestic and international priorities.I will be backing the Prime Minister's Brexit Deal this evening. 
Here's PM's pitch to MPs ahead of 11.30 meeting, entitled 'The Choice Today':* 'It may not be everyone's perfect vision of Brexit - but we have won some important legally-binding changes'* The Unilateral declaration means there is 'nothing to prevent' UK breaking off backstop 
Human Rights must not be an ‘add on’ in any international treaties agreed post Brexit. Read our report published today: @HarrietHarman 
QC legal opinion from Theresa May’s former counter terror advisor which says that the Brexit Withdrawal Agreement changes do not give the UK the right to terminate the backstop.  
What is heart breaking is that even if we have a decisive #PeoplesVote and reverse the result of the Referendum, Honda won’t come back and Japanese investors will not trust GB for a generation :-( 
#RT @jeremycorbyn: Since her Brexit deal was so overwhelmingly rejected, the Prime Minister has recklessly run down the clock, failed to effectively negotiate with the EU and refused to find common ground for a deal Parliament could support.That’s why MPs must reject this … 
But of course there are other issues in the WA which are of great concern to those of us who voted Brexit ... we trust the same care is taken over these issues  
"It was a form of escapism."@Coldwar_Steve posts edited pictures of political and cultural figures in bleak landscapes - and now #Brexit is his new inspiration. Latest entertainment news here:  
This is a ridiculous state of affairs to be in. It’s still a bad deal and we need to defeat it tonight and put it back to the people with the option to Exit from Brexit >  @Joswinson #WithdrawalAgreement 
"Tony Blair is having secret talks with Emmanuel Macron about how to stall Brexit. In plain English, a former PM is conspiring with a foreign power to subvert the will of the British people. This is a scandal of epic proportions."-  Brendan O’Neill 
New @Survation poll today gives @theSNP a 19% lead in Holyrood voting intention, with a pro-independence majority and only 32% against an independence referendum at some stage. SNP: 43%Con: 24%Lab: 22%LD: 9% 
It's deeply unfair that Labour has put someone with a high level of competence in the role of Shadow Brexit secretary, completely against the spirit of the role.  
Pity today’s youth aren’t taught there Ancient Greek in schools or church. Another reason why we need Brexit 
 The ‘new’ Withdrawal Agreement’ is half the size of the ‘old’ one! Not a single word in it has changed...but they’ve pathetically altered the pagination to make it look different. The perfect symbol of Theresa May’s contrick Brexit Brexit.  
Another legal opinion on the Brexit changes. There will be a lot. And virtually all of them will say nothing has changed much. There might be one that is the exception...  
Absolute joy on @lbc as James Bob is literally howling into a Brexit storm. I’m convinced that in former times his like would be either locked up in the loony bin, or donning the old “THE END IS NIGH” sandwich board on the High Street as children hurried past  
It's very clear, there is a good deal available to us. And it's the one we have now. We can put the decision back to the people #PeoplesVote, but that would take time and we will still have problems with lies and misinformation from those who support  #Brexit. #RevokeArticle50 
Not happy for us to just transfer over £1 trillion of assets from the UK to the EU, now the #Brexit jihadists want to give foreign judges in an international court control over the future of Brexit.Are they mad? Or are they just really REALLY thick?  
How the UK will handle #Brexit is still unclear - but what is certain is drama. @lucyfielder reports 
Attending an event around how Brexit impacts on Disabled people. First MP stands up & uses "physical & mental handicap" to describe the Disabled people in the room. Kind of proves why Disabled people are so screwed. 
Dominic Grieve says what's on offer "bears absolutely no relationship to what was being debated during the 2016 referendum, and the promises that were being made then by the Leavers".Yet during that referendum he seemed pretty clear what was being debated and promised.  
PAUL THOMAS on the Battle for Brexit #TheresaMay #Strasbourg #BrexitDeal #BrexitShambles #Brexit #Tories #BrexitShamble #BrexitShambles #Brexit #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #beherenow - political cartoon gallery in London  
This place full of people guessing what others are going to do today. Thankfully @theSNP have no dilemma - our position is clear #PeoplesVote #brexit  
Twitter Gold: Veteran British journalist v UK attorney general #CoxsCodpiece #Brexit  
SNP's @IanBlackfordMP hopes Parliament rejects Theresa May's Brexit deal later  
Naked threats to block Brexit now from a Tory MP who was elected on a manifesto to deliver Brexit.  
It’s time to put an end to your disastrous, humiliating premiership & hold a referendum allowing the British people to stop Brexit  
Even if MPs pass Theresa May's deal, the UK's Brexit nightmare won't end — important piece by @sjwrenlewis on the next cliff-edge. 
Watching Brexit play out on Twitter is like being in a WhatsApp group with your mates at 1.37am on a Saturday morning waiting for a cab, while Keith’s gone missing and Joe is eating a kebab out the bin.  
NEWS! Triumph for Theresa May as she convinces EU to use a different font on Brexit deal  
No Deal clean #Brexit from EU  WTO Rules Own Trade Policy Sign FTAs with Rest of World Negotiate fair UK-EU Trade FTA Union intact Control Laws (No ECJ) Control our Borders Control Fishing Control Agriculture Say goodbye to Mrs May #LetsGoWTO 
363,537 signatures. This is REAL Brexit, not @theresa_may's dreadful draft WA, a Remainer's Deal for rejoining later! See Bruges Grp article. Please sign & retweet. @ConservativesPetition: Leave the EU without a deal in March 2019. 
the only deal that matters, from the Best Network for Roaming #Brexit #PhonesAreGood 
While Labour fails to back amendments for a #PeoplesVote The @LibDems are committed to stopping this disastrous Tory Brexit. Our Amendments commit to:1. #PeoplesVote2. Parliament control over Brexit business3. #BrexitSupportFund4. If needed Revoking Article 50 to #stopBrexit 
How #GBP trades on #Brexit rumours/headlines. This strip never gets old.  
Why is Jacob Rees-Mogg the poster boy for Brexit? He's just a back-bencher who is only interested in shit-stirring as he makes a load of cash every time sterling & FTSE wobble. #BrexitDeal @CCHQPress @UKLabour  
Don't wait for the Attorney General comments, he has already given them ages ago.Q: Does the #WithdrawalAgreement honour the 2016 Referendum decision?A:  
 An overwhelming majority of voters in Scotland are in favour of another referendum on Scotland's future. The EU is a market of 500 million people – eight times the size of the UK alone. Yet the Tories want to drag us out of the world’s richest market against our will.  
My favourite Brexit description thus far.  
If you look at it from some distance, then watching staunch defenders of the British empire adopting the language of anti-colonialist liberation over brexit can be a source of endless amusement.  
Jo Swinson - Every form of #brexit is going to be bad our country.. there is no brexit that protects people's jobs.. there is no brexit that protects the #NHS.. I want to put the deal to a #PeoplesVoteAndrea Jenkyns - It's not democratic to let people vote again #FinalSay 
Whatever the assessment Keir no #Brexit based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o ConsentThe Non-Binding opinions of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the Ppl can beVALIDW/O A Confirmatory #PeoplesVote incl the Option to#Remain in Control in the EU 
This is rubbish  of course unilateral declarations are significantCertain lawyers have a parti pris Brexit view. They seem determined to stop Brexit by all means so don't be surprised if they run around now saying nothing has changed. They would say that wouldnt they  
I will be voting against the deal tonight not because the negotiations around the backstop are deeply flawed but because the deal gives a blindfold #Brexit and leads us to an isolated uncertain future which is bad for our economy, our livelihoods & our communities. #BrexitCrisis 
Did @BBCRadioFoyle this morning, and listened before the discussion to a host of interviews with young people close to the border most of whom just don’t want Brexit to happen. ‘This is the older generation taking away the future of the young.’  
WATCH | @andreajenkyns: "Brexit was about taking back control. This is still putting our destiny into other people's hands. To me that's not Brexit. My gut feeling is I don't think I can support [the deal]."Brexit MPs MUST stay strong. Nothing has changed. Vote it down, Andrea!  
Does anyone know which pubs in town are showing the Brexit? 
Click here: Brexit is being BETRAYED! Get your Yellow Vests now! English, Welsh & Ulster available and world flags!Click here:  
After three long years of intellectual effort, the solution to the Brexit conundrum has finally been revealed:  Brexit means Bollocks.  
Given the sheer weight of legal opinion saying that the backstop is  unaltered, if Geoffrey Cox as AG demurs, many will say he’s acting politically.We’ve been there before. It was controversial for years. It still is. If it happens again, Brexit will get that little more toxic.  
Jim Allister: Changes to Brexit deal ‘spin and guile’ - Belfast Newsletter  
Brexit in one word  
CONSTANT DIZZYING 24 HOUR YEAR LONG ENDLESS BREXIT...EVERY BIT OF IT MASSIVELY MATTERING TO SOMEBODY, PRESUMABLY.  
Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer says of the PM's changes to the deal, "that isn't any significant change" and that he "can't see on the basis of those documents, that realistically he [the Attorney General] can now change his mind..." 
Brexit has been a dark cloud over us for many months, particularly the threat of no deal. We now need to see the Withdrawal Agreement ratified by Westminster & European Parliament, so that we can get on with important work of building the closest possible relationship post Brexit 
This..he's right, if we don't stop Brexit we are letting the alt right win. Please watch and RT.  
Countless people across the planet have paid with their lives in pursuit of independence from the British empire, all we have to do to get rid of WM, the Tories, Brexit, Trident etc etc is put an X in a box when the time comes.. Don't bottle it this time Scotland.. #IndyRef2 
A-level history question, 2050: That the Brexit Parliament took its political inspiration more from the Tudor court of 500 years earlier than from 20th Century liberal democratic values was the key cause of its downfall. Discuss  
Sorry, no. The 'deal' is a fudge which will lead to years of uncertainty. The best deal is the one we already have - #RevokeA50 and you'll start to see stability return. The referendum was deeply flawed and more information is likely to appear. Must act in the national interest. 
Leeds University Union fails to pass a motion on whether it should do more to combat antisemitism, meaning there will now be a campus referendum in which thousands of students - over 99 percent of whom are not Jewish - will be able to vote on the issue. 
The Brexit metaphors keep on coming  
If only we could send @BarristerSecret, who is rapidly becoming a national treasure, to sort out Brexit for us  
What do you mean "at this moment"?Corbyn always had the better team for brexit, it's just a shame the media  chose to parrot the idiots on the other side #WithdrawalAgreement #Brexit #R4today #politicslive #Newsnight #BBCNews #bbcbias #ToryEconomicFailure #NeverTrustaTory #GTTO 
Brexit is all bollocks, every deceitful rights removing,  nation impoverishing, billionaire tax dodging, idiotic, duty negligent, self deluding bit of it. #bollockstobrexit 
If this criminally corrupted #Brexit is forced through without a #PeoplesVote all the MPs responsible should regarded as complicit in a crime against democracy and we should campaign to ensure that in due course they are prosecuted and jailed. 
"Both the NHS and the UK life sciences industry desperately need clarity...to plan successfully for Brexit, and time has almost run out...even the ‘least worst’ option will clearly have profound implications for UK science and health."@PHGFoundation 
Led by young working class activists, RECLAIM in partnership with the @PHMMcr will host an evening exploring the issues facing working class young people in Britain today #RadicalLate #RECLAIMProject #Brexit #VoteAt16 People's History Museum 6:00pm - 7.30pm FREE 
It’s called a referendum. if the result had been other way round we wouldn’t have heard a peep from arrogant jerks like you  
There is no left-wing case 4 Brexit: 21st century socialism requires transnational organization  via @LSEpoliticsblog 
.@JunckerEU @PellegriniP_ #EPlenary #FutureofEurope: “#Brexit is the past. In 2016, in #Bratislava we started our common future at #EU27. This is what we must now focus on” 
The documents published by the EU and UK last night are complementary to the Withdrawal Agreement & Political Declaration & provide an additional layer of interpretation, clarification and elaboration to the UK. #Brexit  
Foreign Secretary Jeremy Hunt on updated #Brexit deal: "These are legally significant changes... we have achieved everything that we hoped we could achieve in very difficult negotiations" 
.@JunckerEU #EPlenary #Brexit : “There will be no third chance. I would like British MPs to approve the deal found that will enable an orderly withdrawal of the #UK from the #EU.” 
For those insistent that the NI economy is buoyant despite the impending threat of Brexit, check out Bow Street Mall in Lisburn where I’ve just been. One end of it is still a virtual ghost town, although the DUP will be delighted that Ann Summers is closing. 
No Deal Brexit would boost UK’s economy by £140bn over 15 years 
The question tonight is whether lawmakers are willing to acknowledge what most Britons have already figured out: Brexit is a game with different categories of losers, but no winners  
Good piece on Brexit effect on regions of England and the reasons why local authority responses are hamstrung  Includes a useful set of tables of local activities to date preparing for Brexit 
Anyone who thought that voting Remain was voting for a status quo needs to see this video - the “European Project”, being so undemocratic, was vulnerable to a takeover, and it has been taken over, by people like @GuyVerhofstadt. Brexit is the only remedy  
Failure to deliver Brexit would consign the Conservative Party to the dustbin of history  via @BrexitCentral 
So you won't give the people a another chance to vote on Brexit which was only won by cheating at a narrow margin, but your "deal" that lost by 260 votes in the Commons can be voted on again? How is that fair? 
Any MP tempted to fall for the Brexit BS of great changes secured by @theresa_may should read this. And so should Cox. 
Two thirds of exports r covered by our trade with EU, its best deal in world. Replacing it with chlorine chicken, isn't a good deal. #Brexit  
Mature. Professional. And very defensive. Tells you all you need to know #Brexit  
Life in UK is great, get free money, do no work and laze around all day harassing women. Of course, there is always Brexit-supporting Nazi Islamophobe dogs shouting abuse, but we is soon get rid of them  
Yes but the reality is that the Emperor has no clothes. Never mind a #codpiece #Brexit  
As usual, Brexiteers are mulling a compromise while Remainers make clear that the only thing they'll be happy with is stopping Brexit altogether. But sure, it's the Brexiteers who are the hardliners  
Tories won general election. Didn’t you notice.? And you lost the referendum. There’s a name for people like you. LOSER  
Here's what's happening ahead of tonight's crucial Brexit vote:- Theresa May has secured a "legally binding" limit to the controversial Irish backstop- MPs are waiting for the attorney general's legal advice- The vote on May's deal is set for 7pm.  
To enact a #Brexit corrupted by lies, crime & foreign interference against the will of the majority would be such a huge violation of democratic standards that it can only be regarded as criminal, closer to a coup than to democracy. #PeoplesVote #FBPE. 
If deal was too bad to endorse in Jan it’s too bad to endorse now. So greatest issue of our times, affecting countless lives, will finally reduce to numbers, games, party politics.Perhaps, after all, Brexit is not big. Britain just became small.My take  
EP President Antonio Tajani has summed up what all the #Brexit mania has been about the last few years: to serve as a ‘deterrent’ to other nations leaving. The mask slips again from the corrupt globalist cabal who want to decimate national sovereignty and create a new USSR 
Personally, I have no problem with Gove's explanation that the future of the backstop (& therefore Brexit) is in the hands of foreign judges in a supranational court. Could you confirm, as a relatively rational Brexiter, that this is what last night's developments deliver?  
This shows a clear majority of Scots do not want another referendum any time soon. Any claims the SNP have to a ‘mandate’ for #indyref2 are utter nonsense. 
The British Attorney General, folks. On one of of the biggest mornings in British history. #Brexit  
UNMISSABLE READING: Legal challenges revealed Brexit puts our Democracy at risk. Joel Baccas @joelbaccas & Liz Webster @abcpoppins on the litigation that unveiled accountability for, & the dangers of, Brexit. #StopBrexit #RevokeA50 #PeoplesVote #WithdrawalAgreement #BrexitVote 
While we all continue to argue over Brexit 14 million people now live in poverty, millions are forced to use food banks, homelessness & malnutrition has soared & life expectancy has been cut by six months. We’ve lost all sense of perspective  
While the SNP plot for #IndyRef2 (legal or not) it’s clear that a majority of Scots do not want to go through the division of yet another referendum.Scots are sick to the back teeth of all of this - its time the SNP gave it a rest #No2IndyRef2 #OnceInAGeneration #WeVotedNo 
Even if I wasn’t a lawyer I could see that the PM’s #Brexit “new” withdrawal agreement is the same thing she has touted for monthsits the emperors new clothesare we really so blind?Is it just my imagination?Well thankfully @bricksilk & others have done the analysis 
I'm sorry but you're absolutely deluded, you know any form of Brexit is worse than membership, you made that clear during the referendum campaign.  Have the honesty to say so, stop pretending there is any good Brexit. We need to either #RevokeArticle50 or have a #PeoplesVote 
In her heart, Mrs May knew that the new ‘Joint Instrument’ wouldn’t work out well for the UK#Brexit  
Jean-Claude you do not have a veto over Brexit. If we decide to proceed with Brexit on WTO terms you do not have the power to prevent us doing so. Stop trying to boss us around.  
Translated: She has absolutely nothing. It’s the same woeful surrender document that she presented before. (With a meaningless letter attached.)Nearly 3 years for this?Brexit must mean Exit and the only way we leave is by walking away completely on 29th March. #WTOBrexitNOW 
Today, MPs will be voting on the Government's #Brexit deal in the second #MeaningfulVote. More details of today's business in the #OrderPaper:  
The poll shows that, if Nicola Sturgeon demands the power to hold a referendum any time before the next Holyrood election, she would have the support of just 22 per cent of Scots. 
Irish PM Leo Varadkar says Theresa May's updated #Brexit deal is "positive" and hopes #WithdrawalAgreement will be "endorsed by the House of Commons" For latest reaction:  
No deal Brexit BOOST: Jacob Rees-Mogg explains why no deal is now 'default expectation'   
You truly are a disgrace to the legal profession.  Why don’t you get back to your pressing task of figuring out how you can craft a believable lie so that the frauds & money launderers funding Brexit can have what you promised them. 
 Businesses want certainty Voters are exhausted of #Brexit and want to move on The Deal has been improved  The SNP will vote to create chaos and push for #indyref2 I will vote for the Deal tonight.Read more  
MPs who are happy to frustrate the voters especially when their constituency overwhelming voted leave are absolutely insulting the the voters! #Brexit 
My legal opinion on last night’s #Brexit developments, jointly written with Jason Coppel QC and Sean Aughey, is here:  
Principles of conduct for MP:The seven principles of public life are: Selflessness, Integrity, Objectivity, Accountability, Openness, Honesty and Leadership.How many Brexit voting MPs are following these? Especially integrity, objectivity, and honesty?They are a disgrace. 
Only Gove could use an analogy for May's Brexit Deal that means we stay in Europe  
May getting Juncker to threaten “no Brexit” very like Cameron getting Obama to say “back of the queue”. It will also backfire. 
Margaret Thatcher would have stood up and walked out when Juncker spoke about Brexit not happening. May is weak.  
Same people shouting everyday “stop Brexit” & waving EU flags outside the Houses of Parliament, do these people not have jobs?? 
She's an embarrassment to this country! #Brexit  
This won’t go down well, but Labour committing to the option of a second referendum made May’s deal passing more likely. May’s deal hasn’t changed in any meaningful way; what has changed is Tory Brexiteers are more scared Brexit won’t happen if they keep voting the deal down.  
Some quick notes on unilateral declarations. #Brexit international law lecture 315. To start with: what is a unilateral declaration (thread) 
 The latest Survation poll also shows that 7 out of 10 people in Scotland want another Scottish independence referendum. 
Brexit   
Brexit is likely to be delayed whatever the outcome of tonight's votes, former attorney general Dominic Grieve suggests #r4today  
Leo: Ok, ok, so my backstop is no longer bullet proof, but it stands a decent chance in an arm wrestle. Now if you’d excuse me, I have to go hand over some shamrock, and my dignity, to the Yanks #Brexit #Taoiseach 
Theresa May trying to get Brexit over the finishing line  
BREAKING: Theresa May's legal advice on her bad Brexit deal is in  
Brexit is the process of divorcing your attractive spouse because she doesn't agree with every single thing you say, and replacing her with a lifetime of Tinder. 
Tonight MPs will vote on the Prime Minister's Brexit plan again. In the meantime they are assessing whether the changes she secured last night are meaningful or not.How would you vote if you were able to? 
Britons living in France have been subjected to even more Brexit worries after the French authorities said they would not be processing applications to exchange British driving licences for French ones until they know exactly what's happening with Britain's departure from the EU 
A @Survation poll for the Scottish Daily Mail has revealed that 60 per cent of Scots are opposed to an independence referendum taking place any time in the next five years.  
Scotland upshot from #Brexit and #BrexitChaos today likely to be ...1) May gets No Deal and staring at Crash-out in 17 days so an earlier #Indyref2 2) She gets her incredibly bad Deal through to damage economy before and after Dec 2020 so means #Indyref2 by then 
Brexit is an 'unmitigated disaster' that has damaged UK investment - Gerald Grimstone, ex Barclay's ChairBrexit trade plan is ‘utter bollocks’ - Kevin Rudd, ex Australian PM'Let's get it done' - Theresa May, soon to be ex PM, but not before she destroys UK & the West with it. 
I really feel for you. Labour's deal is a sensible consensus but 'extremists' on both side of the ruddy BREXIT argument would rather tear each other apart than agree to this so we can move on to the many other crises now facing the UK. Good LUCK! 
Jeremy Corbyn and Labour should finally take responsibility for their country and support this compromise. Their purely tactical behaviour and electoral calculations are absolutely unacceptable. #Brexit 2/2 
This is the last chance to reach a reasonable agreement on #Brexit. There departure date can not be postponed - a two-month long technical transitional period is the maximum we can accept . 1/2  
New @Survation poll today gives @theSNP a 19% lead in Holyrood voting intention, with a pro-independence majority and only 32% against an independence referendum at some stage. SNP: 43%Con: 24%Lab: 22%LD: 9% 
BOLES: Vote for the deal or we will frustrate you. “We will vote to stop No Deal Brexit on 29th March. We will vote to extend Article 50 for a few months...build a majority for a softer Brexit deal.” 
"If we walk away, what can they do? They cannot invade you, can they?" Former Brexit secretary David Davis there. 
Labour supporters on both sides of the Brexit debate are threatening to quit the party, plunging it into an existential crisis  
I like to imagine there are alternate realities where instead of Cuckoo meaning crazy they use other birds. “What, have you gone *totally* Garganey?!?”“If you think I’m going to admit to trousering £7million off brexit you are living in Cloud Chaffinch Land” 
Will the sheep pull their own wool over their eyes?  #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement #backstop @theSNP 
Tories create referendum to nick votes off UKIP.Tories front lying Leave campaign.Tories front failure of Remain campaign.Tories run Brexit as closed Tory shop exclusively for Tory party advantage.Tories deliver this shambles of a deal.Who is to blame? "all politicians"  
Junker: This deal or you might not get Brexit. We won't give you a third chance.THAT is well beyond the point a PM with any respect for the UK would've walked away. We don't need the EU's permission, or their lousy deal. May's humiliated the greatest nation in history. 
Our analysis Of Brexit-Centric Twitter Activity:  Great research by @r0zetta. 
What happens if the Brexit vote passes and then the police conclude there was illegality in the referendum? How can we ever again chastise other countries for their flawed electoral practices or flouting of the rule of law?We will be one of those countries!! 
On a day when we're all obsessing over Brexit, this is a story which really shouldn't be missed  
250+ pieces of evidence proving that Brexit is already severely damaging the UK. (Warning: it's a looooong thread, of necessity.) 
Spot on by @spikedonline's O'Neill.That Blair's secret talks with #Macron to stop #Brexit *aren't* the scandal of epic proportions they ought to be just shows how much the politico-media class has ditched even the pretence of respect for democracy.      
I'm amazed that that the prevailing mood among commentators is that the deal will certainly fall. It may yet do, of course. If Cox and the DUP don't say yes then by a long way. But if I were a second referendum advocate I'd be worried now. 
‘Or Brexit might not happen at all’. Mate, there’s still hope in this country, hope that this is a country built on the foundations of democracy, hope that we’re not ran by puffed-up technocrats like yourself that don’t give a shit about the ballot box.  
Still can’t quite believe Theresa May couldn’t negotiate my completely reasonable Brexit demand of “absolutely everything I want but nothing that 27 other member nations want”. This. Is. A. Disgrace. 
Fake outrage, fake science, fake compassion, fake news, fake genders, fake austerity, fake education, fake currency, fake wars, fske peace, fake trophies, fake feelingz, fake Brexit.Our world is at war with reality.Reality will win.  
Whatever the legal advice is, this #Brexit deal will make us less well off and throw us into total uncertainty for years to come. Talks with opposition parties were a farce. It is a flawed deal from top to bottom and I cannot vote for it. #NothingHasChanged 
I’ll be on @BBCr4today shortly on the Brexit deal in Strasbourg. 
Just in case you weren’t sure who’s running our country @Jacob_Rees_Mogg confirms the most important decision our country has taken since WW2 hangs on the views of a self appointed committee of #ERG hard #Brexit “lawyers” and the DUP. So much for #TakingBackControl @TheIndGroup 
More than 275 financial firms are moving a combined $1.2 trillion in assets and funds and thousands of staff from Britain to the European Union in anticipation of Brexit  
Senior ERG member on their Brexit thinking this morning: “No changes to the WA have been made at all. The question is therefore whether these “extra” documents actually provide for the changes to the balance of power on the backstop . . .[my] instinct says no real changes made” 
Gordon Brown & Alistair Darling were Anti Austerity-Cameron promised Austerity & Britain voted him in 2010. Now they moanBrexit is the same self defeating act of self denial.Cameron was the beginning of the end. We should have voted Brown. Brexit is a foolish folly 
“The instrument agreed yesterday represents an unambiguous statement by both parties of what has been agreed. It does not reopen the Withdrawal Agreement or undermine the Backstop or its application.” An Taoiseach, Leo Varadkar. #Brexit  
“I am not sure that we, in Britain, are as worried as the French customs officers about Brexit,” said a passenger on a Eurostar train. “Maybe we should stop drinking tea and start thinking about what comes next.”  
No Deal: despite what some have been saying, support for No Deal has NOT increased significantly of late. In fact, its barely moved at all. Currently 20% think it would be a good Brexit outcome, 14% an acceptable one and 52% a bad one 
Nothing has changed.May's #Brexit deal still ends free movement, undermines environmental protections, puts jobs at risk & says nothing about future relationship with EU.MPs don't have to accept this. We can reject the deal, reject No Deal & extend Article 50 for #PeoplesVote 
Handy that the rest of the Brexit team are highly qualified too, eh Laura?Thornberry- barristerGardiner - Harvard trained, ex senior arbiterIt's good leadership to pick your best team for the task. Good job Corbyn knows what he's doing. Unlike May. 
Northern Irish nationalists are strongly against a 'hard Border' post-Brexit. To be sure. A pity, then, more of them didn't vote for MPs who would speak for the community at Westminster, like the SDLP, rather than abstentionist Sinn Fein. 
Wait a minute.May's Withdrawal Agreement Brexit deal includes a UK..."Unilateral Declaration of Independence" ???#DissolveTheUnionIf they can do it so can Scotland. 
Brexit has already utterly gutted the UK. The impact on the City is far worse than anyone has admitted until now. 269 banking firms and £800bn in assets have been transferred - with far more to come...  #BrexitCrisis #BrexitVote #WithdrawalAgreement 
This has gone far enough. The next generation will never forgive us if we deliberately cultivate a second-rate future for them, downgrading, despoiling and disempowering in democracy's name. May's deal must go. Brexit must go. Give us our country back. 
So it comes down to this, Brexit resting on the legal advice of one man. May hopes there is enough there to convince Cox to change legal advice. Will he? Someone who knows him well just texted to say they don’t know. “He’s so independent minded”  
"These changes aren't significant"Shadow Brexit Secretary Sir Keir Starmer reacts to PM's updated #Brexit deal  
It's really sad. Part of me wonders what useful things the government might have achieved if it hadn't been fixated on Brexit for the last 3 years, and part of me looks at this government and thinks probably not a lot, 
Yes - in appointing @Keir_Starmer, @jeremycorbyn made a shrewd tactical decision.  I think that’s what you meant to say eh @bbclaurak but just could not bring yourself to!  Oh & Keir has been there throughout this process!  How many Brexit Secs has the PM had again?  
We will then do whatever it takes to frustrate you. We will vote to stop no-deal Brexit on 29th March. We will vote to extend Article 50 for a few months. And we will then work with opposition parties to build a majority for a softer Brexit deal. 
Unelected Luxembourger says back May’s turd of a deal or he won’t let Brexit happen. Will Tory “Brexiteers” submit to that? Telling moment. 
We had a referendum on EU withdrawal. 52% in favour. Say Parliament legislated to withdraw on condition that we cut all our limbs off (not that far removed from @theresa_may’s deal). Would the public expect to vote on the outcome, or just be expected to get on with it? 
Irish Prime Minister Leo Varadkar says the text agreed yesterday on the PM's #Brexit deal doesn't "reopen the #WithdrawalAgreement or undermine the backstop or its application". He adds they are "committed to exploring alternatives". Live updates:  
"No Brexit at all"...... you can bugger off chum!You might be beguiled by a treacherous PM but #Brexit & our freedom will never die.If @Conservatives & @UKLabour won't take us out the British people will elect a govt that will.Stick your Vassal state WA. 
Brexit as competing uncertaintiesVote for the deal = short-term certainty and long-term uncertaintyVote against the deal = short-term uncertainty, with the possibility of getting greater long-term certainty 
Simon Schama’s devastating critique of #TheresaMay "Pick someone at random from Yellow Pages, they'd be better than her." - #Brexit #BrexitDeal #GTTO #BBCnews #VoteDownMaysDealpic.twitter.com/GSvipsCpBd 
Also hearing rumours from legal world that DLA Piper solicitors in Birmingham have been brought in to help Cox find a way to support validity as he can’t, and Lord Grabiner also drafted in. Will be interesting to see when and if Cox advice is published for scrutinising. #Brexit  
So the withdrawal agreement remains in place with no changes. There is also an ‘interpretation’ designed to placate the DUP and the ERG which, ehm, eaves the withdrawal agreement in place with no changes. In the Brexit chaos this is a ‘triumph’....... 
Break: Senior DUP MP:  ‘It doesn’t look good’#brexit 
handy at this moment, hes been there for 3 years, advising JC and scrutinising Brexit shambles and holding the worse PM to account. We so need a change of government the Tories just seem to make it up as they go along. 
Brexit news: Jacob Rees Mogg reveals on BBC Newsnight that no deal is his expectation | UK | News |  
OK then. My #Brexit diagram (V15) updated for the day ahead. #MeaningfulVote Based on the idea that Cox will declare Backstop "temporary", and introduces the idea of an earlier Meaningful Vote 3No accumulative probabilities though - if anyone can calculate those I will add! 
Until last night Juncker had pretended to respect the UK Ref result. His “no Brexit” threat ends that pretence. May complicit in it. 
I won’t be voting against Brexit tonight because of the backstop - the backstop is necessary to preserve an open border in Ireland and protect the GFA - I will be voting against it because it will prolong austerity & propel Britain, blindfold, into an unknown, isolated future. 
Its 12th March 2019.... my phone’s been beeping with messages from colleagues telling me latest negotiation tweaks on #Brexit are enough. I will get all legal papers & assess whether I can now vote for the PM’s unchanged WA, with legal sideletters, or not tonight @BrexitCentral 
I would have been delighted with just Brexit, but if Brexit isn’t on offer unless we destroy Lab-Con duopoly as well, we’d better do that. 
If we "leave" on Mrs May's terms on 29th March, on the 30th we will be:- unable to remove EU tariffs- bound by all existing EU law and all new laws - under the jurisdiction of the ECJ- still paying the EU £billionsDoes that sound anything like "Brexit" to you? 
Which is:  Revoke Article 50; remain, implement existing EU rules re management of immigration; take the money put aside for Brexit and put it into the abandoned areas of the UK.  End austerity and end the stupid FPTP voting system that got us into this mess in the first place 
The overwhelming weight of legal opinion overnight = these “new” provisions don’t alter the fundamental legal effect of the #backstop set out by Attorney General. He has no basis to substantially alter his previous opinion. Careful questioning vital #Brexit 
Michael Gove telling MPs if they don't back this deal there is a risk that Brexit will be diluted and delayed. That will be the line Number 10 hammer home to convince Brexiteers to back May - it's a choice between this or potentially an even softer Brexit/no Brexit at all. 
Keir Starmer is a QC, with expertise in EU Law.He leads on #Brexit for #Labour.Name a Tory, Lib-Dem, IG MP that is anywhere near as competent/ knowledge. #KeirStarmer  
"Taking back control" shown up for the meaningless twaddle it always was, when the Gov have to summon an army of Lawyers to convince it's brexiter MP's that this crap #Brexit deal is in reality the same as the one massively rejected in January.#BrexitShambles#PeoplesVote 
If May’s Deal somehow manages to get through the HOC today it will mean she has thrown the most British of the British DUP and their supporters under the Brexit bus. It will also mean Labour MPs will be the enablers.Better Together once again to the rescue. 
With most eyes on #Brexit, I’ll be in Westminster Hall at 9.30 debating fire safety - and this government’s woeful failure to get a grip on our failing system nearly two years after #Grenfell 
Theresa May tells MPs to back her "improved" #Brexit deal after securing legal changes which she says ensures the UK can't be trapped in the Irish backstop. Follow live political updates here:  
Wow! David Davis to @talkRADIO: “This is by no means what I would have liked but it will deliver Brexit” 
Commentators: "Spectator: MPs have “ failed on a grand scale” over Brexit. (Understatement.)May’s deal would cost jobs, reduce economic competitiveness and diminish Britain’s sovereignty and standing in the world" Bloomberg’s Editorial Board. (Understatement.) 
With May’s deal is effectively in hands of Jacob Rees-Mogg and ERG, good time to re-read yesterday’s @openDemocracy exclusive on how Brexit department is being forced to disclose names of ERG members after months of fighting against transparency.  
Excellent #Brexit coverage on @morningireland - calm, measured, mature and clear. At such variance with coverage on the other side of the Irish Sea. Great work. @tconnellyRTE @rtenews @RTENewsPaulC @RTERadio1 
GMU: "we couldn't speak to DUP or SF on Brexit this morning so we'll just talk amongst ourselves" Continued unionist v nationalist approach from BBC on Brexit is reductive, inaccurate & denies other political views a voice. Guess what, plenty of us aren't unionist or nationalist 
Keep asking him until he provides the ‘right’ answer?Sounds like the multiple referendum scenario all over again.#PutItToThePeople 
Between a no-deal Brexit or Theresa May’s Brexit deal, Scots would rather have independence. 
These changes were hard fought for. They preserve the UK’s right to act unilaterally in our sovereign national interest. PM has listened to parliament’s concerns so time to back to deal and avoid risk of customs union or no Brexit 
Tony Blair is having secret talks with Emmanuel Macron about how to stall Brexit. In plain English, a former PM is conspiring with a foreign power to subvert the will of the British people. This is a scandal of epic proportions, says Brendan O’Neill 
Unpopular opinion: last night's "developments" on Brexit don't change anything. Backstop still stands. Withdrawal Agreement wasn't reopened & won't be reopened. UKG & DUP need to start dealing in reality that the backstop is going nowhere- neither it should- it's our safety net 
Brexit is a stain4 things MPs can do to act in the best interests of the country;1. Defeat May tonight2. #RevokeArticle50 notice4. Investigate MPs who have made money out of this mess5. Get the @NCA_UK to crack on with referendum investigations 
Theresa May explains why this Brexit agreement is way better than the last one.  
Lots of election chatter around Westminster last night. Some senior Tories convinced that, if tonight's Brexit vote is lost, May would rather go to the country than allow Cooper, Letwin, etc to force her hand 
Sammy Wilson, the DUP's Brexit Spokesman tells @LBC what the Prime Minister has said so far "seems to fall short of what she herself has promised" 
Say we have a referendum on the death penalty. 52% in favour. Parliament legislates for this on the condition that, like jury service, we all have a go at being executioner. Would the public expect another vote on the outcome, or just be expected to get on with it? 
Today is going to be Geoffrey Cox v Keir Starmer  head to head in the ultimate courtroom drama. The Brexit version of Witness For The Prosecution. In a dramatic last minute twist, Theresa May will pull back her hair and exclaim "wanna kiss me ducky?". 
“It's not too late for the UK to stop digging” says Bloomberg as it assesses the economic damage of #Brexit Her deal wld “cost jobs, reduce economic growth, harm competitiveness, and diminish #Britain’s sovereignty &standing in the world” via @bopinion 
The Brexit promised in the referendum was never deliverable and only 37% of the electorate voted for it.That’s why we’re here. 
Theresa May comes back from Strasbourg claiming a #Brexit victory for the country, it's nothing of the sort, please remember May is as partisan a PM as you'll get, this pyrrhic victory is all about appeasing the ERG/DUP and her rancid party, #WithdrawalAgreement #RevokeA50 
Well done Keir. With so much spin, as there was when May first bought back her deal, we need clarity. Its clear last night was a theatrical exercise designed to bull doze people into voting for the WA. Its a con job. I say no, no, no. #brexit #peoplesvote @bbclauraK @libdems 
Of the many bad things to be revealed by Brexit, the decline of critical and intelligent journalism in the BBC is one of the clearest.  
Don’t expect anything much from EU leaders today except warm, vague, encouraging words about Theresa May’s additional Brexit documents published last night 
An Taoiseach, Leo Varadkar will make a statement shortly on the legal assurances the EU has provided to Britain to help pass Withdrawal Agreement. #Brexit Watch it live here  
Another Brexiteer against a pretend Brexit that will see us tied to the EU for years without the right to leave. Yep, guilty as charged.  
BREXIT LATEST: I don't know what's going on. More as it happens. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg's investment firm Somerset Management has profited by £47m since Brexit. Disaster capitalist Rees-Mogg won't acknowledge the number, but his personal profit will be over £7m!!! JRM, what first attracted you to the Brexit goldmine? #BrexitMillionaires #Dispatches 
Overnight, I trawled memes and gifs for Blackadder 4 references to illustrate how well Brexit is going.  
Handy at this moment for Labour to have a renowned lawyer as shadow Brexit sec   
Scots would prefer independence to Theresa May’s Brexit plan or a no-deal exit, a poll has indicated  
Having looked at the legally binding changes in detail overnight, I think they solidify the terms of the Withdrawal Agreement. Really hope the deal will pass so we can move on. @theresa_may has my full support. #Brexit 
I will vote against Brexit today. It was voted for by a small majority of the people, but it will make all our people poorer. @UKLabour should have opposed Brexit from the start, & if it goes through with any Labour votes we will have betrayed our values, our country & its people 
Theresa May returns from Strasbourg in triumph with breakthrough Brexit deal."We found this spoon, sir"  
If only @theresa_may was as committed to ending domestic abuse and #VAWG, as she is with keeping in power and ploughing ahead with #Brexit. Imagine just 5% of the £billions wasted, spent instead on #DA services and helping victims. 
Davis, Duncan Smith, McVey, Dorries, Bridgen, Francois, Rees Mogg, Johnson & co illustrate a Brexit legacy that will be with us for a generation. Ignorance, incompetence and/or blatant dishonesty no longer disbar anyone from being treated as an authority by much of the media. 
After Brexit, all comedy will consist of jowly white men gurning into your face cooing “dO i OfFeNd YoU???”. Forever. 
No Labour MP must collude with May to reduce workers' rights. Today they must vote down her #Brexit Withdrawl Agreement - nothing else will do!  
The media are readying to laud T.May as a great negotiator and the saviour of the will of the people.But make no mistake, should her dreadful deal pass, then Brexit will be used as an excuse for more austerity. More misery, more deaths. Truly nothing to celebrate. 
Found: Supporters of revised brexit deal  
"..it is this deal, or #Brexit may not happen at all."  The hubris of this bureaucrat is staggering.  We voted to leave.  We're leaving. #VoteMaysDealDown  
A politicians speaking plain truth - shame it's not a UK one 'claims that British trade with Commonwealth can make up for leaving EU is “the nuttiest of the many nutty arguments” advanced by Brexit supporters & “utter bollocks” former Australian PM said 
May claims victory in Brexit backstop talksIf She thinks this is Victory I would hate to see her Failure! 
Our government has cobbled together a "half and half" Brexit to do the minimum possible for Brexiteers and the maximum possible for Remainers. The rest of Westminster has poisoned the process to boot. The result? A Brexit Omnishambles.Shame on you Westminster. 
May is trying to flog “legally binding assurances” as a way of distracting you from the simple fact that the entire #WithdrawalAgreement is intact and there has been no change to the backstop in that treaty. She’s desperate to destroy Brexit. Today is the moment of truth. 
Scots prefer independence to no-deal Brexit or May’s plan | Scotland | The Times  
May’s #Brexit  “deal” - which has changed not a jot despite weeks of pretence - remains a thoroughly bad deal for Scotland, devastating our labour market, placing us at a competitive disadvantage, ignoring our vote to stay in the #EU & refusing to allow the people to be heard. 
Here's today's front page, as a new poll reveals Scots back independence over BOTH May's deal and a no-deal Brexit  
Anyone who thinks Scottish indy would be harder than brexit with this Tory mob is having a laugh. There isn't a more inept negotiating partner on the planet than the current UK govt. We could keep the £ and the cabinet personally carrying the nukes down the road by tea time. 
.@DouglasCarswell: We have a former PM, who has clearly never reconciled himself to the referendum result, doing his best to thwart itBlairs behaving like an c.18th courtier advising a French ruler, it wasn’t a happy precedent for king or courtier alike.. 
There are thousands of small-business owners all over the country losing sleep because Brexit could put them out of business later this month.  
When the President of the European Commission tells us "Brexit may not happen" it's time for all of us to double-down on pressuring our MPs.  
Juncker makes clear “this is it”. “There will be no further interpretations of interpretations or reassurances on reassurances” Says it’s this deal or maybe No Brexit at all > Clear message to Brexiteers: there’ll be no more concessions at March 21 EUCO Will they buy it? 4/ 
A sobering thought. Already over 280,000 jobs lost to Brexit, £900 billion removed from the UK economy to the EU. We havent left the Brexit starting blocks yet. 
Hope Something Good happens today...#space for #progress #Brexit  
Leaving aside the tiny codpiece, the most interesting thing here is confirmation that the EU is ready to agree an extension and that the alternative to this deal is no Brexit.  
Spot on Dom! #Brexshit #Brexit #BrexitVote 
As #Dispatches reveals Jacob Rees Mogg may have made £7m since 2016 referendum, we might consider why he's so keen on the the economic chaos caused by Brexit. Could it be to do with a book written by his dad? And if there's blood on the streets...it will only affect poor people.  
Today I'm introducing the Davis amendment. If the EU won't agree to our terms, the UK will make an unilateral declaration that we will have the exact same benefits post Brexit.#Simples 
Brexit will have to be delayed even if the PM's deal goes through, says former attorney general Dominic Grieve. "There is no possibility of leaving on 29 March with the time frame we have for legislation which has got to follow" #r4today 
PM brings back the same old deal, with the same old flaws making us a rule taker with no say; the same old pointless Brexit. May does not speak for the people. Parliament must today speak for Britain and throw it out. 
Under the Tories, the great project of Brexit has been reduced to a couple of sheets of flimflam cobbled together the night before and then with the bellows put under it by pliant media. What a bunch. 
Britain's best deal remains to find ways to defeat "Brexit", holding a second referendum and let wisdom & world view of London prevail over narrow minded "northern villagers"   via @GVS_News 
Nothing has changed. This is the same bad deal Whichever way we voted, we didn't vote for Theresa May's bad #Brexit deal. MPs must reject it today  
"The proper thing to do is to put it back to the public in a people's vote, in a second referendum"Former Attorney General Dominic Grieve says he'll vote against the PM's latest #Brexit deal  
Here is your political day: - 9.30am Cabinet - 11.15am Barclay at Brexit select cttee- Early PM May opens MV#2 debate (could be UQ on Cox advice first - all eyes on its publication this am)- 7pm voting starts@KayBurley on Green from 2pm & special prog on @skynews from 6pm 
Shadow #Brexit secretary @Keir_Starmer says the bulk of @Theresa_May's Brexit documents are "unchanged". It's after the PM said she's secured 'legally binding' changes to the Irish backstop in her agreement. Follow live updates:  
BREAKING: DUE TO SPELLING ERROR, DURING LAST-DITCH BREXIT TALKS THERESA MAY PULLS RABBI FROM A HAT.LABOUR YET TO COMMENT. 
Good news last night: @theresa_may has negotiated additional legal reassurances, which cover issues MPs had raised. This is a good deal for Britain, it delivers on the referendum & I hope that all colleagues will vote for it. #BackTheDeal 
Two years and nine months after the Brexit referendum, the endgame begins with a series of votes, the first to be held no later than March 12th. Here's a handy visual guide to understand exactly what might happen.  
With or without #TheresaMay ‘s deal, #Brexit is catastrophic for British #Manufacturing, industry and agriculture 
It’s not just the #BackStop We oppose Govt’s #Brexit WithdrawalAgreement it will make our country poorer (on the Govts own analysis) & it fails to deliver the promised trade deal which means more uncertainty for British business & more years of arguments & chaos  @TheIndGroup 
Based on opinion polls, @theresa_may's Brexit deal would not be approved by the public. So why should it be approved by public servants? 
Deal or No Deal we will be discussing Brexit for years to come. If Deal passes, another ticking clock starts on the 29th of March, because the deal on the table settles nothing about our future relationship with the EU.  
Failure to deliver Brexit would consign the Conservative Party to the dustbin of history - Cllr Roger Patterson  
For the last two years I have been working on a project that deals with the heaviness I feel about Britain leaving Europe, it’s called The Island. I am going to be sharing images from the series over the coming weeks. #brexit #theisland #photooftheday 
Explained to @LBC We now await legal advice of Attorney General. In addition ERG have set up panel of 8 MPs who are lawyers/barristers and they will give us advice later today whether or not these changes are legally sufficient to enable us to support them. #Brexit 
Since her Brexit deal was so overwhelmingly rejected, the Prime Minister has recklessly run down the clock, failed to effectively negotiate with the EU and refused to find common ground for a deal Parliament could support.That’s why MPs must reject this deal today. 
Theresa May was right.Scotland doesn't want another  independence referendum for at least 5 years.  
New poll results: Only 12% of adults think Theresa May's deal honours the referendum result, compared to 58% who claim it does not.Meanwhile, 82% of Conservative voters are opposed to a 2nd Referendum.#StandUp4Brexit 
And so, in the clear light of day, we can be certain of the following;1. Not one word of the #WithdrawalAgreement has been changed. 2. The Backstop is intact. 3. All May has achieved is hollow words, more tortured ambiguity and her Deal MUST be voted down today to save Brexit. 
If MPs vote down the Brexit deal, the only option for a serious country is to leave without an agreement, writes George Eustice MP 
This really is the biggest of days in Parliament as May brings back her Brexit deal after a last-minute dash to Strasbourg. Plenty of documentation pub’d late last night. But only one thing really matters: are the legal assurances enough convince DUP/Tories to back her deal? 1/ 
If you want Parliament and the leaderships of the established parties to stop the dither and delay and to hold a #PeoplesVote giving you the final say on #Brexit, pls sign our petition here  
And this is why I despise the Tories.The money for schools, police etc is there, and always has been.This rotten PM is now holding it back as blackmail for her rotten Brexit deal to be approved.#GTTO #JC4PM2019  
Anyway amidst all the doom and gloom some really good news!Jacob Rees-Mogg's Somerset Capital Management fund has earned him around £7 million since Brexit!Hurrah. Although we don't know exactly how much because he's too bashful (checks notes) er not obliged to say.  
I wonder if Theresa May “doesn’t doubt the sincerity” of the views of those who will not back a “Brexit deal” when it has been proven that the Brexit referendum was corrupt. With Police & NCA investigations ongoing, this farce should not be going ahead. #BrexitDeal 
MPs be warned: a bad deal or delaying Brexit would destroy voters’ faith in mainstream politics, writes Greig Baker  
Legally blinding Tories profiting from all our misery’s, misery’s they created,Brexit Austerity collapsed NHS, Debt, Windrush, social care crisis, communities broken and shut down, there is No Future with these Basketcase Tories  
The explicit permission of 27 individual member states in a unified decision to agree let us go. My vote hangs on how much power has been returned to our hands in order to do our duty in recognising and executing the referendum result 
Labour have refused to back Theresa May's "improved" Brexit deal. All eyes now on the DUP... 
Word of the (Brexit) day: “Zugzwang” - literally “compulsion to move” (German); a chess term for a situation where one is forced by the rules of the game to make a move, but all possible moves are disadvantageous. Sometimes yelled by opponents in an outburst of unseemly triumph.  
Failure to deliver Brexit would consign the Conservative Party to the dustbin of history, writes Cllr Roger Patterson  
#Brexit process so far....  
Ah, I see. The Prime Minister’s #Brexit strategy is to leave everything until exactly one minute before midnight.The Doctor Faustus plan. 
This evening I met my Nordic, Baltic & Dutch Finance Minister colleagues. Wide ranging discussion from #Brexit to future of EMU. These regular meetings so helpful for working with colleagues across  
The Marriage Counsellor#Cartoon: @theheraldsun #Brexit#UnitedKingdom #TheresaMay #PrimeMinister #UK #Europe #EU #England #BrexitVote @cartoonmovement @Cartoonmuseumuk @procartoonists @CartoonStock @IlloRoom 
Tories will reap the Brexit whirlwind  @unherd 
BREAKING: According to financial reports disclosed by Elections BC, the NDP and their allies outspent the BC Liberals by almost 4 to 1 in the failed referendum on proportional representation. #bcpoli 
UK PM Theresa May secured changes to the Brexit agreement with the EU that won't alter the terms of the withdrawal, but offers legal assurances to back it up  
To put it simply - Theresa May has failed yet again. For Conservatives to mention, 'ensuing chaos' in the event of a vote against the WA tomorrow is absurd. Brexit's last name is Chaos. What a disaster. Run Scotland run. 
Who is to save Britain from the Tories - a party in thrall to narrow economic nationalists, wild free marketeers, ideologues and hucksters? Killer column from the FT’s Robert Shrimsley. Brexit backstop could save Britain from the Conservatives via @FT 
Revoke Article 50. A fraudulent, non binding referendum is being perpetrated on Scotland, NI &  the rest of the intelligent, more informed now people in England/ Wales. This is not democracy, this is no union, it’s a Tory farce. #StopBrexit 
Dave Brown on #JeanClaudeJuncker #TheresaMay #Strasbourg #BrexitDeal #BrexitShambles #Brexit #Tories #BrexitShamble #BrexitShambles #Brexit #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #beherenow - political cartoon gallery in London  
Good stuff. #peoplesvote is cleanest and most democratic route through Brexit. Time to vote on this in Parliament.  
Now ⁦@JunckerEU⁩ ⁦@MichelBarnier⁩ briefing ⁦@Europarl_EN⁩ #Brexit Steering Group on agreement with ⁦@theresa_may⁩. ⁦@guyverhofstadt⁩ ⁦@ElmarBrok_MEP⁩ ⁦@gualtierieurope⁩ ⁦@danutahuebner⁩ ⁦@ph_lamberts⁩ ⁦@GabiZimmerMEP⁩ 
Juncker tweeted 'It's this deal or Brexit may not happen at all'Who the fuck does he think he is to decide.Didn't we vote to leave the EU not let the fucking EU decide how and if we fucking leave.They take the fucking piss and May let's them  
Brilliant #brexit  
Theresa May's new and improved Brexit deal@iresimpsonsfans @LADFLEG 
"Let us be crystal clear about the choice, it is this deal, or Brexit might not happen at all," EU Commission chief Jean-Claude Juncker says  
Deeply worrying development. The UK government has a horrendous track record of upholding commitments under the Good Friday Agreement. Allowing a unilateral exit from the backstop in the hopes the UK will suddenly uphold it's obligations does not instill much hope #Brexit  
It is exactly the same deal that was rejected in January. Not a single word of the Withdrawal Agreement has changed. Its not even a deal, its an agreement to a blindfold brexit, we leave but have no idea where we're going. MPs should "hold their nerve" and reject it. 
The primary purpose of the EU is to maintain peace. The Good Friday Agreement is part of the EU peace dividend. But for Raab the EU, the Good Friday Agreement and peace in Ireland are just obstacles in the way of a #Brexit tax haven for the rich.  
British Prime Minister Theresa May still hopes to secure changes from the EU that can win U.K. lawmakers' backing for her Brexit deal, despite a lack of progress in last-minute talks.  
Newspaper headlines: 'May of reckoning' for PM's Brexit deal  
The Speaker has announced he will allow manuscript amendments to the Government’s Brexit deal motion until 10.30am tomorrow in advance of the Commons sitting at 11.30am, with him announcing his amendment choices when the debate begins (around 12.30pm if no urgent questions etc) 
I'm actually sick of seeing polls asking who the worst PM is - right now, the only thing that matters is STOPPING the shitshow that is #Brexit. We can argue about who is most to blame afterwards, STOP WASTING TIME FFS!!! #StopBrexitSaveBritain #RevokeRemainRebuild 
Theresa May wants MPs to vote again tomorrow on something they overwhelmingly said no to a few weeks ago, but #nothingHasChangedOn the other hand, years after a narrow referendum win based on false premises, the public are told the result is immovable. 
Theresa May is attempting to put lipstick on a pig. Not only is it still a pig but that lipstick is easily wiped off.  Certain the DUP & ERG won’t be duped by it.  #Brexit @eastantrimmp @NigelDoddsDUP @DUPleader @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @SteveBakerHW 
A - It's not a deal. It's a withdrawal agreement. We're years away from any deal. B - It's not improved. Nothing has changed. C - 37% of the British people, three years ago in a corrupt foreign influenced  referendum. D - No one voted for this. E - You're completely barking! 
Theresa mays statement in full from strasbourg, #bbcnews #skynews #r4today #Brexit #brexitdeal #BrexitShambles @theresa_may #skypapers #NoDealBrexit #brexitvote #PeoplesVote 
The photo in the brochure was a Maserati.We delivered a Trabant, which fully honours the British people's wishes expressed in the 'Buy Car: Yᴇs/Nᴏ' referendum.And yes, the PM has now polished it. 
Dublin bound tomorrow morning. #Seanad has the small matter of the Brexit Omnibus Bill up on Tuesday & Wednesday. Oíche Mhaith over there @M_AndersonSF  
Oh please - no Brexit at all and the country would be booming! Huge relief for millions. A brighter future. Let;s get on with it! 
SMR: @Jacob_Rees_Mogg Don't you think your constituents deserve to know just how you've used their votes to profit from #Brexit to the tune of £7,000,000?#DispatchesHave you no shame? Not even just a little bit? @Somerset4Europe 
Och, ochón agus ochón ó, and we ruined entirely without even a twisht of thatch or page of a backstop above us to keep the cruel cold Brexit from the children and they destroyed entirely with it, the sorrow and the cruel hard pity of the grief of it all... 
“The claims that British trade with the Commonwealth can make up for leaving the EU is “the nuttiest of the many nutty arguments” advanced by Brexit supporters and “utter bollocks”, former Australian prime minister Kevin Rudd has said” 
Q. For the umpteenth time:  How can there be No Brexit when leaving on the 29th March is enshrined in law ? Explanation please.  
Good night tweethearts. Morgen verder #brexit  
If Brexit were to happen, it would negatively affect fucking roasters like this.The. Fucking. State.  
2/3rds of my business is export. The last 6 months has since business with EU evapourate. Anything to do with Brexit ? We’re already seen as being out of EU and problems to do business with. I can see it from the EU Sales Returns I do every 3 mo this. It’s collapsed. 
UK followers - do you back May's #Brexit deal? 
It has never been just about Ireland. This seems to have been lost in commentary on the clusterfuck that Westminster has made of Brexit. The whole essence of the EU is the single market.  They CANNOT allow uncontrolled non-compliant goods access via NI 
#Brexit: We have done everything possible to reassure the United Kingdom. We look forward to a positive vote in the Commons. I hope common sense will prevail.   
Let’s remember MP’s be will be given just hours to assess legal changes to May’s deal before voting on it. In a simple Court case, affecting a single individual, a judge would ensure he/she had weeks to consider new evidence. Brexit will affect 65 million people and generations! 
If it comes to a rethink and a 2nd referendum I have just the person to put the Remain case. Point by point she strongly and clearly shows the advantages of EU membership.   
European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker warns “it is this deal, or #Brexit may not happen at all”  
If they pass her deal we will be hearing of nothing but Brexit for years.  
What if the real Brexit was the convoluted legal framework we constructed along the way? (Incidentally, WTO-only folks, the legal framework of the WTO is even more convoluted). 
Keir Starmer....in a different league..... 
“Keir Starmer savages Theresa May's new Brexit 'deal' in fiery Commons statement” 
Negotiating documents on Article 50 negotiations with the United Kingdom:  #Brexit 
Parliament asked us to secure legal changes to provide reassurance around the backstop. PM has delivered on that. Time to back the deal and deliver an orderly Brexit. 
They're doing the best to paint this as a success, but in reality the "changes" to this deal effectively amount to a used car salesman once again attempting to flog you a decripit, burnt out Volkswagen with no wheels - only this time he's included a pair of furry dice.#Brexit 
Who are you @JunckerEU to tell us it is your vassal state deal or no Brexit - the reason we voted leave is so arrogant a**holes like you cannot tell us what to do! The backstop was only ONE of the problems in your DIKTAT so #NoDeal 
President @JunckerEU following meeting with Prime Minister @theresa_may: "We agreed on a joint legally binding instrument relating to Withdrawal Agreement. It is this deal or #Brexit might not happen at all. Let now bring UK's withdrawal to an orderly end. We owe it to history"  
So basically in Strasbourg @theresa_may says...#Brexit #BrexitCrisis #BrexitShambles #BrexitDeal 
Made point in tonight's Brexit Statement that the fundamental problem with the British Governments Brexit policy is that it would mean leaving the EU with no idea about the detail of the future relationship. A blind Brexit is deeply irresponsible. 
“Theresa May’s Brexit plan changes nothing for Scotland. It is the same disastrous deal that ignores the people of Scotland’s overwhelming vote for remain, and will cost jobs and living standards”SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP responds to Theresa May’s Brexit statement  
Brexit_agreement_final_final2_final2-revised_final3_definitely-final3_final4-this-is-the-deal.docx  
This is how Theresa May hopes Brexiteers see her 'new' Brexit deal.  
Theresa May's "breakthrough" changes nothing. The withdrawal agreement still leaves us economically damaged, less sovereign, and with no clarity about our future relationship. Years more of negotiations will follow.The only way to end the Brexit farce is to Remain. 
The Govt’s #Brexit fudge fools nobody. They can’t reconcile the irreconcilable objectives of ditching Single Market & Customs Union...while keeping Irish border open & frictionless.That’s why @TheIndGroup have tabled Amendment B for a #PeoplesVote for Tuesday’s debate here  
Everyone wondering if Geoffrey Cox will give legal backing to May’s reheated Brexit dogs dinnerSPOILER ALERT: he will 
"The whole approach has been misguided and the fault lies squarely at the Prime Minister's door."Shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer reacts to the #Brexit developments.Sky News has the latest:  
Keir Starmer savages Theresa May's new Brexit deal in fiery Commons statementLabour Shadow Brexit Secretary swept into full lawyer mode for a damning statement shooting down the Prime Minister's new  
Comedy ending, by the way, is that Article 50 extension is now contingent on participation in the EU elections (Juncker pretty much just said that). Which is party time for the far-right and signs the death warrant for Europe. So, the Brexit outcome is now no deal or even worse. 
#BREAKING UK opposition Labour party comes out against Brexit deal  
15 mins to vote kill brexit and revoke A50. Take thirty years for UK to recover from brexit if YOU ALL LET IT HAPPEN and it'll take a lifetime to get public to trust you with country again. @vincecable @UKLabour @Keir_Starmer @ChukaUmunna @CarolineLucas @Andrew_Adonis @theSNP 
Brexit: Keir Starmer savages Theresa May's new 'deal' in fiery Commons statement  
Everyone who says Corbyn "facilitating Brexit"? Within seconds of May and Juncker face saving presser, Corbyn issues this:  
Wrong. It’s either this pathetic apology of a “deal” or WTO Brexit on March 29th. Are you feeling lucky, Juncker?  
Former Australian PM calls Brexit trade plan ‘utter bollocks’  
Government that denies its electorate a second vote is threatening a third vote on its Brexit deal if parliament rejects it a second time. We are ruled by hucksters and hypocrites. 
Philip Lee MP wants a second referendum with May’s deal and Remain on the ballot paper.  So the 17.4 million voters who won the 2016 referendum are to be totally disenfranchised? 
Has a single word of the withdrawal agreement changed? @Stone_SkyNews asks the prime minister about what has been decided. For the latest on #Brexit, go here:  
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn says Parliament must reject Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal tomorrow 
If you're just catching up with the news, the outcome of those last minute intricate high-stakes negotiations to change the Brexit deal is explained in this detailed graphic  
“The public voted for Brexit, the biggest democratic mandate in British history. If we don’t leave what does that say about British democracy” – Brexit campaigner Suzanne Evans, adding that “the world looks up to us”@SuzanneEvans1  | #newsnight 
Just read these. Two points.1. This is the fudgiest fudge that ever fudged. It even has every negotiators favorite punchline commitment: "redoubling effort" if things get stuck. 2. If the UK wants Brexit it should absolutely accept this because No-Deal would be a nightmare.  
Yeah, sorry. There’s nothing in here. It just restates the existing withdrawal agreement. It even references specific paragraphs when discussing “unilateral” withdrawal from backstop. #Brexit  
"If we ever have to use that insurance policy it cannot become permanent - it is not the template for our future relationship"Theresa May explains details of changes she has agreed with the EU over the Northern Ireland backstop Latest #Brexit updates:  
Fabulous. Could the majority of us here in the UK choose #Brexit not happening at all. Theresa May doesn’t speak for us. In fact we’ve been invisible for over two years. Thanks so much #RevokeA50 #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Detestable. Everything she says is detestable, false, cheap and low. This ignoble rubbish condemns her out of her own mouth, and the Brexit cabal she serves.  
Q.- Have you secured time limit to backstop or unilateral exit mechanism?PM - What we've secured is legally binding changes.  #Brexit  
I choose Brexit not happening at all - & history chooses that too!  
Varadkar reacts to Theresa May thinking she’s negotiated a new deal ....  #Strasbourg #brexit  
I hope Theresa May is voted into oblivion tomorrow.She cares nothing for this country, nothing for the Union, and nothing for the 66 million of us who will suffer from Brexit.EVERYONE will suffer.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Ha who do you think youre kidding.  The UK en masse wont fall for this Remainers Brexit youve cooked up with our pro EU politicians & EX politicians.  Sleep well Mr Juncker. Tomorrow the UK will be sending you a v clear message to stick your ‘deal’ where the sun doesnt shine  
Strong EU spin—clear they are trying help May get the deal through.Problem according to QC I’ve spoken to, is that it’s next to impossible to prove a breach by the EU which is what’s required for unilateral action by the UK.Strongly suspect this will unravel tomorrow. #Brexit  
Majority of voters do not think PM's deal delivers the type of Brexit people voted for, YouGov poll reveals  via @Telegraph 
"In politics sometimes you get a second chance. It is what we do with this  that counts, because there will be no third chance"EC President Jean-Claude Juncker says an instrument for the NI backstop has been agreed onLatest #Brexit updates:  
Here’s the new legally-binding instrument just agreed by ⁦⁦@theresa_may⁩ & ⁦@JunckerEU⁩. Let the analysis begin. #Brexit  
Theresa May says she has secured legally binding agreements to ensure the backstop is not permanent. Follow #Brexit live on Sky:  
PRO TIP: if you are bored of Brexit, WHY NOT start reading "WA" like Waluigi's "waaaah"? 
We are incredibly disappointed that tonight students voted against a motion to combat antisemitism. It will now be sent to campus wide referendum. Jewish students have a right to feel safe.  
T May's new Brexit deal:- A temporary backstop without a set time limit- Alternative arrangements that don't exist yet- A unilateral UK declaration that does not bind the EUIs this really going to be enough tomorrow... 
A welcome step that the Malthouse Compromise Alternative Arrangements are a key part of tonight’s statement on changes to the #Brexit Withdrawal Agreement 
When Phil Mitchell met Theresa May: @Coldwar_Steve and his Brexit montages 
If there's any silver lining to Brexit, it's that the words "Arlene Foster, First Minister of Nowhere" will forever be enshrined in the Hansard transcripts of Parliamentary debate. 
JUNCKER SAYS `THERE WILL BE NO NEW NEGOTIATIONS' ON BREXIT 
Sorry to split hairs but the referendum result was not an instruction, it was advice. The Brexit decision was parliament’s. (For the umpteenth time) 
Apparently, if they stop Brexit we'll "lose trust" in the politicians.What fucking trust?  
As May fudges some phantom wording to try and get her deal through, we should remind ourselves that Brexit will finally allow us to replace the trade with the EU with the Commonwealth and oh...  
“Even if this deal is voted down I would be astonished if that meant no Brexit” – ERG chairman Jacob Rees-Mogg, adding “we need to worry about whether this is a satisfactory deal”@Jacob_Rees_Mogg | @maitlis | #newsnight 
#Brexit #EU WTF?HOW F*CKING DARE YOU, JUNCKER......HOW DARE YOU TELL US:'Vote for the deal, or you will get no brexit at all'WHO DOES HE THINK HE IS?@theresa_may - you are a national EMBARRASSMENTYou sit there whilst he lectures OUR COUNTRYSHAME ON YOU#resign 
Hmm. The new legally-binding joint instrument described by @theresa_may sure sounds like the existing legally-binding withdrawal agreement. #Brexit 
Pretty sure she should be smiling if she had done well....this face says "i'm buggered"#Brexit #Strasbourg 
Juncker says it is this deal or #Brexit may not happen at all."There will be no third chance," he says.Follow live here:  
This is a highly significant and positive move from the EU and the Republic of Ireland - and it gives us now the best hope of a pragmatic and clear Brexit. Rejecting it will simply deepen risk and uncertainty.  
Juncker “It is this deal or BREXIT MIGHT NOT HAPPEN AT ALL...”. Whaaaatt??? How dare he??????   
Watching Juncker slip effortlessly from English to German to French in his address while May fiddles with her translator earpiece is just so ... #Brexit 
If deal not ratified tomorrow, it’s no deal or no Brexit. EU is shutting up shop from tonight. 
Midnight flits to Strasbourg and desperate late night Commons statements underline the chaos into which Project Brexit has descended. Ministers cannot negotiate a better deal than being in the EU, because the UK is stronger inside as a full member. #PeoplesVote 
You know it's a beautifully choreographed,  pre-planned last minute amendment to the deal when, less than 24 hours before the vote, Juncker threatens the UK that if we don't accept this deal there is no other.#Brexit 
Juncker goes on to tell MPs that if they choose not to vote for the Withdrawl Agreement, Brexit ‘might not happen at all’ 
“It is this deal, or Brexit may not happen at all” says a man we did not elect.  
There will be “no third chance” says @JunckerEU. MPs must back reworked deal tomorrow or “there may be no Brexit” 
.@JunckerEU @theresa_may #Brexit “There will be no third chance. There will be no further interpretations of the interpretations; no further assurances of the re-assurances – if the meaningful vote tomorrow fails.” 
Jean-Claude Juncker says it was a sad day when Britain  decided to leave the EU.He says the deal has been on the table for 105 days,Follow #Brexit live here:  
Juncker: It is this deal, or Brexit might not happen at all. Members of the HoC have a deep responsibility and a solemn choice to make 
After three years of this grotesque pantomime, our politicians are still floundering over Brexit and therefore, as always, resorting to their grubby and desperate tactics to try and deceive us. Right everyone, sod this for a game of soldiers...let’s all just go to the pub. 
Juncker letter says that Varadkar willing to accept the 'legal instrument' to clarify the backstop in order to get a deal done  - Juncker goes on to say, 'it is this deal or brexit may not happen at all' 
Latest UK Brexit fantasy punctured   
JUNCKER: 'IT IS THIS DEAL, OR BREXIT MAY NOT HAPPEN AT ALL' 
Hard to know tonight if this will all unravel tomorrow, or if, as I have long feared, that this will be enough of a fig leaf for the DUP, most of the ERG and some Labour MPs to vote for the Brexit Deal. And thus condemn Britain to a poorer, weaker and more isolated future. 
The Government had a Cobra meeting about their self inflicted political crisis. What an absolute omnishambolic train wreck of a dog’s breakfast#Brexit  
Our agreement provides meaningful clarifications & legal guarantees to the Withdrawal Agreement & #backstop. The choice is clear: it is this deal, or #Brexit may not happen at all. Let’s bring the UK’s withdrawal to an orderly end. We owe it to history.  
For the purpose of full disclosure I'm happy to confess that I've not earned £7 million from funds since Brexit. Why can't Jacob? 
Tomorrow's front page: A majority of Scots is ready to back independence over any type of Brexit  + Commons set for meaningful vote after May's latest fudge  
WATCH LIVE: PM @Theresa_May and @JunckerEU provide an update on Brexit in Strasbourg  
May’s so-called ‘breakthrough’ this evening won’t save a single job from her bad Brexit deal. It won’t stop the £40bn a year hit to public finances by 2033. It won’t stop UK’s workers’ rights being eroded. It won’t tackle the underlying reasons why many voted to leave. Hopeless. 
So the government is happy to write a blank cheque for Brexit. But let's cut the education budget to fund it. Stick that on the bus.  
As is so often the case with the Brexit story, a big dramatic statement is made followed by it quickly unravelling under scrutiny in Parliament. 
Brexit News: Furious Britons demand MPs respect Brexit vote and UK leaves EU NOW | UK | News |  
There are lots of annoying people in Brexit, but tonight none more so than Labour Remainers pretending they were *really* hoping that the PM would come back with something that meant they would vote for this, or any, deal 
Nigel Dodds pours cold water on the excitement around the ‘deal’, asking for detail of negotiations that are ongoing. Adopts the “let’s wait and see the detail” approach. Others in DUP have already dismissed it- and quite rightly so #Brexit 
Big night of Brexit news. Find out what has changed, if anything, on @BBCBreakfast from 6am tomorrow. @louiseminchin is in Salford and I’m live from Westminster with a big coat #BBCbreakfast 
We owe it to the public to deliver Brexit, and deliver it on time. That’s why I’ll be backing the improved Brexit deal. 
"I didn't hear the words coming from the dispatch box 'the withdrawal agreement is being changed''Shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer responds to #Brexit deal changes 
BREAKING: British government says it has secured "legally binding changes" from the European Union that could lessen opposition to Brexit deal in Parliament.  
#BREAKINGView from Dublin:   1. Withdrawal Agreement is unchanged  2. Joint statement is a legal interpretations of what’s in the WA (agreed by both sides)   3.  Unilateral statement  is UK talking to themselves.   Mood in Gov Buildings described as “calm”. #Brexit 
Just bear in mind, that whatever you hear in the next hour, and whatever reassurances claimed or offered: the #Brexit Withdrawal Agreement has not been re-opened and no-one Theresa May met with tonight has the authority to re-open it. 
BREXIT CRISIS: Former Australian PM calls Brexit trade plan ‘utter bollocks’ /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
Even if tonight changes anything (which is already in doubt) Brexit never was just about the backstop. This is a truly bad deal. Full stop. 
I fully expect that the changes the government has achieved to the Brexit agreement are “legally binding” in the same way as reserving a hotel sun-lounger with a towel is legally binding.  
WATCH IT ALL HERE ALL OF THE TIME FOREVER! IT WILL NEVER STOP! THE BREXIT IS OFFICIALLY GOING ON FOREVER! IT WILL NEVER BE FINALLY DECIDED WHO HAS WON THE BREXIT! THERE IS STILL FOREVER TO DISCUSS FOR AND FOREVER TO DISCUSS IT IN!  
It might be a dire/boring situation, and generally politics can go and get stuffed, but I burst out laughing at this... #brexit  
Does Future Britain not sound a little Britain First to you? What does future Britain look like, it’ll be a good bit smaller for a start cos we’ll be off shortly, but who is welcome, what’s their plans for the post Brexit apocalypse that they’ve created?  
Regardless of May’s apparent “legally binding” changes to the backstop, her deal fails to allow true regulatory divergence. I iterate, what is the point of May’s Brexit if we still can’t control our laws? 
It is still shocking to hear the Tories proudly announcing the end of Freedom of Movement. How can anyone be proud to rob their fellow British citizens of the right to live work and study in 30 countries? How can that be patriotic?#PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
There’s no legally binding changes that can make Brexit good for Britain. Nobody voted to be poorer, have falling food standards, worse trade deals, less NHS funding. Enough is enough, let the people decide!#PeoplesVote #ExitFromBrexit 
So Sir Peter Bottomless having loudly heckled his way through @Keir_Starmer excellent dissection of the Govt #Brexit statement, is now asleep on the Tory backbenches 
European Parliament president Antonio Tajani: "The example of the British will serve as a deterrent."Openly admitting they are punishing us to prevent other countries who may try to leave.This is NOT how a democratic institution behaves.#Brexit 
“The claims that British trade with the Commonwealth can make up for leaving the EU is “the nuttiest of the many nutty arguments” advanced by Brexit supporters and “utter bollocks”, the former Australian prime minister Kevin Rudd has said.”  
Former Australian PM Kevin Rudd (Dec 2017):  "The bottom line is that the Brexit decision by Britain is dumb. People seem to think that Australia is somehow standing in the streets applauding, waiting for Britain to 'come home'. That's just nonsense. Your future lies in Europe."  
Really excited that another thing that doesn't quite mean anything has not quite happened thereby not exactly changing the situation regarding what might happen with Brexit but probably won't. 
The only difference to the Brexit Agreement that even David Lidington is claiming, is that the future deal doesn't have to copy the backstop.THAT CHANGES NOTHING!The Backstop was modelled on protecting the Good Friday Agreement. So must ANY future UK-EU deal!#meaningfulvote 
A useful night to remember the big picture folks: there’s no good brexit and no amount of last minute late night process story dramas can disguise that fact. This ‘deal’ and ancillary nonsenses should be rejected and Article 50 revoked. Goodnight. 
It would seem that Theresa May and her conservative government are willing to lose Northern Ireland to secure a Brexit that enriches the entitled few.  #Strasbourg 
Brexit - Cabinet"The whole cabinet is supporting these improvements" - Lidington -- Cox therefore supports ... but what will his legal advice say? 
 There will be a joint press conference by @JunckerEU and @theresa_may in next few mins in @Europarl_EN, Strasbourg #Brexit Follow live here  
It appears that the legal significance of today‘s #Brexit excitement is negligible. Its political significance remains to be established. Belief in it being legally binding seemingly more relevant than it actually being legaly binding. Good night.  
Brilliant on the hoof  dissection & demolition of tonight’s #brexit “agreement” by @Keir_Starmer in the Commons just now: “nothing has changed”. #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote 
Desperate late night Commons statements underline the chaos into which Project Brexit has descended.It's an absolute mess. Its time to end the madness and give the people the final say with the option to stay in the EU 
Only question worth asking to the Government on the 'revised' Brexit deal is this - what power does it give to the UK Government that would not have been available under the original agreement? As earlier, vote for a treaty on merit not short term spin. 
.@Keir_Starmer showing his strengths here. Reacting without warning to arguably one of the most legally complex and jargon-laden govt statements you’ll ever hear (because Brexit is complex), and he’s seen the holes in it immediately. 
Irony is dead. Tory Ministers are still using the phrase ‘taking back control’ to describe their handling of this Brexit debacle. 18 days to go. And no idea where. Britain is being failed by its Government. 
This is fair.  Accept a deal that will deliver Brexit, but will damage UK economy and lock us for years into an asymmetric negotiation; or precipitate a political and (under some scenarios) economic crisis, with the possibility of both worse and better outcomes.  
the new Brexit deal vs the old Brexit deal  
It’s pretty lame for the Tory benches to slag off opposition spokespersons forced to respond to a vague on the hoof statement not as yet backed up with the requisite paperwork #Brexit 
With eloquence, @Keir_Starmer is perfectly dissecting the Government’s mishandling of the Brexit negotiations. 
Imagine all the things we could do if we didn't have to focus on Brexit 
Brexit has made me realise that the English are far more arrogant than the Americans. English exceptionalism is really a bizarre thing to behold. 
David Liddington you utter #Brexit charlatan...we do not send 'vast sums of money to the EU.£8/9bn pa is a drop in the ocean compared with the £billions the UK will be losing directly & indirectly over the decades to come! And we always had Control of our Borders.How dare you! 
David Lidington talking misleading nonsense about "vast sums of money" being sent to the EU. The #Brexit economic slowdown has already cost the government budget vastly more money. This is a government of lies. #LeaveLies #PeoplesVote 
I will never forgive Brexit for making me fancy Keir Starmer. 
Meanwhile the Brexit parade continue their chants about being “anti-establishment” & “anti-elite” Jacob Rees-Mogg is here to help you make up your own mind.#Strasbourg #brexitdeal 
So homelessness tripling, teenagers being stabbed in the street, headteachers marching, people waiting longer in A&E wasn’t enough to bring out the magic money tree but passing May’s rubbish Brexit WA and saving her is?! This makes me feel sick. #BrexitCrisis 
With the clock ticking down to Brexit Day, here are my arguments in the London Guardian on why Britain should remain in the European Union. In contrast to Howard, Abbott and Downer cheering on the Brexiteers  - all to reconstitute a British imperial rump.   
PM has secured "legally binding" changes to Brexit deal, says Cabinet Office minister day ahead of MPs' vote  
. @M_AndersonSF Sinn Féin MEP Martina Anderson continues the diplomatic offensive in the EU Parliament Strasbourg as she hands out copies of 'Irish Unity the Solution' to the press corp who are assembled for Theresa May's press conference tonight. #Brexit  
MAJOR BREAKING: A judge in Barcelona is now investigating at least 37 Spanish riot police officers for their actions during the 2017 Catalan referendum in the city's polling stations in which 325 people were injured. 
Brexit - David Lidington statementTM has secured legally binding changes that strengthen and improve Withdrawal agreement and political declaration 
Nope. Brexit referendum was never that stylish to begin with. It was more like this.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg: The amount I receive is not for public disclosure.Dispatches: Rees-Mogg may have earned up to £7 million since the EU Referendum with profits increasing since the vote.Me: Now is this the penal servitude you were talking about Jacob? 
Did anyone watch Channel 4 Dispatches, featuring none other than Jacob Rees Mogg, member of ERG and 1 of the many Brexiters making millions at our expense through Brexit. Yet here we are, country being held at ransom again by these people. Where’s the honest reporting @bbclaurak 
Can somebody explain what’s happening in Brexit this evening, preferably in the form of a limerick? 
About to live tweet and comment on the Commons statement on Brexit 
10pm in the evening and we're just about to *start* a statement from the Government on #Brexit. 18 days out from the UK leaving the European Union and this is what it's come to. A shambolic way of doing things! 
The ERG know this is their maximum moment of leverage over Brexit. If they agree to May's plan, that's gone. 
Oh for the love of god THERE IS NO GOOD #BREXIT. So PLEASE Westminster. Stand up and be counted. Act in your country’s best interests and #RevokeA50. Now.MPs say they are ready to push May towards softer Brexit | Politics | The Guardian  
Tweeted by an actual MP.With this attitude it's no surprise that the Tories have run the Brexit negotitations, and with it the whole country, into the ground. #Brexit  
Theresa May has a plan to lure MPs into voting her Brexit Deal  
I suspect May knows that her crap brexit deal is going to be bounced out of parliament tomorrow which is why she has gone to Strasbourg. The only thing she has left now is to suspend our leaving of the EU and when she sees how easy it is it will be repeated often. Wake up people. 
Behold the real Metropolitan elites and guess what, they want Brexit because it will make them richer.  
This does not look encouraging.Earlier this evening. #Brexit?  
'We should be OUT!' Furious Britons demand MPs respect Brexit vote and UK leaves EU NOW. Those MP's who proved treacherous should be kicked out of the UK and Britain should leave with no further ado. If the Germans want a deal we'll be here for them.   
If we are going to interfere in Venezuela because of a government which does not honor its people or their social contract, we must be willing to go to war with the United Kingdom should they botch #Brexit. Or France for the Yellow Vests.Or are brown people less than? 
IDS on BBC close to “claiming” the amended deal - saying it now contains the alternative arrangements the ERG proposed. I think they’re about to pivot. Because they won, you understand. Not because their bluff was called and they’re now looking at losing Brexit altogether. 
This, from former Australian Prime Minister, @MrKRudd, on Brexit, is absolutely brilliant!  
Think the Commonwealth can save Brexit Britain? That’s utter delusion | Kevin Rudd  
The government is running down the #Brexit clock, whilst refusing MPs the chance to properly examine the legal advice, says @ChrisLeslieMP. Full exchange here:  
Truly award winning journalism from #Dispatches. Turns out Rees-Mogg is an over privileged posh elitist who may have made millions out of Brexit. Who knew?Now maybe they could look at #ToryRacism, the business affairs of Theresa May's husband, Britain's role in Yemen... 
#BrexitCatGIFs BONUS: Summary of the discussions between May and Juncker in Strasbourg this evening as they attempt to solve the #BrexitCrisisCheck out my summary of #Brexit in Cat GIFs at this thread:  
Some Australian straight talking here -Former Australian PM calls Brexit trade plan ‘utter bollocks’ | Australia news | The Guardian  
.@tconnellyRTE reports as British Prime Minister Theresa May is in Strasbourg for last-ditch talks over a Brexit deal  
View from Brussels/Strasbourg: this really is the EU’s “last shot” for a deal on Irish backstop/Brexit.  Juncker - so often derided in London - has reached out to May but is now “at his limits”.  Other EU leaders not hopeful 
It's not just Brexit that's changed since 2016. The country has!The 2 million new voters who've now turned 18 DEMAND A SAY NOW!- @Femi_Sorry 
Kevin Rudd on Brexit trade arguments:  “This is the nuttiest of the many nutty arguments that have emerged from the Land of Hope and Glory set now masquerading as the authentic standard-bearers of British patriotism. It’s utter bollocks."   
This is nothing less than political corruption. If the money is there, it should be spent irrespective of Brexit. If the money isn’t there, the Government is trying to bribe MPs with unfunded commitments. It’s banana republic behaviour.  
Whatever comes back it will not change the FACT that any #Brexit Deal/No Deal will be based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesDisenfranchisementRights Removed w/o ConsentThe Non-Binding Opinions of just 37% Voters/26.5% of the People.#RevokeA50 #Remain in Control in the EU! 
After checking in with contacts on both sides of the Channel, this is where we appear to be on those Brexit talks tonight:  
Just a quick reminder that every job lost as a result of #Brexit is the fault of #Leavers. 
Not true! The SNP was given a mandate for #ScotRef for "when the details of Brexit are better known." We now know the details. Stop repeating the edited narrative. #UseTheMandate 
Genuine question for Brexiters: What does "regaining our sovereignty" really mean? What will we be able to do after #Brexit that we can't do now? Just asking! 
Cabinet ministers ‘preparing to demand Theresa May resigns' in bid to save Brexit 
Brexit distraction.....  
You know if they "needed us more than we need them" Juncker would be running over to Downing Street every week. But that never happens. Does it. #Strasbourg #Brexit #BBCnews 
Opinion: Theresa May has lost control, and Brexit has lost its mandate  
If after watching #Dispatches tonight you still think the Eton educated, man of the people Brexit millionaire Jacob Rees-Mogg has your interest at heart, then you aren't just deluded your certifiable #RevokeArticle50 
Danish PM provides Brexit quote of the day, which sums up EU mood nicely.  
This is how the russians undermined British public opinion and politics.This is how our referendum was blighted in 2016.- our national security orgs know it- our police know it- our Courts declared it unlawful   and the referendum result unsafeWTF is wrong with our MPs? 
Am I the only person left who likes talking about Brexit? I think it's quite exciting (and frustrating at the same time considering May's WA)! 
This is the 'leaky whip' strategy by which the Labour leadership can claim to have backed a #PeoplesVote while quietly allowing a bunch of Labour MPs to stop it happening. Corbyn was never going to respect the Conference vote.#Brexit  
We don’t think a referendum on something so dangerous, ill defined and reckless was a good idea at all, David.  
When I was just a little boy I asked my mother “What will I be? Will I be famous? Will I be rich?” Here’s what she said to me.“Brexit” 
.@theresa_may has been in meeting with @JunckerEU for an hour and a quarter now - rather longer than had been planned for. The stage is set for a statement after the meeting... @10DowningStreet staff are here.... we wait... for a #Brexit breakthrough? Updates @SkyNews 
There's no sensible Brexit option that will get through parliament, it's time to revoke Article 50 and reconsider — Contradiction was baked into the Brexit result from the start. Now, its contradictions have proved irreconcilableBy @JolyonMaugham 
So what? Who cares?  Remainers Blair, Mandelson, Heseltine etc are multi-millionaires and then some.  Just more pathetic hypocritical MSM Remoaner drivel. It wasn’t  just millionaires who voted for Brexit - 17.4m (mostly non-milllionaire) ordinary people did.  
Theresa May’s Brexit Deal the PM goes for one big last vomit   
How can we possibly have another referendum before implementing the result of the first one? It would be the death of democracy in this country.  
Love @SteveBakerHW just listening to him on @SkyNews I know he will do the right thing for our country and wont be bamboozled into anything if it's not right for our country. The Brexit lawyers will go through the agreement with a fine tooth comb. #HerosOfBrexit 
Tommy Sheridan on RT tonight discussing Brexit, #indyref2 and the Hope Over Fear #Usethemandate rally on 24th March.@citizentommy 
2016: “We knew exactly what we were voting for!”2019: *PM pisses off to Strasbourg in the middle of the sodding night because the dopey fucking twats who knew exactly what they were voting for still can’t fucking agree on what Brexit looks like 17 days before it happens* 
Whatever is announced in Strasbourg tonight won't change the fundamental nature of the backstop, and won't address Tory MPs' actual concerns about it. But No.10 will be hoping it is enough to provide political cover for those who want to back the deal to avoid a second referendum 
“It is difficult to give a helping hand to people who stand with both hands in their pockets,” Danish Prime Minister @larsloekke says about the EU’s difficulties on trying to help the UK solving #Brexit #eudk 
It means UK taxpayers are getting shafted, & any chance of an actual Brexit on the 29th of March is less than none.  
Former Australian PM calls Brexit trade plan ‘utter bollocks’ #BrexitShambles #RevokeA50 #FBPE 
May might get a semantic change to an agreement she made so she can convince her own Attorney General to change his legal advice so she can convince her own party that they should support the first stage in Brexit happening. So it’s pretty exciting tonight. 
The Taoiseach had already started his trip go DC, and turned back to have a cabinet meeting, because of Brexit developments - said @rtenews just now on the main bulletin, if I heard correctly.So clearly significant. 
The next fifteen minutes will decide whether Theresa May has a face saving Brexit deal to dupe willing Tories... but it will not alter the fact she has no majority for the deal in the Commons. 
John Bercow has insisted the Commons will “not be messed around” by ministers over a crucial Brexit vote as MPs prepare for the showdown.  
This is the man behind Brexit, don’t forget his face when our country goes down the shitter pic.twitter.com/TiuJVlex0Z 
WATCH NOW on @Channel4+1 The Brexit Millionaires#Dispatches investigates how political and economic uncertainty since the 2016 EU Referendum has helped the rich get richer. 
It also time to have some clarity on the financial dealings of MPs who moved their money out of UK when the Brexit fiasco started. We cannot have MPs manipulating politics for personal financial gain! They are supposed to represent the electorate, not themselves, friends & family  
Who’s up for a Brexit marathon programme? What do you mean, No? Lock the doors, I’m doing FOUR hours. @bbc5live from 21.00 
It’s all kicking off soon. The latest #brexit developments on @bbc5live breakfast with me and @rachelburden from 6am. 
Brexit statement expected  in House of Commons around 10pm. 
Theresa May says she has reached an agreement with the EU on the backstop, except that she disagrees with the EU over what the agreement means. Could the Brexit farce get any more surreal? 
Heading off to @BBCNewsnight to discuss #Brexit and @theresa_may’s  leadership. So much to say! How long is the programme again?! 
Question for @UKLabour MPs thinking of voting for May’s deal: Apart from the marginal vote 3 years ago what is it about Brexit that thrills you, makes you convinced it’s absolutely the best thing for your country? Which Brexit promise do you believe? 
NEW - 'As these revelations surface, more and more parliamentarians are speaking out about the safety of the referendum result.' by @joelbaccas and @abcpoppins 
Brexit talks “deadlocked” day before vote in the British Parliament, the mood is “bleak” — EU says it is now up to MPs to decide next steps 
Please, please, PLEASE can we not do Brexit? PLEEEAAAASSSSE just make it stop now ok? Thanks  
Interesting from Channel 4 Dispatches that hedge fund multi-millionaire William Odey invested £600,000 in Leave campaign and made £200 million shorting the pound in the Brexit collapse - when will the people of Stoke, Sunderland, Grimsby etc wake up to what has been done to them? 
Gosh the death threats are being ramped up tonight! Here’s some advice for those who want me to change my mind on Brexit; threatening me is unlikely to change how I vote tomorrow . 
A short interpretation of Brexit  
It’s amazing that Mary who works in Sainsbury’s on the tills voted the same way as @BorisJohnson & yet she is still earning £9 per hour & he is now earning £100,000 per hour... Can you smell the bullshite yet ? #Dispatches #Brexit  Wake up Britain ffs 
#JacobReesMogg's financial affairs aren't 'private' if he stands to profit personally from a #BrexitCrisis he's inflamed & encouraged for 3 years. The people are quite entitled to know, given they don't even know if there will be food or medicine in 2 weeks#Dispatches #Brexit 
Opinion: Theresa May has lost control, and Brexit has lost its mandate  
I sense an apathy surrounding #brexit & an apathy surrounding this event, Indy wont be won sitting on our arses, time to rise & be a nation again... Please RT if your going or interested in going & RT if your not.. No that's not a mistake just RT the f**king thing #UseTheMandate 
As public servant @Jacob_Rees_Moggwon't even say how many millions he made this year - let alone how much he is profiting from Brexit - let's have a poll.RT If you think he is a Brexit profiteer LIKE if you think he gives a damn about poor people  
Corbyn and May our great wise leaders pose in front of  burning house  #brexit  
The rich didn't fund Brexit because they thought it would be good for Britain...it was because the chaos would help them make even more money. Brexit isn't about taking back control...it's about giving it away and this is just the beginning. #PeoplesVote 
It's worth looking at whether there is coordination, and also simply imagining what will happen in US should no-deal Brexit play out. Also notable that it coincides with Russia cutting off its domestic internet and Netanyahu election soon after. Many players having a big week... 
Jacob Rees-Mogg is not having a good day. Revelations that he trousered £7m since Brexit - and also this. Check out latest from @openDemocracy: 
Just watched Dispatches on the folk making money out of Brexit which is set to make the ordinary people of the UK. No wonder people don’t trust politicians. We are all tarred with the same brush yet who are the ones wheeling and dealing at our expense? Tories. Yet again. 
Former Minister George Eustice demands the Government encourages low skilled immigration post Brexit. Not a peep from him about maybe training the 800,000 NEETS in this country first? 
Former Australian PM calls Brexit trade plan ‘utter bollocks’  
Aimlessly wandering around the Westminster estate asking anyone and everyone if they have a slightest clue what is going on. I’d have more luck asking @Number10cat #Brexit 
What is the point of Tom Watson effectively starting a Samaritans branch for Labour MPs and Peers when they will still be out door knocking to make Corbyn PM?Waiting him out will give us Brexit and has given us a sewer of antisemitism.  
Another vlog on #Brexit and what’s happening at Strasbourg - more to come as the night rolls on...  
Why are they so obsessed with the backstop? Surely the question is whether Brexit benefits us and is feasible. (But I know the answer to both these questions. Hence we shouldn't Brexit) 
This is reassuring! Ministers have drawn up plans to hire extra benefits and Job Centre staff if there's a no-deal Brexit, Amber Rudd revealed today. We live in a time of utter madness  
Note: David CAMERON is expected 'to earn £1.5m from memoirs and £50,000 per hour giving after dinner talks' (Post Brexit Referendum incomes) 
Algeria is making a new constitution, ratified by referendum.Constitutions are neither sacred nor set in stone. When will India get rid of its colonial monstrosity of a Constitution and actually create one which is “By the people and for the people”? 
Labour MP Yvette Cooper on Brexit vote: 'Nobody has any idea what's going on' Expect more wonderful stroppiness from Yvette this week. via @jonsnowC4 
Guess it’s not the Brexit Secretary making the statement as he appears to be in Strasbourg - Lidington due up in Commons when it’s all signed off later  
Brexit not invent yet, so just wait of common sense possible evolve for now. 
Watching tonight’s #Dispatches about who has profited most from the uncertainty surrounding Brexit, straight after a Channel 4 News report on the number of homeless people who have died on the streets over the last 18 months is pretty hard to stomach. 
Like so many, I am so tired of the issues of Brexit. What ever the outcome I believe the UK will remain the creative centre of Europe! 
I hope folk are seeing dispatches and how the rich are screwing the erse with Brexit !!!! 
I’m to busy watching Ch 4 Dispatches and how the Brexit politicians have made a vast fortune out of Brexit. Thanks. 
The @C4Dispatches documentary now on Brexit is one of the most revealing and informative programmes since the ref.Basically, wealthy MP'S and ex MP'S are betting against British citizens and businesses to make a killing.Yet drape themselves in the Union Flag.Absolute joke. 
LIVE TO THE BREXIT CAFEOK who wanted quiche?meWho wanted pie?MeWho wanted bolognese?MeOk sorry about this but the chef has reheated the soup you all sent back can you eat it or we’ll shut this place down 
Gosh lots of anger on Twitter tonight over @C4Dispatches revelations about those who’re making money out of Brexit.The Brexit Millionaires is on C4 now...or at 9pm on C4+1 or later on All 4 catch-up.... #dispatches 
President ⁦@JunckerEU⁩ Prime Minister ⁦@theresa_may⁩ meeting in #Strasbourg underway. #Brexit  
If this is the criterion for reliable comment on Brexit then fine - but in that case recognize that the vast majority of business people think that Brexit is damaging, rather than giving so much weight to the tiny minority, like Tim Martin, who say otherwise. 1/2  
Sad to watch May and her cabal, along with the whole of #parliament,  playing out a farce around #Brexit , pretending there's a battle going on between Brexiters and Remainers, even though they are all united in burying the result of the Referendum while the MSM helps them. 
Q: Who made money on the night of the referendum as a consequence of the leave vote?   A: Aggressive investors betting against the British currency, sterling. Like Crispin Odey whose firm made £220m fans. He donated £600k to leave campaigns #Dispatches 
Crispin Odey made £220million on the night of #Brexit by shorting Sterling and UK companies. What a patriot.@C4Dispatches #Dispatches 
I'm short 3 UK banks. If there is a Brexit, the assumption in the investment community is that there will be a recession in the UK - how bad? Nobody has a clue.- Steve Eisman, American businessman and investor #dispatches 
Theresa May has arrived in Strasbourg for further talks on #Brexit. More on the negotiations here:  
Anne Applebaum has been writing about transnational kleptocracy as weaponized to undermine and corrode Western democracies, Brexit specifically here.   
The EU is willing to offer Theresa May three things  
The British people voted to leave the EU because they were sick of being dictated to by BrusselsTheresa May is currently being dictated to by Brussels on how we can leave.Why is a Remoaner in charge of Brexit.If remain had won would Boris or Jacob been made Prime Minister. 
#Dispatches is so manipulative ."Here's Jacob Rees-Mogg, look how much money he has made..... and here's a small business, look how poor they are"Give me a f**king break. Our economy is roaring, despite Brexit! 
Imagine looking at the economic disastrous, isolating ugliness of this Tory Brexit and believing that this is the best Scotland could be? No wonder more and more people want a Scotland that is so much better than that.  
#Brexit is a coup by disaster capitalists and the hard right, masquerading as a popular revolt, and facilitated through a referendum with a wafer-thin majority mired in illegality, dark money, lies and corruption.  
Nerves in Dublin at Cabinet meeting tonight over third part of poss brexit tweaks - idea Uk can make its own ‘unilateral’ statement about backstop 
We never should have had a ridiculous referendum. It’s turned what was, other than for a handful of obsessives,  a marginal issue into an unparalleled national crisis. We have so many far more important issues to be focussed on right now. 
James Whale suggests future referendums should need 60% of the vote to pass to avoid the "limbo" resulting from the Brexit referendum. Do you agree?@TheJamesWhale | @VirtualAsh |  
1/ As we await yet another pronouncement on the backstop that will doubtless be immediately dismissed as insufficient by the usual suspects, worth quoting what a senior EU diplomat from a Member State pretty neutral on Brexit said to me the other day when I asked if it's a trap. 
Giving the final say on the #Brexit deal to the UK people is not an affront to democracy, it is a much-needed affirmation of democracy’s fundamental principles  #FinalSay 
“We need to inspire people to see that Brexit is the first step towards a more democratic, accountable politics. My biggest worry is that voters are so let down that they never vote again.”@Nigel_Farage on The Brendan O’Neill Show: 
Here we go the BBC fake news telling us that Brexit may not happen feeding us lies and propaganda all time so are the politicians.They need to realise we are leaving on the 29th march even with no-deal who cares as long as we get country back. 
WATCH NOW on @Channel4 - The Brexit Millionaires#Dispatches investigates how the uncertainty since the referendum has helped the rich get richer - and meets the super-wealthy looking to make big bucks out of Brexit. 
If you're a Labour MP considering voting for a blindfold Tory Brexit, ask yourself this :What shred of evidence do you have that Theresa May or the increasingly rabid and right wing Conservative Party can be TRUSTED.None. 
In two years, #Brexit has managed to reduce this country to the punchline of jokes and the brunt of limericks. Just extraordinary. 
#Brexit was always far more of a attempted power grab by one domestic elite faction than about leaving the EU. That's why we have been negotiating with ourselves far more than with Brussels. 
So Rees-Mogg & Co need some Brexit rather than lose it all but don’t want to lose face; Labour (especially Jezza) need to be seen to do what their voters voted for, but don’t want to help the hated Tories. 
The Prime Minister has allowed these voices to continue. She should have stated categorically how such negatives lies are hurting he country as it prepares for Brexit. She allows it because she doesn’t believe in Britain herself and this negativity suits her purpose.  
Coming at 21:00 - @joelbaccas & @abcpoppins: 'Legal Challenges Have Revealed Brexit Puts Our Democracy at Risk' - More than 2 years into the Brexit process the public remain surprisingly unaware that the decision to leave the EU was made by the PM and not by the 2016 referendum.  
If May loses Tuesday’s Brexit vote, she must back a customs union or go | Simon Jenkins  
“Billions of additional pounds”? No, this bribery is simply the money that should have been spent in the UK over the last 3 years instead of pissing it away chasing an elusive and ultimately pointless #brexit deal. 
Bit of an understatement! David Cameron says a no-deal Brexit is ‘not a good idea’  
The only way to make Brexit stop is to stop Brexit.Our EU membership never used to be the biggest issue facing this country.It’s not worth the hassle.Let’s get on with our lives.  
My new essay on #Brexit, “A perfect summary of Britain’s flaws”, for @DIEZEIT:  - there is a German translation here: . If of interest, please share. 
Translators are the future of Europe #TAsymposium @soc_of_authors "good-bye, and over to you" say @EUlondonrep #Brexit @PaulKayeEUlangs @danielhahn02 @rolandglasser @shauntranslates 
We should have sent Gary Sweet to Brussels to negotiate Brexit. What a man! 
Yvette's angry, what about the rest of the country? 
If the country can afford all the things that Theresa May is promising if we Brexit (incl. lots of dosh all over the place AND workers' rights)... Could someone please explain why we couldn't afford those things whether we Brexited or not? 
It could all kick off tomorrow in Westminster. We’ll take you through it step by step, voices from across the UK, and MPs trying to persuade you why their plan is the best one. It’s crunch time. Wrapped in bubble wrap. Covered in rice crispies. #crunch #Brexit @bbc5live 
We had the lies, then we had the cheating, now we have the bribery - at least everyone now knows what Brexit means.....Brexit Means Corruption.  
There’s never money available, until this Tory government need Brexit votes, then they’re bunging billions of *our money* around to buy MPs off.Brexit has transformed our democracy into a cesspit of bribery and corruption. We have become one those countries we used to sneer at.  
Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg may have earned *at least* £7 million since the EU referendum from an investment firm he has a stake in - which has seen its profits increase since the 2016 vote. The firm relies on a hard Brexit to increase profit. Mogg relies on Brexit for profit  
European Union Will Punish Britain For Delaying Brexit By Demanding Billions More  
It looks as though a fistful of fudge is in the offing re Brexit - probably cooked up by Merkel and May many months ago. #StandUp4Brexit 
Are there any EU Politicians left tonight who have not been asked their opinion or view on our Country’s future by our arrogant MSM ?As per normal is us Mr and Mrs “Muggins”who are the last to know or be consulted as the normal Elite play “Fast and Loose”with our Brexit future! 
Politicians don’t appreciate the anger that will emerge if they delay Brexit further. I’ve spoken to so many people who are absolutely furious with the behaviour of the whole political class & frustrating the will of 17.4 million people will only fuel that 
Another quick #d3js parallel sets demo, reproducing a YouGov chart on how people voted for Brexit.  
Those in government who wanted to frustrate Brexit have had the upper hand throughout negotiations. Unless meaningful change is secured overnight, the deal before Parliament tomorrow is a Soft Remain deal that does not honour the referendum result.  
139 people have died whilst homeless in Scotland in the last 18 months. Whilst everycunt is shouting about Brexit n witever, ordinary people are dying on our streets because they can’t get by. This is a national disgrace, reprehensible and a horrible sign of the times we live in 
Poll reveals Scots ready to back independence over any type of Brexit  Important poll! #indyref2 
A lasting legacy of resistance comes from pointing out how unpopular #Brexit is, and for that only one slogan is right: #StopBrexit. Demand it very loud on 23/3/19. - @LoubinWally @StopBrexitMarch @Always_Remain @emmyzen @RemainingKind @Maxmycat @acgrayling @MHookins @AngieMeader 
As to any hope the PM may have about negotiating further next week in face-to-face talks with EU leaders at their summit next week, I’m being briefed: “At no point during the Brexit process have member states negotiated directly with Theresa May and they won’t start now” 5 
A right-wing project driven by right-wing ideologues. Interesting viewing tonight on @C4Dispatches at 8pm - The Brexit Millionaires  
My 8pm  returns tonight. 1. Brexit - the hour of betrayal is now.2. Shamima Begun's imaginary baby. Join me. 
Whatever the Attorney General comes back with..Remember one thing & only one thing...Never Trust a Tory!#Brexit BritainNOTHING LEFT TO RESPECT#RevokeA50 #StopBrexit Prevent the Theft of Our RightsPrevent the Impoverishment o Our countryPrevent the fracture of Our Union 
Preview of Theresa May's last-minute rabbit from the hat. #Brexit  
Spent three hours queuing in Paris today to get on Eurostar. French customs were working to rule because of concerns about the impact on them of #Brexit. As one of the UK team who first negotiated the ground-breaking “juxtaposed” Eurostar border controls it was a sad day for me. 
I think we can all agree on one thing:Esther McVey is a liar.#Brexit is a crime.#StopBrexit 
As May's shambolic Fake Brexit strategy continues to unravel, the calls for her to resign are only getting louder. She's stabbed us in the back time and time again - it's time for her to go and make way for a leader who believes in Britain!  
BOE tells some UK lenders to triple amount of liquid assets before Brexit - FT  
Everyone who thinks they voted for Brexit because they believe the EU is bad should read this. This is the guy that financed the referendum illegality. He thinks you are worse than dirt - unless you're a billionaire.   
Brussels has treated the British Government with condescension bordering on contempt over #Brexit | Boris Johnson via @telegraph The EU’s Sabine Weyand ‘observed, with perhaps unconscious irony, that the concept of “reasonableness” was unknown to EU law’ 
The decision to knowingly tell a lie isn’t a serious “error of judgment”. It is a rational decision to repeat a falsehood. She should resign. 
The Bank of England is asking some U.K. banks to hold three times more liquid assets in the event of a market meltdown with a no-deal Brexit later this month, the Financial Times reports  
Obviously it’s far more important to keep the Tory party together than having a Brexit vote  
Sunday #Telegraph headline turns out to be a complete misrepresentation of the results of the #Brexit survey they'd commissioned, which shows (yet again) that the majority would now vote to #remain in #EU. Fancy that! #PutItToThePeopleMarch 23rd March in London 
I'm all out of compromise Rory. We've been ignored, abused, called traitors, citizens of nowhere and a lot worse. We're not going to accept result of a fraudulent 'referendum' based on lies, misinformation, false promises, manipulation and, as it now looks, foreign interference. 
Theresa May appears to find it perfectly acceptable to hold THREE parliamentary votes on her deal but refuses to allow the electorate a confirmatory vote on the 2016 referendum.Undemocratic and unacceptable.No vote was ever more necessary or important than a #PeoplesVote. 
If rules can be changed retrospectively for EU27 citizens in the UK then they should be changed likewise to prosecute and jail the government ministers, who have so abused those citizens' rights.#PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
"I think a free vote would be very smart"  - Government minister Steve Brine confirms he would resign or be sacked over a no-deal Brexit  
China is investing bullions and billions in AI and robotics (the country filed 30,000 public patents for AI in 2018), with clear plans to build a globally advanced, modern  economy over the next 20 years. Our Brexit old guard want to open coal mines like we had in the 60s.  
Personally, one of the worst things about Brexit has been having to accept that a large proportion of our population are gullible idiots.Not everyone who voted for Brexit is a gullible idiot, but everyone who still believes in Brexit most certainly is. 
Catherine has nailed the referendum ballot question  
I was born in Australia (and was brought to England as a baby). Every time I hear Abbott comment so positively and straightforwardly on Brexit, I want to move back there. Remoaners could use a bit more of the Aussie spirit, which is carefree and enterprising at once.  
There has been no changes to how we travel between the EU/U.K. at this stage. Claiming this is anyway related to Brexit shows how far from reality remainers have gone. This is a strike in a pay dispute, claiming it’ll be like Brexit is nonsensical.   
Parliament and press are continuing to deny that we who have been consistently warning them of this brexit disaster do not exist #FBPE 
BOE tells some UK lenders to triple amount of liquid assets before Brexit - FT@FBPE @J_amesp @TheNewEuropean @acgrayling @carolecadwalla @remain_central @HuwMerriman @TheIndGroup @mrjamesob @Telegraph 
This weeka) Brexit vote (12 March on May's Deal (likely no); Next is No Deal Brexit (likely no); so next is extension of Article 50 (likely yes);b) BOJc) Bank Indonesia (hold; talk down external demand but cuts won't come till July);d) China FAI, retail sales, IP (slowing) 
Well said David! Sadly @EstherMcVey1 is the thin end of a very dangerous hard-right Tory wedge. 
There's the usual glitz at this year's #GenevaCarShow, but depending on #Brexit, the autos on display get harder and costlier to make – and more expensive to buy  via the @ReutersTV Markets Now playlist 
Ha ha. Pull the Meaningful Vote unless significant concessions from Brussels in less than 24 hours. When months of trying has got precisely nowhere. When #Brexit is 18 days away...If she did pull it though... what then? More Tories jump to @TheIndGroup denying May a majority? 
Had a great time rallying folks around the transit referendum today with @GoGwinnett2019 & @JasmineForHD108! Early voting is going on through Friday the 15th & election day is the 19th. Make sure everyone you know is getting out to #VoteYes & move #Gwinnett forward!! #GAPol #GA07 
EU demand “legal and financial conditions” for Brexit delayPLUS multi-Billion pound increase to £39bn exit fee!Boris: It's vital we do nothing to further weaken UK position.It would be preposterous to take No Deal off the table.#Brexit via @Telegraph 
Leavers have lied to the British Public for the past two years. They are simply stepping up their lying, as they are worried that they are about to lose their pernicious #Brexit 
Factbox: Deal, no deal or delay - How will UK parliament decide on Brexit?  
EU prepares to demand multi-billion pound increase on divorce payment from Britain in return for Brexit delay  via @Telegraph 
Failing to be seen to deliver Brexit will destroy the Tory party forever. And the Tories hope Labour will help them out with the Withdrawal Agreement?Have they thought this through?! 
Betrayal of the British people Whether you are a Brexiteer or Remainer , this behaviour , along with others going behind Governments back , has caused  weaker negotiating position.There’s no winner in this , Brexit isn’t getting stopped.  
UK, ComRes poll:Scenario: The Independent Group (TIG-*)CON-ECR: 36%LAB-S&D: 34%LDEM-ALDE: 8%TIG-*: 8%UKIP-ENF: 6%SNP-G/EFA: 3%GREENS-G/EFA: 3%Field work: 4-5 March 2019Sample size: 2,042➤ #Brexit #BrexitVote 
"There are very few good things to have come out of #Brexit, but today's @wooferendum #BrexitDogsDinner is one of them.Off-the-wall & quintessentially British, it offers the perfect response to the absurd & increasingly surreal situation we find ourselves in." @StefSimanowitz 
That's why the Remain campaign can't be led by those who for years enabled austerity.It's not enough to oppose Brexit - we also need a positive alternative which only the left can provide.  
'Brexit is the most expensive, ruinous divorce in history'  
Let @davidfrum be the one to explain the inexplicable Brexit mess to you: 
UK (GB), YouGov poll:CON-ECR: 40% (-1)LAB-S&D: 31% (+1)LDEM-ALDE 11% (+1)SNP/PC-G/EFA: 5%GREENS-G/EFA: 4%UKIP-ENF: 3% (-2)BREXIT-EFDD: 3% (+1)+/- vs. 22-23 Feb 2019Field work: 3-4 March 2019Sample size: 2,172➤ #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Is it me or is Jess Phillips just a mediocre politician. I mean sure, she's outspoken against Brexit, but other than that, meh. She doesn't hold a candle to most of the MPs we have in @theSNP. 
Morten Morland on Theresa May's plan to save her Brexit deal #TheresaMay #Brexit #Tories #BrexitShamble #BrexitShambles #Brexit #backstop #brexitshambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #beherenow - political cartoon gallery in London  
#Brexit explained, For those with unionist tinted glasses that is.  
The sooner they realise another country doesn't actually want them - the better.Brexit was a vote for their Independence.Lets hope they win it. 
A Sunday night rant of a thread on apathy, uncertainty & the dismal state of Brexit Britain. 19 days.  
It is reported The Queen may be dragged into the Brexit issue.  What an accomplishment by @theresa_may 1. Brought down @Conservatives Party2. Brought down Parliament Attempting to bring down1. Royal Family2. The UK What a star she is.#TimeToGo 
Philip May's US company made a $88bn #Brexit killing. #PeoplesVote #FBPe 
I have article in tomorrow’s Times arguing for a long extension of Article 50 of ‘up to 21 months.’ Brexit would be dead well before the end of that  
And anyone saying UK will have better and more comprehensive employment legislation post Brexit needs to smell the coffee  
Can you really be certain that this and any and every future UK Government will definitely guarantee all of these after Brexit? Are you willing to bet your rights, your health, your holidays and your pay on it?  
#Brexit is already destroying many jobs & will make most of us poorer & less secure.But for some leading Brexiters it's already making millions.And soon they won't have to worry about the EU's plans to tighten up laws on tax avoidance!#PeoplesVote 
In last week I have spoken on Brexit in Swansea, Crewe, Stoke-on-Trent, Oxford, Wrexham, Tunbridge Wells, London & Brussels! Huge energy & passion to stop Brexit everywhere 
This is really important. A no-deal Brexit happens by automatic operation of the law.Unless Parliament actually does something.  
The Enemy Within @theresa_may. Incompetent, indecisive & weak. The withdrawal agreement is anything but Brexit. Her pathetic deal, a roadmap to NEVER leaving. Voting for it is a serious act of betrayal & DOES NOT respect the majority vote to genuinely LEAVE the EU. Resign!  
This week in the House of Commons, it's make or break for Theresa May's Brexit deal, so what's happening when? 
Sorry Femi, but you're wrong - most of us are talking about 'not doing Brexit' and quite frankly, given the illegalities surrounding the whole thing, so should you be. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #RevokeRemainRebuild 
"We want to send a message that what's happening with #Brexit in this country is just diabolical, it's a disaster. We need more people to be able to speak out, and if takes dogs to do that, that's what we need to do." @elkan_daniel #BrexitDogsDinner 
Goldman on Brexit: We continue to see a 55% chance that the Prime Minister’s Brexit deal is eventually ratified, after a three-month Article 50 extension. We still think a reversal of Brexit (with odds of 35%) is more likely than Brexit without a deal (with a probability of 10%) 
Don’t forget Capital are the largest shareholder in ITV who have been bizarrely silent  about Brexit fraud 
“Democracy”, eh, Esther?! What other lies have you told? We will NEVER respect the result of that fraudulent referendum built on LIES by people like YOU. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#StopBrexitSaveDemocracy#BrexitLies 
I wonder how many of us will lose sleep tonight at the thought of the 'devastation of the Conservative Party in the event of a NO Brexit'. I sure as hell won't. 
The VP of the US chamber of commerce with whom I sat on a panel last week @Harvard made clear that American business considered Brexit negative and a "lose lose lose situation", the greatest loser being the UK, "whatever the Administration says".  
No deal Brexit to give UK £140billion BOOM say economists - ignore 'project fear HYSTERIA'  
Just when you thought he couldn't sink any lower, it emerges that Tony Blair has been briefing Emmanuel Macron on how to force Britain to stay in the EU:  #Brexit 
Brexit was an illegal undemocratic coup engineered by rich elites to avoid EU tax avoidance rules  
Len protests the closure of the Honda plant caused by the Brexit that Len supports.Don't be like Len, a hypocrite and public idiot.  
I hope the #EU refuse any extension to Article 50 if #Parliament rejects the #Deal. #Brexit should happen at the end of this month.  
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 10: In a classic case of "foot in mouth" Liam Fox described obtaining a #Brexit trade deal as being the "easiest in history".  That aged well Liam...  
French customs strike delays Eurostar, airports ahead of Brexit - FRANCE 24 ⁦@andywigmore⁩  hope this helps. Love your work as always 
Very soon #Scotland will leave UK over #Brexit & take with them their #whisky industry leaving huge hole in British exports. Few will weep as England has treated Scotland as a colony for centuries. Braveheart will rise from his grave and cheer. And I will cheer with him. 
Unbelievably relevant!EEC Commission President Roy Jenkins (son of a Welsh trade unionist) talking about Labour's desire to leave the EEC under Michael Foot in 1980. Every single word rings true, and could be used against the Brexit process today.  
Monday's Daily Telegraph front page: EU ready to charge £1bn a month for Brexit delay #tomorrowspaperstoday 
EU prepares to demand multi-billion pound increase on divorce payment from Britain in return for Brexit delay' | via @telegraph 
Why is the PM allowed to ask for a vote as many times as she likes but we the public are branded as undemocratic to want a second referendum vote? 
Jeremy Hunt says it will only take 3 things to stop Brexit - vote against the Deal, get a delay, & have a 2nd referendum. This sounds like a Govt admission that the people will vote to stay in the EU in a #PeoplesVote. 
“The one thing that unites us, whether you voted leave or remain, is that no one voted for the environment to be worse off as a result of Brexit” says ⁦@CraigBennett3⁩ ⁦@friends_earth⁩ 
There is a reason Brussels is also keen to avoid a so-called hard Brexit - and that is because the harm could cut both ways  
Dog owners hound Theresa May in call for Brexit referendum | Politics News | Sky NewsNothing will retrieve-her deal  
Brussels has no incentive to make concessions. It is being told by Blair, Major, Mandelson, Campbell, Umunna, Soubry and the rest of its fifth column that no deal will be ruled out and Parliament will end up either keeping us in the EU or will vote for a second referendum. 
Devastating to hear what Brexit uncertainty means for my godmother Sue @crugfarmplants To those who consider it acceptable collateral damage: you have so much to answer for. 
According to Foreign Secretary Jeremy Hunt, if #Brexit fails, it will be devastating for the Tory party. Every cloud has a silver lining! 
Being Dutch citizen, working as guest in UK, I should perhaps not interfer in #Brexit discussions. But: please #remain with us. Help us reform EU from inside where needed. Without your wonderful country EU would not be EU anymore! Think twice before leaving. Even better: stay. 
Guardian front page, Monday 11 March 2019: May fights to save her Brexit deal and her job as Eurosceptics circle  
For God’s sake get out NOW! : EU prepares to demand multi-billion pound increase on divorce payment from Britain in return for Brexit delay 
If Parliament votes for a Brexit delay next week it means that Brexit will not happen. It will also mean that the elected  MP's will have shat all over the people they represent. These MP's will think they are clever but they would have just destroyed democracy. God help them. 
Why are our MPs putting blatant self-interest ahead of the Brexit vote? | Matthew d’Ancona - the guardian  
Nigel Farage, is the former head of UKIP. They discuss the disconnect between politicians and the public, the betrayal of democracy, and why he set up a Brexit Party. #LetsGoWTO#Brexit  
done with Leave voters who insist that things WILL be better after Brexit - in the longterm, not the short-term  "trust me," they say. they use it as a trump card.we can't reach into the future & bring back proof to show them it's not going to be better. we can't disprove it. 
If we don't get a complete Brexit at the end of March, then the prime minister and MPs should face a jail sentence for incompetence. 
We're getting mugged off ..EU prepares to demand multi-billion pound increase on divorce payment from Britain in return for Brexit delay...Just leave NO DEAL this has gone on long enough now!!  
It's April 2017, & @TheSun tells its 'readers' about @theresa_may's "ELECTION BOMBSHELL", in which she will:"KILL OFF @UKLabour!""SMASH rebel Tories!"& gain a "clear Brexit mandate!"Journalism at its finest   
It would be fantastic if #BREXIT was followed by #FREXIT and #ITALEXIT ! 
Forecasts are the remainers lynchpin."Since the EU referendum, 750,000 more people are in work in the UK. This contrasts with HM Treasury forecast of 500,000 job losses following a Leave vote – meaning its prediction was an embarrassing 1.2 million out." 
Tomorrow's front page: SNP Brexit amendment to demand power to call indyref2   
Just caught latest @bankofengland (feb'19) estimate of CURRENT Brexit damage to UK - sized at a huge £800 million per week or £42 billion per annum - that would be c £330+ billion over the first 8 years (we're now 3 in!) so my numbers are on the low side. Can't wait for @BBCNews? 
Increasingly desperate Eurosceptics, needing to leave the EU as directed by their paymasters, plan move against Theresa May if 29th March departure date delayed. 
Tony Blair secretly advising Emmanuel Macron on Brexit as former PM accused of 'unacceptable behaviour'  
Once more with feeling: this argument assumes Remain would win a 2nd ref. If you believe that, how can you possibly claim to represent the people while trying to ram Brexit through?  
Dear British writer friends: it weirds me out that you write "Erm" instead of "Um" in dialogue. Do people there *really* say say "Erm"? Just curious — now go back to destroying your country with Brexit. 
The good (and distressing) thing is that all these posters around the country will still be up a for all to see post Brexit, Mrs May. The blame will clearly lie at your feet, not anyone else's, @theresa_may 
BOE TIGHTENS BANK LIQUIDITY BUFFERS BEFORE BREXIT: FTSteven Mnuchin calling UK banks to confirm that liquidity is fine 
Surely there is enough doubt that the referendum was conducted free from foreign interference, that some of our politicians can say they no longer respect the result. That it was unsafe. 
Of course, in the event of a no-deal Brexit on March 29, British clocks will be set back by fifty years. 
Jeez.Just emailed someone about #brexit and got an out of office autoreply "Out of office until 02.05"What is our politics even going to look like by 02.05?  
Indeed.The French are bureaucratic and do not like to be surprised. They are, as a culture, utterly appalled at the shambolic state of this #Brexit..but will not allow themselves to be caught out on their end. Not at all.And they will minimize their own inconvenience.#France 
Remoaner extremist and democracy despising Jessica Simor loses virtually every argument in court as she foolishly attempts to argue the referendum result is invalid and illegal.  
“The people who would stop Brexit should know just this: what you do, you’ll have to do in public now. Stopping Brexit will be on you, not Brexiteers. Don’t kid yourselves otherwise.” Derrr OK Steve!   
The party will have no activists, no base, and if you think as a conservative MP a no deal Brexit is bad, when you look at the damage inflicted by Corbyn as he a militant left wing (not centrist Blairite) wins a landslide, you can look in the mirror and take responsibility. /End 
Brussels has treated the British Government with condescension bordering on contempt over Brexit, says @BorisJohnson 
We need a way to get through the utter shitshow that is going to be brexit politics this week. I am going to start with kittens wrapped up as purritos (cos why the heck not) but it's gonna take some serious twittertainment. What else do you think we should do? pic.twitter.com/CCQKJZ3ueM 
Factbox - Deal, no deal or delay: How will UK parliament decide on Brexit?  
Tony Blair secretly advising Emmanuel Macron on Brexit as former PM accused of 'unacceptable' behaviour' | via @telegraph 
Today is #labourday in Victoria. Time to recommit to the principles of the 8-hour day movement: a fair share of the economy for those who work, as a fundamental building block of a decent and generous society, for all of us to enjoy. This election has to be a referendum on wages. 
If you want a #FinalSay on brexitThen you need to campaign to get oneWe need to do as much as we canHere is a very simple thing to do RIGHT NOW!SIGN this petition calling for a Second Referendum and then RT itSIGN this  and now RT it please#FBPE 
Well, one thing brexit has shown us. Just how thick/and or evil the Tories are....And how little their voters understand about their true motives 
Don't let @theresa_may get away with cancelling the European elections if Brexit is delayed.It would mean the UK had to leave the EU on 1 July whatever else happens next.  
SNP Westminster leader Ian Blackford argues in Monday's Daily Record that Scotland does not have to hit the Brexit iceberg and go down with the Tory sinking ship@IanBlackfordMP 
If this was post Brexit you would be hysterically blaming this on Brexit. I look forward to you blaming every single thing on Brexit for the next 10 years Gavin should be amusing. 
Sources in Paris confirmed to The Telegraph that Mr Blair had been speaking to the French President about Brexit  
If #Brexit is such a good thing, why do Quitters choose to lie about the benefits, lie about the down sides & talk complete bollocks about WTO, GATT etc? 
Can someone remind me the last time anyone of sound mind or competence etc.. listened/agreed with anything this woman said? #Brexit #Toxic 
@JohnMannMP are you entirely comfortable voting for:* A Brexit campaign won by a  Russian Ambassador's friend & law breaker Arron Banks who campaigned after Jo Cox's murder, polled to see if would affect voters & has posted anti-semitic anti-soros tweets & mate to Steve Bannon  
Stephen Barclay will be appearing before the Brexit Select Committee tomorrow afternoon. 
There is no such thing as a good Brexit, we know that it's going to cost jobs, we know that it's going to impact living standards, we know of course that no deal is absolutely disastrous for the people of Scotland #indyref2 
Nothing to report tonight on this weekend’s #Brexit talks. “Maybe in the morning” I’m told here.. 
Esther, it was written in 2014 by THE TELEGRAPH! If you have genuine reasons for believing Brexit is in the best interest of the Country you wouldn’t have to share nonsense like this. Please resign, as a taxpayer I’m disgusted I have to provide you with a living. 
Eh? Landlords are increasing rent to “cover financial implications of Brexit”? ....Nope, they are just being greedy, aiming to make a few extra bob and like so many other people, are using #Brexit as a convenient (but wholly untrue) excuse...   
19 days till brexit and you’re still sharing lie-filled articles that were debunked when they came out in 2014. If you had developed the concept of shame you’d be ashamed of yourself. 
Theresa May battles to save Brexit deal ahead of Commons vote  
You don't get to be as incompetent as @theresa_may overnight. It takes years of practice. A strong contender for the worst PM ever:#Brexit Chaos#Windrush#Grenfell#NHS crisis#KnifeCrimeCrisis#HomelessnessYou name it, Theresa May f*cked it up 
Can someone remind me of the fuckwit who supported Brexit then complained about not being able to get EU staff to work in his pubs?  
My dissertation is fully moving like brexit: no concrete plan, 3 weeks til deadline and driven by a woman who now looks 500 years older than when the process began. Theresa we should go on a mini break when this is all over x help 
Absolutely heartbreaking to think any nursery is at risk from Brexit. Horticulture brings in millions of pounds every year, supports employment, leisure and tourism and to see @crugfarmplants so vulnerable is a shock. 
FUNNY:UK Parliament published a report on Russian interference during Brexit.The Russians were the main early readers of this UK report.More:  
Unfortunately, UK humiliation was the predictable and predicted consequence of Brexit. See my Brexit Blog post from October 2017 "Brexit is bringing humiliation to Britain, and there is much more of it to come". Pretty much everything in it has come true:  
Leave Means Let's take the people who will suffer the most from this Brexit madness for all the money they can't really afford to give.....but let's take it anyway!  
Brexit is cancelled x  
One of the more uncomfortable - and rather frightening - things one discovers with #Brexit is that many public representatives, although charged with leadership in a time of great need, genuinely have no idea whatsoever what they are talking about. 
This promises to be a major week for Brexit in Parliament. For a quick reminder of what votes we expect to take place in terms of debates and votes, see this explainer from @commonslibrary 
An informative, entertaining and well attended Brexit, Trade & Scottish Independence talk by @StewartHosieSNP this afternoon. Thanks to all who came along. Our foodbank collection raised a fantastic £180. Special thanks 2 the Stag, Forfar and to Eddie McNaughton for the PA system 
Maybe it's just me, but a guy who entertains far-right conspiracy theories, doesn't believe in climate change, and thinks Brexit is a good idea isn't the best choice for Prime Minister. #cdnpoli 
If Govt backs a new policy that we can't leave the EU without a deal that MPs find acceptable then the EU just has to withhold such a deal and we can't leave the EU.That is the extent of Brexit betrayal that ministers and MPs are colluding to create. Consequences will be huge 
As Jessica Simor QC rightly says, “This line is gold-dust:“If we go down that road [a referendum], we might never leave the EU at all”  ie Theresa May suspects that Brexit is no longer the will of the people.” 
Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg branded dinosaur after his country estate hosts hunt meetingThe Mendip Farmers Hunt met at Gournay Court in West Harptree, Somerset - a country pile owned by the Brexit-backing Tory millionaire  
Read this study before a week dominated by Brexit. From an economist at Warwick, it shows that Austerity caused Brexit. “The EU referendum could have resulted in a Remain victory had it not been for austerity-induced welfare reforms.”  
I dunno - 'no Brexit' sounds pretty good to me. 
Bro, we've humiliated ourselves ever since we offered a referendum with  no clear consequence to an uninformed populace. 
Come join me, @PeterKGeoghegan and others at this year’s SCAN Summit “Unsettled Status: Brexit, Borders and the Hostile Environment”. Glasgow  21 March 2019 #Brexit #HostileEnvironment #SettledStatus #CitizensRights 
Brussels is keen to avoid a no-deal Brexit. The EU has a major financial reason: Payment of the Brexit bill. It also fears a reduction in economic growth, reduced trade, migration & security concerns & an EU border around Ireland. It also dreads UK success  
Between the government shutdown in the U.S. and Brexit in the U.K., political turmoil is the norm on both sides of the pond, write @elainejgodfrey and @yasmeenserhan: 
Farage has ALSO been convicted of fiddling his EU Expenses.  There is NOTHING that more defines a talentless stinker as a member of the “Political Class” than stealing money through expenses fraud.  Farage is a fraud, Brexit is a fraud.  
Brexit in peril if PM May's deal is rejected: foreign minister Hunt  
So I got a puppy too as an antidote to all the Brexit stuff .....  
One of the biggest jokes in the Brexit/ Trump age is millionaires complaining to voters about “elites”. The sad part is a chunk of those populations believe them. 
Which would you prefer? #brexit #leaveeu #remainer #article50 
To all those Tory MP’s trying to prevent Brexit & those Labour ones who think the EU protects workers. Today’s El Pías “of temporary workers under the age of 25 in the third quarter of 2018 over the total number of employees” look at how shocking the EU is.  
Tim Martin, Wetherspoons boss, has a message for MPs. May's deal isn't Brexit, vote for No Deal on Tuesday. RT if you agree!  
This is fascinating - #Brexiteers falsehoods have led us to the cliff edge...Theresa Villiers: Irish border concerns over Brexit are just ‘scaremongering' - The Irish News  
The French on strike......WTF has that got to do with Brexit? @gavinesler 
Walk away..... Only way and tear up the cheque  Taxpayers to be hit with DOUBLE Brexit divorce bill of £78bn if MPs vote to extend Article 50  
UK: "Give us a concession on the backstop."EU: "Or what?"UK: "Or we'll... we'll postpone Brexit!"Our approach to these negotiations has been abysmal from the start. 
... every time a Brexiter says a new vote would “undermine democracy”, they’re accidentally admitting that they think that a majority of voters now do NOT want Brexit.In other words...2/ 
And Rees-Mogg and B. Johnson say we should respect Trump, and place the UK's fortunes in his hands. Traitors!#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Any #Brexit deal is worse than what we have now and a no deal #Brexit will make the UK a third world country.  
Brexit — Companies have been forced to spend hundreds of millions of dollars on contingency planning. Others have had to cut jobs or delay expansions or idle production. Some are already giving up on Britain and moving their operations elsewhere.  
I wondered how long it would take for the leavers to realise what a complete clusterfuck Brexit is and start blaming those who actually engaged their brains before voting. 
"The prime minister’s allies said Mrs May was ready to fly to Brussels on Monday to discuss .. tweaks to her Brexit deal". I think I've already seen this movie. via @financialtimes 
We're voting it down for a second time and we're still not campaigning for a public vote. Two weeks before we leave and 6 months after Conference.There's no election, no jobs first Brexit, no time left.All that exists is broken promises @Keir_Starmer 
What would happen to our democracy if after #Brexit it is proven that Arron Banks'  £8.5m came from Russia, and there had been a government cover-up? A huge change would have been obtained through crime and there would be no legal or democratic remedy. #PeoplesVote 
It's the likes of you and May that is humiliating  Britain by your selfish, stupid and rose tinted Brexit.But go on, blame others!  
“There will be tariffs on the WTO basis and some of them will be very high. It will damage our economy and it will damage the British economy.” 
“Failure to deliver Brexit on time, or at all, will mean our party will never be trusted again. We will fragment, we will be destroyed. We have to deliver what the people wanted. The peoples vote of 2016 has to be respected. We must leave on 29th March 2019” @cllrrpatterson 
Then in 1964 there was Giant Pie 8 to mark Prince Edward’s birth. The ingredients list is massive. Six tons of custard, for some reason. Since then there’s been two giant pies, in 1988 and 2000. And that’s it. Just wanted to tweet a story to dilute people banging on about Brexit.  
Easy then let's just #RevokeArticle50 which we can do without penalty and unilaterally. That's the only way to bring this debacle to a close. Anything else and we've barely even started the Brexit process. 
Potentially defining week ahead? Has Parliament lost the ability to actively listen? #Brexit: Business leaders don’t want it. The people don’t want it any longer. Economists don’t want it. The young reject it. The #NHS doesn’t want it! So, simply, hear them! #RevokeA50 #Remain 
Furious Brexiteer LASHES OUT at 'anti-British' MPs - 'We've waited long enough for Brexit!  
Trouble is government's own impact assessments show any #Brexit does indeed #fuckbusiness (to quote Boris Johnson). We know it. The EU 27 know it.  So *this* by @jonesycartoons represents the UK's position  pic.twitter.com/7TlqHJZQlq 
PM May has promised £1.6 billion for England’s poorest areas after Brexit.Since 2010, £16 billion has been cut in funding for local councils.I’m not an economist, but we’re being conned. 
3/4   In the same ComRes survey, the same respondents are asked how they would vote in an EU referendum today. As you can see, there's a 46% / 39% split in favour of REMAIN. And that's before you strip out don't knows, etc..Oddly, Telegraph didn't headline this aspect!  
Belgium advises its companies stop exporting to UK around #Brexit date.  
Tonight I am excited to announce my candidacy for President of the Union of Students in Ireland. In the midst of an education funding crisis, a lack of student housing, and huge Brexit uncertainty, I want to guide a confident and activist-led student movement #Oisín4USI #USI19 
Hi @JamesCleverly, this is what Conservative voters, members, activists and leave voters want to hear. @SimonClarkeMP is sticking to his pledges and our manifesto. Are you? If not, why not? And what do you think will happen when Parliament moves to frustrate Brexit? 
Brexit negotiations highlight UK incompetence"The UK’s tragedy is not so much that Chris Graylingis a cabinet minister, but rather, most ministers have been engaged in a race to become the next Chris Grayling."Harsh but true  
Anyone who supports the idea of People's Vote on Brexit, but does not support a second referendum on Scottish Independence is a hypocrite of the highest order. There is no way you can justify one but not the other. 
The tax-dodging #Brexit billionaire press has spent years whipping up the political hate and intolerance which is causing the threats against MPs and which lends credibility to the threats of disorder and violence being made by leading Tories. This is terrorist politics. 
Putting a remainer in as PM was in insult to 17,410,742 million leave voters. We knew she would never give our country a real BREXIT, nor for that matter will Mr Corbyn all snobs at the top, his front bench even sends their children to private Schools.  
Dog owners hound Theresa May in call for Brexit referendum  
No majority support for Theresa May's Brexit deal in any of the 632 constituencies in England, Scotland, and Wales, not even in her own Maidenhead constiuency, according to a fresh @YouGov poll 
This week will see open warfare in both the major political parties and all those that go against the democratic will of the WINNINGLeave vote will be named,remembered and dealt with at any future GE.We need to bury the  careers of all those that are trying  to thwart Brexit. 
THIS WEEK:-it is do or die for brexitYOU:-Give out leafletsJoin a pro EU PartyCome to the March on SaturdayNO DEAL = a national emergencyWe need a confirmatory referendum#PutItToThePeople 
Watch this space. Should be a new update to my mega-thread of Brexit consequences (job losses, assets being shifted out of the UK, etc.) coming within the next 24 hours. Just tidying it up. It will be the first to pass *250* entries! 
No Deal exit supported by British publicNo Deal ends EU blackmailNo Deal ends EU bullyingNo Deal ends uncertaintyNo Deal ends our national humiliationNo Deal ends our leaders' EU collusion!No Deal honours Referendum result#Brexit #EU via @Telegraph 
May:- stood on the steps of No10 as accidental PM, rounded 52 to 100%- ignored calls for cross-party Group to deliver #Brexit - paid £1b to DUP- held ransom by ERG demands- ignores illegality in Ref campaigns- biggest vote loss in Parlt’y history- blames EU.Mess= all May. 
This week is Brexit decision week. It is the end of the road. UK can now exit the EU with Mrs May's deal or exit the EU with no deal. Delay is unacceptable. If my MP votes for a delay I will never vote for him again.  Decision time is now. This is it. 
Sorry, that's just b*llocks, we're all still waiting to hear one concrete benefit of Brexit. Your own government impact studies show any form of Brexit is harmful. Everything other than Remain is damage limitation. #PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
Anyone....and I literally mean ANYONE who has negotiated ANYTHING in their lives will see the push to take “no deal” off the table for what it is; the liberal elite corrupting brexit. Ruling out your only “bargaining chip” is f..king stupid! 
Keep scrolling from some positive #Brexit news!................................................................................................You didn't expect to see any did you? 
Hi, My name is Oliver Murphy - I'm from the United Kingdom. Oh, you seriously can't say you've never heard of it!It's that small island next to Europe that got tricked by a red bus! #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
Senior Tories including Theresa May have used the threat of violence to intimidate people into accepting #Brexit. Threats are scaring MPs into changing their stance on Brexit. This is terrorist politics. It must not be rewarded. Brexit must be stopped 
Brexit shills are disgusting. Please report this hateful and sick mockery of the murder of a young mother, a remain-supporting MP, by a far-right terrorist with a gun.  
Did you sign Up to Article 50?After the Referendum did you agree to adhere to the result?Where is your evidence to show ‘Democracy has changed its mind’Are you now a mainstream political figure?I will answer that one for you, NO you’re notBy the next GE you will be forgotten 
My @guardian column: Less than 20 days before the official Brexit date, it is repugnant that the Tory Party should be indulging in leadership speculation  
Theresa May knows the EU ref was won by Leave's industrial scale criminal cheating buying billions of hate-stirring Facebook ads when Remain stopped spending. She is willfully ignoring this and pursuing Brexit to stay in Number 10 as long as possible.  
Support for a no-deal Brexit is growing in theface of the EU's refusal to help salvage Theresa May's deal,according to a new poll.A survey by ComRes found that 44 %of the public nowbelieve the UK should leave without a deal if Brussels refuses to any concessions 
The NI Backstop is one of many issues with Mrs May’s #Brexit ‘deal’:During transition the UK can’t have an independent Trade Policy &  won’t be able to sign own FTAs;The ‘Joint Committee’ can amend the Withdrawal Agreement without UK Parliament’s involvement.MPs #VoteNo 
Oh boy I'm smiling on the train back to Sheffield. Just did some research into some of the things a top Brexiteer said during the 2016 referendum. My next video...  
BRIT CRAZES● Bay City Roller tartan flares●Savile● Brut & medallions● Perms on men● Smoking 60 a day● Party tins of beer● Heroin chic● Eldorado● Toploader● Peroxide Sick Boy hair● Blair● Nylon dreds● Spice● Fidget spinners● Brexit 
With another vote on Theresa May’s Brexit deal this week - #Dispatches investigates how the uncertainty since the referendum has helped the rich get richer and meets the super-wealthy looking to make big bucks out of Brexit.The Brexit Millionaires - tomorrow at 8pm on @Channel4 
How is economic inequality in the UK the EU’s fault?!It’s very much a BRITISH problem!Immigration could have been controlled using the legal tools that other EU countries use!Employers & government set wages - NOT workers!Brexit is pointless  
Seedy speculators and spivs coining it in under brexit. While real businesses that make things, provide jobs and pay taxes are destroyed and driven away.  
This is all evasion.McDonnell here is keen to talk up Labour's "alternative deal" for Brexit and does not commit to #PeoplesVote/#FinalSay. He mentions it would be down to parliament and floats it as a mechanism for Lexit.Carefully worded to give Remainers false hope. Again. 
Why do pollsters include TIG as an option, but not the Brexit Party?  
Opinion: How a post-Brexit trade deal with the US could make life-saving drugs unaffordable for the NHS  
Brexit Dividend  
Toyota says it may end manufacturing in Britain if there's a "bad" Brexit  
Amazing @theresa_may says the naughtiest thing she's done is running through a field of wheat.Meanwhile she holds a country to ransom, oversees a 6.4% fall in GDP and a chronic rise in food banks, with her whole approach to Brexit driven by xenophobia. 
The reality is that unless the Government move legislation to override the default position or in the event Parliament approves a Withdrawal Agreement (virtually impossible) then there is no way to possibly stop Brexit, or to prevent no deal. 4/5 
Just a working-class northerner who voted Remain. Since #EURef I been called "elite", "unpatriotic", "citizen of nowhere" by my own Govt, & told to respect result of a criminally fraudulent #Brexit, funded by God-knows-who, & which only benefits disaster capitalists & Russia. 
So Britain's future is to be wrecked and a democratic #PeoplesVote denied for the sake of the Conservative party. This means that Tory ministers are violating their duty as MPs which is to put the country before any political party. #Brexit  
10 reasons to be cheerful about the UK economy as we head towards Brexit  
Interesting reply. Clearly the PM did not create a high performing Brexit negotiation unit (or was that the fault of David Davis?). She also failed to set out clear objectives with wide support, and has not been honest about progress. Apart from that...  
Eurostar tonight- queue out of the door- anyone thinking of going on holiday after March 29 (and assuming the Brexit ‘sunlit uplands’ continue) might find the same. But hey, we can spend hours waiting for our flights,trains and ferries looking at our new blue passports.  
THREAD - Brexit facts: If May’s deal fails this week (as it almost certainly will) then the vote on no deal and/or extension of Art 50 is not legally binding. That means that even if Parliament votes to rule out no deal, this does not actually prevent no deal 1/5 
This is absolutely abhorrent. The Conservatives are not even trying to mask that Brexit is simply a Tory political game. Mr Hunt, who the hell cares that Brexit not passing, would be devastating for your party? What about the devastating consequences for your people if it does?  
Tory Gov commit the biggest ever fraud.Tories are telling us they are delivering #Brexit.In fact, #BrexitBetrayal means the EU dictators will have MORE control over us, for evermore,with no exit door.UK media are complicit in trying to deceive us about what is really proposed. 
Sir Rocco Forte: 'No point in delaying Brexit'. A no-deal Brexit is better than a bad deal, and Theresa May's is a bad deal according to the hotel tycoon.  
Today's best Brexit take. The defeat of the Government over Brexit this week should be the end of Mayism, and the end of the particularly short-sighted idea that you can negotiate a major deal without involving Parliament, the opposition, regions, business etc  
A few of the spineless, embarrassing halfwits who’ve done everything to derail #Brexit & peddle blatant propaganda on behalf of the EUImagine being so pathetic, supine & feeble that you side with a failing, corrupt, anti-democratic, authoritarian rabble... against Britain  
What is striking is the way May’s position has shifted:No deal is better than a bad deal, becameMy deal or no deal, then finallyMy deal or no Brexit.This will tear the party apart. People are just fed up with this kind of political chicanery.#StandFirm 
Theresa May claims to be “proud” of her record in Government. Please retweet this if you think she should be ashamed of the damage she has caused. pic.twitter.com/pzHBvzFL7n #GTTO #ToryEconomicFailure #ToriesOut #TheresaMay #GeneralElectionNow #Brexit #JC4PM #JeremyCorbyn 
A poll suggests the British public is rallying behind a no-deal Brexit. @IainDale asks: would you support a no-deal scenario? 
Listen to the contempt shown to our Attorney General. Whether you agree with Geoffrey Cox or not to call him a buffoon and comic shows jusy how much these unelected Eutocrats actively hate us. I cannot bear the thought of being trapped in this awful club much longer. #Brexit  
Senior Labour figures talk of a three month delay to Brexit. They also talk of a second referendum.Remember thisfrom John McDonnell next time you hear that.  
Up and down the country, contract lawyers are currently trying to establish whether Brexit would count as a force majeure event - the “all bets are off” clause generally reserved for catastrophic acts of God, and war - you know, the horsemen of the apocalypse. 
Ian Blackford: Scotland will seek power for second referendum if Brexit goes ahead | The National  
Don’t know where to begin with these mad fuckers.Both unemployed, both beaten with the ugly stick,he’s Dutch & outraged that he has to apply for status. Fuck off.  Look what Brexit made me do: I'm stockpiling food for my family  
In advance of the critical votes this week, the unquestionably correct course of action for MPs to take is to vote for a WTO clean Brexit. It gives the certainty everyone craves on Brexit and frees the UK from EU control once and for all. #GoWTO 
A busy week for the global #economy with ...   Closely-watched IP data for #China, #Eurozone and the #US;  The Bank of #Japan's policy meeting;  First indications on the US FY 2020 budget;  #UK Chancellor's Spring Statement; and... the #Brexit votes in parliament.#boj 
Despite the current clusterfuck caused by our Remain MPs, I’m still excited by Brexit! For the first time in my life the UK is talking about an independent trade policy, what it wants to do domestically after taking back control and ordinary people have made their voices heard! 
„Brexit - was aus Englands Wasserrutschen wird“  
It's so dumb it should be called porno-Brexit. 
The #BrexitShambles is painfully simple:We voted to leave the EU, but ended up with 2 Brexit options that most Brexit voters did not want in 2016: A deal that means LESS control than we have now or no deal at all.A referendum on that new reality is the only logical next step. 
Endless prevarication and no consensus for any form of Brexit in Parliament.Hundreds of thousands will take to the streets on 23rd and march with one simple demand : Put it to the people.Make sure you're there.  
This weekend in Brexitannia:1. Jeremy Hunt admits govt knows Remain would win a new referendum.2. ..admits Brexit is needed only to save the Tory party, and happy to sacrifice the country3. ..acknowledges Brexit isn't the will of the people.4. Asks the Queen to help them! 
Jeremy Hunt opines that if MPs don’t back PM this week, result could be no Brexit, which would be devastating for Tory Party. *Ruffles through papers looking for a down side*. 
When this proposal was first announced I thought it was so completely, staggeringly deranged there was no way a British government would do it. And then Brexit happened.  
Jeremy Hunt admits on Marr this morning that a referendum would kill Brexit. He knows we do not want it. If this govt forces through a botched Brexit it will be against the “will of the people” - and they know it. Time to think - and vote - again.  
Brexit: Not going well, is it?  
LIAR & APPEASER MAY; " It is my deal, or no Brexit"THIS IS A FAKE STATEMENT!A 'No Deal' exit forms part of the legal withdrawal from Europe.It takes a Statute to overturn this legal position!This cannot happen with 18 days to go.W T O = WAY TO GO !#WTOWTG 
Picture if you will,Treasonable May is forced to resign after her deal with Merkel is voted down again,Who would you like to see take over and negotiate a true Brexit? 
Theresa May trying to get her Brexit deal over the line   
Bad news for Westminster if the establishment delay Brexit and European elections take place.  
Tobias Elwood: A no-deal Brexit is “not in the spirit of the party manifesto ... or indeed the referendum outcome."  Come off it Tobias. A clean Brexit is the ONLY way to honour the referendum result. 
I’m a socialist and I’m VERY proud to have ran against and voted against @rosie4westlancs, the *Labour* MP who has voted against equal marriage, against an elected House of Lords, against delaying Brexit to avoid No Deal, and for the abolishment of on shore wind energy subsidies.  
#Brexit"I think we could agree the Labour deal within a matter of weeks.The EU has looked positively on that and in all the discussions that we've had, they see that as the foundation of a proper negotiation."John McDonnell.#BrexitDeal #Labour  
“We need to inspire people to see that Brexit is the first step towards a more democratic, accountable politics. My biggest worry is that voters are so let down that they never vote again.”@Nigel_Farage on The Brendan O’Neill Show: 
Interesting summary of the preparations made by French Customs to maintain the smooth goods trade between France and the UK after Brexit  
Just as long as Brexit is defeated, that’s fine. And they are right - my name is absurd, I don’t have an Eton voice, & I have no dress sense whatever  
Andrew Marr; “If you don’t vote for May’s deal, you risk losing Brexit altogether”.  But Andrew, May’s surrender deal is not Brexit at all. It’s Remain by another name.     
“All but two constituencies want their MP to reject May’s Brexit deal”  
Memo to MPs: If you vote “to take No-Deal off the table”, you are in effect voting against a meaningful Brexit. And your voters will remember that. 
No smoke signals as yet in Brussels from this weekend of #Brexit technical talks 1 
David Lammy hit back at this caller who said the Tottenham MP's anti-Brexit stance is because he's on a "gravy train".@DavidLammy | #Brexit 
No Deal support rising and public want Brexit sorted, poll finds - Westmonster  
BREXIT: Why are our MPs putting blatant self-interest ahead of the Brexit vote? /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
I wish these pathetic Remainers would stop threatening us with quashing the referendum result.The Withdrawal Agreement is an abomination which cannot be supported, so you must allow us to leave with #NoDeal (unless the EU backs down). 
The #EU is clueless to the needs of Europe’s sinking economy. Political turmoil and shrinking growth, all #Brussels can think to do is construct more rules. And making life difficult for #Brexit isn’t helping. What a bunch of skunks in Brussels  
Talking to @C4Ciaran, Shadow Chancellor John McDonnell says a six or seven month extension to Article 50 would be required for a second referendum.Senior Labour Party figures had previously discussed a three month extension limit.  
The will of the people in 2019, anyone?"The vast majority of those unable to vote in 2016 would support Remain in another referendum," our polling with @FFSake_shows today. 
His Holiness Hazrat Mirza Masroor Ahmad, Caliph of the Ahmadiyya Muslim Community, on #Brexit at the National #PeaceSymposiumUK#Europe #EU #Unity 
Watch a short clip from my visit to the villages #Belcoo and #Blacklion on the border between Northern Ireland and the Republic of Ireland. Nobody wants a hard border here after #Brexit so we must make sure it won't happen. Thank you @JNicholsonMEP for showing me around. 
.@DavidDavisMP is absolutely right. If Brexit doesn't happen on 29 March, there are going to be a lot of angry people out there. 
On the other hand, if Brexit *does* happen, if ANYTHING negative comes from it, the history books will *not* be forgiving?"You still left the EU despite major electoral fraud in the referendum, the negotiations going to sh** and Brexit voters hating the deal? ... Why-TF? " 
#Brexit #UK #May #Russia #PutinPresident V.Putin ”..let them [UK]  decide this [Brexit] for themselves, this is none of our business, or else they might accuse us of wrongdoing again ”President of Russia  
The @ForBritainParty will be fighting the Newport West by-election. We are pleased to announce our candidate Hugh Nicklin.YOU can make real change just by voting differently. Labour want to join the Tories and frustrate the Brexit that YOU voted for.  
You need to know that Brexit would be a self-inflicted disaster on all levels.#StopBrexit(Nice flags) 
The deal remains by far safest path to Brexit & is far better than many of its critics admitSome critics clearly have something approaching pathological mistrust of EUBut for those open to persuasion I urge you to look v carefully at actual facts before it's too late V/V) 
One of the strange things about the Brexit debate at the moment is the persistence of certain idées fixes about the PM's Brexit deal & its alternatives which are repeated by critics Here's a Sunday afternoon mythbusting threadA) 
The Brexit question isn’t whether the deal will pass on Tuesday - it’s unlikely. Nor is it whether parliament will reject no deal or ask for an extension.The question is whether the reasoning will be acceptable to the EU27.The substance counts more this week than the noise. 
.@Jeremy_Hunt was clear on #Marr that if we have a #PeoplesVote then Brexit will be stoppedIf he is so sure that leaving the EU is no longer what a majority of British people want, why are he and the government he is part of pushing it through?#PutItToThePeople #StopBrexit 
Is it me or has Jeremy Hunt just admitted that there is no longer a public majority in favour of brexit. 
Profits in Jacob Rees-Mogg's investment firm soaring while UK braces for Brexit 
Babel: Adventures in Translation  A new @bodleianlibs exhibition is exploring the power of translation, from the ancient myth of the Tower of Babel to the challenges of modern-day multicultural Britain in light of Brexit:  
The clip contains the express admission that a new referendum would "kill Brexit". So, despite their denials govt *knows* that Remain would win. Hence they *know* that Brexit is *not* the "will of the people". So, it's all about saving the Tory party!  
Yes Scotland’s head of digital confirms hate filled cybernat posts like ‘filthy stinking sub-human Tory scum’ caused Yes to lose votes in the 2014 referendum. Not much has changed @2351onthelist @cultfree54 @CompoundAye @edglasgow59 @mik61scot @JohnLeoNo1087 @carmic3 @BRRSC 
Brexiteer @johnredwood FURIOUS at idea of second EU referendum - 'A complete insult to voters!'  
"Brexit seems to be turning [the UK] in on itself. Science thrives on the exact opposite," says Paul Nurse, the Nobel prize-winning head of the UK's biggest biomedical research lab.  
Japanese drugmaker moves HQ out of London over Brexit  
Whatever happens with Brexit I urge everyone to stop voting Labour or Conservative.Look what both parties have done to our Cities, Towns and local communitiesIf we let them continue what will this country be in 50 yearsWe must protect the British way of life for our children 
JUDGE CRUSHES REMAINERS’ CLAIMS THAT REFERENDUM RESULT IS INVALIDJessica Simor QC was judged wrong on more or less every argument she tried to make as she went down in flames Jolyon-style…  
Just to clarify... We had a referendum.It was advisory...We then spent two years investigating & now know that the public & most MPs know FUCK ALL about this subject.So back to common sense & being a constructive partner in the EU.What a waste of time. 
#Brexit - It's a Dog's Dinner, organised by @Wooferendum. Lots of cute dogs against Bexit. Pics at @AlamyNews & Rex Features @ShutterstockNow . With thanks to Cookie, Pie, Chunkie, Polo, Jimmie, Lillie, & Robbie all the other four legged protesters! 
It's interesting that you highlight a poll saying all but 2 constituencies want to reject May's awful deal, but you ignore polls saying almost all constituencies are Remain now and want a ratification referendum. You're only a half-hearted democrat, then.  
This is where I and many others stand on the Withdrawal Agreement and #Brexit Worth a watch.  
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you  
'Brexit in peril' as PM May faces heavy defeat  
Massive queue today at 1630 for Eurostar at St Pancras after customs officers start industrial action over Brexit. #Brexit  The gift that keeps giving. pic.twitter.com/yj8gJHoyt7 
Says a man who wants Britain to be a permanent rule taker under qualified majority voting, subsumed into an EU army and adopting the Euro. That is the future if we stopped #Brexit  
So we’re back to distorting and abusing history for Brexit ends. All this ahistorical posturing is so far beyond embarrassing we really need a new word for it.  
It's insane that Theresa May has come back with a Brexit deal that would make this country a rule taker and give us no say on the things that matter.I can't wait to vote against it.  
I’m a lifelong @Conservatives voter/member but if MPs betray the referendum result & vote for @theresa_may ‘s appalling WA, I & many others, will NEVER vote Conservative ever again. MPs MUST vote for NO DEAL to fully respect the ref result, or lose power for generations.  #NoDeal 
Proof beyond a reasonable doubt that Scotland Does NOT need permission of the UK Parliament or PM of the UK to hold a referendum or leave this unequal union.  No Sovereign Country has to ask another Sovereign Country permission to Leave a treaty of Union @theSNP @ScotTories 
2018 was a referendum on Trump. Trump lost.2020 will be a choice. Democrats would be well advised to remember this. 
Even if we give Scheer the benefit of the doubt about Pizzagate, he is still doing nothing to distance himself and the CPC from the far-right.Look at his Rebel Media campaign manager, his weak response to Bernier's racism, thinking Brexit is a good idea as examples. #cdnpoli 
Thank you; indeed, we do not fear a No Deal Brexit, we want it.... on 29/3/19 @theresa_may 
I want Britain post-Brexit to be what it was in the Swinging 60s, when we were the cultural capital of the world! When we were something!  
My take on this week’s Brexit votes ...  
What is so extraordinary is how the cheerleaders of Brexit, who have been totally discredited, whose lies have been repeatedly exposed, are still popping up on our TV screens as if they have not been totally discredited and their lies have not been repeatedly exposed. 
The government seem to be saying that if there is another referendum then Brexit will be stopped. Does this mean that they accept that the will of the people has changed. 
Myself in the north, @Domhannigan in the south! Out traversing 4 separate border crossings in the space 1 kilometre along Coleman’s Island. A hard border would totlaly cut this section of the Republic off from the rest. #Brexit  
Brexit in peril if PM May's deal is rejected: foreign minister Hunt  
I'm off to Paris next week for a short break. What's depressing is how many people have responded with: "oh, lovely! I'd like to go but, you know, all the terrorist attacks."This image of Europe as a dangerous place: it must have contributed to Brexit. 
The modern world and rise of Athiesm tells us the Bible has no place in the modern world. It's always been TRUTH and LIGHT and continues to be TRUE.#MAGA #WWG1WGA #KAG #Brexit #PATRIOTSUNITED #wearethenewsnow #WWG1WGAWORLDWIDE #TWGRP  
No such thing as a good Brexit in the current world. I will do my job and do everything to stop xenophobic Brexit. 
The deal is shit. No deal is shit.The referendum was shit.#Brexit is shit. We don’t have to do this shit. 
So “holding a second referendum would stop BREXIT” ? Isn’t that an admission by you that the electorate NO LONGER WANT BREXIT ? And you want to deliver BREXIT to protect your party ? Interesting...  
"It’s five minutes to midnight in the UK. Brexit will mean Brexit. The British government and the British people are about to learn the hard way the real-world content of that rhetorical tautology," writes @DavidFrum: 
In other words keep having a referendum till you get the answer you want?  
London florists are already "stockpiling flowers" in case of a no-deal Brexit ???Who's going to break it to them ?  
Brexit: John McDonnell shifts from people's vote to arguing for yet another go at Labour's 'deal' which wd fit fine w May's withdrawal agreement - shambolic, fudged & total failure of leadership at a time when halting brexit & 2nd ref only rational route 
2. "No," they say. "If we let you choose the biscuit now, we would be disrespecting the choice you made." "But I didn't choose dog poo!" you say. But they make you eat it. And they eat it, too. Because there's no way out now that you know what's in the bag. #Brexit #Referendum 
"My parents and siblings look at me as if I’ve lost my mind"Not surprised!She's stockpiling water. Because we import water for our taps apparently! Look What Brexit Made Me Do: I’m stockpiling food for my family because we can’t afford a crisis 
The world’s media turned out in force to cover 100s of dogs who staged “the world’s biggest dog's dinner" outside Parliament to highlight the fact that Brexit = a recipe for disaster. Waiters attended to the hungry hounds for the sit down #BrexitDogsDinner 
1. Brexit: Your dad and your uncle both have a bag. Your dad says his has a biscuit and your uncle says his has cake. You choose cake. Your uncle opens the bag and it's dog poo. "I don't want dog poo," you say. "I chose that because you told me it's cake. Can I have the biscuit?" 
No majority support for #TheresaMay’s  #brexit deal in ANY constituency in the country:  
#BrexitDogsDinner protest today Jessie got a selfie with the awesome @Femi_Sorry We will all be impacted by Brexit including our dogs! @wooferendum #dogsoftwitter #Wooferendum Come to the Put it to the People March on 23rd March - we need to stop the #Brexit madness  
For those in the north of Ireland pressing for second Brexit referendum. Why are you happy to surrender the fate of the people here, to the political choices of the people of England? I want a vote that places our destiny in our own hands. #UnityRef 
If Brexit doesn't happen, the history books won't call it a scandal at all."You voted to leave the EU in a referendum and you didn't leave? Why not? Oh there was major electoral fraud, the negotiations went to sh**, Brexit voters hated the deal, so you voted to stop it? Fair." 
After almost three years of procrastination, duplicity, squabbling and utter confusion, the potential outcome of #Brexit is still yet unknown. I have narrowed the potential outcomes down to four. What do you think will happen? 
.@anneapplebaum is on the money (no pun) in this article on Crooked Brexit. Yet she, @carolecadwalla et al will have continued difficulty raising the alarm. Overturning referendum is a democratic powder keg, and exposing dirty money in UK an economic one  
Agreed. No one could be this incompetent. The process of ineffectual ‘negotiation’ and apparent bumbling stupidity has been carefully planned and choreographed by @10DowningStreet to engineer the failure of Brexit.  
“The implications for rebuilding devolution post brexit are grim; there’s even a growing sense that most of the nationalist community has had enough of living in the British state.” @TomMcGurk reflecting a growing sentiment#UnitingIreland 
I know what should be on the referendum ballot paper!!!!Do you....Want to keep your Freedom of Movement?Or lose your Freedom of Movement? 
If May's deal is voted down and no deal is voted down too, the only two versions of #brexit on offer will have been voted down, so brexit itself will have been voted down.No need for a #peoplesvote: #RevokeArticle50 
Seriously?Still with SNC?Haven't you guys got any REAL news to report?Brexit? Netanyahu disenfranchises the entire Arab population of Israel? Trump is still president?This is just lazy journalism. 
statement from the ERG:"The people who would stop Brexit should know just this: what you do, you'll have [to] do in public now. And everyone will know just what you have done. Stopping Brexit will be on you, not Brexiteers."that's us! yaaay we get full credit!!  #StopBrexit 
Brexit secretary met Labour MPs championing second referendum plan  
"It's insane that Theresa May has come back with a deal that would make this country a rule taker and give us no say on things that matter to me."@Davidlammy| #Brexit 
Rugby aside, the Irish & French in lockstep on the backstop and #Brexit. Bienvenue to  @MichelBarnier & @ChLambert_FNSEA. Important week ahead for @campaignforleo & @simoncoveney. 
EU Chief #Brexit Negotiator @MichelBarnier is off to watch Ireland v France in Dublin, with @campaignforleo & @simoncoveney no less 
People who only talk about austerity in relation to brexit e.g "it would devastate public services!" do not give a shit about austerity or the people dying on the streets right now. 
No, Brexit began with the EU referendum, which was Cameron's baby. He wanted to deal with the rifts in *his* party (he effectively put party before country). Lumping Corbyn in with May smacks of intellectual dishonesty on your part.  
The country’s defenceless against a Brexit right pathologically against the EU comes to a head this week. We live through an avoidable fiasco - the result of interpreting the referendum result as a democratic mandate for a hard Brexit. It wasn’t and couldn’t be. Hence the chaos. 
Brexit: Three-quarters of newly eligible voters would back #Remain in a new referendum.And young people are strongly in favour of a #PeoplesVote – with only 9% against it, survey finds.The next generation must have a say. Write to your MP. 
Hilarious anti Brexit rendition of Yorkshire’s anthem Ilkely Moor by the fab folks from ⁦@PeoplesvoteSWY⁩ ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ ⁦@campbellclaret⁩ 
Brexit doesn't belong to us. We didn't vote for it. We don't want it. We don't want to live with its cataclysm consequences. But we do want a @peoplesvote_uk on the Brexit deal.  
Brexit is one of those epoch-making events that we will look back on and ask ‘why the fuck did we let that happen?’, like the way we have polluted the oceans, wiped out the majority of large wild mammals and deforested the rain forests. 
The Prime Minister may be forced to resign if Brexit is delayed. @IanPayneSport asks: who would you want to replace her? 
John McDonnell predicts Labour will win snap general election as he prepares full BudgetThe Shadow Chancellor also vowed to stop a terrifying no-deal Brexit in appearances at the Scottish Labour conference in Dundee#JCP4PM2019 
On train to Swansea for an anti-Brexit rally. But just heard the dreaded words ‘bus replacement service’ from Port Talbot. So I may never make it. Yet again Chris Grayling makes it impossible to get anywhere 
The problem for John & Jeremy is that they’ve spent 3 years playing a blatantly two-faced game with the electorate over Brexit. Why do they think anyone believes a word they say now?And the desperate attempt to block Brexit by adding the word ‘Tory’ to it, is childcatcher-esque  
The #UK's 47 year membership of the EU has been like being in prison. We have lost our country, the #EU controls our laws, borders, trade, cash & economy. #Brexit is the only way to free ourselves!  #StandUp4brexit #LeaveMeansLeave @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns 
It’s all very well voting down this ridiculous Withdrawal Agreement, but MPs must also:* Refuse to take #NoDeal off the table; &* Refuse to delay #Brexit by even a minute.Anything less is a total betrayal of the electorate and risks damage to the economy and political trust. 
He's exactly right to say that both TM and JC focussed on party politicalk management (that's how Brexit began) rather than what's good for the country.  
The public has already decided, David. It doesn’t want May’s surrender deal, and it doesn’t want Remain. It wants Brexit, pure and simple. Clean WTO Brexit on March 29th.  
I can reveal Whitehall’s secret Brexit plan: stop it dead, says Anonymous Civil Servant 
I'm one of those young people. Personally I'd be more furious at the establishment trying to overrule the result of the referendum and using my generation as an excuse to further their aims. No 2nd referendum. Not in my name.  
What does No Deal mean?No Deal is NOT RemainingNo Deal IS WTO Hard Brexit!No Deal IS what the ERG want!No Deal WILL make Disaster Capitalists happy!No Deal WILL ruin everything you’ve worked for!No Deal WILL ruin your kids’ future!#PeoplesVoteRemain 
 While Theresa May's #Brexit madness continues, the rest of this Tory government are trying to hide from questions. We're not letting them.  
Too many Remain MPs and ministers have done everything they can to undermine the Brexit process, while the EU has been doing exactly the same.  
the urge to run away and hide in a dark room until we know for certain that Brexit has been cancelled is overwhelming 
Listen to NI Business not DUP on catastrophe of no deal #Brexit, says @StephenFarryMLA as he again stressed the need for a positive decision aimed at bringing certainty and stability, ideally through a People's Vote. 
My Labour colleague Gareth Snell has not supported the present ‘terrible Tory Brexit’ and I am glad to make this clear & apologise for suggesting otherwise 
The likely results of votes in the coming days reduce the probability of a no-deal #Brexit on March 29. There's a significant chance that the Commons will either approve May's deal (leading to an orderly Brexit) or vote to delay Brexit by the end of March.  
"I haven't met any #Leave #voters who want a #secondreferendum!" - legendary #Brexiteer #JohnRedwood crushes demands for a referendum re-run & the arrogant #antidemocratic #Remoaner #MPs pushing for it!  @ConHome @Conservatives @TheConWom @DCBMEP #Tory 
Will @theresa_may agree a date to go to get her Brexit deal over the line. Cant think of a recent PM who went voluntarily. They usually have to be dragged out screaming & shouting 
There you go @jeremycorbyn this is how you stop Brexit. Anything else would be supporting the Tories. #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote 
The irony of Brexit is that it has granted the EU more power over UK affairs than ever before - pleading for Article 50 extension would take that to a new level. 
The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks.The truth about the Brexit scandal, that you won’t see in much of the British media - from the paper that investigated Watergate.  
Whatever happens with Brexit I urge everyone to stop voting Labour or Conservative.Look what both parties have done to our Cities, Towns and local communitiesIf we let them continue what will this country be in 50 yearsWe must protect the British way of life for our children 
“I understand why, even though May’s Withdrawal Agreement was previously rejected by 230 votes, some Brexit supporters will now back it – “so we can move on”.“Yet, this view is profoundly mistaken.”Writes @LiamHalligan: 
Playdate w purpose?.@AmbJohnBolton could suggest inviting some of our allies to Mar-e-Lago -- @POTUS likes the golf course and spends a lot of time there. He could multitask and discuss topics like foreign election interference, nukes, Brexit, (you get the point) while golfing? 
The Scottish people are soon going to have a choice between the Uk or Independence. There is no longer the option the ‘status quo’. Brexit could lead to job losses. Independence would create jobs. #youYESyet 
Oh the irony of both Tony Blair and Alistair Campbell asking for the public to follow *them* over the issue of another referendum.For all millennials and those now old enough to vote, I urge you to type into Google;"Weapons of Mass Destruction"#PeoplesVote #Marr #brexit 
How exactly is ‘Brexit lost’ if PM deal voted down? All the Government has to do is hold its nerve, batten down the hatches, and get past 29th March and Brexit will be delivered. If if ‘loses’ Brexit, the party will be finished. The stakes are that high  
Good chat today with the lady at the supermarket checkout, who said "I don't want to leave the EU. I wish Brexit would all just stop and that we would stay in". Buying a @TheNewEuropean can open up conversation in an interesting way 
Responding to @Jeremy_Hunt, ERG Dep Chair @SteveBakerHW:“The people who would stop Brexit should know this: what you do, you’ll have do in public now. And everyone will know just what you’ve done.“Stopping Brexit will be on you, not Brexiteers. Don’t kid yourselves otherwise”  
#WooferendumStop #Brexit and save the country  
Meanwhile, as we enter this week of another meaningful vote on Brexit (or will May delay it again?), let us not forget the judgement of one individual who has backed Theresa May all the way throughout this needlessly tortuous journey...  
The path to Brexit - on the brink of UK's big votes, a look back at how they got to where they are now  
Don’t miss our live collage tomorrow by twitter phenomenon @Coldwar_Steve as we celebrate the release of his book, ‘The Festival of Brexit’. #Hackney #brexitbook #FestivalofBrexit 
MPs could save Britain from #Brexit madness next week -- let's make sure they do! Sign and RT:  
The ComRes poll that says public swinging behind no deal was commissioned by a Leave supporting group called Brexit Express.Nothing suspicious at all. 
How many times have you heard this now? They are power-hungry jellyfish that would sell their grans if it meant keeping Corbyn out of Downing Street. Gutless. Tories 'demand Theresa May quits by June' as her Brexit deal faces vast defeat  
WATCH | "I haven't met any Leave voters who want a second referendum!" - legendary Brexiteer @johnredwood crushes demands for a referendum re-run and the arrogant anti-democratic Remoaner MPs pushing for it.Support us at  
The world’s media has turned out in force to cover hundreds of dogs outside Parliament who are staging “the biggest dog's dinner in history" to highlight the fact that #Brexit is a complete dogs dinner.#BrexitDogsDinner with @Femi_Sorry @joswinson 
Progress: some commentators are talking of “a chaotic Brexit” instead of “crashing out”. Good. But what is “chaotic” about a change in our terms of trade which we have been anticipating for nearly three years? 
Leaving the EU on March 29th under World Trade rules fully delivers on the 2016 Referendum result. It means we LEAVE the EU and all of its institutions. It means we are FREE. It's the fear of this happening which is driving our Remain Parliament to remove this option this week. 
It is 18 days to Brexit Day: We Brexiteers must stand firm. We have recorded history on our side. June 23 2016. Remoaners hate this inconvenient truth.“When there is no enemy within, the enemies outside cannot hurt you.” ― Winston ChurchillLet's Stay Strong. No Flinching.  
Brexit is like a bloke trying to show off in front of the lads by farting really loudly, but he follows through and soils himself.With turds running down his legs, he tries to pretend that he knew he was going to follow through, and that’s exactly what he farted for. 
19 days until Brexit #FacesOfBritain #JoannaLumley 
If there was to be a Second Referendum it might as well be as follows...Question: Do you believe in following democracy?Yes. Proceed with Brexit.No. Disregard and repeat all democratic practices until a particular result is given before any result can be implemented. 
Police attack brexit supporter in Westminster today. Following the examples of French Police against #GiletsJaunes.  officer pushes to floor a woman with a crutch. 
Norway shows the UK a better way to Brexit  
Mogg warns the May: Rotten Brexit deal means we'll NEVER leave EU. Join us in Parliament Square on March 29th to protest for Brexit:  
Every Brexit deal imaginable is “worse than our current membership”  
Some people still don’t understand that democracy means that people have a say as the situation changes. The referendum was implemented and led to three years of failings.Now it is time to ask people again. #Democracy#PutItToThePeople 
So let me get this straight. The chancellor and government recognises the police needs more money to fight crime but will only spend it as a bribe, to make MPs vote for the Brexit deal. Interesting way of making policy.  
"Britain has become a place where untransparent money, from unknown sources, is widely accepted with a complacent shrug." And that money fuelled the Brexit campaign.  
If Brexit means anything, it means getting a deal that is worse than we have already. The only debate is how much worse the various options are vs remain, & whether the electorate should have a say in the outcome. If May crashes again, then morally there should be an election. 
The world’s media has turned out in force to cover hundreds of dogs outside Parliament who are staging “the biggest dog's dinner in history" to highlight the fact that #Brexit is a complete dogs dinner.#BrexitDogsDinner 
Foreign secretary says failing to deliver Brexit would be devastating for Conservative Party, so there you go, with them it is Conservative Party first everyone else last. 
Make Brexit happen, damage the economy and people's jobs because it will be better for the Conservative Party!   
Of course we need it but your MP route is to1) Ifnore half the country2) Make up her own mind about red lines without consultation3) ignores corruption in referendum and MPs that lied then and continue to lie now in her own party4) Tries to prevent Democratic review 
.@Jeremy_Hunt tacitly admits that public opinion has now changed and a fresh referendum would lead to the people voting AGAINST Brexit! Plus, that he is more concerned about the consequences *for the Tories* than the country...  
All but two constituencies want their MP to reject May’s Brexit deal | News | The Sunday Times  
Punchy from @SteveBakerHW after Hunt this AM:The people who would stop Brexit should know just this: what you do, you’ll have to do in public now.And everyone will know just what you have done. Stopping Brexit will be on you, not Brexiteers. Don’t kid yourselves otherwise. 
A post Brexit Britain should be outward looking; global trading; welcoming to skilled immigration; enforcing our laws and our borders; low tax and high energy; light bureaucracy and heavy on effective education. We can create a glorious future but first - we need OUT of the EU! 
"The risk of a delay is just a stepping stone to stopping it altogether.”Former Brexit Secretary David Davis discusses the possibility of “a Remainer parliament” delaying the UK’s departure from the EU.  
Jess Philips. Absolute personification of the London chattering class prejudices. Against Brexit, pro open borders, shill and moral relativist, but with a Brummie accent so they fetishise her as 'voice of the people'. Its just Blairism & Hampstead-ism redux. 
I see why some Brexiteers would view a second referendum as undemocratic, but one of my favourite lines is "by your FBPE logic we'd have to repeat the General Election too" - WE DO.  EVERY FIVE YEARS.  THAT'S HOW DEMOCRACY WORKS. 
French European Affairs Minister Nathalie Loiseau said that extending the March 29 Brexit deadline for leaving the bloc would lead to uncertainty and worry  
So this will be the first Presidential re-elect campaign in history that won’t be a referendum on the incumbent. When it’s Trump! This is beyond stupid.  
MUST WATCH: @Keir_Starmer: There ought to be a public vote and we will support it. Shadow #Brexit Secretary makes it clear Labour will support a #PeoplesVote 
you wanna knock a guy for going to a worse team to get a million or two is one thing. 30 guaranteed vs none guaranteed? cmon man. that’s not a referendum on the modern athlete. that’s perfectly reasonable, even if things got ugly. 
As May's shambolic Fake Brexit strategy continues to unravel, the calls for her to resign are only getting louder. She's stabbed us in the back time and time again - it's time for her to go and make way for a leader who believes in Britain!Support us at  
It looks more likely that Brexit  will be delayed or even reversed. Which Political party will you pledge your support to for a true Brexit  to be honoured & delivered? 
Even though the risks of a disastrous #Brexit become clearer by the day, our failing political party leaders still prioritise their internal fights and hold back support for a #PeoplesVoteSo sick of this partisan game-playing. We’ve reached the #timetodecide now. 
The best route now to proper Brexit is to make sure TMs deal doesn't pass creating a crisis big enough that her position becomes untenableAs long as TM remains in power we will not leave. If she's toppled, we will Brexit MPs need to engineer her resignation/removal 
Important summary by my colleague @whatukthinks (Sir John Curtice): -May deal widely unpopular-Leavers prefer no-deal Brexit over other options-No rise in support for second referendum-Remain has narrow lead in '2nd EURef' polls but no more than that 
Jeremy Hunt says delaying Brexit would destroy the Conservative Party. Yet another reason to cancel the whole embarrassing saga if you ask me #marr 
The problem is that Brexit is inherently divisive. It has been sold on the basis of “othering”, whether that is the “migrants” supposedly taking jobs, or exploiting housing and social care or the “elite” that a vote to Leave is supposed to punish.  
I'd like to point out that Labour can have all the same manifesto points with new leadership but actually be electable because they aren't institutionally anti-Semitic and pro brexit 
Reasons for Scots independence No.599 “If Brexit was the creation, in part, of this new world of offshore money and political influence campaigns, Brexit may well ensure that it continues unrestricted” A must-read from the US  
What Brexit is really about!  
Boris Johnson, Michael Gove, Nigel Farage, Arron Banks, Vote Leave, LeaveEU, Beleave...they all cheated and lied to the UK to secure the narrowest Brexit majority. Brexit that will hurt all but the richest. We have to put a stop to this  #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
J Hunt is reported on @BBCRadio4 as saying stopping #brexit would be devastating for the Tory party. Read that again.For the Tory party.Not even pretending the national interest, voters or even our neighbours, matter. It’s what it’s always been about: the Tory party.Jeeesh 
A group spending £340k since October trying to influence the outcome of Brexit and nobody knowing where the money came from is deeply concerning. #ChangePolitics 
Imagine for a moment what would happen if after #Brexit it was proven that Arron Banks' £8.5m came from Russia. A huge change would have been forced through by crime, and there would no effective  democratic or legal redress. What then for our democracy? 
Amused by NoleFam's Brexity "You lost, get over it!" attitude regarding Kermode. It's a good parallel, given that - like the Brexiters the day after the referendum - no-one seems to have a plan for what to do next 
Why are we all still fighting for Brexit when the referendum was fought and won by leave over 989 days ago? Imagine where Britain could be if once the result was in, we all had looked forward to the opportunities #Brexit offers. #LeaveMeansLeave 
The Brexit impasse we have now was planned in the Conservative Party before the last General Election. This was not an accident! The May governments intention was always to end with a No Deal Brexit. Revoke Article 50, now to stop this criminal conspiracy.  
Has anyone got any faith that in the next week our MPs will do the right thing or even the rational thing? #Brexit 
Extraordinary with Govt on ropes over Brexit great drama over Labour leadership at same time. Who’s out 1st? May or Corbyn? 
Ok #remain we only need to 1 kill this deal 2 get an extension 3 get a second referendum Jeremy KNOWS we would win. Dunno about you but I’ve definitely got wind in my sails. And fire in my belly! LETS DO THIS! #stopbrexit#peoplesvote#democracy 
Behold: a series of dog owners gathering to protest Brexit outside parliament #wooferendum 
This is the reality of what #Brexit means. Brexit is breaking Britain. It's broken our politics and will break many businesses. This isn't democracy. People were not told the truth and are still being lied to. If the reality of #Brexit wasnt explained, need to ask ppl to confirm  
Admit it: You don't understand Brexit. We're here to help. Two years and nine months after the referendum, the endgame begins with a series of votes, the first to be held no later than March 12th. Here's a a flow chart that outlines what could happen.  
OMG don't raise our hopes like that!!"The campaign to prevent Brexit is almost two thirds of the way to succeeding, the Foreign Secretary Jeremy Hunt said on Sunday." #Marr 
Am frustrated by @AndrewMarr9 not raising the illegality of the referendum or challenging @Jeremy_Hunt for wheeling out the same old rubbish about taking back control. The BBC are failing us 
MUST WATCH: Foreign Secretary @Jeremy_Hunt admits that now we know so much more about #Brexit, we would vote against it. It's time to #PutItToThePeople:  
Added to all that, promising a referendum that includes No deal as an option would make it unlikely that EU27 would grant the extension that would be necessary to hold it (why the hell would they?), thus potentially propelling us into No Deal now. 9/9 
Campaigning in a storm! Real sense of disgust with politics, some MPs contempt for democracy and wanting to get Brexit done.  
Whilst the British Government play Brexit games, Welsh businesses are left helpless due to the deliberate decision of the Prime Minister to run down the clock. 
Distressing to receive an e mail from an agricultural business in my constituency who have been informed by a specialist supplier based in Germany that they will not be able to export until April 4th because of Brexit uncertainty. 
So Keir..let's hope you don't make the same error Emily Thornberry did.We must he prepared to participate in the EU elections & have UK MEPs in place or you will de facto & de jure make the choice May's #BrexitShambles deal or No Deal #Brexit, ruling out a #Remain #PeoplesVote. 
Thirdly, the idea that it would disenfranchise a large portion of the population is, in a fundamentally representative Democracy, baloney. It's the equivalent of arguing that not having a referendum on re-introducing hanging for petty theft disenfranchises those who'd want it. 6/ 
'Brexit in peril' as May faces heavy defeat  
Baker and Dodds claim that a delay to Brexit would mean "democracy is effectively dead". The heart sinks at the sheer stupidity of this. Serious arguments can be made for not delaying. There's no need to be so thick. 
WATCH: @Keir_Starmer explains why Labour will not put forward a #PeoplesVote amendment on Tuesday - the vote should be a straight vote on the #Brexit deal.  
Just to clarify @adamboultonSKY - there isn’t any support for the PM’s awful Brexit deal coming from @TheIndGroup - we believe it must be rejected firmly on Tuesday: it’s paying out £bns in exchange for zero clarity on our future relationship with EU. Time for #PeoplesVoteNow 
"I am extremely disappointed with the DUP, really disappointed. This idea that they have been consistent. They have been consistently reckless with how they are handling politics in Northern Ireland" @lichamber #rtetwip #rtepolitics #brexit  
Play this as a loop-tape and you've got the last two years of Brexit. This monumental oaf sounds like a football manager who's still defending his tactics after a 7-0 defeat. Why is the BBC even putting him on air!? 
Any mandate from the 2016 Referendum (and criminal activity and wrongdoing in the Leave campaigns casts serious doubt on the strength of that mandate) could only be for the Govt. to go and negotiate a deal. 
I’m a UK citizen w/ an American husband, living in Berlin as a freelancer. I have no idea what my life will look like post Brexit so for the first time in 10 years I’m considering getting a job, maybe in the US. If you want a Helen, I’m open to discussions. Stuff I do follows... 
The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks - The Washington Post.And the more embarrassing that this becomes to the #BBC and people like ⁦@bbcnickrobinson⁩ & ⁦@bbclaurak⁩ who have in their public duty to inform the public 
‘London is the world capital of offshore banking,’Anyone who still labours in the belief that brexit will bring down the elite is willfully deluded. For the leaders of brexit this is all about protecting and making money    
Brexit is heading towards extra time. The question then is: to what purpose? 
I personally think it should be a choice between the negotiated deal and membership.The 2016 referendum was terrible because Brexit was undefined. So No-Deal isn't just irresponsible in terms of its effects on the country, but it's too undefined for a constructive debate. 
Public swinging behind no deal Brexit, as Tories and DUP urge May to invoke plan B' | via @telegraph 
This is Brexit.We voted against something that had its flaws while being promised 1000 different alternatives but ended up with options the country would never have voted for even though technically they do fulfil the referendum instructions. 
Say we had a referendum on the NHS.Do you want 100% publicly funded healthcare?Do you NOt want 100% PF healthcare?The No campaign promotes 100 different healthcare models to get us to vote against the NHS.We vote no then government bans hospitals.#WillOfThePeople #Brexit 
Any extension of Brexit has to be used to hold #PeoplesVote 
Young people in Northern Ireland have grown up with a unique ability to identity as British, Irish, or both, thanks to the peace agreement that ended decades of conflict.But after Brexit, some there are fearing a return to the past. pic.twitter.com/jzMaIk8nGR 
“Am setting up a dating website  Gammons 4 Love - you will get your hole post Brexit” #janeygodleyvoiceover 
It's far bigger than Watergate. Watergate was just somebody bugging a hotel room. Brexit is the whole political system being corrupted for a hostile foreign power. 
Brexit is a crime in progress and the cops are not answering 999 calls 
Opinion: The left-wing case for Brexit is becoming more ridiculous by the day.A Brexit driven by a hard right-wing Tory government cannot be what we need to protect workers’ rights, health and safety and the environment.   
An extension of Article 50 leads to Tommy Robinson as the next PM.Betray Brexit, and this country will never be the same again  
#PoliceBrutality is enormous trendy against disabled, peaceful participants of the #YellowVests movement  here from #UK: happened during yesterday's protest in #London, #Westminster #Brexit 
Simple question for Remainers.If EU membership is so good for the UK (& French) economy why do we have the lowest exports in the EU as a % share of GDP?Just over 30% of UK & France's GDP is due to exports. EU average it's 45%, Germany 47%.Why is the UK so low, the lowest? 
Gibraltar will be Brexit’s thorniest problem  
MPs need to show the EU that an extension has a purpose, that we are not just kicking the can down the road like the PM. Common Market 2.0 is the only Brexit compromise that can win a Commons majority and be agreed with the EU in time exit at the end of June 
If the PM loses the meaningful vote on Tuesday and MPs mandate the government to seek a short extension to Article 50, we plan to lay an amendment proposing a Common Market 2.0 Brexit compromise by 18th March 
Theresa May bringing her Brexit deal back to Parliament : “Insanity Is Doing the Same Thing Over and Over Again and Expecting Different Results”  
The biggest lie of Brexit was that there was ever a chance of compromise. In reality, it was #NoDeal or #Remain from the start. And if THAT had been on the ballot, the result would have been very different. 
May threatens “No Brexit” if mps don’t approve her EU capitulation. Her rotten deal IS “ No Brexit”.  
Let’s be clear, the main reason why the U.K. has been offered such a bad deal and why Brussels won't compromise now is because Remainer MPs continue to subvert Brexit..  
David Davis warning of a democratic disaster if #Brexit is stopped. No @DavidDavisMP the democratic disaster would be to force through a #Brexit corrupted by lies, hate, crime, cover-ups, threats of violence and foreign interference against the clear will of the majority. #FBPE 
Incredible. Jeremy Hunt as good as admitting delivering Brexit is about Tory party interest rather than national interest #Marr 
Ok. Serious question. A lot of people are, I'm sure, fed up with me & others banging on & on about Brexit crimes & foreign interference. While almost every other British news org ignores it. Almost all politicians. Almost all political journalists. So...what if it is Watergate?  
Jeremy Hunt helpfully sets out how to #StopBrexit. 1. Kill the deal. 2. Get an #Article50 extension. 3. Have a 2nd referendum. #Ridge #marr #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
The WaPo's conclusion is devastating - keeping London as a hub to hide money and sod everyone else has been the whole point of #Brexit 
That's because he is still a closet Remainer. Does not have a clue about Brexit. Part of a slippery Tory elite that will soon be swept away.  
Brexit is 19 days away. #brexit 
Join us in support of #Brexit outside the House of Parliament during next week's vital voting period!#BREXITBETRAYAL 
/True I consider the murder of our once hegemonic industrial base a crime by our rulers,institutionalised by the EU .I don’t think we can get back to where we were. But I want us to try. Selling ice-cream to tourists, fork-lifting other people’s manufactures, is no future #Brexit 
Brexit: No majority support for Theresa May's deal in any constituency, poll analysis reveals - So a managed WTO exit it is then, the legal default option that Parliament overwhelmingly voted for. MPs are required to deliver..  
"If you want to stop Brexit, you only need to do three things: kill this deal, get an extension and then have a second referendum" (Jeremy Hunt on #Marr)Great advice @Jeremy_Hunt - and nice acknowledgement that the UK would vote remain now. #PeoplesVote 
/It’s true I’m loyal to the working-class from whence I came but I had cut-suits and a cordless phone when Peter Mandelson hadn’t been invented yet. I’ve been at the cutting edge of political communications all my life #Brexit / 
A no-deal Brexit is better than a bad deal, and Theresa May's is a bad deal.  Ahead of a series of Brexit votes in parliament this week the hotel tycoon Sir Rocco Forte is urging MPs to reject both the prime minister's deal & the option of delaying Brexit.  
Liberal Democrats have been leading the fight against Brexit for two and a half years. We know that Britain deserves better than this embarrassment.Join our fight to give the people the final say on the Brexit deal and opportunity to stay in the EU   
Does @UKLabour support a second referendum yet? 
If you’ve been paying no attention, the pattern ahead of Brexit Parliamentary votes is this:1. Cynical building of hopes2. Timed release of exciting sounding information3. Reality gets quietened down by 1 and 24. The votes go predictably5. The level of risk increases again. 
/It’s true I’m white ( like most people in this country) but what’s wrong with that? I have four mixed race children and have represented more BAME people in parliament than anyone in history. And my mother’s side are Irish.”Gammon”? I don’t think so. #Brexit / 
Please watch. The Brexit right is a curse on our country.  
the poorest people in Britain are migrants, and Brexit is aimed against migrants, therefore by definition it cannot be a working class movement, because it excludes a part of the working class that is so critical to the running of the UK the UK will literally collapse without it 
...I'm struggling to see a downside here."Stop Brexit, Destroy the Tory Party" should be the new Remain klaxon.  
Nice of Paul Sweeney to admit that the next independence referendum is going to be a choice between an independent Scotland or a crap UK.  
Proud to be a member of ⁦@GMB_union⁩. Well done ⁦@Tim_Roache⁩ for speaking out. Brexit will usher in more austerity and the slashing of workers rights. That’s why I will vote against the PM’s deal on Tuesday.  
Public swinging behind no deal Brexit, as Tories and DUP urge May to invoke plan B. A survey by ComRes found that 44 per cent of the public now believe the UK should leave without a deal if Brussels refuses to make any further concessions, 30% disagreed..  
Wow, I have never been happier to find an iMovie video in my life. I randomly made this in 2012, when very bored waiting in an airport & after Boris’ incident. I had completely forgotten it existed. Until now. This really is the soundtrack of the Tories & their Brexit dreams   
Hunt on Marr - "If you want to kill Brexit you need 3 things to happen." 1) Vote down May's deal 2) Extension to A50 3) Hold a #PeoplesVoteIs that an admission that the 'will of the people' is now to stop Brexit?@BremainInSpain 
I agree. Thanks to Brexit the Enemy is plain in view.  
It is becoming more and more obvious each day that she has been planted there by the EU to scupper Brexit. This was always the Plan. We have a government that has gone along with this and is going against the people. They have to be swept away once and for all. 
Dear Tories, if you don't deliver Brexit you are toast. Tick tock. #justsaying 
Walk away .... Only way ....Tear up the  cheque ..............   Brexit: No majority support for Theresa May's deal in any constituency, poll analysis reveals | The Independent  
Hammond was supposed to ensure the PM had a strong plan for a no-deal Brexit, to strengthen her hand in talks. Instead, he sought to present a choice between profit or penury.  In this FT interview he doesn’t do much to disguise his strategy.  
Interesting that Hunt implies that if there were a 2nd Ref, then the outcome would be remain. I'm not at all sure that's true, but if he thinks so then the further implication is that he thinks Brexit should be done even though the majority no longer want it.  
If the people have changed their minds then democracy can only be thwarted by carrying on with Brexit.If the people have not changed their minds then another vote would merely confirm the decision to Brexit.Simples...  
“We have plans in place to ensure that we can get all of the drugs into the country in whatever the Brexit scenario. We’ve been working very hard on making sure that the NHS is there in all circumstances, whatever the Brexit vote” @MattHancock#StandUp4Brexit #Ridge @SkyNews pic.twitter.com/BlmvnRpw2k 
We don’t want your trashing Brexit.We don’t want you deliberately trashing our economy.We don’t want you making it so bad to trade that companies leave.You sold us lies.You used criminality to get it.We don’t want your lies.We don’t want to spent 10+ years in trade talks.  
What he said before this, though, is wonderful - giving a blueprint for stopping Brexit!  "If you want to #StopBrexit, you only need to do 3 things: kill this deal, get an extension, then have a second referendum."  For once, we believe you, and are behind you!  
Has David Davis been held to account for lying to Parliament and the public about the existence of Brexit Impact reports? NO! - instead, he  has been given a media platform to continue with his lies, unchallenged...(similarly for other Brexiteer MPs) #BrexitShambles #Marr #Ridge 
Ian Blackford(SNP) - Labour needs to stop shilly-shallying on a #PeoplesVote... they must join us in campaigning for a #PeoplesVote so we can protect jobs... #Brexit is going to hurt & we must stop it.#Ridge #marr #FinalSay #bbcsp 
I looked my Tory MP Junior Minister in the eye this week & told her - after a meeting where she came up with not ONE single benefit of Brexit - that she knows as well as I do that Brexit's a disaster & she should vote for what's right for the country. 
Hunt is right: BBC polling expert Sir John Curtice said after the local elections that Tories had been reminded “the electorate that it now has is disproportionately a Leave electorate… 70% of the Conservative vote are people that voted Leave… it has to deliver Brexit.”  
The backstop is the embodiment of the demands that Britain plays fair and honest especially towards Ireland . That the UK parliament see this to be insurmountable makes the EU even more aware that the UK may no longer posses those vital qualities.  #Brexit 
Which best sums up your view of Government’s haddling On Brexit so far? Vote and retweet 
British MPs voted for EU referendum, for Article 50 and nearly all elected on manifestos to carry out Brexit. To now argue that ‘no deal’ must be taken off the table shows they won’t back their country at crucial moment in negotiations. They’re doing Brussels’ work for them.  
The honourable @NickBoles claimed £679 on his expenses for Hebrew lessons so he could talk to his gay partnerONLT When CAUGHT OUT he gave similar amount to charity And this fiddler thinks he should stop our Brexit 
I’ve seen a lot during my time of campaigning, but this “Crossing the Brexit Divide” game, developed by @bbcworldservice and @BBC_News_Labs that sets a Brexit supporter against an EU citizen sure is something else. [THREAD]  
I’m under a deluge of attack from Waitrosers who think sneering at my age (younger than their hero Tony Blair) my respect for blue-collar work and not just  white, my culture (I’m a “Gammon” don’t you know), and yes my “imagined country”. It’s been a chilling experience #Brexit 
Jeremy Hunt says those campaigning to stop Brexit are almost two thirds of the way towards succeeding.  
So far so good Keir, but if a #Brexit corrupted by crime, lies, foreign interference and threats of violence is forced through against the will of the majority without a #PeoplesVote, it will create a disastrous democratic deficit. 
Brexit fans like to claim/state/perhaps believe that Irish exports are pretty much all going to the UK. Lets see. A thread, with pictures, on the % of goods exports by sector that go to the UK 1/ 
Delaying Brexit would do "incalculable" harm to public trust in politics, say Brexiteer MPs.Bit late for that, lads.  
.@IanBlackfordMP: The UK government must recognise that Scotland voted to remain in the EU. If the UK does leave the EU, the people of Scotland should be able to determine their own destiny, and have the power to hold an independence referendum if they choose #Brexit 
That’s absurd. It’s obviously down to Brexit & Trump.  
.@IanBlackfordMP the SNP does not have a majority in the Scottish Parliament. The SNP also lost 21 seats in the snap General Election. If anything, the SNPs support is dwindling. The SNP was born a grievance party and this is why they need to grandstand on Brexit. 
Jeremy Hunt, the man who praises Dictators & failed to  declare his 7 luxury flats because he forgot he owned them is seen here putting Party before Country by saying "Brexit not happening would be devistating for the Conservatives" #Marr 
The Lib Dems have led the campaign for a People's Vote for over two years. It is the only real escape route from a divisive and damaging Brexit. The Labour frontbench must stop making excuses and join us in this fight on Tuesday. @thomasbrake 
Northern Ireland businesses voice fears of 'no deal' Brexit - CBI  
.@IanBlackfordMP: The SNP will put forward an amendment reflecting what happened in the Scottish Parliament and Welsh Assembly this week - recognising that neither Theresa May’s deal or a no-deal Brexit would be good for Scotland and Wales #Brexit 
Interesting how Gordon Brewer's questioning of Ian Blackford (not part of the Government party) on Brexit is much more aggressive than his questioning of David Duguid (part of the Government party). 
Foreign Secretary Jeremy Hunt says there is "a risk… that we end up losing #Brexit… I think most MPs know in their hearts that would be a very big mistake” #Marr 
Senior Tories including Theresa May have used the threat of violence to intimidate people into accepting #Brexit. MPs are being terrorised into changing their stance on #Brexit. This is terrorist politics. It must not be rewarded. #Brexit must be stopped. 
Post Brexit Doctor shows us the new way to deal with migraines  
Young people who weren't eligible to vote in 2016 will have to live with the consequences of Brexit the longest. We risk creating a generation furious at the establishment for taking away their rights, freedoms and future without consent.  
We desperately need harmony in all senses - to reconcile, to fit together, to be in tune - a compromise on Brexit is not just inevitable, it is wise and necessary for any future projects we undertake together as a nation. 
Vast majority of senior EU & European government officials don't want to reverse Brexit. They don't think it's a good idea, they're sad the UK is leaving, but they don't want to reverse it – indeed, quite a few believe it needs to happen (in an orderly way)  
Sir Rocco Forte: 'No point in delaying Brexit' - BBC News  
Furious Brexiteer LASHES OUT at 'anti-British' MPs - 'We've waited long enough for Brexit! - Express  
Until the fifteenth century, China was the richest, most advanced, most sophisticated empire in the world. And then, for domestic political reasons, they became isolationist and closed their doors to the world. Centuries of decline followed.Sorry, you were saying about #Brexit 
Foreign Secretary Jeremy Hunt: #Brexit not happening would be “devastating” for the Conservative Party #Marr 
Whatever happens now - May's deal, no deal, delay, revocation, referendum - someone will call it a betrayal of trust. Which suggests a) all sides use it as a rhetorical claim b) the damage is already done and c) it isn't a useful criterion to judge which course of action to take.  
George Orwell would recognise the Remainer elites’ abuse of political language. Language is misused in order to ‘make lies sound truthful’, Orwell said — and that’s exactly what the Brexit-bashers are doing today, argues Mick Hume 
Hey, Labour supporters. Instead of saying ‘then have a by-election!’, try focusing on the biggest disaster currently facing our country, Brexit, which Chuka is fighting to stop. So, for the time being, maybe just STFU, eh? 
A delay of more than three months is needed for a #PeoplesVote. The EU have made it clear an extension to allow for a #PeoplesVote is on the table and will be granted. But if you oppose the longer delay needed for that referendum, you are standing in the way of a #PeoplesVote. 
Hi @Jeremy_Hunt, If you want to talk about “problems going to the very top”, here you go: Islamophobia Windrush Grenfell Knife crimePoverty NHS Crisis Schools Crisis Ruinous Brexit Homelessness epidemic AusterityIncrease in food banks Universal Credit #Marr 
Dear @Keir_Starmer What does "accepting the result" mean?Does it mean @UKLabour are reconciled to the massive fraud that took place during the Referendum? 
Jeremy Hunt just basically said the PEOPLE DON'T WANT BREXIT! If you're saying a new referendum automatically means Brexit doesn't happen then... use your head... #Marr 
And delivers music to the EU’s ears, who’d love to reverse Brexit. Unsure this is the best negotiating tactic in Brussels. (Hunt’s 3 steps; 1. Vote down deal, 2. Win delay, 3. 2nd EU ref).  
Huge admission by David Davis on #Marr that May's Brexit deal is "worse than our current membership" of the EU.It is only right that the public gets to decide what it prefers in a #PeoplesVote. 
The EU is not showing any signs of compromise - an extension would do nothing to resolve the problems with their very bad deal but instead embolden those who want to derail Brexit.  
David Davis told #Marr today that he is opposed to a #PeoplesVote giving the people the final say on #Brexit. He needs reminding of this:“If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy” - David Davis, 19 Nov 2012.Pls RT 
Majority of voters oppose May’s #Brexit deal in all but 2 constituencies, finds massive poll of 25,000 in Sunday Times⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ #PutItToThePeople 
David Davis is right, to extend the negotiations would be the first step of reserving #Brexit. Businesses need certainty, we just want to leave and move on. #Marr 
Jeremy Hunt concedes on #marr that #PeoplesVote could well be an end to Brexit. These people are terrified that democracy will thwart them. 
Jeremy Hunt gives fuel to @peoplesvote_uk campaign by saying that by the end of this week we could be two thirds of the way to a second referendum 
Former Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP "It's a dreadful deal... The issue here is the negotiating strategy has gone wrong, and it's gone wrong largely because the Government has abandoned the one thing you can do, which is to walk away if you don't like the deal..." 
Hilarious that @Jeremy_Hunt thinks saying ‘if you want to stop Brexit vote down her deal, vote down no deal then have a referendum’ helps their cause. A NATION REJOICES!!! #marr 
Jeremy Hunt, being unusually honest: "If Brexit fails [ie doesn't go ahead] the consequences for us as a party will be devastating." So as ever, Brexit is all about the Tory party. #marr 
To leave the EU, Britain hasn’t just had to negotiated with Brussels, it has also had to wrestle with powerful individuals in the Remain camp who never accepted the referendum result and who hold great sway over the media and the civil service in London and in Brussels.  
WATCH | David Davis warns that the "democratic disaster" of a Brexit delay would destroy the Tory Party, and predicts the Brexit Party would win a new set of European elections. He's spot on - the people have spoken & will not be ignored!Support us at  
Finally got around to filling in that post-Brexit food form. I've gone with Protein Slab B and the third option from the Fluids section. 
@DanielJHannan - "The reason Brussels won't compromise? It's hoping Remainer MPs will keep us in" #brexit 
Theresa May said it was her deal or No Deal now Philip Hammond says it is her deal or extend Article 50 ? They only want to sabotage a proper Brexit deal that the majority voted for ! 
I’m thrilled to get my hands on a copy of @Coldwar_Steve’s ‘The Festival of Brexit’. The pictures he creates are surreal, mildly disturbing, and hugely funny; and portray a weird, twisted kind of truth about how life feels in Brexit Britain.  
1 man and his truck. Cash but where are the people? I was told 250 People’s Vote/Best for Britain advocates would be on Don Valley doorsteps. No sign of any. 3 Don Valley residents lobby me in Parliament. Everyone is entitled to their opinion but don’t overstate it. #brexit  
The referendum was corrupt you haggard loony.  
FAO John McDonnell. There’s no such thing as a Brexit that doesn't damage the economy and threaten jobs. #marr 
John McDonnell says a Brexit delay should be for “as long as necessary”. Emily Thornberry says for no more than 3 months. Labour urgently need to sort of their line on this #Marr 
#Marr has been told Labours position on Brexit almost every week since September Last year yet here is John McDonnell telling him again. It's like he's doing it on purpose to stop Labour MP's talking about the most popular manifesto policies in the UK... 
David Davis - "The effect of govt losing this week makes two things probable." 1. No deal by accident2. No Brexit#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
A heartfelt plea from Conservative grassroots to the Prime Minister, published by the @Telegraph today...“Endorsing a bad deal or delaying Brexit would be a devastating blow to activists’ morale and voters’ faith in mainstream politics”#StandUp4Brexit 
No, DavidDavis (#marr): what wld cause democratic outrage would be proceeding regardless with a costly, job-destroying #brexit and saying to voters “You had your say 3years ago, now you must shut-up & accept whatever we come up with, even though it’s v different to our promises” 
@theresa_may @Number10press @Conservatives Please can you tell me why it’s ok to vote on your same Brexit deal (which is unchanged) 3 times in Parliment, yet apparently it’s undemocratic to have a second people’s vote on the EU? #Brexit #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
David Davis is trying to whip up anger at the idea of Parliament ignoring Brexit.NOBODY is talking about simply not doing Brexit. Right now we're talking about a delay because YOU PERSONALLY messed up the negotiations. Then we're likely to have a referendum on the deal.#Marr 
watching David Davis trying to explain Brexit stuff on #Marr 
David Davis is an unquenchable fountain of nonsense. BBC studios are becoming a sort of day-care centre for the incurably deluded. Where will they go when this #Brexit nightmare is over?#Marr 
Good to see @DavidDavisMP explaining ‘with respect’ what a brilliant negotiator he was when he was in charge of Brexit (and lying without challenge that everyone said Brexit meant leaving single market and customs union) #marr 
David Davis: "The day after Brexit happens the chief executives of Volkswagen, BMW, Audi etc. will all be queuing up saying we've got to have access to a £16bn market"AN: "What do you say to that?"MB: "I think it's pie in the sky, frankly". @lbc #marr 
Former Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab "...in the absence of any change, it would be difficult why the result on the vote would be different... I think we should keep the promise that every Conservative made in the manifesto that no-deal is better than a bad deal." 
Wishing Everyone a Happy Socialist Sunday. May/Tory’s continue Destroying Our Country, Bleeding  Our Every Resourse while running down the Brexit Clock. JC continues to be needlessly battered by the BBC/MSM with distortions & lies. Our future lays with what The Public Believes.  
David Davis says Cox’s ‘arbitration panel’ *might* do the trick regarding the backstop. Who negotiated the backstop? “With respect, the prime minister” says the former Brexit secretary. 
- It’s jolly tough, this exam, Border- You’d find it easier, Brexit, if you’d done some Geography and History revision instead of playing Call of Duty every night for two years 
Zero tariffs is a ludicrous outcome to a no deal #Brexit. It will mean imports flooding into our economy, making the balance of payments unsustainable and will cripple our own manufacturing industry. Where did these people learn their economics? 
Nowhere near good enough is it? #VoteMaysDealDown #Brexit  
The govt’s #brexit negotiations focus only on the Irish Backstop. The media also portray it as the only problem #Marr But it’s NOT the main problem with May’s #BrexitDeal ICYMI, here’s a list of fifteen other problems: 
Opening paragraph sets the tone, the government wasn't elected, it's in power due to the grubby £billion bribe they slotted the duplicitous DUP who, like Baker, is up to its neck in the Brexitscam over the mysterious £435k donation it received and spent on Brexit advertising. 
MUST-READ: there is no majority support for Theresa May's Brexit deal in any constituency, new. analysis shows.This is why the PM cannot force their Brexit deal on us. Please RT  
Janet Daley is, sadly, 100% correct. Number 10's entrapment strategy has taken No Deal (which is, of course, far better than the "deal") off the table. The alternative is delay  and an increasing of No Brexit.  
Ahead of the Spring Statement I’ve urged the UK Government to provide Scotland with the necessary resources to mitigate the damage of Brexit and end the short-changing of Scotland.  
"We've seen total intransigence from the EU."Former #Brexit secretary @DominicRaab says a "no-deal is better than a bad deal" if the EU refuses renegotiate.Follow live reactions to #Ridge as the PM is warned she faces another Brexit defeat:  
So, Matt Baker keeps banging on about the "six week medicine stockpile" he's organising against no-deal Brexit disruption... But that begs the obvious question: what happens in six weeks and a day, if things play out badly?#ridge #marr 
Keir’s a lawyer. The referendum has been judged illegal by a UK court. Respect that result, Labour. Thanks.  
Don’t vote for May’s deal, it will only usher in more austerity | Politics | The Guardian ⁦@Tim_Roache⁩ yet again showing leadership on #Brexit  
Theresa May told she must quit to save Brexit 
Britain is disillusioned & fed-up-Most politicians don't listen to ordinary people 81%-Gvt handling Brexit badly 76%-Mainstream parties don't offer appealing choice 69%-Don't care how just want Brexit sorted 55%-Parliament emerging from Brexit in good light 6%ComRes Mar 5 
Raab - "This is for EU to decide, EU need to work whether they've got flexibility"Sophy - "Well we chose to leave, didn’t we?"#EU #Brexit  
On Saturday, Labour announced a major new policy that would benefit millions of people who rent. It got the barest of mentions on the TV news.It joins the list of the media ‘disappeaed’ including Labour Brexit policy and the measures to deal with AS cases 
huh, so you can only pursue a second referendum once theresa may's brexit gets rejected? tryna think which major political party this has always been the position of, a position that 'people's vote' cheerleaders like campbell have always previously opposed  
Unfortunately some of the parties in the North are completely out of touch with the majority of people on the topic of Brexit!  
Over the weekend I’ve received lots of emails - all saying the same thing - trust in our politicians is at an all time low with many using the phrase Brexit betrayal. Here’s an article I wrote last week exactly on this point.#PoliticiansWakeUp#trust 
Twitter 2019:The place where grown adults complain that “the world has gone mad” when introduced to the fact of trans people whilst they simultaneously cheer for an economy-crashing Brexit and ignore eventual extinction through irreversible climate change.Gone mad alright. 
Brexit is only days away and we still haven’t a clue what we are doing. So what better time to interview David Davis, to explain how much better it would have been if only he had been in charge of the Brexit negotiations. #Marr 
Dominic Raab: "What the public want overwhelmingly is to get Brexit down. They want the finality of it being over on 29 March." Outrageous lie! Brexit won't end for years. Brexit Day marks the start of the proper negotiations, those on our future relationship with the EU. #Ridge 
- I say, Border, could you help one with one’s revision for the exam this week?- Aye, sure, Brexit. - The question is “Does being in the Customs Union solve one’s Irish Border problem?” I am surmising that the answer is “Well, of course, old boy”- The correct answer is Nope 
Which best sums up your view of government's handling of Brexit so far?Total shambles 66%Poor but improving 19%Satisfactory 8%Excellent 0!ComRes March 5, DK Excl.#Marr #Ridge 
Quick reminder, as we head into a busy few days of Brexit:Be respectful. Be kind. Try to think of things from other people's perspective.Your opinion may be different, but it's not better. 
So apparently Theresa May & Philip Hammond will offer Tory MPs a £20billion ‘bribe’ to pump money into public services - but ONLY if parliament votes for May’s Brexit deal. It appears that austerity only ends if the government gets what it wants through blackmail and bribery.  
@Keir_Starmer Why do you accept the result of a referendum won through criminality? A result that is was almost certainly influenced by Russian money. That is still under investigation by @NCA_UK Which has just been highlighted by @Channel4News only last week? 
Millions who voted Remain are wonderful good ppl, millions who voted Brexit are wonderful good ppl.This whipping up hatred for each other, character assassinations, class prejudice where does it come from and who does it benefit?Great thread  
Wrestlers need to realise that not everyone is cut from the mold required to work in WWE. That shouldn't be a referendum on whether you can make it in professional wrestling or notSuccess doesn't look the same to everyone   
Our polling with @FFSake_ speaks out for the 2 million newly eligible voters who overwhelmingly want the chance to vote on their futures and stop Brexit. 
When there is just 19 days to Brexit and the discussion on any Sunday programme is still just a vague conversation on whether the UK will have a deal, no-deal or extension. With no details, no plans, no backbone. #Ridge #Marr 
This. The billions wasted already on Brexit could have been sent to the North East, or Cornwall, or Swindon. Those billions could have improved lives. Saved jobs. Housed families.  
Relaxed open collar, neutral baby blue shirt, sincere stare, serious non-threatening hand gestures and smooth oration. This is still a man who is suggesting we use petrol to tackle our house fire. Which is the essence of EU Referendum 2.  
Young people deserve to have a #finalsay on #Brexit. Three-quarters of newly eligible voters would back remain in second poll ⁦@OFOCBrexit⁩ ⁦@BestForBritain⁩ ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩   ⁦@FFSake_⁩ #putittothepeople 
Please don’t buy the line “ it’s the uncertainty” that effects Business. That implies that once we know what Brexit looks like it will all be fine. But we are far from that and it’s the Certainty of a worsened trading framework that we should focus on... not just the process. 
Is the Single Market the EU? No.Is the Customs Union the EU? No.Did the 2016 referendum ballot paper say anything other than "Leave the EU"? No.So can anyone legitimately argue against the Deal, while calling those calling for a referendum on it undemocratic? No. 
Friends! My new record, 'Smash Brexit', will also be released next Saturday!Tracks include 'Baby I Love EU', 'You Can't Hide Your Lyin' Bus', 'Power To The People's Second Vote', 'Song For Our Guy' and 'Can't Live Without EU'.Talk about any other record being #BetterThanThis! 
I’m speaking on Brexit in Swansea tonight - 6pm, Village Hotel, Langdon Rd, SA1 8QY. All welcome! Makes me angry thinking of Grayling cancelling the Cardiff-Swansea electrification which he could have paid for from his dodgy ferries & other flagrant incompetence 
Opinion: The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks  
Dear Continuity Remainers,How dare you compare Brexit to the monstrous bloody tragedy that is the partition of Greater India.Tell ya what - my family have experience of valuing freedom and standing up for a free India. That's why I campaigned to Leave, for a free Britain.  
The UK must leave the EU on March 29, write @SteveBakerHW and @NigelDoddsDUP #Brexit 
This is surreal.It's being reported that Theresa May will step down in April so long as her deal passes this week!To put it another way, once she has killed off Brexit she is happy to move on.That tells you all you need to know about her. 
Which closest to your view?"Those who argue UK post-Brexit can be great, self-governing, free-trading nation are living in fantasy" -44%"Those who argue UK post-Brexit can be great, self-governing, free-trading nation are right, if politicians seize opportunity" -56%@ComRes 
Dominic Raab and David Davis both negotiated Theresa May's Brexit deal, they both failed badly and both walked away from the job. Now they both see themselves as senior statesmen, not the utter shambles that they are!!! #StopBrexit #marr #ridge 
Theresa May is warned another Commons defeat for her Brexit deal on Tuesday is 'inevitable' 
This week Labour will once againvote down the Tories’ failed Brexit plan. Our country has been badly let down by an incapable Prime Minister and an incompetent Government. We need an urgent change of approach. My piece in today’s @TheSundayMirror 
Is Labour serious about a second #Brexit referendum? Shadow Brexit secretary @Keir_Starmer tells #Ridge a three-month extension would be "doable".  Follow live reactions as the PM is warned she faces another #Brexit defeat:  
It’s clear that the thinly veiled aim of many in Westminster is to overturn Brexit.“Sources in both Paris & London say Tony Blair has been privately lobbying Emmanuel Macron, saying ‘You’ve got to hold firm, then we’ll end up staying’”#DelayMeansRemain 
When Brexit is formally cancelled this week, that won't change whether we leave the EU in the end, because Brexit is not the result of decisions taken in the UK. It is the inevitable by-product of the Eurozone's decision to politically integrate into a Single European State.+ 
Over 50 Northern Ireland businesses voice fears of 'no deal' Brexit in open letter to Westminster MPs  via @CBItweets 
With continued stubbornness from the EU, a new poll shows that Brits favour a clean No Deal Brexit. We're sick of being insulted and abused by Eurocrats - let's walk away from the table and go WTO!Support us at  
Shadow Brexit Sec @Keir_Starmer says that if there was another referendum on the PM's deal, in his view "the default" position for Labour "ought to be remain" - he says he would vote remain #ridge 
The reality is that it does not matter to Theresa May whether 99.9% of people are against her deal or even against Brexit. She will do what the tax-avoiding billionaire Tory donors want. The Tories have always represented the few but rarely has a PM made it so obvious to voters.  
"The PM is bringing the exact same deal."Shadow Brexit secretary @Keir_Starmer tells #Ridge Theresa May hasn't changed a "single world in her deal since November".Follow live reactions as the PM is warned she faces another #Brexit defeat:  
#CivilService is betraying #Brexit. During WW2 whenever the great ‘Bomber’ Harris met a Civil Servant he asked them:”What have you done to undermine the war effort today?” The civil service are part of the political class. They are our enemies 
Theresa May WARNED by Rees-Mogg: Rotten Brexit deal means we'll NEVER leave EU  
The country is United Theresa May must GO!!! They all must GO!!!!Possessed by Brexit?Possessed by the Tories?Time to call an EXORCIST!!!!Reverend Chunky #ridge #marr 
RAF jet on standby to fly Theresa May to Brussels - to save her Brexit deal  AS PM May's WHOLE deal is so bad and keeps our country under EU control. When she lands in Brussels can they keep her please? 
Brexit Pledge: "I pledge that I shall neither forgive nor forget the politicians who inflicted Brexit on us, nor the ones that stood by as the UK was harmed. Their lack of opposition and abdication of responsibility makes them equally culpable." (please RT) #ridge #marr 
POLL: No Deal support rising and public want Brexit sorted. Politicians must deliver what the people instructed them to do!  
Just read that the Chancellor is ready to offer to end austerity in return for the Prime Minister’s Brexit deal being saved. Yet more ideological horse trading at the expense of the poor and at the risk of public services. 
Disgusting almost beyond words. The vilest behaviour is justified and normalised by brexit. Brexit is a moral vacuum, a black hole, a sleazy, filthy corruption of everything around us that is good.  
.@Keir_Starmer:'Why we'll vote down Theresa May's Brexit deal for a second time'#Ridge #Marr 
My favourite quote from ⁦@ShippersUnbound⁩ this morning #brexit  
Nations are built on choice not chance.The choice ahead for  is Brexit. The choice is courage. And courage is contagious.Let's have the courage to deliver what the British people had the courage to vote for.It's time to Back Global Britain.  
Some days I look at my nearly three year old daughter and everything she’s achieved, and I think to myself, bless - she’s only two months older than Brexit. 
The public are swinging behind a no-deal Brexit 
I'm sick of this straw man argument that if a #PeoplesVote doesn't produce the result we want, we will keep calling for another vote until we get the result we want. If, knowing what we know now, the British people still vote for #Brexit, they deserve everything they get! 
You see this, right here, is what so many Brexit Fundamentalists get wrong. It isn't that the world was a better place when you were young. It's that you WERE young. And no amount of Will Of The People will make you young again,  
"We are good enough to stand on our own 2 feet.I call on UK Gov to allow us to take back control by leaving the EU on WTO terms. Anything else— be it an extension of article 50, a 2nd referendum, or PM’s pitiful dealand we will have been betrayed. 
87% of people who were too young to cast a ballot in the 2016 #Brexit referendum but have since reached voting age would “definitely” take part in a #PeoplesVote and 74% would back remain. We should NOT deny them a final say! #ChangePolitics 
Blair has been trying to sabotage Brexit from the start.  
On this, @EstherMcVey1 is right: democracy should be upheld. The 2016 referendum has been found to be a subversion of democracy & should not be followed by anyone who believes in our democratic values. Corruption, illegality & crime do not support democracy.  
What happens to UK workers if, after brexit, a government decides to build a bonfire of employment and equality rights? What's going to protect people? "May’s vague promises are thin gruel." ~ New analysis from Human Rights Watch.  
Fascinating graph in today’s ⁦@sundaybusiness⁩ demonstrates how Ireland’s economy developed in the 1990s in particular.  Important context for discussions around backstop #Brexit  
11. C. Little public transparency and guidance about consequences - for example, the impact of No Deal or the trade-offs between different Brexit alternatives. 
Imagine if all those politicians campaigning for a 2nd ref had instead invested their time and energy into strengthening the UKs negotiating hand and debating which policies to change/reform post-Brexit. 
You tell’m @Femi_Sorry Just when do we think the penny will drop that this whole thing is madness? Everyone who knows what they are talking about says it is so.  Time to rethink #Brexit  
"Brexiteer MPs"  I see most comments on here are from people who are not citizens of the UK, I dont know which countries you come from and I dont really care, BUT, the UK is supposed to be a democracy, if you do not fully understand this term, google it, WE WANT BREXIT. 
On referendum legality worth also reading this pre-Edinburgh Agreement article from 2012  in which 7 senior Scottish constitutional experts challenged the view that only Westminster had the legal authority to call an #indyref #indyref2 
The public are swinging behind a no-deal Brexit: Brexit News for Sunday 10 March 
So what will happen this week with regards to Brexit?Expect a dead rabbit to be pulled out of the hat tomorrow and in the subsequent 24 hours before the vote this will be HAILED by the UK media as the big breakthroughI predict May will LOSE the vote, again. Then....? 
I look forward to achieving #brexit on the 29th of March and for . @theresa_may and her frront bench cabinet remoaners stepping down ...... I look forward to it so I can ease back on Twitter .... completely exhausted by the apparent betrayal of the democratic vote of the majority 
A new poll, conducted by @YouGov for @peoplesvote_uk, shows that there is majority support for the PM's #Brexit deal in just 2 of 632 constituencies.It's time for MPs to vote down this flawed deal, and put Brexit back to the people with a #PeoplesVote. 
It’s scandalous for rebellious remainer MPs to say the Brexit vote is worthless and that they are willing to destroy the democratic “get what you vote for” rule which our country has demonstrated works to the whole world. ⁦⁩ ⁦@SteveBakerHW⁩ 
Brexit in a nutshell at my local Tesco - when this car was produced ( 1977) wasn’t we the sick man of Europe ? Maybe we could start exporting these magnificent cars once again  
“The British press helped condone austerity. It's now blinding us to the stupidity of Brexit.”I think it’s fair to say that our media have failed on Brexit. 
It’s scandalous for rebellious MPs to say the Brexit vote is worthless  
 must leave the EU on March 29Where there's a will, there's a #MalthouseCompromiseLet's get on with it. Go Brexit. 
Is he the youngest Brexit supporter they could find? Or is the message, ‘I help you get pissed cheaply so you can trust me on this?’#Bizarre 
It’s out of control: by the end of the week we could have no deal, no Brexit or no PM  
Brexiteer James Gray - who sounded in the mood for compromise when he spoke to @SkyNews a month ago - seems to have hardened his view. He says "no way" he can support this deal, calls for a no deal Brexit on March 29 
If England were having a referendum on anything, I don’t know any Scots who would purposefully go down and interfere, to sway the results. Yet we know folk from England came up to interfere in #indyref and I’ve seen talk of going to interfere in and #irishunity vote. 
Public want Brexit wrapped up... or ripped up?Increasingly, it’s the latter. #RevokeArticle50 
I am completely fed up with listening to May and her cabinet Brexiteers trying to shift the blame for the disaster that is Brexit on to the EU, when May's 'red lines' and the govt's sheer incompetence have caused the situation in which we find ourselves. Appalling. 
The only way to wrap up brexit in 6months is to have a referendum and stop it. If the withdrawal agreement goes through we will be dealing with future trade negotiations and our relationship with he EU for years.....  
Join us for "the biggest dog's dinner in history". To stop #Brexit, hundreds of dogs will be holding the biggest dogs dinner ever (with waiters, candlesticks & silver platters) outside Parliament on 10 March.It’s time to bark out #StopBrexit #BrexitDogsDinner #wooferendum 
But, democracy is all about the "will of the people" . And the will of the people in 2019 is that we don't want #Brexit. We now know it will be bad for our country. It will make us poorer and take away our rights. If #Brexit goes ahead, that will be undemocratic! 2 of 2 
So, if #Brexit doesn't happen, it will be "the death of democracy". What absolute shite! The EURef 2016 was advisory. It was not mandatory. It was illegal and would have been voided if it had been mandatory. And TM has regularly acted in contempt of Parliament. 1 of 2 
Steve Baker: man behind spending scam for which Vote Leave was found guilty of breaking electoral lawNigel Dodds: member of tiny party with extreme socially conservative viewsReprehensible that @BBCNews is allowing them to frame the Brexit debate ahead of this crucial week 
The BBC could be investigating the illegal referendum not lazily  pumping out questionable articles from newspapers.The corporation is diminishing before our eyes.  
How could a second referendum possibly be the end of democracy and undemocratic? That is the most democratic thing to do. Only those worried about losing would be against it. Which funnily enough would prove that a second referendum would be the right thing to do. 
What’s all this nonsense about delaying Brexit damaging public confidence in democracy?  There was no date on the referendum.  There is however a date on the EU tax avoidance legislation. 
Wow!!  Just 2 out of 632  constituencies across Britain want their MPs to vote for Theresa May's Brexit deal  
Place your order before 29th March, and Deal or No Deal, the original price on your Vantage, DB11, DBS Superleggera or Rapide AMR remains. #AstonMartin #Brexit #HWM 
There are clear pathways after May’s deal is rejected again in parliament.1. Revoke Article 502. Vote of no confidence in the Government3. New ReferendumIf the government has failed to negotiate a feasible deal, we have to think again. #RevokeArticle50 
Amazing revelations in The Times about squalid anti-democratic plots across the civil service.Future defence has fallen victim to this type of anti-Brexit stance by the officials who are supposed to work for the people. 
.@BorisJohnson and @michaelgove were the #Brexit ringleaders. They were supposed to be the grownups who would never have stooped to the lies they told. Their role will not be forgotten, no matter how hard they try. #criminals 
19 days to go and still no real  tangible,  measurable benefits to #Brexit identified, just down sides.Why are #Leavers so ominously silent on this. Could it be the penny finally dropped?#BrexitShambles 
Hey kids ! On Brexit you won't be able to work in Italy, Spain, France or Greece.IT IS YOUR GOD GIVEN RIGHT TO BE PART OF THE 30% YOUTH UNEMPLOYMENT IN THESE PLACES.  
For the avoidance of doubt:  if Brexit goes ahead without a deal, it does so against the advice of every serious business organisation in NI, and those proposing it must carry responsibility for the economic consequences in real lives. Brexit means... 
Ladies and Gents. This is what we call 'false equivalence'."Sure, the overwhelming majority of Doctors, Nurses, Midwives, Radiologists and GPs in the country say Brexit hurts the NHS, but Matt Hancock studied PPE at Oxford. So I guess nobody knows for sure" 
MPs should not be seeking to delay Brexit, but instead to deliver on their promise to get out of the EU on 29th of March 2019.  
Okinawa: Nationwide poll finds 68.7% respondents think Japanese government ought to respect results of February referendum opposing new Henoko base; 19.4% say no such need.  
The 2016 Brexit referendum vote crystallized divisions between cities and towns, young and old, the beneficiaries of globalization and those left behind. The divide shows no sign of narrowing.  
When I listed the top medical authorities in the UK, who all say Brexit hurts the NHS, the presenter says "Matt Hancock is health secretary. He's allowed his opinion" as if a man who studied Politics & Economics trumps the entire UK medical community when it comes to the NHS. pic.twitter.com/OEADKp3l8D 
Headbanger ERG types won't support a long delay or softer Brexit. Moderate Tories won't support a hard or no-deal Brexit. There is literally no form of Brexit that is simultaneously palatable to all Tory MPs, and to wider HOC. Theresa May is doomed - question is, will we be too? 
Brexit: £3.5m adverts ask EU citizens to stay | News | The TimesFirst they treat you like dirt and make you feel an outcast, then they hound you, depriving you of your rights. Then they appeal to you to stay in their country.  ⁦@voiceseurope⁩ 
Brexiter MPs warn that a delay to Brexit would be a "political calamity". And they're right. It would be calamitous *for the Tory Party*. Going ahead with a catastrophic no-deal Brexit, on the other hand, would be a calamity for the UK. Choices, choices. 
Today’s front pages sum up the national mood. No more capitulation to the European Union or recalcitrant MPs. It’s time to get on with Brexit.  
As Brexit Secretary, David Davis was never held to account for misleading Parliament. He stated that extensive analysis was being carried out but was then exposed that no such report was actually written. He is a liar who has caused huge damage to the UK! #ridge #marr 
The Brexiteer MPs are claiming that all 17million people voted for a THEIR chosen type of relationship with the EU. They know most Brexit voters aren't extremists like them. They know most Brexit voters believed we'd get a good deal.They're taking advantage of you and your vote. 
PM warned she faces another 'inevitable' defeat in her last-ditch attempt to get her Brexit deal through  
Sky News’ Stephen Dixon thinks BREXIT has divided all the parties at Westminster. Not the Scottish National Party Stephen - the second largest party in the UK. 
Remember during the referendum when the chat was all about how Remain was bound to win? The chat this weekend that MPs will definitely vote down Theresa May’s deal again on Tuesday has the same ring of...  
.@BBCBreakfast again leading with 'people will not trust politicians if Brexit is delayed' views of a Tory Brexiteer & DUP, but NOT balancing it with remain views. At least half your license fee payers (I've paid mine for 26yrs) DO want to see it delayed or cancelled, @BBCNews! 
Brexit is heading towards extra time. The question then is: to what purpose? | Andrew Rawnsley  
The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks - The Washington PostEveryone can see it, except British newspapers and the ⁦@BBCNews⁩ 
Raab is rightIt was (Remainer) ministers and civil servants, working hand in glove, who are responsible for this mess. Brexiteers were sidelined all along and were not given the opportunity to deliver a proper BrexitThat must change 
Labour - you will never be forgiven for making brexit happen.  Any of you 
The political temperature is rising once again. Then there is BBI & a possible referendum. ODPP & DCI are now as popular as the English Premier League in the country. All this, however, is masking the fact that the economy is broken & anything that can't be fixed, won't! 
We voted to LEAVE the EU and that meant not half in and half out it meant OUT. We didn’t vote for Hard or Soft boiled Brexit just to LEAVE! That’s what we WILL do on 29th March! 
I found the poll interesting. 66% disagree & 34% agree with the statement. If majority are confident that there will be more EU Referenda (Leave / Remain) we are confident of more instability & therefore instability of EU. Why would any country want to be part of it now? #Brexit  
My business suffered badly in the financial crisis, survived a raft of crazy building regs from the Welsh assembly, but Brexit pushed up our costs and damaged confidence, we closed it down last July. Keep fighting @DeborahMeaden , this is a disaster for our country. 
#Brexit will force Ireland to reconsider its own EU membership and I'd even go as far to predict that they'd be the next domino to fall.#Irexit 
It's actually quite staggering that the chief EU #Brexit negotiator Barnier would ever contemplate a proposal that would ultimately separate N.Ireland from the UK, it's divide and conquer but the fact he's voiced it doesn't bode well on @theresa_may her govnt and weak leadership. 
If Brexit is going to make the UK better off, why are those who promoted it leaving the country like scared rabbits? 
From the horse’s mouth - this Tory-DUP Brexit is wantonly threatening both peace and prosperity in the North. Shame on them  
HSBC’s boss faces big challenges in China and Brexit 
Brexit is heading towards extra time. The question then is: to what purpose? | Andrew Rawnsley  
Well you've certainly skipped over it haven't you? I didn't. I read it all.It's the headline to a July 1, 2014, long and highly speculative counterfactual piece of pre-#brexit pro-leave propaganda by Andrew Lilico.Headlines his 2014 prediction, not fact.#DissolveTheUnion 
Remainers: The EU is absolutely not an Empire.Michel Barnier: Give us Northern Ireland. #Brexit  
How an extension of ‘Article 50 limbo’ next week leads to the collapse of Brexit  
With some recent Polling now showing that 52% of the British Public do not want a  Brexit delay to last more than 6 months will our PM, Cabinet and Parliament treat that same 52% figure with the same arrogance and disdain as they ignore the 52% who dared to Vote to Leave the EU. 
We should be leaving 29 Mar fully prepared & ready to #Brexit with no EU deal. But had we made such thorough preparations UK’s robust position would have ensured a good EU deal was secured by now. @theresa_may needed no parliament approval to prepare for no deal, she just didn’t 
Northern Ireland firms warn of economic, social risks from no-deal Brexit  
Ignore that ISI sponsored Khalistani propaganda in London, no sane sikh wud shout those Islamic Slogans they are probably hired imposters by ISI. Probably pindi is distraught as it Referendum 2020 is getting  ZERO traction in Punjab. 
"I wonder how you got deceived by that kauye propaganda. It's tactless defeatist spin. Gandollar has lost by a wide margin in both birni da kauye. It's a referendum on our values." Dr. Ibrahim Musa#KanoDecides#KanoAbbaIsComing#AbbaGidaGida 
#brexit Can we have a rest Sunday for one day please. From the Remoaners, Snowflakes, & Libtards. All crying about Brexit all day, BORING 17.4 million voted leave the CRUMBLING EU. What’s the difference between a Remoaner Bore & a Crybaby     NOTHING.   
Arron Banks made a minimum of 8 trips to Russia in the run up to the referendum. He was Brexit's multi million donor-yet his businesses are bankrupt. The Legatum Institute and The Institute of Economic Affairs (Shanker Singham/Christopher Chandler CEOs) were large Brexit backers  
Interpol issued a red corner notice against Nirav Modi in July 2018 but UK still gave him asylum and a license to work. Can't blame the pommies. They have bigger things to worry about like getting screwed by Brexit. 
With tensions escalating, Britain's House of Commons leader said Saturday that European Union officials need to take seriously British proposals for ending the Brexit impasse before a crucial vote in Parliament.  
Great fundraiser by @UCPEgan and Harry Grewal with @jkenney. He reminds us that if the the UCP gets elected, he will either get a pipeline built or will have a referendum on equalization. 
IT'S UPON US...#MAGA #WWG1WGAWORLDWIDE #TWGRP #TRUMP2020 #Trump #KAG #PatriotsUnited #Brexit #WWG1WGA #QAnon @POTUS 
Could. It agree more.And you haven’t done that...just carried on in the face of a corrupt referendum.  And continued to lie.Three separate lies in one evening from 3 sitting ERG MPs .You cannot divide and win by corruption as you all have done and be able to govern 
The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks - The Washington PostExposing real reason for the Elite wanting to leave the EU,To save Elite their paying taxes, new EU rules making them cough up   
Official advice from this mad #Brexit Parliament to UK farmers: in the event of #NoDeal, kill your lambs, burn their corpses on a big bonfire & declare bankruptcy.Friendly reminder: the majority of UK Farmers voted for this. 
If Scotland meekly accepts Brexit, then we will follow Westminster down the plughole.Another future is possible. All we have to do is get off our knees and stop listening to those who would do us down. #Indyref2 
Now we know how divisive the referendum was, and how deep the wounds are. How on Earth would it be a good idea to hold another referendum? It would be like using petrol to extinguish a fire. People need to come to their senses and put EU Ref 2 to bed. 
I have put everything into this, & only in the last year has it started to pay off, where I can afford to live how most would consider normal. I don't aim for wealth but why should my wellbeing & hard work be threatened by Brexit?What is the positive? #stopbrexit please 
When Bill Clinton stands & winks, is it called a 'Bill Winksy'? When Bill Clinton kneels and winks, is it called a "Lowinksy"? Not apologising!#MAGA #TWGRP #WWG1WGA #WWG1WGAWORLDWIDE #KAG #PatriotsUnited #Brexit  
Theresa May to QUIT to save Brexit? Senior MPs reveal main contenders are 'ready' to lead  
New Scientist’s poignant quote from Nobel Prizewinner Paul Nurse:“The motivation for Brexit seems to be a turning in of the country on itself. Turning away from the rest of the world, not just Europe. And science thrives on the exact opposite.” 
Received an email from DEFRA: "We are trying hard to get a deal, but if we fail you won't be able to send seeds into Europe from the end of the month.... If this will badly harm your business, please email us". Can't sleep. Brexit cuts me off from customers. #stopbrexit please 
You're defining democracy as sticking to the result of a vote tainted by industrial-scale lying, illegality & dodgy psy-ops held before voters knew what #Brexit was.If you were a true democrat, you'd seek #InformedConsent for a #Brexit which is lightyears from "as good as now". 
Whatever happens, Brexit or no Brexit the last 3 years have undoubtedly damaged the country. Inward investment is down and companies  which have already left won't be back. The damage to the county's international reputation for fairness and justice is irredeemable. 
The VAST majority of Northern Ireland VOTED for the GFA,voted against Brexit, want (as a fallback) a backstop. The DUP want exactly the opposite of what the people want . Why ? Some investigations into a bank account Jersey will tell us soon. Run Sammy @eastantrimmp run . 
#Brexit. 3 completely wasted years. And here we are. The cliff edge. What now? 
Labour will oppose any delay to #Brexit that will require Britain to take part in the Europ$ean parliament elections, Emily Thornberry has said.So... no referendum???I now hate Labour. 
Big Brexit vote: What do I need to know?  
According to the Observer Stephen Barclay, the Brexit Secretary, has held a meeting in Downing St. with Labour MPs who favour a second referendum.Their proposal is to support May’s deal on condition that it is then put to a referendum.Why did he bother?Is this now May’s strategy? 
WTF? You plan to inflict medical shortages, food rationing, energy outages, travel restrictions & martial law on us in the name of toxic #Brexit. You're stockpiling rubber bullets & body bags. That's NOT a prosperous future.UK has become a Brexit dictatorship & you're a tyrant.  
Paul Kelly- One certain consequence of Bill shortens Wages referendum will be, Job creation will dry up and unemployment will go up. #auspol #pmlive #amagenda 
Northern Ireland firms warn of economic, social risks from no-deal Brexit  
We currently trade as follows:EU/EEA 53% best-in-class trade termsEU FTAs 14%WTO+++ via EU trade facilities 16%WTO basic terms 16%#Brexit downgrades all our trade to WTO basic. Can the Con in charge of the single braincell you share explain how that makes us more prosperous?  
It is our children who will suffer most from Brexit.Therefore we should hold a second referendum but only allow under 12s to vote. 
Your refusal to disclose your funding source suggests that it's Putin. Until you prove otherwise I and others will regard you as a Putin tool, and therefore a traitor.#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Interesting that this gives the impression that a People's Vote isn't really wanted by ScotsCan't blame them really as they already voted against Brexit but Little England will crash them out.Maybe they're now thinking it's either EU or UK  
I predict we could see a dramatic rise in "shy Leavers" after Brexit Day: people who voted for Leave, but will refuse to admit to it once the full impact of what we've done to ourselves hits home. (Obviously that doesn't apply to prominent figures, but to the general public.) 
BREXIT DIVORCE MAN: “you know we agreed to share custody of the kids well actually now I want full custody but if you dont agree I will go and live in a shed on my own or possibly stay married to you I’m not sure yet why are you so unreasonable” 
More evidence that Labour leadership don’t want to stop Brexit. They want to facilitate Brexit. “Thornberry: We want short delay to avoid EU election” 
The lying carries on in the #SpanishShowTrial. Where is the evidence of "Most people Spanish police officers encountered at polling stations in the 2017 referendum showed highly violent behavior"? Opposite evidence is abundant, yet refused in this court. 
And they would still pound the Brexit button. Nobody’s changed their mind around here  
A clean WTO Brexit would wipe the smirks off their faces.   via @MailOnline 
Not as amazing as this....... 
Theresa May’s deal is NOT BREXIT.  It is worse than EU membership. 
If Brexit belongs to me, I wish to return to sender. Like or RT if you agree.  
Theresa May's Brexit deal is less popular than Plague: "Constituency-by-constituency analysis by YouGov of more than 25,000 voters shows that in only two out of 632 constituencies do a majority of voters want their MP to back Theresa May’s Brexit deal." 
On Brexit are we ready to admit:1. Divide and rule won’t work;2. The EU won’t throw Ireland under the bus;3. German car manufacturers won’t force Merkel to give us a good deal; and4. The EU won’t fold at the threat of no deal? 
There's fab #Brexit graphics (eg @Usherwood @jonworth) but for a basic tabular guide thru' w/c 11/3 (only), here's my effort. Covers only highest-level options; UK not EU; just sets out possibilities in logic/law. Should be poss to cross off at least 2 possibilities by end-14/3. 
The simplest and most realistic solution to this dilemma, like every dilemma raised by Brexit is for the UK to remain in the EU! 
#Brexit is not a victimless crime.It's ruined businesses, lost livelihoods, hard-earned success trashed .It's gnawing anxiety, sleepless nights & heartache.#stopbreximisconduct 
Little Engländer: they hate the EU, but apparently love our wine, our Christmas markets, our beaches, our forests, our cheese and our cars... But they do not speak our languages and they hate our people! Bollocks to them and bollocks to Brexit! 
 MPs could save Britain from Brexit madness next week -- let's make sure they do! Sign and RT /#EU #Brexit  
We were promised by the PM we would leave the EU on the 29th March. We were promised “no deal is better than a bad deal” You promised Iraq had WMDs and was a threat to the U.K, you promised a referendum on EU treaties/changes twice and failed to deliver. The audacity of you.  
The Northern Ireland Brexit trilemma:The UK wants to simultaneously:1. Leave the single market and customs union, 2. Avoid a hard border/ need for magical / technological solutions 3. Keep NI aligned to the UKYou can have any 2 of these 3 but not all 3 at the same time 
History will judge @Jeremy_Hunt and the entire Tory govt for failing unite the country and negotiate a Brexit deal that would satisfy most. Their red lines, intransigence & incompetence have cost us dear. #SpecialPlaceInHell 
There’s the occupied territory in the North that someday (and thanks to #Brexit that day is fast approaching), will rejoin Ireland  
Just to explain.#Brexit  
☆Brexit bombshell!☆More info on May's rotten deal, pointing again to it being a deal prepared by Merkel!Please RT far & wide so everyone can see that May appears to have sold us out to EU!@BrexitKnight@SocialM85897394@DVATW@gerardjasper@Mitchel06512105@bolt_adrian 
Yes! Public swinging behind no deal Brexit, as Tories and DUP urge May to invoke plan B' | via @telegraph 
It was on every TV in the lounge - Dean and Panahi running conspiracy theories on Brexit and Climate change. UK tourists near me assumed this reflected mainstream Aus opinion. 
Ryanair boss calls Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn ‘idiots’ and says Brexit should be reversed  
In the unlikely instance that #Brexit happens on 29th...I can assure - to your great disappointment - that me, @Femi_Sorry , @Andrew_Adonis, @mikegalsworthy and @JasonJHunter won't be going anywhere.... 
I am fed up to my back teeth with the dozens of MPs on here saying they can do nothing about #Brexit.You are MPs. Your job is to vote on things, to decide what the country will do. YOU CAN STOP BREXIT IN A DAY.If you won't do your job, resign, now.Otherwise, #StopBrexit. 
You do realise you’re a politician too @Nigel_Farage? Admittedly one who has failed to get into Westminster 7 times but still one of many politicians that have sold the people of the UK an absolute pup in #Brexit  
Huge new poll shows voters in just 2 out of 632  constituencies across Britain want their MPs to vote for May's Brexit deal   
Dear Public,Extension or not, Brexit will not be "wrapped up in six months".It will not be "wrapped up" in a year either. Not in two.Not in three...Not in a decade. If Brexit goes ahead it will be the future. For a very long time.  
As Clean Brexit has become the likeliest and preferred option the Tories have risen in the polls.  You’d think someone in CCHQ would have noticed this pattern.  I too will never vote Conservative again if we don’t leave cleanly on March 29th 2019. 
No need. If you want real life, living dinosaurs etc.. Then I give you the DUP . #Brexit #Ireland 
We have to deliver Brexit But it will wreck the country 17.4 million people voted for it. The people need to be respected.There are 65 million people in Britain. So 70% of the population didn't vote for Brexit.The people Yes. The people Democracy 
Democracy?The Brexit ref was advisoy, gerrymandered, contained no thresholds and your wafer-thin win was won with lies, illegal funding and illicit online marketing.Fact is, if the ref had been binding, it would have been anulled. It was THAT corrupt  
There is so much in this story it’s hard to know where to begin.• PM in peril• Government may fall• Chancellor dangling billions for Brexit votes• Plane on standby for emergency talks• Still no idea what Brexit will look likeTruly these are tumultuous times.  
Hammond claims that May’s Brexit deal will free up £20 billion as a “Brexit Bonus”. Nonsense. May’s deal will COST £39 billion, and deny money that could have been spent on domestic priorities. 
Amazing that a guy has spent 350k on hard Brexit Facebook ads but won’t say where he got it  
March 29th should be our independence day, but our politicians are trying to stop Brexit. Parliament Square, 29th March will be a historic rally of Brexiteers to tell those in power not to betray Brexit. Be there!  
Jess Phillips has hit the nail on the head. MPs must do what is best for the people they represent. Brexit is a disaster for the UK so don’t vote for it. End this nightmare and #RevokeA50 or give us a #PeoplesVote 
Another deranged tweet from the PM. I really believe that we are witnessing the death of #Brexit. That's something that will restore sanity. Hopefully, we can then put this whole sorry mess behind us and start healing divisions and address the problems which led to Brexit. 
Brexit is an older generation of politicians deliberately removing the rights & futures of the young, against their wishes & best interests. New survey: 3/4 of newly eligible voters wd back Remain. Only 9% of young people are against #PeoplesVote. 
@jessphillips actually said the Labour Party has to stand for *something* or it is nothingFor example, if it, or you, can't stand against #Brexit when you see something like this, then what actually *do* you both stand for? 
An absolute must-read for pretty much anyone interested in #brexit. How Britain’s dark history with Ireland haunts Brexit. Top-notch ⁦@gavinsblog⁩ ⁦@NewStatesman⁩ 
Public swinging behind no deal Brexit, as Tories and DUP urge May to invoke plan B  
Remainers seem to be trying to rewrite the English language. Brexit supporters are "extremists", "hardliners", "ultras". Remainers are "centrists", "moderates". But actually there are just "democrats"- who want the referendum result implemented- and "anti-democrats", who do not. 
Let me be blunt:The anti-expert thing just has to die outExpertise is part of our evolution as a species. Access to medical/tech experts is a huge factor in human survival ratesIf you know the UK medical community opposes Brexit but disregard it, you're part of the past.  
Of the 635 consitutencies, only 2 would back May's Brexit deal, according to YouGov. So if more than 2 MPs vote for the WA, they will be voting for themselves and their party, not for their constituents.Politics is broken. #theindgroup #Putittothepeople 
Nope. You don’t get to hand ownership of this shit-show to me. Brexit belongs to those who promoted it, those who voted for it and who are too stupid to change their minds, and those who continue to agitate for it. 
SUNDAY TIMES: PM told: quit to save Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
No. Even if Mrs May’s Brexit deal passes, her troubles remain. Conservatives have never been more fragile as cracks extend further and deeper. That would a whole lot closer to the truth and reality.   
I used to be a ladyNot a curse word would I spillA gentle soul, a delicate budAt least that was untilFucking bollocking bastarding shitting BrexitTwatting cunting arsing dicking LexitI used to be so niceJust sugar and some spiceNow it's all just frigging freaking frexit 
Society thrives when older generations want younger generations to get more opportunities and prosper more than themselves. To achieve this, the older generations lay the foundations to enable this. Tragically, Brexit is having the diametrically opposite effect. 
Oddly, we are dissuaded from using the term “dark forces” by people who are forever talking about “dark money”. Any explanation for this latest example of political correctness disappearing up its own fundament? #Brexit 
When @Femi_Sorry tells @danwootton & @rogergewolb that the highest medical authorities in the UK say Brexit will hurt the NHS, Wootton says it's just their 'opinion'.Femi was NOT happy.  
In a letter sent to Mrs May yesterday, dozens of senior grassroots figures, including @michaelgove & @GavinWilliamson’s association chairmen, warn: "Endorsing a bad deal or delaying Brexit would be a devastating blow to activists’ morale and voters’ faith in mainstream politics." 
Through the great Stop Brexit campaign I have got to know Britain’s Labour, Tory, Green, Lib Dem, SNP & Plaid MEPs. What committed & impressive public servants they mostly are! And what a pity we have done so little to forge links between Westminster & the European Parliament 
"It came as 74 senior Tory activists, including more than 50 association chairman, told Mrs May that Conservative voters "do not fear a no deal exit" and "just want Brexit delivered." 
Britain’s Future has spent over £340,000 promoting hard brexit – but once again no one knows who’s funding it adverts who urge voters to email their local representative and create the impression of a grassroots uprising for a no-deal Brexit.  
The Government cannot fool the voters over Brexit' | via @telegraph 
This is your brexit. You own it. 
Two years and nine months after the Brexit referendum, the endgame begins with a series of votes, the first to be held no later than March 12th. Here's a handy visual guide to understand exactly what might happen.  
Sunday @Telegraph claims public opinion is "swinging behind" a no-deal #Brexit based on a @ComRes poll 
What has happened to Sky News? It's completely lost the plot. First it was a campaign for televised leaders' debates, then they turned into the "Brexit Crisis" channel campaigning against Brexit and now they are campaigning to bring ISIS jihadis back here TO cayuse mayhem. Why? 
Glad to see @SunScotNational raising a real world impact of brexit. Delighted to work with @BobDorisSNP to try keep us in vital lifesaving networks. 
Its becoming plain to see that both @theresa_may and @jeremycorbyn are now working VERY closely together to make sure Brexit happens on the 29th regardlessThese two news items on the same day attacking the exact same problem, but from different sides 
So many people saying how wonderful no deal #Brexit & WTO will be. I wonder why every other country isn't doing the same. Why does everyone else spend so much effort negotiating trade agreements? Apparently, it's unnecessary. 
#MaySummonsThe illegal behaviour from 2016 is going to be repeated in 2019.It's already started (although it's not yet during the official campaign, so it's legal)Obscure no-deal Brexit group is UK's biggest political spender on Facebook 
If anyone sees @MichelBarnier in Dublin for the rugby, just buy him a pint and I'll pay you back #brexit 
Support for no-deal Brexit backed by public as poll finds growing number think UK should leave without a deal  via @Telegraph 
There are 65 million people in the UK. 17 million decided they wanted to leave the EU. Forget the illegality, forget the lies, forget foreign involvement...the reality is it was a minority that expressed a wish to leave, it was not the will of the country. End of.#Brexit 
#Brexit does NOT & will NEVER belong to me.We will NOT be prosperous as a result.We expect politicians to do the RIGHT THING, NOT implement the narrow result of a referendum which was won ILLEGALLY & with foreign interference We demand you #PutItToThePeople to #STOPBREXIT 
Last week I was shortlisted as PI on a European Research Council Synergy Grant for €10M. If funded and no-deal Brexit happens, I can’t be PI. Luckily my coapplicant is well capable of leading, but overall this would be a belly blow for British science. 
In for May... in for May... they’ve all got it in for May... Downing Street braced for ‘Ides of March’ as leadership rivals gear up and Brexit deal hopes fade... tomorrow’s Mail on Sunday has all the details.  
Excuse me @EmilyThornberry but this silly idea ends withEither@UKLabour forced back May's Tory BrexitOrA No deal BrexitEven if we get a 2nd referendum, same choiceDeliberately screwing usYou've not thought this through?Or maybe you have? 
On the face of it, putting the #Brexit question back to the people by giving them a #PeoplesVote would seem to be the most democratic thing to do. It is the most democratic thing to do. But, is it the best thing to do, when we can stop this nightmare right now.  #RevokeArticle50 
Your health minister can't guarantee that your Brexit won't straight up kill people. 
165 likes and 1,500 cries of despair. How do you feel your tweet went down? It's not our Brexit and if you force us out with an illegitimate mandate, we'll be fighting to rejoin, ON ANY TERMS! We'll never support YOUR catastrophic and illegitimate Brexit!  
I now want the Queen to burst into the Commons, and shout “we do not give a fuck about your fixed-term parliament act – you are all fucking fired”, stop Brexit, and set her Corgis on the ex-Cabinet. 
Notice how the PM and Tories now say Brexit belongs to all of us. I notice when Tories thought it would bring glory to the Tories they owned it. Now u have made a bollocks, we own it. Nothing new with Tories blaming everyone else! 
The most consistently brilliant blog on Brexit is @chrisgreybrexit’s, and the latest entry is no exception. Quite the contrary. 
Ludicrous nonsense does not lie only on the right-hand side of the political spectrum in Britain. This hankering after past “glories” - if that’s what they ever were - borders on the childish #Brexit #brexitshambles 
From Day 1 it has been obvious - who are the Brexit winners? Not Grimsby or Stafford, Sunderland or Derby - Russia / the USA and the tax dodgers like Rees Mogg who want us to be a little Singapore on the edge of Europe. "The People" were conned.  
For those that are not aware, Labour’s most recent Campaign for Federalism started in 2015. It hasn’t tweeted since 2015. It’s this kind of disingenuous posturing that led to Scotland being tethered to this Brexit mess.  
Policewoman pushes over a Brexit protester on crutches. What an absolute disgrace.SACK HER!  
Great turnout for @Andrew_Adonis and @SHKMEP at short notice in Eddisbury this evening.The constituents have made their Brexit thoughts very clear.They are lucky to have a principled MP in @Sandbach who will act in their best interest. 
If they’re going to waste hundreds of thousands of pounds on an ad campaign to change my mind about the disaster that Brexit is going to be, they could at least use the photo on the right... 
There's nothing Left Wing about Brexit.It builds borders, removes rights, lessens equality of opportunity and diminishes our values of internationalism, common endeavour, cooperation and solidarity.It's a right wing project Labour MPs must vote down. 
Doesn’t belong to me! I didn’t vote for it! I’m certainly not taking responsibility for it.Brexit belongs to those that voted for it, as do the outcomes. You broke it, you bought it! 
Dear MPs, please try and remember, before this all gets very nasty, that you are elected by us to represent us. Not yourselves. We voted to leave the EU. Not the WA, not any version of soft Brexit Remain but to leave - per your manifestos. 
The struggle to defeat Brexit is turning into a political version of the Napoleonic Wars – protracted and diffuse, with months, even years, of indecisive engagements. But we may be approaching Waterloo.By @Andrew_Adonis 
Brexit just gets shittier and shittier... pic.twitter.com/fqIch8NqFW 
Ian McShane has also spoken to Newsweek about Brexit and Trump. And it's thing of beauty forever.  
Delighted to join with @Andrew_Adonis in #Eddisbury this evening arguing for #brexit @peoplesvote_uk - delighted to see so many constituents speak so highly of @Sandbach appreciative that they have such a strong voice in @HouseofCommons - 23 March #peoplesvotemarch see u there! 
Has there ever been anyone more duplicitous in office? A WTO Brexit will match up to what people voted for @theresa_may The British people will not be conned by a second rate deceiver such as yourself. Don’t you dare try and keep us in beyond the 29th of March. 
Calling all lawyers! Are there any grounds you're aware of for individual or corporate Brexit-related class action lawsuits against either the UK Government as a whole, or particular departments, or even specific MPs? (May be a daft question, sorry - I don't know...) 
What complete and utter claptrap.Your stinking Brexit is yours and yours alone.As for “more prosperous future” - try reading HMG’s own impact assessments. You know, and we know, that any Brexit will have a very negative effect on prosperity.  
Businesses are screaming out for certainty – which is why delaying Brexit would be so alarming - Tom Bohills  
EU law recognises animals as sentient beings, aware of their feelings and emotions, but this legal protection is not guaranteed post-Brexit. We're urging governments in the UK to provide a #BetterDealForAnimals. Show your support by signing here:  
Brexit is nothing to do with me, proud to be one of the 48 million who didn’t vote and won’t accept it. 
The solid rule of trying to comprehend #Brexit: every day you find something more and more ridiculous about it, and something that is harder to solve than you ever thought before.456 hours to go, folks!  
People who think "no deal" is a good idea have no clue what they're suggesting. A responsible gov wouldn't even offer that option in a referendum. Why do people suppose other countries go to so much trouble to negotiate trade agreements? 
Totally loving this video from yesterday! Thank you @MaryCreaghMP for your support and vocal prowess ... you picked up the lyrics fast  "This Brexit deal is naff!" #PutItToThePeople #FinalSay@NYorksEurope @Best4Doncaster @SheffEurope @bradfordeurope @York4EU @LeedsEurope 
Everything else is Remain minus, every Brexit deal shrinks the economy. Every one means less money for public spending, fewer jobs and lower rights.Every Labour MP is a representative, not a delegate. Every Labour MP should vote against less for working people.#PeoplesVote 
It certainly does! Nigel has fought 25yrs for our freedom from the corrupt EU system.Our fight for BREXIT & our independence has opened everyone's eyes to the insidious corruption, dishonesty & greed in both UK & EU politics. 
Project Fear is back! Now Brexit means 'the UK will run out of toilet paper'.. What a load of rubbish.  
GREAT NEWS!!!!!Petition: Hold a SECOND REFERENDUM on EU membership SMASHES  80,000 signaturesPlease SIGN & RT as many people don't sign petitions on THEIR first sighting!SIGN this  and now PLEASE RT#FBPE #FinalSayForAll 
Fuck off @theresa_may. I don’t want any part of your nasty, hate fuelled Brexit. Even if it led to a more prosperous nation (and your own analysis reveals clearly that it won’t)  
The lawn mower saga: a brutal, funny and sad story of “sovereign” post-Brexit trade deals (FT).  
People don't want a future of isolation, begging for trade deals, selling off our public services, poverty and bickering with all and sundry. The referendum delivered an illegally won, marginal majoriy, not a 'will of the people' vote.Revoke A50 and ask the people properly. 
There's zero chance of me or anyone I know ever backing any kind of Brexit. Accept it. You're a failure. Your whole government is a failure. Have the courage to #PutItToThePeople. If Leave win without lying and cheating, then we'll accept it. 
MPs are trying to make Brexit as difficult as possible – but without actually voting against it - @AVMitchell2010 
House of Lords Reform on UK political agenda since 1911.  Promises of more equal treatment stretch back to well before 1979 referendum.   Scotland’s future needs to be in Scotland’s hands, not those of Westminster politicians & UK parties for whom It will never be a priority.  
Brilliant news RT @SkyNewsBreak BREAKING: Brexit has been put on hold as Sinn Fein have announced they will be taking their seats in Westminster  
I’m backing a person of colour over their handling of Isis brides ( a barbaric medieval behaving terrorist organisation )..... and that makes me racist Throw in my Brexit vote , my loathing of Diane Abbott and Sadiq Khan I’m literally Hitler on Twitter right now 
We're not allowed to call people who voted to leave the EU stupid. I can understand that! When they go low, we have to go high. But, when you see and hear the Brexiters' so called arguments for a #Brexit, any kind of #Brexit, it's bloody hard! #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 
A Brexiteer told me the other day (in real life and not on here) that he didn’t vote for Brexit for the “usual reasons”. He voted for Brexit because... and I quote... “my grandad told me to never trust a German”. Just let that sink in 
Withdrawal Agreements not a deal it’s a suicide note!Designed to place the UK in a debilitating & humiliating EU ghetto to make us squeal to rejoinBrexit extension is better than being trapped where they can seize our fisheries, tax us & hammer farmers 
BREAKING: Delay #Brexit to save environment, green charities urge PM 
I feel Scottish but we're leaving for Denmark – Brexit is too much for us  
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 9: Theresa May is so desperate to squeeze her #Brexit Deal through, she's even tried moving the entire door to do it!  
excited for the brexit street parties  
it’s hard to choose a favourite type of cybernat, but if i was forced i think i’d pick the ones who try to overcome their Brexit / indy dissonance by denying that the UK is a single market - that takes some next-level self-delusion 
what a coincidence! the #PeoplesVote campaign have been busy running stalls in MK and Aylesbury today where we spoke to Tory voters who have now switched to lib dem because they're so disgusted with how the @Conservatives are handling Brexit! you need all the luck you can get!! 
You were the one who persuaded me to join all those years ago - but the pervasive antisemitism and Jeremy's continued pursuit of Brexit were too much to stand. I want to do something more positive than fight internal battles. 
Kevin McDonald, Arch-Bishop Emeritus of Southwark up, speaking about the need for peace on issues large & small: Knife crime, Brexit, the surge of nationalism. #PeaceSymposium 
Campaigners calling for a second EU referendum march through York #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
Jeremy Corbyn is shifting through the Brexit Allsorts trying to find any alternative to the one he doesn't like: a people’s vote. Now it's Norway plus.It's time he listened to Labour members and adhere to the...  
No, how dare you! @theresa_may Brexit doesn't, and never will, belong to me. I didn't vote for it and I campaign against it. You own this abomination, you and all those who promoted it without a sniff of a plan and then voted to trigger  A50. Not in my name.#PutItToThePeople 
If they say "no", that will be interpreted as "ok, so you didn't actually *choose* no deal" and we'll then fall back into the default Brexit situation, which is... no deal (foisted on us).I really, really wish I was making it up. But I'm not. Things really are that ridiculous. 
We are in an astonishingly dangerous Brexit situation right now. A disastrous no deal crash out remains the default outcome in 20 days' time, unless:A) Deal passed by both UK & EU before Brexit DayorB) Article 50 extended (only postpones the problem)orC) Brexit called off 
Democratic votes are free & fairUndemocratic votes are criminal & corruptEU Referendum 2016 was criminal & corrupt Sir James Eadie QC (@theresa_may's Defence Lawyer) agreed in Court last month.Who denied me my democratic right to a free & fair vote? 
Thornberry slating @TheIndGroup for offering to back May’s Deal in return for a People’s Vote, while saying Labour will oppose May’s Deal but only push for a referendum if it passes.  
I am afraid the critical issue is that this LP FB will lose Brexit for us ...its members and MPsI cannot see how a group so callow, so determined to deliver Brexit thaypt it will betray members, MPs, Policy can deliver a winning campaignMore MPs and members need to jump ship. 
Calling @theresa_may The country belongs to the British people (and all those living here).The vast majority want your obsessive #Brexit madness to stop.#RevokeA50 Or ask them#FinalSay 
If we get an extension until end of June and do not participate in the EU elections in May, we cannot get a referendum done in the time even if we wanted to.It’s just cynical from the Labour Leadership. Push with one hand. Pull with the other. 
Brexit was the creation, in part, of a new world of offshore money and political influence campaigns, Brexit may well ensure that it continues unrestricted. 
"It is important to remember that since the Brexit vote was delivered, the following two year period has brought levels of foreign investment in the UK that is higher than any other EU nation, along with near record levels of employment." 
We are screwed. An extension to July will end in a Deal v No Deal vote because nothing else is possible. Labour have supported this disastrous Brexit since they voted to trigger Art 50 without a plan.  
#breastcancer patients rely on #Euratom for the supply of technetium to stage the disease & plan the extent of surgery and other treatment (radioisotopes are used to locate sentinel nodes for biopsy)A #NoDeal #Brexit means we will die.Thanks #BrexiteersI liked my life. 
MPs could save Britain from #Brexit madness next week -- let's make sure they do! Sign and RT:  
Femi claiming Brexiteers are betraying 'the people of Sunderland' whilst campaigning to overturn Brexit is peak remainer.  
As we sink further into the #Brexit mess that Vote Leave put us in, as the dodgy funding from Banks & Co comes to light & criminal investigations are launched, the only contribution from the @BBCPolitics presenter is "both sides lied"Really? Is that "balance"? Ffs 
Interesting. The europarl is adamant that they don’t want a new cohort of UK MEPs, so any delay will be short. In that case, agreement is unlikely and a clean WTO Brexit remains a likely outcome.  
Effectively @campaignforleo and the Irish Government are refusing to allow Northern Ireland to leave the European Union. In doing so they are no longer recognising UK sovereignty over Northern Ireland as set out in the Good Friday Agreement. #Brexit 
This afternoon I had the opportunity to visit the Belcoo / Blacklion bridge to see where the hard border between Northern Ireland and The Republic of Ireland used to be. We must not return to the borders of the past. #Brexit #backstop 
"With the uncertainty surrounding Brexit, we want to assure our customers across the world that our pricing will be honoured on every Vantage, DB11, DBS Superleggera and Rapide AMR ordered before 29th March."@AndyatAston, Aston Martin Lagonda President and Group CEO 
.@Nigel_Farage: March 29th should be our independence day, but politicians are trying to stop Brexit. Parliament Square, 29th March will be a historic rally of Brexiteers to tell those in power not to betray Brexit. Be there. 
“I was shocked that the Tories didn't bring down May over her Brexit deal. They are gutless and spineless... Brexit is the first, neo-revolutionary step to a more democratic politics.”@Nigel_Farage  on The Brendan O’Neill Show: 
Telegraph View: If the people see the MPs they elected delaying the Brexit that millions voted for, expect shock and outrage.  
It would be a mistake for Tory rebels to back May’s Brexit deal.The reasons why they voted against the deal in January are just as valid now as they were then.This deal was and remains the worst of all worlds. 
Regardless of his politics, this rant from George Galloway says so much about Brexit.  Nostalgia for lost youth and sentimentalism about the past mixed with nationalistic hubris."I want Britain to be what it was in the Swinging 60s - when we were something!"  
Brexit: Why Derby isn't changing its mind about voting LeaveA recent poll carried out by the Derby Telegraph suggested that the result would remain the same if a second referendum was held. Bless the people of Derby! True Brits with true grit 
Shame on May for her treachery.Shame on MPs intent on overturning the referendum.Shame on MPs backing Mays deal.The only MPs with any integrity are those who are fighting to deliver a true Brexit & refusing to sell out the country by backing the deal.  
Labour will oppose any delay to Brexit that will require Britain to take part in the European parliament elections next May, Emily Thornberry has said.That means Labour upholds as the only options:•Theresa May’s Brexit Deal•No-Deal Brexit 
Walk away.......Only way....   May suffers fresh setback in Brexit deal negotiations  
Yes, I know they may sell out Brexit long before 29th March, kick it into long grass etc, but I am damned if that is going to stop me from along to Parliament Square on the day it is supposed to be happening.  See you there.  
Separated at birth, brexit style  
Great to see more #BBCbalance from Andrew Neil. Here he is retweeting Julia HB retweeting Guido having a pop at @JMPSimor’s case about Brexit crimes with drivebys of me & @JolyonMaugham... in a TOTALLY fair & balanced way. The crimes still happened, @afneil. You know that, right? 
Which your favourite #BrexitDogsDinner slogan?"Walkies not porkies" "Biscuits not Brexit" "I’m a Sufferapet" "Brexit is barking"Bring your dog & join the #Wooferendum "biggest dogs dinner ever" tmw, 1pm, outside Parliament #StopBrexit #Brexit  
"British power will be reduced. But the gray zone — where politics meets money, where foreign money can become domestic, where assets can be hidden and connections concealed — will survive. Perhaps that was the point all along." @anneapplebaum on Brexit  
About to speak on Brexit in Eddisbury at large public meeting at Tarvin Community Centre. I have great respect for the local MP, @Sandbach, who is under pressure from ‘no deal’ extremists, to the astonishment of her constituents 
The country keeps saying it doesn't want your deal @theresa_may The Government's Brexit agreement : 43%Remaining in the EU : 57%Let's get it stopped.#PeoplesVote 
"Since the referendum the #economy has done very well. Half a million new  jobs!" #Wetherspoons legend #TimMartin rips apart #ProjectFear nonsense, the anti-democratic #EU, and disgraceful calls for a referendum  re-run !  #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
I’ve just had to cancel a long-standing speaking engagement - on #Brexit - at a Salisbury school on Monday. At this 11th hour the teacher insisted that I “don’t mention Israël” or the “Novichok incident”. I didn’t intend to raise either but I cannot accommodate such censorship. 
Ah an Australian re-enactment of Brexit ....  
If there was a court case and it was found the judge was crooked, the jury were duped and bribed, and the lawyers weren't lawyers at all but dodgy used car salesmen and robbers, being paid by gangsters, that trial would collapse and there would be another trial#Brexit 
“These big swings, they do happen - and we’re not immune from that. Brexit or no Brexit.”Professor Peter Frankopan reflects on the UK’s future in the global standing.  
Placard ready for the #Wooferendum tomorrow! #Brexit Dog's Dinner 1pm Victoria Gardens #Westminster@wooferendum#StopBrexit 
Two Sundays to Brexit – cartoon  
Obscure no-deal Brexit group is UK's biggest political spender on Facebook 
Watching Brexit from France this week it's hard to decide whether the UK looks more pathetic than nasty or nastier than it looks pathetic. 
Are we still having a brexit festival? (Genunine question @theresa_may) 
Obscure no-deal Brexit group is UK's biggest political spender on Facebook  
Forest Gump had more brains than these remoaners.'Stockpiling for no-deal Brexit buffers my family from risks'  
Brexit is 485 hours away. #brexit 
A friend has told me he’s been waiting for three hours at the eurotunnel  and not even at the ticket booth yet - and the trains are running at one an hour . First it was commercial traffic now it’s tourist . Wait for personal checks post brexit . 
Excellent piece from @gavinsblog for @NewStatesman on how Britain’s troubled history with Ireland haunts #Brexit and even raises some curious parallels with today. Should be read by all British politicos... and a few Irish ones too.  
Don't know how many times I can say this.Remain was defined. Leave wasn't.Remain had 2 international treaties & was cemented by the 2011 EU Act preventing further integration without referendum + decades of laws & resulting rights.Leave WAS 4 words and is NOW a 585-page treaty 
An application to the City of Westminster Magistrates’ Court for the issuing of a summons against the Theresa May, alleging the Common law offence of Misconduct in Public Office regarding Article 50 notification.  #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Once the Conservative party final betray Brexit next week, the small leave leaning parties (SDP, Brexit party, UKIP etc) need to be clever & not compete for seats, or at the coming GE they will split their vote & end up with nothing and we will be left with Labour and Cons again. 
Labour voted for a referendum; Labour voted to trigger Article 50 - yet now they're refusing to take responsibility Conservative eurosceptic critics of the deal & Labour MPs who voted for Article 50 should think very carefully about the options which are actually now possible  
Phantom Brexit. Brexit in Name Only. Soft Remain. It's all the same thing, it doesn't take us out of the EU as was promised, and right now it's what both the Prime Minister and Labour are offering.  
Don't give up, yet."The Brexit legal challenges that could force Britain to leave without a deal"  
#Tories want a bonfire of our rights after #Brexit, with the top priority being to scrap our #HumanRightsAct and replace it with a watered down ‘Bill of Rights’ – the long-term goal of PM @Theresa_May. Read @Jon_Danzig’s full report. #StopBrexit Link:  
These ministers are not planning to rebel, they are planning to betray #Brexit & the UK Electorate!The disconnect between these defeatists & the UK public is immense.By contrast #Leave supporter, @DominicRaab is totally in sync with the UK Electorate. 
Brexit latest  
EU citizens have rights to vote and stand in elections to European Parliament. UK nationals, wherever they live in the EU, will be deprived of such rights by BREXIT. Please sign and share Permanent EU Citizenship initiative addressed to European Commission  
Obama being flown in to tell us how to vote in the referendum and scaremonger was disgusting.  
So basically Brexit is Galloway going through a midlife crisis.  
Correction: Around 20 people out of approximately 170,000 people in Huddersfield says stop Brexit.  
I, my wife and 3 boys are not British. We were born on the Island of Ireland, hold Irish passports and are subject to an international bi-lateral agreement that regonises & protects the above.#Ireland #Brexit  
Yes activists and those just sickened by Brexit are being asked to wear the white rose of Scotland o mark Scotland’s first day out of the EU 
Good piece from @jonlis1 including key insight of the political dangers of a situation in which "public anger will grow if we deliver Brexit and if we don't".  
Liberal Democrats proudly stand opposed to this disastrous Brexit. More than 250,000 people across the country have now joined our campaign for a People's Vote. Help us give the people the final say on Britain's future 
The Mayor of Sheffield @MagicMagid on Theresa May’s proposal... if you vote for my Brexit Deal and I’ll give you money for Knife Crime “Theresa May is Sick”  
The BBC is not covering the strikes at the French ports ahead of Brexit. Maybe it doesn’t know about them. 
She then also only promises a referendum only after May's deal is passed, making it functionless. Her claim this is somehow a tougher position is false. It is simply a more deceptive and unproductive one. 
Only 20 days until #Brexit and the only "stocking up" I'll be doing is booze for the big day.Will be one of the happiest days of my life #Freedom #BalanceforBetter 
A 'Labour Against Brexit' national conference took place today at ... [checks notes] ... ah, Camden School for Girls. Apparently it was a toss-up between there and Mansfield Working-Men's Club.  
We want a #PeoplesVote. We want a European Parliament vote. We want democracy. And we will not let the arrogant political elites on the Tory and Labour front benches deny us our say, our voice, our votes, our democracy! #Brexit 
BREXIT: Campaigners calling for a second EU referendum march through York /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
Tim Dawson is a no-talent ex public schoolboy who went to Abingdon School (Oxon) and then wrote a 6th form comedy drama for TV about a 6th form in Oxon that was as funny as Ebola. There is dark money pushing Brexit and I suspect that he is the funnel for some of it.  
I've just read that Julia Hartley Brewer thinks Hard Brexiters are slandered to be called Hard Brexiters; they should just be called "democrats"."Democrats" who are implacably opposed to putting Brexit back to the people for a vote? Yeah, right. 
As Brexit gets closer the middle/management class traitors, the parasitic foreigners, the international corporatists, & the globalist scum hate the working class people of England more & more each day.They wish their plan to replace us happen yesterday but we are still here. 
"Brexit belongs to the whole country" is one of the most obnoxious lines I've heard in a long time. I didn't vote for it; you are not doing this monumentally stupid, harmful thing in my name.  
Certainly don't want to "get it done" Treesa, unless you mean get this nonsense over & done with by revoking Article 50. If that's a step too far extend A50 for 21 months to give us time for #PeoplesVote referendum, so we can prove once & for all Brexit's not will of the people  
Government spends £3.5million to try to keep EU citizens here after Brexit.  
Britain's economy is set to boom and become the largest in Europe - because of Brexit  
BREAKING! Violence between police and protesters! #westminster #brexit #protest #yellowvests #policeviolence 
downloded app on daughters blackbry. should keep PC brigade at twitter HQ off my back. out of actiern for awile now. focused as ever. spent most my time in deep medertation on shitter in local. brexit only thing on my mind. time to get these fuckin papers signed. no surrender 
Furious Brexiteer LASHES OUT at 'anti-British' MPs - 'We've waited long enough for Brexit!  
Breaking - Wolchover and Silver action - application for summons against T May made!Misconduct in Publice Office!: @abcpoppins @A50Challenge @RobertCPalmer13 @Suewilson91 @BenPBradshaw @brexit_sham @carolecadwalla @acgrayling @DavidLammy @DamianCollins @LucyMPowell @jessphillips 
#brexitriot #brexit Protesters have locked down parliament square in a protest. Police trying to break it up.  
After the 2016 EU referendum, David Cameron although much in favour of remain, insisted parliament must respect the will of the people to leave the EU! If we don't leave the EU on March 29th, then it's the death of democracy in this country as we know it! Anarchy will prevail!!!!  
This is essential listening (but it will make you really angry) ‘Brexit & Trump are the same crime’ from @gaslitnation 
No one wants a general election. But a general election could close down parliament and let Brexit Day March 29th run its course. So a general election would be better than May’s surrender deal.  
A 48% approval rating for EU membership is CLEARLY not the same as a 52% approval for whatever the Brexit negotiations produced.The only question is: Is our country mature enough to recognise that? 
Basically UK is now a Russian colony. Our government's loyalty is to oligarchs who find it expedient to launder and park their dirty money here. Criminals who can kill members of the public, steal personal data and buy our country for a paltry £8M with their crooked referendum.  
The Washington Post is right.It means that #Brexit should not go ahead until there has been a public inquiry.#RevokeArticle50 
The reason such a huge constitutional shift like Brexit should have required a 60+% majority in the referendum is that it needed to show that EU membership was so unpopular that ANY negotiated departure from the EU would be highly likely to AT LEAST please those who voted for it. 
Your regular reminder that the people who would dismantle the NHS are the same people who won the referendum by claiming they would protect the NHS.(Billboard location: Rainham Rd, Chatham)  
With a spate of tweets that have NOT aged well, I give you this tweet from Steve from last year. It’s absolutely BANG ON the money. And even more relevant now, as we know the sort of deal we are being asked to support. There is no logic to Brexit #NoBrexitDay#stopbrexit 
The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks - The Washington Post  
With several #Brexit votes lined up for the week ahead, I know Londoners may be feeling uncertainty, especially our city’s EU citizens. No matter what happens, #LondonIsOpen 
Poll: Voters in Northern Ireland overwhelmingly reject a hard Brexit, would vote to remain in the European Union in a second referendum and would prefer checks on goods travelling between Great Britain and the North rather than checks on the Irish Border  
Amidst the mayhem has Parliament lost the ability to actively listen! Brexit: Business leaders don’t want it. The people don’t want it any longer. Economists don’t want it. The young reject it. The #NHS doesn’t want it! So, simply, hear them! #RevokeA50 
Anti-Brexit demonstrators marching around York city centre today as part of 'Remain - the best deal for women' event  
Given the rate Remoaner QC's like Jolyon & Simor are losing anti-#Brexit court cases, one has to question the long-term validity of their career choice.It'd be like hiring a hole driller to steer your boat ffs.  
Any kind of Brexit is going to ruin and probably break up the United Kingdom So either have a People’s vote, or simply revoke Article 50 unilaterally stopping Brexit altogether Before more jobs, businesses and hardworking young EU citizens abandon the U.K. for good 
in all the time i've been campaigning against Brexit or for a #PeoplesVote it's only ever been white British men who get all aggressive in my face and swear at me, why do they think they have the right to do that lol 
What amazes me, is that people think the gov is bungling #brexit. This is as good as brexit is going to get. It's all you can do when you chose, at some point, to pour a bucket of excrement over everything you own. 
Up above the streets and houses... good couple of hours in Ford at the top of my ward talking about PIP assessments, dropped kerbs + Brexit among other things. Had my palm read (I'm coming into money!) told 'You really are short aren't you' (yep!) +lots of @PlymouthLabour support 
How an Irish observer warned in 2013 how the pro-EU elite would seek to block Brexit - M E Synon  
Damian could have been our Bob Mueller but sadly he's not independent so cannot say what needs to be said at this crucial time. Too many politicians have pulled their punches over #Brexit corruption.We need our own FBI that doesn't answer to the Home Office or @10DowningStreet. 
#Brexit is what a traitor would do to Britain. #Brexit is corruption, crime, threats of violence and foreign interference. All true patriots oppose #Brexit.#PeoplesVote 
I wonder how soon after #Brexit the Tories will cut the State Pension?  Personally I think probably about 18mths.  Any other offers. 
Whatever happens with Brexit this month, Theresa May must go.If we leave without a deal, the country will need a leader who actually believes in Brexit.And if Article 50 is extended, the PM can't claim that she is the woman to lead those negotiations. 
Canvassing with the lovely candidate Alexandra Tatton-Brown for #Dalgarno by-election. @KCLibDems #DemandBetter than #Brexit, a big concern from residents on the doorstep.  @LondonLibDems 
Amazing that, 2 and a half years on, the metropolitan elite who control our political and cultural landscape *still* haven't accepted they lost the Brexit debate. 
Why are you @DamianCollins not calling for #Brexit to to suspended or stopped. We cannot allow such a huge change to be pushed through by crime and threats of violence. That would be the end of our democracy. 
This is important . If PM can’t get her backstop through, let’s drop it and replace with EFTA instead. That’s the Plan B that could get Brexit through. The ERG are going to have to choose.  
Good to speak to so many Leithers today about schools, local developments, transport infrastructure & Brexit. Encouraging to hear so much support for @robm2 & @theSNP as the campaign continues! #RobMunn4LeithWalk #ActiveSNP 
We believe in FREE speech. We believe in challenging the failing legacy media. We are a Brexit supporting Trump admiring Israel supporting media. Please click and watch. Will you support us?  
We have seen this before. This bullying and intimidation against MPs is what Nazis did in 1930s Germany. Sadly there are many similarities between Brexit and Nazism. 
Take Five: From #Brexit saga to the ECB's emergency-era monetary settings. Here are big themes likely to dominate the thinking of investors in the coming week  
When the #Brexit referendum was announced, £1 bought 1.43€. As of March 9, 2019 at 04:50PM, £1 buys 1.1582€. This means that food & medicine imports to the UK are more expensive. It doesn't have to be like this. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Voters in Bradford not happy about Brexit. Rescind A50, People’s Vote, but no Brexit, please! @bradfordeurope @LeedsEurope @EuropeanYorks 
It's 2026. As Brexit talks continue, the UK's EU membership is extended again. Natashabotski3255675 tweets: "I've just read the Lisbon treaty 2028. It abolishes our vetoes, forces us to join Schengen, and makes Jeremy Corbyn's cat the Queen..."  
"We won’t expose ourselves to Brexit Britain, complete with chlorinated chickens, a privatised health service, rising university fees and getting hounded by the Home Office" 
You know how in December you can’t get away from hearing about Christmas? How is it that with 20 sleeps until Brexit, it isn’t EVERYWHERE???  
You set such a high bar for our country. "at least we're better than ISIS". That should be our national anthem post Brexit.  
An English rugby game at Twickenham: pure, unrefined Brexit. 
“I do have to ask myself, what game are they playing here?”Commons leader Andrea Leadsom calls on EU leaders to take seriously the “very carefully thought through” Brexit proposals, adding “I am confident we can get that bill through without extending Article 50.”  
May's Deal is the worst of all world'sIt reduces & permenantly traps Britain as a vassal stateMPs MUST vote the deal down!An Extension is a less terrible choice that would fatally undermine democracy but is no threat to Brexit as we can escape later 
"If Britain wishes to Brexit who are we to stop them? But they won’t take the North with them and they’re not going to wreck the Irish economy and upend our peace process."  
Labour Leave was colluding with Banks who in turn kept campaigning even after the tragic murder of Jo Cox. This is why Labour are not calling for an investigation on the referendum fraud. Why aren't the Met Police all over this though? Who's stopping them? #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
A reminder from the @WingsScotland archive of the heady days when the Conservatives knew and accepted how a parliamentary democracy should work when it comes to a referendum mandate. They've long since abandoned this as they descend into the SW1 swamp. 
Opinion: The left-wing case for Brexit is becoming more ridiculous by the day.So let me get this straight: a Brexit driven by a hard right-wing Tory government is just what we need to protect workers’ rights, health and safety and the environment?  
What’s happening in Kano is a referendum and not election. 
The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks, ensuring that offshore money paying political influence campaigns continues unrestricted — Politics meets money, assets can be hidden, connections concealed. That was the point of Brexit all along.  
No majority in British parliament for second Brexit referendum - Reuters analysis | Reuters  
What @SkyNews "forgot" to mention in this article is that Nevine Mann is a People's Vote campaigner!'Stockpiling for no-deal Brexit buffers my family from risks'  
A second independence referendum must come at a time of Scotland’s choosing. 
2) it's genuinely, utterly, profoundly disturbing that supposedly intelligent, apparently decent & presumably patriotic public figures know all about the dirty money, hidden connections, amoral campaigning & likely hostile foreign influence in #Brexit, and yet they carry on 
Clear and to the point. Every MP needs to think and think hard. Get this wrong, support May’s hard Brexit deal, and Britain’s great history will come to an end. We will be joining the third world.  
Labour are only for a referendum if & when the deal passes, but they are not for a referendum until the deal passes (which they are against).This gives them no policy/route to oppose no deal in practice. Except negotiating new deal (without an extension in which to do that) 
That's what he should have said 3 minutes after the Referendum result was in, not 3 minutes before we leave the EU.  
Tony Blair ~ it’s going to be a soft brexit!  
Brexit has so far wasted the equivalent of 150 years of #CancerResearch’s budget.Without the diversion of Brexit, there is a good chance  we could have cured many forms of Cancer with the same budget and amount of resources ploughed into Leaving. 
.@MaryLouMcDonald has said today that a Tory Brexit will not be allowed upend Irish economy or peace process.With 20 days until #Brexit, the Irish Government need to hold firm against Britain's approach to Brexit which shows absolute indifference to Ireland or Irish interests.  
Really interesting column from ⁦@UnaMullally⁩ ‘Ignorance about Ireland isn’t just the preserve of ⁦⁦@Jacob_Rees_Mogg⁩ and #KarenBradley.’ Anti-English sentiment in Ireland had healed. But #Brexit has brought it all flooding back   
Emily Thornberry. Labour will (1) support a referendum (if the deal goes through)and(2) oppose A50 extending into July.(3) oppose May's deal in all circsand(4) oppose chaotic no deal(1) & (2) are incompatible.(3) & (4) incompatible with (2) 
The complete and utter Brexit Shambles of @Theresa_May is costing people their jobs. "Businesses are laying off staff at the fastest rate since September 2012 as “Brexit indecision” takes a heavy toll on employers’ confidence" #ToryEconomicFailure 
Exports of Scotland’s national drink have reached a record value of £4.7 billion – despite #Brexit concerns. We’ll raise a glass to the good news!    
Ok, let's say next week's votes play out as follows:A) Theresa May Meaningful Vote 2: voted downB) No deal: voted downC) Article 50 extension: voted downWhat then? No-deal is default, there may be nothing else to amend between then and Brexit Day, and extension turned down. 
“If Brexiteers won’t back Theresa May’s deal, then Brexit is only going to get SOFTER” so says the Sun losing the plot. This is not true. May’s deal does not respect the result and therefore democracy. To pretend it does is seriously disingenuous.   
Leavers” “If we don’t get the Brexit we voted for then there will be a huge backlash! Don’t say we didn’t warn you!”Same Leavers: “So Scotland isn’t getting the Remain they voted for. So what? They should just suck it up.” 
You’re wrong, Simon. No one seeks to undermine Europe. I’ve spent a great deal of time & money working & holidaying there — I love the culture, the cooking, the countryside. And (mostly) I get on with the people. But I’ve spent 20 years campaigning for Brexit.  
Next week is a H U G E week for the 17,410,742 Brexiteers of Britain. There are a series of votes in Parliament with ammendments by remainers to scupper #Brexit. They want to take "No Deal" off the table. Let's contact our MPs to #SaveBrexit 
Shame that a Labour MP representing a Brexit-voting town such as Grimsby should wish to cheer a member of the London intelligentsia when he tries to conflate Brexit and racism. 
The Labour leadership and the Tories desperately want to avoid the European Parliamentary elections because they know they will be humiliated as millions of voters desert them to vote for pro-Brexit and pro-Remain parties. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
The EU has been 'playing games' with us for 40 years and this government is the last to see it! Andrea Leadsom furious at EU’s latest Brexit proposals - ‘They're playing games!’  
This is not a game.... stop treating it as such #Brexit  
George Eustice is right that we will continue to be signatories to the EEA Agreement after Brexit. But transfer into the Efta pillar will require the consent of all other EEA members i.e the EU27 and the Efta3. So we will still need the Withdrawal Agreement.  
There IS a right way to hold a referendum - the June 2016 EU referendum was not it.  
5 Cabinet Minister are expected to rebel against democracy & the Government next week (forgetting they're in Government) & have a #Brexit plot to keep UK in a permanent EU customs union. | @CamillaTominey via @Telegraph via @Telegraph 
Theresa May is now blaming the EU for offering her the very same thing (the backstop) that she originally wanted as part of the Withdrawal Agreement. Theresa May has become the Vicky Pollard of the Brexit negotiations - “yeah but no but yeah but no”. 
Couldn't agree more. I've been saying for a long time now someone big has her by the short and curlies. It's like her life depends on getting #Brexit through.Maybe it does..  There's something HUGE and very dark going on and she is shitting herself. 
Truly excellent panel of speakers on trade unionism vs #Brexit at the @labourvsbrexit #StopBrexit conference(l-r) @nurseboothroyd @RiccardoLaT0rre (@EasternFBU) Henry Chango-Lopez (@IWGBunion) and Ruth Cashman (@LambethUNISON) 
Good to be out meeting constituents with @theSNP team in #Luncarty. Much concern about the Tory Council and Tory Brexit.  
Final job of the day, dropping 58 postcards from his constituents into Ken Clarke's postbox. Ken may dislike referendum but his constituents want a #PeoplesVote 
The wonderful @crugfarmplants, probably the most cutting-edge, dynamic nursery in the country, talking openly and honestly about the impact brexit could have on her business.So much on the line for UK horticulture.Via @sturdyAlex 
The Labour leadership is pissing on the majority of the public, Labour supporters and Labour members. Corbyn wants #Brexit and he will trash democracy to get it.  #PeoplesVote 
Very busy in Oxford at the @OxfordStays stall, filmed today by both Ukrainian and Finnish TV. Majority of ppl in Oxford think Brexit is a disaster. Nothing good is even being promised now. BMW, university, NHS under threat. Industry leaving.  #RevokeA50 #PeoplesVote 
Unlike the Brexit Elite, the #PeoplesVote campaign doesn’t have to pretend it has the backing of young people. Groups like @FFSake_ & @OFOCBrexit have thousands of young activists - because young people know our future is best served inside the EU. #PutItToThePeople 
NI born Irish citizens are to be excluded from stabilising their EU rights under the EU settlement scheme as they are 'British'Position goes against the #GFA and withdrawal agreement #Brexit “NI born Irish citizens are British”   
The 2016 Brexit referendum vote crystallized divisions between cities and towns, young and old, the beneficiaries of globalization and those left behind. The divide shows no sign of narrowing.  
I sometimes feel nostalgic for the good old days of 2015, when #Brexit was just a far right pipedream and Jeremy Corbyn was an obscure backbencher who voted against pretty much everything and nobody took seriously. Those were the days my friend! 
Inspiring ( again I need that sarcasm emoji ) for crying out loud... the British People might be bored but moving on through Brexit means living in its shadow for years... it’s your job to show them a vision... not “ let’s get it done”  
This is what is happening to the Tories as the country is divided by corrupt and illegal practices & a pigheaded reluctance to accept Brexit is NOT the will of the people. 
Restrictions placed on police leave as Brexit loomsPolice contingency plans warn that shortage of medicines and rising food prices could lead to unrest.  
Polish partner pays UK tax but doesn't get a vote on her own future. Offshore Tory #Brexit -ers *don't* pay UK tax yet *do* get a vote, and what's more--are allowed to fund a massive post-truth political machine designed to control all our futures. Summat not right in UK ... 
I’m speaking on Brexit in Swansea tomorrow (Sunday) - 6pm, Village Hotel, Langdon Rd, SA1 8QY. All welcome! Makes me angry thinking of Grayling cancelling the Cardiff-Swansea electrification which he could have paid for from his dodgy ferries & other flagrant incompetence 
Telling the #truth about #Brexit - it is a far-right anti-democratic project  
The sole intention of May's deal is to keep us as close to the EU as possible. It is not BrexitJoin our March to Leave:  
As the realisation of a corrupt & illegally procured mandate gains traction amongst millions of Britons, so too is the notion that 2 party politics, caught in an unnatural circadian rhythm between left & right agendas, is the problem that drove us to Brexit.We deserve more. 
Facebook and brexiteers have spent more than two years being hammered over questions about Vote Leave and its huge donation to Darren Grimes. It’s 2019 — and 21 days before Brexit — Tim Dawson’s Britain’s Future is spending tens of thousands of pounds a week on Facebook ads. 
Is this true? To 'encourage' the Queen to block #A50 is tantamount to denying a meaningful vote to Parliament on #TheresaMay's Brexit deal. This is a serious threat to our democracy and a move toward dictatorship. The justification for a #PeoplesVote gets stronger by the day. 
Great canvassing session this morning despite the rain and hail! Lots of people horrified at the UK Government's handling of Brexit and desperate for independence!  
From November we have leaked messages revealing Tim Dawson telling Tory activists he was taking over “Britain’s Future” — a dark money group pushing for a no deal Brexit. Since then it’s become Facebook’s biggest political advertiser in UK politics. 
To be fair to the Leave Means Leave crowd, once they'd exhausted their massive supply of four Brexit supporting young folk, 63 year old Tim Martin was the most youthful candidate they had left. 
I don’t understand why there are so many #Brexit deadlines. The EU is that professor that keeps giving you extensions hoping you’ll finally live up to your potential and the UK is the student who doesn’t even understand the assignment.  
If Corbyn's Norway+ manoeuvres are, as seems likely, an attempt to avoid a #PeoplesVote then he is colluding in the right-wing hate, lies, gerrymandering, electoral crime & Russian & US right-wing  interference that won the 2016 vote.#Brexit 
The London-centric Labour Party listens more to the big business lobby and Blairites about Brexit than it does to the Leave-voting working class communities outside of London that they're abandoning.  
Skip Brexit, not breakfast! Out early this morning talking to EU nationals about rights moving forward.  
The 'left-wing/Labour Leave' case for Brexit is becoming more ridiculous by the day /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
In 2016, the status quo was our membership of the #EU. We lost the referendum in part because it was harder to campaign for no change! The status quo now is national crisis. Remain is no longer the status quo, but the solution to this #Brexit chaos. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
I met Elaine and John in #Mynachdy in #CardiffNorth this morning. They voted leave but have now firmly changed their minds and want to stay a part of the EU. They want a #finalsay and for the decision to be put it back to the people. @peoplesvote_uk #Brexit @LabPeoplesVote 
University of Cambridge academics are worried that Brexit will render the city less attractive to the companies that have fueled an economic boom  
Why we need a 'Confirmatory Vote'1. We were told lies2. We now know we were told lies3. The liars need to be held to account4. It's our RIGHT to decide our own futurePlz sign and RT#stopbrexit #Brexit #finalsay #fbpe 
Theresa May is watching Britain’s elderly die in misery as social care collapses, suddenly now the Tory PM begging vote for my ‘Poxy Brexit Deal’ I got billions!! You’re like you what?!? She’s a disgrace  
Sickening. Decency trampled underfoot. Campaign rules flouted. Lies spread on a mass scale.It’s not a narrow referendum result. It’s a crime scene.The Banks Files: Brexit funder urged campaign to “press it harder” after Jo Cox murder.#StopBrexit 
When @theresa_may became PM it didn't really sink for me that she was in No10. I guess part of me didn't believe it. It was surreal.Now it has sunk in I just want to forget. Instead I wake up every morning in this Groundhog day nightmare called Brexit.Make it stop#RevokeA50 
Who would you prefer as Prime Minister? Please RT to get a large sample size#GTTO #LeaveMeansLeave #FBPE #Brexit #SecondReferendum 
The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks #washinggonpost 
Brexit is driven by such ugly, jealous and selfish emotions:-removing others' rights-limiting what people can do-an obsession with the past-screw everyone else's happiness, health and wealth as long as mine is okNothing is "generous", forward-looking or open-minded. 
It really is NOT “the unknown” that’s the problem. It’s BREXIT that’s the problem. If May’s deal goes through next week, the unknown goes on and so does brexit. The only sane solution is to Stop Brexit urgently! 
A #PeoplesVote may be the only realistic way of resolving #Brexit .But a problem with it is that it gives credibility to a referendum which deserves none.The referendum was corrupted by illegality.It deserves no respect. Nor does any "deal" resulting from it.#RevokeArticle50 
untransparent money helped Brexit win the referendum. untransparent money is still being spent to promote the harshest possible version  
++BREAKING NEWS++Multiple sources now reporting that May asked civil servants whether presssure could be brought on the Queen to “encourage her” to block any article 50 extension or soft brexit if parliament voted for these against the wishes of cabinet or May.More to follow. 
And even now, they can't stop lying.Because lies were all they had.No talent.No intellect.No arguments.No empathy.No plan.Just lies like this one."EU won’t be forgiven if it fails on Brexit, says Jeremy Hunt"#LeaversAreLiars 
I don't need to explain it to you b/c it's the law . Moreover the example you present would make the child a dual national of the UK & Australia. It's also very much how individuals with either Irish parents or grandparents are getting Irish citizenship to lessen the Brexit blow.  
The Queen speaks of 'greater confidence and optimism' as she delivers her last Commonwealth Day message before #Brexit 
It is ironic that Leavers believing #Brexit will restore sovereignty and return control are backing the project of a super-rich elite whose aim is to reduce democracy to a shell, leaving us in the hands of a global kleptocracy bearing no loyalty to any nation.#PeoplesVote 
UK won't accept Brexit deal that puts union at risk: PM's party chairman  
The idea that the UK can leave the EU is nonsense. We can give up our membership and our major influence in the EU, but the economic superpower will still be next door, having a huge impact on our economy & domestic policies.#Brexit sovereignty is a myth. #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
As we leave the European Union we will have, for the first time in over 40 years, the ability to negotiate and enter into our own free trade agreements (FTAs). 
Anyone relaxed about a Brexit "no deal" because "it will be like Y2K" should reflect that in September 1999, after 2½ years as a Y2K test manager, IBM gave me 7½ weeks leave (Peru, whooo!) because everything was done, dusted & tested. Brexit? 20 days to go & we're all clueless. 
‘The territorial integrity of the UK after #Brexit must remain unchallenged. We need a strong UK operating in partnership with the EU,’ I said to @uuponline #UUP19 conference in Belfast today. I hope we are on the same page on this with the other #Spitzenkandidaten. 
If you voted for brexit to stop immigration you are shooting yourself in the foot. Immigrants from further afield have now increased 5 fold. It will have to increase much further as we seek to replace 51000 EU nurses who have left and that’s only scratching the surface. 
Deal or no deal, here’s why Brexit cannot be stopped - @CJCHowarth 
This porn block coming in next month is about to introduce a whole load of "I'm not interested in politics" people to what happens when they don't pay attention. If Brexit hasn't done it yet. 
Look at this woman. A decent, hardworking business owner driven to tears by the self-destructive idiocy of Brexit. This is what “fuck business” comes to: fear, uncertainty and the end of dreams. WE DID NOT HAVE TO DO ANY OF THIS.  
Was in Islington this lunchtime and found myself with a number of guys from @IslingtonIn by Highbury station raising awareness for the #putittothepeople march. Sadly no sign of @jeremycorbyn or @EmilyThornberry but a lot of their constituents seemed very keen.#Brexit  
Every now and then something cuts through the dull malaise of brexit fatigue. I want to hug her. I wish I could tell her it'll all be fine and mean it. Sad and furious that I can't.  
No one is going to thank Brexit MPs for voting for TM's deal just because it avoids Article 50 extension or the alleged potential for no Brexit All this is irrelevant. Is the deal good for the UK?No. It's devastatingly bad, so don't vote for itReally is as simple at that 
Well done Charlie Stayt !!!  Finally a BBC journalist holding this terrible Government  to account on their shameful cuts, that are affecting  children's education. The billions that are being wasted on Brexit, the Tories are failing our children.  
Business owner, fighting back tears, worried for her livelihood and that of her staff. This is what your “only upsides” #Brexit looks like, @DavidDavisMP. Your “independence day”, @Nigel_Farage . Your “easiest deal in history”, @LiamFox. Your “confected hysteria”, @BorisJohnson. 
What the hell are the UK's satirists going to do after Brexit is receding in the rear view mirror?(Oh, I know, I know: they'll be too busy hunting rats in the rubble to write anything, and if Brexit goes away because Luxembourg invades or something they'll be busy celebrating.) 
What is wrong with British journalism? @SkyNews running a segment. “Some people think that a no-deal Brexit will mean falling off of cliff edge. Some people don’t...” That’s it. Journalism isn’t ‘balancing’ opinions whether it’s raining outside or not. It’s about finding out. 
So you've gone and done a Brexit: A Govern-mental booklet on surviving food shortages, making your own medicine and sacrificing loved ones.(See also: "Protect and Survive", of which it is a parody:  ) 
NHS belongs to the whole countrySchools belong to the whole countryOur railways belong to the whole country.Brexit belongs to the whole country.You have made a disaster out of them all.You, @theresa_may, are responsible for the catastrophic decline of the U.K.#ToriesOut 
One thing we Remainers should do is challenge the use of the term "Brexiteers" in the media. It makes them sound like brave buccaneers when in fact the leading Brexiters are more akin to traitors betraying the country in the pursuit of greed and ambition. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Millions will never accept Leaving the European Family on the basis of a mandate procured by corrupt and illegal practices.You're just going to have to accept that by implementing Brexit you'll have to squarely confront the blame for dividing and destroying a great country. 
No-deal advocates fail to mention one critical fact. After a no-deal the UK will urgently need a trade deal with the EU. And with the UK in recession & with shattered trade relations, it will be in the weakest possible condition to conduct such negotiations.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Please consider this observation @theresa_may You've been willfully unyielding about implementing a Brexit that was never advertised during the ref campaign.Brexiteers have thrived on schadenfreude of remain side's deeply felt loss.WE DONT WANT IT DONE.#RevokeA50 #TIG 
Restrictions placed on police leave as Brexit looms  
Mysterious Hard Brexit Group Run By Young Tory Writer Is Now Britain’s Biggest Spending Political Campaign On FacebookTim Dawson is only person publicly associated with Britain's Future which has spent almost £350K on Facebook since November #DarkMoney 
“there is no evidence that gives rise to any soundly based ground for believing the outcome of the referendum result would have been different if the breaches of the rules had not occurred” 
For years those who’ve never accepted Brexit vote result have said that we must have a second vote as the first one was cheated, manipulated etc. That contention has now been tested, & rejected, by the courts.Wilson & Ors , R v The Prime Minister [2019]  
May is indeed shameless & capable of huge deceit, but if she does this, don’t celebrate until you know what question will be asked in any referendum.May’s deal or No Deal is NO choice.There MUST be an option to #RemainLondon Evening Standard 
So tell me Lexiters.The working people that have already lost their jobs due to #brexit Are they just collateral damage, a necessary sacrifice for the cause?#stopbrexit NOW 
 This week, the UK Government continued its Brexit delusions, caused anxiety among EU citizens and was exposed for its incompetence.  Here's your brief roundup of the week’s key events and highlights from SNP MPs as they stand up for Scotland. 
Telegraph View: The Government cannot fool the voters over Brexit 
Mark Francois - Brexit supremo - son of an Italian immigrant. He literally would not have existed if his European mother hadn't come to work here. Now seeks to stop it happening again...  
...in your honour, play nothing but Euro pop, and donate all the money to anyone who stands against you.You can’t keep ignoring your constituents - not just on Brexit, but on your other equally iffy decisions.#shedoesntevengohere 
Today is #NationalGetOverItDay. So to all the Remainers, especially those campaigning for #PeoplesVote:We voted. The answer is LEAVE. You lost. GET OVER IT!#Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
This year marks ten years since the expenses scandal, which destroyed the last vestiges of trust in our political class. A failure to deliver Brexit will be another watershed moment: leading to widespread voter apathy and a rise in the political extremes. They’re playing with . 
“So vote for me, and I will reverse the referendum result, so we can, together, make sure the world’s largest banks and corporations get the EU referendum outcome they paid for, and so desire.”  
.@ScotTories @Carlaw4Eastwood So you think Scotland shouldn't be independent and govern her own affairs. After #Brexit referendum it is quite clear your Party can't run a country let alone 4 in a "union". Time to stand aside. I would suggest Scotland should run the UK until indy. 
The chairman of Britain's Conservative Party urges Parliament to back an unpopular withdrawal agreement as British and European Union officials seek a breakthrough to the Brexit impasse.  
The Customs Union is indivisible from the EU itself. Staying trapped behind the EU's tariff wall would be a betrayal the Referendum resultJoin our March in Sunderland:  
Brexit is 20 days away. #brexit 
I am sorry to say Jon that, while many people pursue Brexit for honorable reasons with which I sympathise, English Brexit voters were in very large numbers motivated by hatred of immigrants and got out to vote by dog whistle racism. There is no denying that. 
The government has failed, the ERG has failed, the Brexiters, the bullshitters and the various Leave camps have all failed. Hold a second referendum on EU membership.  
An almost unbelievable pack of lies. Far from being united the country is bitterly divided with  the majority opposed to #Brexit. These lies are more befitting to North Korea or an Arab dictatorship. They show a sickening contempt for democracy & the British people. 
The EU’s strategy is clear: destabilise the British political situation and force a Brexit rethink.Next week, MPs will have to decide whether they represent the British people or whether they are the EU’s willing agents for betrayal.#StandFirm 
Imagine: Having a vote on a deal the EU has rejected just two and a half weeks before Brexit deal.  
If you have any compassion and look through the twitter trend "Begum" you will be truly horrified by the hateful political culture of Brexit England. I clicked on hundreds of vile comments and though scores positively traced to England, not one to Scotland. Check for yourself. 
Thread: Decoding the leaked Cabinet memo on Brexit. Exhibit #1 - someone in 10 Downing Street clearly asked: could the Queen block Article 50 extension? Answer: Not without politicising the monarchy.  
- So, The Irish Border, if I may call you that, how would you describe your role in the Brexit negotiations?- Well, it’s a bit like ...  
The Brexit torture continues and there's no end in sight. My latest Brexit Blog post on the never ending saga:  
Andrea Leadsom blasts Brussels’ latest Brexit proposals - ‘They're playing games!’  
We should probably listen to the likes of Three when they say that there'll be no roaming charges after Brexit. They are the experts after all!Sign up with us!  
We're making it clear Don Valley doesn't want Labour MP @CarolineFlintMP to vote for this #Brexit deal. Demand a #PeoplesVote. 
Three on Brexit1) Chlorinated chicken2) The Irish border3) England's difficulty is Ireland's ... greater difficulty - More to come - 
It might be as well to revisit the #MalthouseCompromise ahead of next week's votes. Any attempt at locking us into the Customs Union with a phoney second referendum will destroy the Conservative Party electorally. Permenently. 
We're in Poplar & Limehouse today telling @FitzMP that his constituents don't want him to support this bad #Brexit deal. #PeoplesVote 
November 19th. But we won’t be allowed to take part after Brexit  
Sun’s out  in #Eastwood where we’re speaking to residents about @theSNP this morning. Huge anxiety about #Brexit and great appreciation for @NicolaSturgeon standing up for Scotland while the Tories are hellbent on dragging us out of the #EU against our will.  #ActiveSNP 
"Self-determination and referendum are the doors which will lead us to the solution," says activist Jordi Sànchez, who faces rebellion charges in #CatalanTrial 
Extending Article 50 would prolong uncertainty and act as a Trojan Horse for Remain:  #Brexit 
All my fellow lefties moaning about Brexit being used as a device to roll back workers right. Why do you think so many women are so perturbed by the ramifications of trans rights? 
No deal 10, May deal 20, softer deal 30, election 20, referendum 20. All require some extension.  
Could Brexit break the BBC? The tensions, the bewildering question of ‘balance’—and how to get it right At the very least, so very serious questions need answering.It will take a lot to restore my faith in BBC news ever again. via @prospect_uk 
The British right is the author of the wreckage of our country. The thinking behind mindless financial deregulation: excessive cumulative public spending cuts; interpreting the 52:48 referendum as a mandate for a Hard Brexit - now blaming EU for the debacle. Never to be forgiven. 
Post-Brexit, when hopefully we can start focusing on other issues, what would be your top priority? 
If Theresa May’s Brexit deal passes, national humiliation awaits, says Ross Clark 
1. It really is Simples#Brexit means BrexitThere is No #LexitIT WILL:Be ToryRemove Rights w/o ConsentLeave UK & Cits Worse OffThreaten the UnionAllow Govt to Take Back Control from Parl & Ppl &Hand it to the EU/USA/China etcTHERE IS NO GOOD BREXIT#RevokeA50 
Theresa May said we all own #Brexit, oh no we fucking don't, for a generation your party has blamed the EU for everything your party has done wrong, your xenophobia/racism towards our friends in Europe has led to the shitshow we're in now, you own Brexit and we won't forget #GTTO 
Brexit shows us how broken our democracy really is. We are leaving the EU even though it is *proven* Vote Leave committed the largest breach of campaign finance law in British history, and top LeaveEU donors accepted financial deals at the Russian Embassy.  
Great location. The poet John Donne was once Dean of St. Paul's: "No man is an island, entire of itself; every man is a piece of the continent, a part of the main. If a clod be washed away by the sea, Europe is the less …" #Brexit 
Is it not the same FT of London.London of Britain.Britain of BREXIT.BREXIT that's about to turn Britain into the new Bulgaria of Europe.Lol. I see why Atiku would appeal to them, but sadly Nigeria isn't the country they colonized 100yrs ago.The jungle is now mature.   
If the Tory PM said No & refused to agree a section 30 that would make an Indy Referendum bindingDo you agree that it would prove  beyond doubt we do not live in Union by consent and Scotland is trapped in a WM dictatorship, where democracy has ceased to apply for Scotland 
There is NO WAY I will ever unite behind a fraudulent illegal referendum which delivered a Brexit without any plan whatsoever. No patriot would want that for our great country. Shame on you. The will of the people has changed #NoBrexitDay #Remain 
Picture Speaks 1000 Words - @dfatirl Minister for Foreign Affairs @simoncoveney Took Time From #Brexit Negotiations to Talk to Eoghan & Duke. Check Out Eye Contact Between Duke & The Minister -I think Dukes smile says it all about what kind of person Simon Coveney is! Thank You  
20 days until Brexit and Theresa May is still playing Russian Roulette with the public's savings. Millions could be impoverished.She must now rule out No Deal and put her deal versus remaining in the EU to the public.  
The UK is one of the greatest countries in the world and still the 5th largest economy. Whatever the outcome of Brexit - the UK will thrive and we as one of the most entrepreneurial countries in the world will make the outcome work for us all. We should now be POSITIVE 
The depths to which remainers in Parliament are stooping to undermine the referendum result and betray our country and its constitution are unprecedented.   It is nothing less than a coup d’etat against the electorate.   
Theresa May’s hopes of a last-minute Brexit breakthrough appeared doomed last night after a “total breakdown of trust” between London and Brussels, reports the Telegraph.#GoWTO 
If deal voted down & there is an extension of Article 50, TM notes this will be a failure of politicsMore accurately, it will be a profound failure of her & the gov, meaning she'd have to resign & there'd be a GEVote it down, let this happen, elect someone for proper Brexit 
Two weeks today, we will march on Westminster to demand that parliament #PutItToThePeople.Join us as we demand a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit. RSVP at  
‘We may never leave EU’: Theresa May issues warning to Brexiteer MPs before crucial vote on her deal  #Brexit  
A Mysterious Hard Brexit Group Run By A Young Tory Is Now Britain’s Biggest Spending Political Campaign On FB. Where’s The Money Coming From? No time for complacency else the next referendum will be as unsound as last 1!@UKEUchallenge via @alexGspence 
This is why @openDemocracy has been ferociously looking into how this 'dark money' funded Brexit, and campaigning since then.  
#FBPE something to lighten the mood. Share your favourite Brexit related funny pics, cartoons, tweets and jokes. Here's my newest favourite to start us off. It's the Nigel Pissweasel bit that gets me every time.  
Opinion | The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks  
We need to fully identify these shadowy organisations running dark political campaigns - Britain’s Future A Mysterious Hard Brexit Group That Is Now Britain’s Biggest Spending Political Campaign On Facebook. But Where’s The Money Coming From?  
Not long now until the second meaningful vote on Brexit. We’ve secured concessions* from the EU and things are looking very good** for my deal to pass**** no concessions ** exactly the same as last time*** be put in the bin 
Food inflation in the UK has been low for 4-5 years.... until post-referendum currency weakness caused what the FT calls "The biggest rise ever in food prices" EU - a precious part of our lives. #FinalSay #FBPE #Food #StopBrexit 
This is a must watch. The murder of my colleague, Jo Cox, resulted in these people wanting to press the anti-EU case harder. It’s another shameful episode in this disastrous Brexit saga. 
I'm centre-right, a natural Tory voter, except that now I want to see the mendacious, greed-crazed, venal, incompetent proto-fascist rabble that is the current Tory party wiped off the electoral map for at least a decade. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Trump is terrible, but the sabotage of Brexit will outlast him.Ian Birrell - The Washington Post  
An analogy.It's one thing to implement a vote to lift smoking bans when voters knew the dangers of cigarettes.It's another to do it after voters were told smoking increases lung capacity.I know which category the Brexit vote falls into. 
Brexit makes tackling poverty and climate change harder  
The only sensible thing to do now is CALL A GENRAL ELECTION. 1. Tory’s for mays deal. 2. Labour for customs union brexit 3. Tig and Lib Dem’s for 2nd referendum. 4. UKIP STAND FOR COMPLETE WITH-DRAWL FROM THE EU UNDER 1972 REPEAL ACT!! Who would you vote for?? 
Guys, how will Brexit make the UK more prosperous?Your own government figures say the reverse especially if you go for no deal Brexit.  
Join me & my fellow Renewers on Saturday 23rd March as we join our voices with those on the #PeoplesVoteMarch who vehemently oppose #Brexit & all it stands for.We. Demand. A. People’s. Vote.Sign up to march with us 
Hilary Benn - I don't think we'll be leaving on the 29th... fantasy has collided with #brexit reality... we are in a terrible mess & the world is looking at us wondering what we're doing.. the only people who will decide to #StopBrexit are the British people.#bbcaq #PeoplesVote 
I raised this directly with @Facebook this week - apparently it’s ok because it’s registered to someone they can identify - it’s not up to them where the money comes from... FFS. This is how democracy dies. @MarkDiStef @alexGspence #Brexit #DarkMoney  
The Brexit lie-machine spat its poison further following Jo Cox’s death & Theresa May continues to force feed the UK its result. It would be a crime against democracy not to have a Public Vote on the Deal  
Thornberry says Labour will oppose any delay that will require us to take part in the European elections.  How is that consistent with “keeping all options on the table”?  It’s designed to make a second referendum impossible.   
Very good summation by Blair of where we are with Brexit, though I don’t agree with his conclusion. Mainly because I’m utterly convinced if there was a 2nd Referendum, LEAVE would win by an even bigger margin - so we’d be in exactly the same position we’re in now.  
George Eustice MP reveals how the foreign office kept the door open to staying in the EEA as a no-deal #Brexit Plan B 
It is quite difficult to wake up every morning in a country brought low by nationalism and arrogance. To be able to trust no one, to be pushed along the line towards the cliff edge, to hear people shout for 'total Brexit', all of this destroys the soul. 
Labour’s strategy all along has been to be one foot behind the Tories towards Brexit. Their front bench are soaked in Tory Brexit facilitation. A short extension solves nothing.   
The Telegraph: The Government cannot fool the voters over Brexit  
There is NO present for us.  They know that.  But for them, there are rewards from their Vulture Capital tax dodging billionaires who will pillage our economy and reward them with directorships, consultancies, shares.  Brexit  is organised crime. 
Swedish chef on Saturday Kitchen just said he no longer has a problem getting good service staff ‘thanks to your Brexit, because they are all leaving London and coming here’  (Stockholm) 
Politicians should deliver on their promise to get Brexit over the line by the 29th of March - even if that means leaving on WTO terms.  
"I pledge that I will never forgive or forget the politicians who are inflicting Brexit on us, nor those who - by their inaction, abdication of responsibility and lack of opposition - are enabling them to harm us." RT if you agree. 
Nonsense to claim that it’s the EU that wants to re-run #Brexit arguments, when it’s the British govt that is seeking to wriggle out of what it previously agreed on the Backstop  
How about another illegal war Tony. That'll get Brexit out of the headlines mate. 
PLEASE SIGN & SHARE:"We call on you to reject May's Brexit and any other bad Brexit deal, take the catastrophic threat of No Deal off the table, and extend Article 50 for a year, allowing a new public vote to break the deadlock”.#FinalSayForAll 
May's scriptwriters provide unequivocal proof that reality is suspended at CCHQ. There's only one way for the country to be brought back together again and it involves a public inquiry and the full force of the law being brought against those already found guilty of breaking it. 
You may believe Tony Blair is the devil incarnate. But he has all the best tunes on Brexit 
Brexit is not something to be suffered, endured, survived. It is an idea that has been tried and found wanting. Let's stop pretending, to ourselves and to the world. Let's revoke Article 50 and get on with the important stuff instead. 
"A second referendum would be divisive" said the Education Secretary Damian Hinds. He thinks that a #PeoplesVote should not even be on the table. Theresa May's disciples are trying to turn UK's future into a binary choice between two disastrous outcomes! #StopBrexit #ToryShambles 
Yet more new evidence coming to light casting doubt whether the 2016 referendum can be considered free and fair. Add to that the government's shambolic handling of the negotiations, May's miserable deal and absence of any benefit of #brexit to the UK, it's time for a #peoplesvote 
These people are available to set up your brexit festival @theresa_may 
Exceptionally enjoyable read-Judge Crushes Remainers' Claims that Referendum Result is Invalid - Euro Guido  
It’s utterly despicable. How can anyone respect the result of a referendum when these were the tactics employed to fight it?  
Because I can promise you one thing: I will never forgive. I will never forget. And I am willing to bet millions and millions of others won't either. Brexit will break Britain, literally and metaphorically, and there will be no putting the pieces back together again. 
If you demand better than this Brexit mess join us on March 23rd.Together we can stop this disaster. 
If we lived in a properly functioning democracy, Brexit would be cancelled because it was a completely invalid campaign and Aaron Banks would be in prison.  
Many young people see Brexit as an opportunity to create a more democratic and tolerant society. Tamara hits the nail on the head here! Get involved with our campaign:  
It’s been said many times, but Blair - whatever his blind spot on Iraq - is a great communicator. Nobody has put the case against Brexit more succinctly. Put your prejudices aside. Listen to it. He absolutely nails it in language anyone can understand - even the Prime Minister.  
The Monday after Brexit is April Fools Day - could this all just be the most elaborate practical joke in history? 
These days Jim Davidson looks like your aunty’s friend Carol who moved to Benidorm but still voted brexit.  
Simple way to solve the Brexit debate. Those who want to Leave the EU can stay in the UK and we become self sufficient. Those who want to Remain, leave the UK and go live somewhere in Europe. 
This is Brexit in a nutshell.The EU have conducted themselves impeccably throughout the process. They've been consistent, united and statesmanlike from start to finish, while our MPs and press have spent three years shit-talking them to deflect from their own inadequacies.  
Britain's network of tax havens is enabling Arron Banks to hide the source of his money. #Brexit Britain is in thrall to the money of the super-rich exploiting the largest tax haven network of any country.  #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
A Mysterious Hardline Brexit Group Run By A Young Tory Is Now The Biggest Spending Political Campaign On Facebook. But Where’s The Money Coming From?  
It’s a crowded field, but Banks is surely the foulest skid mark on the rancid underpants of Brexit.  
New dark money Brexit mystery: an obscure group called Britain’s Future has become the biggest-spending political ad campaign on Facebook, splurging tens of thousands a week pushing a hard Brexit. The only person associated with it is a young Tory writer and activist.  
#Libdems are absolutely united on #Brexit. We are a pro EU party, we are open, tolerant and outward looking. We have never supported ending FOM or leaving the EU. Which is why we have been fighting for a final say referendum for 2 years. 
U.K. and EU officials are meeting for more #Brexit technical talks in Brussels today. The member states have been sent a memo saying the EU is open to “further, workable ideas from the UK.” 
The Banks Files: Brexit funder urged campaign to "press it harder" after Jo Cox murder  via @Channel4News 
⁦@Channel4News⁩ for exposing the criminality & immorality of the pro #Brexit campaign. Banks ignored Jo Cox murder truce & funded Labour Leave - now under investigation by ⁦@ElectoralCommUK -latest revelations. #finalsay #peoplesvote  
Theresa May asked to respond in Commons this week to the proof that both Leave sides cheated said that Brexit must be delivered or people will "lose faith" in democracy. Some democracy when the cheats get to win 
The referendum was not free and fair and needs to be voided. 
Sent to me by a friend. From Private Eye.Do you think Private Eye is wrong sometimes? YES!#Brexit #Flowcharts 
Brexit belongs in court."This is actually very serious. @vote_leave, which goes right to the Cabinet & @theresa_may's advisor at @10DowningStreet have probably committed the biggest overspend, the biggest electoral irregularity since the 19th Century" 
'A slap in the face': Barnier sets May on course for Brexit defeat  
A Mysterious Hardline Brexit Group Run By A Young Tory Is Now The Biggest Spending Political Campaign On Facebook. But Where’s The Money Coming From?  
Stockpiling, collecting rain water and growing vegetables - one family's preparations for a no-deal Brexit  
There has been absolutely no effort from Irish media to report on Brexit negotiations in any sort of balanced way.  They all wrap themselves in the EU flag. Pathetic really. #IFP #Irexit 
Believe in the post-Brexit bounce!This is an excellent article laced with humour and a healthy dose of realism. Project Fear is pathetic and quite laughable really.Oh, and don’t forget that foreign investment in the UK reached record levels in 2018!  
At the last election, the Labour Party promised to accept and honour the result of the referendum.Now they're seeking to overturn that result and keep us in the EU. Promise broken.  
DISGUSTING FULL THROTTLE scare mongering on BBC news today, the same old story, food shortages causing riots in the streets. Dispicable. Stabing the public in the back by denying Brexit is far more likely to cause trouble  
I really hope everyone in #EU countries is aware that our prime minister #TheresaMay does not speak for all of us. Many of us are deeply ashamed and embarrassed by the mess she’s made of #Brexit negotiations. We do NOT accept that the EU is to blame for this. 
THREADThe talk today by @PhilipHammondUK of his ability to spend his 'accumulated insurance fund' if MPs approve Theresa May's Brexit deal is rather misleading about how the public finances work... 
Whatever you voted, whatever you think of where we are, this should really worry you. Democracy is totally undermined by this - ‘The Banks Files: Brexit funder urged campaign to “press it harder” after Jo Cox murder...’   
Here is a simple question. If the #EU are willing to block Food & Medicine supplies to the #UK Why the hell would we want to be a member of a union That puts peoples lives at risk?#LeaveMeansLeave #StandUp4Brexit #StandUp4Democracy #LetsGoWTO#Brexit 
‘Whatever happened to plans for the #Brexit Festival?’ asks ⁦@canonjpemberton⁩. ⁦@Banxcartoons⁩ answered last year. 
‘’Oh my God, Karen. YOU HAD ONE JOB!’ Hilarious as ever from Marina.                  Worried about Brexit? What, with these geniuses in charge? | Marina Hyde | Opinion | The Guardian  
Brexit began with ‘Cakeism’. It won the ref with Cakeism. It was our negotiation strategy and it is still STILL all we’ve got. Its utterly transparent to everyone apart from, apparently, the UK gov. They’re in a parallel universe.  
Before Brexit we can continue to vote with our ££. Leave EU products on the shelf or in showroom.Choose local products where you can. Ask your suppliers to stock UK products. When there is no UK option, go global. #BuyBritishOrGoGlobal #DontFeedTheMonster #AvoidTradeWithBullies 
The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks - The Washington Post  
I have asked members of the Conservative Party many questions on Twitter about things that affect our country,Brexit,Law and order,Immigration,All important issues. I’ve never had one reply. What a bunch of arrogant aloof conceited disdainful snobs.Do you agree? 
Nobel-winner Paul Nurse on Brexit: ‘The UK is turning in on itself’  
Ladies and Gentlemen, I give you Tim. Tim is 63 years old and represents the youth wing of the pro-#Brexit Leave Means Leave.  
But #Brexit of ANY variety means LESS for public services & NHS. The Brexit on offer will weaken revenues by £40billion a year - so says the Treasury’s own data!Sick and tired of phoney promises of ‘billions’ extra under Brexit, whether from @PhilipHammondUK or @johnmcdonnellMP 
This election is between 2 Yoruba men. But it's has somehow become a referendum on whether or not into people should be trusted. 
Brexit is horrific. Lose our freedom of movement and get nothing whatsoever in return other than a self imposed recession of 'up to 50 years'. Brexit takes away, it does not give. No. I don't want any Brexit at all. 
I used to pretend my epilepsy didn’t exist. Like a no-deal Brexit, it’s a dangerous game | Hadley Freeman  
Maybe in the 2nd referendum Aaron can re-form the band with all the newly declared Lexiteers inside Labour - I would pay to watch that fiasco unfold. 
It's #Saturday! It's #FBPEParty Day!       Is the UK stronger, safer and more prosperous & harmonious in the EU? I believe it is.If you agree, add #FBPE, follow others and join the resistance against a corrupt, uninformed #Brexit. #Remain 
So, the UK looks as though it might march out of Brexit negotiations in a strop at the NI backstop that *they* demanded  was included in the EU deal.  
Well I’m an NHS professional with over 30 years experience and with 2 clinical degrees. I voted leave. Does that make me racist? Let this buffoon label me racist and I’ll see him in court! The EU mandarins are pocket lining self serving elites!Brexit!!  
We are two @MarinaHyde columns away from Brexit 
By the way, do you want to hear the kicker? Although the civil service has been on a Brexit hiring binge, thousands of those staff have been seconded from other departments to work on Brexit. In other words, everything that was being sidelined is now sidelined AND understaffed! 
From the Washington Post - The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks  
MPs could save Britain from #Brexit madness next week -- let's make sure they do! Sign and RT:  
Hey Brexit, I remember when yer da said “I’ll never be using that text message thing, it’s just a phone” and now a year later he has a Twitter account and thinks he’s Bill Gates  
'The flimsy proposals she’s unveiled today won’t even guarantee your existing rights after Brexit.  And they certainly won’t stop workers’ rights in the UK from falling behind those in the rest of Europe.' 
Brexit latest:  
Huddersfield says stop Brexit!  
No deal Brexit warning: UK could run out of TOILET ROLL two days after exit claims expert . Absolute Rubbish! I would just buy the Guardian to use then! But my neighbour, has unloaded 100 loo rolls from his car! There are some sad people! around! 
UK media are fixed onto Shamima Begum ATM. Let her go.You do realise Brexit is less than 20 days? Report on that. 
- You lost, get over it: the result of the referendum doesn't affect the chance of Brexit being a success, just like you can't vote to win the football or for your team to win the lottery. Cause and effect just don't work like that.But apart from all that... Sigh. 
brexit belongs to the Tory Party. History will judge them harshly for squandering our wealth and international standing on a 40 year-old internecine squabble. Shameful. 
Must read. This is where Brexit talks stand following a ‘Cod’ dinner in Brussels on Tuesday. Whatever about dinner, the talks  are gridlocked. Brexit: Cox, Barnier and the blame game begins  
What a stupid, dishonest position. Anyone against both May's Deal and No Deal but insisting only on a short extension because of European elections, as if they're a big deal, either has no idea how massive Brexit is in comparison, or is just desperate to avoid a People's Vote.  
Dundee taxi driver who’d voted Leave ranted on to me last night about the “bloody immigrants who cheat us all out of tax” before offering me a wad of blank receipts so I could fiddle my expenses...#brexit 
So according to the Tories:Brexit shambles - Labours faultDecade of austerity - Labours faultKnife crime - Police’s fault Housing crisis - Labours fault Service cuts  - Councils fault Has there even been a more  reckless govt that so shamelessly denies accountability? 
Thank goodness for C4 news. Shame on the @BBCNews @itvnews et al for not doing their job properly. The Banks Files: Brexit funder urged campaign to "press it harder" after Jo Cox murder  via @Channel4News 
Today's news:- Brexit Secretary rejects EU’s new backstop proposals- Theresa May threatens UK with permanent EU membership- EU President says Brexit date can only be delayed few weeks- Judge crushes Remainers’ claims Referendum result is invalid 
Brexit donor ‘defied ban’ after Jo Cox murder  
How does milk and toast for breakfast, a jacket potato for lunch and lamb chops for dinner sound? 
Quote of the Week, and serious early contender for an annual award.Clear (as here, also in phrases like ‘Let me be very clear’) is also doing well in the Word of the Year, #Brexit section.Indicates statement to follow that is either daft, irrelevant or impossible. Or all three.  
May's Brexit is dead in the water.Is Corbyn's Brexit preferable to May's? Yes.Is it better than what we have now? Not even close.@bremaininspain 
There’s no such thing as a successful Brexit - it’s a total con  
On @BBCr4today, @SteveBarclay again making the spurious point the result of the 2017 GE shows 80% of the public supports May’s Brexit approach. Quite literally, hijacking votes AGAINST it.“We don’t trust you with a majority”, we said.“You endorse our plan totally”, they hear. 
There is no better commentator on Brexit than Tony. Calm, knowledgable, objective, dispassionate, he is everything that is (mostly) lacking in the UK discourse.  
All these elites who just cannot stand the fact that those up North and from working class backgrounds had the audacity to vote leave.How very very dare they, they must be anti-semites, racists, uneducated oiks..... no just pissed off at the likes of you #Brexit #nodeal RT 
I wrote a chapter on Brexit and political economy for @GavinJKelly1 and @IPR_NickP’s Political Quarterly Brexit book.It’s online and it’s free to read.  
Mark Francois pathetically delighted to be interviewed on Today programme. Of all the talentless 10th-raters Brexit has unearthed, Francois is surely the dregs. His return to obscurity cannot come soon enough. 
The Government cannot fool the voters over Brexit  
MPs could save Britain from #Brexit madness next week -- let's make sure they do! Sign and RT:  
A socialist message from Jeremy. The real divide isn’t between those who voted ‘No’ and those who voted ‘Yes’ in the Independence Referendum.And it’s not between those who voted ‘Leave’ and those who voted ‘Remain’.It’s between the many, and the few.  
The Government cannot fool the voters over Brexit -   
Ok, we're now down to "counting the days until Brexit on your hands and feet" time. Hard to believe that 20 days we're supposedly crashing out of the largest economic block in the history of the world. And we're less prepared than if we were going on a dirty weekend to Magaluf! 
Britons will still be able to get their Greggs vegan sausage rolls after Brexit, the high street baker pledges!    via @business 
As the high-stakes Brexit negotiations reach a crucial phase, the blame game is also well under way writes @tconnellyRTE 
March with us on 23 March if you are BOB! (Bored of #Brexit) The only way to be free of Brexit is to stop it. Parliament can:1. Revoke A502. Ask for an extension to A50 so the people can decide if they want May’s deal and years more of Brexit negotiations.#PeoplesVote 
Do you remember the days of innocuous scandals, when we would splutter into our conflakes for days on end over duck houses claimed on expenses? Now it's all "£33 million for fake ferries" this, and "Brexit referendum stolen by dark money" that. Nostalgia ain't what it used to be! 
Next week is the week we can celebrate the death of Brexit, will it finally collapse under the weight of its own contradictions?May thinks she can come back for a third vote but I suspect legal challenges and much else besides will kill off Brexit once and for all.Happy days! 
Green MP Caroline Lucas brands Theresa May 'shameless' over Brexit, and says she thinks PM will call second referendum - Evening Standard  
Walk away ......Only way ........and tear up the cheque......     Brexit secretary accuses EU of trying to 'rerun old arguments' - BBC News  
Leaked memo reveals ministers warned of Brexit plot to keep UK in permanent customs union with EU  
Brexit news: Theresa May to be GONE by end of April says Iain Dale on BBC Newsnight | UK | News |  
Such a shame that you didn’t seize the opportunity to resist the Tory Brexit instead of helping it.If we judge actions rather than words, the only change you actively work for is to make people poorer and cause chaos. Presumably so you can then keep politicising poverty. 
It now appears that Labour Leave was partly funded by Arron Banks and  - which ran a disgustingly racist and Islamophobic Brexit campaign. Shame on Kate Hoey, Graham Stringer, Kelvin Hopkins. SHAME ON THEM  
Thank you for your draft obituary.Please note, as the post mortem will show, a small minority was achieved by misleading promises & illegal activities which, if the referendum was binding, the courts have stated would rendered the result legally void. This is all yours, not ours 
Excellent article by @JamilaMammadova about why Scottish Independence would suit Russia. Russian trolls actively attempted to influence the 2014 independence referendum 
Been 'liking' this here there but I need to share it. I feel this woman. I get enraged when a racist makes some cowardly sh... remarks in front of my boys (Brexit GB n unleashed hatred) so I can v well imagine how it feels when u r a black woman scared abt your babies lives ...  
Does anybody else think that the whole Brexit situation is all being staged jointly by May and EU? Making it look like it's going to end in disaster then at the last minute EU 'cave in' to May with a pretend concession. Her BRINO deal is passed and she's a hero?  
The UK has thrown out the EU's latest attempt to break the Brexit deadlock over the Irish backstop and accused Brussels of trying to "rerun old arguments". 
HOLD ON A SECOND : is she standing in front of pallets that will be compliant in a no deal brexit ?  
‘Could empty shelves after a no‑deal Brexit result in violence? Of course’Why doesn’t Gauke & Rudd just Resign, nobody would miss them, both useless! 
You silly lying buggers!! #Brexit does not belong to me or millions of others because we voted remain and are still remainers. If it belongs to us all them the Govt would trust us with a #PeoplesVote and end this charade once and for all. Will you charlatans do that? 
Alexa what does Brexit look like?  
"here’s the final irony: If Brexit was the creation, in part, of this new world of offshore money and political influence campaigns, Brexit may well ensure that it continues unrestricted"  
"The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks".  
So, according to Barnier, we either have to leave NI as part of the EU, give up #Brexit altogether, or leave without a deal?On this basis, I vote #NoDeal. 
Ann's sister, daughter & neice voted leave. They had reasons that are very common amongst leave voters. But they have all changed their minds 2years 9 months later now relaity of brexit is clearer. They are #remainernow. Respect to them, so many like them.#PutItToThePeople 
Brexit gets the Oscar of the biggest democratic mess in history ! 
How an extension of ‘Article 50 limbo’ next week leads to the collapse of Brexit  
@ForBritainParty Newport West Candidate is Oxford graduate Hugh Nicklin.He is a supply teacher & tutors children of all school ages privately.  He played rugby for Llangwm & Narberth & was a WRU referee.#ForBritain will make #Brexit happen.The other parties have betrayed you.  
The Brexit tragedy boils down to the lie that you can ‘have your cake and eat it’: - the referendum result- May’s entirely incompatible red lines- the  inability to sell compromise agreement reached with - the need to blame EU as the ‘cake’ fiction becomes obvious 
28% of Brits stockpiling ahead of #Brexit.What happened to all the benefits?.......oh they were lies..............OK, I get it... 
Another farcical thing about brexit is being told ,ad nauseum, that, it's 'the will of the people' by people that adamantly refuse to verify if that's actually the case.It's like being told I must get policeman pyjamas because that's what I desperately wanted when I was 5. 
‘Mediicrity & incompetence turned into a principle of government’ - @dominicbrind of @OFOCBrexit brilliantly describes the ‘Grayling Brexit syndrome’ last night in the Oxford Union, which voted to reject the May deal 
All of the crucial damage to delivering Brexit has been caused by Conservatives:  Hammond, Rudd, Gauke & Clark from inside the Cabinet, and Grieve, Soubry and their gang, and then Boles, Spelman and Letwin, from the back benches.  Labour has just need to sit back, watch and wait.  
After Jo Cox’s murder it was agreed to stop the campaign for a bit, as the pro Brexit campaign had clearly motivated this horrendous act.  But Banks refused to comply with the moratorium and capitalised on the tragedy instead.  
"Describing someone as an architect of Brexit is like describing the Luftwaffe as an architect of London" so good  
Strathbogie council backs Uluru Statement and endorses the referendum to enshrine a First Nations Voice to Federal Parliament.  
Arron Banks 'ignored the deal to stop Brexit ads' after the murder of Jo Cox  - instead he doubled down & told LeaveEU to 'keep on pumping'. Banks is under investigation by the National Crime Agency looking at the true source of multi-£millions funding for the Brexit campaign!  
#FinalSayForAll Final Brexit Deal -v- Remain.  
Brexit will see the biggest transfer of wealth into fewer hands than we’ve ever seen.  
Philip Hammond’s urging to MPs to vote for May’s Brexit “deal” should be the strongest warning against doing so.  
My bit on a week of spellbinding WTF-ery, even by this lot, even at ten minutes to Brexit  
This the democracy we are told we must respect? There is right and there is wrong, and those behind Brexit are on the wrong side of history.  
Are we 20 days from Brexit or 4 to 6 days from betrayal? 
Next week's Brexit votes could yet result in the general election nobody wants  
err no thanks... you as a tricktator do not speak for me and the millions who didnt vote for your fraudulent brexit in any of its forms - - REMAIN IS THE ONLY WAY - STAY AND LEAD THE WAY  -you know it makes sense even to you - 
We no longer want Brexit Guy, orderly or otherwise. We’re demanding the British people are given the final say. 
It's bloody obscene that a Labour Party - Labour - should collude in depriving ordinary people of their freedom of movement. I will never forgive them this horrendous betrayal of everything the Labour Party was formed for. @uklabour @jeremycorbyn #Brexit 
Mark #Francois, vice-chairman of Brexit extremist group, the #ERG, is entitled to #Italian citizenship via his mother. He can therefore keep the right to live, work, study and/or retire in any #EU country even after #Brexit, but is intent of taking that from others. Hypocrisy ! 
BREXITGovernment efforts to change the backstop have run into a brick wall. The EU thinks with justification that MPs won’t allow No Deal so feels no pressure to make further concessions. We're on the verge of a political crisis the likes of which we've not seen for generations.  
For once, the UK does hold a very significant card, the A50 revocation card that puts an end to this madness; though holding, playing it is a different matter. 
The @Europarl_EN stands in unity with @MichelBarnier. He has put forward constructive additions, now we wait for a credible response from the UK to ensure an orderly Brexit.  
This man exports - outside the EU.  So do some members of our team.  This man is a better 'expert' than Remain civil servants in the Treasury.  He actually does it.Distinctive daily #Brexit research & news daily : #GoWTO 
Tories have stripped back the welfare state, forcing millions into poverty. Corporate tax cuts have taken precedence over social care and the NHS. They have more interest in fighting amongst themselves over Brexit than fighting for social justice.They are the #NastyParty #r4today 
Despite Brexit drama - the U.K.  is lucky to remain a member of @esa. UK has been the largest subscriber to @ESA_EO programmes at 2016 @esa Ministerial ! Hope this continues in 2019 - £ wisely invested ! 
Small business owner on BBC, at the moment, crying at the fear of her business being closed by Brexit. Worried for her staff.You should be in prison, @theresa_may 
The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks  
Summary: The backstop requires the EU to negotiate in good faith. If we want out of it, we can just leave Northern Ireland behind.This is what happens when you hold a referendum on leaving the EU without mentioning that we're constitutionally bound to another EU country.  
The context of that tweet was Corbyn fans finally turning on him, not for his antisemitism, but for his Brexit support. I can just repost in context of Ilhan Omar and her Obama comments.  
PLUS WITH A FEW ITS RESONATING LIKE IN #UK THE #CONS SO CALLED #REPs of #BRITs have fallen into his trap with #Brexit Mess it ..Promise me Everthiing but give nothing Look at his thinking on borrowed $$$ #Military in #Space "Jesus Christ" shall  I say"Moses" Priority is #Climate 
June 2016 - the result of a criminally flawed referendum must stand. January 2019 - the record defeat of a government must be rerun.Funny thing this democracy malarkey...  
BREXIT is “essential” in showing leaders within the European Union they need “to have more regard to the democratic wishes of people throughout Europe”, Tory Lord Forsyth has claimed.@Conservatives @theresa_may 
Have you noticed, Brexiters are suddenly obsessed with allocating blame for the chaos? I don't see any Brexiters celebrating a glorious success, far from it. They've dug a giant hole & can't climb out. Brexit means wrecks it. #StopBrexit 
Frances O'Grady: Theresa May's Brexit promises on workers' rights are worthless - Frances O'Grady - Mirror Online 
‘A second referendum is not a negation of democracy, it is a completion of democracy.’ My speech in a packed Oxford Union, which last night voted against Theresa May’s deal @OxfordUnion 
But the "British people" didn't vote for Brexit !!! Only a minority of them did. And even then, they couldn't agree on what they f'cking wanted! 
Let's see who the English Nationalists love  it BREXIT or is it the tiny tiny 6 North Eastern countries of Ireland? 
It is, quite possibly, the most ridiculous argument for Brexit yet.  
Theresa May says Brexit might never happen if MPs refuse to back her deal in Tuesday's vote  
Three weeks before Brexit day, the costs of no-deal are mounting by the day  
"The backstop debate does not even begin to address Brexit’s existential threat to the Irish economy," argues @davidfrum. "Instead, it offers a nationalist consolation prize: the economic severance of Northern Ireland from Britain." 
Brexit secretary accuses EU of trying to 'rerun old arguments'  
No, history will judge the @Conservatives for placing the interests of their own party above the interests of the country at every single step of #Brexit.May has one last opportunity to place the interests of the country first by adopting #Labour’s proposals to prevent no deal. 
"Democrats still seem to think 2020 is going to be a referendum on the president. It’s not. It’s going to be a choice. Right now, the Trump campaign could hardly ask for a bigger favor from its overconfident opponents." 
Brexit is 500 hours away. #brexit 
Jeanne Freeman orders snap inspection which reveals third world cleanliness at QEUH. Staff shortages blamed. Meanwhile Nicola yaps about Brexit. @cultfree54 @2351onthelist @CompoundAye @JohnLeoNo1087 @BRRSC @carmic3 @edglasgow59 @JanetMcwee @mik61scot @AgentP22 @athomsonkinross 
Up until today I thought that "Brexit" was just some weird British word for breakfast. Suddenly the last two and a half years of headlines make a lot more sense. 
yesterday i explained to mei & tiff that i have to speak at a thing about loose effect of brexit on asean countries but they thought i was misspelling asian so i complained about korea not even being involved bc its not an asean country and they thought I was the dumb one 
When Brexit finally dies as it will it won't be the EU or Remain that kill it. It will be May's incompetence and fanatical hatred of immigrants. 
And this is where we have arrived at in the world....causing anxiety to child molesters is considered a crime..... What in the name of Richard Blumenthal is going on!? #Brexit #TommyRobinson #MAGA #WWG1WGA #TWGRP 
May appears to be part of the deception and a knowing part! Again because the vote was advisory the PM could choose to decide the vote was safe or not safe ? As she seems to consider it safe when many ind PMs wouldn't is another Question! Don't know what legally can be done 
THOUGHT FOR THE DAY:If Islam is the religion of peace why aren't there any extremist peacekeepers? #MAGA #Trump2020 #WWG1WGA #KAG #Brexit #TWGRP #Trump #WWG1WGAWORLDWIDE 
Brexit: a done deal? - a good reason for no Art 50 extension would be to cut short these interminable speeches from Mrs May. However, it might just be worth it if she could be persuaded to deliver her next speech from the top of a wind turbine...  #Brexit.  
Leaked memo reveals ministers warned of Brexit plot to keep UK in permanent customs union with EU  via @Telegraph 
Spot on. As Brexit gets closer expect the hysteria, the attacks & the desperation from the Ultra Remain / Peoples Vote camp to increase. The language will get darker and the emotional blackmail will increase. There will be a lot more Will Self style outbursts where the mask slips  
This is mental @MichelBarnier , from NI, live in Fermanagh with Irish passport all my life & under GFA that recognised our nationality of choice; Irish  or British, NI vast majority voted to remain but Theresa May says we are now British #brexit #remain #deservesomuchbetter 
Stop.Lying.Brexit is toxic. The reason Cameron had a referendum was to stop its toxicity in the Tory party. We had a prosperous past. There is no *good* Brexit. Your blackwhite propaganda is straight out of '1984'. Are you aware it is a dystopia and not an instruction manual?  
As Home Secretary, Theresa May was warned by our intel people about the true source of Aaron Bank's funding for the Leave campaigns before the Referendum, but spiked their investigations. 
The mysterious £8m does raise issues about the probity of the Ref. result, but having spent such vast sums on getting that result, how can we be sure yet even more £ is not being spent on getting that result passed into law? The 30m that didn't vote to Leave want, deserve answers 
Judge Crushes Remainers’ Claims that Referendum Result is Invalid  
All hail to @Coldwar_Steve for this marvellous piece of writing, in his book of amazing satirical montages, “The Festival of Brexit”.  
The more we learn about Brexit, the more crooked it looks- yikes. My twitter foe, Arron Banks is in it up to his neck.  What a surprise...  
Stephen Fry approves of the knuckle dragging Will Self. The chattering class luvvies stick together and shall deserve their eternal exclusion from power, a great bonus of Brexit  
In the UK we've got a corruption scandal over the Referendum to leave the EU involving Russian money, election fraud etc. and it's not getting anything like the coverage it should here. 
722 Videos of the Repression lived in Catalonia caused by the Spanish Police in the Referendum of October 1, 2017, #ThisIsTheRealSpain  
On Michael Gove: “Describing someone as an architect of Brexit is like describing the Luftwaffe as an architect of London. “  
20 days to #Brexit.It's going to be a messy run in, as UKGov succumbs to the weakness of character they are endowed with.When this ends, our govt must end next. Should that mean the Tory party collapses, then so be it, the party let this happen.Feck them all, is where I'm at. 
Nothing to admire or support here guys.  Please understand we are in the Government Coup/  WHY BREXIT?  Please why DID HMG do it?  So much in legal circles.  MP's ARE ONLY WATCHING NOW AFTER CH 4 NEWS THIS WEEK! 
I am on a very delayed train out of London and I look forward to getting into my bed around 3 am and also FYI everything is terrible and by everything I mean England. And by England I mean drunk business men on flights and also Brexit.  
It was obvious from day one (and widely predicted) that the govt. and #Brexit supporters would blame the inevitable failure of negotiations on the EU and then blame the ensuing failure of the UK economy and civil disintegration on the EU, #Remainers, "elites", immigrants etc. 
Grateful to @RoryStewartUK at tonight’s @OxfordUnion debate for pointing out that Andrew Adonis calls BBC ‘Brexit Broadcasting Corp’ while Farage simultaneously calls it ‘Brussels Broadcasting Corp’. It’s just a ploy to put pressure on BBC of course - but some people swallow it. 
"Perhaps, after all, Brexit is not big. Britain just became small." 
“The Guardian understands another plan under discussion is to hold a third meaningful vote immediately after no deal has been ruled out – in the hope of focusing the minds of Brexiter rebels”What the hell is this? 3 votes on the same deal? WTF? #brexit 
This Brexit belongs to the PM alone, & the country doesn’t like itThese allegations about Arron Banks need to be investigatedAlmost 3 years after the referendum we *still* don’t know where he got the money to bankroll LeaveEU & UKIP & Labour Leave 
Signed. We must stop brexit until we know where Arron Bank's £8m came from  
Scotland voted No to Indy.  Scotland voted no to bombing Syria Scotland voted no to war in Iraq Scotland voted no to Brexit.  Each time the Westminster government had its way and won.  ????Did you ever wonder why????? 
Weirdly, in debate at @OxfordUnion on PM’s Brexit deal, @Nigel_Farage & @Andrew_Adonis spoke on the same side against, versus @RoryStewartUK who was in favour.  Adonis & Stewart were thoughtful, Farage was knockabout. But he & Adonis won the vote. Commons will surely do the same. 
Our interim report: The Northern Ireland backstop and the border has been published. Read it online here: Find out more here: #Brexit #NorthernIreland #Backstop #Border #BrexitNextSteps #WithdrawalAgreement 
#WillSelf reckons that because some racists voted Brexit, then Brexit is...racist? So what about the extremists who voted to remain?What an utterly moronic thing to suggest. @wself is being purposely dishonest. FULL VIDEO: #JBPYS 
‘Finally. The political debate breaks out of the "Canberra bubble". "The next election will be a referendum on wages," Bill Shorten said this week. "It will be a contest about who the economy should work for, whose interests the system should serve.’ 
Newspaper headlines: Brexit breakthrough hopes 'dashed'  
If we left EU under the t&c's of Jeremy Corbyn ? I would not fear #Brexit so much He is a Trusted Leader here & abroad ..& many EU & Worldwide countries are prepared to work with him .So many people are following his progress at home & abroad all hoping he becomes P M in Britain 
Utter cobblers! There is no prosperous future post-Brexit. The government's own figures tell us so. 
Queen dragged into Brexit? DELAYING Remainers risk ‘full-blown constitutional crisis’  
Stockpiling seeds to beat the post-#Brexit "hunger gap"  
Ok @Conservatives you need to get your house in order. This is not ok. This is an insult to the dead &  bereaved. You’re saying that #Brexit will cure this appalling killing spree of knife crime? I mean how low can you get? @theresa_may @metpoliceuk @SadiqKhan @labour #knifecrime 
Tech Review 1) 5 Myths About 5G, 2) Alibaba $BABA in the U.S. (video), 3)Investing, 4) ICYMI Tech News  $AAPL $GOOG $FB $MSFT #StockMarkets #China #Brexit #tech #investing #Huawei #Alibaba #5G 
I stand with IsraelI stand with the people of the Jewish faithI Stand with the Yellow VestsI stand with BREXITI am Proud of our @POTUS$ My Tax Return is awesome$16 felony counts for Jussie SmolletI believe the Democrats hate this country 
UPDATE: Alma Otter referendum question fails, with 7,317 votes total. @WCIA3NO: 3,807 votes.YES: 3,510 votes. 
SMR is utterly bewildered by the ability of @theresa_may to LIE her arse off!| She suggested the British people, to whom Brexit "belonged", had "moved on" and "are ready for this to be settled", adding: "Everyone now wants to get it done." @BBCNews |EVERYONE? REALLY?  
Just to be clear..After @theresa_may's #Brexit, the other 27 #EU member states have the right to leave the #EU completely with 2 yrs notice by submitting #A50. However, #UK will have no right to  leave a permanent #CustomsUnion with the #EU ....errrrr ever!No, no, no! 
May spelling out that Brexit is NOT the will of the people..and she knows it.  
Can you answer this #r4roday?If Mrs May can call THREE meaningful votes on her deal why is a #PeoplesVote undemocratic?Please note that the defeat of the PM's deal in the 1st vote was the greatest defeat of the govt ever.Compare that with 2016 referendum results: 52% to 48%.  
The Great Brexit scandal - despite all the cheating, the lies, the dodgy dealing and the subversion of democratic process the BBC, media and our Prime Minister seem determined to pretend that none of it ever happened. 
#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#CambridgeAnalytica#RobertMercer#SteveBannon#DataHarvesting#DarkAds#BrexitLies#TrollFarms#GamingTheMarkets#DisasterCapitalism#TaxAvoidance#MediaBillionaires#BrexitBus#Gerrymandering Please don’t tell me Brexit was “a grass roots” campaign.  
Here's a thought - the UK (or maybe just England) a once great imperial empire, now unable to attack and bully distant countries and peoples, has turned its aggression and bullying in upon itself. #Brexit#PeoplesVote #FBPE 
Barnier reaffirmed tonight. It’s GB less NI. No Unionist, Conservative, Democratic Socialist or sensiblest can support May’s awful WA. As a Brexit supporter it’s No Deal or Remain over this. Remain at least preserves the chance again through A.50. Shameful management @theresa_may 
Poverty and climate more important than Brexit, says Jeremy Corbyn “The real divide is between the many – who do the work, create the wealth and pay their taxes – and the few, who set the rules, reap the rewards and dodge their taxes."  
So, in NI, Brexit planning is being undertaken by Civil Servants (bureaucrats) without political oversight.  Was that not the original reason given for the UK leaving the EU? 
“Describing someone as an architect of Brexit is like describing the Luftwaffe as an architect of London.”- ⁦@MarinaHyde⁩, Goddess, 2019  
News flash! Something has changed in Theresa May's approach to Brexit. It's taken over two years, but she has finally finally finally caused the EU to snap and run out of patience...  
This grotesque gaslighting has got to stop.  In economic terms the government's own data shows that any Brexit scenario leaves us worse off, and in political terms, the loss of influence is plain for all to see.   
“The great fear on the progressive side of politics is that 30 Labour MPs flip out of panic on Tuesday… But it’s not going to happen.”Author Paul Mason outlines how the Brexit votes might result in a general election#newsnight | @katierazz | @paulmasonnews 
"By way of a refresher course, Michael was one of the architects of Brexit. Or perhaps that’s the wrong word, given the mess. Describing someone as an architect of Brexit is like describing the Luftwaffe as an architect of London." Who else but @MarinaHyde? 
Behind @Andrew_Adonis and @Nigel_Farage is the @JohnSimpsonNews from what one calls the Brexit Broadcasting Corporation and the other the Brussels Broadcasting Corporation  
Well this is definitely more important than Brexit. #YouthStrike4Climate #Seven 
If Brexit doesn't happen TMay will always be able to blame the ERG 
If, as #newsnight is now discussing, Theresa May can have a THIRD MEANINGFUL VOTE on her deal, why is it undemocratic for the electorate to have a referendum to confirm or reject the results of the 2016 referendum?Double standards, Mrs May, double standards!And not acceptable. 
Yes, but it’s also dishonest of May not to tell it as it is to the people of my home town.  Grimsby will be damaged by Brexit.  It has significant problems, but none of its major issues will be solved by departure.  #PeoplesVote 
“In any of these scenarios I think Theresa May could not be prime minister by the end of April.”LBC’s Iain Dale lays out on the #Newsnight whiteboard how the difficult it could be for the PM to get her Brexit deal through@IainDale | #Newsnight 
Deal or no deal, here's why Brexit cannot be stopped | BrexitCentral  
Sickening deceit from Corbyn to downplay the Brexit crisis by claiming that poverty & climate change are far greater priorities for Labour & the country. #Brexit will worsen poverty, and a UK outside the EU will be far more vulnerable to pressure from polluting multinationals. 
You are right I will continue to stand up for the 17 .4 million who voted to Leave in a UK referendum 
Leaked memo reveals ministers warned of #Brexit plot to keep #UK in permanent customs union with #EU ⁦@Telegraph⁩ 
£16k private charter will take hundreds to the People's Vote march and they will fill the train easily #Brexit 
Theresa May's Brexit speech in full from grimsby, #brexit #brexitdeal #Newsnight @theresa_may 
They are listening to the referendum result, you irresponsibly foolish person. The result was incoherent and parliament reflects that incoherence 
The newest move by the EU to end the Brexit deadlock has been dismissed by the Government, but what does it offer and why will it treat Northern Ireland differently to the rest of the UK? 
Hello Sajid JavidA British citizen could have been repatriated before the birth of her baby.Instead you removed her citizenship.That is not how Britain treats its citizens.Or it wasn't until the toxicity of xenophobia was unleashed & legitimised by #Brexit.Grim.#newsnight 
Jess Phillips speaks absolute sense.  I applaud you.  Uncovering the truth about the validity of the campaign and subsequent vote has to precede any further actions based on it’s outcome.  No one can argue against this point. 
This map shows the difference between Mays Stronger town Fund and the EU structural Funds per region, this is how much each region is losing out on because of brexit....  
Personally, I’m with Mark François on this one. Will Self is self-contradictory. He says all anti-Semites voted Brexit. But he also thinks that Brexiteers are right-wing, and those on the right are frequently pro-Israel. Labour is anti-Semitic.  
A society grows great when elderly people plant trees in the shade of which they know they will never sit in. Tragically, Brexit is the diametric opposite of that. 
What utter nonsense. WTO deal = Brexit done in 3 weeks. May’s Deal = years more negotiating humiliation at hands of EU, stuck in vassal statezombie state. May’s weakness & Remainer obstinance will rightly be blamed. 
Up to her usual standard of brilliance.Worried about Brexit? What, with these geniuses in charge? | Marina Hyde  
Change won't come if we don't fight Brexit. Any Brexit.You will be remembered as the worst Labour Leader in history. The Leader who failed to listen, who failed to lead, and who split our Party and consigned our country to years of Tory oblivion.Campaign for a public vote.  
Theresa May is a disingenuous fraud, along with all her remain backers.She is now trying to blackmail us into accepting her deal, or get no Brexit... when we all know her deal is no Brexit at all too.. Ultimately she is destroying her only party, destroying her core vote. 
.@Andrew_Adonis for the Opposition: “We have crises in health services, unemployment, and housing. The key to understanding Brexit is that it’s as an elite project to move us away from these social crises.” #BrexitDebate 
He's absolutely right ... please RT if you agree"Poverty and climate more important than Brexit", says Jeremy Corbyn #WelfareRebellion #ClimateAction #GeneralElectionNow 
Next week will be a critical week in our country's history. We'll be holding our breath, waiting to see if MPs vote for a return to sanity or decide to follow our delusional PM on her journey towards the cliff edge. We now know, any form of #Brexit will be a disaster. #StopBrexit 
Well, the problem is that poverty and climate disaster are made so much worse by Brexit, Mr @jeremycorbyn  cc @RemainiacsCast @pimlicat 
My fisking of #TheresaMay's #Grimsby speech on #brexit, pointing out her deliberately misleading presentation of where we are and where we’re going:  via @RCorbettMEP 
#isitok to stage a cat coup given that we are now only 21 days away from #Brexit? Asking for a friend @TheLastLeg 
Why did teh BBC's Jo Coburn not close Will Self down who repeatedly smeared and branded 17.4m Brexit voters as racists and antisemites by association?Self's "stare down" at the end is ludicrous and worthy of a 3 year old.  
Fantastic result. The High Court has thrown out a Remoaner challenge to Brexit by the ghastly Jessica Simor QC. The Court also rubbished the idea that the referendum was flawed.   
Everyone blames you for your failed #BrexitEven leave voters blame you.The blame will be coming thick and fast in your direction.#PeoplesVote 
That's more than three quarters of a billion pounds a year being spent on people generating paper. They're not improving healthcare, paying for new school buildings, or building more homes. They're pushing bits of paper around, documenting the chaotic blizzard of Brexit red tape. 
Saturday's Daily Telegraph"Barnier leaves May facing Brexit humiliation" #tomorrowspaperstoday#bbcpapers(via @hendopolis) 
Brexit: One more push needed, says May.Everyone agrees. Push her out of office and replace her with a #Brexiteer. Now. Please. 
Oh, and if you want to know where the Brexit £billions are going, that's where. DExEU staff costs ran at an average of £5,878 per person per month. If we use the same average for all staff working on Brexit, that's close to £64.7 million in salaries a month, or £775 million/year.  
With more serious revelations over the spending of the mysterious £8m by Arron Banks, Jon Snow asks "Given there was only a 4% difference between Leave and Remain is the result safe?" @jessphillips explains Theresa May needs to make clear that she's also interested in the facts." 
Judge Crushes Remainers' Claims that Referendum Result is Invalid  
Just asking again but has anyone seen any benefits to #Brexit lying around? It's just, we're quite close to 29th, and I'm yet to see one. Maybe I've been looking in the wrong places for over 2 and a half years. #HELP 
Thing is @theresa_may that you can still get the #Brexit you do desire via a #PeoplesVote if the British people decide that #Leave is still the majority. Nobody is stopping 17.4 million from voting #Leave again to approve your deal.So, what have you to fear?#PutItToThePeople 
A second referendum is not negation of democracy, it is a completion of democracy @OxfordUnion #PeoplesVote #brexitdebate 
The third instalment of the Channel 4 News #TheBanksFiles investigation tonight reveals the secrets of millionaire Brexit backer Arron Banks’s campaign to leave the European Union.Watch it in full here:  
No, if they don't back her treasonous 'deal', we leave by default with No Deal under WTO rules.  Complete #Brexit.  Job done.  #LetsGoWTO #NoDealNoProblem 
There are 11,000 civil servants working full-time on Brexit at the moment. 88,000 hours of effort, every single day, put into making the UK poorer and diminishing our standing in the world. Just mindblowing. Imagine where we'd be if they'd been doing something productive instead! 
Scotland needs to stay in the EU. There's no version of Brexit that safeguards our jobs, livelihoods, institutions or our standards of living.EU membership is critical - if it can't be achieved as part of the UK, it needs to be achieved as an independent country. 
The referendum was a con and achieved only a tiny marginal swing (2 in 100 voters) - so stop treating it as what we voted for - especially when there was no plan or detail. You do not have some unaccountable mandate to pursue whatever you alone decide @theresa_may 
Brexit is only the latest injustice in a long line forced upon Scotland by Westminster governments. Bombing Syria, austerity, the Iraq war, privatised utilities and services, the destruction of industry - the list goes on and on.It's time for Scotland to be governed by Scots. 
The worst, most hated, evil government with a suicidal leader that needs sectioning ~ and its almost 10 points ahead of @UKLabour & the clot that's ruining it.Wake up, Labour. With Corbyn in charge & Brexit your penchant, you'll never govern.#fbpe #ofoc #ffs @tom_watson 
I'm sorry twitter users.Next few weeks will be boring.I will be suffering from monomania.It can be cured:#StopBrexit#RevokeA50 There is no benefit from Brexit.The 2016 referendum was advisory and result obtain by lies and illegal campaigners.Brexit is a coup 
Leaked memo reveals ministers warned of Brexit plot to keep UK in permanent customs union with EU  
Exactly this. May keeps threatening Brexiters with ‘no Brexit at all’. Since that would only follow a referendum, the implicit declaration is that the will of the people is now to remain. Her hypocrisy is so monumental it deserves its own plinth on Trafalgar Square  
The 2020 election cannot just be a referendum on Donald Trump. It has to be a referendum on the rotten system that made Trump’s presidency possible. 
.@theresa_may warns MPs that #Brexit may not happen at all if they reject her deal  
Less than a month before the deadline, good Brexit news continues  
CH4 did their best to imply a large numbers of Brexiters are right wing & that a large number of right wing people are unstable deranged murderers, when Brexit's a constitutional issue not even a left/right one anyway !Beginning to wonder who the really are deranged people are  
I took part in this @Channel4News report to comment on new evidence of #EUreferendum alleged illegality by the Leave #Brexit campaigns. But there was even more shocking evidence than I imagined.  
Deal or no deal.... #Brexit simply is being backstopped forever..... the vast majority from our Island, want a unified Ireland, that remains within the E.U. Family.... united and together as one Island we are stronger.....  
History will remember that it started with Blair actually..He had the golden opportunity to undo what Thatcher did...But he didn't..He pushed the policies, paving the way for the Tories austerity and ultimately Brexit. Ah, that Blair..what a guy, hey?  
Brexit is 506 hours away. #brexit 
Brexit talks 'going backwards' after breakdown of trust between London and Brussels 
In 1893, Colorado suffragettes passed the first state referendum in U.S. history to grant women the right to vote.In 2020, we can make history again. Chip in today to send the first woman from CO to the U.S. Senate!#TeamTrish#InternationalWomensDay 
FS.Let's just leave.MPs dismiss EU's last-ditch bid to secure Brexit deal  
Brexit to avoid new EU tax avoidance rules. Shelve plans to make British Overseas Territory’s reveal who has billions stacked there. And then they get huge donations from tax exiles. But that’s got nothing to do with the donations........ Honest 
I dare you to read this article attentively, mindful of the fact that there's broad agreement that every single Brexit scenario will leave the UK worse off in the short- to medium-term.  
You hewn the country down the middle. It will never be united, never mind get behind your divisive #Brexit.#brexit is your shit-show, not mine, own it.#BrexitShambles 
Behold the fight over the last loaf of bread in Brexit 
We now go live to Brexit  
U must be joking ... we voted for #Brexit ... if u won't deliver it we will find someone who will ... what a shambolic mess u have made of these negotiations @10DowningStreet 
It’s 2021. Post-Brexit, Britons fight over the last ham in the land.  
Worried about Brexit? What, with these geniuses in charge? | Marina Hyde  
Theresa May: 'We may never leave at all' if my Brexit deal is rejected. It Should NOT be your Deal May! It Should be the Deal 17.4 M Voted for. It was always a  Bad Deal is Worse Than No Deal. Vote was To Leave, not IN/Out Shake It All About! 
(Opening 10 minutes of report) @Channel4News confirming what we all knew.... Arron Banks funneled money to both UKIP and Labour Leave in the run up to the EU referendum. Labour Leave now under investigation by the @ElectoralCommUK: 
Brexit BOMBSHELL: Philip Hammond hints at SOFTER EU exit if MPs reject May’s deal . Would anyone of voting age who wants to see Hammond remain in office please shout. . . .quiet isn't it.  
Brexit is deadThe Tory party is dead.... 
There are so many questions related to crookedness and foreign influence in the Brexit campaign that the UK would be mad to not put it on hold. Including:Arron BanksCambridge Analytica / Steve BannonFacebook fake news Russian bots Russian money?Far-right violence 
@BitchesvBrexit this is Flora. Guinea pigs against Brexit pic.twitter.com/WHC2QmYe2V 
I love that face. Nothing gives me more schadenfreude “Can I ask her about the visit of Alexander Nix of Cambridge Analytica to Downing Street in December of 2016?” #brexit  
In the year 2000, Brian Souter organised (entirely independently) an advisory postal referendum on Section 28.  It was highly controversial and the result was ignored, but I don't recall a single person pretending it was "illegal". 
The Banks Files: Brexit funder urged campaign to “press it harder” after Jo Cox murder – Channel 4 News  
Full emails say Arron went to Moscow in the run up to Brexit vote, to discuss Sberbank involvement in Gold Consolidation and Diamond Privatisation deals. You had the bank introduction details and could get Russian visas, Andy. Want to explain more?  
Oh dear @MerrynSW really doesn’t understand the #backstop or the #WithdrawalAgreement. Fortunately @KirstySNP is there to put her right & get a huge round of applause from the #StAndrews audience #anyQuestions #Brexit  
However much Jackson Carlaw and Ross Thompson may wish it otherwise, normal countries don't view the holding of an advisory referendum as an illegal act. Are they advocating smashing us over the head if we vote in one? 
This really is an inadvertently hilarious and insightful thread on how some understand the alleged tragedy of Brexit. Talk about parallel lives...  
Haven't seen any good reason to accept a worse deal than the one we have  already.  Other than stupidly implementing the result of a fraudulent referendum, which would have been declared void if it had been binding (ironically). 
Tonight we reveal Brexit funder Arron Banks ignored campaign suspension after Jo Cox’s murder, urging social media team “up the spend” and “press it harder”.Watch the third instalment of #TheBanksFiles in full here: 
(1) A reminder that it was not only the Leave EU loons that continued campaigning in the wake of the shocking murder of Jo Cox. Here's at Vote Leave's Matthew Elliott denying they had continued pumping out ads: 
Brexit talks grow more hostile as the EU unveils a new concession that U.K. negotiators have already rejected  
There won't be hundreds of thousands marching for no-deal this month. There aren't hundreds of local groups campaigning for Common Market 2.0 or a Labour Brexit. You'd struggle to find hundreds who thought May's deal was any good.They're not what the country wants.#Remain 
George Galloway: "I want Britain post-Brexit to be what it was in the Swinging 60s, when we were the cultural capital of the world. When we had a steel industry, when we had a coal industry - when we were something!"@GeorgeGalloway | #MOATS |  
17.4m people might have voted for Brexit but the MAJORITY of people no longer want Brexit. #bbcaq 
No matter deal or no-deal #Brexit, the UK will always be THE best place to hide out after looting a nation.  
Read the judgment. The referendum was advisory and the common law cases referred to binding elections. If the referendum had been binding and the Electoral Commission had reported the illegalities prior to the A50 notification it would have been voided. 
We must make our voice heard. Join our march against Brexit and send Theresa May a message.Together we can stop this mess. 
We all know Brexit was achieved by eschewing the truth; the extent to which it also shunned decency is now becoming clear.  
Anti-Brexit campaigners have hijacked Nigel Farage’s infamous Breaking Point poster to put the real threats to the country in the spotlight  
Al Gore Brands UK Politicians ‘Cowards’ for Not Forcing Second Brexit Referendum  
Brexit Explained  
Gore is useless. He can’t get America to listen to him but thinks other countries will. Real comedian. UK isn’t concerned with your opinion.Al Gore: UK Politicians 'Cowards' for Not Forcing Second EU Referendum  
(checks to see whether the DUP is winning friends back home with its Brexit stance)Oh. 
NI-specific backstop. The DUP would never buy this, clearly, but will recalcitrant Tory MPs? And what if a chunk of Labour MPs cancelled out the DUP? This is the best chance Theresa May has of delivering Brexit.  
Damian.  Brexit must be stopped until the truth is uncovered.  This is not democracy.  It's abhorrent. 
Well, this is very strange indeed. @JMPSimor has been busy on Twitter all day but somehow she hasn’t found time to tweet about her crushing court defeat over Brexit. Maybe she’s forgotten all about it? I do hope this helps jog her memory.  
If someone thinks that saying ‘every racist voted for Brexit’ is the same as saying ‘everyone who voted for Brexit is racist’ they are not very good at their native language. 
Raab warns of ‘DAY OF RECKONING’ if politicians BETRAY Brexit voters  
#Brexit is the project of the most ruthless, greedy and cynical segment of the transatlantic super-rich, allied with Putin, and using fascists and bigots and the venally ambitious as its tools. #Brexit is what a traitor would do to Britain. 
Hi. Nice to see you destroying the economy and reputation of the UK on the back of an ILLEGALLY funded referendum with Russian interference.You will be held to account as you must be aware of the facts. Hopefully we can get you jailed at some point. 
#Brexit weakens and divides Britain and harms its people. It undermines Western democratic unity and aids enemies of democracy such as Putin and foreign multi-billionaires like the Kochs, Murdoch, Mercer and Trump. #Brexit is what a traitor would do to Britain. 
Excited to be at Harvard for the European Conference 2019 where I will be talking about Brexit   
regular reminder that, as we speak, Idaho Republicans are planning to respond to the Medicaid expansion's sweeping referendum win by overturning it AND by restricting future referendum drives 
Are you aware, Alastair ,that there are credible reports that the police are now ready to proceed with bringing the "brexit" criminals to justice , but that this is being resisted by No 10 ? 
Would Dr Paisley, as a committed Ulster nationalist, have missed the open goal which is the special status which Brexit gives to the North of Ireland? Subsidies aplenty from Brussels & Westminster, & unique access to the single market. #freetrade 
Professor Dougan predicted the Tory Brexit blame the EU game in 2016Cue the blame game from @Jeremy_Hunt today 
Yep, FOM going ...going ... ..incl the opportunities for all those made redundant by your #brexit to find a job abroad.And those of us with #cancer the chance to be treated FREE in an EU hospital.And our kids to get Erasmus grants for EU unisTories= they kill you in the end 
Perhaps Europhobic #markfrancois should read this again. A beautiful letter from an RAF officer in #WW2, written just before the #brexit referendum. ‘If the nation should fall for this deceit I can only conclude the lives of my comrades were lost in vain.’ He died last year.  
What level of illegality, corruption and interference will it take for @theresa_may to stop “respecting” the result of the referendum with such complete religiosity and start demonstrating some critical faculties and basic curiosity about what actually happened? @Channel4News 
Absolutely! We should make it very clear to politicians that the 2016 referendum was so corrupted by gerrymandering, crime, foreign interference and lies that it would be a crime against democracy to use it as a mandate for #Brexit. #PeoplesVote 
Britain Should Take EU Negotiators at Face Value and Just Leave, Says Brexit Rebel Eustice  
Theresa May knows the accusations. She knows the Electoral commission findings. She knows.... she knows and yet still she insists that this rotten referendum must be *respected* #thebanksfiles 
When Brexit history is written the failure of @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn most MPs and the law enforcement agencies properly to take seriously the referendum crimes and misdemeanours will be a big part of it. And hopefully @Arron_banks will read it at Her Majesty’s Pleasure 
Has Brexit activated you politically?Please select closest match. If you have not been activated yet, please comment and RT anyway. If you wish, please leave more details in comments.Please RT for big sample. 
It’s getting to the point where I like ⁦@MarinaHyde⁩ more than I like lemon drizzle cake and Puligny Montrachet put together, which is a LOT.“Describing someone as an architect of Brexit is like describing the Luftwaffe as an architect of London” 
#C4News Do these remainer Labour MPs and Jon Snow SERIOUSLY THINK I cared what the leave campaign said, I had _40_YEARS_ experience of the EU, and you can't beat that over some poxy adverts. I'm going to report Channel 4 for their anti-Brexit hatchet job so called "reporting". 
I can't explain how angry it makes me that the @Conservatives lied to get my vote last GETheir whole plan was to defraud us through promises knowing they'd be reneged onTo get power not to implement Brexit but to stop itI trusted them. I'll never trust them again 
So #LabourLeave was just another front for #ArronBanks to spend Russian money during the EURef campaign?Will Theresa May now intervene and declare the referendum null and void as would be appropriate?@lbc #c4news #TheBanksFiles #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote #newsnight #r4today 
BREXIT IN: 21 DAYS. 21 SECONDS. Will we ever leave the EU? MAYbe, MAYbe not, says MAYbot.  #Brexit  
The complete moral bankruptcy behind the Brexit campaign. All parties agreed to suspend campaigning after Jo Cox's murder by a far right terrorist. But Arron Banks urged his social media team to "up the spend" and "press it harder". 
May is blackmailing all of us by saying it's her deal or it's no Brexit and delays. She should be done as a traitor and trialled for treason. There is another deal on the table and that is NO DEAL WTO RULES where has that option disappeared too. She is a disgrace as a PM shameful 
#Brexit is what a traitor would do to Britain. 
WA is not a deal, it’s a suicide note!May & Barnier’s joint plan is to place UK into such a painful, debilitating & humiliating ghetto under EU control as to make it squeal to return.WA 'Transition' period puts UK under EU rule with No say.#Brexit #EU 
It will be thrown out but the House of Commons will not have the guts to leave without a deal. This is because the majority of MP's want the UK to remain in the EU in direct contradiction to the instructions they were given by voters in the referendum. God help Parliament. 
How sad to hear the anxiety and genuine fear of #Brexit in voices old and young.  Huge turnout of Italian citizens at our information event tonight in Glasgow.  
Looks like even by @Arron_banks disgusting standards he dived especially low when Jo Cox was murdered. Some truly disgusting people have driven Brexit and the failure of MPs to pursue them properly is one of the many scandals of Brexit @Channel4News 
On Channel 4 News right now the third part of our investigation reveals the secrets of millionaire Brexit backer Arron Banks’s campaign to leave the European Union - #TheBanksFiles 
"Theresa May must stop passing the buck and take personal responsibility for the Brexit crisis created as a result of her own intransigence."The Tory leader’s Brexit deal is fundamentally flawed and would be devastating for Scotland”- @IanBlackfordMP: 
Judge Crushes Remainers' Claims that Referendum Result is Invalid -  
Gordon Brown: “Decades from now a new generation will look back with stunned disbelief at the way the Brexit debate has been conducted so far.”' Yep, remain voters refused to accept the 2016 ref result and ''has-been remainer MP's'' sabotaged the negotiations at every turn! 
The really frightening thing that Brexit has thrown up is just how many MP’s on all sides are just plain stupid. Not just not quite the best and brightest but really dumb. Unable to articulate a reasoned argument and happy to go on tv and show they are idiots. 
Very Exciting News!I have solved Brexit. 1. Rename wherever it is you live as “Here”2. Rename everywhere else as “There”3. Let everyone who lives There to visit you Here4. Everyone who lives There will then  let you visit from Here5. The end. 
So Arron Banks funded @LabourLeave whilst @KateHoeyMP supped champagne on a boat with Farage. Tells you all you need to know about #Lexit - it’s a con. Brexit is a project conceived by the Right, of the Right, and for the Right.  
People say Brexit is as complicated as the Moon Landings, but I think it differs in two important ways:1. The Moon Landings were planned and executed by intelligent, capable people who used logic and data to test every theory before attempting their mission2. The Moon exists 
Judge Crushes Remainers' Claims that Referendum Result is Invalid  via @GuidoFawkes 
Fruit, Fear and BrexitBritain's grocers will find themselves at the global forefront of exploring new retail technologies. This can only be a positive for Britain's labour force, consumers, and the country's ability to attract investment and partnership  
Will Brexit result in a new economic model for the UK or just a worse version of the status quo? Really thought-provoking essay on political economy by @DuncanWeldon for forthcoming book 'Britain Beyond Brexit' edited by me & @IPR_NickP for @po_qu.  
Tomorrow's #RoguesGallery cartoon, after #FredericChurch, for @Independent... #TheresaMay #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
Quote of the day on the rees mogg show on LBC  :“ I couldn’t vote in the referendum as I was too young and I’ve waited 40 years for this “ 
 'Brexit is rubbish. Let’s bin Tory Brexit.'@BestForBritain had a strong message for the government on their visit to Leeds today!View the full gallery of pictures here   | @pixel8foto 
Shortly on Brexit negotiations  
Poverty and climate more important than Brexit, says Corbyn  
FM @NicolaSturgeon yesterday spoke of the  Resilience Committee was meeting to discuss securing medicine/food supplies if a No Deal Brexit occurs due to a Tory PM refusing to rule out No Deal.|So why did the PO tell her that is enough? PO is supposed to be neutral  
A third of UK firms may now move abroad because of Brexit  via @LondonEconomic 
The sheer level of stupidity in this is staggering.Of course Poverty & Climate change are worse than #Brexit.But not only does Brexit make both worse - brexit is something we can instantly & easily stop.  
We didn't vote to leave to remain in bits of the EU because it might upset Macron, Blair and Campbell. We REJECTED the EU. May's deal is not Brexit, it's a national humiliation. Every MP must vote against it for the country. 
As @BenKentish reported, LOTO backs a soft Brexit over a new referendum. Norway backers believe Corbyn could be persuaded to whip in favour of an EEA/EFTA option, not least b/c it’d be like putting a “hand grenade” in the Tory party, as one MP told me.  
Brilliant piece from Ms Hyde - Inernational Women's Day - Yes!  But not Theresa May - she's exempt on grounds of devious insanity.  Worried about Brexit? What, with these geniuses in charge? | Marina Hyde  
Andy Davey on #BrexitShambles #Brexit #TheresaMay #backstop #GeoffreyCox #StopBrexit - political cartoon gallery in London  
Any Brexit related hit to the German car industry will be more than made up for by the Brexit related growth of the German comedy industry.  
Upset by Manafort verdict in the US? Mad at the alt-right coming back to San Francisco in May or by Brexit coming to the UK? Unsure about the future of Europe? Remember what happened to the world in the 1930s? Can we do anything? #YesWeCan  
He’s right. And history will be his judge! Poverty and climate more important than Brexit, says Corbyn#ImWithCorbyn 
Worried about Brexit? What, with these geniuses in charge? | Marina Hyde  
Three weeks until Brexit day and  we’ve reached the Twitter phase of negotiations. 
OH MY GOD HE WAS SO YOUNGWHAT DID THIS REFERENDUM DO TO US  
Judge rejects Remainer claim that referendum result is invalid ... “There is simply no evidential basis for the proposition that the breaches...are material in the sense that, had they not occurred, the result of the referendum would have been different”   
At tonight’s Oxford Brexit debate, 7/8 speakers are men. 4/4 of the invited (outside) speakers are men. Not one speaker represents Ireland. Does the Union know the head of Oxford is an Irish woman & a globally renowned political scientist? Give me strength. Oh and happy . 
Summary of May’s latest #Brexit speech:  - I still haven’t got a clue what will happen  - Nothing to do with me anyway, blame everyone elsePar for the course from the worst PM this country has ever had. #ToryBrexitShambles 
I honestly feel like I've drifted into some sort of dream state...first Trump, then Brexit, now people are defending a world class child-catcher... These are the End Days 
Mrs May, Your deal won't bring the country together. It jeopardises the Union. It isn't a decisive step. It offers a dark future of uncertainty, alienation & decline. No one voted for the UK to be entrapped & emasculated in this wayLet's undo Brexit before it undoes us.  
Everything you need to know about Brexit.  
 via @GuidoFawkesAnother one bites the dust.QC Jessica Simor( have a look at her twitter feed ) who tried to get the Referendum made null and void has failed excruciatingly badly.Must have a twitter word to console NOT.Jessica will be well bitter. 
My bit on a week of spellbinding WTF-ery, even by this lot, even at ten minutes to Brexit  
May: Let's get it doneBelieve in honouring the resultThe result was corrupted. Why honour corruption?Boost our economySafeguard our securityProtect our UnionEvery version of Brexit is worse than RemainBrexit damages our security & our UnionIs May delusional? Corrupt?  
1/3 Let's make it very clear. Its pushing the political rhetoric that 'Leave voters are racist' by associating the words he's chosen with 'Brexit'. 
Tourism industry fears 'no-deal' Brexit will cost it billions  
DUP Sources have told Sky News the offer presented by EU Chief Brexit Negotiator Michel Barnier shows "no respect to the constitutional and economic integrity of the UK" describing it as a "non-starter" 
A Channel 4 News investigation tonight reveals the secrets of millionaire Brexit backer Arron Banks’  campaign to leave the European Union.#TheBanksFiles Channel 4 News 7pm 
Will Self says that every racist voted Brexit, Brexit voters then take to the internet to say they're disgusted (even though a quick look through their timeline shows they are actually racists). It's all so confusing.  
It doesn’t appear to be a compromise that the DUP will be able to accept, and without the DUP, such is the mess that May has made, a whole section of her party will not support her.   #Brexit  
Poverty and climate are more important than Brexit, says CorbynAbsolutely Agree Jeremy! This needed saying. Please RT if you agree too.#InternationalWomensDay 
"We may never leave the EU"T May"If Parliament and this Govt betray the clear will of the British people by either delivering no Brexit or a half-in/half-out Brexit, the very future of our democracy itself may be thrown into doubt. I will play no part in this."M Fabricant 
The Mayor of Sheffield @MagicMagid on Theresa May’s proposal... vote for my Brexit Deal and I’ll give you money for Knife Crime “Theresa May is Sick” 
Berlin Wall anniversary resonates in age of Brexit and Trump  
Of all the fantasists afflicting Britain "Leftists for Brexit" are the most deluded 
If the UK wants to have a whole UK solution, then it can, and it can pursue a deep economic relationship with the EU. If it doesn't then NI will need to be treated differently from GB.Brexit means tough choices and compromise; there is no magic workaround. 
A Channel 4 News investigation tonight reveals the secrets of millionaire Brexit backer Arron Banks’s campaign to leave the European Union - #TheBanksFiles Channel 4 News 7pm 
Judge Crushes Remainers' Claims that Referendum Result is Invalid  
DUP sources: Barnier offer shows “no respect to the constitutional and economic integrity of the United Kingdom. It’s a non-starter.” #Brexit 
Brexit funder Arron Banks ignored campaign suspension afterJo Cox’s murder, urging social media team “up the spend” & “press itharder”. Watch #TheBanksFiles Channel 4 News 7pm 
Peel back the lies of the referendum campaign and it’s clear that Brexit was always a hard-right project that will do nothing to help deprived parts of this country. Labour MPs should be the last people to consider backing it. (Location: Parliament)  
Tonight on Channel 4 News: Did Arron Banks break election law during the referendum, were there under-declarations of expenses:? We show him not only financing UKIP  but Labour Leave too:Watch 'the Banks Files Channel 4 News 7pm 
We've run out of scrutiny time for the remaining Statutory Instruments that will be needed for Brexit. Convention is supposed to be to leave 21 days before an SI is passed, but we don't have 21 days left. Watch for Government to activate emergency provisions and pass them anyway. 
How typically Tory of Mark Francois to twist what someone has said to suit his agenda! Will Self said racists will have voted for Brexit - of course they did! But Self didn't say that all those who voted Leave were racists. Grass is green; not everything which is green is grass.  
Brexit outcome on 29 of March 2019 . Vote and retweet for a big sample 
Is Labour closer to backing a Norway-style Brexit?Pro-Norway MPs who met with Corbyn this week were really encouraged. He arrived with the "Common Market 2.0" pamphlet and asked Qs for over an hour.MPs are plotting Norway amendments for next week. 
Arron Banks told  to 'keep pumping' Brexit ads in wake of Jo Cox murder, probe claims  
“Customs officials in Calais are operating a 'go slow' in protest over what they claim is a lack of resources being allocated to manage their post-Brexit workload.”  
How can we stop the never ending lying from Brexit supporters? Surely there should be legal recourse against such behaviour in public office?We must #StopBrexit #RevokeA50 and hold an independent public enquiry with serious teeth! 
Nationalists claim that the Independence Referendum in 2014 was a Joyous occasion. Well it was for one day.   
More Die: ‘Health statistics represent people with the tears wiped off. ...Theresa May’s government, and David Cameron’s before it, have overseen an evisceration of the social contract. Furthermore, Brexit in any form will only worsen our nation’s health,'  
Looks to us as we approach Brexit day that the NI only backstop has suddenly come back into play. An interesting few days approaching for our small island.  
Mayhem"We need an economy that works for everyone a country where everyone can be proud of their community & every community offers people the opportunity to get on in life. That is the opportunity that awaits our country if we agree the Brexit deal"=crap 
I believe that the fact that the vote of #Scotland to stay in the EU is being not merely ignored but dismissed as irrelevant as well as being told it needs PERMISSION for a referendum are complete and utter proof that it is no more than an English colony. #Brexit #Indyref2 
The Brexit torture continues. My Brexit Blog post on the latest developments in the never ending saga. Just up, now (with the earlier technical glitches, for which apologies, now corrected):  
Will Self making a silly and unevidenced claim and Mark Francois being incapable of parsing its logical structure so that he gets self-righteously angry about a claim that has not been made. God, a second referendum campaign would be fun and not soul-destroying, wouldn’t it? 
Will the hardline Brexiters in the end vote for any Brexit? Or will they choose the valiant defeat and glorious martyrdom of Remaining over the endless humiliation of May’s crap deal?My latest for @prospect_uk on the Tory revolutionaries’ final showdown 
Women's rights are likely to be challenged after brexit, the economic crisis can impact:-Workplace rights e.g. parental leave-Equal treatment-Rights for part-time workersDemand a #PeoplesVote and make sure your voice is heard at the #PutItToThePeople march on March 23rd. 
Grenfell, WASPI, police cuts, rough sleeping up 168%, destitution rife, NHS crippled, schools on their knees, violent crime soaring, no majority, no direction, no leadership, no hope, Brexit in chaos. Someone in the Tory Party needs have a word with Theresa, and tell her to go. 
Brexit funder Arron Banks ignored campaign suspension after Jo Cox’s murder, urging social media team “up the spend” & “press it harder”. Watch #TheBanksFiles Channel 4 News 7pm 
"I think you should apologise.""To who? Racists and anti-Semites?"That stare  Conservative MP Mark Francois and author Will Self fail to see eye-to-eye on #Brexit[tap to expand]  
Horrific politics Theresa May using murdered teens and their families grief as a political tool to get her ‘Poxy Brexit Deal’ through!!!!! Has Theresa May No Shame?  
The army has been practising crowd control on Salisbury plain. Is May expecting  all hell to break loose when she cancels brexit ? I don't think our military will go against the people who have always been proud of them and supported them. 
.@AngelaRayner has ambitious and welcome plans for education reform, but they are incompatible with #Brexit.Pleased to have teamed up with young people from @LabourStudents & @FFSake_ to call on Angela to back young people, by backing a #PeoplesVote. 
The parts of the left that think they can ignore Brexit because it's boring and the EU is imperfect are some of the most misguided. Stopping Brexit is a precondition of a progressive political programme. 
There's absolutely zero chance I will ever get behind any form of Brexit whatsoever, never mind any form of Brexit which removes our Freedom of Movement. #RevokeArticle50 and #StopBrexit or you're no better than Corbyn. 
Pretty much everything in politics is more important than Brexit, but it becomes harder to fix once you've done it because you'll have less money.  
ICYMI: great article and key reading Vote Leave cheated in the 2016 Brexit vote – how would we stop them doing it again? | The Independent  
How can we honour the results of a referendum which was according to Electoral Commission and by your own lawyer's admission corrupted. How can we support your implementing a Policy which  every day that passes shows increasing damage to our economy & the lives of ordinary people 
I still don't see why the ERG are worried about the backstop. They told us over and over again that they know of an all singing and dancing electronic system that would provide a frictionless border. #LeaveLies #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
This is a big deal. A committee that concluded *unanimously* that the Government's internal divisions undermined its Brexit negotiating position is cross-party, and includes prominent Leavers. More confirmation that we're in a hellish mess now because of Tory infighting.  
Unfortunately the credibility of every sitting MP is just about destroyed. The Electorate will never forgive Parliament for their abysmal handling of Brexit and all parties will suffer at the next GE... 
Fascinating that @theresa_may is speaking in Brexit-voting Grimsby today - just 3 weeks before Brexit. In this divided country she only talks to and for Brexiteers. And it’s not enough. She can’t heal profound divisions by ignoring the wishes of now more than half our country.  
Other EU leaders have worked their butts off trying to make sense of the decision Britain made and the red lines our awful PM drew. For her to blame them for her incompetence and her MPs’ failure to agree what Brexit means is a low point in this sorry saga. 
Why are you putting blatant lies out, your deal does not deliver Brexit by a long way, and you know it!! If we don't Leave now, we will at the next GE, when I vote for a Brexit party!! And I will not be wasting my time reading the @Conservatives Manifesto promises, or lies? 
This would not allow @Geoffrey_Cox to change his opinion that in theory the backstop could be forever. So it won’t get the PM’s Brexit deal ratified at the last by MPs. The big sticking point, especially for the DUP, is that there could be a regulatory border in Irish Sea forever  
Yet another slap in the face from Brussels, with Barnier's latest "concession" amounting to a disgusting offer to annex Northern Ireland and put a border down the Irish sea. Time to walk away and have a clean Brexit on March 29!Support us at  
The forces of bigotry were unleashed long before Brexit but it is true that Leave and in particular Leave EU official played those tropes to get the racists in board. Anyone who denies that has their head stuck in the sand and their headphones on.  
She won't answer because she can't answer; she can't answer because there is no answer; that there is no answer is why MPs can't agree; and that they can't agree is why she needs a mandate from the people for her personal vision of Brexit. 
England's difficulty is Ireland's ... bigger difficulty. Third in a series by me on Brexit in @TheAtlantic 
By all means have another referendum followed by another and then yet another if it makes you feel better, but only once the first has been implemented. We've had over 40+ years of membership with no say but only broken promises of referenda. 
Leaving the shackles of the EU is a chance to really kickstart our economy. March from Sunderland to London against the Brexit betrayal:  
But its not a deal. Its an agreement to spend at least the next 2 years continuing to go round in circles during the real brexit negotiations that determine what the future relationship is. Its a blindfold Brexit. We leave but with no idea where we're going. Nobody voted for that 
So it begins. Read M Barnier’s words carefully. The JIS might get the Tories over the line, but be in no doubt there’s no good brexit. We can and should revoke Article 50 now.  
Concerns about immigration were at the heart of the Brexit debate but progressives must speak honestly about it.Read more about integration + how we can stay true to our values on immigration in the 'What are Progressives for?' pamphlet. #ChangePolitics 
May in Grimsby: ““If we go down that road [a referendum], we might never leave the EU at all”  ie Theresa May guesses - acknowledges? - that Brexit is no longer the will of the people. #PeoplesVote 
Hello Barnsley! Let's be honest brexit is a stinker. No more wasting time - let's bin it! #binbrexit  
Brexit is the Chris-Graylingisation of British political life  
“And that might lead to a form of Brexit that does not match up to what people voted for.”Whatever specific form each individual voted for, and we know that goes from EEA to the most distant relationship, they voted for the UK to be better-off in some way.That’s not possible.  
WILL SELF: “Every racist & anti-Semite, pretty much probably voted for Brexit.”MARK FRANCOIS: “How do you know that in a secret ballot?”S: “I don’t know it but I suspect it.”F: “I think you should apologise.”S: “To who? To racists & anti-Semites?” 
Brexit: EU 'not interested in blame game' as May plea for concessions misses mark ...#May & her #Govthave totally failed our Country .. the shambles is a disgrace ! 
So UK gov, decided to brexit, but blame EU when it doesn't go well hmmm UK you wanted it, no EU it isn't EU responsability to sort it out for you. In my humble opinion EU has shown extreme patience with the UK shambles brexit. RT if you agree #PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
Labour is not a liberal party like the Greens or Lib Dems, both of whom are obsessed with Brexit, electoral reform and other constitutional issues.Labour was founded in 1900 to improve the material conditions of working class people, not to obsess about the constitution. 
Theresa May says of #Brexit "Everyone now wants to get it done.". That is a shameless and blatant lie. May & her fellow Brexiters are wrecking democracy with their lies. The lies must be stopped or we will have no democracy, which I fear is what they want. 
In #Eddisbury, we spoke to Rachel who is calling for a #finalsay because of the new information we now have on any #Brexit deal. Join our campaign at  
Today I received a copy of my new book #TheReferendum and other Essays on Constitutional Politics published by ⁦@hartpublishing⁩ and with essays on #Brexit, #referendums & #populism ⁦@CTPSR_Coventry⁩ ⁦@CovUniResearch⁩ ⁦@bbclaurak⁩ ⁦@RebeccaGebauer⁩ 
Superb panel line up at Brexit & YOU this afternoon with @EamonnMallie as MC... interesting to hear from economists and others .. thanks to @s_armagh for hosting @nmdcouncil 
May: 'We may never leave at all' if my Brexit deal is rejected"Well, that settles it! It's now absolutely plain that it *must* be rejected.  
EU nationals have to apply for Settled Status after Brexit, more than 60k in N East. Ministers say process is simple - but already problems. @catsinbelfry recently granted S Status says requirements of Home Office are intrusive. More L North + Sunday Politics 
EU Chief Brexit Negotiator Michel Barnier says the bloc has committed to giving the UK the option to exit the Customs Union element of the backstop unilaterally saying the "UK will not be forced into a customs union against its will" 
Describing Bradley’s latest bit of crassness but could equally be applied to any of them and to Brexit....‘That type of scenario requires a very careful set of hands. Instead, we have a moron.’There’s no longer any accountability in govt. As for shame... it’s long gone.  
Maybe you should invite a people of a higher calibre on BBC more often. Perhaps give the UKIPPERS, the Oakeshottes, the Hate-Spewers a miss and invite more intelligent people that aren't knee deep in the corrupt shitshow that is #Brexit.Just a thought. 
Driving back from a now regular visit to hospital I was mindful of the kids coming out of school.Filled with anger, frustration, helplessness & heartbreak that they're having their EU future denied by just 26.5% of the Ppl & the most godawful bunch of party hacks.#Brexit UK. 
I’m reflecting on a Parliament in which May won a vote of no confidence.Brexit was always based on a series of lies & undeliverable promises, but May & her govt have brought dishonour, incompetence and utter shame to the reputation of a country that they lead but don’t govern.  
"I just heard the good news about your latest accomplishment, and I just wanted to be the first to say congratulations! This is amazing for you and not primarily a referendum on my lack of success in a similar field!" by @theillustrious 
The Brexit negotiations are like playing snakes and ladders but without ladders. 
Leo Varadkar warns May to PAY PRICE for Brexit compromise and SACRIFICE Northern Ireland     Brexit news: Varadkar warns May to pay for Brexit deal – sacrifice Northern Ireland | UK | News |  
The week-saw 365 days since nerve agent attack, met Prime Minister with Nick, delivered leaders events to 200 front line supervisors (with Exec team), Brexit planning, national Chiefs calls, Justice Board, Health/Safety Board, spoke with officers/staff assaulted. Proud of force! 
Shorter @MichelBarnier - We are not talking the blame here. - The UK has clear choices. As this weeks talks show, they can't be fudged. - It's the original NI-only backstop May rejected; or the all-UK one she negotiated. - Stop looking for uncorns, just choose. #Brexit 
An example for our secretive Brexit government which has tried to exclude not include. In particular the British public who have been told to shut up since 2016 and denied any further say. 
We have gone from no deal is better than a bad deal to her deal or no Brexit. 
Marking #InternationalWomensDay with a reminder that The Mash Report was the only Brexit Broadcasting Corporation show to give @CaroleCadwalla a reply to the abuse from its Brextremist presenter @afneil 
Another brilliant piece from @amy_hoggart for @FullFrontalSamB #Brexit  
Monsieur Barnier, we're still holding out for a #finalsay and/or a #RevokeArticle50 as the referendum result was tainted. Please do not cave in to May's unreasonable demands. 
It’s become lost in the debate, but May’s proposal is essentially the hardest possible Brexit that doesn’t wreck the Good Friday Agreement. It’s a Brexit for Brexiteers that makes no attempt to secure the consent of the 48% that voted to Remain.  
Barnier - "The EU stands united. We are not interested in the 'blame game', we are interested in results." #EU #Brexit  
Racists have demanded that Will Self apologise for slandering them with the suggestion he suspects they voted Leave. To compensate, they want him to pay their fees for the Brexit walk to London and buy them box sets of 'Mind Your Language'. 
So sorry you’re having to deal with the unreasonable demands of our Brexit zealots. We’re still pushing for a #PeoplesVote so that the British people can deliver their final verdict on all this mess. 
Jeremy Corbyn says that poverty and climate change are more important than Brexit. In the long run, he's right. In the short term, that's just a way to avoid squaring up to the huge issue of Brexit properly.*** Brexit is 21 days away, folks *** 
Yes, Brexit will hit Germany hardest First, Then Spain & France! Boycott anything from these Countries!  
This last stand to try and salt the earth to secure Brexit is one of the most pitiful spectacles the world is likely to see for a while. 
Writing my Oxford Union speech for this evening, taking on both Rory Stewart (Eton, Mad Brexit) & Nigel Farage (Dulwich, Even Madder Brexit). Key point: Brexit is a split in the right-wing privileged elite, manipulating a social crisis which needs solutions not cynicism 
 I briefed EU27 Ambassadors and EP today on the ongoing talks with #UK. Following the EU-UK statement of 20 Feb, the EU has proposed to the UK a legally binding interpretation of the #Brexit Withdrawal Agreement. Most importantly: 
John Major: “extend Article 50 for at least a year to allow for a public consultation on #Brexit”⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ 
All cats are mammals therefore all mammals are cats. I learned the falseness of that syllogism age 12. Mark Francois is a fuckwit who thinks Will Self, a man with a brain 4 time's bigger than MF's belly is saying that all Brexit voters are racists. WTAF!  
But she doesn't want to take that olive branch because that would effectively crown JC our brexit-pergutory saviour & shoe in at a snap election when the DUP abandon the Tories.Lifetime anti-EU activist Corbyn is having to play the long game. Stay for the ride. 21/ 
If no-brexit happens it will not be an accident. It will be the choice of the PM and her government to not allow a different deal to pass.There is a workable solution staring her in the face. It's not proper brexit but it's less restrictive than her iron maiden BRINO. 20/ 
Now TM warns us that if her deal doesn't get thru, "we may never leave the EU". The stench of irony would make Sir Didymus wince. Who's talking about 'no brexit'?! Not the LOTO. He's very clear Labour want to facilitate a compromise brexit that can get a majority. 19/  
Brexit funder Arron Banks ignored campaign suspension after Jo Cox’s murder, urging social media team “up the spend” and “press it harder”. Watch #TheBanksFiles Channel 4 News 7pm 
A huge part of the establishment has strongly resisted implementing Brexit ever since the referendum result came in - and that's the key reason why the process is in the mess it's in.  
In honour of #InternationalWomensDay we @RemainerNow would also like to pay tribute to these 8 ladies who have been brave enough to speak to local campaign groups on the streets about how they changed their minds on #brexitDo watch what they have to say on this. 
Eustice: We have bungled this negotiation. The best means of putting matters right is to embrace No DealFormer government minister speaks out about Brexit, and believes it's time to go for No Deal.Join the #MarchToLeave today:  
Listen to the experts May.You as Prime Minister are a representative that is supposed to serve the welfare of the entire nation. Not just the wishes of an ever shrinking minority.Brexit is complete rubbish, be honest with people & stop it.  
THREAD: Why as my MP - @PriskMark - and democract, you must CONDEM the decision of the Prime Minister to proceed with the result of the EU referendum DESPITE KNOWING it was corrupted. @A50Challenge @UKEUchallenge 
.@thomasbrake: “It is extremely concerning that the Prime Minister is still threatening to vote for a no-deal Brexit should her deal fail to get through Parliament... For any serious politician to consider taking us over the cliff and crashing out of the EU is utterly reckless."  
BREXIT SHOCK: Germany facing massive job losses - UK's hard exit fears mount  
Please listen to Corinne, the “proudest non-British Brit you can imagine” as she describes herself before the referendum and hear about her struggles now and how she lost all sense of belonging since that vote.  
I'm on the new BBC Scotland Channel tomorrow night at 7pm if you want to see me bluff my way through talking about Brexit for 45 minutes 
Perhaps Europhobic #markfrancois should read this again. A beautiful letter from an RAF officer in #WW2, written just before the #brexit referendum. ‘If the nation should fall for this deceit I can only conclude the lives of my comrades were lost in vain.’ He died last year.  
It's fashionable to mock Blair, but this is an incisive analysis. It captures the impossible task set by ministers, the urgency of knowing the future relationship, and the choice between a "painful" Brexit & a "pointless" one, subject to EU rules in which we no longer have a say.  
Dame Margaret Beckett doesn’t hold back as she berates Theresa May over Brexit: “She is blackmailing Parliament, she is blackmailing the country… Her behaviour is utterly disgraceful!” @ShelaghFogarty | #Brexit  
Just back from Warsaw with a few thoughts on how the Polish govt views Brexit. Poland regrets Brexit as much as any country, except perhaps Ireland, as it loses a potential ally in blocking federalism, supporting the US, being tough on Russia, etc.  /1 @CER_EU 
Brexit is being used to bury bad news! Government plans to introduce the highly unpopular Relationships Education with compulsory transgender lessons in all primary schools are to be pushed trough Parliament on the week of Brexit.  
RT if you have not moved on (and have not intention of doing so) when it comes to #brexit  
Let's not eh?A horrid #tory #Brexit based on lying, cheating, nationalism & Bullingdon hubris. 
"How many working hours have been wasted dealing with Britain’s mess? How many millions has the Irish civil servie across gov departments spent preparing for Brexit?"  - interesting article   
May states that if MPs reject her deal then nothing is certain? Unless I'm mistaken the law passed by parliament clearly states that the UK leaves the EU on March 29. That surely is certainty & upholds the referendum mandate. Does she think we're all stupid? #WTOBrexit 
We've used up all our democracy with the first referendum, see? There's no democracy tree. 
Pure stupidity! Belgium tells companies to halt exports to UK after Brexit  
This Monday come and see our live collage with twitter phenomenon @Coldwar_Steve in celebration of the release of his book, ‘The Festival of Brexit’.#Hackney 
Has Theresa May been driven insane by Brexit? Or is she just bad? 
I've just had to explain to a customer that the things he's ordered may take a while to arrive as they're imported. "Why the delay?""Brexit. Suppliers aren't sending stuff to UK until they know what's going on""Can I get them elsewhere?""No." 
Three weeks to go til Brexit and I have firmer plans for the evening of the 29th and the weekend that follows than my country has. 
Dear World, here is the current state of UK #Brexit politics: a novelist makes a statement and a politician gets outraged & demands an apology because he is unable to grapple with the basic logic of the statement. He then bangs his mug on the desk & initiates a staring contest. 
Theresa May admits that she is not sure that Brexit is any longer 'the will of the people', saying of a second referendum: "If we go down that road we might never leave at all"Full text of Theresa May  
Just 15% of individuals who appeared in the 2016 EU referendum press coverage were women. It's time to recognise the fact that women are leading the charge for a #PeoplesVote and fight for a fairer referendum, writes @Phoebepotter_1 
And there speaks a true  remainer. Shameless Theresa May declares Brexit 'crisis' if her deal is voted down , more details :  
Cons think they'll get away with selling out on Brexit because Lab are not credible. There's an alternative to this two-party shambles.The political landscape needs a seismic shift. Join us. Follow us.It's showtime. @TimePartyLDN 
Rees-Moog: “Brexit is as much a Left-wing project as a Right-wing project. Fundamentally it is a question of democracy: 'should we be ruled by our own voters or should we be ruled by bureaucrats in Brussels?'”  
You know @theresa_may Holding us to ransom by saying Brexit will be delayed if we don't agree with her deal is nothing short of blackmail!! We shouldn't have to put up with this sort of skulduggery!! I can honestly say if she don't do what the people want her party's  HISTORY!! 
Jacob... You still can't quite get your head around this can you? May won't let us leave. You all made a fatal mistake in keeping her in place. The Bruges Group revelation says it all. Its all pre planned. A con of gargantuan proportions on all of us. It'll be BRINO sham Brexit 
Theresa May was always in favour of Brexit.  Cameron had to work hard to get her to turn up for any remain campaign event.  He called her Submarine May because she always dived out of sight 
She knows full well that her deal doesn’t ‘get it done’ at all but leaves us open for years more or division, divisiveness, uncertainly, lack of clarity and nothing but Brexit on the agenda  
Having Brexit overturned would assure surgical precision in draining the swamp. 
Criminal investigation starts into law breaking in the referendum. As a precaution, let’s #RevokeArticle50 pending the outcome of the investigation.  
Ok, I get that. But let’s put that ‘soft Tory brexit’ to the public. Let’s see if the country wants that or #RemainAndTransform? #FinalSay 
Proud to be an anti-Brexit campaign group with so many women at the helm! #SexistBrexit #StopBrexit 
Irish Times poll: Northern Ireland voters do not want DUP-Tory Brexit  
Here’s something I never hear on the BBC: “Today we go to the constituency of Vauxhall in London, where people voted overwhelmingly to Remain, to find out what they think of Brexit negotiations.” Why not? 
Anybody else heard the rumour that Theresa May is now actually in favour of Brexit whilst believing that it is no longer the will of the people?If true, it suggests she might actually be serious about no deal, which chimes with threats by cabinet members that they would quit. 
Nothing about the Will Self exchange is particularly interesting. Typically the BBC has taken two ends of the douchebag spectrum and set them on each other for entertainment rather than enlightenment. Best not to dignify it. #Brexit 
Will Self, discussing Brexit on Politics Live:'The English people told us to leave the EU, not Britain as a whole'Well said   
The latest Government #Brexit Update has just issued and is available here: #GettingIrelandBrexitReady 
Because that single moment of the referendum, the advisory, vague referendum, the lawless referendum, the referendum influenced by dark money and foreign interference, has been used to edit out, to silence the vast majority of the country in any conversation on its own future. 
This is why “Remoaners” like me have not “accepted” Brexit and will never accept it. This is why the UK, with three weeks to go, still cannot tell the EU whatbit wants with any clarity. This is why May’s approach commands no support - and no respect - in the House of Commons. 
Only the people who voted for Brexit are NOT the whole county. The 16 million who voted Remain are also the country. The people who abstained are also the country. The youth who was deemed ineligible is also the country. The migrants who were disenfranchised are also the country. 
"Let's get it done."– PM @Theresa_May speaking in Grimsby about Brexit  
Leaving meeting of EU27 ambassadors on #Brexit @MichelBarnier said: “We stand united. We are not interested in the blame game, we are interested in the result. We are still working.“ 
Dear ParliamentWe don’t want May’s disastrous deal - with or without the backstop. It’s a dreadful deal from top to bottom and belongs in the bin. Stop messing around. We want a no deal Brexit on 29 March.  Yours angrily17.4m Voters  
Ignore Oliver Letwin – the Tories have nothing to fear from a no-deal Brexit, writes @oflynnmep 
'Don't believe claims that Brexit threatens peace in Northern Ireland'. It's time to #GoWTO for a real Brexit! 
Frustration bubbles over. One EU diplomat today: “The UK voted leave. Mrs May presented contradictory Brexit parameters: leave customs union but keep border open on island of Ireland, no checks in Irish Sea but frictionless trade with EU. Impossible! How is that the EU’s fault?” 
Corbyn’s desperate to shift the focus away from his cooperation with the Tories over Brexit, And he again fails to understand the consequences of the Brexit / Lexit he proposes. Second rate, inept politics #BrexitShambles 
Just back from Bucharest where they appreciate EU Citizenship and associated rights. Romanian Presidency supports 'EUROPEAN Citizenship after BREXIT' gathering, which includes Permanent EU Citizenship initiative addressed to European Commission 
You know how I hate to be the one who busts the Brexit fun balloon, but wouldn’t it be just really stupid to start a public fight with the EU, when in 21 days time you will be BEGGING for an extension or help getting your cancer meds and a flight?Asking for a country... 
Theresa May: 'We may never leave at all' if my Brexit deal is rejected  
"Thanks to the EU we enjoy guaranteed rights to flexible working and paid maternity leave which Jacob Rees Mogg and his band of hard right men would love to sweep away if Brexit happens. Today let’s celebrate what we have and say no to sexist Brexit" - @JoStevensLabour 
Is Corbyn really as stupid as he appears or is it all an act? If it’s an act, he deserves an Oscar. Surely he must know that Brexit will increase poverty and climate change is best tackled by staying in EU? 
We took the liberty of putting this up oustide Airbus.Brexit or Airbus? You can't have both. Our pleasure#peoplesvote #stopbrexit #airbus 
His claims of 9,000 jobs at risk turns out not to be even close. SNC is bidding on $67 billion dollars in contracts and threats of moving the head office to London (in the middle of Brexit) seem idle.  
This piece against brexit just went out to a billion people on a Chinese TV we've been informed. They now know that 1 in 10 Brits are stockpiling in the 6th richest country. Can you imagine what this ex communist country must be thinking about us?!   
Just a snapshot of some of the abuse I get after speaking out on how my daughters and their generation will be adversely impacted by #Brexit. Happy International Women’s Day!   
Perhaps Europhobic #markfrancois should read this again. A beautiful letter from an RAF officer in #WW2, written just before the #brexit referendum. ‘If the nation should fall for this deceit I can only conclude the lives of my comrades were lost in vain.’ He died last year.  
#THREAD: For , we wanted to highlight the sensational women who are leading @FFSake_ and championing a #PeoplesVote.We're immensely proud that - unlike most of the Brexit debate - #FFS represents the diverse talents and backgrounds of the UK.#InternationalWomensDay 
"The 21st century is about cooperation in the name of peace and prosperity; not intertwined alliances, not military or political union, but a unity of commerce" #TheHistoryBoys this week discuss 'Brexit: the Rise and Fall of the EU'@adamgarriereal  
.@BernardJenkin not pulling any punches in his criticism of "fifth columnists" in the Cabinet and laments the fact our democratic principles are being "carelessly trashed by a weak government which is willingly being held to ransom by those determined to stop Brexit."  
Excellent article by Polish Ambassador to the UK, @ArkadyRzegocki. The - relationship will continue to thrive through Brexit and in the years ahead of us @PolishEmbassyUK #BelvedereForum19 
This is where we are: UK side insists the EU has to give us exactly what we want on Brexit, even though doing so puts at risk over twenty years of peace in NI. EU rationally says "No". UK says "On your head be it. It's all your fault." We're a laughing stock. So embarrassing.  
Our First Amendment, like all fundamental constitutional rights, are not subject to democratic referendum. Even 99% of people cannot take away the free speech rights of the other 1%. This is part of the glory of American exceptionalism 
"Brexit does not belong to MPs in Parliament. It belongs to the whole country."Theresa MayMPs would do well to remember this. 
"I'm very worried we might lose control next week." - a cabinet minister tells Laura.#Brexitcast's @BBCLauraK brings you up to speed with all the latest Brexit drama   
Theresa May has said "no one knows what will happen" if MPs reject her Brexit deal - and that Britain may never leave the EU.h/t: @Bristol4Europe 
Francois....the gift that keeps on giving. 
Racists hate being called racists. But their fake outrage doesn't mean we shouldn't call a spade a spade.Leavers who still believe Brexit's a good idea are either:RacistsXenophobesNationalistsDelusionalPathologically GullibleBacked by RussiaorTax Avoiding Billionaires  
Bit rich of @sarahwollaston to accuse Brexiteers of being charlatans!2011: Called for referendum2016: Advocated Leave...2016: ...then Remain2017: Pledged to respect referendum result2018: Joined campaign for second vote2019: Joins new party, refuses to call by-election 
Theresa May, what is wrong with you? You just seem to say whatever you feel like, with no regard for truth. Stop it. There is no integrity in your behaviour. Your arrogance, ineptitude & mishandling re Brexit is how you‘ll be remembered. Shame on you. #ToriesOut #ToryBrexitChaos 
May repeats the #Brexit BS.A result based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesDisenfranchisementThe Non-Binding wills of just 37% Voters 26.5% of the PplIf your #BrexitShambles 'belongs to the Ppl' give us a #PeoplesVote on the deal!If it passes it will hamstring UK for yrs 
The @instituteforgov is a sober and respectable body of experts. So when they say that Brexit could create a disaster much bigger than the Windrush scandal - a claim I previously thought wild - we should listen.  
If @theresa_may wants to force on the country a new treaty which binds us to the EU, then she needs a mandate through a general election. Brexit means Brexit, according to the Reerendum and the Manifesto, not BrINO  
Theresa May says 'we may never leave the EU' if MPs reject her Brexit deal  
I can understand why it may make those who lost the referendum feel better about themselves to simply disregard all leave voters as racist. But it’s not true. And it’s certainly not conducive to civil society.  
@IainDale used to be a reasoned voice for Brexit. Now he’s clearly joined the circus. It’s clear to any reasonable person what Will Self was saying. The only thing brexiters can do now is push their slogans and misrepresent what has been said. 
Brexit would be the biggest step backwards for women’s rights for over a century - @EloiseTodd #SexistBrexit 
MPs need to come clean.May’s dud deal is not the end of Brexit.It’s not even the beginning of the end.It is just the end of the beginning.Unless we #StopBrexit, this shambles will keep going on for years to come. 
The thing with brexit is that it’s not even about the chicken nugget anymore it’s about the lies 
Let’s get this clear. It’s not about celebrating any political party. It’s celebrating the early signs of a referendum on Jamaicans living to pay high taxes in a no-growth economy then die. We want a better quality of life! 
I am in the wonderful position of being the only MP defending the Brexit deal at the Oxford Union tonight against the unique tag-team of @Nigel_Farage and @Andrew_Adonis #middleground pic.twitter.com/UhnhR1wKWu 
“Am organising a Brexit car boot sale does anyone want to buy a finger head doll?” #swearing #brexit #janeygodleyvoiceover 
Calling all Brexiteers! @Leavers_Britain are holding an informal gathering at The Railway pub in Witham on Thursday 28th March at 7pm. Come along for a chat and a pint with like minded people  #brexit #thedaybefore 
Anti-English sentiment in Ireland had healed. But Brexit has brought it all flooding back  
Even now, with only 14 workdays left, neither Tories nor Labour know what they want with Brexit.Make no mistake, it's the UK's crappy electoral system that's brought us here. A system which promotes division, extremism, incompetence & exclusion.We're officially a failed state.  
After 3 years, the government still don’t have a coherent plan for Brexit and resort to blaming the EU rather than facing up to their own inadequacies. This is psychological projection. Tories always do this. They then get away with it with a little help from their media friends.  
MAJOR league dust up between Will Self and ERG maniac Mark Francois over racism and the Brexit vote...Serious eyeballing at the end before they both remember they are on live TV  
“People want to know why I’m exercised about this... we are going to Brexit on a pack of lies, on a fantasy, on people being manipulated.”Good to talk to @Polhomeeditor of @theHouse_mag about the @RightToVote_UK campaign and lots more 
Apparently 2nd referendum campaign has a billboard with my face on it ‘these people are taking us out of  Europe’.  1. Can my area have lots please? 2. It is the people who voted for this. 3 it’s the European Union not Europe. 
Theresa May used her speech to blame her Brexit catastrophe on Parliament, the EU, and the old favourite, Jeremy Corbyn.We have a problem here. She will not listen to anyone else, and now she is blaming everyone but herself. She is in denial. We can all see it. #BlameTheTories 
May tells the world that #Brexit ‘belongs to the British people’ and ‘everyone now wants to get it done’.Well, it doesn’t belong to me and the only thing I want done is#RevokeA50.Hallo, World. She’s lying. 
Theresa May lies almost every time she speaks about any major issue, but especially Brexit. Demonstrable, unarguable lies. Untruths that she knows are untrue. That everyone knows are untrue. We are so inured to her lying that it barely registers.@theresa_may - you are a liar. 
The staring continued.... 
This is a public call on the UK GovernmentAccept the birthright provisions of the Good Friday AgreementStop imposing British citizenship on Irish citizens in the NorthWe have the right to be Irish or British or both - the situation is untenable #WeAreIrishtoo #Brexit #GFA 
No-one can call ME an anti-semite. I voted for #Brexit.  @wself just espousing narrow north London “metropolitan elite” view. 
it seems @MarkFrancois' main interests are No1: Making the rich richer & poor poorer, voting 4X to cut capital gains tax, 22X to reduce corporation taxbut 12X for Bedroom tax, 44X to cut benefits No2: BrexitComing a close 3rd: taxpayer-funded chocolate #PoliticsLive 
You’re being disingenuous.  The cost for renewing a passport is £122 - not changed at all from months ago.  Brexit is NOTHING to do with it. So you’ve just had to spend £5.50 for an international driving permit. Do you want a crowdfunding scheme set up?  
One similarity between Brexit and build-up to the Iraq War is a frantic diplomatic effort (in 2003 in UN) to get external support to help solve what is essentially internal British political problem. 
"Theresa May must stop passing the buck and take personal responsibility for the Brexit crisis created as a result of her own intransigence.”: @IanBlackfordMP #Brexit 
The objection to Brexit is a moral one. If you do not oppose Brexit, you need to examine where your conscience went wrong. That's all. 
On the 100-year anniversary of Universal Suffrage for women you concluded a Brexit policy that would disproportionately harm millions of women from EU 27 countries. Great job.#InternationalWomensDay- @Harini_Iyengar 
If ever there was a glaring example of the primary reason for this country being in the state it's in, look no further; the rise of the diminished intelligence politician, brilliantly illustrated here by ERG thug Mark Francois, exhibiting the classic telltale of incomprehension. 
Her best line is a corruscatingly vivid lie? #Brexit  
London once again the leading global wealth centre. With the world’s largest UHNWI population, the city sweeps the board in the annual City Wealth Index, pushing its only serious rival, New York, into second place. The world has faith in Brexit Britain..  
Theresa May: "If it were a delay to give MPs more time to decide what to do, the EU might insist on new conditions that were not in our interest before they agreed such an extension... a delay could mean a second referendum,"  
Who are you looking at?Will Self and Mark Francois face off on #politicsliveBasic logic.All/most racists voted Brexit *does not imply* all/most Brexit voters are racists.  
Trading slips away from London ahead of Brexit - Reuters  
After yet another characteristically dishonest Theresa May speech, this seems a good moment to repost my recent column on the duplicity that lies at the heart of her Brexit strategy.  
Do you want to Brexit to happen? @theresa_may 
Nothing new in #TheresaMay ‘s #Brexit speech in Grimsby!Blind stubbornness heading towards catastrophe is no virtue. Admitting you’ve made a mistake is no vice. Time to switch to the latter... 
Theresa May today threatens: delay, no Brexit & 2nd ref, if her WA/Remain Agreement is rejected.The UK doesn't require a 'deal' to leave, it requires a PM that doesn't repeatedly backtrack on promises.  
Have you seen this 12 point "No Deal" plan to turbo-charge Britain's economy after a No Deal Brexit?If not please read, smile and RETWEET. This is the route map to the prize which too often gets forgotten about - BRITAIN'S GREATER PROSPERITY OUTSIDE THE EU.  
As yet another make-or-break crunch moment looms in the Brexit crisis, read me here on why the straw being clutched by some faint-hearted Brexiteers will only drown them 
Perhaps Europhobic #markfrancois should read this again. A beautiful letter from an RAF officer in #WW2, written just before the #brexit referendum. ‘If the nation should fall for this deceit I can only conclude the lives of my comrades were lost in vain.’ He died last year.  
Don't you dare to this to the people! We are leaving on the 29th of March with a WTO Brexit!!!Read now: #Brexit 
 CANADA'S BACK #Justin. #CBCNews is reporting that Canada's #SncLavalinScandal is sharing the front pages of international newspapers along with Brexit & Trump. GOOD JOB @JustinTrudeau.What's going on @CameronAhmad - get a handle on this. Oh WAIT! I forgot. #Justin lied. 
This passage from May’s speech.... vote against my deal and.... Norway style exit or no exit at all #Brexit #May 
Mark Francois' dad fought in the war you know.Which means that Brexit is obviously a good idea because something something "Believe in Britain". 
Theresa May says: “Everyone now wants to get it (Brexit) done!”Well I don’t!Do I want to see my right to freedom of movement removed? Do I want to see my country cut itself off from our nearest neighbours and friends? In the words of Margaret Thatcher: No! No! No! 
Mark Francois failing the logic test set by Will Self.Self: "Every racist voted for Brexit"Francois: "How dare you call 17.4 million people who voted for Brexit racist!"Someone so lacking in logical thinking should not be making decisions on our behalf.#PoliticsLive 
If I were conducting a negotiation and was making so little progress that all I could get was something my client was clear they didn’t want, I would see it as my duty to be honest and to get fresh instructions, not to try to trap or badger them into the deal #Brexit #peoplesvote 
"But independence would be worse than Brexit!""How? And where's your evidence?""Shut up, Krankie! You're part of separatist cult!"This is where we're at with british nationalists. They're angry because they have nothing to offer or argue for. The UK is an indefensible joke. 
I am so sick of the notion that in a disorderly no-deal Brexit, problems will be down to EU “bullying”, revenge or sanctions. They are what happens in a COMPLETE LEGAL VOID. How bloody difficult is it to understand that in order to trade the parties need an agreed framework? FFS 
We're calling for ministers to drop post-Brexit plans for a £30k salary threshold for international staff. Salary is not a proxy for skill & as we mark  it's worth noting it could discriminate against part-time workers who are predominantly women 
OK. Sold. No Brexit is fine with me. 
"Shortly after A50 was enacted companies that tendered for govt contracts were made to sign declarations that they were pro Brexit or no contract These threats are part of the reason its taken so long for major firms to express their growing concerns re #brexit".See @hawkred7 
Beg, borrow, steal a ticket to this. Theresa May doing a speech about Brexit in a warehouse in Grimsby. This will be our generation’s Oasis at Knebworth. #Brexit  
Remember, we still need MPs to vote down the Government's dodgy Brexit deal, vote down a disastrous no-deal, and vote for an extension of article 50. They need to hear that their constituents want this - so keep writing to your MP #PeoplesVote 
Considering a majority of MP's voted Remain perhaps threatening them with no Brexit at all might be the wrong way to go about getting your deal through parliament, Theresa. 
Mark Francois: “A slur on 17.4m people...you should apologise on national TV....outrageous thing to say”Author @wself “You seem to find a lot of things outrageous...What I said was every racist and anti-Semite…probably voted for Brexit”#politicslive 
Will Self has just said on Politics Live that every Racist and Antisemite in the U.K.Voted for Brexit.Not only did he say it he refused to apologise for slurring 17.4m good people@wself feel free to tell him how YOU feel . 
Attn TheresaAfter just listening to your various veiled Brexit threats directed at your own people rather than the EU it is obvious that you have made your choice!If that’s OK with you starting at the Local Council Elections then it will be “US”the People will have ours! 
No, I wouldn’t. I have defended plenty of MPs from all parties from these absurd witch hunts. And BTW, I am on the opposite side of the Brexit debate from Rudd, so it’s in my interests for her to be damaged by this. But that would be unjust. 
The PM is threatening us.The woman, who promised to deliver #Brexit we voted for.It's a slap in our faces. #BrexitBetrayal 
I agree with Will Self on BBC Politics Live who suggested that "pretty much all racists and antisemites voted for #Brexit". He did not suggest that the 17.4 million people who voted for #Brexit were racists and antisemites as Mark Francois suggested. 
A quiet, permanent shift in trading from London to the European Union ahead of Brexit is picking up speed as stock and bond platforms in Amsterdam and Paris crank into action.  
THIS is why he doesn't comment on drama. When they quote him, he wants it to have to be about his mission.#Lexit #jeremycorbyn #brexit #gtto 
As the #Brexit endgame heats up, we need to hold on to the basics. So remember that not only is Brexit a self-inflicted wound by the UK, it is also a wound the UK inflicts upon the EU. Don't expect the EU to sacrifice itself any further for the UK's sake beyond this wounding. 
Theresa May is now threatening Brexiteers that we "may never leave at all" if her pathetic deal is voted down next week.Considering her disastrous deal is NOT Brexit and the worst of all worlds, voting it down is a risk Leave MPs must take. 
In the Brexit referendum, voters were brainwashed with fake news and unrealistic promises. Yes, an eye-watering 48 per cent of the electorate were fooled into voting to remain in the EU, says @patrickxwest 
Let's face it, Theresa May went behind the back of her Brexit Secretaries to cobble together a completely unacceptable surrender to the EU and she has flatly refused to budge a single millimetre from it. It is not just a bad deal, it is an atrocious deal. #StandUp4Brexit 
Prime Minister Theresa May says a delay to Brexit could lead to a form of Brexit that people did not vote for and potentially a second referendum 
#PoliticsLive wow, always liked Will Self but he’s just called me and the other 17.4 million people who voted for #Brexit racists. Blokes a prat 
May's best speech line is also her riskiest - an attempt to isolate hardline Brexiteers from the voters: "Brexit does not belong to MPs in Parliament, it belongs to the whole country. Everyone now wants to get it done". 
School student at Brexit mtg with Therese Coffey MP asks, "How will Brexit improve my life?" Her answer? "Ask Leave voters." Pontius Pilate answer from the Junior Minister toady. 
Theresa May presses the nuclear button as she warns MPs that rejecting her deal on Tuesday could lead to no Brexit.“We might never leave the EU at all,” she says. 
Guest on #PoliticsLive just said "we need another Referendum because 2 million young people have come of age and it is a once in a lifetime decision."If there was a second referendum and remain lose again, what's stopping them saying exactly the same again 3 years later?  
Listening to @mrjamesob calling out Theresa May on the #Brexit deceit that she is currently spouting. WHY DOESN’T THE REST OF THE MEDIA ASK THE GOVERNMENT THESE QUESTIONS? 
In my latest video - #Brexit, compulsory voting, and aliens   
Just as a point of logic, it is interesting that a narrow referendum is untouchable and cannot be replayed but that the biggest margin in parliamentary history has changed absolutely nothing in the PM’s mind and is set to be repeated. 
Just realised @mrjamesob commentary is a bit like a grim Graham Norton commentary of Eurovision. Only this time we are the weird rockers dressed as farm maidens and the laughing stock of a continent #Brexit 
Brexit in a nutshell: .@theresa_may : "Brexit will not be a race to the bottom..."@mrjamesob :" It won't be a race because we are the only ones doing it." 
What on earth is behind the PM as she gives this whinge of a speech, blaming everyone but herself for the #Brexit mess which she has created ?   Looks like a random collection of items hoarded against disaster.....  
Straight choice, says PM..1. Back my Brexit deal 2. Reject Brexit my dealPM - "Reject it, and we may never leave at all". #EU #Brexit  
The body language of Will Self, throughout the whole #politicslive show, sitting next to Mark Francois.... it's like a 30-minute long, perfect GIF to epitomize all of our feelings about the absurdity of ERGers (and Brexit) 
Prime Minister Theresa May says MPs face a crucial choice next week when they vote on her Brexit deal and if they reject the deal then no one knows what will happen 
#Brexit explained  
Theresa May is clearly trying to shift the blame for Brexit on to the people, saying it is “your Brexit”. How dare she pin the blame for this crisis on us? This was and still is all about historic internal arguments in her own rotten party. Your mess Prime Minister, so own it. 
Theresa May just said Brexit leads to a “more prosperous future”. Her own governments show that all possible outcomes we will be worse off than if we stayed in the EU. Outreagous she is not honest with the public. 
WATCH | Mark Francois fires a warning shot to those trying to betray Brexit: "If the people outside the Westminster bubble come to believe the politicians have done them out of what they voted for, I think there will be a LOT of anger!" Support us at  
Putting the Grim into Grimsby.... Theresa May begging everyone to accept her useless Brexit plan that nobody wants.   
I’ve just finished speaking, and there’s a wee silence, and then Brexit gets up and says “This is more of a comment than a question” 
As serious allegations about Leave EU Official and Arron Banks continue to come out – the media and political class are complicit in a conspiracy of silence. Me for @BylineTimes #Brexit #C4news 
May warns that MPs that if they don’t back her deal, “we may never leave at all” #brexit 
This is a brilliant new initiative for young people.  Forward-looking, enterprising, boldly seizing opportunities... that’s what Brexit is all about.  Worth following  
Will Self: an example of the smug, sneering, faux intellectual middle class Prosecco guzzling purveyors of anti-British sentiment who not only lost the Referendum but also the goodwill of the majority of the electorate. #politicslive 
Campaigner @GraceCampbell: “Politicians get to keep voting and re-voting and re-negotiating, why has it not gone back to the public?” Tory MP Mark Francois: “We had a vote, people decided” She replies: “We decided based on lies” #Brexit #politicslive  
PM says if MPs reject her deal next week, nobody knows what happens next. Suggests it could mean no Brexit. 
Will Self is playing the game at a level that Mark Francois has never seen before. This is funny, Self has more insight into Francois psyche then Fancois has himself. #PoliticsLive #Brexit 
Does anybody else remember the Tories telling us the glorious Brexit dream would end up with Theresa May begging the European Union for mercy, from a platform in Grimsby?Our worldwide humiliation is almost complete. 
We’re 21 days from Brexit and we’re no closer to agreeing what that means. Let’s stop the clock by revoking article 50. It’s the sensible thing to do. It’s doesn’t stop Brexit forever (we can find democratic ways to sort it out) but it stops the madness and the cliff edge. 
Excellent public letter by @KateHoeyMP and Lord Trimble about the ridiculous claims that Brexit will lead to an end to peace in Northern Ireland.  #NoDealNoProblem 
Latest YouGov poll has Tories 9 points clear of Labour. UKIP and Brexit Party level on 3% each. If Tories united Brexiteer vote they would be 15 points ahead of Labour.  
NEW: Today we are launching Future for Leave with @bbradleymp, @FrancisBoulle and Spoons owner Tim Martin. There are millions of young people who support Brexit out there, it's time we were unashamed to call for a global Britain. The future is leave.  
80% of women between 18 and 24 voted remain in the EU ref. 80% - 80% - 80%. Just think what that means!? We gotta stop Brexit.   
Q. Has the UK passed legislation or managed logistics so it can leave without a deal on 29th March without a breakdown in law & order?A. No. Conclusion: No Deal Brexit is a blatant bluff & responsibility for the failure to agree terms lies with its advocates not its critics.  
21 days to #Brexit.3 weeks, but they'll be the most entertaining of all.Watch Westminster reveal the true horror of the UK establishment & her remoteness from anything resembling democracy.Q: Why has our democracy evaporated?A: Because the EU don't do democracy. Simples. 
BREXIT LIVE: EU summons ALL 27 ambassadors as 'May CANCELS Sunday meeting' - EXIT ON BRINK  
Anothe foolish misjudgement by a Prime Minister whose serial blunders and arrogant assertions have created ( and are steadily worsening) the chaos that is #Brexit  
That is a certainty if May stitches us up on Brexit. 
Whatever happens with Brexit, this is already the legacy of the ideology of austerity and 2 years of government ignoring critical issues in order to focus on one insane policy. See also education, policing, health etc etc etc  
New Official Investigation into the BBC. Ofcom is investigating the BBC over the “depth” of it’s reporting and impartiality, particularly over Brexit. About time..  
I suspect he's correct re the judgement...that the UK Govt will be found guilty of Gross Negligence, the EU exonerated & the real majority of the People looking to replace both main parties if someone doesn't #RevokeA50 Stop this invalid #Brexit & #Remain. 
“This leadership race looks like a selection for the fourth 11"Beyond Brexit: Tory leadership candidates jostle for position @ft via @financialtimes 
Stephen Wall points out that the UK publicly committed to economic and monetary union prior to accession in 1972, and again when Harold Wilson renegotiated some aspects of the budget and Commonwealth trade before the 1975 referendum.  
Anti-English sentiment in Ireland had healed. But Brexit has brought it all flooding back | Una Mullally  
Brexit is 21 days away. #brexit 
"Carniball players will embody the play style of his country."Country: EnglandPlaystyle: Hard Brexit  
I'm a bit confused why Brexiters say that if we had a 3-way referendum - May's deal, no deal and Remain on ballot paper - it would split the Leave vote. If, as they say, everyone knew what they were voting for, the vote wouldn't split - surely they will all vote the same way?  
The @CPSThinkTank prescription for a no-deal Brexit is the plan that post-Brexit Britain needs and deserves!   
You can’t compromise with a Tory brexit.This entire project has been their ideological baby from the get go. To now bail them out & claim joint ownership of this disaster is preposterous. You call it ‘compromise’?Another name is ‘appeasement’ No voiceNo veto No vote#FinalSay 
So...’Scottish’ Labour are all about securing a second referendum for the English but determined to deny Scots the same democratic choice. Sounds about right for the branch office of London Labour. 
BUSINESSES FOR BREXIT | “Ironically, we’re probably better prepared for a #WTO deal, compared to any other deal”. #business4brexit #despitebrexit #EU 
Brexit is a huge self-inflicted wound. Brexit going wrong is not the fault of the EU, Ireland or even NI. The only people to blame for the Brexit mess are those pursuing delusions & unicorns, and not facing up to the hard choices & consequences of Brexit.  
"In December, Theresa May portrayed the withdrawal agreement as a resounding victory. Not a word of it has changed, but today, she's blaming the EU for it not being good enough."@mrjamesob | #Brexit  
Here is the Scottish Government's Chief Economic Adviser stating that a no deal #Brexit will be damaging and that entering a transition period would be a better option on 29 March. Yet the #SNP intend on voting down the deal and, by consequences, against a transition period. 
Summary of British politics.1973-2016:Join the EU and blame the EU for any domestic issues2016-2019:Leave the EU and blame the EU for any domestic issuesafter 2019:Be outside the EU and blame the EU for any domestic issues#Brexit  
Great that the first by-election fought by the re-launched SDP will be in the #NewportWest  constituency where I was born. Looking forward to campaigning actively in the constituency with our great candidate Ian Maclean and fellow SDP members.SDP - fighting for Brexit 
The Tories own Brexit.  The EU, have shown the patience of a saint with the incompetent fools. 
Live scenes as Theresa May asks EU to back Brexit backstop changes for the 47th time since Monday:  
Let’s not sugar coat this – Brexit is nothing less than a disaster for women’s rights. We must fight for the Final Say in the name of feminism.  - @AnnaMcMorrin @ChiOnwurah @JanetDaby @KateOsamor @PreetKGillMP @RosieDuffield1 @RachaelMaskell 
Interview: Cold War Steve's Festival of Brexit  
21 days before Brexit day, @theresa_may will blame the EU for the national travesty that is the UK's own Brexit policy. Then, she will have to beg the EU for:A) Extension, technical or otherwise.B) Or t help mitigate the worst circumstances of a No-Deal Clusterf***  
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 8: Next up, Dominic Raab became #Brexit Secretary. Here's the moment he realised Britain was actually an island!  
Don’t forget this about the Backstop- it’s the logical consequence of the Hard Brexit the Tories want- it was agreed in principle by  &  in Dec 2017- it was adjusted to have a CU for whole  at ’s request- it was in Withdrawal Agreement agreed by May in Nov 2018 
The Brexit shitshow is almost entirely the creation of men  pic.twitter.com/tFPn3Y9oAV 
WATCH | "Since the referendum the economy has done very well. Half a million new jobs!" - Wetherspoons legend Tim Martin rips apart Project Fear nonsense, the anti-democratic EU, and disgraceful calls for a referendum re-run Support us at  
A very true statement, MPs sat in their high privileged positions will have a rude awakening if Brexit is betrayed  
The Pound to euro exchange rate has reached "dizzy highs" of €1.17 yesterday as the UK gets ever closer to breaking free from the EU. The rest of the world has faith in the UK, which will thrive under a managed WTO Brexit..  
And I’m an EU citizen at the moment, as are all the Brits. We don’t have to lose our status, we can still stop #Brexit @peoplesvote_uk 
Join us on Sunday for "the biggest dog's dinner in history".To stop #Brexit, hundreds of dogs will be holding the biggest dogs dinner ever (with waiters, candlesticks & silver platters) outside Parliament.It’s time to bark out #StopBrexit #BrexitDogsDinner #wooferendum 
No, it would the the government’s fault for seeing the red flags, hearing the concerns of the people and continue to push this brexit agenda as if there are no consequences. It’s time to #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote 
Did you know that, of 44 members of the Leave Means Leave Board, only one is a woman but seven are men named John? Women’s voices continue to be missing from #Brexit. That’s why I’ll be at the #PutItToThePeople march on March 23rd, join me and @WEP_UK there. 
2/2 Neither of my daughters were able to vote in the 2016 referendum but it’s their generation that will be most impacted by #Brexit. They deserve a #finalsay on their future. That is what I’m fighting for @votesat16 @FFSake_ @WelshYouthParl @SkyNews @CardiffNorthLAB 
1/2 @SkyNews this morning - #Brexit will have hugely negative consequences in the UK but also stop us being an open, international, inclusive country that will impact our #FutureGeneration the most. @FFSake_ @peoplesvote_uk @WalesForEurope 
Leave voters...Assume WTO exit gets taken off the table next week (of course, it may not) & we head into a 2nd referendum.What are YOU going to choose?Staunch Leaver & I will vote Remain. May's deal petrifies me even more, I consider it vassalage with re-entry to EU ASAP. 
Michel Barnier will be briefing EU27 ambassadors at 3pm in Brussels to discuss the fallout from  May's Grimsby speech #Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn says Labour MPs will be whipped to vote against a no-deal Brexit if Theresa May’s deal is rejected again next week  
“Brexit is nothing less than a disaster for women’s rights.”Brilliant piece by a group of sensational women MPs on  on why we should love feminism, and hate Brexit. #PeoplesVote#PutittothePeople 
Brexit: Leo Varadkar says it is a question of what the UK is willing to offer the EU rather than the other way around 
Remain MPs & commentators are brilliant at putting out endless recycled Project Fear tales each more lurid than the last & seem to have demanded or influenced many Ministers & depts to ignore the potential & suppress the good news of what we can achieve w/ a clean WTO Brexit. 
Taking a no-deal off the negotiating table will be “the end of Brexit”, warned Fishing for Leave member June Mummery. The managing director of Lowestoft fish market auctioneers BFP Eastern explained a no-deal Brexit is “the one tool” PM must hold “strong”.  
Don’t believe claims that Brexit threatens the peace in Northern Ireland  via @BrexitCentral 
#Brexit Wish we had Donald Trump sorting Brexit out we would have a good deal by now. A man with balls of steel gets things done. Who have we got sort Brexit out. Theresa May queen of dithering, sitting on the fence. Waving the white flag to EU. Or Jeremy Corbyn the CLOWN.  
The damage done by the dastardly deeds of Watson & Co will pale into insignificance compared to the fall out for May & the Tories when they fail to resolve brexit. There is no way out for them. All the chaff won't divert the rocket up their ass. 11/ 
After brexit there will be no use placating them. 2018s rule change makes it easier to challenge incumbants & recent VoNCs give hope they will be easily defeated.JC can go into the next election with far fewer sticks in his spokes & far more dedicated socialists behind him. 8/ 
All this 'bend like the reed' stuff makes sense *now*, before brexit. But things need to change once a WA passes. I predict JC will become much less willing to give ground. If brexit can be resolved, a GE is likely & with it, a chance to shuffle the deck. 7/ 
 WATCH | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg tells @ChristopherHope there have been a "whole catalogue of errors" in the government's negotiation strategy which has been "very, very badly handled from day one!"  Listen to Chopper's Brexit Podcast | @brexitbroadcast  
Number crunching nails May’s Brexit bribe in ⁦@PrivateEyeNews⁩ 
Gordon Brown calls for year-long #Brexit delay to avoid 'impending national disaster'  
A BUDGET FOR NO DEALThe @CPSThinkTank has published a major new paper, setting out measures the Chancellor should consider in a no-deal scenario. The British Government & the EU insist they do not want a “no-deal” Brexit, yet it remains a possibility.  
Plans have been finalised to keep planes in the air under a no-deal Brexit. Yet another Remain myth falls by the wayside!Join us in Parliament Square:  
.@MarkReckless tells @AMCarwyn 'Your party were elected on coming out of the EU, yet now you try to have another vote. You promised you were going to respect the referendum.''It is that which is eating away at our democracy; eating away at our country.'  
Strong Lobby support for the Full Public Inquiry (Under Oath) into Brexit. Personally hoping that covering the hearings will see me through to retirement.  
I’m really not sure Brexiters calling for a public inquiry into the handling of Brexit should be quite so eager to open that specific box ... 
Labour’s #Women MEPs write to mark #IWD18 about how #brexit would make gender equality harder to achieve via @LabourList 
“UK interests will be accommodated to the extent possible but will never be prioritised above the collective interest of the EU itself.” This is often forgotten in UK #Brexit debates. An interesting read on how the EU has approached #Brexit negotiations   
Politicians should be more positive about leaving on WTO terms - it's not the ideal Brexit outcome but it's better than the deal currently on offer.  
No deal Brexit: Food banks will run out of food charities warn Theresa May!Somehow don't think that will spoil her appetite at the next banquet she eats at, do you?#ToryCutsKill 
You couldn't make this up..... 
If a major supermarket negotiates a deal with a farmer, which party has the leverage? If the US, China or the EU negotiates a deal with a post-Brexit UK, which party has the leverage. Why would anyone believe we can get a better deal when we have left the EU! #RevokeArticle50 
Blame the EU for the failure of Brexit. Blame the EU for your failure. Blame the EU for straight bananas and falling wages and failing services and your own incompetence. But when it's not there any more? Who will you blame?#TheresaMay 
Whenever you read a newspaper article which refers to a referendum without a Section 30 order as “illegal” . . you can instantly dismiss it as having been written by a person with a British nationalist agenda. It is opinion, not fact.  
‘Plot’? It’s called exercising a democratic right to oppose a government trashing the country & it’s future. “Tory Remainers 'plot second Brexit vote with members of French government' - The Sun  
'Look @Nigel_Farage in the eye and ask him to spell out how Brexit could ever have benefited your communities...' A challenge to all those who encounter Mr Farage on his forthcoming march from @thatginamiller. 
The British would be crazy to be seduced by any kind of assurances or 'guarantees' from Brussels.  #Brexit #IFP #irexit 
The referendum happened because of David Cameron's hubrisUK was backed into a corner by Theresa May's red lines & complete intransigenceThe backstop was a UK negotiated ideaBrexit is the fault of the UK government and the MPs in WestminsterNot the EU & not Ireland 
No, history will judge the Brexiters & the Britain (this time we can forgive the exclusion of NI: it’s not to blame) that allowed them to commit national suicide on our behalf. “History will judge UK, EU badly if they get Brexit wrong says Hunt” - Reuters  
If we end up in a situation where the #Remain-dominated Parliament votes to stop #Brexit from happening they will live with the consequences at the ballot box. They'll have to tell their #voters that 'we don't think you got it right.' Good luck with that!" 
Hunt: UK-EU relations 'could be poisoned' if Brussels fails to budge.Still blaming the EU for their own mistakes.History won't look badly on the EU for Brexit - it will lay the blame firmly where it is deserved!@Bremaininspain 
Brexit: Belgium advises companies to halt exports to UK after March 29 to avoid customs chaos - The Independent  
Who do you want to control UK’s trade policy?The EU27?  support “Common Market 2.0”The EU27 and then the Trump Administration?  support May’s DealTrump, China, Japan, ASEAN et al?  support no dealThe UK?   support no BrexitBeing in EU gives us maximum control.  
Trump Asks UK To Drop Food And Environment Standards To Secure Post-Brexit Trade Deal  
BOOM: Cut taxes, reduce tariffs in 'No Deal Brexit' budget, @CPSThinkTank report urges. @rcolvile: “Let’s slash tariffs to help consumers. Invest in a new generation of free ports. Develop the world’s best customs procedures.” 
Russian bid to influence Brexit vote detailed in new US Senate report  
Remain media and remain pols still don't get Brexit. We demand to once more be a sovereign, independent nation. Just like all the others. Blackmail will not make the vast majority of us back May's bag-o-shite.  
Bill Cash on @adamboultonSKY talking gibberish about massive trade deals with the rest of the world. The EU and USA account for two thirds of our trade. They are much more powerful trade blocs and will carve out great deals for themselves not us. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Sign. Sign. Sign.Takes one minute. If you support this. Just open the link and sign. Every name is a voice. PETITION   "Hold a second referendum on EU membership"Almost 80,000 signaturesSIGN this   Now RT#FinalSayForAll #FBPE #PutittothePeople 
If by some miracle #Brexit's stopped & we #RevokeA50 & #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible DealBe in No Doubt neither the Tories nor Corbyn's Labour Party can be trusted to repair the damage done to our Country or its reputation & #Reform the UK.They both Failed 
No Mr Hunt. Precisely the opposite. This is our own #Brexit bed that we’ve made, & we must lie on it. History will judge our UK leaders for this terrible folly.  
I'm pretty sure that the unionist push on normalising the ''any referendum  without their permission is illegal'' is a result of their having looked at what happened in Catalonia & thinking ''that's what WE need to do too'' 
EU27 ambassadors have been summoned to a meeting about #Brexit this afternoon at 3pm Brussels time. 
Three weeks till the Brexit cliff-edge and Theresa May is going to Grimsby to tell the EU that it’s all their fault. This negotiation is going awfully well isn’t it? 
Anna McMorrin - We know there was corruption, lies & fraud during the referendum & it's wholly inappropriate to pursue #brexit on that basis.. we need a #FinalSay vote to vote this off the table & for us to continue with the best deal.. full membership of the #EU.@AnnaMcMorrin 
Gave evidence on law, Parliament & #Brexit to parliamentary Committee @CommonsEUexit on Weds with brilliant experts @cambridgelaw Prof Alison Young & @Brigid_Fowler — all women panel in a male-dominated area   
Things we never had to do before Brexit (apparently): No.54 Renew our passports.  
Where were Labour when Honda and Nissan spoke to govt about Brexit?Whee were Labour and Mcluskey when they warned via the press they would go?What did Labour do initially when Honda says it was closing?Answer they have done bugger all to protect the 217149 jobs lost! @UKLabour 
Women's rights cannot be sacrificed to #Brexit. This  @CCriadoPerez explains why women deserve a #PeoplesVote on this #Brexit deal:  
Theresa May's decision to hold her Brexit speech in Lincolnshire is backfiring spectacularly as the lobby's finest battle train cancellations that thwart their every move North. Just as well Chris Grayling can't see the press gallery Whatsapp group 
1. Anna McMorrin MP pursuing an investigation into the illegalities by Vote Leave etc in the #Brexit Ref interviewed by @AdamBoutlton on Sky having made an 'unusual' request to the PM in Parl.What an indictment to think that questioning the validity of the #Brexit Ref is unusual 
Brexit soars to 95% in the polls.  
Beware of Brexit.  Belfast 1981.  
“People are using a 2nd referendum as a Trojan horse to overturn the result. We haven’t delivered on the 1st instruction. I think that it would go down incredibly badly, and at a time when politicians are felt badly of” @JamesCleverly#StandUp4Brexit #DelayMeansRemain @SkyNews 
Ministers accused of hiding hundreds of millions of pounds in costs related to #Brexit that are set to hit taxpayers and businesses. @IanMurrayMP: "It’s time ministers came clean and told Parliament and the British public the true cost of Brexit.":  
In 1981, Diego Pérez de los Cobos, head of the police operation to stop the Catalan referendum and now a key witness in the #CatalanTrial, showed up as a volunteer, wearing the blue shirt of the fascist Falange party, to support the Tejero coup attempt. 
Dear @TheScotsman,The man on the right is not a protestor. He is pro-Brexit Conservative MP Sir John Haynes.I was telling him how Brexit wasn't going to happen. He didn't like that much.. More info about him here:  
Geraint Davies - "That's farcical. Voters were promised more money, more trade & more control etc.. They are getting none of things. #Brexit  
We will all be dead and Brexit will still be going on. Frankly, death will be a merciful relief 
A No Deal could result in major disruption to food supplies to those who most need them - children, hospital patients and vulnerable people. Don’t let a #NoDeal mean a #NoMeal Brexit. @UKSustain @SharonHodgsonMP #NoDealNoMeal 
Margaret Beckett close to despair as she quite accurately points out that Brexit has barely started yet and the trade negotiations will go on for years and years and years. Remind me, why are we doing this? 
UK realising EU is dominant power in Europe and #Brexit will be on its terms via @IrishTimesOpEd 
We should have said this 2 years ago. A clean #Brexit with the “best Free Trade Agreement ever” (on offer by the #EU - their words) along with all the mitigation already now in place both sides of the channel.There has been lack of vision and political courage. 
And so the "We can't ship to the United Kingdom any more after Brexit" notification e-mails begin...  
A thought as we all desperately try to peer into crystal balls and predict the #Brexit What Next: Fact that talks between Cox and Commission not going well hardly surprising. He marched over to Brussels pushing for what EU always said it couldn’t and wouldn’t give on backstop 1 
Daily Briefing:- UK PM puts onus on EU to make concessions on backstop or risk disorderly #Brexit- UK foreign minister says history will judge UK and EU badly if they get Brexit wrong- World marks #InternationalWomensDay 
One of the nicest things I remember about working in the Journal was the Thursday before the referendum, all the lads brought us in cakes, sweets and treats for all the women in the office because 'we'd had a rough time'.That is how you become a true ally.Bring food.  
As we have long said the biggest threat to Brexit comes from within the cabinet  
Govt unit supporting some of the MOD’s biggest procurement decisions still has an EU mentality.They’ve been pushing UK companies into binding EU Commission schemes since the Brexit vote and are still advertising post-Brexit contracts through the EU.  
Ricky Tomlinson on @RyanTubridyShow as to why he voted leave in the Brexit referendum. "Everyone should have a job, a place to live. I don't want to see someone sleeping rough on the street." What has any of this got to do with the European Union? 
Remainers keep banging on about Russian interference in Brexit process when there is no evidence of any Russian interference.Meanwhile one of the primary voices of the Remain camp is now employed by a man whose family has roots in the former KGB.George Osborne>>Evgeny Lebedev 
Phillips' willingness to disrespect the referendum & inflict the Tory status quo on her constituents is hardly praiseworthy, James. She also supports the incremental genocide of Palestinians, has a snout deep in the trough & boasts she'd stab her party leader. Integrity? Ha! 
In a crowded field, this was always going to be the most destructive legacy of Brexit: the hunt for people to blame when impossible promises turned to dust.  
I think Macron might save Brexit. He's been trying to stem populism by making Brexit look destructive. He seriously might refuse to extend Art.50 to bring on what he sees as us  crashing out. Viva Emmanuel. 
The arrogance, ignorance, patronising bluster and pretentious illogic demonstrated by most government ministers over #Brexit is like a crescendo of all the worst elements of private schooling - a cursed bane of British public life 
Brexit is proving daily to have less & less to do with what is good for Britain & the British economy, jobs, security & freedoms & more & more to do with containing the massive corruption endemic in the establishment & the city in particular.This is now a cover up operation 
I hope Nick that you pointed out/ 1 we spat our dummy out/ 2 we said we were taking our toys home and 3/ we said we weren't coming out to play. The EU doesn't have to do a thing. Brexit is a Tory Civil War. Nobody but the cranks to the extreme L&R really gave a fuck pre 2016 
Brilliant piece by @philipstephens, which goes right to the heart of the problem with Brexit  
A brilliant one-stop shop to send a postcard, tweet, audio message and more to your MP urging them to vote against Brexit. Do it. Takes ten seconds.  
And this looks like the worst party ever......the privileged Remainers trying to steal Brexit from the working class.  
The May and Corbyn leaderships are both clearly frightened by the prospect of a second referendum which, amongst other things, will reverse Brexit and bring to account those prominent figures responsible for tainting the 2016 referendum. 
Gloss coming off being the Westminster centre of attention when back home many of your supporters are infuriated at your hard Brexit stance.  
I honestly never thought we would get this close to the cliff edge. I thought #Brexit would implode under its own contradictions long before now. But I am NOT going to be pushed. Join me in hanging on! Even if it’s by our finger tips. We can still do this #Remain 
Hunt's right. The EU called a referendum to fix Tory splits then lied and cheated and made unachievable promises to win it then got Theresa May to impose impossible red lines & made her bow to extreme Brexiters and refuse to compromise even now. Bloody EU! 
On way back to Shrewsbury now will be engaging with senior members of @Conservativeshr  and constituents throughout weekend over Withdrawal Agreement to decide whether or not to support it during expected vote in Commons on Tuesday. #Brexit 
FORMER Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab has warned that if politicians were to betray Brexit voters and not take the UK out of the EU there would be a “day of reckoning” for them. @Conservatives @theresa_may 
"The UK government is refusing to reveal how it will use data collected from EU citizens applying to remain in the UK after Brexit, leading to fears that vulnerable groups could be deterred from applying." writes @tpgcolson in the @businessinsider 
.@Jeremy_hunt own up, take responsibility for your own party and government's catastrophic mistakes. Brexit is on you. The jobs lost are on you. The billions wasted are on you.Neither history nor the British people will let you forget it.  
A big problem for the SNP is that if they believe that it is legal to hold a referendum without permission from the highest authority then the Orkneys and Shetland’s, Borders, Lothians and Aberdeen could all hold a referendum on that same basis to leave Scotland  
To this day the government are refusing to tell us what exactly they are using our data collected during the #SettledStatus application for, and who they are sharing it with. Why?  Brexit settled status fears: UK in privacy row over EU citizens' data  
Brexit: 'Home Office should lose its immigration duties'  - report by Institute for govt. Calls for proper independent review ahead of sea-change Brexit will cause  
He is a bit unsure about what is legal and what is not. For example: trying to touch people's sex organs without their permission is not legal. Holding a democratically mandated referendum is perfectly legal.  
The Remainer elites have utterly twisted political language. ‘Crashing out’, ‘Hard Brexit’, ‘extreme Brexiteers’ — these terms are all designed to demonise Leave and the people who voted for it, says Mick Hume 
Petition: Undertake an independent enquiry into the role of Russia in Brexit.  
WATCH: Like many in Wales, Julie and Phillip here voted leave but they have now changed their minds now they see the reality of brexit and just how complicated it is, which they (and others) did not appreciate in 2016. They are both #remainernow.We need a #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Intelligent people change their minds when facts change. Brexit fact changes:1. Major risk to NHS2. Thousands of jobs already lost, millions to come3. The Easy Trade Deals have not happened4. The “Same Benefits” have not been won5. Leave broke the law6. Russia interfered 
There aren’t enough MPs to support a No Deal Brexit because so many lied through their teeth to get elected in 2017. Many in the HoC should be done for misselling. They need to grow a pair and deliver. #StandUp4Brexit 
The PM is very busy fucking up Brexit so please don’t waste her time on stuff like this. It’s November 19th. When’s Brexit? That’s a better question for her.  
Tip of the dayThere's no such thing as an illegal referendum for IndyIt has never been tested at the Supreme CourtTill then, talk of an illegal referendum is just Tory speak 
Tory MP Sir John Redwood: "I doubt this miserable, remain-dominated parliament, pessimistic about Brexit, has got the guts to say the British people 'we hate your decision and we're not going to implement it'."@JuliaHB1 | @johnredwood |  
It is clearly the EU’s fault that we don’t know what kind of Brexit we want ...  
Absolutely. I’ve never disputed an election or referendum in my life, and I wouldn’t have disputed the EU referendum, had it not been based on lies, cheating, false promises, dark money, foreign influence and the blatant manipulation of desperate people. 
So you admit you're pro-#Brexit as long as you get to choose the format @jeremycorbyn. That's why, after nearly 40 years supporting Labour, I can't any more, at least while you're its leader. *You* want it despite the Court of Appeal confirming corruption & fraud in 2016. 
On International Women's Day remember that Brexit would not be happening without the Leave votes of millions of women across the country - as well as great campaigners like our Chair @GiselaStuart.  
 Devastating for May as ex-minister George Eustice admits the Tories have bungled Brexit. 
Brexit news: Labour warned against ‘betraying’ members over second referendum  
So it's the Friday before the Week of Big Brexit Votes and you want to get your head around it all?Come with me1/ 
The cabinet is getting its recriminations in early for the expected flop of the UK’s Brexit deal: “it’s the EU’s fault”. Who else?  
Hammond presides over a system where billionaires use tax havens with impunity and multi-nationals can legally dodge tax.Yet will only spend more on the police if May"s fake Brexit goes through? About time the Tories started caring a bit more about our social fabric, I'd say. 
James Cleverly just described the post Brexit period as, "the really exciting part"...That bloke makes rotting cow shit seem sentient... 
I was angry for a moment but mainly I am just sad. Hunt’s statement confirms what I have felt for a long time: the main tragedy of #Brexit is that it has put  & many of its closest friends &allies on opposing sides. I hate this situation. #blamegame 
“If you haven’t heard anything about [@JeremyCorbyn’s] plan [for #Brexit], then perhaps you haven’t been paying as much attention as you might to what he’s been saying, because Mr Corbyn has made it very clear from the beginning...”#bbcqt #r4today #gmb 
If only @peston @bbclaurak @BBCPolitics and the rest had been doing their job properly this poor bloke would've known exactly what Labour's position is on Brexit. It's not as if @uklabour & @jeremycorbyn haven't been explaining it for the last 2.5 years 
#OnThisDay in 1973 the IRA murdered John Green, 21. Soldier shot guarding St Joseph’s School, Slate St, as it was acting as a polling station on referendum on whether NI should remain part of the U.K. The Slate St attack was 1 of a number of IRA attacks connected to the poll #OTD 
On Wednesday I asked Barry Gardiner MP,  Shadow Secretary of State for International Trade, how he thought Brexit was going and about Honda.Too busy walking to answer. #SaveHondaSwindon #BrexitBribe #Sodem #HondaGonda 
Experts predict the UK will run out of stories about running out of things after Brexit. 
Wrong. We're judging you now Jeremy, for failing the UK through your reckless pursuit of an 'at all costs' Brexit.  
I'm heading up to Grimsby this morning to see Theresa May make a Brexit speech before next week's vote. If the overnight extracts are a guide, she plans to blame the EU for the fact her MPs voted down a deal she agreed with the EU. Curious times indeed. 
Has Theresa May No Shame??!? using grief of murdered children as political tool to get her ‘Poxy Brexit Deal’ through  
The best possible Brexit deal is to:*Leave on WTO terms*Abolish all tarrifs*Abolish corporation tax*Abolish VAT*Repeal all EU regulation*Introduce points based immigrationSod negotiating with a protectionist trading block that is only trying to stop us prospering 
While everyone is concentrating on Brexit, the contest to replace May has begun. The candidates are already building their teams, speaking to donors and plotting their way to No.10.Most likely person to succeed? Boris. My latest  via @financialtimes 
see her deal ratified by MPs on Tuesday. There we have it: Brexit deal, PM, government all in that Italian-Job bus, hanging over the cliff edge. 
to a trench that says it is the EU that wishes to blow up Brexit by not doing as she says. But the EU would argue that 1) they don’t really know what the PM wants and 2) even if they did they are not persuaded she is right that their capitulation would in fact... 
And so it goes on-Brexit is the fault of everybody except those who advocated it or voted for it. Except it isn't. The reality is that Brexit has infantilised the UK's political process. Time to grow up, take responsibility for our actions and start putting it right. #PeoplesVote 
If you follow @Herring1967 today and look at some of the ‘when’s International Men’s Day?’ cretins he RTs, you’d be tempted to find a correlation between being a massive sexist arsehole and Brexit... 
How and why is Theresa May still PM of our country.She has proved herself totally inept and should have resigned months ago.She has to be forced out because not only will Brexit not be enforced but worldwide her failed leadership will affect ourfuture economy. 
Tories: STOP TALKING ABOUT INDEPENDENCESNP: Okay, so in Brexit news-Tories: Hahahahaha you want a new Scottish currency?SNP: You just said-Tories: STOP TALKING ABOUT INDEPENDENCESNP: Okay...so Tory austerity-Tories: INDEPENDENCE MEANS BEING RULED BY BRUSSELS 
Latest wheeze from Corbyn. Pretend you are looking for a Norway plus Brexit so nobody asks you about a referendum. Even though you are against FoM, voted down staying in EEA in the Commons and have no intention of delivering this. 
"2nd division luvvie, forced to part with some of his soft-earned money for new passport etc, blames Brexit for Post Office queue" shocker.  
MPs warned about using 'parliamentary tricks' to HALT Brexit - 'Brits will be VERY ANGRY'  
Margaret Beckett is right. The Withdrawal Agreement is actually meant to the easy bit. Continue on our current path and we have years and years of Brexit wrangling as the substance and the detail our future trading arrangements get thrashed out.  
Brexiteers!If Mrs May does not deliver the hard clean Brexit we voted for what should we do?Pls retweet. Comments welcome 
Three weeks to Brexit so it's now totally legitimate to put your Brexit tree up and start slacking off at work 
This is Scottish political journalism at its absolute worst. The legality or otherwise of such a referendum has NEVER been established.  
Steve Edginton says "we marched  against the Iraq war and tuition fees" but er he didn't because he's only 19. So NO Steve YOU didn't march against those things - but I did. Oh and I marched against Brexit too. Because it's equally stupid @StevenEdginton 
Hunt setting up the Blame Myth, but UK/UKGov chose:- Brexit itself- A50 w/no plan- Stupid red lines- Delays due to lack of UKGov positions- GE+lost majority- Secrecy/false claims- No expectation management- UK request for all-UK Backstop- Voting against own deal  
The marketing skills from the leave side are incredible. In the real world no deal brexit is the EU's biggest bargaining chip, not the UK's. The way they've managed to twist this around to their narrative is fascinating to watch, horrific to experience. 
#Brexit is a disaster for the UK and I am so sick with idiot #Tories making inane statements whole driving us to the cliff edge. Forget history judging these #Brexit at-all-costs #Tories, the present will judge them. There must be a reckoning coming very soon 
We need a new syscall.brexit()where your C programme exits but doesn’t, is very confused and blames the scheduler demanding more CPU slots than cores plus memory protection but wide open IPC. 
Corbyn backtracks on ‘final say’ referendum. A man that ignores his party members, ignores anti-semitism, ignores terrorism, ignores nepotism and ignores hate speech is not fit to lead a party let alone a country. #ChangePolitics 
So pathetic. The UK held the referendum. The UK triggered article 50 with no plan. The UK proposed the backstop. The UK agreed to the Withdrawal Agreement with the backstop yet as ever the govt prefers to blame the EU than admit the blame for Brexit lies with the UK not the EU! 
#Brexit means exchanging your gold plated first class passport, that gave you freedom to move around Europe unhindered, for a tatty second class version issued by an insular inward looking country. 
I see we have reached the ‘I’m gonna hurt myself if you don’t give me what I want.’ part of our Brexit negotiations.  
History will judge all and everyone that promoted Brexit, lied and conned their supporters and voters, and most importantly, the journalists that Did. Not. Challenge. Them!  
NEW VIDEO - Brexit: What is Democracy?   
Brexit: Does anyone really know what happens next?  
May’s govt, having made one catastrophic mistake after the other, having lain in thrall to the extremists in their party, having lied & mis-promised & distorted & hidden Brexit truths, having wasted months with delay, now reverts to blaming the foreigner. How very Brexit Britain.  
Mrs May was offered a clean #Brexit and free trade deal by Tusk, but she rejected it in favour of 'closer ties with the EU' Number 10 has been trying to thwart our vote for Independence from the very beginning.  
Last week we marched to Downing Street.Please don´t wait until 23 March to make a stand against Brexit.@suehard @stratford4eu @WD4Europe 
From @iaindale: Whatever happens with Brexit this month, May must go. And quickly.  
If anyone is surprised by Labour’s weasel position on a second referendum, I’ve no sympathy. 
Shifting blame doesn’t solve the contradictions of our Brexit position: the backstop is tailored to the governments requests. We have to face up to the consequences of the choices and contradictions of our own policy decisions. And be brave enough to explain this to the public  
As a keen student of history, I think it will be the mendacity of the Leave campaign, the ineffectualness and bluster of the Brexit negotiators, Labour's woeful, disunited opposition and Teresa May's hapless leadership they will judge 
In this Op-Ed I take issue with those who argue that the #EU27 have been tactical rather than strategic in #Brexit negs ⁦@BrigidLaffan⁩ UK realising EU is dominant power in Europe and Brexit will be on its terms  
Our Party policy, agreed at conference and restated last week, was to ‘campaign for a public vote’ on Brexit. Any backtracking on that commitment will be a betrayal of our communities and our values.  
I think history is more likely to judge a UK parliament for promising a utopian Brexit with no idea how to deliver it. 
Labour will not support new Brexit referendum in all circumstances... A U turn every 5 minutes.I WILL NOT VOTE FOR A PARTY THAT BACKS BREXIT #ABTVRT if you agree 
History will judge the EU if they fail to give the UK what need to get a Brexit deal through Parliament the Foreign Secretary @Jeremy_Hunt tells @BBCr4today 
“There will be a day of reckoning with voters..Woe betide those politicians who don’t keep their promises..”Watch Dominic Raab on #bbcqt reject the false “bad deal or no Brexit” approach of his own PM and warn MPs of what awaits them if they fail to deliver Brexit on 29 March.  
Brexit - the most damage any peacetime government has threatened to rain down on the UK. All in the Conservative Party interest. 21 days to go & Brexit is still undefined, unplanned, uncertain...Industries leaving, businesses collapsing #ShameOnYou #GroundhogDay #BrexitShambles 
Today Head Teachers have sent letters to parents telling them they are running out of money. £100 billion waste so far on Brexit would fund this and put 20 thousand police on beat and still have change. #RevokeA50 now. 
Today we @instituteforgov publish our latest report..We argue that the Home Office is not ready or able to manage immigration policy after Brexit.The report looks at the brexit challenge and the problems that have plagued the immigration system.  
Serhat has single-handedly saved Eurovision 2019, Brexit and cured world hunger with this song    
“There will be tariffs on the WTO basis and some of them will be very high. It will damage our economy and it will damage the British economy.” 
'Suggestibility' has always played a part with Brexiters - and MPs know it - which is why it's completely irresponsible for them to continue to announce their 'fear' of 'civil unrest' if #Brexit is stopped - they are DELIBERATELY planting a seed. It's incitement. #RevokeA50 
Don’t believe claims that Brexit threatens the peace in Northern Ireland, write @KateHoeyMP and Lord Trimble 
A BUDGET FOR NO DEALThe British Government & the EU insist they do not want a “no-deal” Brexit, yet it remains a possibility. That's why we have published a major new paper, setting out the measures the Chancellor should consider in a no-deal scenario  
NEW research shows that women are STILL underrepresented in the Brexit debate. This #InternationalWomensDay it’s time to demand our voices are heard. Join us, 23rd March 2016, 11am.  
Former Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab asserted on BBC Question Time that attempts to “frustrate Brexit” are nothing short of an “establishment stitch up”. He added that the UK must leave the EU on 29 March and was met with rapturous applause from the audience, reports the Express. 
Top 5 worst on TV or Radio talking bollocks always 1  Owen Jones  Wins by a distance Doofus 2  James O’ Brien  Slagging off Brexit every show 3  Kevin Maguire  4  Yasmin Alibhai - Brown   Annoying or what 5  Polly Toynbee    Another GUARDIAN bore  
Remember UK your money will be worthless after Brexit. Please give it all to Refuge now and let them deal with the problem of it being worthless in a few weeks, leaving you to enjoy your roadkill  
Absolutely horrific politics Theresa May using murdered teens and their families grief as a political tool to get her ‘Poxy Brexit Deal’ through!!!!! Has Theresa May No Shame?  
There will NOT be a meeting between the Brexit Secretary, the Attorney General and Michel Barnier today. (We had sort-of expected one but it was never confirmed.) 
“I don't want to see this country being bullied or held over a barrel on a bad deal when... we could get Brexit done on the 29th March, take the opportunities that Brexit brings, which we've totally lost sight of, and move on” @DominicRaab#StandUp4Brexit #BBCQT 
As the world's fifth-biggest economy shows signs of slowing and the Bank of England expects the weakest growth in 2019 since the global financial crisis, Britain's dominant services industry cuts jobs at the fastest rate in more than seven years. 
It's a complete myth that a no-deal Brexit would cripple the British economy  
Postcards to MPs have to be sent by 10am today if they're to arrive in time for next week's crunch votes on Brexit. MAKE SURE YOU & YOUR FRIENDS HAVE SENT YOURS before it's too late. It's free!   
“The one thing people expect is to get Brexit done and dusted on 29th March, and for all the politicians who promised to respect the democratic verdict in this referendum, to keep their promises, and I think woe betide those at the next election who don't” @DominicRaab#BBCQT 
UK realising EU is dominant power in Europe and Brexit will be on its termsvia @IrishTimes 
Hey @LucyMPowell   please vote down Tory Brexit!"Political Declaration" is not legal & WA can't bind anyone not in negotiation (EEA-EFTA)It's unworkable + gifts May her Withdrawal Agreement. So IS a Tory Brexit #FBPE #HeyMP 
QT audience ERUPTS as Raab warns of ‘DAY OF RECKONING’ if politicians BETRAY Brexit voters  
“Brexit has woken Britain up to the fact there’s a world beyond Europe and it's reawakened our interest in that world. “I've always thought we’d go close to the wire in terms of the negotiations. That tends to have been the way that Europe has operated in the past” @LiamFox 
Second Brexit vote MOCKED on QT - 'Shall we do it every four years like the Olympics?'  
 of course - nothing to do with Brexit ( tongue in cheek ) - would it be because the uk is about to lose ALL access to markets around the world ? I don’t think they like the mythical “ WTO “ option . 
Who the fuck are you to tell anyone who and why they support? You don’t own the rights to how people fall in love with the game. Such a brexit, gammon faced view on football support. #nufc 
Guardian is speculating if Theresa May loses her meaningless vote again she may, eventually, call for a referendum with her deal or no deal (crash out) as the option..I wonder how that would go down? 
Brexit: the shitstorm so far. #brexit pic.twitter.com/vBEyNhRBWq 
A very powerful and well constructed argument that allows Scotland to proceed with an advisory referendum for Indy  
So these ‘Leavers’ who are demanding a ‘Hard / No-deal Brexit’ keep going on about this £39 Billion we will save by leaving with no deal.. the UK’s current estimated population is around 66.84 Million so that equates to a one off payment of £583 per person, 
May to EU - Agree to backstop changes or risk disorderly Brexit  
The EU has made a new offer in a bid to break the Brexit impasse, sources say  
The one thing the MPs of the lib/lab/con cannot accept is after they have stopped brexit everything will not go back to normal . Once they see their gravy train slipping away and realise they will lose their seats . Only then will our corrupt MPs get the message . 
Sorry, Theresa. The negotiations are over and you got the best deal you could considering your red own lines. If you can't get your deal through parliament, then it's time to accept that Brexit has failed.Cancel it, and come back in a few years when you have a plan. #RevokeA50 
The Referendum was illegally procured, the electoral commission adjudicated as such, a judgement subsequently confirmed in court, during which counsel for HMG confirmed that Theresa May knew about the illegality. So what exactly is it that you think you have won?  
A referendum to replace the Prime Minister with this cat Laureen Harper brought to TIFF  
It gets even more complicated. Scotland were told that if we voted to remain in the UK in 2014 Scottish independence referendum our place in the EU would be guaranteed. Scotland & Northern Ireland voted remain and will be dragged out of EU against our will. 
Some have lost their jobs because of Brexit. Others are spending every spare moment outside work to try to safeguard the jobs, rights and freedoms that Brexit threatens.While you sit and laugh. 
Scheer & CPC don’t support:climate changetaxing the richCPPUniversal pharmacare pay equalityrecreational cannabis public education women’s right to chooseLGBTQtighter gun controlsDOES SUPPORT: Brexit & IDU Trump & Republicans White Supremacy #Cdnpoli  
Indian civil society is asking for freedom in #Kashmir to conduct a referendum and being treated brutally by mob. #PrashantBhushan#kashmirimuslims 
Brexit is a bit embarrassing eh 
Nicola rules out illegal referendum but pontificates on indyref2  with the next encyclical due in ‘the next few weeks’. Elsewhere the UK Statistics Authority has reservations on her cavalier use of NHS statistics. @cultfree54 @2351onthelist @JohnLeoNo1087 @BRRSC @AgentP22 
Sorry, Henry, but May’s deal IS NOT BREXIT AT ALL.  
Hammond says that there could be more money to spend on the police if MPs vote for May’s woeful Brexit deal. In that case the funds set aside for no deal could be used in the fight against knife crime. Talk about playing politics with people’s lives! He is the lowest of the low. 
Today the Florida Senate approved legislation to legalize the smoking of medical marijuana.  The legislature originally banned smoking after the 2016 referendum, but lawsuits and DeSantis' support for the smoking option are leading to a quick about-face #flapol #sayfie 
Deal, no deal or no Brexit? Britain's departure from the E.U. is becoming a choose-your-own-adventure story  
WATCH: Amid global trade war and #Brexit uncertainty, ECB pushes out timing of rate hike  
Sturgeon slaps down her deputy over referendum. Ms Sturgeon later told journalists that Mr Brown’s remarks had been misinterpreted. Aye, bollocks. Rosa Plebb’s been rumbled.  
This was Daily Mirror in late June 2016. How different things *could* have been if Corbyn had been replaced then by a proper leader. And I don't mean anyone on his current front bench, all of whom share responsibility for Labour's pitiful failure to oppose the Tories *and* Brexit  
Just imagine for a second that Brexit does make us poorer. And your kids ask you why you did this to them. You say you wanted more control over laws, but can't name a single EU regulation you don't like other than bendy bananas. 
DUP at odds with its base over Brexit approach  via @IrishTimesWorld 
As to EU imminent demise, if I'd ever thought that was true, I wouldn't be bothered about Brexit or WA. While it's in a poor state and will eventually collapse, the EU has plenty of time left to inflict damage & misery. In fact May's deal will bolster EU - probably by design. 
WATCH: Job cuts, losses at Germany's Schaeffler come amid #Brexit uncertainty and possible US tariffs weighing heavily on European auto industry  
So, the UK has collectively stopped believing in Santa, is in two minds about God but still believes in Brexit?Grow up FFS. 
The #Democrats  really know how to handle #IlhanOmar#MAGA #TWGRP #WWG1WGA #Trump2020 #WWG1WGAWORLDWIDE #KAG #InternationalWomensDay #Funnism #PatriotsAwakened #PaintOurCountryRed #Brexit   
Hi @Ofcom Looks like @bbcquestiontime are at it again!! The head of the opposition party being grilled about #Brexit when it was a @conservatives #Referendum and they wish to negotiate on their terms. 
May to EU: Agree to backstop changes or risk disorderly Brexit  
Outrageous. Labour admits it may not back a final say vote.Labour has taken millions of Remainers for granted for too long.We don’t want hard Brexit, soft Brexit or any Brexit.We want to #StopBrexit.We only vote for parties that campaign to #Remain 
EY (formerly Ernst & Young) moves European parent company to Brussels as it prepares for Brexit  via @CityAM 
Britain's departure from the EU could be put on ice if lawmaker's vote down the government's #Brexit deal next week - UK finance minister warns  
Kate Hoey MP and Lord Trimble: Don’t believe claims that Brexit threatens the peace in Northern Ireland  
Margaret Beckett delivers an electrifyingly clear, honest and passionate call for a #PeoplesVote: "Whatever the House of Commons decides, it has to come back for confirmation to the People!"#Brexit #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 #PutItToThePeople 
[ECB] underlined how a global trade war, Brexit uncertainty and simmering debt concerns in Italy are taking their toll on economic growth across Europe.Yeah, siamo nella top three!  
Labour will not support new Brexit referendum in all circumstances - The Independent  
#WomansDay #WomensDay2019#InternationalWomensDayTo all the exemplary women who voted on #Catalonia's #1oct #1O #Referendum To all of us‍ No queen#DiaInternacionalDeLesDones#SomDonesDesign by .@paco_santero 
There are so many great Labour MPs but they are let down by a disastrous front bench and a foolish leader.Any deal is literally just the foundation of negotiations, we haven't even begun the trade ones yet If you're bored of hearing about brexit, you need to stop it not accept 
This is absolutely unarguable and yet its remorseless logic will not be enough to switch enough Brexiter votes. In Brexit, being absolutely right always trumps getting most of what you want.  
This blatant 'Lisbon Treaty' propaganda continues to gain traction across social media & particularly on @Facebook. Perhaps @steve_graves & @LivEchonews could afford Prof Michael Dougan shareable copy space to thoroughly & at once and for all, debunk this fake news?@connolly_lg 
No. A way out of Brexit.... 
e.g.If you cut resources by 50%Then pledge to raise themBy 10%Over the next 5 yearsThatIs notAn improvementIncidentallyAfter BrexitWe’ll haveEven less#StopBrexit #UKPolitics #SocialCare #Schools #AffordableHousing #Police #ChildPoverty #Pensions #NHS #Brexit #Leave 
I agree, Brexit makes a strong case for IndyRef2. 
Phillip Hammond has spent the last two-and-a-half years doing everything he can to try and frustrate #Brexit. A strong Prime Minister would have fired him, or better still, never appointed him in the first place #bbctw 
The UK has never had a referendum on Proportional RepresentationIn 2011 we had a vote no one asked for: on a system that is not proportional, and often even *less* proportional than First Past the Post.So when someone says "we had a referendum on PR", let them know #AVisnotPR 
Thank you Miatta Fahnbulleh!!! We need more people who get why people voted Brexit and what needs to happen when it is stopped!@Miatsf #BBCtw 
A wee vote of confidence for #ScotlandinEurope. Let’s hope we can rise to the occasion #Brexit #independence 
This is the main thing people just don't get about Brexit #BBCqt 
We warned you Corbyn was lying. He's a Leaver through and through."Labour has admitted it will not support a new referendum on Brexit in all circumstances."#PeoplesVote 
If you're bored of Brexit, you need Brexit to stop RIGHT NOW!Or we'll be negotiating this crap for YEARS!- Margaret Beckett #BBCqt 
Didn't realise until today in Brussels how much anger there is at heart of EU with May's-UK...she got 27 EU leaders (biggest egos in Europe) to dance to her tune in November and endorse her Deal - then she rats on the Deal... Furious EU will not change a word #skypapers #Brexit  
FM @NicolaSturgeon explaining that Scotgov's Resilience Committee was meeting to discuss securing medicine/food supplies if a No Deal Brexit occurs...and quite rightly points out it's due to a Tory PM refusing to rule out No Deal.What on earth was the PO's interruption about?  
I guess one of the only true brexit dividends is that for the first time it as shone a light on some of the sub human detritus that defile the backbenches of the House of Commons in both major parties. 
Britain will prosper with a 'hard but smart' Brexit say top German economists' | via @telegraph 
"Senators noted that experts reportedly identified 150,000 Twitter accounts with Russian ties that disseminated messages about Brexit. They also point out that Ukip and Farage criticised European sanctions on Russia and provided flattering assessments of Russian President Putin."  
You were a Minister in a Government that promised a straight in/out Referendum in 2015 and that its was our sole decision that WOULD be implemented in the 2016 Referendum. Your position as an MP is untenable. Ask Broxtowe voters!  
Labour warned against ‘betraying’ members as party admits it may not back fresh Brexit referendum - The Independent  
I’ve seen for the past 2.5 years a Govt paralysed by one issue. Children and young people don’t talk to me about #Brexit. They talk about health, education, employment, skills, prospects and their confidence in their future - and burning injustices.@JavedKhanCEO on #bbcqt 
Don't think I could despise Corbyn more.Labour will not support new Brexit referendum in all circumstances...  
Dominic Raab is trying to downplay the fact that he didn't know how reliant we are on Dover-Calais trade. If you don't know how much we need that link then you don't know how much we need the EU. It's that simple. So your entire analysis of Brexit is poorly founded.#BBCqt 
£10m of criminal cheating buys 2bn views on FB like this which explains the near verticle spike in the polls to Leave just before the EU ref when Remain stopped spending to stay within the law. The EU ref is a crime scene and so Brexit needs to be stopped. #BBCQT 
"I didn't understand our full reliance on it for every single sector." says Dominic Raab, referring to the Dover-Calais link. But by the time he became Brexit Secretary we were years into the Brexit process, and there was mountains of info already out there. Sheer laziness #bbcqt 
Dominic Raab seems as thick as mince and oblivious of politics. Here you go @DominicRaab:● No-deal Brexit can't happen ● Theresa May's blind alley 'deal' is dead ● An extension is inevitable and once in that it will either be a soft Brexit or a referendum 
why have you 'got to' get Brexit done and dusted?? the British people don't want it! we want a #PeoplesVote with the option to Remain!join us on the #PutItToThePeople march on Saturday 23rd March then, put Brexit back to the people!!  #bbcqt 
"We need to deliver the Brexit we promised the people"The problem here is that what was promised by the likes of failed Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab is an absurd fantasy which isn't vaguely achievable - and by the time the deception becomes apparent it'll be too late. #bbcqt 
‘We have got to get Brexit done and dusted, but we have got to keep our promises’Former Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab is questioned on whether he feels any responsibility for the current situation on Brexit.  #bbcqt 
We're not bored of #Brexit per se (it still could be an exciting shake up & democratic renewal) but we are bored by kind of turgid/ evasive/uninspiring politics on display from left on right on tonight's @bbcquestiontime - at least @iainmartin1 having a go at Beckett is lively 
Margaret Beckett is a boss on Brexit  #BBCqt 
Is there anything dumber than the “public are bored of Brexit” argument? I’m sure World War Two and the Black Death had their tedious moments too.    #bbcqt 
WATCH | @DominicRaab: "If there's an Establishment stitch-up to try and frustrate Brexit there will be a day of reckoning with the voters. The one thing people expect is to get Brexit done and dusted on March 29."  #BBCQT Support us at  
Message to folk who voted Leave.It's totally ok to change your mind. There was a global misinformation campaign built around Brexit, often invisible and insidious. Come join us; you'll get a warm welcome and possibly biscuits. :)#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
ScotlandWalesNorthern IrelandAll hold an “advisory” referendum on the same day!Think of the fun watching the British State running around like a headless chicken trying to head 3 Independence Movements off at the same time? 
Labour’s Margaret Beckett says there's still a long way to go over Brexit. #bbcqt 
A gammon slurs: "What is Mr Corbyn's plan for #Brexit? I haven't heard a thing, the people must know" with a look of 'gotcha' on his face..Margaret Beckett retorts "If you haven't heard, you haven't been listening" - EXACTLY. #bbcqt 
Here is @jeremycorbyn's sensible alternative plan for Brexit, as Margaret Beckett said: 
‘I’ve not heard one plan from that man, the people want to know’This audience member questions Labour leader @jeremycorbyn’s plans on Brexit. #bbcqt 
Is it irresponsible for commentators to say they're"bored of brexit"?I mean sorry you're bored,but many of us are terrified of the consequences of brexit esp No Deal. Meds shortages are a very real+serious concern to many people.We're not bored, we're terrified #StopBrexit 
Dominic Raab says a choice between a bad deal and No Brexit would be an "establishment stitch-up".So unless 27 other countries agree to the terms demanded by the UK, there will be a "day of reckoning" as you call it? @DominicRaab Can we please GROW UP!!!#BBCqt 
MPs warned about using 'parliamentary tricks' to HALT Brexit - 'Brits will be VERY ANGRY'  
Unless I missed something Dominic Raab managed to say he would vote both for and against the Brexit deal #Questiontime 
“Brexit done and dusted”Dream on! This is only the beginning! The only way that Brexit will be done and dusted will be to ditch Brexit. #bbcqt 
Yeah.  Well.  Anyone who thought he would stick to the script he only read out like a hostage was bound to be disappointed.Time for some more MPs to jump ship.After Brexit is bloody pointless... 
The BBC economics editor on Newsnight explains how British investment in the EU has gone up out of fear of Brexit.But EU AND British investment in Britain has also gone up. No mention of that.Then CBI Director said growth here was stalling—but it is stalling even more in the EU! 
Mate, not being funny, but you called for Article 50 to be triggered the DAY after the referendum result.  
Just heard Tory MP on @BBCNewsnight saying most important issue facing this country for 40 years is BrexitThat's because she's richIf she was poor, most important issue, the life & death issue, is Austerity Ending itWhich needs a @UKLabour government #GeneralElectionNow 
Comparing Brexit to WW2 has become almost normal. We brought the EU referendum on ourselves. It's not hard to see the difference. Incredibly neither side of Farage's family played a role in it. His constant evocation of it is the massive chip on his family shoulder writ large. 
Holy Cow.  At exactly the same time Pelosi puts an antisemitism referendum on the House floor, @AOC sends out an email saying the Jews are out to get us. You just can't make this stuff up. 
This for me is the most disastrous change in politics in the Brexit era. Politicians have always spun, omitted bits & been economical with the truth.This is different though. Our leaders looking down the camera and knowingly, deliberately lying as a matter of course is new.  
Videos of the English fighting for the last bag of Mr. Porky Pork Scratchings after Brexit x  
Winner of Newspaper Review of the Year Dominic Raab Theresa May’s Tories their Brexit and the Port of Dover #bbcqt 
The former Tory Brexit Minister @DominicRaab is on #BBCQT tonight. Here’s a few things about Mr Raab that every single voter needs to know. 
Brexit latest: 1. Backstop talks still deadlocked, Cox cancels Brussels trip on Friday2. No10 sources admits situation “bleak”, Tuesday’s vote may happen without new deal3. May tells EU chiefs Brexit deal will be voted down unless they climb down 
And he does it again.Labour support for a PV was a false dawn.Corbyn now saying only May's deal should result in a PV.Labour warned against ‘betraying’ members as party admits it may not back fresh Brexit referendum  
Boring.No, May, it’s not in the EU’s interest for UK to leave without a deal. But the EU will survive it more unscathed than the UK will.Threatening the party you’re negotiating with when you’re the weaker party makes no sense at all. #Brexit  
Not surprised that there are so many  #ResignKarenBradley calls. Apart from her saying “the wrong thing" on Northern Ireland, she was also one who lied during the #brexit referendum about Turkey being about to join the EU and that Britain could not stop it. #Bradleyout 
It's becoming very clear, this Tory Government is preparing to force through a no deal #Brexit that will be a catastrophe for our country. And they are being aided and abetted by a Labour Party leadership that refuses to act for its membership. Parliament is now our only hope! 
The final, wholly expected betrayal by Corbyn.....Labour warned against ‘betraying’ members as party admits it may not back fresh Brexit referendum | The Independent  
#Brexit: Does anyone really know what happens next?  
I lasted less than 24 hours off ice cream because my nerves are shot with the Brexit thing, no thanks to you, tbh  
Tomorrow Theresa May will give a speech whose highlight is that the Brexit negotiations are a two way process. Three weeks to go and she’s only just realised... 
With 505 hours until Brexit, we owe it to ourselves to keep reminding journalists and reporters VERY POLITELY that revoking Article 50 remains an option, and that no-deal isn't the inevitable outcome of Theresa May's deal getting voted down (default isn't the same as inevitable). 
Philip Hammond has done huge damage to the Brexit cause — and to his party & his country:  
This is worse than brexit  
The semantics. ANY referendum must have Remain as an option. It’s not a referendum between Brexit & Lexit, thank you, which is a construction these words bear.  
Told Scottish Labour’s SEC has tonight agreed a statement supporting a second EU referendum with Remain on the ballot paper. The party conference will be asked to agree it over the weekend. 
The Tories will be wiped out not only in the upcoming local elections but also at the next General Election if they don't deliver Brexit. They have been warned.  
Picture, if you will, a Remain campaign poster, in May 2016. It says:THREE WEEKS BEFORE BREXIT DAY WE STILL WON'T HAVE A DEAL!Almost everyone: Project Fear! (Even I would have called that Project Fear.) 
Every Remainer should resolve only to vote for parties or candidates who pledge absolutely to stop/reverse Brexit, until the UK’s place at the top table of Europe is once again secure. #ABTV #PeoplesVote 
#bbcnews #Newsnight The government #brexit negotiations focus only on the Irish Backstop. Important to remember that the Backstop is not the main problem with May’s #BrexitDeal ICYMI , here’s a list of fifteen other problems: 
An extremely important legal case ⁦@TheBMA⁩ should join as an interested party as affects every prescribing doctor. I can confirm that neither ⁦@the_mdu⁩ nor ⁦@MPS_Medical⁩ were consulted #NoDeal #Brexit  
This comes under the title The end of the Labour Party if Corbyn and his Lexit buddies do a deal with the tories on brexit"Labour warned against ‘betraying’ members as party admits it may not back fresh Brexit referendum" 
It's a complete myth that a no-deal Brexit would cripple the British economy' | via @telegraph 
Liam Fox: I fear Brexit may never happen  
IT Poll confirms anger at DUP & SF game-playing on Brexit.  Brexit is not about pushing a constitutional agenda, it's about trying to protect the people of Northern Ireland.  Unfortunately both the DUP & SF have chosen to ignore the will of the people of NI at this critical phase 
Another really interesting @IrishTimes political podcast. Some fascinating polling from N Ireland. A lot of unhappiness w/DUP, even among unionists. And 64% of NI Catholics want Sinn Fein to take its Westminster seats. Brexit driven winds of change are buffetting N Ireland  
We have completed a thorough assessment and can confirm that there is a diesel crisis but diesel is not responsible for the large business evacuation from Britain. The corporate departures are entirely Brexit related and not the result of a fuel crisis or the actor, Vin. 
Brexit: Does anyone really know what happens next? - BBC News  
I hope this is nonsense.At @LondonLabour conference this w/end @EmilyThornberry rightly paid tribute to MPs & campaigners who fought for a confirmatory referendum and was unequivocal about Labour’s support for it.This story would flatly contradict her speech of 4 days ago.  
Interested to see how SDP get on in Newport West by-election. Brexit has rattled the political scene in Britain and reawoken voters' interest in what UK could become.After we leave the EU, policy making will be democratised again, freed from the backroom deals in Brussels.  
Brexit has become like watching a televised football match with foreign language commentary, no referee, no idea which players are playing for which teams, or what the score is, or how the game can be won or lost or when it ends. 
Found the Brexit section in B&M ⁦@Coldwar_Steve⁩ 
Fraser Nelson: 'It’s not too late for Mr Hammond to outline what a no-deal Brexit could look like. All it would take is a Chancellor who believes in it'  
BREXIT BETRAYAL: Dominic Grieves REMAINERS hatch plan with MACRON’S team to DELAY Brexit!( LIKE & RETWEET if you want to get on with BREXIT) 
All the Leave muppets thought "we're the rational Anglo-Saxons, the EU will be all emotional and "Latin" over Brexit so we'll nail them".But when the EU turn out to be cold and rational negotiators, the UK has become hysterical and completely irrational. 
Dominic Raab said the government should “pull every lever we've got” to ease business “disruption”- this will come in the form of a massive No-Deal Brexit tax cut for the corporate giants. Huge tax cuts for the rich while working families struggle... #BrexitCrisis #bbcqt 
I don’t think the primary will be a referendum on the Biden ‘70s or the Sanders ‘80s. I just don’t think that’s what voters care abt—we’ll see! 
Our shared #EU Citizenship is one of Europe's greatest achievements. It is so much more than just a legal status and it is a tragedy that #Brexit is depriving us of it.  
A new opinion poll suggests that voters in Northern Ireland are deeply dissatisfied with the British government's handling of Brexit. |  
BREXIT SUCCESS: UK can THRIVE outside EU, US economist declares - ‘Extremely optimistic!’  
I have no words.......Labour warned against ‘betraying’ members as party admits it may not back fresh Brexit referendum  
#DUP #Brexit ...Breaking.....Irish Times poll: Majority in North unhappy with handling of Brexit by May and DUPvia @IrishTimes 
Omid promising Cher and getting a balloon-based stripper is Brexit in a nutshell. #CelebrityApprentice 
Tomorrow's front page: Scotland set for showdown over holding indyref2 after Jeremy Hunt says the UK will refuse to allow Scots to vote. FM slams 'anti-democratic' Tories + @PeatWorrier on whether Holyrood can hold a referendum with a Section 30 order.  
"Labour has admitted it will not support a new referendum on Brexit in all circumstances"Tell me again how Labours come out unequivocally for a new ref. 
Brexit and passports. In the light of some tosh that has been talked today, some key points.Deal agreed/Brexit delayed: no change to present arrangement. Your passport is valid for travel anywhere in the EU up to and including the date of expiry.No deal: 
Tucked way in the TV news today, there was a little mention that Jeremy Corbyn and his team have been speaking to Tory MPs on a workable Brexit plan. It’s good someone’s working on the biggest issue facing the country while May just wastes time.  
Loved setting out a positive vision for our @Conservatives movement we need to build post BREXIT. I have some amazing colleagues; you don’t hear enough from them (irrespective of age btw!) If we change and adapt to meet the challenge ahead, we have a huge future.  
Scots Tories: Screaming that Indyref 2 without consent would be illegal, while wholeheartedly supporting Brexit which was won by Cambridge Analytica, untraceable donors and complete disregard for electoral law. 
With less than 30 days before the cliff edge, it is now clear that the Brexit that people were promised is not on offer. When people voted in the 2016 referendum there was no detail that allowed people to know what exactly they wer... via @qz 
So #Labour only back a #PeoplesVote #FinalSay on Brexit if it comes down to May's deal. If the deal Corbyn is prioritising gets through they'll vote it through with no public consultation.Remainers have been had.  
Russian bid to influence Brexit vote detailed in new US Senate report | World news | The Guardian  
Ex-PM Gordon Brown calls for year-long Brexit delay to 'consult' voters - Sky News  
Interesting to see what is dominating the news lately...> Brexit climax> Our whole political system breaking apart> Labour antisemitism> Stabbing epidemic, drugs & gangs> The final defeat of ISIS..top of today's agenda> why it's wrong to say "coloured person"Get a grip 
Coxcomb's ludicrous codpiece is a new low for the Tory Brexit fiasco. This bloviating buffoon thinks bluster will convince the EU27 to change their fundamental rules. No sane govt would put him in control of the critical phase of the most important negotiation for 50 years. 
“Brexit Blind Dates”  
- Number of possible Brexit outcomes: 3 (some kind of deal, no deal crash out, revoke Article 50 and stay in)- Number of times the mainstream news has mentioned revoking Article 50 as a viable alternative to no deal calamity in the last few months: 0 (approx) 
<Parliament. Saturday morning>JULIAN SMITH: So. Who has Castle Mayskull sent me this morning... a princess, a geek, a basketcase a rebel and... a GraylingMCVEY: HeyWILLIAMSON: What?RUDD:HAMMOND: Fuck you JulianGRAYLING: Hello!SMITH: Welcome all of you, to the Brexit Club 
Corbyn snuggles up with the Tories to deliver a corrupt Brexit, neither his party nor the country want. #StopBrexit 
Corbyn:2015 “support tory referendum”2016 “support tory brexit”2017 “Support Tory Brexit”2018 “SUPPORT TORY BREXIT”2019 “Nothing to do with me, it’s a Tory Brexit” 
Perfect timing...@Coldwar_Steve book release on #WorldBookDay during #BritishPieWeek!Brexit survival kit sorted   
The French fisherman are threatening a war and to enter our waters illegally after BrexitCan I remind them that the fucking French are shit at war anyway that's why we've had to win 2 for them.I say send the Royal Navy in if they even try it   
‘24 @uklabour MPs incl 8 front-benchers—abstained or voted against amendment last month that would’ve helped prevent no-deal Brexit. Labour whip is not being cracked..Corbyn’s main concern is avoiding blame for Brexit, not changing it’Won’t be forgiven.  
The UK's largest estate agent group, Countrywide, has reported widening losses and says the uncertainty surrounding Brexit is hitting business. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
The competent Tories:“Rise in stabbings not to do with police cuts"“coloured women”“Soldiers in NI couldn’t have committed crimes" “Speak to Foreign Office re islamophobia”“Send in army to deal with kids"“Brexit may lead to deaths”And that’s just the last couple of days 
ERG's Mark Francois: "If MPs use parliamentary tricks to do them out of Brexit, a lot of members of the public in this country will get very angry, very quickly."@TheJamesWhale | @VirtualAsh |  
There is a thick, heavy trail leading to a Russian bid to influence Brexit vote detailed in new US Senate report. Yet our police and government do nothing to investigate the criminals involved. We must have a #PeoplesVote 
Written in 2017, this article explains perfectly why we should have a #PeoplesVote (and why the 2016 referendum was not one).."only one option to restore the democratic process: a second (or rather: an actual!) referendum on Brexit". 
In case anyone in Westminster cares what the majority in Northern Ireland want, poll shows:67% want to stay in EU single market and customs union59% prefer checks on goods in the Irish Sea to Border checks59% would vote Remain in a second referendum.  
Here's some of the findings from our Brexit poll-  
The 13 @UKLabour MPs who voted against Cooper amendment so risking a No Deal BrexitKevin BarronRonnie CampbellRosie CooperJim FitzpatrickCaroline FlintRoger GodsiffStephen HepburnKate HoeyJohn MannDennis SkinnerLaura SmithGareth SnellGraham StringerYour action? 0  
DUP at odds with its base over Brexit approach  
Come on, patriots! Let’s all march for:• decimated economy• job losses• deregulation• removal of our right to live, study, work and retire in 27 EU countries• rich people getting even richer etc. Wave your Union flag, sing Rule Britannia and *believe* in Brexit!  
“We have agreed of course to a referendum to enshrine an Aboriginal voice into the constitution,” Labor’s @LindaBurneyMP told ABC Radio. 
Anti-Democratic SNP trying to lecture the Conservatives about referendums They have never accepted the 2014 independence vote or the 2016 EU referendum result.  
Orwell, the corruption of political language and Brexit: 'The dread word ‘Brexit’ is rarely allowed out on its own these days. Instead it must always be accompanied by a minder – an adjective whose job it is to warn us that Brexit is a very bad boy.'  
A 21-month extension on leaving the EU could be the decisive victory in the war of Brexit, says Andrew Adonis  
Every iteration of Brexit is damaging. There's no magic Labour version which won't devastate us. 
#ThisIsTheRealSpainShare this719 Videos of the Repression lived in Catalonia caused by the Spanish Police in the Referendum of October 1, 2017 
Brexit is a lot like belief in a flat Earth:- not supported by any credible evidence- spread via ever more elaborate hoaxes, pseudoscientific babble and general nonsense on social media- has attracted a few high profile supporters- a matter of fervent belief, immune to facts 
This is an utter disgrace. Had we waited post #Brexit, post #WTOBrexit in fact, then how many jobs could a British company have created here?Are we not capable of building our own warships? We need to urgently reshore our manufacturing activities - both large and small. 
Russia must be so happy re Brexit. Gmt paralized for years, billions wasted, nation weakened & divided. Only question, How did they do it? 
The people who want to delay Brexit have only one purpose in mind: overturning the result of the referendum. Listen to my interview with @SputnikNewsUK 
WATCH: Here's @Justine_Roberts from @MumsnetTowers on @BBCPolitics explaining how there has been a big shift amongst their members on #brexit and on a survey they found 22% of those  that voted leave have changed their minds & are #remainernowRespect to those mums!#FinalSay 
The report adds that although officially the Russian government asserted  its neutrality on Brexit, its English-language media outlets RT and  Sputnik covered the referendum campaign extensively and offered  ‘’systematically one-sided coverage’’. 
Germany to CRUMBLE under hard Brexit - shock stats reveal HUGE damage by no deal  
Extraoridinary that the US Senate covers Putin's  involvement with Brexit while the British authorities do nothing. 
I used to respect ⁦@AllisterHeath but he writes a lot of bilge these days on #Brexit, such as this article. Anybody with any common sense knows that “No Deal” is a bad deal for the UK economy.  
Dominic Raab is still pushing the idea that No Deal with WTO rules is the only way to fulfil the result of the Brexit Referendum & 'take back control'. No Deal will cause a huge 9%+ contraction of the UK economy! The 2008 financial crash was 2%. Raab is dangerous! #bbcqt 
George Orwell would recognise the Remainer elites’ abuse of political language. Language is misused in order to ‘make lies sound truthful’, Orwell said — and that’s exactly what the Brexit-bashers are doing today, argues Mick Hume 
Russian bid to influence Brexit vote detailed in new US Senate report.UK political system vulnerable to anti-democratic meddling via social media and ‘possibly illicit’ campaign funding, report says #BrexitGate#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
The new narrative from Brextremists. All arguments for Brexit have been lost. All the empty promises exposed.All the corruption is being exposed.Project Fear is now Project Reality.All that’s left is die-in-a-ditch No Deal.Death or glory. What despicable irresponsibility. 
Planes will fall from the sky, blinded by a swarm of Brexit crazed locusts, and the land will be torn asunder.. Change the poxy record. 
.@AmnestyUK young children in the UK, particularly in London are now targets of Armed gangs, the death toll is alarming and scary @theresa_may and UK politicians are focused on #Brexit please join @amnesty to put pressure on UK government to ACT.Campaign as you would in Africa. 
Dominic Grieve hosts French minister for Brexit discussions on Article 50 and second referendum 
SonyDysonPanasonicLloydsUnileverGoldman SachsBarclaysAirbusFlybmiP&OHSBCJP MorganUBSFordHitachiToshibaAXAHondaMoneygramPhilips PrimarkEuropean Medicines AgencyBank of AmericaJacob Rees-Mogg’s investment fundNone of this has anything to do with Brexit. 
Where else in Europe is there a small nation with its government in prison, its president in exile, its language in danger, its TV and police risking supression, its voters beaten up and its leaders being tried for organizing a Referendum?  
Quite simply, they're all safe until we're out, May doesn't want anything stopping the Brexit Express which she was given the job to drive - nobody else in their right mind wanted the job.  
Theresa May cannot be allowed to get away with her botched Brexit deal.Liberal Democrats believe you should have the final say on the deal and the option to remain. Add your name if you want the final say 
I hear the weather is nice in North Korea, they are already socialists, and the economy cannot collapse. The effects of Brexit just keep getting better.   
Devious 2015 referendum billMade advisoryIf mandatory a supermajority needed, 2016 Cameron promised government would Implement result2019 appeal court May admits she knew about criminal activity of leaveJudge rules that if mandatory  would be nullified. Because advisory cant  
MPs passed the #Brexit decision to us.MPs can't now renege on that cos they don't like the result.The arrogance of these MPs is breathtaking.  
Nicola Jennings on Theresa May's plan for the Irish border #TheresaMay #JeremyCorbyn #Chuka #Tories #Brexit #Brexit #Backstop #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
Enjoyable afternoon with @FedTrust & @SCER_eu discussing “Future of Europe & the Scottish Dimension”.  Plenty of recognition that Scotland’s experience of #Brexit reinforces the case for #independence 
Translation: ‘My determination is to deliver #Brexit, not a People’s Vote.’  
whoo!! @EuroMove_MK social time!!  let's go plan some Brexit sabotage and sign people up for the #PeoplesVote march!  
Whether you voted to Leave, Remain, couldn't vote or didn't vote - it doesn't matter. We want to build youth-led solutions to help reunite Britain @APPG_Brexit   
I couldn't be more disgusted with our politicians at this moment in time they're hell bent on betraying brexit, they allow our veterans to be prosecuted whilst allowing amnesty to terrorists, they've allowed grooming gangs to flourish and they 'lost' paedophile reports!  
Russian bid to influence Brexit vote detailed in new US Senate report - Nigel Farage ‘provided flattering assessments’ of Vladimir Putin - well he would wouldn't he.  
On “truth telling” @LindaBurneyMP very clearly states here “We [ALP] have agreed of course to a referendum to enshrine an Aboriginal voice into the constitution”.  
Can The Queen stop Brexit?  Come on Queenie, if you can. 
Looking at #FailingGrayling, Karen Bradley on NI #CalamityKaren, Amber Rudd saying ‘coloured woman’’, Andrea Leadsom on Islamaphobia alongside Tory Brexit chaos you can only conclude our government are deeply incompetent. We can’t go on like this #GeneralElectionNow #C4News 
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: A German Brexit? A Scandal Of Subversive Statecraft | Politicalite UK | Unreported News, Politics and OpinionThis was posted today, written by a Bruges Group member. ⁦@resurgentsheep⁩ ⁦@gerardjasper⁩ ⁦@paulrey99⁩ 
European Parliament set to keep Scotland office after Brexit  
We wish to emphasise that the early retirement of senior officials in the Department, on Exit Day, is not in any way linked to Brexit. 
At the launch event for @KirkleesEurope tonight ... can't fit everyone in the pictures! Hearing from @KathPinnock that the tide is turning & things have changed. People are speaking up & they're not happy about #Brexit!  
Grieve, has met with members of Macron's govt to discuss an extension of A50 and 2 ref. France wants a 21-mth Brexit delay in order to help finish the terms of the WA. But Grieve, and other Remain Tory MPs, want a much longer extension so they can spark a second ref. Disgraceful. 
Starting from Brexit with Farage, passing from Trump to Salvini-DiMaio, without omitting the yellow gilets, we always find the "Bannon-Putin" duo omnipresent. The first "orders", the second "pay"....  
“Parliament has proved itself incapable of resolving this problem”Former PM Gordon Brown suggests a year extension to Brexit to consult the people about the different options 
A law graduate of the University of Glasgow, Sturgeon worked as a solicitor in Glasgow. I think she knows she can call an other independence referendum. 
Love this cartoon - with its author Tom Johnston in Wrexham, campaigning against Brexit  
"We're going to have economic chaos if we go ahead with Brexit, we're going to have a constitutional impasse because they'll never pass the legislation in time"  
Everyone has to wish the fantastic Brexit and free trade hero @MissVHewson a belated happy birthday! 
This is SO IMPORTANT - take a 1 min 2 sign this petition - AND SHARE IT with everyone!#FBPE #FPHD  Please follow back across the EU! #PutItToThePeople March 23rd - BE THERE! #BBCQT TStorm  @ 22:35Petition: Hold a second referendum on EU membership.  
Only 26 stabbings til Brexit. 
As I’ve been saying all along. Boris is somebody to be extremely worried about. He plays the fool but is politically very dangerous. He’ll play any card for power. You have been warned... #Politics #Brexit #TheresaMay 
#HumanCost of Brexit THREAD: When dependent on disability benefits from another EU county, then living in a country that is leaving the EU can destroy families...Pls, @eucopresident #RingFenceOurRights , so families like @SiannamacDonald 's can find peace again#CostaAmendment 
I’m hurt by the comments made by some Indy people. Liverpool my home city voted overwhelmingly to oppose brexit. I am Scouse & live in Scotland I have ALWAYS supported an independent Scotland yet in recent days I’m seeing a lot of “if you weren’t born here you don’t get a vote” 
On The James Whale Show featuring Ash:► Brexit with Daniel Hannah and Mark Francois► NHS satisfaction falls to lowest in ten years► Geoffrey Cox's codpiece@TheJamesWhale | @VirtualAsh |  
Appears that @Channel4News is the only UK news outlet to comprehensively cover comments by #KarenBradley re deaths in #NorthernIreland. Exemplifies how little interest, curiosity or knowledge there is in UK re the North. Little wonder the confusion that ensued because of #brexit 
It is worse than inept.Tory Government never had any intention of delivering #Brexit.  
At @FinalSayForAll, we fight for the rights of #The5Million disenfranchised citizens. We’ve filmed and collected many moving stories about the personal impacts of Brexit. Our aim is to disseminate them, especially to those who can bring about change. /3 
Caught up with a Tory activist in the supermarket. Or rather now Ex Tory. He told me he has left the Stonehven Tories as have 4 others.All canvassers they now have no canvassing team from Stonehaven for Stonehaven Reason for leaving? Brexit and Bullying with in the local branch 
In December 2017, the Tories restored the party whip to MP suspended for using racist languageAnne Marie Morris is brought back into party fold, five months after apologising for using N-word in discussion about Brexit#ToryRacism#ToryIslamophobia 
Anti-Brexit campaigners have hijacked Nigel Farage’s infamous Breaking Point poster to put the real threats to the country in the spotlight  
Ex-PM Brown: Delay Brexit for a year to 'consult' voters  
Ex-PM Gordon Brown calls for year-long Brexit delay to 'consult' voters  
Ok then.... New proposal is we leave, as planned, on 29th March on WTO terms, No Deal is better than a Shit Deal. You'll find us over the English channel when you want to talk trade Brexit: UK should offer new proposal, France's Europe minister says  
Yeah, right. With Brexit tariffs of up to 40% and actual food production not even a priority. That’s before even getting into how a Tory ending of freedom of movement will decimate the rural community.  
If Brexit does fail, and it’s really going for it, it’ll fail because it becomes a national joke. 
.@Telegraph cartoon#PhilipHammond #Brexit #Remain #evilplan #antibrexitdeathray 
Judging from the last 24 hours or so, the UK's final 3 weeks as an EU member will be occupied by MPs taking it in turns to provoke outrage, then being forced into a grovelling apology. Gives the media something to do to while away the hours until Brexit, I suppose... 
Geoffrey Cox says plans to solve the Brexit deadlock over the Irish backstop were "as clear as day". Strange therefore he is unable to tell the EU what those plans are? They are still waiting. 
Gordon Brown DEMANDS Brexit pushed back a YEAR and claims 'even Brexiteers want a delay'  
“It is no exaggeration at all to say the future of our party is at stake. If we extend Article 50 and delay Brexit further then we are likely to see our local government candidates massively punished in the May local elections.”  
Ghairat: Yr nana used to call Ayub daddy, ZAB mastered art of flattering by calling Iskandar Mirza as greater leader then Quaid E AzamYr Dada &  father contested 77 election frm ANP, dada was Zia’s chief polling agent in 84 referendum later he abused QuaideAzam #BilawalSharif 
An incredibly silly statement Mr Mayor, not worthy of your office but perhaps worthy of you. You could say this about any Election and any Party. In the Referendum, people didn't vote for every bit of legal jargon - they voted for freedom from EU rule and controlled immigration.  
For anyone saying that Brexit's not about the economy, how do you think we pay for the NHS, schools, public housing, mental health, homelessness mitigation, etc.? Magic beans? At the end of the day, EVERYTHING is about the economy. 
.@FullFrontalSamB has done an explainer for Americans having a hard time understanding Brexit, and it's pretty good.#PeoplesVote@lbc #newsnight #r4today #bbcaq #bbcqt #politicslive 
Just played ‘Brexit or remain’ in the chippy. Had the gammon looking fella next to me down as a def. brexiteer. He saw my ‘Don’t blame me...’ @RemainiacsCast badge and said “what a bloody mess we’re in, can you believe what we’re doing to ourselves?”Humble pie time for me... 
The face of Romanian gypsy who kicked a white British mother to death in Thurrock Essex. He was jailed today. Sadly even after brexit we will continue to let these trash into Britain. RIP Julie  
Are you an American having a hard time understanding Brexit? Allow @amy_hoggart to translate it for you.Produced by @TylerGHall with @laserlauren. Edited by @jessecoane. Animation by @danspenser. 
So a French Minister warns us that No-Deal Brexit could stoke anti-British sentiment. Thanks for putting us in our place for exercising our democratic right. It was OK for you to seek our help and friendship when an enemy was twice at your door eh? What has Macron done to you?  
As a bit of light relief, let's take a look at a man so frightfully inept he's ensured incompetence will be our lead export post Brexit.That man is Chris Grayling. Here I look into the man, the myth and the mystery of why he's still somehow employed: 
Allister Heath in today’s Telegraph rightly calls the scare stories of the Treasury about Brexit ‘the worst campaign of official disinformation since Tony Blair’s dodgy Iraq WMD dossier.’ And of course Blair and Campbell have been backing the latest disinformation with gusto. Sad 
Let me state some facts:Messi = GoatLampard > GerrardHazard > SalahUnited > LiverpoolChelsea > Arsenal > Palace > SpursAguero > KaneAubameyang = Gabonese VardyPogba > KDBBrexit = BrexitEPL > Any other LeagueUK Rap > US RapAndroid=AppleFeel Free to add more 
Would you take the risk of delaying Brexit or accept Theresa May’s deal? Vote and retweet 
She didn’t have to implement the will of 17m people (advisory referendum) and made NO ATTEMPT WHATSOEVER to “pacify” the 16m who voted Remain; rather she spent two years either pretending we don’t exist or calling us traitors, saboteurs and citizens of nowhere. She can piss off.  
#Brexit is a human rights crime. The criminals must be prosecuted. #PeoplesVote 
The UK can unilaterally #RevokeA50 at any time between now and Brexit day.Write to your MP today to demand they #StopBrexit. 
 The Oct 1 referendum was a very visible moment of repression and civil rights violations in Spain. They were happening before however, and thereafter. Find out more about Spain's civil rights abuses in this dossier.  @fairtrials @hrw @AmnestyEU 
Please sign and share this petition to make sure animals are legally recognised as sentient beings, who can feel pain and joy, after #Brexit >>  #BetterDealForAnimals 
The SNP is in "complete disarray" after Nicola Sturgeon contradicted her deputy over ordering an "illegal" second independence referendum | @simon_telegraph 
Nicely sums up the past 986 days #inLimbo.Was."The application system for EU nationals to stay in the UK will be as easy as setting up an online account at LK Bennett."Now."Ooops."#Brexit @the3million 
#CommonMarket2.0 simply puts flesh on the bones of our Party’s Brexit policy, as outlined by @jeremycorbyn in his ‘5 tests’ letter to the PM. So, it is 100% wrong to claim that CM2.0 is ‘helping the Tories’. It’s a cross-party plan, based on re-discovering lost art of compromise. 
 Hot off the press New Brexit data from @cbitweets on no deal impacts - happening now and in the future. And it’s not a pretty picture. SHOCK NEWS: businesses, not big fans of no deal. Who knew?~9 out of 10 concerned about delays, tariffs and exchange rate (1/?) 
Amber Rudd - Remain - "coloured woman.Dianne Abbott - Remain - "white people divide and rule"Angela Smith - Remain - "funny tinge"David Lammy - Remain - "White saviors"Those racist Brexit supporters though... 
What happens if May's Brexit deal is voted down? And if it passes?  
 Today @LiamFox has been championing  free trade and global Britain at the @WTO in Geneva. Listen to see what  will use its independent seat to do after Brexit   
With May’s deal sinking fast, Brexit looks to be heading for extra time. But it's unclear what the UK will do with it  
Tory ex-Brexit Minister Dominic Raab was a member of a Facebook group, The Ultras, that states 'selling off council housing, ending free healthcare, and bringing back workhouses for debtors are policies that "have found their time to enter Britain'. The Brexit Minister! #bbcqt 
Trump’s Digital Operation Comes Under Scrutiny By House Judiciary Committee - @RVAwonk reports the facts. #Mueller #Trump #CambridgeAnalytica #BrexitRead it here:  
MPs handed the Brexit decision to the people – they must not now be allowed to overrule us 
Nicola Sturgeon has ruled out holding an unofficial Scottish independence referendum.Some might view this as bad news but I beleve Nicola must make clear we shall apply for section 30 order. If refused we go ahead regardless. Nicola needs to make this clear. 
Hello to everyone whose British passport is going to expire within 6 months. Do it ASAP. As in latest tomorrow or you will be denied entry in the event of a no deal Brexit  
Any MP who regards the advisory referendum result as an instruction is violating their duty as an MP, which is to exercise their judgement in the service of their constituents and country, not to obey voters. "I was only obeying orders" is no excuse. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
Delightful . ALL those MPs who support "brexit" are in direct breach of #5 of their Code of Conduct, namely their Duty to Uphold the Law - the more so now that May's own lawyer has told the High Court in London that she KNOWS that the 2016 EU leave vote was corrupt and illegal 
Oliver Letwin on #bbcpm trying to sell us a Brexit "that we can tolerate" while "sometimes having to accept something that's second best". Why?  Why accept second best? Why not kill this stupid idea off once and for all?#StopBrexit#RevokeArticle50 
#Brexit is so corrupted by gerrymandering, electoral crime, foreign interference and cover-ups, and orchestrated campaigns of hate & lies that any MP who colludes in forcing through Brexit without a #PeoplesVote should be regarded as a criminal violating our democracy. 
We must never forget the appalling gerrymandering of the 2016 electoral franchise which excluded EU27 citizens from a vote which profoundly affected them, but included Commonwealth citizens. Had EU27 citizens been allowed to vote Remain would have won. #PeoplesVote#Brexit 
Look at this #Catalan lady going to vote on the Catalan referendum in 2017.#Spain claims the referendum was a violent act.Does this look like violence to you?Does anyone look violent in the video?Seems to be simply democracy.  
There are plenty of good, reality-based legal arguments about Holyrood's authority to hold a second independence referendum. Why get diverted by groundless fantasies, however confidently asserted? 
EU is understood to be riled by having to work with Geoffrey Cox – sent in by Theresa May to negotiate – who's deemed to be asking for the impossible 
Tories will refuse to recognise IndyRef2 regardless of SNP mandate. I favour challenging this anti-democratic move in courts. And I favour civil disobedience to exert Scottish sovereignty. We have right to hold referendum, point is to force Westminster to accept result.  
Marine Le Pen confronts EU for DESERTING citizens – making Brexit 'most painful possible'  
We don't know if it would be legal or illegal. We do know:- @ScotParl could pass a Referendum Act- UKGov can challenge in the courts- @ScotGov would prefer an unchallenged process like last timeScotland isn't Catalonia, UK isn't Spain. Politicians misinforming isn't helpful. 
Former prime minister Gordon Brown has called for a 12 month extension of Brexit. Speaking to ITV News' @DanielHewittITV he said public hearings should be set up and a second referendum is ‘not necessarily’ the answerRead more:  
JULIA Hartley-Brewer @JuliaHB1 hit back at Mayor of Bristol  @MarvinJRees for his "incredibly insulting" claims suggesting Brexit voters did not know what they were voting for at the 2016 European Referendum.  
Why is Parliament so scared of a no deal Brexit. The people are not. Since it is the people that will make it work I am supremely confident that all will be well. Wish I could say the same about Parliament. 
They’ll definitely be first up & then Con/Lab MPs will suffer massive casualties at the ballot box should they not deliver Brexit. A seismic shift in British politics would take place; hope @Conservatives & @UKLabour are listening. Brexit is more important to us than you are   
So here’s your Brexit Britain...anyone shot by the police/armed forces will be killed lawfully regardless of the circumstances and anyone not white skinned will be regarded as “coloured”....aaagh, let’s get out of here Scotland 
So JH tells Scotland that TM will say no to another Scottish independence referendum, siting ‘ no one wants another divisive referendum’. When is it acceptable we need another country’s permission to determine our own destiny. I for one want another referendum.  if you agree! 
Hi guys! Feel free to say 'hey' to your MP and tell them to vote down the Brexit deal. Just click the link below  
In Holyrood, #JacksonCarlaw says he doesn’t want another #Independence referendum.We already know this, as he voted against it in a Parliamentary vote.But Parliament voted for the referendum.Why can’t the Tories accept Parliamentary democracy?#Indyref2#DissolveTheUnion 
They told us thousands of years ago, we tried to continue to tell you, is anyone listening?#ItsNotTooLate #MAGA #Jesus #Brexit #YellowVestsUK #WWG1WGA #QAnon #ThursdayThoughts #PaintOurCountryRed #InternationalWomensDay #TWGRP @realDonaldTrump 
@DExEUgov is to set up panels of experts to consider the Irish border post-#Brexit. OK, Good.But 3 panels of trade/customs experts, business/TU reps, & MPs/peers won't cut it.@BorderIrish is not simply a technical, trade, or (Westminster) political concern(cf. @BelfastAgmt). 
“If Brexit is abandoned, many of them will forever feel disenfranchised. I sympathise, because that’s how we Remainers feel now.Yet I still think a second referendum is necessary. That’s because of the gulf between promised Brexit and real Brexit “  
Gordon Brown tells @bbcnews there needs to be a year's extension to Brexit to consult the public because 'Parliament has proved itself incapable of resolving this problem' - in coming days others like Martha Lane Fox and Justin King will make the same call 
A reminder for Tory politicians claiming a Scottish referendum would be 'illegal':- Powers reserved from @ScotParl are in Schedule 5 of the Scotland Act 1998- 'Referendums' are not listed as a reserved power- Without any judicial process, asserting 'illegality' is simply wrong 
British and EU Brexit teams at cross-purposes as clock ticks on.Postponing the 'meaningful vote' in December, January & February was utterly pointless, which just about sums up May's leadership.@Bremaininspain. 
There is not even a credible Brexit to put to the people. So... Parliament has no option but to revoke and remain within the EU. It is a simple case; and it is one which 'remainers' have thus far failed to make. 20/20 
The first step is simple. Next week, remainers should be making the case that the Government has failed. That if, at the end of the 2 years, neither the Government's deal nor no deal can command a majority in Parliament, there is no possible Brexit path forward. 19/20 
"Companies bidding for work with the British government are being asked to affirm that they support #Brexit as part of the tendering process" 
Hello Liverpool! We can't promise the sun, but we can promise to fight against Brexit! #binbrexit  
AAAGGHHGGAGHHHAGGGAHHHHH 22 days before leaves 986 days since the referendum708 days since Art 50 triggered454 days since Backstop agreed in principle...... govt tries to use ECHR (that May anyway HATES) to get rid of backstop 
AG Cox told MPs today that his proposals were "as clear as day." I don't think clarity is the issue here."'They have no clue,' said one official handling Brexit, who added that the UK’s ideas were becoming 'crazier and crazier'"  
#brexit happened because the British Media allowed people like Nigel Farage & Boris Johnson free range to lie openly about the EU.It is therefore absolutely maddeningly depressing to watch sections of the Irish media treat #irexit & their fact free bullshit the exact same way. pic.twitter.com/xrBMUwIaqG 
 Orwellian Spain. #ThisIsTheRealSpain #Makeamove "Spanish police official tells court that Catalan referendum voters showed highly violent behavior."    
In #Chislehurst we spoke to Jamie who voted for #Brexit but now wants to vote again with the information on the table. #righttovote #PeoplesVote 
If we stay in the EU, responsibility will be shared by Tory purist Brexiters and Labour MPs who said they'd respect the referendum 
A long delay to Brexit will cost Britain a fortune - and if MPs send the government begging for an extension then the EU gets to choose how long that extension would be.  
Just chaired the latest meeting of @scotgov Resilience meeting on plans for ‘no deal’ Brexit. These meetings look at things like supply of medicines and food, economic and community impact. It’s disgraceful that PM’s refusal to rule out a no deal exit makes this necessary. 
Send a little #FBPE love to these two inspiring young peopleLove what they are doing Spending an hour a day at Westminister@mrhmltn and @cd_loveless Well worth a follow30 day to stop brexit vigilYou don't have to do 30 days, just get down to the SODEM when you can  
They offered a pathetic bribe to areas in the North and Midlands in the hope of ‘buying’ Labour MPs votes for their botched Brexit deal. 
Breathtaking complacency of both Tory & Labour frontbenches about the threat to our public services from #Brexit. Brexit will cost NHS & other public services £40bn a year under the Government’s preferred deal! MPs can’t keep blithely ignoring the risks from #BrexitAusterity 
Tories claiming "SNP plotting an illegal referendum" in a matter of weeks... Would be helpful if they could tell us which law is about to be broken...... Lie after lie after lie. It's all they have in their armoury. 
Inward looking, angry and extremely paranoid. Britain has locked her door, closed the curtains and turned the lights off. #Brexit #FinalSay 
A reminder of one small part of the sinister transatlantic network that is manipulating #Brexit politics. #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
16) Any UK Govt would want to avoid permanent UK partition. Having signed the WA, the only way to do that is whole UK in full SM+CU via an assoc'n agreement. The super-soft Brexit Henry assures us we avoid by signing the WA.  
15) So Henry would have us break up the UK, for same non-tariff barriers as WTO Brexit, stuck as EU's captive customer in a customs union. For negligible industrial tariffs & agricultural tariffs/quotas rendered valueless by non-tariff barriers. 
Jeremy Corbyn - Botched Brexit is dragging communities down and driving division  
13) Yet German economists see “hard but smart WTO Brexit” (unilateral lowering tariffs) => minimal impact to UK economy. Why throw that away by locking ourselves into Customs Union ? 
3 years on from the brexit referendum and 22 days from it actually happening and we still do not know on what terms we are leaving  
Association of British Travel Agents: “UK citizens can be reassured that regardless of the Brexit outcome planes will still fly between the UK and the EU”  
After Brexit the UK will sit here next to the United States (alphabetical order)  
tomorrow on good morning brexit piers is gonna be asking the nation wot the problem is with calling the blacks “coloured”, they’re not white after all.  
linguistic update: European officials now describing UK's Brexit ideas as "crazier and crazier"  
Tell them to F off and I am English. No point in you going over the cliff just because half your English neighbours have gone bat shit crazy. If I was Scottish I would want a declaration of UDI on the 30th of March unless Brexit stopped. Scots have not been treated with respect.  
“...Vice President for Student Affairs Teri Hall acknowledged frankly that WSU isn’t necessarily required to abide by the will of the students.”“The state statute says that we must have a referendum. I don’t think it says it has to pass, Hall said.”  
Lol, you absolute dangers can't tell us what's happening after Brexit, which is happening in like three weeks.  
"My determination is to prevent a No Deal Brexit, reach an agreement, a serious agreement, which is why I wrote to the Prime Minister with my proposals, and took them to the European Union..They said there was a basis for negotiation."Jeremy Corbyn.  
We marched against the Iraq war and tuition fees - now we need to march FOR Brexit  
Let's see...what could she have done:1) Research effects of brexit before notifying A.502) Investigate clear illegalities involved in the vote3) Set-up cross-party group to ensure cohesion in HoC4) Aim for a deal with SM and CU as a compromise position, given narrow majority. 
Where do the Tories get off with this "illegal referendum" nonsense?an advisery referendum in Scotland would just as legal as the "advisery referendum" the Tories held for Brexit!  
Didn't Amber Rudd say that registering as a non-UK EU citizen - i.e. applying to continue living in your own home -  would be 'as easy as opening an account with LK Bennett'?  For some people that is now horribly true. #brexit #stopbrexit 
Good to join the @FrenchChamberGB today to speak about how whatever the outcome of Brexit - London will remain a welcoming destination for French business, investors, students and tourists. #LondonIsOpen  
Spot the hypocrisy... #Brexit  
Great work by @NickTorfaenMP - publication of AG’s advice on changes to Brexit backstop is a must. At the moment, its looking likely to be a short document!  
VicePdt of EP ConstitutionalCmtee, SilvaPereira, says a LONG extension of Art50 needed- 3 months not enough 4anything - if short extension,EP wld need extra session during election period to approve #brexit deal- probs if UK revokes during extension without having elected MEPs  
Nothing in the Withdrawal agreement or Settlement scheme papers on this exemption & could leave NI born Irish citizens among the only EU citizens within the UK that cannot applyThe continuation of the presumption that we're all automatically British is deeply worrying #Brexit 
Stuff that’s happened today: Amber Rudd calls Diane Abbott “coloured”. NI Secretary apologises for saying some Troubles deaths were “not crimes”. Labour could face a Human Rights probe over antisemitism. Nothing has changed on Brexit, and we’re 22 days away. 
Ben Bradshaw's words before the referendum don't match up to his actions after he lost it   
Jeremy Hunt flies in, tells Scots to get back in their box and the SNP to get on with the day job.But it's perfectly okay when the Tories holds a divisive EU referendum and makes a mess of it, damaging the economy and wasting £billions on pandering to Brexiteer fantasies.   
"36% of financial services firms, and 56% of banks and brokerage firms, have relocated staff and operations overseas as a result of Brexit."How Brexit has hit the value of UK firms  
Deliver which Brexit exactly?The Deal you said makes us a "slave state" and which Brexit voters hate, or the No Deal Brexit which would defy the wishes of the entire UK business community, meaning the Tories can never be called the "Party of Business" again? 
Unwilling to give a “guarantee” no-one will die as a result of a no deal Brexit, Health Secretary Matt Hancock refuses to say whether he would vote against a no-deal! This is a Government of incomprehensible madness!!! pic.twitter.com/eWgkoc1fan 
“There is nothing that a 2wk, 3wk, 3mnth, 9mnth extension is going to change about the numbers here. The only question is whether or not there’ll be a 2nd referendum. Leave would win again and then we start all over again” @JuliaHB1#PoliticsLive #StandUp4Brexit 
If the Conservatives fail to deliver Brexit our supporters will understandably be disgruntled. 
Also Amber was probably overtired from trying to block Brexit and greasing up to pro-Remain journos. It’s an exhausting schedule she is on! 
Head of the civil service or Santa, it's scare tactics, says Sammy Wilson over Brexit warning 
Primark has joined the long list of Brexit evacuees:  
MPs could end the #Brexit madness next week -- let's make sure they do! Add your name and RT:   
It's not illegal to hold a referendum! Sexual assault however - illegal! 
*really* hope this summoning circle works                           Second referendum    
"The time to be a bystander is over."Hauke Grün, a new Liberal Democrat member, shares how Brexit stirred him to action. 
The fact that Annie thinks it’s ok for The Scottish Government to have to ask another country for “permission” to hold a referendum, tells you everything you need to know about the mindset of cringing unionists.  
You know what that means, right?Statistically, your views and your vote are more likely to make a difference and be influential in the European Parliament, than in the UK parliament, and yet we voted for Brexit because we felt we weren't being heard.  
Flights between the UK and EU will not be grounded in the event of a no-deal Brexit after both sides finalised plans to keep planes in the air | @jrmaidment 
WHY are we letting the EU drive the agenda? WHY don’t we just tell them to take a hike and we will leave on March 29th, keep our £39bn and they can sod off? Answer? Because May has no passion for Brexit. It’s all so needless and so tragic for our Nation.  
The UK has gone much further than basic level of anti-discrimination legislation required by Brussels, it's wholly cynical and irresponsible of anti-democrats at @peoplesvote_uk to suggest this will be affected in any way by Brexit!Me for @BrexitCentral: 
“...calling Huq “a miserable, stinking, filthy EU whore” “Brexit has done this to us – with the help of social and other electronic media” 
I'm angry that an MP thinks it appropriate to stir up baseless fears amongst Britain’s LGBT community over Brexit, to push their own anti-democratic agenda. Our equality, non-discrimination and family rights were hard fought for over many years by parliamentarians here in the UK!  
Jeremy Corbyn's pro-Brexit bias is killing the Labour Party. A majority of members and supporters are #Remain. He's enabling a far right Tory #Brexit. He's against a #PeoplesVote to determine current public opinion. He cannot win a GE. The man's a liability. He needs to go! 
Mood in SW1 grim. Optimism that chance to move beyond Brexit was in sight has been sucked out and replaced with MPs looking miserable. Real danger zone for PM if it becomes self-fulfilling prophecy that the vote is lost. Movement happening but will stall if its MV2 a lost cause. 
28 out of 93 British billionaires - almost one in three - live in or are moving to tax havens. Yet people like James Dyson and James Ratcliffe funded Brexit and are shifting their investment and tax residence to tax havens. What was their game?  
Increasingly looking like the latest round of Brexit discussions in Brussels have achieved what few thought possible and made UK EU relations even worse  
Expect no US/UK Brexit trade deal: UK voters won't take US food nor sky-high US drug prices. Vertex pharma, Trump vanguard, trying to break NICE, NHS drug price setter, by denying cystic fibrosis children their drug. Tax avoiding profiteers 
EU court is another layer of defence when the most vulnerable in our society face discrimination. After #Brexit that extra defence layer will be gone. @joelbaccas explains 
The European Parliament will take 2 weeks to complete its consent procedure after the #Brexit deal has passed in Westminster @danutahuebner tells @EPInstitutional. 
We have shot ourselves in the foot by rejecting #EU #hospitality workers while in the same time totally ignoring the urgent needs of our professional education. Who will work and staff in our hotels, restaurants and bars? #brexit is totally devoid of reason, logic and virtue  
Government in chaos as as Brexit department boss to quit on EU departure date. @JoStevensLabour - the personnel moves at the top of the #Brexit department were "a reflection of the whole Brexit process – shambolic and doomed to fail.":  #PeoplesVote 
If Nicola sturgeon's SNP Scottish Government use taxpayer's money to hold an illegal referendum, Westminster should shut down Holyrood. 
EP negotiator @guyverhofstadt confirms no progress in #brexit talks. EU will not tear up #GFA. Would support extension to Art50 only for a purpose, not to kick can down road for no purpose. 
Great meeting with @margotwallstrom.  &  = strong partners. Also in EU & UN. Some of the topics of common interest: Rule of Law, EU budget, migration, Brexit, climate & Human Rights Sanction Regime. Our joint visit to @IntlCrimCourt underlines our strong support for the #ICC. 
FYI, anyone referring to a consultative referendum in Scotland as "illegal" is a fucking idiot.There is no legal or constitutional barrier to referendums in Scotland on any matter. A section 30 doesn't make a referendum "legal", it makes the result "legally binding". #FMQs 
Hi @JayneSeckerSky if like this morning another Brexit supporter can't think of anything about the EU that affects their life other than "We have to have straight Bananas" would you please ask them where & when they last saw a straight banana?  
There's a serious national conversation to be had about fixing our politics, helping our most vulnerable, caring about our elderly and our environment and clamping down on tax-dodging companies and billionaires. We can only begin it when we recognise the irrelevance of Brexit.  
New report by @Economy_NI shows NI service sector, especially Logistics & Transport will be hit hard in the event of a No Deal #BrexitThis would envitably lead to job losses and higher costs for wider economy#weneedadeal #standingupforlogistics 
FM @NicolaSturgeon: "Let me tell Jackson Carlaw what my obsession is right now. It's saving Scotland from the disaster of a Tory Brexit." #FMQs 
Our public meeting on the ’Impact of Brexit on Health’ with @Dr_PhilippaW will be held in Knightswood Secondary School, Glasgow on Fri March 22nd, 7pm. Our host for the evening will be the fabulous @MrJohnNicolson. 
UK’s  independent future is looking great  #LetsGoWTO #WTO #Brexit @WestmonsterUK @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @ConHome bring on 29 March 2019 at 11pm.  
BBC: "There have been calls...for the Scottish govt to hold an unofficial referendum similar to the one in Catalonia..." Sigh. No there have not. There have been calls for the Scottish govt to hold a consultative vote, which would differ from the Catalan one by not being illegal. 
The hypocrisy about the EU membership of #Turkey will soon be over. The EU parliament is very likely to suspend the accession talks in few weeks. ....another #Brexit hoax busted! @BorisJohnson 
Our Parliament votes on @theresa_may’s Brexit deal on Tuesday. It’s a *bad deal* for Britain, compared to what he have now! Click here to send your MP a REAL postcard and ask them to *vote down* this deal:  
A far reaching conversation with @LiamFox and the ambassadors of the US, Canada and Australia to the WTO about Brexit and the future of global trade.  
My granddad was on the original Jarrow march. I can't say what he would have thought of Brexit, but I'm pretty sure I know what he would have thought of Nigel Farage.  
If you gave infinite monkeys, infinite time and typewriter ribbon, they still couldn’t come up with @MarcusFysh. Yesterday, in the International Trade Committee hearing he asked Liam Fox: “Does it matter what tariffs are set at, post-Brexit?” *stares into infinite space* 
Seen much of your uncle, Ali Rees-Mogg, recently Jacob? 
If the Prime Minister's Brexit deal falls next week, Common Market 2.0 is the answer. We remain part of an alliance of democracies but end jurisdiction of the ECJ, leave CAP/CFP, and have stronger powers to restrict freedom of movement. Read more here   
Listeners labelled this epic James O'Brien Brexit monologue as one of his best ever.@mrjamesob | #Brexit  
Must read from @davidfrum: on the risks of Brexit to Ireland, Northern Ireland, and the Good Friday Agreement.  
That's the first week or #BrexitCatGIFs done.  7 GIFs of Cats describing #Brexit. Check the thread and RT your favourite so far  
You can be critical of Brexit without being anti-Britain.You can be critical of China's manipulation of its currency without being anti-China.But criticism of the treatment of Palestinians will mark you as anti-Israel. 
‘Hard But Smart’ Brexit Would ‘Not Put British in Worse Position than EU’, Admit German Economists  
Good I hope the EU do reject an extension to article 50, I hope we leave the EU without a deal at the end of the month.That's the only way we will get a real Brexit. The Brexit we voted for Germans DEFY Angela Merkel as they reject Brexit delay –  
I disagree with @HenryNewman regularly but his #thread here is vital reading for his own colleagues. From a EU perspective, we don’t exactly like the deal either but it is the best thing on offer; the only thing on offer. Some would like a no deal, I’d rather a no #Brexit obvs  
Brexit or Remain?It’s too close to call and as reported the EU27 are ‘waiting for a sustainable proposal’; and after nearly 1000 days it looks like it will go to the line with clear consensus unachievable.How would you vote in a new public vote?Please retweet and thank you. 
So I guess if we criticize Britain for brexit, we are anti-British?  Stupid. 
May has lost complete control of Brexit (either deliberately or otherwise...) Corbyn is meeting Tory 'remainers,' Brussels is refusing to budge on the backstop & Parliament will likely vote to rule out no deal. The people are being betrayed by the political establishment!  
 -  Despite the frustrations that #Brexit may cause – as our Ambassador in London Jean-Pierre Jouyet reminds us – “our friendship with the United Kingdom will remain unbroken no matter what.”@FranceintheUK 
Catalan president says "thank you for everything" to editor of Catalan newspaper after he testified they did not charge Catalan government for their referendum adverts.Same Catalan newspaper that received 1.9 million in public subsidies in the year running up to the referendum  
"The Govt's Brexit policy is in chaos. Collective responsibility has disintegrated. Junior ministers run amok. Some of them threaten to resign about 27 times, but never have the guts to actually go through with it... This is a farce". Well said, Mark Francois MP. Please RT  
At #FMQ today  failed business “entrepreneur” Jackson Carlaw now a Tory MSP refused to reject a no deal Brexit & spent all of his questions spouting the usual Tory Dirty Tricks & Lies about Indy, he showed his lack of confidence in our countries capability & capacity to succeed  
.@EstherMcVey1: Us ladies are going to be on the #MarchToLeave from Sunderland to London for a real Brexit.Yesterday female Brexiteers explained why they are marching to tell MPs they must not betray Brexit."Now is the time for us to leave!"Join:  
DUP won’t back Brexit without guarantees on backstop, says Sammy Wilson MP 
The Remainer elites have utterly twisted political language. ‘Crashing out’, ‘Hard Brexit’, ‘extreme Brexiteers’ — these terms are all designed to demonise Leave and the people who voted for it, says Mick Hume 
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 7: David Davis was #Brexit Secretary for TWO YEARS.  This cat perfectly summarises the active approach DD took to negotiations in that time... RT if you think this cat would've been more effective! pic.twitter.com/c7V2AcI0hX 
Light trolling in the form of putting certain Brexiteers' laughably inaccurate claims on giant billboards is one thing but the 'Breaking Point' poster was genuinely ugly propaganda and trying to resurrect it as an anti-Brexit joke isn't particularly funny 
COMMITTED: Four Korean banks staying in post-Brexit London. “We can’t ignore the fact that London has a long history in finance and is a major hub in Europe. That’s not going to go away as soon as the UK leaves the EU.”  
Summary:1. Our Labour Party can unite behind Our Final Say Referendum that challenges Tory Brexit.2. Admittedly, this plan won't be popular with Labour Leave voters.3. But hey, who cares?4. After all, Labour didn't get where it is today by being popular.5. That's all, folks!  
There's one main reason I've fought against Brexit from the beginning, and it isn't just because Brexit is a terrible idea. Freedom of Movement. It is worth its weight in gold, especially to those of us who take advantage of it. We all need to fight to retain our freedom. 
Former Australian Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull says the referendum was held without understanding the consequences of Brexit, and that a second referendum should have been planned.  
"..which is why I'm having discussions with one of the Tory architects of the Poll Tax to find a Brexit deal rather than backing a People's Vote. Don't question me. I don't like it."#wato 
The average MP's supine approach to Brexit is that of a condemned prisoner meekly laying their head on the block, before whispering: "Please make the stroke clean, and quick."It doesn't have to be this way. We have 22 days to pardon ourselves, and walk away scott free... 
Next week Britain is going to wake up to the news that whilst its children are being stabbed to death in the street, MPs are demanding another three months to continue squabbling over Brexit. We are heading for catastrophe. 
My determination is to prevent a No Deal or damaging Tory Brexit.  
Just to be clear. If the UK leaves the EU on 29 March with no deal, then the ONLY justification the government has for not revoking A50 and stopping this undoubted catastrophe is honouring the will of a small majority in an an advisory referendum that is undeniably fraudulant. 
Unless there are considerable benefits to Brexit that will convince the very pro-remain young demographic, it is likely to be reversed in years to come. So what are they? 
You want to do something about #Brexit? There are events happening across the country near you! Be involved!  
Ye can keep him, we don’t want him. He’s your Brexit Bonus prize. 
Sorry, Yvette. You're behaving like a child, constantly surprised by people's dishonesty. Where have you been for the last 2 years? Theresa May has broken every promise on Brexit she's ever made. Grow up and call a spade a spade. The time for middle-England politeness has passed. 
The Govt are trying to pressure Brexit MPs to back vassalage with the threat of what is essentially no Brexit - Customs Union with Labour backingExcept everyone outside the Hammond-Clarke-Rudd clique know that that’d be catastrophic for the partyERG know this. No10 know this.  
"Over the past three days, as I’ve had many conversations with Irish politicians and officials ... the word that recurred most often in discussions of Brexit was 'betrayal.'" @DavidFrum writes from Belfast: 
Former Italian prime minister calls Brexit the 'biggest mistake since World War II'  
Brexit department's most senior civil servant has announced he is to take "early retirement"...conveniently..."at the end of the month", on Brexit day.- Commenting @VirendraSharma said:"Our political system is broken. And that’s why we need to put Brexit back to the people." 
When will MPs learn? You cannot trust Theresa May. Every promise she's made on Brexit has been broken. Every. Single. One.  
How will a No-Deal Brexit impact on organisations supporting the most vulnerable in our society and already pushed to the limit? Read more here and our joint letter to the PM thanks to ⁦@UKSustain⁩ ⁦@Kath_Dalmeny⁩ 
French port workers and customs officials are today enforcing regulations that will become necessary if the UK leaves the EU! Lorries are currently backed up for several miles!Scotland needs a ferry link regardless of Brexit!   #BrexitStrike @RHANews @forthports 
Feeling outraged, today. Used to be able to hold up my head, and be proud of my country. Corbyn and May have engineered it that I’m now from some creepy little self-destructive, racist, duplicitous, backward island.I am ashamed to be British.#Brexit 
But it’s not three quarters of Leave is it? What’s on offer is thee quarters remain, with the final quarter entirely in the hands of the EU; we remain in the customs union indefinitely but with no say over the rules. Sorry but May’s deal is worse than status quo, it’s not #brexit  
Sounds very familiar like when the remainers won't accept the referendum result.The left don't seem to like it when a decision is made that doesn't fit their narrative....#StopHarassingTommyRobinson 
Reading the Brexit fine print for Ireland  
"#Brexit is a nightmare for women who have precarious jobs, who work much more predominantly in part time jobs. There’s a whole regulatory framework that protects women’s economic independence" says @SWACEO @scotwomensaid #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
Anyone needing cheered up today?If so, read on........................................................................................Unionists are currently in meltdown at the idea of an upcoming independence referendum because they know Scotland will vote YES! 
What I love most about Brexit is how it’s making all our every day lives that little bit easier….*SCRAPES NEEDLE ACROSS THE RECORD*  
Scotland 'can hold referendum without go-ahead from UK'  
 WATCH | @JuliaHB1: "If we end up in a situation where the Remain-dominated Parliament votes to stop Brexit from happening they will live with the consequences at the ballot box. They'll have to tell their voters that 'we don't  think you got it right.' Good luck with that!"   
Primark has announced that it is moving its UK-based product operations in Reading to Dublin from September, affecting 220 jobs. But of course, this has nothing to do with Brexit whatsoever. 
Brexit: Cox ensuring 'codpiece in full working order'Absurd schoolboy humour as country teeters on the brinkPlease never, ever vote for these irresponsible Tory buffoons  
The irony. Makes a point about an apparently "illegal" referendum by using stolen footage  
Anti-Brexit campaigners parody LeaveEU's controversial Breaking Point poster: "The UK is being swamped by a tide of incompetents." 
I was on @SkyNews this morning... I think I made a few good points.(thread, I start calling out the Brexit BS in part 2)What @mrjamesob & @Femi_Sorry do is hard work. 
Phil Newbold is calling for a #PeoplesVote because he has lost 2/3 of his taxi business already from this #Brexit chaos. He has joined more than 100 businesses across Hampshire in demanding a #PeoplesVote: 
The European Parliament has decided to retain an office in Scotland after Brexit.  
Soft Brexit is a dream outcome for the EU. We pay the same money, but stop sending Nigel Farage to Brussels.  
Brexit is built on a tissue of lies. Labour’s Brexit policy is built on another tissue of lies. And the result is that nothing can be trusted, nothing can be found that works. And still we don’t admit it. Still the politicians bluster and the media blathers. 
Geoffrey Cox is basically Brexit in human form. Bloviating, grandiloquent, full of self importance. And without a single idea of what his aims actually are, much less how to achieve them. British media’s seeming fondness for Cox says a lot  
They should leave Len and Unite behind and join @GMB_union en bloc.  Brexitty Len has sold his members down the line.He doesn’t even want them to have a choice whether to remain or Brexit. 
Absolutely superb. Top class work. #Brexit  
So. Let's get this straight @jeremycorbyn @UKLabour Working with 'moderates' in your own party is a cardinal sin because they're warmongering, neoliberal Tory scum.But working with 'actual' Tories to deliver job losses & impoverishment through #Brexit is OK.#RevokeA50 
Landmark article. *All* MPs should read this.#quote "a WA+PD have been proposed that is NOT Brexit.It is Remain with a Brexit wrapper, converting our membership to that of a colony that can be asset-stripped with impunity by the EU without repercussions" 
Julia Hartley Brewer on BBC Politics Live: Most people are saying "we just want it over and done with". TM's deal doesn't do that. Negotiations will go on for years. A no deal #Brexit will be a disaster. If people want it over and done with, the only option is to #RevokeArticle50 
It's a complete myth that a no-deal Brexit would cripple the British economy 
EU: So you want to stay in the Single Market?Soft Brexiter: YesEU: And the Customs Union?Soft Brexiter: MhmmEU: And continue paying into the budgetSoft Brexiter: SureEU: But you don’t want MEPs?Soft Brexiter: No, we must honour Brexit EU: Sign right here#peoplesvote 
Is this all the #Brexit charlatans have. Shut down democracy cos of threat of riot?#RevokeA50 Revoke them #StopBrexit & #Remain in Control in the EU + our Best Poss Deal & prosecute those who riot & those responsible for Gross Negligence in the handling of this #BreitShambles. 
Well if no link to Police Cuts Prime Minister - what is it?! Perhaps the decimation of youth services and support for vulnerable children as a result of Council cuts, and a rise in organised crime which Brexit won't help?! Probably all of the above..  
What goddamn planet is she on?Failed on policeFailed on BrexitFailed as PMFailing the UKWorst Tory leader in historyWAKE UP Conservative MPs - May is destroying all political capital. She is flushing voter trust down the toilet. Time is running out  
Listen to Digby Jones squirm as he tries to explain that jobs have been lost not because of Brexit but because of the uncertainty around Brexit and that none of this is his fault.  F^cking idiot.  Why would anyone want this man on their board?  
I'm actually not bothered by her opposition to another referendum. It's the cheap divisiveness of that tweet that bothers me. 
Let’s Brexit with full steam ahead, fellow Britons! We are going to win as EU is fighting a desperate rearguard battle.   
Remember that time that the UK unilaterally decided to destroy itself? No me neither. Not until #Brexit came along... 
Tory MPs voting for tax transparency Laura ? Turkeys and Christmas come to mind - you know full well that one if not in fact the  major reason for "brexit" is to hide dirty money ... 
If lies prevail democracy dies. The politicians, press barons, journalists and social media orchestrators pushing out the torrent of #LeaveLies are at war with our democracy. They are enemies of democracy. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
I find the generalisation that it’s all PV campaigners the worst bit of the tweet. I have seen crap on “our side” too and I always call it out when I do. But there is a big failure by many to acknowledge the hate etc that Brexit has unleashed. 
Crass beyond belief. Farage, Mogg, Cash, Redwood, Johnson, Bone, Hartley-Brewer, Oakeshott, Dorries, McVey, De Lucy, Fox and the funders of Brexit like Banks, Hosking, Bamford & van Nievelt Price - such solid working class folk 
The bridge to Brexit starts at Trump Tower. 
Ask Louise Mensch about this. Heat Street was playing the same Pro Brexit Trump memes during this time @nadinevdVelde 
40 reasons NOT to back the Brexit deal • Britain's Future  
And here we have it, the real reason behind the billionaires backing #brexit . This was announced to be in the pipeline about a year before the EUref. This register will be expose every single 1of them hiding their cash in 'unnamed' numbered accounts in the tax haven territories  
Just switched on half way through @itv show "Exposure".  They seem to have a scoop on a  creepy weirdo called Thomas Borwick and his Kanto Systems company which seems to be funing Dark Brexit ad campaigns 
Theresa May knew when she became PM that the #Brexit referendum might have been corrupted.Over time, that was confirmed by the Electoral Commission, the ICO and Parliament. Recently her lawyer said in court that she knows.Yet she has never said or done anything about it. 
Don’t miss this #Manchester #TheDanceHouse Oxford Rd #TheOutsiders @ken4london and me Tickets:  #TomWatson #Corbyn #Brexit #Labour #Venezuela 
ITV investigation reveals extent of online abuse and death threats aimed at MPs in 'Exposure: Brexit Online Uncovered'  
...and the £1.6bn Brexit bribe is far less than the equivalent €13bn fund for the UK. We’re better off if we #StopBrexit and #Remain in the EU. 
With 25 days left, HMRC has no clue how trade will work in NI after Brexit, because nothing's been decided yet, so they can't tell businesses anything.  
- Adds to the costs (Brexit prep, plus ongoing EU contributions in parallel)- May further fan the rise of the far rightOverall, I think the prize of avoiding no-deal pips it, but it's neither straightforward nor clear cut. 
FG running Mark Durkan in Dublin quite a good move. Some of the current FG support in polls is to do with the Government position on Brexit and being seen to stand up for the whole island North and South. 
To put this '£1.6B over 6 years bung' thing into perspective- #Brexit is *costing* us that amount every 3 weeks.#Frauderendum16#RevokeArticle50 
Macron talking rubbish again, I see. He's no different to Blair. Anyone believing his nonsense is gullible. EU reform is a fantasy. #Brexit 
Brexiteers and eurocrats accuse Theresa May of trying to bounce them into a last minute new Brexit deal. ERG demand 48 hours before Commons debate starts to scrutinise Cox backstop. 
Now all of a sudden it’s all hands on deck, #KnifeCrime. I sometimes wonder if #TheresaMay had her own Children if she’d have cared more about the future of UK CHILDREN. #Brexit #ChildPoverty 
Parliament voted to invoke article 50 based on an advisory referendum that turned out to be tainted by fraud, lies, and foreign interference. Parliament has the power and duty to now revoke art 50 based on that knowledge. 
Macron is dead in the water....his elitist arrogance just won't let him see he has lost the support of the French people for his globalist ideology! Europe is crumbling....UK wont need #Brexit! 
Isn’t it ironic that if the ERG vote against May’s deal then we’ll end up with a softer Brexit or even a second referendum lol 
Danish Prime Minister described Brexit, at a party conference on Saturday, as a political "circus" playing out in a "melting down" system.   
Up next - should there be a referendum vote on whether to switch @SurreyRCMP with a municipal force?  Surrey councillor @LindaAnnisBC says yes & she joins me next on @CKNW @SBofT 
MP claims Leave voters knew what they were voting for, but can't actually tell us what they voted for because we still don't know what Brexit is going to look like.  
If it's a bribe, it's a bad one. Like saying I'll give you a tenner if you stop moaning about your house burning down.£1.6bn 'bribe' for poorer towns as May seeks Labour's backing for Brexit deal 
@Anna_Soubry Just watching "Exposure: Brexit Online Uncovered" on ITV 22;45 tonight. Jaw dropping revelations on Russian interference in the EU referendum. Why is the Uk not investigating? Appalled by the abuse you have received for standing up for your principles #PeoplesVote 
I will transform from a ‘remoaner’ to a rejoiner if the Brexiteers get their wish - I will fight the evil that’s brexit to my last breath if I have to - because I know we’re on the right side.  
This is one of the main reasons the #Brexit criminals want May & accomplices to drag the UK over the line on the 29th March.And for the same reason, this is why we need an extension to #Article50, or even better, #RevokeArticle50 to give time to a full public enquiry. 
WATCH | @EmmanuelMacron had a pop at Brexit today, calling on Europeans to reject the nation state and rejoice in "European solidarity" starting with a "common border force" and "common asylum policy".Perhaps he should look to his own people first before lecturing Britain...   
10/ So, Brexiteers. The next time one of you DARES to suggest that my life will be no worse after #Brexit than it is now, just think again. I haven't even started on the "know where non-EU students are at all times" sinisterness that @theresa_may introduced as Home Secretary. 
Anyone who has paid attention to your amazing work has seen Brexit for the crime scene that it is.  Hats off to you  Shame the PM is too corrupt to halt everyting until we get to the bottom of what happened. 
ITV 'exposure, #Brexit on line uncovered ' on now exposes Leave campaign fraud, Russian troll farms and sources of death threats to remain MPs during and since 2016 referendom. Still Teresa May refuses to acknowledge or investigate. Sounds like complicit and tacit support crimes. 
PM arguing no link between rise in knife crime and police cuts infuriating- of COURSE having officers makes a difference not just to detection but prevention work too. Stop wasting money on no deal brexit and start putting it back into public services!  
French President Emmanuel Macron urges Europeans to 'take back control' and avoid Brexit 'trap'  
I've only just looked at this list. It is gobsmacking how many people on it have direct ties to Brexit and/or Britain.  
Brexit is 600 hours away. #brexit 
Watch ITV Exposure on "Brexit online exposed" on now.  As #jocox would have said we have more in common than divides us, so who is exploiting the divisions and why? 
Everyone : Brexit will be the most controversial thing of 2019.                             WRU : *hold my beer* let’s merge the Scarlets and the Ospreys.. 
So, it turns out that Nigel Farage’s ‘March to Leave’ from Sunderland to London is about as deceiving as Brexit itself- it won’t cover the full distance and the marchers will be getting bussed from one part to another. My cartoon of this bullshit event... pic.twitter.com/DP4P0CGB6X 
Pure Brexit. Brexiter MPs voting to lose €13bn in order to gain £1.6bn.It makes no sense. It is nothing like what was promised. It should be stopped. #StopBrexit. 
A combination of David Cameron's stupidity and Theresa May's xenophobic incompetence have conspired to make #Brexit the greatest threat to our country since WW2. But, there is still time  to put an end to this debacle. All that's needed is the will. #RevokeArticle50 now! 
They won the referendum by promising to protect an NHS that they instinctively despise.(Billboard location: Kingsway, Manchester)  
In June 2016, @CarolineFlintMP said it was difficult for her constituents and many others "to see the wood for the trees" on Brexit, and that she feared "ordinary families may pay the price" for leaving the EU.  
All the momentum has gone out of Brexit. It's weird. It may well still happen but nobody sounds convinced any more. Even the hard core have lost the wind in their sails 
Good point from @DavidMcLA on CBC just now: If @theresa_may can survive all the Brexit revolutions within her own caucus, probably likely @JustinTrudeau can survive this. 
Brexiteers and eurocrats accuse Theresa May of trying to bounce them into a last minute new Brexit deal. ERG demand 48 hours before Commons debate starts to scrutinise Cox backstop. 
A vast array of infrastructural, educational, developmental and other hugely beneficial projects in the Highlands & Islands would not exist but for EU funding which Brexit will cut off and which Britain's Conservative government will not, and cannot, replace  
What!!? When did Brexit become a class thing  
Britain should be contributing to this kind of positive vision as a key player. Instead, we're retreating to a future as a marginalised & impoverished country that will accept any crumbs or chlorinated chicken bones thrown to us by Trump's America.#Brexit 
What a silly woman she is for goodness sake Walk away.....Brexit news: EU to REJECT eleventh-hour changes to May's Brexit assurances | UK | News |  
“Theresa May has been warned she must whip her MPs to keep a no-deal Brexit on the table in a vote next week as Geoffrey Cox travels to Brussels for make-or-break talks with EU negotiators.”#StandUp4Brexit 
1/ I feel like today is the day that May’s deal died. A very public failure in bribing Labour MPs, an admission by the pompous bloater Cox that a backstop has to be a backstop, & outrage over a pulled vote on tax avoidance even in her own party. Not all Brexit stuff of course... 
Totally irresponsible of Trevelyan to talk of rioting in her constituency in event of people’s vote. I’d put money on fact that most people in Berwick upon Tweed would never do this. She is using the fear of insurrection to frighten people into backing Brexit. Unforgivable. 
Business leaders from around the world are watching and waiting to see what happens with #Brexit. But, rest assured, if it goes ahead there will be a mass exodus of international companies from the UK, because they no longer see the UK as a way of accessing the EU market. 
It seems deeply cynical & concerning that government can find £1.6 billion for their Stronger Towns Fund before the PM’s vote on her Brexit deal next week, sincerely hope that this money, which is a drop in the ocean for what is needed, isn’t conditional!  
Tom is absolutely right here.The bribe was meant to entice Labour MPs to back the deal... but the “help Brexit and you shall indeed have some crumbs” strategy is exactly the patronising attitude that will cause a psychological backlash against the whole thing.What a reveal...  
Theresa May 'did not understand EU when she triggered #Brexit'  
The UK is in #Brexit chaos yet I cannot remember when the last Scottish independence poll was published. Perhaps this explains why?  
.@TiceRichard @JLongworthLML @andreajenkyns @PeterBoneUK: Tory MPs must vote down any deal that fails to deliver a proper Brexit or the people will never forgive usJoin us on our #march2leave 
Trade agreements in force, signed, provisional or finalised:EUUK#Brexit 
Dear Monsieur le Président, Brexit is not a threat to freedom, its about choice and accountability. It is about working with friends and allies via cooperation, rather than Federalism. It's about giving people a voice on globalisation and responding to them. You're welcome. 
Message to May/Tory’s... If you believe you are doing a such a good job with Brexit, Knife Crime, NHS, Public Service’s, Record Child Poverty, Homelessness, Food banks & on & on & on.... Let’s have a General Election and let the people decide!  
ITV news does a piece on online abuse in relation to Brexit. Interviews with 3 Tories (oncluding Soubry, who always will be). NO MENTION OF CORBYN BEING PHYSICALLY ATTACKED YESTERDAY!! 
'Not go down well' Brexiteer MP warns voters will 'RIOT IN STREETS' over second referendum  
If, like me, you voted no to independence in 2014 to protect our place in the EU... and now feel a bit cheated, give this a wee watch. Many thanks to @PhantomPower14 for speaking with me! p.s the bags under my eyes are because of Brexit x  
As usual it looks like this crooked government is once again trying to subvert democracy by hiding vital information from MPs and the public.#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
The people didn't understand John. It was fiendishly complicated. And it's despicable that MPs such as yourself should propagate the myth that people clasped the ramifications of that referendum and the unending catastrophe that would be visited on them and the country.  
It's an excuse, a get out for politicians to blame everyone but themselves. We have no money for youth clubs, training centres and intervention strategies but billions of pounds to blow on Brexit bribes. Look behind the right wing media and find out what is really happening 
MPs Must Reject May's Very Bad Withdrawal AgreementIt ties UK closely to EU rules2-4yr Transition UK will remain fully within EU rules & under EU CourtsNo Trade dealsLimits on agri subsidiesPay #EU £10bn/year + £19bn!No control over migration#Brexit 
When I look at the brainless people promoting no deal Brexit I wonder why I have to respect their views.I need a responsible Parliament to protect them from ignorance.However, when I look at Parliament I see our society reflected back.Are we really this bad?#RevokeA50 
Memo to MPs: It would be a betrayal of the Referendum result to vote through a deal which is not Brexit at all, and which leaves us shackled indefinitely to Brussels. 
This attempt to label as nationalists, everyone who is not a DUP lackey, does nothing for unionism. Don't you guys realise the enormous damage that Brexit is doing to the UK, as well as to unionism?  
Special Brexit screenings of The Thick of It happening in Glasgow  
From @HenryNewman of @OpenEurope: Get real, Eurosceptics. Your choice is May’s Deal – or no Brexit at all.  
Sky News has manufactured a "Brexit crisis" to keep hold of a rapidly evaporating audience. Why else would they come up with such scaremongering nonsense?  
Can we make Chris Grayling Brexit secretary?I quite fancy joining the euro 
Dear President Macron. Brexit is none of your business. It is a matter for the British people, who voted in their millions to leave the EU. Please respect the vote, and remember why hundreds of thousands of your own citizens have fled France for the UK.  
Sudden eruption of sabre rattling by Tories means Whitehall expects Nicola Sturgeon to call for a Section 30 sooner rather than later because any kind of Brexit, hard or soft, on 29 March or later, opens up a whole new set of positive options 4 Scotland.  
Cmon Billy Boulton @adamboultonSKY you know you desperately want to scream  Hello my name is Adam and I’m a Remainer and all brexit supporters are far right....#ReamonersAnon you’ll feel a lot better, come out the closet Adam....@KayBurley will hold your hand. @SkyNewsHead 
This Brexit fiasco is going to end up meaning £44 Billion lower public spending every year @theresa_may So this bung, spread over 7 years, is 0.5% of what we could have afforded from inside the EU.A pathetic insult to areas that desperately need investment.#PeoplesVote 
Japan's ambassador warns more firms could leave UK over Brexit: He tells Sky News his country is "perplexed" by the UK's departure from the EU.| Business News | Sky News  
So many official @theSNP folk hotly debating everything *except* independence. Self-appointed party commissars telling us to block fellow yessers they don’t like. Focus well and truly lost. Meanwhile, Brexit. 
The ⁦@EmmanuelMacron⁩ open letter to Europe worth reading in full. Suggests he has thought more deeply about Brexit than some British leaders.  European renewal | Élysée  
Theresa May warned she must whip MPs to stop them taking no-deal Brexit off the table 
Perhaps Tory MP Anne-Marie Trevelyan is ever so slightly out of touch with reality........ 
NEW VIDEO THIS WEEK - 'Brexit: What is Democracy?'   
So the ECONOMIC CASE for the UK ...Labour want to damage UK economy by 4% with their #BrexitTories arguing amongst themselves whether they will do 6% or 8% DAMAGE to the UK economy!! That is new background to #indyref2 
Leave trying to deselect one of the few men in the Brexit debate who has shown any honour.  
To MP's enabling Brexit knowing that the result of the non binding referendum was won by criminal acts, this is a matter of public recordThis is Misconduct in Public OfficeIt's a criminal offenceCarries jail time, max sentence of life imprisonment 
The vote for Brexit wasn’t about narrow self-interest - it was based on principle, on a commitment to weakening the stranglehold of foreign technocrats over UK law-making:  
Professional jobs ofc + all the club rep jobs in Ibiza in summer, the jobs at ski resorts in Europe, working holidays, internships at bakeries in France, musicians playing at pubs across Europe - they’re all set to face visa restrictions and become uneconomical to pursue #Brexit 
Where does the money the EU gives *back* to the UK come from?Oh wait... It's the hardworking UK taxpayers  If only theres was some way we could take back control of our laws, borders and all our  Brexit Now  
Do you support a second referendum? 
Ivan Rogers says Theresa May 'did not understand EU when she triggered Brexit I’ve always suspected this arose because her interactions were under 3rd pillar & thought same arrangements applied to all EU   
The EU turned this Country into a service economy. The EU was instrumental in destroying our manufacturing economy. After Brexit we can reverse this People want skilled manufacturing jobs, not low wage service jobs.Another big reason I voted leave. 
Well worth re-reading. The top 40 horrors lurking in the small print of Theresa May’s Brexit deal via ⁦@SpecCoffeeHouse⁩ 
To any Brexiter who proposes a WTO #Brexit I would suggest - "You buy a new top of the range BMW. I'll buy a perfectly good basic bicycle. Then we can swap them. For you that will be like giving up the EU in exchange for WTO, so you should be pleased with the deal."#PeoplesVote 
Government faces legal challenge over no-deal Brexit medicine shortages plan. 
Time to get your wellies on!If you've had enough of the Brexit betrayal then join the #MarchToLeave with @Nigel_Farage.Sign up here:  
It’s been another tough few days for Chris Grayling who was a no-show today for a question about the Brexit ferries.  
Brexit and Labour antisemitism are similar challenges. In both instances you have leaders who don’t believe in their fight. Brexit would stand more chance if led by a Brexiter. Likewise anti-racism if not led by an antisemite. 
Imagining headlines from 2021:  'Brussels forces UK to scrap British summer time' Lots of ifs here, but does not seem a stretch to imagine that Brexit transition politics could be toxic.  
More lies about Brexit ferry disaster: "Informed sources say the out-of-court settlement made on Friday involves a straight payout to the Channel tunnel train operator despite suggestions by the government to the contrary after an urgent Commons question."  
Where @MatthewOToole2 explains how Brexit (by taking NI out of EU) has ripped away the comfort blanket that EU membership provided to moderate nationalists who now fear re-partition from and English brexit. Fascinating read.  
Theresa May 'did not understand EU when she triggered Brexit'Too focussed on keeping foreigners out  
When they refer to a "growing political crisis" in Brexit-addled Blighty they know of what they speak.  
If you agree with @JimMooreJourno below. Please support our Remainer Now crowdfunder here -  #remainernow #Labour #Parliament #Brexit  
Shame you screwed up from start to finish by backing Brexit that was going to cost jobs...as night follows day.. yes.  Your Labour Brexit too.What a waste of an opposition you are. 
Things our politicians will protect us from:The result of a democratic referendum No Deal Brexit Tommy RobinsonEgg throwers Grooming gangsTerroristsRubber dinghy invading asylum seekers Knife crime epidemic  
A 2016 referendum would certainly be well past is 'Use By' date, surely. 
So that’s £0.87 per person per year.We’ve lost sevenhundredandfortyninemillionpounds to the local council budget in #Plymouth alone since #Tory gov. That’s £749,000,000.00 not to mention the cut to #EU funds coming.#Brexit is a continuation of #austerity 
What I don't understand is... There are people who argued for Brexit saying we need to restrict free movement and control our borders more, who also argue that Brexit won't affect British travel and work abroad, and they don't spontaneously burst into flames!HOW!? 
"Gran, 71, who moved to UK in 1960 from Italy must prove 'right to stay' over Brexit"via @birminghammaiI 
Watch Labour's Andy McDonald criticise ‘international embarrassment’ Chris Grayling for failing to appear before MPs to answer questions about a £33 million Brexit-related payment  
Got to meet @bbcnickrobinson on Eurostar today. He was returning from Brexit business in Brussels and I’m returning to London for #ExtinctionRebellion business! #ReclaimTheBBC He was very nice! 
Democracy does not compel you to abandon your beliefs or get behind policy you despise. If Brexit is stopped, I won't expect or require any members of the ERG to convert to remain. Go to jail, maybe, but change politics while there - no. 
Thanks to @BBCnews & @BBCAmos for recognising this major challenge for UK space. Note it can largely be averted by a soft Brexit (staying in single market & customs union), although the best option for UK space is to remain in the EU. It’s all in the hands of @UKparliament 
What a silly 'Mann-splaining' comment. Of course Remainers knew what  they were voting fo. - it already exists, unlike the detail/ costings/ assessments of any Brexit plan that STILL haven't been agreed...!@VesperUK @JohnMannMP @atatimelikethis @Kean1S @EuropeanPenguin @jcm247 
This, by @sjwrenlewis, is quite brilliant, in my opinion > Why the UK cannot see that Brexit is utterly, utterly stupid  
NEWS! Government’s £1.6bn post-Brexit bribe delights morons who don’t realise the EU spends £4bn a year in UK  
The only thing worse than the 'Stronger Towns' bung offered today?The fact that a small number of #Labour MPs who represent towns are considering backing #Brexit.Brexit in any form is bad for our towns, our cities and our country.We need every Labour MP to back a #PeoplesVote 
In an op-ed for European newspapers, Emmanuel Macron predicts Britain will 'find its place' in a new EU that 'advances at different speeds'. He calls Brexit a 'symbol of the crisis of Europe' and says the current impasses in talks 'is a lesson for us all'.  
Of £92m given to ScoGov for Brexit Preparedness, £10m has been spent on other things. Not a penny to councils.If this new UK Gov towns fund is barnettised, it will evaporate on SNP pet projects. East Ren was hit w/ a real terms cut in budget, let them bid directly for this cash 
REMAIN ruled out Norway in 2016. They also ruled out a second referendum and warned us of the consequences of voting LEAVE.We voted LEAVE.Perhaps it's time for REMOAN to respect the referendum result so we can just get on with leaving.  
"I'm convinced there's no one in Westminster who understands the integration along the border"Talking to people who will be amongst the most affected by Brexit, Bordering on Brexit at 9:35pm  
Hey, @annietrev , how about you actually visit Berwick and ask what we want rather than assume from your Dark Throne in Morpeth. I’d gladly welcome a 2nd referendum now that all the leave lies are out in the open. #annietrevout 
Here's Macron's piece Dear Europe, Brexit is a lesson for all of us: it’s time for renewal 
Philip Hammond could increase spending if no-deal Brexit is avoidedThe Slimy Chancellor should be Planning for a Spend of £39Bn when we Leave No Deal!  
Feelin' blue 'bout Brexit? This might soften the blow (Okay it won't but you will get a laugh)  
ANY Brexit fails businesses! wake up jeremy!! there is NO good Brexit! it's a Tory brainchild and Labour should never have had anything to do with it. OPPOSE Brexit in all its forms, or we'll never see another Labour government, and that will be squarely on you. 
10. Instead of having a frank public debate about these issues and instead of actually doing something, we set about demonising anyone with inconvenient opinions as far right - and sooner or later, especially if Brexit is not delivered, these people will start to win votes. 
BBC at it again, adopting DUP v SF narrative on Brexit. I just find it lazy. But sure I understand it's easier to adopt a unionist v nationalist agenda. But the truth, if they're interested, is that opposition to Brexit is cross-community and they'd do well to portray it as such. 
Summary of UK politics, 2016-2019."Wow, 51.9%. We have won!""Great, let's leave the EU.""How should we do this?""Easy, just trigger Article 50.""Done.""Thanks."[Pause]"And now what?"#Brexit 
Even more anti-Brexit events have been added to our list   
.@afneil  "Nothing to do with Brexit???"Japan's ambassador warns more firms could leave UK over Brexit  
If Richard Leonard opposes an independence referendum as there's no appetite for it, presumably he'd support one if there *was* an appetite for it, for example if voters voted into government parties proposing to hold one? If not, what does he mean by "appetite", "no" and "is"? 
So @MattHancock stood in for #FailingGrayling & assumed the rest of us are as stupid as the U.K. Govt. But we know that £33 million is gone forever to settle litigation brought about by their incompetence #ferrygate #Eurotunnel #Brexit pic.twitter.com/ICGvYe7VZM 
Second referendum WARNING: Brexiteers opposed 'because Leave could LOSE' claims expert  
Delighted to welcome ⁦@markdurkan⁩ into ⁦@FineGael⁩ to run for European Election in Dublin with ⁦@FitzgeraldFrncs⁩. Marks political experience North+South and in Westminster can be a huge asset to ongoing #Brexit negotiations. Look forward to working with him!  
The hugely respected Trevor Kavanagh says it as it is !Flawed Brexit, then dignifed Therexit — price of 'success' is PM departure  
“Boris Johnson could appear in court after a crowdfunded legal case filed an application for a summons against him for misconduct in a public office.”The ongoing work of @MarcusJBall et al. #Brexit #Brexitvote 
Affordable housing.Aging population.Austerity.Climate change.Education.Homelessness.Knife crime.Mental health services.NHS.Overseas aid.Public transport.Renewable energy.Roads & infrastructure.Science & technology.Unemployment.No. Brexit.Always fucking Brexit. 
EU must learn from Brexit and reform, says Emmanuel Macron  
Chris Grayling under fire from MPs for Brexit ferry absence  
OMG - Some proper Brexit journalism by a Brit (on U.S. tv) > Pro-Brexit politicians promised "the EU would let Britain leave with all the benefits of membership with no consequences."  
Emmanuel Macron: Dear Europe, Brexit is a lesson for all of us: it’s time for renewal  
Thousands of EU nationals living in Scotland have to apply for settled status after #BrexitWith 25 days to go, Tove Macdonald discusses her hopes and fears about having to register in the country she calls home.More here:  
PERSON #70: TED MALLOCH. This London-based Trump adviser is connected to ROGER STONE and "Brexit" guru (and Trump booster) Nigel Farage, and has been suspected of being a WikiLeaks intermediary for Team Trump. He was stopped, searched, and interrogated by Mueller's team in 2018.  
The government's Brexit policy is failing businesses so badly that workers are petitioning their employers to stay in the UK. Honda's decision to close its factory in Swindon is a huge blow to thousands of workers and the whole community. #SaveHondaSwindon 
Remaining in the EU would deliver €13bn of targeted investment for development. That’s a smidge more than £1.6bn.Brexit is a disaster for the UK.Poverty is calling.Insignificance beckons.Irrelevance awaits.Congratulations. 
The public see through you and your bare faced lies. This will not buy votes. You lied when you promised to deliver the Brexit we voted for. Either get it done, or get the hell out of Downing Street  
The #EU is an abusive partner in a relationship with the #UK. #Brexit #cpac2019  
As poll after poll shows more and more support for a #FinalSayForAllLet's help make one happenIt's simple really we need to shout as loud as we canHere is one waySIGN this petition "Hold a second referendum on EU membership"Now over 77,500SIGN  
The Brexit vote is being betrayed. Join us on March 29th in Parliament Square to tell the Westminster elite we will not sit by whilst they try and stop Brexit.Sign up now:  
This whole section is just an ode to the benefits of the Single Market, as well as a warning of how terrible for trade a 'no deal' Brexit would be. The free movement of goods is a huge benefit to our economy, anything less is detrimental and the government knows this.  
Brexit is nothing if not a series of acronyms and titles for varying different political tribes - meet today, the ‘Cash council’ - in other words eurosceptics who are also lawyers who will pore over whatever Cox gets from Brussels 
Brexit Explained  
Companies in Europe have put contingency plans in place for a no-deal #Brexit starting 29 March. Now they don't want a delay of a few months as it will cost them more. Why would they?  
The governments report on the implications of a no deal Brexit also basically says that its own policy of leaving the Single Market is economically detrimental. Remarkable.80% of our economy benefiting from free movement of people & the Single Market.  
"Without an end date, the UK will pay £39bn for no say in EU affairs and be permanently trapped in the orbit of Brussels, having sacrificed all the advantages of leaving."The Conservatives will never be forgiven if they sell out on Brexit!Support us at  
Theresa May 'did not understand EU when she triggered Brexit'  
This really is quite extraordinary and, if you ask me, the reason why there is a race to get Brexit over the finishing line on 29th March before the full effects of the EU Directive on Money Laundering bites.  
Why is it the areas which have seen their shipyards, coal mines and steel works close... that somehow have the strongest belief that their jobs are safe from Brexit?The phrase "national tragedy" really doesn't cut it...  
.@theresa_may must accept responsibility & set up a £7.5bn Brexit Redundancy Fund to support all those made jobless by No Deal, May’s deal & those already impacted by #Brexit uncertainty.£1.6bn is a futile drop in the ocean.Don’t they care about the lives of ordinary people?  
"But it's our money anyway"Forget the general economic damage of Brexit for a sec...The EU has 40 agencies that do government functions e.g. certifying chemicals & medicines for public use, the aviation authority... That cost is shared among 28 countries. Who pays post Brexit?  
How much has @theresa_may given to all the poor regions in the U.K. over a 7 year period? How much did she give the DUP and over what period? It’s obviously a #brexit bribe, and a crap one at that. 
If you're still flying the flag for #brexit, Just stop for a moment and imagine that day when you cough up some blood, or find that lump, then discover that your medical insurance only pays out the first £10,000 of treatment. #brexitShambles#projectReality 
Ironic coming from a Sky employee, where his news colleagues don't even try to conceal their contempt for Brexit. 
The ultimate question for JRM and the ERG: Are you prepared to put country before Party, and sweep away this failed Remainer Prime Minister and her non-Brexit. Brexit? 
One of the UK's most successful space entrepreneurs has launched a withering attack on Brexit, labelling it "galactic scale stupidity". Brexit will do immense harm to Britain's space industry. The UK will be "lost in space", he says.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
This should be shouted from the roof-tops. Pro-deal Labour MPs are being invited to accept £1.6 bn as compensation for losing £13 bn. Will the outspoken Brexit defender Caroline Flint worry that one day she may have to justify the loss to her constituents?  
It seems Sammy Wilson is taking time out from the Brexit negotiations to read my leaflets - it will also tell him we are opposing the gas cavern project at Islandmagee, calling for the removal of paramilitary murals and welcoming the investigation into corruption in the council.  
Dutch MPs Brexit report @PieterOmtzigt concludes we are heading for ND“what started as a plea for more free trade by a country for which free trade has always been of paramount importance, ends in the short term then in substantially less free trade...” 
At my friends who watches BBC News. FFS you’d think Scotland did not exist.  Knife crime in England, English NHS, Brexit Bung to English towns. No relevance to Scotland at all.  News from a foreign country 
I find Britain to be an unbearable place to live in at the moment, with this evil Brexit ideology dominating the country and tainting everything which comes into contact with it. #FBPE 
Prediction: in the event of a second referendum there will not be riots in Berwick-upon-Tweed.  
So this is what @theresa_may  is planning paying parts of the UK to support her #Brexit deal. Notice who isn't getting anything. #indyref2 #dissolvetheunion 
Our communities are losing billions from Brexit and Ministers are replacing barely half of it with their ‘Stronger Towns Fund’. It’s time for a #PeoplesVote, says @ChrisLeslieMP 
People really do care about knife crime and certainly don’t see a second Brexit Referendum as a solution to it. You might be losing perspective here...  
Experiencing life in the UK after Brexit in Not Tonight. Its the end of the world for the UK again, and this time its only a month away  
HMRC being asked again about what the Brexit plan is for the Irish border. Sir Jon Thompson reduced to aplogetically reading out the pro forma: 'The govt will publish further details on its immediate temporary arrangments for trade between NI & RoI' 
Future generations in the UK have had this stolen from them.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#BREXIT  
Do you welcome Theresa May’s £1.6bn Brexit “bribe” for predominantly Leave supporting towns? @Nigel_Farage is live 
Best megaevolution brexit!see more noble-senpai x ashley-san comics here: 
When ‘remainers’ of 1970s Britain held a referendum on Europe, they didn’t quibble for years over whether to enact the result — obsessives like Edward Heath had already put us in, establishing their choice as status quo.Remainers are quietly doing the same on EU Defence today.  
Enjoyed recording @mrjamesob's podcast 'Full Disclosure' last week, talking Brexit and my time in Government. Recounting the moment my dreams of becoming a rock star were dashed was a little more bittersweet. TBListen here   pic.twitter.com/wC3e2sYIm7 
I am prepared to fight to stop this with every breath in my body.I suspect this might be a Full on Bitches Against Brexit campaign. (Yes. It is coming. We’re still working on the website)  
The Tories' Transport Secretary hasn't shown up in Parliament to answer questions on his and the UK government's failure over their Brexit ferry contract.  Failure the SNP's @joannaccherry exposed months ago. 
Theresa May has pulled a key vote that would have made tax havens more transparent! The Financial Services Bill is a crucial law (needed before Brexit) was due to pass its final stages tonight - MPs tried to amend it to include tax haven transparency, then it disappeared...  
So according to David Lammy's "logic" a tiny country like Greenland can survive outside the EU but the 5th largest economy in the World that speaks the global language, has the biggest financial hub in this hemisphere and so much going for it cannot?! #Brexit  
As a Labour MP John Mann, are you proud to be parroting the lie peddled by fascists like Farage & Banks that Brexit is a rebellion of the ordinary folk against the elite, when in fact it is bring orchestrated by the most cynical & ruthless of all the right-wing elite factions? 
As it stands in Ogun state, APC is winning that election. Just like the Oyo Election is a referendum against Ajimobi so also in Ogun state.The civil servants are going to vote against Amosun's candidate in APM.Fav this tweet. 
Proof again that Brexit is about tax avoidanceA vote on the Financial Services Bill – needed before the UK leaves the EU – has been cancelled after an amendment to make British-controlled tax havens more transparent looked likely to succeed.   
“UK citizens can be reassured that regardless of the Brexit outcome planes will still fly between the UK and the EU”  
Margaret Thatcher agreed with Attlee that referendums are a device of dictators & demagogues. #Brexit has proven how right they both were, at least when a referendum is held in an infantilised democracy overtaken by populism and nationalism. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
A lot of folk in their 50s saying "we survived World War II, we'll survive Brexit". Fuck off. YOU didn't survive World War II. You weren't even born! Many of you wouldn't survive a mild jog never mind a war. You'd burst into tears if you had to go a week without a takeaway. 
Government pulls vote on tax transparency for overseas territories after Brexit - An MP says "they knew we commanded a majority" and warns ministers not to ignore "the will of parliament". 
Tory Brexit bribery plan @WelshConserv 
So the ECONOMIC CASE for the UK ...Labour want to damage UK economy by 4% with their #BrexitTories arguing amongst themselves whether you to do 6% or 8% DAMAGE to the UK economy with their #BrexitThat is new background to #indyref2 
What a ridiculous farce. Theresa May is scrambling for support because she knows her deal is a mess.If you agree that the people should have the final say on Brexit, with the option to stay in the EU, join our campaign >  
IMPORTANT: MPs have to act in the national, not party, interest in steering us out of the Brexit crisis, here's why: #PeoplesVote Please RT, share and ask your MP to back a #PeoplesVote #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
When Grayling symbolises Brexit Britain to the outside world, it really ought to be the wake up call May’s govt keeps ignoring so wilfully. #NotSoGlobalBritain 
We must stop wasting energy over how we do the least damaging Brexit, & talk about the biggest elephant in the room instead:The crime of the Brexit referendum & how our craven & corrupt politicians are ignoring the fraud & Russian interference@billbrowder @lbc #bbcpm #r4today 
Today’s Stronger Towns announcement won’t come close to addressing the level of need in communities like Sunderland - and won’t make up for the years of Brexit-driven austerity and decline to come.  
I have Proper Brexit tamed in a wee cage here and I feed it every day, but don’t tell the lads, they’re enjoying wondering where it went 
Just been watching the Beeb. The anti Brexit campaigner Gina Miller is complaining she has been demonized over Brexit because she's a woman with a voice. Oh my bleeding heart! No Gina your demonized because you have been used by Soros as his mouthpiece @thatginamiller. 
One of the UK's most successful space entrepreneurs has launched a withering attack on Brexit, labelling it "galactic scale stupidity"  
I laugh when I'm called a #Remoaner. I've hardly begun. If Brexit does end up going ahead, they haven't heard the start of it. The moaning will shatter ear drums and much of it will come from people that voted LeaveAnd, a warning: There may also be a tiny bit of #BrexIToldYouSo 
How factory-farmed American chicken may just save Theresa May's Brexit bacon : me reporting from the UK  
Charles Dickens was the first to realise and describe it in his #books how corrupt and totally useless MPs in the #Commons were and how their elections were a total farce. It's especially poignant these days as they betray #Brexit and work against the people who elected them. 
Fellow Brexiteers: three-quarters of a loaf is better than no loaf at all. Let's pass the deal and get out of the EU now! #brexit #leavemeansleave 
If the government and civil service are unable to deliver Brexit, it doesn't mean that Brexit is impossible - it isn't - but rather that our politicians lack the will to deliver it.  
In the run-up to the referendum to repeal the 8th Amendment in May '18, a mural appeared near the George Bernard Shaw pub in Portobello, DublinDublin City Library & Archive photographed some of the messages that were left at the Memorial Wall; 
This weekend, London Labour voted 79% to back a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal.March with us on 23.03.19 & please RT this:  
Just think, after 29 March, we won't have to do those tedious, paper-free, visa-free weekends to Rome, Paris, Berlin, little villages in the south of France, little villages in the middle of Spain, Bucharest, Amsterdam, Naples etc. Such freedom! Thank you, Brexit. 
I just learned so much about chickens. And Brexit. Thanks @davidfrum. 
There was nothing democratic about the Brexit referendum.If it had been binding, the courts would have anulled the result.Yes, it was THAT corrupt 
"In October 2016, The Sun was arguing that we would be able to retain single market membership despite abolishing freedom of movement."They have been proved categorically and completely wrong."@mrjamesob | #brexit  
"I think it's been so badly handled that it's possible that it will cost her votes rather than gain them"Labour's Lisa Nandy says Theresa May's new fund for struggling English towns, which she calls a "Brexit bribe", will make MPs even less likely to vote for her Brexit deal.  
This is key piece of legislation necessary in event of no-deal Brexit & needed to pass quickly. When faced with amendments calling for no 'race to the bottom' in financial regulation, gov ran away.  via @PoliticsHome 
Doesn’t matter how many times you say it - the media continue to ignore the illegal referendum result. Why is it not ALL over the news?????????? #AnnulReferendumResult #FairFinalSay Please RT - expose the cover-up!!! 
Scottish Tories - "We will stand up for Scotland!"Scots budget cuts - silencePower grab - silenceBrexit - silenceN Ireland gets bribed Billions - silenceEnglish councils get bribed Billions - silence 
This is outrageous. Knowing the Referendum result was unlawful (Sir James Eadie, May's legal representative was fully aware), May just ploughed on with it. Shout it from the roof tops. If this doesn't undermine democracy what does? #PeoplesVote #ExitFromBrexit 
BBC News - Brexit Britain will be 'lost in space' . Another Brexit tragedy. The bad news just pours in by the hour. May is determined to wreck the country and Corbyn is lost. #FBPE 
Ress-Mogg implictly concedes here that no deal Brexit is not a credible negotiating position because the Government has failed to make adequate preparations for it. 1/  
And, of course, sets up endless years of complaint that Brexiters were bounced into supporting something that wasn't 'proper Brexit', and so every bad consequence that flows from it isn't their fault.  
Unlike with the EU @BorisJohnson, If the #Remain majority of MPs in the HOC betray the UK Electorate, the people of this Country will know precisely, come the next General Election, how to remove every single one of them who votes to betray #Brexit.#DoNotDareToBetrayBrexit 
Moderate Tory MPs need to watch out... If May’s bad deal gets through the ERG will move to oust her and impose much harder version of #Brexit.  
What impact will & has Brexit so far had  on how we source and support local fishing industry here in INISHOWEN  ?    Here our concerns on tonight’s @rtenews with @EileenMagnier @KeelinShanley @CaitrionaPerry #SupportLocal is vital in these parts if we are to grow as a region 
“The political class still doesn’t understand Brexit. They’re obsessed with Brexit’s economic impact but we didn’t vote Brexit for economic reasons. We voted for it because we believe in democracy and sovereignty.”Brendan O’Neill in @spectator 
People in London wondering how NI stuff around Brexit took them by surprise are welcome to start paying attention anytime   
UPDATE: Brexit Rally location and time announced! 4pm - 7pm, Parliament Square, Friday March 29th.The rally starts when the March to Leave from Sunderland arrives in Westminster.Free to attend for all! Be there!Register for info here: #brexit 
PROMINENT Brexiteer Mark Francois dismissed claims Conservative  hardliners will be "softening" over Theresa May's Brexit deal when MPs  will have their second chance to vote on the final agreement.  
Not only has former leader Mark Durkan jumped ship from the SDLP, he is also walking away from any prospect of securing democratic European representation for northern citizens after Brexit 
OK, and if I'm right, is it fair to suggest that #Brexit could do as much damage to the UK as Trump has done to the US! 
dunno about you but i feel like the fbpe clowns celebrating a pro brexit right winger attacking a left wing politician who recently came out in support for a second referendum quite revealing 
Kay says "Bollocks".Do you think Sky is biased against Brexit?  
German Karneval again comes up trumps on #Brexit. Today in Düsseldorf.Hope this can join the #PutItToThePeople march on the 23rd.#RevokeA50 
On @BBCNews, @thatginamiller says EU has ‘moral and legal duties to ensure both sides limit the damage’ of Brexit.  
Brexit and the effects for travellers on Eurostar/Eurotunnel/ferriesI was interested to learn that Eurostar, which runs trains from London to Amsterdam, Brussels and Paris, sought to identify benefits/growth opportunities from leaving the EUIt found none 
Y'day @News_Letter published Trimble & Hoey's letter to @10DowningStreet headlined 'Do not let groundless fears abt NI dictate your Brexit strategy', & citing @ARK_info data on #unity.Here's a more nuanced reading of that data, @BelfastAgmt & the union. 
'There is a looming betrayal coming on Brexit. Our dreams are meeting reality.' 
Hey, remember how PROJECT FEAR said no planes would fly post Brexit etc? this is what the industry says  
Watch Sky's Beth Rigby cheekily slipping in the "crashing out" our jibe to bash Brexit.  
For years MSM direct nasty, mendacious, pernicious bile at the Leader of the Opposition. When he is physically attacked - by a right wing Brexit supporter - MSM go quiet.MSM is a cesspit.  
The most magnificent rant against those advocating no-deal from someone who campaigned for leave in the referendum. He's right of course...  
Northern Ireland may well have a post-Brexit voice in Europe after all...  
PANIC OVER JACOB!!! - After MPs put forward an amendment to make British-controlled tax havens more transparent in a key piece of Brexit legislation, the bill has now completely disappeared from today’s House of Commons Order of Business. #ToryCorruption 
By 82% to 18% Labour voters across Yorkshire support remaining in EU and big majority want a people's vote. Labour MPs have nothing to fear from supprting Party policy on a referendum on the deal.  
The key difference is probably that they’re journalists and not rent a gob shites who need  the controversy and attention.It’s pretty clear that Brexit has warped your mind to such an extent you’d probably agree with Harold Shipman if he supported Leave. 
Is there any reason we cannot leave with a crap deal, then get a genuine Brexit government to tear up the rotten deal?What will they do?Sail the French navy up the Thames?Whoever heard of a permanent treaty?  
German carnival processions have hit the nail on the head once again. Our economy hoisted on brexit’s petard.#StopBrexit #RevokeA50 #FBPE 
As usual, @GiselaStuart nails it: Brexit isn't at all impossible. We have an anti-Brexit Government, an anti-Brexit Civil Service and an anti-Brexit parliament that, instead of getting on with it, have delayed, obstructed and manipulated the outcome of our biggest vote.  
I know I will get replies about remainer intransigence and the refusal to accept the democratic mandate of the referendum. I understand this, It's true, to an extent. But this it's no longer an argument about politics & governance, but a culture war. 
sure , brexit has nothing whatsoever to do with tax avoidance....  
I know Brexiteers have pursued Brexit based on certain instincts and principles. I understand it isn’t all about the economy, I’ve made that argument myself, but this is just masochism. I can’t endorse it. 
at last some clarity in this whole bloody Brexit debate...  
Brexit: 5 reasons Theresa May's £1.6bn bung is a 'pathetic drop in the ocean'  
What an absolute crock. People will riot when you've figured out what you've done to them if you do brexit. They'll tut and put the kettle on if it's cancelled. 
You just couldn’t make it up!This shower are running our country and negotiating Brexit. What could possibly go wrong? #FailingGrayling#BrexitShambles#UnfitToGovern 
The UK Government is still refusing to tell me who the shadowmen of Brexit, Aggreagte IQ, were meeting in Downing Street  
This week and next will be hugely important.This is the Brexit end game.#StopBrexitCan you hear me? 
Social care providers could shut down if Brexit and the £30k 'pay cap' drive away vital migrant staff.That means residential care and nursing homes shutting down because we simply don't have EU staff wanting to work here any more.Is this what people voted for?  
“#EU means peace, freedom, freedom of movement & prosperity. Most successful peace project in history & biggest free trade area. Success story we should be proud to be part of. #Brexit means we failed as a nation.” @snb19692 in @PMPmagToday #TalkTime 
I’m a lifelong @Conservatives voter, but if MPs betray the referendum result & vote for @theresa_may ‘s appalling WA, I & many others, will NEVER vote Conservative ever again. MPs MUST vote for NO DEAL to fully respect the ref result, or lose power for generations.  #WTOBrexit 
is anything actually happening with Brexit today then?  or is this just another whole day wasted when we could be getting the 'meaningful vote' voted down AGAIN and out the way and move towards a #PeoplesVote? (or better yet, #RevokeArticle50 and just Remain in the EU) 
the "referendum on socialism" was also the story the gop pushed in 2016, 2012. 2008, 2004, 2000, 1996, 1992... im sensing a pattern.  
Sinn Féin MP @ChrisHazzardSF has called on people to support anti-Brexit demonstrations organised by Border Communities Against Brexit on Saturday 30 March #Brexit  
Richard Tice demands NEW TEAM for post-Brexit trade negotiations – 'NOT too late'  
Flexcit was rejected (setting aside the difficulty of working with the Norths) not just because it advocated Single Market membership & free movement, but because it dealt with unwanted details & facts. It told Brexiteers what it didn't want to hear. Like the below on WTO Brexit.  
Lammy never slow to show his utter dumbness and stupidity when it comes to all things to do with Brexit. Money “paid to U.K. regions by the EU” is our money!!!  That’s why we pay £20 billion to the EU and get half of it back.  
Flexcit, though flawed, was more detailed, indepth & honest than any other attempt at a Brexit plan. Essentially an EFTA/EEA plan+, it brought detail & nuance to Brexit thinking. Because of this, in hindsight, it was always destined to be a minority pursuit. Another red flag.  
Out of the IEA’s 2013 competition for a Brexit plan came Richard North’s Flexcit. It didn’t win. All EEA based entries were rejected. This was a warning sign of how Leave would never be able to build a majority around a plan. The winner is forgotten because it was nonsense  
John Sheridan(NI farmer) - We see #brexit as something that will ruin our peace & it has the potential to ruin our economy & we don't want one bit of it.Thomas Murphy(Irish truck driver) - Everything is going to be a complete disaster. #peoplesvote #FinalSay #RevokeA50 
Nobody could write satire to match the endless stream of absurdity that is Brexit. 
Report: Govt Abandons Efforts to Win Real Concession from EU on Brexit 'Backstop'  
May's 'withdrawal agreement' is abject surrender. We must walk away under WTO rules on the 29th of this month. Brexit must actually mean exit! #WTOBrexitNow 
So much for EU being undemocratic. EU regional funding is free of political motive, based on where need is greatest. By comparison, Tories resort to #Brexitbribe, playing politics with people’s lives, in undemocratic attempt to prop up #Brexit disaster.  
Euan is a @FFSake_ supporter and is marching because young people will be hit the hardest by #Brexit. Join him at the #PutItToThePeople march to demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
This is precisely what May is hoping Brexiteers will do ie conclude that her deal (fake as you correctly refer to it) is the best option on the table and back it. This would be a catastrophic mistake. Let May cancel Brexit and the Tories feel the full force of the reaction 
Here is yet more real world facts from an expert source comparing the grubby brexit bung Mrs May is hawking compared to what we're about to lose. By any measure a shockingly bad exchange, shameful that the UK has got to this and shameful that anyone would give it credence.  
German business TERRIFIED short Brexit delay will wreak HAVOC – 'It's bad for the economy' - he’s right. If Parliament needs more time work a shift system. 24 hrs a day, earn your pay for a change. No more “uncertainty”, leave 29th March 2019 as promised..  
JULY  2016Ruth Davidson: "Next PM should NOT BLOCK Scottish independence referendum." Lets #RT this ask Ruth to keep her promise and tell TM Scotland,s voice shall be heard. 
May's deal is Soft Remain while it has a Backstop that would permanently prevent a real Brexit. Leave-supporting MPs like @AnnieTrev won't back the deal until there is a clear and legally-binding route out of that Backstop. 
A former Lib Dem candidate spent tens of thousands of pounds trying to get the courts to reverse Brexit.Following a two-hour hearing judges said the case was "hopeless & totally without merit".There's nothing democratic about the Liberal Democrats  
Theresa May cancels key Brexit vote because amendment to name and shame tax avoiders was going to pass 
"I don't want to be complicit in ten years' time to the biggest mistake our country has made. I am not afraid of a No Deal Brexit, and wouldn't it be great if our Prime Minister got up tomorrow and said to the EU 'l am just going to walk away' ."- Suella Braverman: MP.  
Theresa May has come in for severe criticism after cancelling a crucial vote on a key piece of Brexit legislation after it became clear that a cross-party amendment – to essentially name and shame the bosses of tax avoiding companies – was going to succeed  
Very interesting numbers, which show that- Brexit had little effect on trend- Brexit is and was about more than anti-immigration- opposition to immigration is not policy for the future- most media are completely out of touch with vox populi  
UKIP selects @NeilUKIP to fight the Newport West by-election“None of the other parties back Brexit. This election will show that UKIP is back and firing on all cylinders."- UKIP Wales Leader Neil HamiltonIN FULL:  
Excellent new report  just published by Northern Ireland's economic department looking at Brexit and services. Here's their estimates of the barriers facing NI services exporters (as tariff value equivalent) of being outside of the single market. 
So @UKLabour ‘s @jeremycorbyn and @johnmcdonnellMP really are cunning liars , pretending to be in favour of a People’s Vote while all along they surreptitiously enable BREXIT ... they are no better than UKIP ... we need to make them pay at the next General Election !!!  
Meanwhile on Planet #Brexit - an excoriating attack on the UK’s impending departure from the EU. An act of “galactic scale stupidity”, says ⁦@Will4Planet⁩, one of the UK’s most successful New Space entrepreneurs. 
It's clear what the EU are trying to do.1) They want to stop #Brexit by offering the worst possible deal.2)They want to ensure that once UK has agreed to stay they'll NEVER be able to have the audacity to escape again cos all exit doors will be firmly shut & bolted by the EU. 
When Theresa May told hard-up NHS nurses "There isn't a magic money tree", she forgot to say "There isn't a magic money tree FOR YOU NURSES - only for bribing the the DUP, bribing Brexit voting areas, paying for Chris Grayling's costly cock-ups... 
READ: Northern Labour voters back Brexit second referendum move by 75%:  
Surely it's time to step aside."Theresa May has sold out again, lied again, betrayed Britain again as May gives up any real attempt to change the backstop. MP's should sack May as she has failed. If it requires an election call an election because May isn't delivering Brexit" 
Translation:“I’m so desperate to get my fake Brexit sell-out deal through Parliament I’m prepared to stoop to anything including bribery, in order to achieve my aim.”  
Theresa May cancels key Brexit vote because amendment to name and shame tax avoiders was going to pass  
"UK faces rise of far-right if Brexit is delayed" says Jacob Rees-Mogg, unlike now, where they’re all just minding their own business. 
How does the PM have the brass neck to say she is delivering #Brexit when she is doing the opposite? 
Petition to have the 'Grayling' adopted as the official unit for measuring political waste"Brexit is costing the UK economy 40 Graylings a week!""By the time is finished, Hinkley Point will have racked up 11 KiloGraylings" etc. 
Theresa May's satisfied look when she says that #CanadaPlus is not on the table explains why we don't have a proper beneficial #BrexitDeal. Theresa May has done evrything in her power to stop #Brexit. #BrexitBetrayal #MondayMood 
I agree with one difference.Both the main parties will lose seats & a Brexit Parties will be in the new Parliament. If the Government collapses & the Queen desolves Parliament then the UK will leave on the 29th with no deal, which means WTO rules. 
Oh come on Ruth I can’t believe even you are capitulating. The ‘Deal’ isn’t Brexit and will leave us worse off. We need to just Leave on WTO 
Your sneering tweet is just as patronising. You don’t have a monopoly on working class sensibility. All the people in my street wanted to win the pools to get the fuck out of there.  Brexit promised the WC a win. It was a lie. And you’re perpetuating it. 
 @BBC5Live's #Brexitcast asked you which songs should be included on their Brexit playlist...which songs were missed out? Listen to the final mix on Sounds, decided by you  
A Leave voter admitted to being “bamboozled” after James O’Brien repeatedly asked him which laws he wanted to be in control of after Brexit@mrjamesob | #Brexit  
WATCH: @annaturley makes it clear that this #Brexit deal will harm the people in the North East and that the #OnlyWayForward is a #PeoplesVote. Join the #PutItToThePeople march to demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
We cannot let Theresa May off the hook. This botched Brexit has embarrassed the country.Make your voice heard and join our March to Stop 
If there’s a serious possibility there’ll be another referendum, we need to start talking about the ‘information deficit’ and how to cure it.     We cannot have another vote  with the population so misinformed that they are basing their choices solely on lies and preconceptions. 
They are beginning to realise that Brexit was bought by 45 years of negative piss from right wing newspapers, lies, Leave overspending and Russian money. Welcome to Little Englander’s Dumbocracy.  
If you're fed up with the Government's Brexit betrayal then show your support for the #March2Leave:  
Europeans double UK investment since Brexit vote 
#Brexit bribe? British Prime Minister Theresa May unveils £1.6 billion fund for Brexit-backing towns  via @ReutersTV 
After accusations that £1.6bn Stronger Towns Fund is a bribe, govt unveils new Brexit slogan:  
Japan issues corporate warning over no-deal Brexit.Not just warning about a No Deal but a Brexit with a poor deal. They are so unhappy.  
Anyone else noticed that the Brexit cranks have mysteriously reappeared on here, spreading their misinformation and getting uppity whenever they're corrected?It's like 2016 again. 
It's a choice between (i) Fake Brexit (the "deal") and (ii) delay & No Brexit. Any significant extension of "exit day" would only embolden the Remainers and dramatically increase the chances of No Brexit. The least worst option under these circumstances, sadly, is the "deal" 
.@UKLabour voters across #Yorkshire overwhelmingly back Corbyn on supporting a @PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. Yorkshire Labour voters want a #FinalSay 
NEW YouGov poll reveals:- Northern Labour voters back second referendum move by 75%- 76% would support staying in the EU- If it were a choice between Remain or backing Gov's Brexit deal, the split would be 81% to 19% in favour of staying in the EU 
Ministers postpone bill debate to avoid likely defeat over tax havens.MPs’ amendment would force crown dependencies to take action over money laundering. The Tories hate controls on tax-dodging, including the EU measures against tax avoidance.#Brexit 
Theresa May's bung shows she still doesn't understand Brexit - Brendan O'Neill  
By backing #Brexit you will not see the the Far Right off you will have helped them win...#RevokeA50 #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal..& prevent our Rights being Removed w/o Consent & the UK being made Poorer or even breaking up! 
Good point by Ivan Rogers about how the government really sees no-deal Brexit:  
I’ve been asking every account that makes such claims whether they personally would resort to violent action. Turns out, they seem always to mean someone else will do it for them. Which is a bit like Brexiteers and Brexit. 
No idea if you ever check to see who or most likely 'what' is liking your Tweets...but from a cursory look I'd say you're on the wrong side of history & appealing to those with whom you might not share the same outlook...if you do perhaps you're in the wrong party..#Brexit  
⁦@BestForBritain⁩ research showing how much the regions of the UK would miss out with #Brexit#VoteDownTheDealThe millions of EU cash spent in Leeds revealed - Leeds Live 
Richard Leonard has been mocked over a “catastrophic” TV interview where he said Labour would block a second Scottish independence referendum. 
Former Spanish Secretary of State for Security tells Supreme Court judges that Catalan referendum voters had "a violent attitude" and that the Spanish police made use of the "minimum and indispensable" force.  
Britain aims to build an industry-leading car-battery factory to accelerate a push into electric vehicles as Brexit and an over-exposure to diesel models hurts demand and jobs  
Never forget. We are only getting Brexit because of a legal loophole.If the Brexit ref had been binding, the corruption committed by Leave would have caused the result to be dismissed.But because it was only "advisory" the result stands.#LoopholeBrexit 
This is a disgusting email. Good for you @RupaHuq. We may disagree on Brexit but that’s absolutely no excuse for racist abuse. I just wish you hadn’t covered up his full email address...  
Gibraltar saved from the clutches of Spain as UK forges new deal to keep Rock after Brexit 
After #Brexit it will be the Republic of Ireland who are the occupied 26 counties.Ireland has no control over its own laws, courts, interest rate, exchange rate, public spending limits, borders etc.Soon they will also lose control of tax and foreign policy.Time for #Irexit. 
Japan issues corporate warning over no-deal Brexit  
No Brexit bribery.Instead, there must be stable investment where it’s most needed. 
This towns fund smacks of desperation from a government reduced to bribing MPs to vote for their damaging flagship Brexit legislation. 
Welcomed Lithuanian Prime Minister Saulius Skvernelis to Dublin this morning. We visited #dubw earlier and now holding meeting in Farmleigh to discuss bilateral relations, EU issues and #brexit  
On Thursday the 14th of March Parliament is going to vote and will potentially DELAY Brexit!We cannot allow this to happen, if you can manage along on the day please come and make your voices heard!Event details here:  
Having lunch in IKEA in Southampton & sharing a table with a delightful Italian lady who has never heard of settled status. Lived here since 1962. Had no idea #Brexit could change anything for her. How many people like her are out there? Very worrying. 
It’s what happens when you position yourself as the thinking persons Katie Hopkins? I’ve never understood what JHB brings to the Brexit debate, other than sneering the words ‘Project Fear’ whenever someone raises a concern over Brexit? A parody of a serious broadcaster... 
Apart from Mercer and Putin, the other big figure in the whole #Brexit #Trump mess is - of course - Rupert Murdoch, who set an ethos of hacking, kompromat and criminality long before either the Russian IRA or Cambridge Analytica were dreamt of. 
This is interesting - top Brexit campaign legal mind Martin Howe arguing that Brexiter MPs should not be afraid of an Article 50 extension of 3 months or even 21 months... both better than backing May deal, he argues:  
Nope, I know a lot more than I did, probably way more about the EU than our MP's know.The disaster that is Brexit scares me as I know its will be ruinous to the whole of the UKKnowledge is power? only if you can make people listen, knowledge is f'ing scary otherwise. 
BORDERS: 44 migrants arrested after boarding Dover-bound ferry.“Reports of what a No Deal Brexit could mean for security checks in the port area has had an impact...worried about not being able to reach the UK”  
The Tories have neglected communities, cut public services and destroyed the fabric of industrialised areas in the 1980s and from 2010. Now they are only bunging money at these areas to bribe their MPs into voting for Theresa May’s terrible Brexit deal.  
George Eustice dismisses claims that a no-deal Brexit would be 'disastrous' for farmers 
Leavers have lost the intellectual argument for Brexit (such as it ever was). All they have left are crude appeals to populist sentiment. They may have pulled off a Brexit heist, but their cheating and lies are unsustainable in the long term, and they are beginning to realise it 
It is highly disconcerting this is what Remainers believe is a stereotypical leave voter!Or put another way the UK education system has let kids down since joining the EU: so easy to spin anything to a particular political narrative.Let's have a serious #Brexit discussion.  
“My constituents would be literally rioting on the streets…people do not want a second referendum in Berwick-upon-Tweed” Tory MP Anne-Marie Trevelyan @Annietrev“They do in Norwich!” Labour MP Clive Lewis @labourlewis#Brexit#politicslive 
The Guardian have managed to print a Brexit letter so stupid that even Labour Remainer MPs are mocking it  
BBC News - No Welsh cash in £1.6bn post-Brexit English towns fund  
The ONLY course of action is for ERG to collapse the Government. Article 50 still applies and we leave under WTO rules but with 2 year (para 24) grace period. New Brexit leaders for Conservative landslide, new elections to negotiate free trade deal. 
These Labour MPs taking taxpayers money from #TheresaMay , say that they personally, don't gain financially.  Untrue. They hope their constituents vote for them in thanks, hence they are kept in a lucrative job and therefore gain personally. #Brexit #PoliticsLive #PoliticalNews 
#Brexit bribe? UK PM May unveils $2.1 billion fund for Brexit-backing towns  
Bye then! Look what Brexit made me do: I've booked a one-way ticket out of the UK  
The PM’s Brexit bribe isn’t fooling anyone!This is a drop in the ocean compared to cuts made under austerity & the financial benefit set to be lost post-Brexit.Yet more evidence of the need for a #PeoplesVote 
You can’t even label your ‘2nd referendum’ transparently. Have you dropped “Confirmatory Vote” now and we’re back to “People’s Vote”? Don’t dare pretend to be the white knights of politics when you are quite patently asking for a “do-over” bc you don’t like the 1st answer you got  
"This is money from an English budget, not for Wales." It’s not new money and a drop in the ocean compared to what we now know will be lost if the Prime Minister’s #Brexit plan goes ahead. #BrexitShambles @WalesForEurope #finalsay  
CORRECTION: “He cost taxpayers 2.7 billion pounds, not million.”FWIW, he also thinks Brexit is a great idea.  
We aren’t going to agree on whether to respect the Ref vote or not. Brexit or not we should be supporting funding to address the concerns of our towns and also the disparity between spending in the South and North on areas like transport. I won’t apologise for that.  
Anne-Marie Trevelyan MP on BBC Politics Live: "People do not want a second referendum." Mmm, I suspect what she's saying here is that people she talks to (predominantly #Brexit supporting Tories, no doubt) don't want a second referendum. Well, of course they don't. They'd lose! 
I run a small business that does 70% of trade with the EU. Brexit is an utter disaster for us, so we will be moving most of our business to the Netherlands. Your government could not organise a drinking party in a beer factory. Party of business? My foot! 
I don’t want to talk about Brexit. I want to talk about how we create a kinder, fairer society and reduce violent crime. I want to talk about tackling climate change. But I have to talk about Brexit because if we leave the EU all those things become even harder. #FinalSay 
Questions raised over £1.6bn fund for less-well off towns after Brexit - which includes no cash for Wales 
This Wednesday @IanDunt will be leaving these shores with a panel of EU reporters who've covered the Brexit beat for the last 2 years - @StefanieBolzen @MarionVanR  and @antoguerrera - to look at the image of Britain in Europe today. last few tickets here: 
A great representation of #Brexit by artist Jacques Tilly.He's captured perfectly @theresa_may's compulsive lying, today's #BrexitBribe being a prime example. 
A stunning story that is absolutely crucial to UK also. Because you know what else Murdoch wants? Brexit. Or as he put it: "When I go into Downing Street they do what I say. When I go to Brussels they take no notice." @michaelgove in his pocket. @nigel_farage now on the pay roll 
Fury as Tony Blair urges MPs to delay Brexit to have a second referendum and force Britain to Remain 
Denying a referendum voted by Scotland's parliament.Forcing Scotland out of the EU & stripping Scots of rights.Stealing Scotland's oil & lying about reserves.The british need to realise that their Anglocentric entitlement is built on sand. Their arrogance *is* their undoing. 
“I am not afraid of a No Deal Brexit and wouldn’t it be great if our Prime Minister got up tomorrow and said to the EU ‘I am just going to walk away’.”What a shame that negotiations aren’t being led by principled Brexiteers like @SuellaBraverman. 
Theresa’s bribes could be *illegal* under the Bribery Act..Facilitating Brexit could mean a stint behind bars says @MollyMEP 
Our director Paul Nurse spoke to @BBCr4today this weekend about the potential impact of Brexit on UK science.  Listen to the full interview here from 34:00:  
What you'll realise Chloe is that you're living in a country that doesn't like cheats, crooks and liars; they can only hide within, and be protected by, the Conservative party for so long. 
So tierd of ardant remainers critisicing ordinary people who feel passionate about #Brexit. Who cares what they look like?? So judgemental. So unkind. So exclusionary.People want to get involved & that's great. You're all welcome @Leavers_Britain 
Amid the perennial buskers and noisy Brexit campaigners outside Parliament, this goes unnoticed and is far worthier of attention  
I don’t know but to be fair it’s a paltry sum in terms of Govt spend £280m for 6 years...and if this is how much they are going support towns hit by Brexit Exit it’s blinking shameful.  
I caught @mrjamesob on @lbc claiming “We all lose if it’s a “No Deal” because let’s face it literally no one voted for that”! Cosmic grade nonsense. A WTO Brexit (“No Deal” to James) literally delivers on exactly what we voted for - a clean Leave. Poor James. 
John Hickenlooper, now running for president in part on the claim that he revived Colorado's economy, opposed the 2012 marijuana legalization referendum which substantially helped the revival of Colorado's economy  
Here at @instituteforgov where former UK rep to the EU, Sir Ivan Rogers, is going to be speaking about Brexit and HMG’s handling of it very shortly  
As facts emerge, the ‘will of the people’ has moved on from 2 years ago. The true impact of #Brexit and extensive cheating from the Leave campaign has become clearer. Democracy is an ongoing process, it is time @theresa_may recognised this by calling a #PeoplesVote. (3) 
Despite knowing the Referendum result was unlawful, she has “decided to carry on” with a damaging #Brexit.Just because it is in her powers to do so, does not mean it’s right.  She is undermining democracy and setting a dangerous precedent. (2) 
.@mrjamesob this seems pertinent.Brexit backing @TheSun in Oct 2016 actually angry that the UK might be forced out of the Single Market by those nasty French & Germans.This is the same paper that now says everyone knew that they were voting to leave the SM & CU.@lbc pic.twitter.com/DDqMbtIdfo 
"What are we going to have a referendum on if another one comes along? @theresa_may’s deal or remaining?" asks @UKIP leader @GerardBattenMEP after @DominicRaab says a #Brexit delay would be seen as a win for the EU.  
25 days until Brexit  
#ProjectFear debunked! The Spanish government has issued a range of measures aimed at protecting British citizens should there be a no-deal Brexit. 
Thought- provoking  article  by @madevi :"...I have vivid memories of the morning after the referendum. I wept then as I weep now – as a French citizen, I’d been given no say in the momentous decision that would irrevocably alter my life..." 
Caroline Flint suggests ‘up to 70' Labour MPs will oppose a second referendum regardless 
Brexit is 25 days away. #brexit 
The Nissan bribe occurred immediately after William Hague got a job at PR company Teneo, that represents Nissan, to advise them on Brexit strategy. Not reported, except by me.  
Let us hope they reach a satisfactory agreement pronto!!! Because we are sick to death of it all. We voted out so please understand that!!!The Latest: Brexit Talks Between EU and UK Set to Resume  
Ok so we're doing Brexit like Christmas shopping. It's December 1st, 25 days to go, and we don't have any presents yet. 
Why can't a British billionaire lead a British  consortium to buy back Rolls Royce Cars & Bentley?There must be a huge market in China & the Far East beckoning after Brexit.Let's start making British made cars British again. 
Surge of illegal migrants seeking to get to UK before Brexit. Around 100 broke Calais port perimeter on Saturday, French police arrested 44 people. Another 11 migrants detained at Ashford lorry park.  
A £1.6bn govt fund has miraculously appeared, like some fairytale, Roald Dahl magical money tree, to boost less well-off towns in UK after Brexit. It is over 7 years, in the North & Midlands. What's in a name? That which we call a bribe by any other name, would smell as putrid. 
The Financial Services Bill is the 1st of 6 bills that Govt must pass (thru both houses) by March 29 to make No Deal possible. It was due to leave Commons tonight. So yet another Brexit timetabling disaster.  
LORD BREXIT:Where is my Lord Cox? His voice do pleaseth,His foxiness in negotiationsIs the very stuff of this jewell'd nationIRISH BORDER:He hath folded, Lord of the can't Leave,Like a letter that hath been grossly hid,Like a hand at cards that is low number'dLike ... 
ERG slowly begins to appreciate how EU works and why A50 is a legal guillotine. If ERG were smart it would focus on how to revoke A50 and use UK rights/veto/disruption to attempt a Brexit by treaty.   
The bribes for Brexit votes just underlines how our union works. If you want the UK Government to care about you, you must have something to offer them. Wales has nothing to offer that we're not already handing over willingly, so will continue to be neglected. 
As a result, this makes delay almost inevitable. That would be a humiliation for May, but she's probably gotten used to those by now.It makes a 2nd referendum significantly more likely. The Stronger Towns Fund is so pathetic, it almost seems May wants her deal to fail. (9/10) 
It has been obvious since GE17 that May would need Labour MPs to vote with her or to abstain to overcome the hardcore of Brexit ultras who want no-deal.The Stronger Towns Fund debacle leaves that strategy in tatters. Labour MPs would look ridiculous if they support her (6/10) 
It was never supposed to be 'Vote Leave, Get a Tenner'. Brexit was supposed to change everything but instead it shows "nothing has changed".It reveals the great deceit: humiliation comes from Westminster, not from Brussels.That's why it could be a watershed moment. (4/10) 
Liberal Democrats have led the fight against Brexit for over two and half years. Across the country people are demanding better than the national embarrassment that is Brexit. Join them today > 
Under No Account Should the UK Accept the Withdrawal Agreement#brexit #WithdrawalAgreement 
Alliance representatives were among those at the unveiling of a billboard by Border Communities Against Brexit at Stormont today, calling for the backstop to be implemented and preservation of the GFA in the face of #Brexit  
Boris still in the lead with Dominic Raab in 2nd place. I like Boris but overall would prefer Raab as leader, he stands for values closer to what I believe will equip the Tory party to thrive in Brexit Britain & take on detrimental challenges from opposition parties.  
"The idea that I would be that cheap in the first place is insulting" - Labour's @RuthSmeeth says government fund for struggling towns "is not going to affect my [#Brexit] vote either way" 
 José Antonio Nieto, the second in command to the former Spanish interior minister Zoido, says at the trial against the Catalan leaders that "there were no police charges" during the October 1 referendum in #Catalonia. What is this then?  
Couple of hours at my local mart today to gauge how they are feeling and #ScottishBorders #farmers are rightly worried about #BrexitI knew #ScottishIndependence question would be a hard one, but suprised at the results.Question 1 results weren't so much of a suprise though! 
Loss of EU will mean Loss of £13bn investment to projects around UK. Don't dare try to tell us that the govt will replace this money, it keeps all its money for the parts of the country it wants to support that is why we have parts of the UK left behind.Brexit is not worth having 
Whatever happened to the great #Brexit property crash? Remain think no one remembers their lies. 
I’m expecting Chris Grayling to come to @HouseofCommons today to make a statement about the #ferrygate fiasco. Assuming he hid from press over weekend because he felt it his duty to explain himself to Parliament first. I have a lot of questions to ask him #Brexit 
What would a no-deal Brexit mean for universities and research?  
I’m a lifelong @Conservatives voter, but if MPs betray the referendum result & vote for @theresa_may ‘s appalling WA, I & many others, will NEVER vote Conservative ever again. MPs MUST vote for NO DEAL to fully respect the ref result, or lose power for generations.  #WTOBrexit 
May's Brexit bribes shows austerity was always a political project, not an economic necessity. Read my piece from last month's @NewStatesman on why the PM can find money for her Brexit deal but not for public services:  
£1.6bn to bribe English MPs to vote for @theresa_may's #BadBrexitDeal and no mention of #Wales.Over the same amount of time, the #EU sent over £2 billion in funding to #Wales alone.From top to bottom, #Brexit is crooked and we don't want it.#FinalSay  
Breaking: Theresa May announces new solution to Brexit problem  
Our MPs will live long in infamy if they sign this colony agreement. No self-respecting country would accept this deal. MPs must vote it down   #brexit 
10:30pm last night: Downing Street announces their 'Brexit Bribe' to MPs10:38pm: Labour MPs respond & the PM's Brexit bribe has backfired.The PM's bribe is a drop in the ocean compared to what we now know will be lost if the PM's Brexit plan goes ahead. Pls RT:  
Go hiontach! A very handy crib sheet on #Brexit for #SeachtainNaGaeilge - although no mention of the cúlstad (backstop) or indeed Aonadharcach ()! 
Brexit Explained  
@BBCWomansHour Penny Morduant glibbly asserts that women will be better off after Brexit without any evidence. Yet again, we're expected to accept their "belief" over detailed reports by EHRC and WBG that all find Brexit will adversely impact women. 
Great quote by W.B. Yeats. Given how Brexit UK is now governed in comparison to the Republic of Ireland and also how the young in the North are attracted to the liberal policies of the South it feels like Yeats was quite prophetic: almost Zeitgeist.  
Thank you so much for telling me what I voted for in the referendum, @ClareFoges.I thought it was to escape the deeply undemocratic EU, which bears little resemblance to the EEC we joined in the 1970s. And nothing to do with immigration.Silly me. 
Just got an email to say the company Vente-Privee are closing due to Brexit uncertainty. They've been in business for 11 years. Brexit is NOT doing UK business any good whatsoever. 
"If we don´t get the Brexit they promised, there´ll be an uprising", says Hartlepool resident. 
Dear MPs, now that Geoffrey Cox has abandoned attempts to get legal reassurance from the EU, you need to vote for NO DEAL. We cannot be kept under the control of the EU with this WA. Failure to respect the referendum result will see the main parties lose power for a generation. 
So why isn't @Nigel_Farage getting the message?It is because he simply does not know what he's talking about and never has done and doesn't care. None of the Brexit advocates had any idea what it actually entailed or what the consequences were.It's a metaphor for Brexit. 
MORE BRIBERY After paying DUP £1bn to support her Brexit which they now refuse to do our inept PM now trying to bribe Leave voters by giving them £1.6bn instead of the £13bn they will lose from EU.Lied/conned to vote Leave in 2016. Still lied/conned today.& still not getting it 
Will work out as tiny sums. Dwarfed by council cuts. Totally dwarfed by cost of Brexit damage  
Ever wondered what the Irish word for Brexit is?....  
#Brexit Message to all Parties from 17.4 million that voted leave the CRUMBLING EU. We’re all getting pissed off with all of you trying to derail Brexit. Stop arguing with each other everyday get on with Brexit FFS. The worst bunch of politicians of all time. Pathetic all.  
Theresa May’s “towns fund” designed get Labour MPs to back her Brexit deal hits the sweet spot of being an obvious attempt at a bribe while at the same time amounting to nowhere near enough cash to actually bribe anyone. Just like her withdrawal agreement, the worst of all worlds 
In fleeting moments of hopelessness, I think of how easy it would be to pack the bags and go back to Portugal, to our families & friends. No more Brexit anxiety.But, I couldn't be truly happy anywhere else other than Scotland. That's why I fight for #indyref2. For our future  
'Up to 70' Labour MPs oppose second #Brexit referendum, Caroline Flint claims Good work @CarolineFlintMP ! 
We have a Remain govt trying to do a potemkin #Brexit, thinking the public fools. Of course it's worse than Leave or Remain. It is a disgrace to the whole country, whichever way you voted.  
One thing that #brexit has shown me is that there is, in fact, a "magic money tree" after all.Funny that, I thought we were skint.#stopbrexit NOW 
"The #Brexit opportunity is great and need not be delayed."Jacob Rees-Mogg   MP for North East Somerset and elected lead of the European Research Group (ERG).  
Oooops... well done. #Brexit #May #Rosenmontagszug #Düsseldorf@zdfheute @ZDFlondon 
A little bit more light hearted if you think your day started poorly...When you're walking home... ....reading the paper...thinking that with the state of Brexit and @theresa_may that your day can't get any worse........it happens!Not once......but twice!  
If you're saying that Brexit is failing because the wrong negotiators are in charge, you *really* don't understand Brexit. That's like saying that a chocolate cake made of manure tastes bad because of the chef! 
BREXIT STRATEGY SUMMARY: Well it worked with the DUP... 
Jeremy Corbyn’s decision to support a fresh Brexit referendum enjoys the overwhelming backing of Labour voters in Leave-voting areas, new poll finds. 
T'other day, I heard Climate Change has barely been discussed in UK parliament for the past 2 years (presumably cos they've been squabbling over Brexit). Baffled how the FUTURE OF OUR WHOLE WORLD isn't deemed the most pressing issue of all time. #kidlit4climate @kidlit4climate 
Wonder why 'Leave' voting #Cornwall, having been assured of a 90% decrease in funding (£60M- £6M) after #Brexit, seems to have been neglected in the distribution of the £1.6B bribe.Surely it can't be anything to do with all Cornish constituencies having a loyal Conservative MP? 
There's no doubt,virtually 'all' out problems stem from the sheer numbers of legal & illegal migrants. From lack of funding for all services,education, housing, the NHS, crime, to Brexit. Had politicians had the gumption to see where it would lead we would not be in this mess. 
Friends! Pathetic rubbish!As Our Bunter says, Our Job is to report accurately that the 52% are wrong, and Our 48% should prevail, as all non-voters would obviously have supported Remain.And Our Sly News balances every pro-EU view with an anti-Brexit one.Talk about shameful!  
I suspect @MarinerWatches are deeply regretting their latest ad campaign.No doubt they will blame their marketing dept but surely the owners set the tone for the ad guys.Any respectable man who owns one of their products will be hiding it today.#indyref2 #brexit  
It’s weirdly true that on all sides everyone is doing their best to make Brexit less likely. 
Can't wait for this case, lots of disclosure....suggest this is 'Exhibit A'  
.@PennyMordaunt on @BBCWomansHour saying Govts #Brexit deal will make women better off. That’s NOT what her own Govt assessments predict. We will be worse off by at least 4% but then Penny’s good at being economical with the truth ... still waiting for #Turkey to join #EU ... 
Britain will enter 'zombie world' if MPs don't back May's #Brexit deal warns minister as hardline Brexiteers give her three tests she must pass to win their support  
Could sit on the bench with keita and shaq watching the Brexit midfield run riot  
Another reality of what Brexit is delivering. We don’t have to do this, it’s costing our most vulnerable people the most. @peoplesvote_uk 
Leaving the European Union will be absolutely catastrophic for the UK, say all those affected by Brexit Derangement Syndrome and MPs like @GregClarkMP, @DavidGauke and @AmberRuddHR. Meanwhile, in the real world in @Telegraph 04.03.19 
Norway seemed so obvious the day after the referendum with the 48/52 split and with 25 days to food-shortages or street riots or May’s deal it still seems pretty obvious and I JUST DON’T UNDERSTAND why everyone else seems to have lost their minds. 
The @Conservatives and @Jacob_Rees_Mogg must KNOW that May’s Deal with or without the backstop is NOT Brexit and totalling unacceptable to the 17.4 million? Why are they such lemmings! How can they even consider backing it? It’s beyond therapy! Beyond stupid! Suicidal! Insane!  
"Donald Trump’s proposals for a trade deal with the UK after Brexit would lower food standards, increase NHS costs and bankrupt British farmers. It’s yet another example of how we will be poorer and weaker after Brexit." 
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 4: Meanwhile, Jeremy Corbyn just can't make up his mind what to do with #Brexit! When he eventually does, he misses the point entirely then disappears...  
The bribe that is being offered by Theresa May to back her bad Brexit deal is just a fraction of the cash taken away from Stockton Council is the last few years.  I for one won't insult my constituents by having anything to do with it. 
Powerful illustration of the challenge any UK govt faces. Little to do with our EU relationship. Understandable anger manifested itself in an anti-establishment, anti-politics, anti-status quo vote in 2016. Sad irony is that Brexit was won by establishment charlatans #RightToVote 
With all the talk about AS and Brexit, don't let us forget what we are fighting for.NHSUCpolice cutHomelessness In work poverty Elderly poverty Council cutsEducation cutsHigh rail faresHigh bus faresThe only party to change this is LABOUR VOTE LABOUR NEXT GE. 
If the Tories can afford £1.6 billion (over 7 years) to bribe MPs into voting in favour of the Brexit economic meltdown they've cobbled together, they could have afforded not to slash those local government funds in the first place.Tory austerity is a choice. Always has been. 
People outside the Westminster bubble are not being listened to. It's time that MPs realised that the country expects the Referendum result to be honoured #March2LeaveSign up today:  
The amount of money flowing into retail investment funds in the U.K. plummeted more than 85% last year to £7.2 billion from £48.5 billion the year before. Analysts say Brexit is mostly to blame.  
If she delivers Brexit on time and in full, they will find their home in the Conservatives ... But if she does not – if she fudges, delays or reneges – then they will know exactly who to blame. - @OwenPaterson 
Corbyn was punched by a Brexit supporterImagine the headlines if any other politician had been punched  
This @IpsosMORI graph disproves the claim that the EU Referendum unleashed a wave of xenophobia and anti-immigrant feeling.This looked like a healthier environment to have the, long overdue, grown up debate about our need and appetite for immigration.(HT @BobbyDuffyKings) 
Here's the twisted logic: the referendum result is being treated as binding, but had it actually been binding, would've been voided. @theresa_may MUST #RevokeArticle50 TODAY! 
Simply political bribery. This funding pales in comparison to the detrimental impact leaving the EU would have on left-behind communities. We need real investment in these towns, and an end to Brexit.Demand a People's Vote >  
"Brexit has shone a powerful spotlight on our system of government - particularly severe failures in Whitehall - that we must now deal with.."David Campbell Bannerman MEPConservative Member of the European Parliament for the East of England.Follow David >> @DCBMEP 
That's our letter in from the German Government, preparing for a no deal Brexit, and asking us to apply for residency so we can continue to live in our own home and continue to work. Words can't express how I feel about this UK Government.   
Brexit:Bad for healthBad for patientsBad for the NHSPlease help us stop Brexit by contributing to our crowdfunder 
The lies told about Corbyn:-terrorist sympathiser-Russian spy-Hard Brexiter-Betrayer of Brexit-Anti-SemiteSome people sharing this stuff genuinely believe it because they're very unintelligent. But many do so knowing they are lies. They do it to destroy him and it's evil. 
Remain MPs should realise that those who fight for a proper Brexit aren't doing it as some kind of personal indulgence - they're speaking out for 17.4 million Leave voters.  
Read this on how councils have been forced to sell 12,000 public spaces in the past four years alone  Next to today's bribe for Labour Leave towns Such cynicism is partly why people voted for Brexit in the first place. Disgusting. 
May accused of 'bribing MPs' with £1.6bn post-Brexit fund for deprived towns  
All part of the big brexit pantomime con.  I’m convinced all MPs were just playing the role they’d been given.  Some good guys, some bad guys and some flip flop guys.  But they were all singing from the same treacherous hymn sheet, from day one. 
Any Labour MP daft enough to buy this Tory Brexit Bribe will buy a bridge I've for sale over the River Tyne. As @RuthSmeeth pointed out her slice of Stoke will lose more in Universal Credit cuts alone than it could hope to get back 
I see it's 3 weeks until Brexit and we're still making grand, sweeping statements about trade policy without a single specific. Cool. What are some products you feel are currently unfairly locked out of the EU?Why and how?Is there political will in the UK to let them in?  
Govt by bribery: £80m to Nissan. £1bn to the DUP. And now £1.6bn to Labour MPs to vote for May's Brexit deal. We used to laugh at countries that did business this way.  
Anna Turley(Redcar MP) - Theresa May's trying to "bribe" MPs really undermines democracy... whatever deal comes out of the #brexit process has to go back to the people to be confirmed & I would advocate for remain.#peoplesvote #FinalSay #alloutpolitics @annaturley 
We're 25 days from exit day, there's no sign of a plan that will deliver a deal, and businesses... not super happy. The @CBItweets Brexit and @CBI_Economics teams were in Edinburgh, Newcastle, Nottingham and Leeds last week talking to companies and... some observations (1/x) 
"Wales' Brexit vote had deeper roots than many are willing to admit". Some historical thoughts on the vote to leave.  
In a letter to Times, Lord Thomas of Gresford, QC was clear:  receiving money in exchange for a vote is a crime under Section 2, Bribery Act@UKLabour MPs who are tempted should also note that the burden of proof is quite low. Facilitating Brexit might mean a stint behind bars  
An extra £1.6bn over 6 years to bribe English Labour MPs to vote for May’s Brexit deal. No bribes from Scotland? Clearly they know that SNP majority won’t be bribed, whilst they think Labour MPs in England might. Says it all, really.  
@gtbho extends a much needed olive branch to Remainers, Brexiteers, lefties + righties, to come together again and come along to @tfbrexit's national tour, to hear out proposals from the left on how #brexit can and should transform Britain for the better! 
Just your daily reminder, if it were ever needed, that Theresa May is:-XenephobicRacistCheatLiar She knows the referendum was corrupt but carried on.She had her majority taken away from her in 2017 but carried on regardless.Fit to be Prime Minister - not 
The London Labour conference voted overwhelmingly for a second referendum yesterday - a united Labour party supporting Jeremy Corbyn’s policy to enable the country to stop Brexit 
The 2016 referendum was so corrupted, were it binding a court would have invalidated it. The 2016 referendum was so corrupted, were it binding a court would have invalidated it. The 2016 referendum was so corrupted, were it binding a court would have invalidated it. 
This is one of the slow motion disasters unfolding while the whole political class is consumed by Brexit  
The Tories are planning to bribe Labour with £1.6 billion in funding for poorer regions (paid over 7 years) to win Brexit votes. But under current system of EU support, they would have expected £13.7 billion. So that's a £12.1 billion CUT for having left. 
Potentially the most interesting development regarding Brexit for some time: don't expect to hear a word about it, however, on @BBCNews as it doesn't fit their narrative. 
BOOM: Surge of European investment into Brexit Britain, more than doubled over past three years. More great news! 
And would you guess who the  PM would reward/bribe? Northern Ireland and England - the only jewels in the iron crown of her precious union #breakinguk #brexit  
Donald Trump will almost certainly be indicted the day after he leaves the White House. I wonder how many Tory MPs will be indicted when we find out what they've been up to with regard to #Brexit. I suspect there will be quite a few! #RevokeArticle50 
Has anyone seen a single TV report on 400,000 Brits having their rights fully guaranteed in Spain after No Deal Brexit, contrary to media scaremongering?  
Anna Turley whos constituency voted 67.7% to leave was on Sky this morning promoting Labours betrayal, a second referendum, people of Redcar she does not respect you or your democratic decision, punish her at the next vote.ANOTHER SELF SERVING MP 
Finally ministers acknowledge that many voted for #Brexit because their communities have been gutted by austerity.Govt has slashed local spending by billions since 2010.They've taken bread from communities & now boast of handing back a few crumbs. This pittance is an insult.  
Politically, a long extension of the Brexit process would be awful for the whole countryAnd I’m hearing a short extension would disrupt businesses ready for 29 MarchBut from a policy point of view, Martin Howe makes a great case: 
Only the Tories could purposely hack tens of billions from deprived areas over a decade - and then bung them £1.6bn as a means to buy support for Brexit.  
Just found out this morning that another person I know is leaving Scotland in a couple of weeks, not because she wants to, but because she is too afraid of the complications arising from Brexit. Another loss for our country of a hard-working young person  
Today the PM will make a desperate attempt to get support from MPs for her botched #Brexit deal by bribing them with £1.5bn.Yorkshire will be offered just over £200m. @bradfordmdc has been cut by £256m alone since 2010.@theresa_may we are not fooled! Call a General Election! 
If we brexit we will be once again a pawn under the control of the USA 
Brexit in a nutshell. Tories bribe MPs with £1.6 billion in money for poorer regions, vs the £13.7 billion those same regions are already getting from the EU now. (That's one of the great things about the EU: it *forces* money to be spent on those who need it the most.)  
Wow. this is fascinating. Adjust for education and age is not the decisive factor in support for Brexit it is assumed to be! Young people without higher education are just as likely to favor leave as older people with no he.  
Welcome new evidence British people are becoming more positive about immigration.Why? My view is the Brexit debacle has forced the media to report on the amazing contribution to Britain by immigrants eg in our NHS.Bring on @peoplesvote_uk 
Theresa May is trying to bribe Labour to vote for her Brexit deal by promising them £1.6bn, or, to put it another way, roughly 0.6 Chris Graylings  
Cameron was reckless & cowardly. But I believe he was a One-Nation Tory. May seemed cold, intransigent, xenophobic, but not far right. I think she's worse. I see something evil in her cold stare, in her recitation that she is delivering Brexit, even tho without merit or legality. 
Theresa May's £1.6bn Brexit bribe for Northern towns is over 6 years-  only £260m a year. A tiny sum when comparing the amount austerity policies stripped from public budgets. Another Tory con. EU development & social funds for UK regions total £1.56bn a yr or £9.34bn for 6yrs...  
Government one-off bribe to get Brexit through:£1.6 billionGovernment's own prediction of the minimum - repeat minimum - impact Brexit will have EVERY YEAR on the economy£78 billion (3% of GDP) 
This is time for bold optimism & decisiveness. The prime minister is imploding. As with all regime collapses power will shift to those with the best leadership & plan. Now Labour has come out for a referendum we need to lead a popular front to Stop Brexit & Rebuild Britain 
Imagine being so naive you would trust May to give a bigger investment into leave areas post Brexit 
Even by the standards of May's politics, spending money to get John Mann to back Brexit is surely some kind of new low. What next: money for Norfolk to persuade Liz Truss to back deregulation? 
OTD in 2018 two  non-GRU gay sports nutritionists visited UK & only went to Salisbury twice at the same time Britain decided to kill #Skripal with a nerve agent only Russia uses so as to sanction us cos nice Tory bankers want to stop Russian money as Brexit is working so well 
I don’t think MPs who say they’ll deliver Brexit to get votes in an election, and then do the complete opposite when elected, should be rewarded with a pay rise. Me for @ConHome: 
The extraordinary growth in British support for immigration disrupts a lot of Brexit narratives.  
James Brokenshire says £1.6bn fund ensures “none of our UK is left behind”...Apart from Wales and Scotland, of course, who don’t get any...Then again, when you realise it’s spread over 6 years, it’s hardly worth worrying, eh? #brexit #crapbribes 
Theresa May 'Brexit bribe to push deal through parliament' rejected by Labour MPs - follow live updates  
A Knife Crime epidemic, a homelessness crisis a collapsed NHS, abandoned towns, child poverty, austerity, Brexit and Theresa May Govt betting tea at the fucking Ritz for PM to say ‘Simples’ in Parliament.. Are you Real?!?  
She has to go now ..........Delingpole: May's Awful Brexit Deal Is an Act of National Suicide  
Supporting Brexit is condoning lies bribery corruption dirty money illegal data harvesting deliberate deception & law breaking..... why? 
The Brexit bribe is pathetic in comparison to what UK regions receive from the EU.  May's Stronger Towns Fund  - £1.6bn over six years / £266m per year. European Regional Development & European Social Funds to UK regions 2014-2020 - £9.34bn over 6 years / £1.56bn per year. 
Friends! I too will be releasing a rock song, which I hope will lift you up!Its catchy title will be: "Let's Smash Brexit, Which No-One Voted For, Apart From A Tiny Handful Of 17,410,742 Bigots Who Were Taken In By LIES On A Bus"Talk about making your day a little easier!  
I don’t think those in Parliament who’ve sought to frustrate this process and delay Brexit have fully thought through what they’re actually doing.What we need from all our political leaders now, and every MP in Parliament, is the courage to be willing to walk away. pic.twitter.com/i23zlvg1X5 
Those calling on MPs to vote for PM's #BrexitBetrayal or risk losing #Brexit, really don't get it.PM's #BrexitBetrayal is WORSE than our present membership.It keeps the EU dictators in control of UK for evermore, with no exit door.No MP in their right mind can vote for that. 
#Brexit will cost UK economy 3-5% of GDP, so ~£100 billion.But that's OK, because if you're very, VERY lucky your town may end up POOR enough to get a SMALL SHARE of £1.6 billion SPREAD OVER 5 YEARS from May's #BrexitBribe.Could almost pay for a new footpath!BRILLIANT! 
"This towns fund smacks of desperation from a government reduced to bribing MPs to vote for their damaging flagship Brexit legislation." – @johnmcdonnellMP 
ICYMI: over the weekend, new polling revealed that Labour voters in the party's heartlands back a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal.  
Unelected former SDP splitter. Or is that spitter? A man who was so arrogant that he presumed the referendum would go his way and is determined to trash democracy.  
I’ll be on radio Kent soon talking about how well prepared we are for Brexit now less than 600 hours away.  This will affect Kent the most, listen in. @BBCRADIOKENT 
If Sky's champion pie eater read the conservative withdrawal agreement, ( which he clearly hasn't ) he would understand it is not Brexit at all.Bunter is just part of the MSM conspiracy to keep us in.  
My Western Mail story asking questions about a £140m payment to NI outside normal Barnet allocations.Today the British Government announce a £1.6bn for the constituencies of English Labour MPs willing to vote for PM Brexit deal.Welsh taxpayers money being used to buy votes.  
Tory councillor suspended by party for ´racism’ for agreeing with tweet saying there is ‘probably’ Isr/US involvement in the A/S  witch-hunt & that it’s all about removing Corbyn. But of course it’s not ´racist’ to claim -w/o evidence, Russia behind Brexit. Some conspiracies r ok  
So, Theresa May is going to give money to deprived areas of the country as a bribe to get their Labour Party MP to vote for her deal. But where is this money going to come from? Perhaps the £35 million a week #Brexit premium. Oh no, that's already earmarked for the NHS. LIES!!! 
POLL: 62% of Tory members oppose MPs voting on No Deal Brexit. Remainer Parliament blocking a proper Brexit would be an absolute disgrace!  
Some numbers for context. Government offers just £1.6billion over 7 (SEVEN) years for towns in the Midlands & NorthEU funding in the UK has been £55billion since 2014Crossrail in London costs £17.6billioneconomy already £23billion smaller than was forecast due to #Brexit 
WATCH: Theresa Mays Tory Brexit ShitShow explained in 26 seconds pic.twitter.com/KB94pSAp77 
The Northern Ireland Secretary didn't realise Ireland can be sectarian.The Brexit Secretary didn't realise the importance of Dover/Calais.Transport Secretary doesn't know anything about anything other than how to piss away our money.So...  
Or as Lord Lawson put it: ‘Brexit is the opportunity to complete the Thatcher revolution.’ Disreputable that ⁦@CarolineFlintMP⁩, ⁦@JohnMannMP⁩ & ⁦@gareth_snell⁩  should be the handmaidens of Thatcherism pic.twitter.com/ol8nLPfg9J 
Why the UK cannot see that Brexit is utterly, utterly stupid  
Richard Corbett would love a second Referendum because If Remain won he would still continue to receive £80k+ and expenses which are not examined.Con Corbett Labour MEP has done his utmost to stop Brexit .He’s an EU puppet.  
This polling  along with the PM’s pathetic, insulting ‘Town’s Fund’ bribe today should make it even more obvious that the public must have a #finalsay on the #Brexit deal #putittothepeople 
Kind of my point, “hardliners” word only applied to politicians who want Brexit, “those Conservatives who are currently not supporting their own government’s Brexit” are also Remainers.  They’re taking a hardline against referendum result and government.  
If U want to vote Sanwo-Olu,a puppet who is remote controlled from Bourdillon & a man who Ambode publicly declared in a world conference as MAD,that's ur problem. For some of us,the guber election in Lagos on Saturday is a referendum on freedom & godfatherism.We must rescue Lagos 
With communities due to lose £billions in European Structural & Investment Funds (ESF, ERDF) because of this disastrous #Brexit, the real question is...why are Ministers replacing barely HALF of the funds our towns currently get through the #EU ? Where’s the rest of the money? 
Brexiters. This is the shambles you voted for. Liam Fox will fail to sign the 40 free trade deals he promised for "the second after" Brexit. Support a #PeoplesVote now and end this shambles. 
Once leaving with no deal is ruled out, the EU have us right over a barrel!!!!! We know it, the EU know it, everyone knows it! Those fools who keep trying to get no deal off the table are living in some twilight world in the hope of reversing the referendum. I'm so angry! 
Not refused, he withdrew his application. He denies it, but it is obvious he would have had to be tax resident in France, which meant losing his HoL seat. Wasn't an issue before Brexit. 
On this day in 2017: yours truly ... and some other folk who turned up at the North East for Europe event. They didn’t wear yellow vests, but nothing much has changed, really: racism has always been at the core of Brexit.  
I always said once the Tories stitch us up over Brexit they will try and bribe us by throwing loads of money at leave areas.PM pledges to invest in communities who ‘have been ignored’ with £1.6bn fund  
So far £4.2billion of taxpayers' wasted on Brexit. And the gov't offers a measly £1.6 billion to worst hit local councils across six years in England only.  
When future historians are combing twitter to locate the source of Brexit, they will stumble upon this thread and read it, in wonder, until the very last tweet. Then they will have found it.  
Brexit news summary, Mon March 4 2019:1. The Department for Exiting the EU is haemorrhaging staff - a quarter of all its civil servants quit in the last six months2. A new Kantar Retail report warns that supermarkets are preparing for possible food shortage disturbances. 
Please buy @PrivateEyeNews, turn to pages 11-13 & read the investigation into Tory party treasurer Ehud Sheleg.Among many insights you will glean are the connection between the Tories, bent Russian money & Theresa May's Brexit approach.@BrandonLewis is apparently saying nowt. 
Who will explain to the PM @10DowningStreet that these towns will lose out on European Social funding if Brexit goes ahead and the “stronger towns fund” comes nowhere near compensating this?  
This is why We Are not getting the Brexit we voted for!  
Secretive billionaire Robert Mercer, who funded Trump and co-founded Cambridge Analytica, is suing Channel 4 over his portrayal in Brexit documentaryI’m sure he’d hate it if you RT this link with more detail of his activities:  
When will global warming be blamed on Brexit supporters? The "alleged" attacker "believed" to have supported Brexit.... So in other words the Guardian blatantly just made up lies...... (Again).  
Could Gina Miller’s next move compel the EU to delay Brexit? | Matthew d’Ancona  
I woke fuming. Tories have slashed many billions from  budgets of poorest councils since 2010 & now they want us to feel grateful for the pittance they intend to dole out (in England only) over six years. It's corrupt, patronising, pathetic. All to appease the Brexit monster. 
“Despite Brexit”?  
In December 2016, when I decided to move back to Germany because of #Brexit, most people didn’t understand because it couldn’t be „that bad“. But the major trajectory - fantasy politics eventually clashing with reality - was evident back then. 25 days to go and nothing is sorted. 
Quaintly Mrs May finds a fund for  "left behind" English communities days before the next Brexit vote. Will Labour MP's from Leave constituencies fall for  such a modest bribe given that it's a bidding lottery? 
Labour Brexit supporting MP finds the government promise that his vote will bring a new economic dawn to Stoke is not all that he hoped. He will have to find another reason to explain why Brexit is good for his town.  
Horrific knife crime epidemic 20,000 Coppers gone, Theresa May’s Brexit Bribes to towns abandoned, communities in pieces, a decade of Tory neglect, as Tory Deputy Chairman James Cleverly mocks violent assault on Jeremy Corbyn .. we are all ‘Less Safe Because of the Tories’  
The EU clearly wants to trap us in the backstop or else they would agree for it to be time-limited. We MUST walk away. Any MP that votes for the WA will be overturning the referendum result and we will not forget.  
“There Isn’t a Magic Money Tree” @theresa_may£1.5 billion for the DUP to buy government £60 million to Nissan to keep production in UK£1.6 billion Brexit Deal Bribe for poorer towns£33 million to Eurotunnel for govt incompetence#Bribery #Corruption #PeoplesVote #GTTO 
Tory Brexiteers are prepared to settle for a “hop, skip and jump” Brexit – letting Theresa May's deal pass so the UK can leave the EU on time. After that they can look to ditch May and ensure Brexit will become as 'hard' as possible... #BeAfraid #StopBrexit 
Wow - communities secretary James Brokenshire says the government's £1.6bn towns fund/Brexit bribe is over *six years*. That's about £260m a year. In government funding terms that's a pathetically small sum. 
Best article I've read on brexit for a long time. Addresses all the absurdities.Please read and RT to anyone who's confused or distracted by the blizzard of disinformation that passes for politcal discourse in the UK. 
..... & after 3 years you're saying to people 'Shut up, we don't care if Leave won the referendum.  We don't care we lied on our manifesto.  We don't give a damn about democracy & don't care about the majority of our constituencies who voted Leave'.  
Outraged by "stronger towns fund"I'm sure a major cause of climate that persuaded many to vote Brexit was wealth disparity.So this fund good, needed and far too late.But why suffer negatives of Brexit?We don't need to leave EU to do it.So just do it.Are we that gullible? 
Slowly but surely the finite nature of the choices available become obvious to all.1. The current deal with backstop largely as is (effective CU likely)2. No Deal - substantial economic disruption3. No BrexitThe end of the age of unicorns.  
£1.6bn bribe for poorer towns as May seeks Labour backing for Brexit dealEU funds regions based on level of need; this plan uses funding to buy support for government policy. It is cynical and anti-democraticSouth West, with loyal Tory MPs, loses out 
Remember how EU agrees funds to meet need to reduce inequality? UK govt finds funds to meet vote needs of Theresa MayPuts our money where her needs are#porkbarrel #magicmoneytree #brexit 
Just think how different 2016 might have been if the government found more than £1 billion from the magic money tree to help Britain’s poorest towns *BEFORE* the #Brexit vote.... 
If May delivers on Brexit she will win back Conservative MPs' loyalty, if she fails they'll know who to blame, says Rt Hon Owen Paterson Mp  
#Notts will get £5.5 million a year #StrongerTownsFund for 4 years #Beeston #Kimberley #Stapleford will want their fair share to improve town centres & support vital local groups like #BroxtoweCitizensAdvice The reality is it’s small beer to buy #Brexit votes. 
Utterly is right. We can't ignore the illegality at the heart of Brexit.  
The Times - BrexitDaily Mail - BrexitThe Sun - BrexitTelegraph - BrexitMirror - RemainGuardian - RemainIndependent - RemainDaily Express - Diana 
Professor Gavin McCrone has revealed he has begun to change his mind about Scottish independence because of Brexit 
Anyone who advocates spending billions on Trident, the monarchy, DUP deals and Brexit is in no position to lecture the Scottish Government on its finances. 
Absolutely! Brexit has shone a powerful spotlight on our system of government - particularly severe failures in Whitehall - that we must now deal with.  
Teresa May shamelessly gas-lighting the electorate with statistics, knowing that whilst Brexit is happening you can say anything you like about anything, regardless of the truth.  
105. Lower Cathedral Rd, Cardiff"I'm reaching the point of thinking that we should have a second referendum." - @Nigel_Farage 
No MP who believes in democracy would allow Brexit on current basis.There must be a second vote, if there is not this country will explode in anger at the  gross miscarriage of democracy.@Conservatives @uklabour @LibDems 
104. Hempshaw Lane, Stockport"Brexit means Brexit and we're going to make a titanic success if it." - @BorisJohnson 
And?? Look at Ireland, Scotland would have a head start!! The WM government are already talking about trading in the Euro if the pound becomes worthless after Brexit! Sick of yer petty gutter politics Scott!!  
103. Whitworth Rd, Rochdale"I'm reaching the point of thinking that we should have a second referendum." - @Nigel_Farage 
Adam Boulton is one of the biggest frauds on TV he has a political agenda and openly displays it all the time . He is anti Trump and anti brexit and it shows all the time . If some one gives a positive view on either he stops them speaking .  
Paltry £1.6bn 'bribe' for poorer towns as May seeks Labour's backing for Brexit deal should be contrasted with the €13bn our regions would receive if we stay in EU  pic.twitter.com/gOhLAjD2DB 
Despite #ProjectFear...Europeans double UK investment since Brexit vote. Uncertainty around Brexit has not stopped companies on the Continent from embarking on a major deal spree in the UK, indicating faith in the economy’s long-term prospects.  
How generous! Theresa May tries to bribe Brexit-backing British towns with a £1.6bn fund. That's about an eighth of the amount we pay to the EU each year in membership fees  
Theresa May. "I think the people that voted in referendum knew what they voted for..."What risible drivel. We're a couple of weeks away from the deadline and nobody knows what we'll actually end up with.#Peoplesvote 
Oh I understand it all nowTheresa May needs extra time before the vote so she can use bribery and corruption to get labour MPs on her side .She is really good at wasting our money, isn’t she?@theresa_may How much more money will she waste to get ‘her’ Brexit.Shame on you 
You have demeaned democracy by endorsing a criminal referendum.  
Why the UK cannot see that Brexit is utterly, utterly stupid  
This is one of the many important post-Brexit debates: do we want to change standards or don’t we. Hiding this debate behind an attempt to sign as many FTAs as we can and push changes through by stealth is a risk to democarcy, which we always pretend we care about so much...  
4 working weeks to go before the planned #Brexit date, and still millions of Brits in EU26 and our families don't know what our rights will be the day after Brexit. It's scandalous. Our distress and anger is 100% justified. 
£1.6bn 'bribe' for poorer towns as May seeks Labour's backing for Brexit deal. Can it be backdated to 2010, please? Thanks. Knew you would.  
It's got to the stage now where mad brexiters are so brainwashed by the press and BBC, they believe they can attack the leader of the opposition physically.The man, half Corbyns age, attacking him seemed to have an idea Labour are stopping brexit! Wonder who put that in his head 
Documentaries used to be a great source of information. Now, the establishment is rushing to create documentaries & docu-series to brainwash the public & cover their tracks.It’s all a lie, folks. They are making series about things like BREXIT before it even happens. 
It says a lot about EU control and media bias and UK voter impotence when it comes to selecting our leader. Brexit is the great accidental revealer of all that is bad in our system of government. Thank God for Brexit. 
Brexit will destroy the #NHS 
Brexit is scheduled, ready or not, for March 29th. But neither Theresa May nor Jeremy Corbyn can necessarily deliver on recent commitments:  
this video just cleared my skin, wiped my student loan, dismantled the colonial patriarchy, ended brexit, impeached the president, vaccinated anti-vaxxers, and muted TERFs @theestallion x @theslumflower what power!!! my two faves!!!! 
Theresa May has promised $2.1 billion to boost poor towns—sparking accusations she's buying Brexit votes  
British PM May promises 1.6 billion pound fund for Brexit-backing towns  
Interesting to see how so many of our people - or bots pretending to be one of us - nowadays take disagreements on an issue and turn it into a referendum on one's blackness. Ava DuVernay is a sellout now? Mutha-effin' @ava?! Child please. You need to check ya self. 
The For Britain party is one of the most important movements to start in Britain. Leader &  Founder Anne Marie Waters is fighting to stop mass immigration, the indoctrination of Britains children, outlawing Halal and fighting for Brexit & much more! Watch her video below   
On this day 45 years ago Edward Heath resigned as Prime Minister. He triumphed in taking the UK into Europe. Sadly,  his successors - with rare exceptions - allowed the case for EU membership to be ignored. So began the steady drift to Brexit & isolation. Tragic.  
But you don't report on events.You invite more daft remoaners on @SkyNews than leave. You allow remoaners to repeat nonsense day after day.Sky investigations - rigged to promote the remain view & promote EU propaganda & scaremongering. @faisalislamSky is bias.#Brexit 
Could it have something to do with his discovering that, as a French resident, he couldn't avoid the Anti-Tax Avoidance Directive and would therefore be liable to having to pay much more tax in France than in a no-deal Brexit Britain? 
'A report from the UK’s ICO in November found there was “no evidence that [Cambridge Analytica] were involved in any data analytics work with the EU Referendum campaigns.”'?Hello @ICOnews?Is CA's CEO's claiming there was evidence? 
Seriously tho Bernie really needs to fix his Hillary/2016 problem. I think 2020 will be a referendum on Trump but if Bernie doesn’t fix it, it’s gonna be a huge problem for him to unify the Party./1 
The party of infanticide, €billion hospitals, an ever-expanding NGO industrial complex & a toxic mushroom pol called Varadkar who baldly lies that he's an EU shot caller whilst the Brexit mushroom cloud is poised to burst this country's bubble. This is a chernobyl party guys.  
The #Brexit fiasco in a Scottish nutshell. Makes me proud to be descended from Maxwells of Dumfries.If they+WWallace etc had succeeded w #Scotxit in 1300...well, prob no Amer Rev.  @janeygodley 
In towns, cities and villages across #WestPapua, people are rising up and demanding a referendum. pic.twitter.com/YiuJLslsf9 
Wake up and smell the coffee UK. You have been fed a pack of lies about the so-called benefits of #Brexit.  Wait until this incompetent bunch of MPs start trying to negotiate all the trade deals that are supposed to be out there. All the lies will then be exposed.  
The central Remain argument is "I can't be arsed with the hassle".#Brexit 
I thought this was a north side Melbounre gay but it’s an English pro Brexit fisherman  
Robert Mercer to sue over Benedict Cumberbatch Brexit drama  
And whilst we appreciate the situation you're in with your Leave voting constituents, we now know the referendum result is tainted through Tory lies and corruption, but what Labour said then, in 2016, still rings true today because it was the truth and is the truth.......  
Well there we have it. Pork barrell politics of the worst kind with dire consequences. Brexit will cost billions but there will be an attempt to buy folk off. Bought and sold by Theresa May yet we will all pay a price. Scotland has a choice, to be an independent Euro nation.  
"Those who voted Labour in 2017 in the Midlands and North favoured Remain by two-to-one in 2016, support Remain by three-to-one today; and, if given a referendum choice between Remain and Theresa May's Withdrawal Agreement, back Remain by four-to-one."  
We are now in the final years of Scottish Nationalism.They know it wont happen. They know we dont want it. They know they have to force a referendum eventually. They know their political careers will end when we reject it.They are simply milking it for as long as they can. 
In the court of appeal on 21 Feb the council for Mrs May, James Eadie QC stated that the Govt know that had the referendum been binding it would have been judged illegal and voided as undemocratic due to multiple violations of electoral law. 
As you are aware:Sir James Eadie QC, for Theresa May, argued that Parliament had moved in on the process, it was too late for the law to be upheld. Any challenge now would prejudice good admin. There was he said, no error of fact, PM proceeded knowing the process was unlawful: 
look at the ratio of RTs & likes compared with the hundreds of replies disagreeing with your chosen course of action. who are you trying to please? it's not Labour voters, that's for sure. and any form of Brexit will harm your constituents. so...why are you doing this?? 
Felt a bit odd on #WestminsterHour this evening being told by two MPs, one Lab one Con, that I was being undemocratic suggesting a confirmatory referendum would be a good thing before we plunge into blind Brexit @BBCcarolynquinn @GeorgeFreemanMP @RuthSmeeth 
Here's an idea @theresa_may, stay in Europe, spend £39bn on those same towns you've brought to their knees through austerity and launch a public inquiry into all the people involved in the referendum corruption your QC said you know about and accept.  
I’m utterly dishearten by all the infighting I see on twitter. Socialists fighting over Brexit, AS and today Angela Rayner. We’re losing our cohesion. Our voices. The enemy is the Tories. We’re being manipulated. This is what they want. Divide and conquer. Sad. #socialistsunday 
Caroline, you're in possession of the facts regarding the damage any form of Brexit will bring your constituents and the country- as well as the unlawfulness of the ref' process. Yet you choose to be light years away from the right side of history.It is simply flabbergasting.  
If the proposed codicil to the backstop is legally meaningful then the #Brexit withdrawal agreement is legally meaningless. If the withdrawal agreement is meaningless then why would anyone support it, Parliamentarian or EU member state? Simples.... #RightToVote #FinalSay 
'Report accurately'  you're an anti-brexit, anti-trump gobshite; spewing out your own special mix of propaganda & selective reporting.  
A one-time bribe to be dribbled out reluctantly over several years, in exchange for trashing our economy for a generation. Does not compute. Especially not when study after study have shown that the worst Brexit damage will be felt by the most impoverished. 
Brexit was a con. And now it’s a busted flush. Rotting in the open. Time to put it out of its misery so the people of these islands can get on with flourishing. 
“A loss of trust in politics” is not a valid argument for forcing through a blind Brexit. If Parliament allows a deal that doesn’t deliver what Vote Leave promised in 2016, the public will rightly believe they’ve been misled. The only way forward now is a #FinalSay #RightToVote 
30 pieces of silver for Labour to betray the UK over Brexit.  
Please don't retweet this....it will just 'embarrass' Ruth Davidson!From July 2016Ruth Davidson: Next PM should NOT BLOCK Scottish independence referendum.... 
You run completely contrary to democracy. You want to repeat a referendum over and over again until you get the result you want.Just another autocratic scumbag! 
HONDA: Company reveals it invested in electric car production in Swindon before pulling the plugMore evidence that the decision to shut Swindon was not linked to global trends, but also due to Brexit. But we already knew that.  
Brexit so far.Costs:£1bn bribe for DUP£1.6bn bribe for Labour MPs£4.2bn Brexit preparations according to Treasury£490m contract for blue passports£33m Chris GraylingAnd what do we get in return? The most expensive 50p coin in history.#Brexit  
Marjorie Chorlins, VP European Affairs, U.S. Chamber of Commerce @Harvard speaking on US, EU, UK relations: "Brexit is lose, lose, lose...and the greatest loser of the three is the UK."  No illusions: US companies investing in UK dislike Brexit "whatever the Administration says" 
If wealth was shared more equally we wouldn't have had any Brexit. And yet, even given the massive and justified outcry, this is an insult.A pittance from the rich designed to pay off the poor.Do one Mrs May, we don't want charity, we demand fairness. 
"A desperate measure to buy votes... Voters will not be fooled." Independent Group Brexit spokesperson @Anna_Soubry on the government's announcement of a fund targeting areas of the country which voted to leave - just a few days before MPs vote on the Prime Minister's deal. 
Nearly 3 years after the Brexit vote, our largely pro-EU establishment still won't allow Britain to rejoin the independent and democratic nations of the world. With brazen disdain for the electorate and a shameless dishonesty, they strive to reverse the result.Incredible.  
By time SNP Conference looks at this document, the SNP ScotGov will be 3yrs into its 5yr #indyref2 mandate... and what effect might a possible hard Brexit a month earlier have on any #indyref2 opportunity? 
An it'll take more than an eleventh hour Brexit fund to fix a problem like this.  
Today:1) @jeremycorbyn got assaulted by a brexit supporter.2) Rachel Riley and James cleverly thought it was hilarious.3) The BBC ignored it completely.A small picture of everything that's wrong with this country. #IStandWithJeremyCorbyn#ChangeIsComing #EnoughIsEnough 
Today, Jeremy Corbyn was assaulted by a man who smashed an egg on his head. The attacker was an angry Brexit supporter Rachel Riley and Tory MP James Cleverly have made fun of the incident And yet, both have been vocal about the public safety of Remain and pro-Israel MPs  
Honour & pleasure to host President @AnastasiadesCY and delegation for a working dinner tonight, ahead of @RoyalFamily & PM meeting this week; we celebrated the success of our #UKCypriot diaspora and also discussed the latest developments on #Cyprob & #Brexit  
May’s offer: £1.6bn for ‘poorer towns’-IFS calculation: £19bn a year to balance impact of austerity -#Brexit bribe  
Flint before the referendum. Yet another weathercock putting her career before the good of her constituents pic.twitter.com/rmDJoD5Qj5 
I spoke to one Labour MP recently & they expected the size of this Brexit towns fund to be in the ‘tens of billions’ and front-loaded. A total of £1bn over 4-7 years (?) isn’t trying. It won’t make much difference or offset ongoing Tory austerity & falling investment. 
We pay for TV licences. Why does the BBC not reciprocate and produce a  Panorama type expose on Brexit lies and consequences rather than allowing  Brexit’s lying leaders equal unchecked coverage? Publish the truth please? @terrychristian @Anna_Soubry 
Still a few places left on our coaches to the #PutItToThePeople March  on 23 March.Tonight's the last chance to book a seat an an early-bird price of just £25. Come and help us show how many people want to put an end to this #Brexit nightmare! 
I see the Unionists have started early on Project Fear II. Independence will cause austerity, a new currency will doom Scotland, (it was keeping the pound will doom Scotland last time). Labour, Lib-Dem and Tory all think we're better off under a Tory Government and Brexit. 
We need a radical rebalancing to share wealth across our country, but May's bribe is a Judas kiss. Brexit will be another blow that disproportionately hurts deprived towns. The best thing for them is to remain inside the world's largest trading bloc.  
Based on responses of @lisanandy, @RuthSmeeth & @gareth_snell (and others who she needs to bribe to back her Brexit Deal), it would appear that the Prime Minister has spent £1 Billion just to annoy her own party.A #PeoplesVote is only way to address inequalities across the U.K. 
Theresa May announces £1.6bn towns fund - but Labour MPs for Leave-voting areas furious at suggestion their Brexit votes could be ‘bought’.Redcar MP @annaturley says: “If she is going to use this as a bung to get MPs to vote for her shoddy deal then she is shameless.” 
Britain doesn't need Brexit it needs a revolution. Long overdue. 
People will look back in years to come, incredulous that May planned hardship allowances and Martial law without first checking back with the people, that Brexit was what they actually wanted. 
That may not work out so well. In such cases--there won't be many--independent Tory candidates for Brexit are likely to stand in the election to give Conservative Leavers someone to vote for. Result? The Tories will lose seats they would otherwise hold.  
I’m afraidA) you have left it exceptionally late and we all know why (looking straight at your Front Bench and the 4 MsB) we can see the Rayners, Long Baileys and co trying to flog Corbyn’s Brexit still.All credibility lost.This Brexit is on LP too and we see you all. 
The 2 year A50 process has been wasted negotiating a 'transition period', effectively a 21 month extension to A50, & a 'backstop', an indefinite extension to the 'transition period'.May's Brexit is just one can kick after another, anything but actually leaving. 
Key target Ruth Smeeth tells #WestmimsterHour that PM’s £1.6bn town renewal fund to win Labour MPs’ votes for her Brexit deal is “an extraordinarily pathetic sum of money” and “a waste of time”. Oh. 
Corbyn egged. They know absolutely nothing about the attacker other than he's supposed to be in favour of Brexit. Absolutely nothing to do with visiting the most notorious Mosque in the Western world. No sir, that doesn't fit the narrative. MSM are a shit show! 
Don’t take it. It simply isn’t enough... your towns and cities are worth so much more and if Brexit has taught us anything, it is there is money for lawsuits, for no trade deals, for the DUP, for non existent ferries etc... Do not settle for small change.  
After decades of neglect a one-off payment designed to help the Prime Minister ahead of a key Brexit vote will fail, and it will confirm to people in our towns that the government is not serious in its commitment to our communities  
I hate to say this but I think Theresa May will get her deal through parliament because the leave turds are now scared of losing their precious Brexit. 
This is how screwed our democracy is....... THERESA MAY'S OWN LAYWER STATED THAT SHE WAS AWARE THE REFERENDUM WAS CORRUPTED BUT STILL PROCEEDED.THE REFERENDUM WAS SO CORRUPTED THAT JUDGES HAVE RULED IT WOULD HAVE BEEN NULLIFIED IF BINDING@A50Challenge @UKEUchallenge 
EU awaits UK move in Brexit talks, but “Not much is moving, actually, demands are always the same... The U.K side keeps on insisting on the same things, time limit and unilateral exit, we keep on explaining why this can’t happen.” 
May accused of bribery with £1bn to help towns#tomorrowspaperstoday@BBCHelenaLee#Brexit  
Why you would justify the centrepiece Brexit argument of Parliament not being sovereign by asking the EU to extend Article 50 on behalf of the U.K. is beyond the comprehension of anyone sensible. 
Trust in politics? Do me a favour, Mr Double! Do you really believe the nonsense that you type? Right now, I trust a handful of politicians and they are mostly in @TheIndGroup . The @Conservatives have shot any credibility they had thanks to #Brexit. Bunch of reckless charlatans. 
The timing is pure coincidence, Andrew, just as it was sheer coincidence that the pound happened to begin an unrelated downward trend on the night of the referendum and the rise in xenophobic attacks has nothing to do with the country voting for an anti-immigration project. 
As far as I can tell, this is the Brexiters Brexit process:1. We want to leave2. Lie3. We won.4. You lost. Get over it.5. Blue passports6. What now?7. Let her deal with it8. She’s not very good at this9. Run down the clock10. Ignore experts11. Blame everyone12.  
Brussels says that any attempt by MPs to delay Brexit by extending Art 50 for longer than a matter of weeks, is likely to come with strict conditions, such as the UK remaining in a customs union or ''agreeing to hold a second referendum''. The stitch up reaches its zenith... 
If your job is to report accurately then you are not very good at it.  If your job is to rubbish a WTO Brexit at every opportunity, load interview panels and your questions then you're spot on.  I used to like Sky News but now you're as bad as the BBC. 
RefereesOpposition fansWindLong grassSnowThe Boogie ExpectationsMan United’s injuriesAlex JonesBrexitNo VAR The SunThe MoonThe 2008 Recession What else will Liverpool, Klopp and it’s fans blame for them bottling the league? #LFC 
May is trying to buy off Labour MPs to back her dud Brexit deal.They must not be fooled. Brexit will leave every town poorer, and put jobs and public services at risk.Let’s #StopBrexit and fund our towns, cities and public services.Write to your MP. 
I don’t think this is new in Ireland @carolecadwalla In fact Ireland were v quick to shut down advertising etc in the abortion referendum.Back in 2013 I doubt that many of us were as switched on to the potential harm and damage possible. 
Not one thing in the official Skripal narrative adds up, but some people love it. Not one thing in the official Brexit narrative adds up, but some people love it. 
Boris believes that the British Armed Forces should be allowed to murder British citizens on British soil, ahead of brexit, this is a worrying position  
Keita, Wijnaldum & Fabinho have to start all of the final 9 games for us to have any chance. Stop rotating the Brexit dross in and out and just play our best team. 
Brexit and TrumpTrump and BrexitSame thing.Wake up Britain.We need an end to Brexit.The damage it has already done is enormous.Brexit was made, at least in part, by Putin.  
It is not whether they whip...it is what message they secretly give to MPs that defy the whip.A bit like the Brexit Referendum.Critical that we get over the message that we see them.  Rthey will not have ouwpr votes if they do this. 
Boulton should have been booted long ago. His overt bias shows though every piece he does relating to Brexit. The only reason he is still in position is because his opinions align with Sky's wishes, Mainstream press in this country is an embarrassment to non partisan viewers 
Make no mistake, remainers aren't calling for a referendum because "people know what they're voting for now". They think they're better. They wouldn't allow us to vote for no deal, or a hard Brexit, because their only aim with a 2nd ref. is to stop that from happening. 
Everywhere I go now people tell me they want a #peoplesvote to get us out of this mess. The number of voices I hear supporting Brexit are getting fewer. Time is short we have to fix this. #exitfromBrexit 
Brexit will destroy the Scottish economy, trade and employment. Why do you welcome that?  
Brexit: Honda reveals it had plans to make electric cars in Swindon before plant closure | Swindon Advertiser  
Are you sick of it yet?Are you sick of brexit?Are you tired of it clogging up the newsAnd taking up governmental bandwidth? Then listen to meIt’s true that the only wayTo stop hearing about itIs to vote brexit down in a final say 
What Brexit Means For You Brexit Will Be A Disaster For The People Of Ireland Seasaigí Le Sinn Féin / Stand With Sinn Féin  
The man who supported Single Market membership (key part of the Irish Peace process) before he realised he could use Brexit to get into the cabinet & now supports No Deal...Is now telling us not to put politics over morality in relation to the Irish Peace Process?Words? Anyone?  
Except you don't report accurately or in a balanced way. JHB is spot on. You portray Brexit politicians in an extreme light. You have called all Tory Brexiters as "Far Right". You are not a journalist, you are an activist. Sky News is #FakeNews 
What a nasty place this country has become#JeremyCorbyn is attacked today and the response by #rachelriley is to slur him and #JamesCleverly to applaud it.Sickening from both#Corbyn #uk #brexit #hatred #incitement 
No case for a second Independence referendum. Apart from the slight matter of it being a manifesto commitment of the party the people of Scotland chose to elect into government but hey, since when did Labour worry about democratic mandates?  
Ignoring for six years the recommendations of the royal commission after the last MMP referendum = not political opportunism. Applying them in-between two elections three cycles later = political opportunism.  
This shows the inconsistency in the remain arguments. Apparently there would be a mandate to have a EEA Brexit as that “technically” leaves the EU, but actually leaving the EU has no mandate... Sorry to disappoint you again. Like your legal challenge, you’re wrong.  
Morten Morland on #satire #cartoons #Brexit #TheresaMay #BrexitExtension - political cartoon gallery in London  
Ex Remainer MPs telling us what must happen over Brexit is never quite convincing  
All points which we have reported. “Hardliners” is a relative term and perfectly useful to describe those Conservatives who are currently not supporting their own government’s  Brexit.  
Only 70 Labour MP's are against a second referendum. So only 70 / 245 Labour MP's in Parliament respect the manifesto on which they were elected to parliament.Great way to restore trust in politics, well done to everyone involved you've really learned the lessons of 2016#Labour 
Well I was sitting right opposite you and I was hit between the eyes by your scathing analysis of the ongoing Brexit crisis and your withering assessment of the Secretary of State's political performance 
People are getting irritated with broadcasters using loaded language e.g. "hardliners". How is Jacob more of a hardliner than Chuka? Chuka is so hardline he left his party over Brexit and wants to reverse the referendum vote. 
No John, it's a patronising MP employing a Leave tactic we've long since exposed. Richard isn't saying that Leave voters didn't know what they voted for, you are, because you think your supporters are stupid enough to fall for your snake oil. Here's more of your kind..... 
Yet another ruinous Brexit delay leaves more than 100,000 companies in the lurch (via @bopinion) 
Just a reminder, for anyone who’s interested, to sign up for my new weekly newsletter on Brexit, sanity and life. Box at foot of my home page: . Will focus more on broken country than broken foot (or oven).Please RT if you think your followers might like it 
I hate to break it to you, but we're 26 days from crashing out of the EU without a deal.This will damage Scotland beyond what most can fathom just now.Nicola cannot call a referendum within 26 days.Unless a miracle occurs, you'd best buckle up for the incoming shitstorm! 
I don't like using the word "stupid". But after 3 years, if you're still saying "We can't have referendums until you get the answer you want"...The 2016 referendum said NOTHING about what relationship we were exchanging EU membership for. If we ratify this new one, that's it. 
After 9 years of austerity Theresa May thinks £1.6bn over 7 years will swing Labour MP behind Brexit? I won’t sell my vote.I demand ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩May pledges funds for Labour towns in bid to win Brexit support  
Personally, I have no interest in an apology from @DanielJHannan. But like all those Brexiters who told us we'd be fine, he needs to own what the Brexit he so desires helped unleash   
Have you seen this @brexit_sham?@RealBristolNews @peterjukes 
The brexit referendum was so corrupt a court has deemed that it it had been binding it would have been invalidated.  
Nigel Dodds MP, leader of the DUP at Westminster, tells #Westminster Hour that his party wants to see “treaty-level change”, before it will support the Prime Minister’s Brexit deal:  
I gather we’re still waiting for Corbyn to mention election fraud or Russian money at the Referendum.Not once has it crossed his lips.Why? 
Both the Conservative Party and the Labour Party are finished, Brexit has exposed both main parties for the anti democratic rogue charlatans that they are!! The Electorate Demand Change!!!  
Noble: "There sure a lot of fire/fighting pokemon. But aren't the ones that weren't more popular?"Ashley: "Yeah."Noble: "Like Braixen."Ashley: "But that wasn't the final evolution."Noble: "Oh, what was it?"Ashley: "Brexit."Noble: *laughing* I don't think that's a Pokemon." 
Oh fuck yesRIP Brexit@sazmeister88 @MadeleinaKay @abcpoppins @BrexitBin @nickreeves9876 @JNM1000 @abcpoppins 
"It is a principled commitment to stand side by side with our European neighbours, friends and colleagues, that should have been made within hours of the Brexit result." writes @holyroodmandy about the #CostaAmendment 
Surely @BorisJohnson would’ve met Tusk or Juncker a few times as Foreign Secretary? You’d wonder what he did as @Telegraph Bxl correspondent for 5 years if he can’t work out how the EU is structured esp as he was reporting on the EU when it came into being..... #brexit  
But Labour didn’t win the election and many people in Streatham (my neck of the woods) voted for Chuka mainly on Brexit. And Fiona stood on a platform that didn’t include perjury and Chris on one that didn’t include anti-semitism 
On @NZMorningReport, @nzgreens MP @golrizghahraman confirms her party wants to reduce the #MMP threshold to 4% in time for the 2020 election, using a simple parliamentary majority, not by referendum or 75% supermajority. Completely corrupt & outrageous.  
a) Labour's Brexit position has actually softened since 2017, so this makes no sense.b) Arch-Brexiteer Kate Hoey increased her majority by 7,542 votes in arch-Remain Vauxhall, do you think that was a personal vote?c) Why don't we just test this in an election? 
As many as 70 Labour MPs oppose second Brexit referendum - so let’s stick with No-Deal shall we. Offer free trade (A24) & walk. Manage the exit as far as possible & then negotiate world wide. Any payment to the EU dependent of a comprehensive deal..  
The prick Lillico has given up trying to claim any economic arguments for Brexit and is now wittering about it being destiny ordained by God.  Lillico has gone Full Icke.  Never go Full Icke.  
Anyway let them continue when we’re rationing eggs and bread after Brexit no one will be laughing.  
It goes further. Many Remainers deliberately voted Labour in 2017 to deprive Theresa May of her majority (and did so successfully). To claim now that they were voting to accept a Tory Brexit as Caroline Flint is suggesting is a travesty and con like everything else about Brexit 
Yeah, because what the hell would someone *whose actual job as a Govt minister* was to prepare British farming for a No Deal Brexit know about how prepared British farming is for a No Deal Brexit? *rolls eyes*  
Quite hilarious watching the Scottish Conservatives slagging off a potential Scottish Currency for being vague, when we’re 27 days from Brexit and nobody has a fucking clue what’s going to happen. 
Caroline Flint pre referendum.Caroline Flint post referendum,I wonder what May has offered her of our taxpayer money?  
The London Labour conference voted overwhelmingly for a second referendum today - a united Labour party supporting Jeremy Corbyn’s policy to enable the country to stop Brexit 
Come to a decision.I will never vote for or support any individual who promoted Brexit or spreads lies about how great it will beAnd I will never vote for any party that supports it or enables it.Judgement so obviously fkawed I wouldn't trust them on anything. 
Barely a day goes by without the reality of what is happening exposing how utterly stupid our politicians are.  We have NOTHING to fear from Brexit.  
If Richard Leonard thinks we've "just had" an independence referendum, he'll have to explain why he's the fourth person to be Scottish Labour leader since then (not even counting interim leaders). 
Shad chancellor @johnmcdonnellMP tells @SophyRidgeSky he doesnt want to do anything to ‘disrespect” Leave voters. So why is he backing a 2nd referendum? 
Whilst large sections of the media focus on egg-throws and internal Labour disputes, let’s not forget the Tories are getting away with 30+ months of doing absolutely nothing to address Brexit. They’re trying to cling onto power while sabotaging our future.Let’s focus on them. 
Maybe she meant they’re “not looking to overturn the result of the *second* referendum”...?  
The illegality of the 2016 referendum, and @theresa_may compliance with that is the 2019 version of the ‘Emperor’s new clothes.’ Everyone from MPs to the media are pretending not to notice, too afraid to let the truth come out. 
Talk about living in a bubble !!!How dare she play silly games in parliament while Britain burns!How many other wagers does she and her hedgefund manager husband have riding on Brexit?This whole thing stinks !!!  
Another one for the "Despite Brexit" annals: London attracts more investment in commercial real estate than any other city in the world:  
To be fair to Richard Leonard I would rather there wasn't a 2nd referendum either. I would rather Nicola just told May to ram Brexit up her bahookie and start begging us for a good deal. 
Car Crash - Mackay fails on the warm-up question. He's playing Scots for fools if his currency plan is to use the pound then switch to a Scottish Currency at some unknown point in the future.Brexit shows we need a plan BEFORE the #IndyRef2 (which Scotland does not want). 
Perhaps Len should read his job description againHe's supposed to be fighting for his members not fighting for #Brexit  
This situation is beyond absurd - but here is the hard question. How much humiliation are the likes of soft Brexiters like Brady and hard Brexiters like Mogg prepared to endure? Or, to put it another way: how humiliating must Brexit become for them to accept it shouldn’t happen? 
This is Brexit.#StopBrexit 
WATCH: This lady (from Wiltshire) voted leave but at the time she did not consider that #brexit would lead to so many companies pulling out of the UK e.g Dyson. Now if she had the chance she would choose to stay, she is a #remainernow#FinalSay(Source: ) 
If the #May Govt fails to deliver a truly acceptable Withdrawal Agreement to Brexiteers then the #ERG / #DUP must defeat the Govt and force a General Election .. there is no way we can accept being cheated of our democratic Referendum mandate of June 23 2016 
I see that @Morrisons in Aberdeen have their post-Brexit range in early.  
What Rory means is that the @Conservatives don't want a General Election because they'll get obliterated I think it's exactly what we need unless Brexit is deliveredThere are millions of leave voters wanting their revenge  
If you need any more evidence that Brexit is morally indefensible, here it is. Not only in MacDonald's devastating question but in Mrs May's utter refusal to acknowledge that there is a question to be answered. I cannot describe how angry this makes me ...  
A great plan for Brexit:Remain 
Demand better than Brexit with us on 23 March. 
Tomorrow marks 25 days until Brexit day. In the next 25 days we will see if the UK is a democracy. Almost 3 years ago Brits voted leave. Our MP’s still won’t accept the vote & are trying to sabotage Brexit. If we don’t quit on time it is clear MP’s are unfit to run the country  
If Brexit isn't delivered, in full, will you ever vote for the Conservatives again?RT for wider sample 
Space on @rtenews for Brexit & GAA, plus hearing tests, but no room to cover @ExtinctionR march, even though they sent reporter, camera to coverGuess coming collapse of civilisation just not newsy enough for national broadcaster? 
Now the truth is coming out... Honda had plans to build electric cars at Swindon that would have guaranteed thousands of jobs for a generation. And they say it had nothing to do with Brexit!Hogwash.  
sheep farmers have been told to prepare to slaughter and then burn/bury10 million lambs if there is no deal #brexit. they will not be able to afford to feed them if they cannot sell them. 10 million. The UK people could promise to eat them, but that's not how markets work 
I hope we appoint Big Sam in the summer and then pay the £7m Aberdeen want for Scott McKenna. None of this tippy tappy nonsense, we'll do 10 in a row by playing hard Brexit footy. 4-4-fackin'-2 with defenders clearing their lines instead of playing out from the back 
me when i see people from the UK having to queue in the ‘Non EU passport’ line in the airport after brexit  
Hi @Nigel_Farage. Just wanted to clear something up. We Remainers don't want a 2nd referendum "because we lost". We want a 2nd referendum because if you and Vote Leave hadn't cheated & breached electoral law to get the outcome you wanted, we would have won fair and square. #FBPE 
The Danish prime minister says selling Brexit was the work of “some rhetorically skilled politicians who turned out to be untrustworthy conmen who subsequently left the sinking ship”. Hard to disagree with.  
He’s been on one of those “Brexit Support Lines “ they charge £1.45 per minute and make you wait until 29th March for an answer . 
The ERG’s latest idea is to support Mays deal and get out of the EU, then force a hard Brexit. The only problem is that the current deal on the Backstop would block that, hence today’s demands. Make no mistake, Mays deal is just a prelude to a hard Brexit. Labour mustn’t back it. 
If the EU guarantees the rights we have now (and I'm pretty sure they will), I suspect there will be a mass exodus post-Brexit of UK nationals who want a better life away from the xenophobic idiots who will be running our country. And net migration from the EU will be negative.  
Britain has had hard times before but we've come through..Let's shoot ourselves in the head...the bullet might miss the important bits & we can recover...#Brexit Britain FUBAR 
The Conservative Mayor for West Midlands, Andy Street, used £500 of taxpayers money on a chauffeur to drive him to meeting on HOMELESSNESS. Sums up Conservative party for me. I try my utmost to stop brexit and I don't honestly know why people R just letting them without a fight 
Could @thatginamiller's next move help to persuade the EU to delay Brexit for a meaningful period? #Article50 
Could you please tell me as a matter of urgency what steps you are personally taking to investigate the proven illegality fraud and foreign manipulation related to the referendum. That seems pertinent before you uphold it. 
'They'll be riots on the streets if we stop Brexit.'Er, I think not. #RevokeA50 
We promised the voters we would leave - if that means backing Theresa May's Brexit deal for now, so be it, says Janet Daley 
yes, the hardline Brexit supporter who followed Corbyn to a Mosque to chuck an egg at him was definitely doing so out of principled antifascist sentiments, this adds up  
A failure to deliver Brexit properly will do enormous damage to the reputation of the political class - which is already hanging on by a thread. pic.twitter.com/sOewePkhqN 
At last I can understand why Theresa May is pursuing Brexit despite making the British people poorer - if she gets it through by March 29 she wins a long weekend for two in Tenerife.  
Could Gina Miller’s next move compel the EU to delay Brexit? | Matthew d’Ancona  
Caroline, it is true that some ardent Remain supporters sometimes cross the line into arrogance.But to smear the whole movement with the faults of a few is narrow-minded.Brexit as sold is undeliverable. Do not ask me to honour a malicious hoax upon the British public. 
While the UK Govt is pushing through the Immigration Bill which removes all #citizensrights of EU citizens in the UK until they successfully apply for Settled Status, they also leave the @BritishInEurope at the mercy of 27 differing national 'guarantees' in case of no-deal Brexit 
Grim - Extra details indicate role of Brexit in HONDA decision: Company reveals it invested in electric car production in Swindon before pulling the plug  
"Some say because of subsidies farmers get, of course they love EUFarmer -"That's codswallop.. subsidies keep food prices down." #Brexit  
I am confused as to why suggesting that the public have a chance to vote on the actual deal is undemocratic. Treating an advisory referendum like an enabling act rather suggests extremism .  
After you've absorbed the above, you're probably ready to have a proper grownup conversation about Brexit. So here goes... 
Even if 17.4m still thought #Brexit was a smart move, it would nonetheless be madness. A country cannot embark on such an idiotic, disruptive project with the backing of less than one in four of the population.#RevokeA50 
Almost four in ten Labour voters voted Leave at the EU Referendum (37%), according to Ashcroft  polls.Indeed, seven out of ten Labour MPs represent constituencies that voted Leave and, of course, MPs represent ALL of their constituents not just those who voted for their party. 
Could Gina Miller’s next move compel the EU to delay Brexit? | Matthew d’Ancona  
There's no such thing as an extreme Brexit or Brexiteer. Extreme Brexit is a duplicitous term made up by Europhiles to describe the act of merely #Leaving the EU!What exactly does this say about @BBCNews? 
We do But let’s not kid ourselves. If Fekir had been signed, he’d still be on the bench on day 478383939299292 of “adapting himself” to Brexit-ball.  
David Trimble and Kate Hoey to PM: ‘Do not let groundless fears about Northern Ireland dictate your Brexit strategy’  
Remember when #FBPE said LAB would win if they backed a 2nd referendum......Still waiting.  
Patrick Blower on #ERG #jacobreesmogg #TheresaMay #Brexit - political cartoon gallery in London  
Labour voters in party's heartlands back fresh Brexit referendum21% of @UKLabour voters in North and Midlands said they opposed the dramatic policy shift – a figure dwarfed by the 66% in favourPlease share this with Labour #PeoplesVote sceptics 
Video 4 of 4: McCluskey on Brexit, leadership – and Labour’s real priority when millions suffering Tory govt  
This is Caroline Flint, ex-Europe Minister, who will vote against a further referendum but in favour of an improved deal (whatever that means) to take us out of the EU.  
No Julia the Remain side which didn't commit industrial scale criminal electoral fraud during the EU referendum campaign are the "democrats" #YourLotAreGoingToPrison 
Labour: "We're not looking to overturn the referendum...but we want another vote that could..."  
Will lawyers settle our Brexit destiny? - ITV News  
Brexit divided the country? No problem. We are all united in wanting City to win the league now... #AnyoneButLiverpool @tezza1976 
Well, you seem utterly delightful. Why don’t you look at the company’s own statements and look at analysis from automotive industry specialists. Very little to do with Brexit. But I’m sure you don’t care about that when it’s much more fun to just throw around insults. Bye. 
Former Armagh football captain Jarlath Burns has said the GAA should not remain neutral if there is to be a referendum on Irish unity after Brexit  
Indeed. MPs who simply want to honour the 2016 referendum result are routinely referred to as “hardliners”, “extremists” or “die hards”. A more accurate word would be “democrats”.  
And here's the same material as a PDF, so that you can print off the comparison of Theresa May's Brexit deal, no deal, and the no Brexit option of staying in the EU. 
Here's a handy at-a-glance comparison of Theresa May's proposed Brexit deal, no deal, and staying in the EU (please let me know if I've made any mistakes). Oh, and please share and RT if you found it useful. Thanks.  
I wonder if this Brexiter knows that the crusades were European campaigns in which the English were led by French speaking monarchs.#Peoplesvote #Brexit  
Dithering Remainer MPs must unite over Brexit for the sake of our country – anything else is a shameful betrayal, says @TheSun 
Would you be happy to eat chicken that's been washed in chlorine? EU regulations ban it but the US ambassador to the UK says if we want trade deals with the USA post-Brexit, we're all going to have to accept it. Will you?  
It was austerity from Tories and LibDems that caused Brexit - This is spot on we take no lectures from Tory enabling @LibDems (although I’m happy to work with them to fix their mess) 
Brexit means Britain loses  
Do you really think 28 countries have been working on trade for 40 years without giving themselves trade advantages over other countries?No?Then have we just chosen to put ourselves at a competitive disadvantage against 30-odd countries on our own continent?#Brexit 
Imagine that leading 'leave' campaigners got (officially and obviously) pulled into the Mueller inquiry?Where would that leave the (already proven) fraudulent referendum? 
Idea for getting Honda Swindon not to turn its back on the UK: stop opposing a People’s Vote and start opposing the Brexit catastrofuck which will destroy so many of your members jobs.  
Modern Ireland is a country..._  that voted in favor of GAY MARRIAGE in a national referendum- Voted to REPEAL THE 8TH AMENDMENT to give women agency over their reproductive rights - the political leader of the county is Gay and the son of an Indian immigrant... 
Jeremy Corbyn was hit by an egg by a Brexit supporter in London Israel supporter ‘Isaac’ @cjm9891 tweets it was a shame Jeremy Corbyn was not hit by a bullet or stabbed with a knife People like Isaac are weaponising anti-Semitism while inciting the murder of Jeremy Corbyn 
People are literally fighting to get into Brexit Britain from Eurozone France  
"A Brexit where there is no agreement would be very disruptive, and people need to understand that and the effect it would have on food."  
Long read for Sunday evening: Remainers should get ready for what this political chaos may bring. My latest Brexit Blog post:  
I'll buy Seema Kennedy a meal at Weatherspoons if she gets May to say Snap Election or Second Referendum or Grayling you're fired. 
Will lawyers settle our Brexit destiny? Should they?  
ERG must bring down the Govt if it betrays democracy and the nation. New parties, new leaders, new elections. Clean Brexit. 
A number of other options on the paper?There should only be 2 options in any referendum - leave with a deal or stay with a better one.@BremainInSpain No MP should respect the result of the frauderendum. 
All these Remain voters telling me "Brexit will hurt you the most mate!" because I'm from a working-class mining town.We've had nothing for a while 'mate'. The only thing we had was our COMMUNITIES & two decades of unchecked immigration have DESTROYED those thanks to the EU. 
"We want ppl to come and pick fruit/potatoes, as we don't want to do it ourselves".. And Leavers wonder why they're labeled bigots. #Brexit  
If ⁦@DavidLammy⁩ wants to end celeb photo opps in Africa he should stop trying to thwart Brexit & use it as the chance to slash tariffs on African imports.   
It is MPs like Ben Bradshaw who will restore Democracy and the Rule of Law to the UK . Don't forget, everyone, as Mrs May's lawyer Sir James Eadie QC told the High Court in London on 21 Feb, Mrs May KNOWS that the 2016 EU leave vote was corrupt and illegal as defined by RPA 83 
Meanwhile a Brexit supporter is almost murdered by being thrown over a road bridge whilst protesting in Exeter and the national press don't pay it any attention. I hope Jeremy Corbyn's dry cleaning bill isn't too hefty!  
Indeed. Flint is also ignoring the fact that last Thursday in the High Court in London, May's lawyer Sir James Eadie QC told the Court that May KNOWS that the 2016 EU leave vote was corrupt and illegal as defined in RPA 83 ie there is NO mandate for "brexit" - it is a fraud 
Brexit is a slow puncture.  You will be sorely missed  
Hi Mike, still waiting for your answer to my question, buddy. Why must the EU referendum be adhered to when you voted against implementing the welsh devolution referendum in 1997? Was ‘the will of the people’ more flexible back then? 
There has been much talk today about a good old fashioned British compromise over Brexit.Poll.Should we all compromise over Brexit? 
Thank goodness it was only an egg. The hatred being stirred up against Corbyn, portraying him as an antisemite and either pro or anti-Brexit depending on which newspaper you read on what day is leading to violence.  It is unconscionable in light of Darren Osborne's attack. >  
After all he’s done for Brexit?The ingratitude...  
can't laugh at this really. he's lucky it was just an egg. MPs should be able to openly support Remain or a #PeoplesVote without fearing for their safety.how many MPs are holding back from opposing Brexit because of the threat of being physically attacked?   
Right, @JuliaHB1, please can you explain how this disaster and the loss of thousands of jobs, was not wholly as a result of YOUR effin #Brexit. Go on, defend it, you sanctimonious old windbag.  
Right, here we are then:For environmental charity stuff go to @CynefinFFor data and Brexit stuff go to @BritOrBot For book stuff go to @CynefinRoad For occasional articles, films, podcasts and retweets of the other accounts stay here. 
Unionists sneering at a Scottish currency might more usefully ask what currency the UK will be using post-Brexit when the pound crashes through the basement and the food shelves in supermarkets are empty. 
Judge: “politicians shouldn’t have to walk on eggshells just to campaign”Suspect: “I was egging on Brexit your honour”Judge: “well, do you wish to call any eggsperts for your defence?” Suspect: “No. We don’t listen to those. The people have spoken” Judge: “This is not a yoke”  
Brexit and bad weather puts UK farmers at risk of suicide, say charities  
Heard Jeremy is OK. MSM et al up to their necks in this, always stirring against him, & the thickos fall for it. Imagine it was more serious. It isn’t even Corbyn’s Brexit - how thick is that? 
Sure it was about Brexit  
Very kind thank you. Let’s just get a proper Brexit and that’d be a brilliant start!?  
Nov 28: If a referendum was held today 55 of the 89 most marginal constituencies would support EU membership, up from just 25 which backed Remain in 2016. 46 Labour backbenchers represent seats which have switched from Leave to Remain.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
“The British people’s democratic right to ruin their own country for a generation at least, destroy the livelihoods of their most vulnerable communities and sabotage food and medicine security indefinitely must be respected without question” Stewart Lee in the Guardian #Brexit 
You can't argue that others aren't respecting the result of the 2016 referendum while opposing a deal which takes us out of the EU.The sheer hypocrisy.... 
Let's have some fun.Retweet if you want Brexit stopped.Let's see how many of us there are out there! 
Our country is going to the dogs. We are 30 days away from a cliff-edge Brexit.  1 in 4 children are living in poverty.  People are dying on our streets, and on trollies in hospital corridors.  Still - it's all jolly hockey-sticks for these psychopaths, isn't it? #GetTheToriesOut 
“The Prime Minister and Mr Speaker are not above the law.” Rocking #Brexit article by @AnneMarieMorris MP, exclusively for Brexit Facts4EU. Read it here: Read and retweet, people!  #GoWTO 
Jubilee MPs Oscar Sudi and Didmus Barasa ask President Kenyatta to declare if he wants a term extension through referendum; say war on corruption is targeting DP Ruto.  
Can you join the March for Brexit?A town near you!  
Theresa May's "simples" quip came about as the result of an aide's bet. Oh how we laughed! Let's hope that same jolly spirit will sustain us when we're fighting for adequate food post-Brexit, or touring all the pharmacies in a 50-mile radius trying to fill a prescription.  
John Waters spoke powerfully in Athlone about the absence of a proper functioning Irish media.  Most deal in propaganda. Not journalism.  Best current example is the media uniformity on Brexit and the EU.  Irish media simply parrot government lines. #IFP #Irexit 
All the people who said Scotland couldn't go independent are presently making an arse of Brexit whilst the Scottish Government is the only one making sense in the whole UK. 
What none of these people seem to realise is that most people who voted leave already had an opinion on EU membership long before the referendum, most remainers by contrast hadn’t even considered what it means - if anyone was lied to it’s them, but then they are rather gullible. 
I find it quite insulting when people say we didn't know what we voted forPersonally I voted for us to leave the EU knowing that we may have a few tough years ahead of us in the short term but a brighter long term futureThe EU is a joke run by a pissed up bumbling fool#brexit 
If we don't have a PV, no country in the world will ever hold a referendum on anything meaningful again.The UK has shown that really serious decisions cannot be entrusted to ill-informed voters, lying politicians and a deeply irresponsible media. 
I can't help feeling that Caroline Flint's rabid obsession with Brexit comes from an unhealthy place. When you start denying all the evidence of the harm it is doing both to the country and to your party, your objectivity begins to look very flaky.  
The will of the people has changed - put it to a democratic vote - and bugger the cost - your Brexit lunacy has cost billions so far (£$bill to govt) for absolutely no gain. 
The reason Theresa May doesn't want a second referendum or an investigation into illegalities of the first referendum is simples. She became PM purely because of brexit and many of her cabinet were involved in those illegalities. Our democracy is being sold down the river. 
So, where does the present state of affairs leave LEAVE?We won the EU ReferendumThere are (at least) 17.4 million of usWe have huge political cloutWe know what we wantWe know what we want Tories to deliverWe recognise Labour's betrayalWe will oust Remain MPs at any GE 
Brexit.  
Theresa May using a core rhetorical tactic of bigotry in pointing out the sins of a few in order to inflame hatred the many. May is a xenophobic authoritarian  nationalist extremist. She is an enemy of democracy, liberty & human rights.#PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
How the book “The Revolt of the Public” predicted Trump and Brexit — and what it can teach us about the destabilizing force of the internet.  
As a labour member I will not support any party that supports or enables #brexit. 
Why the 'no deal' #Brexit brinkmanship was always a bit of a chmiera  
“Campaign against #Brexit starts now – on positive terms only Labour can deliver” write 11 #Labour MPs : 
Brexit is a criminal waste of public money and resources. 
Rebecca Long Bailey as vicky pollard sets out  the Labour front benches policy on a 2nd referendum  YEAH BUT NO BUT YEAH BUT NO BUT YEAH BUT NO BUT #finalsay #peoplesvote #Brexit pic.twitter.com/wkMdnDQtSc 
The outcome of Brexit now depends on Geoffrey Cox, Arlene Foster and Nigel Dodds, says @JohnRentoul 
There's a weird moratorium on stuff MPs said before the referendum. I think we have a right to know why they don't stand by statements like this, if not just to save their own skin.  
Amidst fears of rising trade barriers across the globe and uncertainty over #Brexit, #UK firms report their weakest growth since April 2013. The CBI’s index of private sector activity over past 3 months dropped to -3 in January.#investing #investors #trading #markets #economy 
“We know that Brexit is all downsides.Letting in chlorine-washed chicken as the US ambassador demands would be literally harmful to the health of the nation.It makes me sick, in so many bloody ways.”- Jay Rayner  
This is just a reminder of the waters we would be lowering ourselves into if Brexit goes ahead...A vindictive bully in the US...An ascendant China in Asia...A host of nations, commonwealth ones in payicular, with historic reasons for wanting to twist the knife...It’s ugly. 
The Wales and Ireland border may be the bigger Brexit threat to the economy 
Totally disagree Clive.. You know the bus was demonstrating that we could in future decide ourselves where to spend the Gross amount paid to EU! No evidence at all of Leave voters changing to Remain, quite the opposite! We’ve had the vote followed by GE 83% MPs elected on Brexit!  
If you read their ghastly propaganda you will see this is indeed the future the alt-right, brexit, Trump and fascists have in mind for women. The Nazis called it "Kinder, Küche, Kirche" - children, kitchen, church.  
That's what happens when you back a 2nd referendum.  
Theresa May’s Tories have given the country the ‘horrific gifts’ of austerity and Brexit its time we got rid of the Tories look here>  
If they think they will create a powerful Prime minister position through the referendum we are very much ready, we will tell Dr. @WilliamsRuto to ignore the presidential one n go for the Prime minister seat if that will be the position to form government.|@UKenyatta @RailaOdinga 
Britons living in sunny Spain dodge a no-deal Brexit bullet after government guarantees health care and other benefits  
Ok, ok, ok...Fellow Brits.  Take a second to process that...The President of the United States, a bully by nature, upset his PERSONAL business investments might be impacted by UK green energy policy, is THREATENING TO PUNISH US in post Brexit trade negotiations.  
1) @LenMcCluskey voted for Brexit2) Which caused Honda to Leave3) But now he wants them backWhat a hypocritical arse 
Well said @GMB_union Time for all unions and businesses to come out on thisThere is *no Brexit at all* that gives us a better deal than our current deal with the EUStay in Europe, Fix Britain #FinalSay 
Disrespect the Referendum result 
2019 snapshots - most in Worthing said:- staying in the EU is best - Brexit is not good for jobs - Brexit is not good for the NHS- Brexit is not good for young people.Things have changed since 2016, voters need a say #PeoplesVote@peterkyle @WorthingLibDems @Worthing_Greens 
In sharp contradiction to his ex boss @michaelgove and Business Sec @GregClarkMP who rightly describes #NoDeal #Brexit as “ruinous”. The Govt is a shambles.  
#Brexit is Barking mad don't let Britain go to the dogs #bitchesagainstbrexit pic.twitter.com/ttoDzoLvsR 
If I hear another Tory MP say "don't make perfection the enemy of the good" in relation to TM's deal I might just lose itIt's not even close to perfection. It's the opposite of perfection. It's the anti-BrexitWhat the hell are these people talking about? 
Isn't it amazing just how UNLUCKY the UK has become since 23rd June 2016:FordHondaJaguarAirbusHSBCPanasonicToshibaHitachiP&OSonyLloydsBarclaysAXAUBSEBAUnileverDysonJP MorganMoneyGramObviously NOTHING AT ALL to do with #Brexit!Just how UNLUCKY can you get?! 
Brexit no deal may prove to be the best deal of all, professor says  
EU27 feel they leaned a lot towards UK on backstop and (as with Cameron negotiations leading to referendum outcome) now that flexibility is being repaid with rudeness and hostility. 18/20 
Cameron calling referendum, losing it and then resigning PMship when it was lost is still seen (fairly or unfairly) as incomprehensible lack of leadership by EU27. They feel UK casually discarded significant EU efforts that had gone into negotiating Cameron’s deal. 14/20 
This is the kind of collaborative project we are sticking up two fingers at with Brexit  
Delingpole: There Will Never Be Brexit While Theresa May Is Prime Minister  
How #Brexit works: Honda was about to make Swindon ready for EVs. But then a no-deal Brexit loomed and the ship with equipment was diverted and Swindon was closed.  
JUBILEE MPS Sudi and Barasa ask President Kenyatta to declare if he wants term extension through referendum, say anti-graft war targeting DP Ruto  
Dr. Edmund Sides is walking from Swansea to London to express his annoyance about the way that Brexit is being handled and to join the People’s Vote March on Saturday 23rd March in order to call for a referendum on the final deal  
The SNP has consistently held the government to account over the corruption and incompetence of Brexit. Somewhat ironically they have done the Union a great service! Not that most of the twits in Parliament would ever know it. 
Me this Friday, subtly walking into the Oxford Union Brexit debate, the moment Nigel Farage begins to speak. “Oh please, carry on. Don’t mind me.”  
How far this country has fallen, driven into the ground by right wing snake oil salesmen given free reign under the watch of a complicit Tory prime minister and her government, and aided and abetted by a paralysed opposition..... 
Watch @heidiallen75 speak passionately about the poor below. Then compare it with her voting record on welfare: 4/6 times against higher benefits; 16/23 times for reduction in welfare spending. She joined @TheIndGroup to STOP Brexit, NOT because of a faux concern for the poor.  
THE BREXIT MESS IS THE TORIES FAULTTHE BREXIT MESS IS THE TORIES FAULTTHE BREXIT MESS IS THE TORIES FAULTTHE BREXIT MESS IS THE TORIES FAULTTHE BREXIT MESS IS THE TORIES FAULTTHE BREXIT MESS IS THE TORIES FAULTTHE BREXIT MESS IS THE TORIES FAULTEnd of. 
Trump will need this election to be a choice... He likely won't be able to win if it is a referendum on him... 
Corbyn was warned by one of his MPs this wk that decision to back a 2nd ref wd mean “end of Labour in the north”. Northerners often portrayed as a Leave-voting electoral bloc, but ofc reality is they have as varied and vibrant views as rest of UK on Brexit  
Tony Benn on what he thought of Heath and Parliament's activities in 1972 taking us into the EEC......#Brexit  
Catching up with @SophyRidgeSky. @CarolineFlintMP urging Corbyn to allow a free vote saying there could be 30+ plus Labour MPs backing May’s ‘improved’ deal. These MPs will be the ones that cancel out the Brexit ultras who happier to move to No Deal than fold 
I put most of the @ByDonkeys tweets into tshirts! Available here:Just hit the 100 sold mark!  (I make nothing from these... all non-profit) #ledbydonkeys #brexit #eu #Remain #GraphicDesign #tshirts 
If a second referendum isn't possible I can live with that but the 2016 referendum still needs to be voided bc of Leave's industrial scale criminal electoral fraud.  
A quite remarkable line from this @IrishTimes piece:"The Irish Times understands the British government is likely to reintroduce direct rule to Northern Ireland if there is a no-deal #Brexit."Scotland / Wales next? 
My plan for dealing with Brexit:  
The Deputy Editor of Spiked Online whose US funding arm has received 300k from the billionaire Koch brothers and which peddles pro-Kremlin propaganda defends the right of a fascist thug to spout hate on Youtube. Putin, kleptocracy, fascism & the hard-left. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Shameless self-serving prime minister Theresa May is just ignoring the industrial scale criminal electoral fraud that stole the EU referendum bc doing so helps her stay in Number 10.   
Little liar ... you never accepted the first referendum result.  
'Up to 70' Labour MPs oppose second Brexit referendum, Caroline Flint claims  
Iain Duncan Smith SAVAGES 'completely pointless' Brexit extension - 'NO purpose'   
Let's call remain MPs bluff. Call a General Election and watch everyone of the traitors be defeated, cast into the history books. We can move forward with a clean Brexit. 
I hear Chris Grayling has resurrected this plan in case of a no-deal brexit and has signed a €30M contract with a company who claim to have enough steam trains.  
I'm confused. In what way can giving those 17.4m people a free and fair vote on whether to accept the government's Brexit terms be construed as telling them they're "irrelevant"? Don't they deserve a democratic say?  
END OF MAIN PARTIES?LEAVE HAS THE STRENGTH THAT BREXIT WILL NEVER DIE Remain dwell under the delusion reneging the referendum means stayingThey're wrong. We are not leaving because of the referendum but because it was clear we were going to leave 
If the choice is between May’s toxic deal and an extension to even a theoretical departure date then that’s no choice at all. The final betrayal of Brexit by Parliament draws nigh.  
Scottish Labour leader Richard Leonard has said a Labour government in Westminster would oppose granting a further referendum on Scottish independence. "no appetite for it".he claimed #rt and show your support for Independence directly to @LabourRichard 
The active pursuit of a delay to Brexit, with no purpose beyond frustration, is a betrayal of referendum result, say @andrealeadsom and @Jeremy_Hunt 
I was talking to a British jihadi woman in a Syrian camp when after a bit of talking she asked me: 'So what is all this with Brexit? What's going to happen?' There really is no escape from it anywhere... 
Our crew has actually been out in Leave areas asking ppl what they think of the posters (cheapo @ByDonkeys focus grouping). The Brexit fantasy posters aren’t misconstrued. What *is* true is that they don’t have as much impact as a Farage '52-48' or a mega ‘Grayling vs Grayling’ 
The latest weasel words for infinite postponement are 'smooth Brexit'.  Do you want a 'smooth Brexit' on the Eleventieth of Never?or a No Deal Brexit on 29 March 2019? 
Has anyone got a ladder they can lend to @UKLabour front-bench to help them climb down from the fence their sitting on over Brexit? #Marr #ChangePolitics 
WATCH | @RLong_Bailey: "We're not looking to overturn the result of the referendum. Let's be clear! We think there should be an option on the table to put options to the people."@AndrewMarr9: "Would remain be an option?"@RLong_Bailey: "That may well be one of the options."  
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 3: Theresa May has never quite grasped #brexit and the whole thing has played out in slow-motion. Still, she has always had a fake grin on her face...  
Grieve, Spelman, Soubry, Wollaston, Gyimah, Lee, Jo Johnson, Pawsey, to name just a few, are all facing deselection from Brexit activists, being backed by Arron Banks. He said "They have ratted on their promises, and are now beginning to feel the heat from their constituents" 
The irony of a Labour politician complaining about broken promises, while calling for a second referendum following a manifesto promising enactment of the first. 
Caroline Flint, what kind of Labour MP wants a Tory #Brexit which will destroy the NHS via a trade deal with the US, lower food and environmental standards, slash workers' rights and give the Tories a crushing election victory? 
Here you see the reality of the backroom dealing to flog off our great country to American interests. Nigel Farage: “If I have to come back again” - dear god Brexit ensured you arrived centre stage despite the fact you’ve failed to be elected as an MP.  
"Fury as Tony Blair urges MPs should delay Brexit to have a second referendum and force Britain to Remain""Force" us to remain?The people of this country won't be forced to do anything. And I dare the elites to tryThey're declaring war on the people 
"I was not elected to vote for job losses, to vote for economic recession rather than growth" Angela Smith, The Independent Group MP says "every Brexit option makes the country poorer. #BBCSP  
Nigel Farage has urged fellow eurosceptics to not support Theresa May's Brexit deal as the clock winds closer to March 29th.@Nigel_Farage | #Brexit 
Brexit fan #Marr always helping Brexit with his questions today telling Rebecca Long-Bailey "the nearly four million Labour voters who voted Leave expect the Labour party to help them get out of the EU" he must or should know half of those have now switched to Remain. 
You can continue arguing the case, but when party policy will be to push for a second referendum, you will be aiding the Conservatives to keep in power and unleash even more austerity on your constituents.No Brexit = End of Austerity.Brexit+Lab=AusterityBrexit+Con=Austerity^3 
A German view of a Brexit crippled Britain.. #Wiesbaden #Carnival2019 @afneil #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos #Brexitcast @maryhoneyball #BrexitDebate @seajayshore 
A referendum forced through by the hard right was narrowly won by the hard right, through lies and cheating.Implementing that will put jobs and public services at risk, and deliver nothing that was promised - but still Labour MPs back it.   
“David Cameron did the dirty on us and then he just skipped ship.”Following the 2016 referendum, we spoke to voters in the Leave backing Wiltshire village of Broad Chalke. Now, as the clock ticks down to Brexit day, we revisit its residents to find out if opinions have changed.  
Don’t forget despite the online bluster, an #irexit has just 8% support. Given the manner in which #Brexit was brought about, it is not a threat that can be ignored or allowed propagate any of their spin. Expose & rebut!  
If our system is so weak that even Brexit can be overturned why wld anyone believe our system could resist a communist or fascist takeover? There’d be no point in preserving any of our constitution at all. The whole thing would have to go, one way or another. 
Whatever May presents to this country as an agreement with the EU its going to be treacherous and full of nasty barbs which will keep us in the failing shitehole. Her idea is to ride out brexit until everyone has forgotten about it and then quietly cancel it. 
What did Tony Benn think about the EU? “It is the most bureaucratic terrifying system in the world."Join the #MarchToLeave today against the Brexit betrayal:  
“If I were an MP, I would not want to own this putrid potage of poor political political leadership and self-destructive consequence “. Tony Blair on Mrs. May’s deal in today’s Observer. He is right. Her contemptible deal, settling nothing, must go to a confirmatory referendum. 
How terribly sad. Another casualty of a #Brexit which is costing us so much yet delivering nothing in return.  
There is no more offensive a term to have lately entered the political lexicon than 'Brexit Jihadis', and here 'death cult' is simply an allusion to it. Those who believe that #ERG members like @SteveBakerHW are akin to Islamists are devoid of reason and all sense of proportion. 
BREXIT CRISIS: Liam Fox refuses to rule out chlorine-washed chicken in US-UK trade deal /#EU #Brexit#FinalSay  
This is actually what Brexit means: lower standards on food, workers rights, living standards, and on human rights. This was never about “sovereignty” but scaling back progressive policies.  
Strong competition within the Shadow Cabinet today for most dishonest line on a second referendum...  
Whitehall Brexit exodus revealed as a quarter of civil servants working on the deal quit in six months 
Says Brexit supporting MP whose Borders constituency voted Remain & has key private employers, D R Collin & Son of Eyemouth, employing c. 200 people & exports c. 90% of product to EU, having its future in balance because of Tories’ incompetence in awarding it zero HGV permits.  
#Brexit has been a con from the moment the ref was announced. The Govt. should've investigated the irregularities before even considering triggering A50. Labour should've demanded it. Instead, they've helped keep Brexit alive.Unforgivable from May & Corbyn. 
What a waste. The tragedy of Brexit is that so much is being lost for so little in return.  
Oh, and you are not getting a block grant; much as you might need it after Brexit.. Even though you are a former colony of ours, like Greenland, we don´t feel very bad about how we treated you, and your own track record as colonizers doesn´t add up to a lot of shame on our part. 
Tony Blair - Theresa May's deal is essentially a #blindbrexit... when Parliament faces the choice between a painful #hardBrexit & a pointless soft brexit then they will go for another referendum.#marr - You sound ERGishBlair - #Ridge #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
'We have seen in the last few days how Westminster will try not to allow Scotland to have another independence referendum – that’s not a Union, that’s colonialism.'Debut @ScotNational column for @mstewart_23.(Premium paywall) 
Northern Labour voters back Brexit second referendum move by 75%  
It's infuriating when Tony Blair makes excellent points about Brexit, that his critics always bring up Iraq. It's the same with Rose West. She has many valid ideas about the EU, and it's time we listened to them rather than whining about what she did in the past. 
Wait until Mark realises that Parliament is sovereign and voted for said referendum with the government's promise that the vote will be respected. Also wait until Mark realises that said Parliament also voted to trigger Article 50.  
I love watching Richard deny Scotland a second independence referendum. This is #forthemany Richard Leonard just before he lost 5000 members in Scotland  
Be very careful with all these numbers. For 2 years there's been no official opposition to Brexit. No official opposition argument for Remaining. Just lies, delusions, deceptions, silence.We're in the final weeks of a process that'll affect generations. And we're still ignorant.  
.@RupaHuq – Fox has admitted he has no clue on post-Brexit trade deals  
Did we ask for a “smooth” Brexit? Wasn’t the Leave vote a vote for real change? Isn’t a “no-change” Brexit missing the point?  
Moderate and Liberal Politics is about taking a Progressive EVIDENCED based decision on any Policy or approach to problem solving! Policy driven through by any single  IDEOLOGY is backwards, tribal and utterly destructive! #NoMandate for Brexit #KickOutTheExtemes 
Why was Rudd, sister of the People's Vote mastermind Roland Rudd & friend of Blair ever brought back into cabinet?It's inviting the Brexit enemy into the heart of GovernmentWhy'd any PM serious about leaving do this?The obvious and only answer: TM doesn't want us to leave 
Brexit: Labour will whip MPs to back second referendum, says McDonnell  
Same story, different #brexit spin. No changes or undermining of the Withdrawal Agreement is possible. Negotiations on this ended in November.   
This is great and all, Andrew, but you've publicly mocked and rebuked people for suggesting there was Russian interference in Brexit.  
3 years later and remainers continue to use Jo Cox horrible murder for Political gain when it comes to Brexit.These people are gutless immoral and deserve widespread criticism.  
Through Brexit I think we in the UK can lay claim to one success:We are the first nation in human history to declare economic sanctions on ourselves.A Historic Event! 
When the Deputy Chief Negotiator for the EU points to differences in the Brexit coverage in the UK  vs Ireland editions of the Sunday Times.  
“British people deserve better than having their world-leading food standards sold out from underneath them.”- @RedTractorFood chief executive Jim Moseley on threat posed to British food standards as USA seeks access to UK market after #Brexit.  
Revealed: The scale of Labour opposition to a second referendum from Jeremy Corbyn's front bench 
Great news that Farage is under investigation too - for money laundering. Now just need these other two clowns to be implicated & prosecuted too. 
As a lifelong Tory supporter, running a company with 150 employees, I can assure you that even without a hard Brexit, I will never trust the Party again. @BorisJohnson gave it all away with his ‘f-ck business’. I say ‘f-ck the Conservative Party @peoplesvote_uk 
(She is determinedly trying to bite through the cable supporting the hammock she’s in. This may be her bid at a Brexit analogy.)  
"Dithering Remainer MPs must unite over Brexit for the sake of our country – anything else is a shameful betrayal"Rudd's selfish arrogance is simply beyond beliefShe's now the most destructive force against Brexit in TMs cabinet  
Thank you for your support #Brexit MLP "I am a democrat: the British people have decided to leave the EU, we must respect their decision. With the #Brexit , we see the ideological functioning of the EU wants it to go as badly as possible! It is Soviet enough as a state of mind! "  
.@OwenPaterson gives a stern warning to the PM: If May delivers on Brexit she will win back Conservative MPs’ loyalty, if she fails they’ll know who to blame  
May, Corbyn, Johnson, Gove, IDS, Rees-Smug...they’re all in this ⁦@alfiejoey⁩ Brexit glorious cartoon. Thrilled he gave me with the original and love looking at them. Frame shop here I come  
May allies believe “death cult” could be down to less than two dozen Brexit hardliners. Mann says there could be up 70 labour rebels, a disputed number, but 30 could do it...  
i'm a Labour member & i wouldn't vote for Labour today because of your stance on Brexit. we do exist, so you'd better start listening to us! when the next election rolls around & the Tories win, it will be on MPs like you for making Labour unelectable. you're enabling the Tories. 
Especially since last Thursday May's own lawyer told the Court in London that May KNOWS that the 2016 Referendum vote was corrupt and illegal re RPA 83. By continuing with "brexit" , May now simply becomes part of that corruption and illegality 
No self-respecting country would accept a deal that allows annexation of part of its territory in exchange for, well, for nothing!Promised trade deal hasn’t materialised.#EU membership comes with an exit.May's WA doesn't!MPs must vote it down!#Brexit 
Wow. If voters can't trust you on the most critical line in your manifesto, what can they trust you on? #brexitBrexit: Labour will whip MPs to back second referendum, says McDonnell  
Gibraltar could be the elephant in the Brexit negotiation room. Especially because, unlike the Irish border, there's no plan for a backstop to protect its status. But Spain could scotch any arrangement with the EU that requires unanimity from all EU27.  
.@OwenPaterson gives a stern warning to the PM: If May delivers on Brexit she will win back Conservative MPs’ loyalty, if she fails they’ll know who to blame  
Brexit is 26 days away. #brexit 
Geoffrey Cox warns EU chiefs ‘the future of Europe is in both our hands’ as most voters blame bickering MPs for Brexit chaos 
As a 70 year old, I’d love to hear one measurable and specific way you predict your life will improve after Brexit, other than some lazy tropes about ‘taking back control’ and ‘blue passports’. Thanks. 
“I think that to attempt to have a delay mechanism in order to thwart the process of Brexit itself is actually politically completely unacceptable. And as I've said before would provoke a backlash amongst voters” @LiamFox#DelayMeansRemain#StandUp4Brexit #Marr 
Dear @theresamay How can you even think about presenting the country with such an appalling deal which keeps us under the control of the EU indefinitely? No Deal is the only option now to deliver the Brexit we voted for. I’m so disappointed in you, only the ERG represent me now.  
Brexit means never having to say you're sorry, no matter how incompetent you are as an MP. 
i hope you understand brexit better now after watching the most recent monopoly video by hat films 
Labour is doing everything to stop Theresa May's damaging deal and her reckless trajectory toward a No Deal Brexit. #Marr 
“A lot of countries will not make up their minds until we get to those last days before Brexit.”Translation:“They know our position is getting weaker all the time, and are waiting until we’re really desperate.” 
MPs threaten our freedom'I left House of Commons last Wed more disillusioned with politics & politicians than ever before.Reminds me of May 1940People of our dear country were prepared to fightMost MPs sought appeasement.Today is no different'#Brexit 
So, despite all the warm words, Labour is still a Brexit party.Millions of Remainers will be voting for parties who want to #StopBrexit. 
Hoping for this midfield today , none of that brexit midfield stuff. Btw lads we need another 57 followers to get to 1k , if we do that before the Derby at 4pm (GMT) I’m acc done. My aim last night was 800 for the derby  thanks to everyone   
But with Brexit... those on both the left and right of Parliament opposed it.If you haven't already.... WATCH  
You're losing voters yet you lack the self-awareness the even CONSIDER that the problem just MIGHT be @UKLabour s support for Brexit - AGAINST the wishes of abt 80% of Labour members AND voters.THAT is the reason you'r heamhorraging voters. Your leader DOESN'T LISTEN 
“No more delays, no more excuses - Labour must work with other opposition parties to deliver a #PeoplesVote and a way out of this Brexit mess” - @LSRPlaid 
I'm beginning to find #Labour #Brexit-facilitating MPs such as Frank Field, Dennis Skinner, John Mann and Caroline Flint even more loathsome that Tory pro-#Brexit MPs. After all, they should know better, and they should be trying to protect their constituents' living standards. 
Are we to assume from this that @theresa_may is simply a performing dog so readily manipulated by her aides @SeemaKennedy and @Simon4NDorset for their amusement and less so the leader of @Conservatives taking Britain to assured #Brexit-caused economic destruction? A shambles! 
“MPs who were remainers in the referendum, my view is that 80% of those were elected on a manifesto promise, including those who broke away from the Labour Party to honour that referendum, and I think we should do so” @LiamFox#StandUp4Brexit #Marr 
Brexit is a project to reduce wages, conditions and standards. In the face of a #climateemergency we need synergy with our neighbours like never before. Proud to have co-authored this letter with colleagues  
George Eustice: "I don't think those in Parliament who've sought to create an option to delay Brexit have fully thought through what they're actually doing."  
The dividing lines in the brexit debate can be seen metaphorically as between those who see Boris Johnson as a subject for Chanson de Geste and those who see his escapades as Les Histoires Tragiques.  
Brexit: Labour will whip MPs to back second referendum, says McDonnell  
Excellent from @johnmcdonnellMP on how Labour is working to break the #Brexit deadlock. Watch and share  
#Brexiter MPs don’t want a 2nd referendum because they fear that people have changed their minds.They want to deny the right of people to have a say on a #Brexit that bears no resemblance to what was promised.They’re saying to people: “You had a say 3 years ago, now shut-up” 
Businesses aren't ready for a "messy and disorderly" Brexit, British Chambers of Commerce says  
Reason 4593 why there should never have been a referendum...  
Doesn't say much for democracy. You vote to Leave, MPs spend 2 years sabotaging & diluting Brexit, then say: 'vote for this dog's dinner or change your mind'.  
"That means you have failed"... Marr confronts Liam Fox with his failure to deliver on promises made. #Brexit #marr #FinalSay 
'We've been forced into a second referendum by Theresa May' says @johnmcdonnellMP Sure. That works for me. Now let’s go for Remain & reform full force, full passion this time.#Ridge 
So #Brexit has become a game of semantics.So Sir Graham Brady wants " legally binding guarantee that the Irish backstop could only be temporary." But what does that mean? /1 
It’s immensely sad that those in power haven’t told the truth. A country manipulated to cause harm to itself. The beneficiaries of the damage are the young and future generations.Many people still can’t admit Brexit is wrong. The loss of Honda in Swindon is the first of many.  
Millions of British lambs may have to be slaughtered and then buried or burnt, rather than eaten, in the event of a no-deal Brexit, government officials have told farmers  
Richard Leonard struggling again with the basic idea of the right of nation's to self-determination. Not a good look to have the exact same position as Theresa May on the right of Scotland to hold another referendum if it's parliament chooses to. 
 Richard Leonard “There is no case for a second independence referendum.”It could not be any clearer, Labour no longer respect  democracy or Scotland’s right to self-determination.They think that a mandate secured at the Scottish Parliament should be blocked by Westminster. 
Local MP Joanna Cherry QC MP has led the charge over this issue – having repeatedly queried the legality of the tendering process and demanded that the UK Government publish the relevant legal advice #seabornefreight #ferrygate #Brexit  
Liam Fox told an incredible lie on #marr saying that if we have a Brexit deal then all the third country trade deals will roll over as part of the Withdrawal Agreement. That's categorically not true. All the EU has committed to is to *ask* third countries to roll over agreements. 
UK vs IRL editors of @thesundaytimes Same bylines, same Brexit reporting, wildly different spin. (The first line of the Irish version, notably, points out that the ERG demands are way beyond what EU negotiators will countenance.)  
"Labour will have to do far more than vote the right way. We must campaign wholeheartedly with radical politics at the front of our case." Fantastic article by @KateOsamor @labourlewis @MarshadeCordova @lloyd_rm & others. Love socialism, hate Brexit! 
You urge your Labour colleagues to back a Tory Brexit that would reduce public spending by £40Bn, lead to an economy 3.9% smaller and have a detrimental impact on jobs, living standards and rights.Seriously @CarolineFlintMP, you're campaigning for all the things Labour oppose. 
BrExit was about sovereignty not the economy.BrExit was about sovereignty not the economy.BrExit was about sovereignty not the economy.BrExit was about sovereignty not the economy.We don't care if bankers make less profit if we LEAVE the EU. We want our democracy back  
Liam Fox on #Marr refusing to rule out accepting imports of US hormone infused beef (banned by the #EU ) after #Brexit A chilling prospect for UK farmers. 
Not true @LiamFox the impact assessments compiled by your #Brexit Government DO include the impact of new trade deals. They conclude they will do little to mitigate the real harm Brexit will do to UK economy whatever final deal we eventually get @TheIndGroup 
Implication here is that Brexit will be fixed with a military dictatorship and savage oppression of the Irish. Can’t say that would come entirely out of the blue.  
I was talking to a woman from Malta last night and it struck me that like the Irish - Maltese and Cypriot citizens living in the UK will have more rights than British passport holders post Brexit. How's that taking back control? 
So when exactly are Labour’s frontbench getting off fence and backing #PeoplesVote? Watching @RLong_Bailey on #Marr say “I hope we don’t have to get to that position” - and they may licence other frontbenchers to abstain - suggests they could still enable this #Brexit after all.. 
“We’re not looking to overturn the referendum, let’s be clear, let’s be clear...” She then goes on to explain that Labour are supporting a 2nd referendum.And we wonder why trust in politicians has completely gone.  
Group of Remainer MPs have backed a host of “killer” Commons amendments to betray Brexit. Think this is as unacceptable as we do? Join us on our #march2leave @  
#marrLiam Fox has just said chlorinated chicken is not about safety! No matter what your views on Brexit, chlorinated chicken is a health issue, it doesn’t kill bugs! Hormone pumped beef is a health issue. 
Liam Fox promised to replicate the #EU 40 trade deals by #Brexit day. He’s signed 6 - including the Faroe Islands & Palestine. It’s a monumental failure.  #Marr 
The independent group of MPs:Lying. They said they would respect the referendum result.Intolerant. They don’t care what we voted for.Arrogant. They think they know better than us.Remoaners. All of them.The Liar Party has been formed..  
I didn’t agree with #TonyBlair on Iraq, I didn’t agree with him on PFI, I didn’t agree with him on tuition fees and many other things BUT he’s head and shoulders above the current shower we have in govt and opposition, and talking sense on #Brexit#Marr 
When he says 'nobody' wants a GE, he means MPs don't want to face the public, who are furious with Parl't's ineptitude & mismanagement of Brexit. 
WATCH - Farage at CPAC 2019 as he reveals the unifying cause that unites LeaveEU, the politicians and organisers behind Vote Leave and the Tufton massed choir  - and it's not independence or concern over immigration. Watch the full nauseating speech here:  
I will *never* "respect the referendum result", as MPs on #Ridge and #marr keep telling me to do this morning. If the referendum had been binding, it would have been void for #corruption. Never forget that. #RevokeA50 #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Public fury with meddling Brexit blockers has reached boiling point:  
Tony Blair’s specious argument is that because we don’t know the future exactly, May’s deal is a “blind Brexit”. No more than not Brexiting would be a “blind remain”. Lot’s of problems with May’s deal, her not being a fortune teller is not one. #Marr 
Next week I’m speaking on Brexit in Leeds, Eddisbury, Oxford, Llanelli, Swansea & Wrexham. All welcome! See separate tweets for details 
WATCH: Corbyn ally Rebecca Long-Bailey says "we're not looking to overturn the result of the referendum" and insists that a People's Vote is still just one option on the table. #Marr 
So Blair reckons 43 per cent in support of a second referendum is enough of a mandate to call for one, but a 52 per cent vote for Brexit on a 72 per cent turn out is too close to call   
Blair on #Marr:A hard #Brexit is PainfulA Soft Brexit is PointlessME on a sofa:Summed up perfectlySo let's have NO BREXIT#RevokeA50 Unilaterally#StopBrexit#Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal &#Reform the UK 
You'll get to a 2nd Ref when ppl understand that Hard Brexit is economically damaging, and Soft Brexit makes us rule takers. #Brexit #marr 
Tony Blair wants to stop Brexit. That’s a legitimate point of view. But there is no compromise with him and others like him between a hard or soft Brexit. No deal will ever be good enough.  
As politicians whip the country up into a divided frenzy over Brexit, it is easy to forget the referendum was corrupt & all of this could be halted instantly. #marr #ridge 
"You're trying to overturn the referendum result!"Quite possibly the most absurd argument with regards the non-binding, crime riddled 2016 referendum is that it's somehow infallible beyond question. Nobody accused the 2017 snap election of undermining 2015's election.#marr 
#SwitchOffMarr and watch John McDonnell explain Labour’s Brexit position after more running down the clock by Theresa May 
Please watch this damning assessment of Brexit from the US embassy in London:  
The new Jarrow Marchers -  it just shows how much life has improved since the bad old days. Then they marched for jobs and justice. The elite are now marching to destroy jobs and prop up an illegal (accepted even by May) referendum. Where are we? Animal Farm last paragraph?  
Hysterical! On #Marr Rebecca Long-Bailey insists she doesn't want to stop Brexit, but admits she wants another referendum. One which her party's big cheese Emily Thornberry says will be a choice between #Remain and er...#Remain. 
Sorry @RLong_Bailey - continuing to push for a 'Labour Brexit' is no longer party policy.This deal was never a good one and has already been rejected twice in parliament.If you can't support a #PeoplesVote in parliament on the 12th March, time to leave the front bench.#Marr 
At least some of us are getting ready to Brexit ! Preparations underway in my Brussels office this weekend  
Are they worried about Brexit  
If this was true how does @EnglishScot4YES fit into their narrative?When will it ever dawn on them that wanting to be a normal self governing country isn’t parochial!Spanner & Hague’s BREXIT Britain on the other hand though.....  
Fact 1: Theresa May's deal is better than a no deal #Brexit. Fact 2: The current deal with the EU is better than Theresa May's deal. Ergo, remaining in the EU is the best deal for the British people. #RevokeArticle50 
Brexit is anything but gracious. The vast majority is sorry to see you go and understands the scale of the loss. 
. @CarolineFlintMP "It's not about a Tory deal, it's actually not about a Labour deal, it's about an improved Brexit deal... I urge my colleagues to consider voting for an improved deal."  
“The Brexit Sec has agreed with the EU to set up a joint Taskforce to work up the Malthouse proposals“Cox knows that if he secures a legally-binding commitment to the solutions agreed by that Taskforce, with a deadline he’ll have succeeded” @OwenPaterson 
The Brexit referendum has been proved corrupt. Electoral Law was broken. Key players were fined & referred to Police & NCA. A full public inquiry must take place & all action halted. Consideration of a further vote should take place after this. #marr #ridge 
Perhaps @CarolineFlintMP shld have read this before appearing on #ridge It’s because #brexit bears no resemblance to what was promised, that people should have the right to confirm it or change their mindsIt’s saying ‘no’ to their demand for a referendum that’s disrespectful  
Clear and powerful message from @johnmcdonnellMP.Any MP tempted to support #Brexit will, 'not be forgiven'.The future of our country is on the line. #Labour MPs across the country must back a #PeoplesVote and give the country the #FinalSay 
Love Socialism, Hate Brexit.The campaign starts now, on positive terms only Labour can deliver.By @KateOsamor @labourlewis @lloyd_rm @MarshadeCordova @RachaelMaskell @LukePollard @ChiOnwurah @RosieDuffield1@Gedk @alexsobel @PaulJSweeney @AnnaMcMorrin 
The argument for Brexit is not one easily conveyed in a tweet because the concepts are meaningless to remainers without taking them through the basics and then you're still talking to people who value free stuff over democracy so there's very little point. 
'A disastrous nuclear confrontation didn't seem as important as #Trump's disgraced former lawyer calling him names, or that #Brexit' (Op-Ed by @SiWrites) 
Brexit negotiators’ objectives could not be clearer, writes ERG stalwart @OwenPaterson  
This is how Labour is working to break the Brexit deadlock. #Ridge 
The efforts to delay and sabotage Brexit is a betrayal of the referendum result and the 17.4m who believed their decision would be acted upon. Even the ERG is softening their position and they would do well to look over their shoulders... 
WATCH | "If Parliament cannot accept this deal, we have to have the confidence and the courage to walk away first and talk after!" Common sense from George Eustice who resigned from the government this week over Brexit. Support us at  
Ultra-woke Labour remainers: "People want a 2nd referendum. Let's back one!"Result? Turns out betraying your core voters in the Midlands and North isn't popular.  #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
For months I queried the legal basis of the #ferrygate contract & UK Govt ministers dodged my questions. This shambles is the perfect metaphor for #Brexit – a Govt deluding itself & the public & an ill-fated disaster. Grayling must go   
It looks like Labour backing a 2nd referendum has worked out well...for the Conservative Party.  
Those of you saying that Referendum now would harm faith in democracy aren't thinking logically. That referendum would have one of two outcomes.  
“An extension to Article 50...would resolve nothing. It would put us in a world in which we were still a zombie world not knowing where we're going. It would increase the chance of another referendum, which I think would solve nothing at all” @RoryStewartUK#DelayMeansRemain 
Its all over for manic outsourcing of public services at any cost(the same right wing frenzied thinking that drives Brexit).Last week saw its barely noticed death knell. The long match back to sanity is beginning. One day it will lead us back to the EU     
READ: New polling reveals Labour voters in party's heartlands back a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. Please RT so everybody knows:  
Unfucknbelievable!!! Theresa May’s Brexit is a massive fraud listen to this Tory MP!!! pic.twitter.com/KB94pSAp77 
WATCH: on #Ridge this morning, John McDonnell makes it clear that unless they can protect jobs & the economy, Labour MPs won't be forgiven if they vote for this Brexit deal.MARCH with us on 23.03.19:  
Brutal for @LabourRichard from Gary Smith, leader of @GMBScotOrg - Leonard worked for GMB for over 20yrs. Head of GMB calls out Leonard's leadership for failing on Brexit, weak on anti-Semitism & is not a Government-in-waiting.With friends like these... 
“We respect the referendum but we can’t allow Theresa May’s reckless Brexit this goes beyond party politics” @johnmcdonnellMP 
Caroline Flint is prepared to support a tory #Brexit which means supporting a cruel, sadistic tory PM, it will make (not her) but her constituents poorer, she's an absolute disgrace to @UKLabour and our movement, she must cross the floor #Ridge 
Studies have also shown that the personality types Right Wing Authoritarian and Social Dominance Orientation played a big part in the Brexit vote. Belief in Capital Punishment being the biggest predictor of someone voting Leave. /9 
The psychology of Brexit is thus a product of 'fast mode thinking' (from Thinking Fast and Slow) and appeals to people who rely on fast mode thinking to a dominant extent. /4  
Caroline Flint told @SophyRidgeSky that 70 Labour MPs are opposed to a second referendum. She said Corbyn's new policy 'bodes ill for the Labour Party'She demanded a free vote on the PM's deal & suggested if there was one it could secure support of 30 Labour MPs 
Can someone tell me how Theresa Mays ‘deal’ is better than the one which we currently have? Thank you x #brexit 
BTW, on a similar note, it appears Honda were planning on building electric cars in Swindon and had the equipment en route from Japan but changed their minds over Brexit concerns. So it had nothing to do with 'diesel' after all...  
With Brexit now defined as May's deal or no-deal and its broken promises and lies are laid bare, Labour voters in Leave areas overwhelmingly support a public vote and 7/10 would vote Remain.Those Labour MPs clinging on to this right wing project, let go. 
If Brexit is fudged/extended this month will you retaliate by boycotting Europeans cars and Products? PLEASE VOTE AND RETWEET!! 
The utter insanity of Brexit... being reported in the pro-Brexit Sunday Times  
But those 500 MPs were elected in 2017...a year after the Brexit referendum of 2016. So having 500 Remain MPs is the 'will of the people' unless, heaven forbid, you're suggesting people didn't know what they were voting for. You little elitist you! #PeoplesVote #Marr 
The most amusing part is that @LenMcCluskey is a massive Brexit supporter. So he had a major hand in causing Honda, Nissan, Rolls Royce and many others to leave. 
'I urge my Labour colleagues to consider voting for an improved Brexit deal from Theresa May' says Caroline Flint. #Ridge Follow Sunday politics live:  
Let's end the myth that Labour voters will abandon us for opposing this failed Tory project. Two-thirds of our supporters in Leave areas want a public vote. We should now be proud to demand a #FinalSay, oppose Brexit, and campaign to remain in the EU.  
"If you HAD to choose, which would you prefer?"Accept #Brexit deal & leave EU 60%Leave EU without a deal 40% 83% Remainers say accept deal & leave, 63% Leavers say 'No Deal'75% Labour say accept deal & leave, 57% Tories say 'No Deal'YouGov Feb 28 #marr #ridge 
Caroline Flint isn’t listening to MI6 people like Christopher Steele who called out Russian subversion of Brexit vote. She is on the Commons Intelligence Committee that promised to probe Russia Brexit and then didn’t @IanBlackfordMP @SophyRidgeSky 
 Blair admitting those wanting to delay Brexit will seek to use the delay to block Brexit altogether. 
One young couple yesterday who came to #Salisbury #PeoplesVote stand, said they voted leave because they believed the £350 million to the NHS on the side of the bus.They now want to Remain. #remainernow How can the government push through a referendum based on lies? @JohnGlenUK 
I see the media are still insistent on pretending that the "revoke Article 50 and stay in the EU" option doesn't exist, despite the definitive Brexit court case which confirmed it's always open to us at any time. #marr #Ridge #bbcnews #c4news #itvnews #skynews 
To all MP’s, Are you speaking out about the corruption of the Brexit referendum? For in complicity is corruption too.#marr #Brexitvote #BrexitBetrayal 
Er... Luciana, it's not "EU money".  If you don't even know that the EU demands UK taxpayer money, takes a big cut, and then only sends back the remainder, you're just not competent to pronounce on Brexit at all.  
Would British ministers stop lying to the British people that leaving the EU will enable the UK to trade with the rest of the world? Being an EU member does not prevent Germany from exporting four times more than we do to China. #Brexit #Ridge 
Poll shows Labour voters back party’s support for new Brexit referendum  
new poll corroborates all evidence we have found so far: Labour voters in party's heartlands back Final Say referendum | The IndependentTime for a #FinalSay 
The heartlands voter myth well and truly busted as our union's own polling had already shown. Labour must stand up for our voters by actively campaigning to give them the final say over Brexit!  
Sad thing about our country is that Brexit has ruined our pathway to a better, caring society for all. Whatever the outcome we will be torn apart for years now by hate, jealousy and revenge. As if we haven't got enough of that over immigration; party politics and crime. 
Rory Stewart is actually arguing that people support the Brexit deal. AGAIN!Unbelievable. #Ridge 
Brexit so far:24 Jun 2016- Jan 2017Tories negotiate with themselves[Article 50]Feb 2017- 14 Nov 2018Tories negotiate with themselves[Withdrawal agreement]15 Nov 2018- NowTories negotiate with themselves14 Mar 2019Vote to extend Tories' negotiation with themselves 
This deserves more coverage. A ship carrying production equipment for Swindon to add electric car manufacturing capability, Turns Back MID OCEAN when Honda CEO said closure was nothing to do with Brexit.  
I can't tell you how demoralising & terrifying it is having to sit in budget meetings & listen to how much money has to be siphoned off to prepare for brexit away from patients needs.We can barely cope with the current lack of resource, this is just making our jobs harder. 
I think he meant to say “forced into a second referendum by the resignation of various Labour MPs” but he mispronounced it as “Theresa May”  
'We've been forced into a second referendum by Theresa May' says shadow chancellor John McDonnell #RidgeFor more Sunday politics:  
The public should have the final say on Brexit.Agree with us? Tap retweet #Ridge #Marr 
The Japanese are very polite people and, knowing that any reference to Brexit would’ve been inflammatory, simply found other ways to explain their departure from the UK. 
University of Surrey plumbs new depths, by offering redundancy to ALL of its staff. Naturally the VC blames Brexit. Bullshit. This is the result of the marketisation of HE, and Surrey's "strategy" to exploit that, going awry.  
I’m not your mate. We voted to leave the EU. A small group of MPs are determined that they will respect our decision. The rest not so much. There is no such thing as an extreme brexit, it’s just brexit. What part of this is so very challenging for you?  
AGAINThings unacceptable to the public leading to political oblivion for the Tory’s 1 May’s Deal with the Backstop2 May’s Deal without the Backstop 3 May’s Deal in any shape or form 4 Delaying Brexit in any way 5 Ruling out No Deal 6 Any form of customs union or SM 
What is #Sodem?Sodem is Stand of Defiance European Movement.Started because the 48% Remain voters were ignored by govt & media. Brexit was portrayed as a 'done deal' Not going well, is it?I´ve been protesting Mon-Thurs when parliament sits since Sept 2017Join me & #StopBrexit 
Today I’ve joined 10 other @uklabour MPs to back Jeremy’s policy of a #finalsay to break the Parliamentary deadlock on Brexit in an article in the Guardian. Have a read   
11 ⁦@UKLabour⁩ MPs explain how “we now have an opportunity to defeat Tory Brexit, bring down the government, and rebuild and transform Britain. We must seize it.” #FinalSay 
Opinion: Here's how Corbyn can force a second referendum on Brexit  Thank you Margaret Beckett and George Howarth for supporting the @peterkyle and my amendment calling for a #finalsay on Theresa May’s deal 
If only Len had some form of influence over a major politician and his Brexit policy.  
Paul Nurse, Nobel prize winner and @TheCrick director, spelled out #Brexit threat to UK science on @BBCr4today . His interviewer choose to counter Nurse's points with Brexiter rubbish about funding science from our £39bn EU divorce bill. 
Whenever I hear or read ‘I support the PM’s deal because the country needs to move on from Brexit’ it immediately shows that person doesn’t understand the deal at all. 
Northern Labour voters back Brexit second referendum move by 75% - Mirror Online  
Mrs May is the Chamberlain of Brexit  
Oh dear, is it that time already?Theresa May will have to delay Brexit, Michel Barnier has said. The EU’s chief negotiator points out there is not enough time for the European Union to ratify the withdrawal agreement even if MPs back the plan on 12 March. 
After having watched how Brexit played out in the UK, the Danish PM @larsloekke  promises that he will not put the Danish EU membership to a referendum. It will be completely irresponsible to copy the circus that is currently playing in the UK 6/6 
The referendum and the brexiteers are charactherized by the Danish PM as:"A population that voted for some rhetorically skilled politicians who turned out to be untrustworthy con men who subsequently left the sinking ship." 4/6 
The Brexit negotiations in the House of Commons was characterized by the Danish Prime Minister as:"A paralyzed political system that is about to melt down. Where the two major political parties are so busy with tactics, they cannot talk to each other at all."  3/6 
Tragic. The reality of Brexit Britain. Closing doors not opening them.  
The dept for exiting EU (DExEU) estimate that an #nodeal Brexit will cost the UK £158bn per year. That’s £3bn per WEEK. Dwarfs the “£350m per week” we were supposed to save. Good work, lads. Thanks a bunch. #RevokeA50 
So, within the next 2 weeks we'll find out which MPs are going to act in the best interests of our country and which are going to try to force through a disastrous #Brexit deal that will make us poorer and take away our FOM rights. History will not be kind to them if it passes! 
"There isn't a magic money tree," Theresa May told nurses, who are struggling to survive. Yet her government found £1.5 billion to bribe the DUP, £2.7 billion to pay for Chris Grayling's cock-ups, £4 billion for No Deal Brexit planning...  
Theresa May will consider axeing the Human Rights Act after Brexit, despite promising she is “committed” to its protections, a minister has revealed.YOU HAVE BEEN WARNED - THE TORIES ARE TOXIC 
Martin Lewis poll: 64% Leave with No deal, as opposed 36% Delay Brexit  
Yesterday's campaign across north London. Come and march with us on March 23, asking for a #PeoplesVote. This is not 'another referendum', but a democratic say on the final deal including an option to remain.  
“Brexit (will) help improve people's standard of living. If you cut tariffs they would have the biggest effect on food, clothing and footwear that makes up a particularly large proportion of the expenditure of the least well-off in our society” @Jacob_Rees_Mogg#StandUp4Brexit 
Remainer Amber Rudd kills chances of becoming PM after threatening to delay Brexit deal  
Brexit means piccie on the right trying to compete with piccie on the left. Agriculture in the UK can't compete some of the biggest, most agressive, least regulated food production on the planet.  
The MPs who are ignoring their constituents and trying to thwart Brexit  
The EU game plan on Brexit deal revealed  
Economic momentum is ebbing away as consumer confidence weakens and businesses brace themselves for the possibility of a no-deal Brexit. More and more companies are hitting the brakes on investment and day-to-day business decisions are becoming increasingly problematic. #GI 
Interesting polling by YouGov buried in a Sunday Times article today on Labour’s support for EU referendum-About 75% said they agreed with Labour’s decision.If there is a new referendum, Labour’s heartland voters would support staying in the EU by 76% to 24%. 
Excellent & well-informed piece on the utter madness of Brexit:Why the UK cannot see that Brexit is utterly, utterly stupid  
All the talk about the various factors affecting the UK car market, and how it's not about Brexit, completely ignores the fact that our domestic market is collapsing while the rest of the EU is growing at its fastest pace ever.  
How come leavers argue that the consequences of #brexit are project fear because look, none of it has happened (sigh: we haven’t left yet and yes, some of it has), but they don’t mention that all the fantastic things they predicted haven’t either? 
Brexit weakens Britain & makes it dependent on USA & China while Trump destroys international alliances. Global power competition has returned just as Britain isolates itself from its natural allies in Europe. #StopBrexit 
According to a @YouGov poll 69% of @UKLabour voters in the north and the midlands would vote #Remain rather than leave on May’s Brexit deal. 66% are in favour of a #FinalSay referendum. pic.twitter.com/ZUahZpQAbK 
This is all very well, but it ignores the fundamental problems:1. Mrs May has proved herself to be completely untrustworthy throughout the #Brexit negotiations;2. She saw the process as damage-limitation; &3. She really doesn't want to leave the EU. 
5000 selfies make up this iconic image of @jeremycorbyn in today's @ObserverUK, calling on him to bring courage and leadership to unite @UKLabour MPs behind a #PublicVote on #Brexit. RT to support!  
Anna Soubry MP in 2015: “You can’t go back on your word because you don’t agree with the result”, like so many others now going back on their word, hellbent on overturning the referendum result. Wonder why people have so little faith in politicians?  
BBC 5 Live’s Emma Barnett steadfastly refuses to accept any Brexit bullshit from Lord Digby Jones.pic.twitter.com/cNsi2zIpDR 
Actually - Scaleups and startups are having a hard time re #Brexit - and it does seem to be stifling their growth which is related to #innovation and #productivity  —> see our report here which surveys hundreds of Scaleup CEOs  
AMBER RUDDIn the 2016 referendum, Hastings & Rye voted to leave the EU by a majority of 4,328. At the General Election in 2017, Amber Rudd's majority was just 346. The Remanier MP is skating on thin ice. pic.twitter.com/j60Mfmuq3l 
Less than a month until Brexit! Only 6 continuation deals negotiated, out of 72 required. Liam Fox has failed the UK. He has lied & put forward falsehoods such as his 'easiest deal' line. Where are the consequences for causing the UK this much harm? #ShameOnYouTories #marr #ridge 
It is a long way from “Lead don’t Leave”, a slogan pretending to be a promise much trumpeted in the first independence referendum, to “Once you’ve hit the iceberg, you’re all on it together” - @Feorlean 
Today I start my campaign for #HardcoreFullMemberEU, if #Brexit occurs on 29th March. I propose we support and lead a new #EUarmy, we embrace schengen and have the euro, give up our rebate and be treated like other EU members. Or we can #Remain and not have those things.  
The Wales and Ireland border may be the bigger Brexit threat to the economy 
Who voted for chlorinated chicken?Because that's what the UK will get if Brexit goes ahead.#StopBrexit 
87. Clarence Rd, HartlepoolYou're going to have to run it down (the car industry)... in the same way we ran down the coal and steel industries. These things happen." - Patrick Minford of Economists For Brexit  
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you  
Campaign against Brexit starts now – on positive terms only Labour can deliver  
Labour’s flip-flopping and game-playing on Brexit has failed its voters and the country, says @JoshMackenzieL @GetBritainOut 
There's nothing honourable in wrecking the economy, following a fraudulent referendum won by far right liars. 
politicians and journalists concerned about the potential impact of Brexit on British carmaking have had little to say about the actual impact of EU membershipJaguar Land Rover was been enticed to move thousands of jobs out of Britain and into Slovakia  
"BREXIT DELAYED, BREXIT BETRAYED"  This is all about Remainer (and Brexiteer) politics.  An important #Brexit Facts4EU Sunday editorial for all Brexiteers.#GoWTO 
Brexit - & Chris Grayling is the driver  
No it was money well spent terrifying other Tory MPs who now won’t dare vote against Brexit or for a second referendum. At least 20 in this camp  
Tory Minister Rory Stewart said on national radio of Theresa May's Brexit deal: “to be honest...80 per cent of the British public support this deal”. When asked where the number came from, "“I’m producing a number to try to illustrate what I believe" #CouldntMakeItUp #marr #ridge 
Europe can only give us more time if we have a clear Brexit plan | Tony Blair  
Are all Remainers as dim and as arrogant as you? He may not be the most eloquent but I suspect he works harder than most people and he believes that Brexit will affect him positively. Who is to say you or anyone knows better? 
Was the 2016 Referendum "Advisory" or "Binding"? What "Lies" did Remain tell and how much did they "overspend"? Why did 56% of the British people vote for the repatriation of WW2 Polish Pilots? When will Human Ingenuity overcome Imbecility? #RevokeArticle50 #StopBrexit 
Steve Bannon backs gladiator school - 'The Academy of the Judeo-Christian West' is being created in the Trisulti Charterhouse, an 800-year-old monestary in the village of Colleperdo, Italy. Other than Bannon, the school's funders have been kept a secret.' 
Dear @jamespeshaw & @MaramaDavidson, Can you please advise if @NZGreens are advocating to reduce the MMP threshold to 4% by simple parliamentary majority & without a referendum, and in time for the 2020 election?I asked this question of @golrizghahraman but she has not replied. 
«LEGATUM INSTITUTE»"Promoting policies that lift people from poverty to prosperity."An investment firm who profits from creating destabilization & chaos. Who's lurking behind the curtains? #Brexit#SpyGate[Thread]... 
This is wrong: a delay to Brexit is not inevitable; it is a deliberate device to keep the UK shackled to the EU. The right thing to do is to respect the democratic will of the British people and leave on WTO terms on 29th March.  
Today’s cannabis referendum panel on @TheHuiNZ was the korero we’ve been waiting for. This is how to do it.  
US gives Britain a scary taste of life after Brexit 
Japan's Prime Minister Shinzo Abe is determined to continue his human rights violations against Okinawans, in spite of the historic Referendum, and in spite of our first White House petition which got over 210,000 signatures.  
Brexit supporters give UK PM May three tests for EU deal: Sunday Times  
The interactions between Brexit campaigners, Arron Banks and Nigel Farage, and the Trump campaign have drawn the interest of Robert Mueller...   
 How can independent MPs demand another referendum, but refuse to put themselves up for their own People's Vote? 
In a 2014 report on the BBC about the referendum, presenter Giles Dilnot says, "It doesn't really matter what other countries think...  If we vote no, then like that - pfft - we're gone!"  No wonder people thought Brexit would be quick and easy.  
Brexit: death cult Tories - those blocking the current deal are being described as "death cult Tories", but in actuality parliament as a whole has become a death cult, filled with brain-dead zombies long ago departed from the ranks of humanity...  #Brexit.  
By all means walk away Kate. Nobody is stopping you walking away. You can go ANY TIME YOU LIKE. And, please don't let the door hit you on the way out.  #Brexit  
If Amber Rudd is leading the soft-Brexit initiative, then I am left to wonder if the DWP is her top priority. Universal Credit is an omnishambles and her department is fueling an epidemic of suicides and attempted suicides among UK's sick and disabled people. Does she even care? 
You are pressing on with brexit without knowing the "will of the people" in 2019.Everything indicates the electorate has changed its mind and the majority now support remain.We MUST be asked again, once the terms of leaving are clearly defined.#PeoplesVote 
If you want to change the UK, reject Brexit completely and embrace proportional representation.Solve the problems by improving the system. 
Quite impossible to summarise this brilliant article by @simon_schama in a tweet.But it's worth a year's subscription to the FT to read just this.If I had to sum up in a few words it would be these:#Brexit is a drowned dead duck drowning 
Brexit debates were often packed, whereas climate change barely attracted a handful of MPs. Cutting back 10% on Brexit attendance would have enabled MPs to spend more time with their constituents & attend the climate debate. Failure on the latter was a disgrace. @CarolineLucas 
Please sign the petition to save Okinawa!The 27-year-old who instigated a referendum in famously apolitical Japan @CNNI 
No, it represents a devastating failure of Brexit - your policy  
I don’t really care if UK gives access to US ‘chlorinated’ chicken post-Brexit or not. But there are c. 300 mil Americans and visitors to US every year, including Remainers, who eat this chicken without batting an eyelid. It’s another example of Brexit sending ppl totally insane  
"I've legally lived in the UK and paid taxes since 1975I was an NHS nurse for 30 years.How do I get to keep my home and continue to be allowed to see my grand kids?"#BREXIT #BrexitShambles 
Also worth remembering that *he wont have a choice* post-Brexit... because UK poultry farmers will all be gone within a few months, bankrupt by the plummeting £.UK egg-laying flocks are going out of business every week over the last year or so. 
The thing is Alex once you understand enough to realise that Brexit is a catastrophe for our country, do you swallow your pride and do the right thing or do you put your head down and pretend you didn't get it wrong? Put people and country first, I say.  
Japanese domestic press very firmly blames brexit 
Brexit: What would no deal mean for lorry drivers?  
No self-respecting country would accept this deal. MPs must vote it down. Brexiteers must stay strong, crush May's deal, keep voting it down and be patient. We need a managed no-deal Brexit. Offer A24 & walk. Any future payment linked to a deal..  
Nigel Farage on Russian TV sucking up to his idol Trump for a rabidly right-wing US audience & declaring that if there's another referendum on #Brexit "there'll be no more Mr Nice Guy".What a strutting nincompoop the man is. A poundshop Oswald Mosley. 
Oliver Letwin Tory MP who wants to stop Brexit has a really cracking idea.If you see a burglar outside checking out your house invite them in.Let them use your facilities and then let them tie you up and Rob youAnd then repeat this  process until all your money is gone. 
The government have just handed a £365 million contract to this ferry company after Brexit! Just in case  
Marjorie Chorlins US Chamber of Commerce @Harvard explaining that the vast US investment in the UK has largely been due to the UK being in the EU market of 515m people.  After Brexit, with UK population of only 66m, US companies will be finding alternative routes of access. 
BREXIT CRISIS: Scale of crisis facing automotive sector amid Brexit laid bare /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
And finally, at the end of a long and marvellous day for #Brexit, please follow @ajcdeane Alex Deane, he's our man on #skypapers and #bbc #datelinelondon 
BREXIT: Brexit exodus as quarter of civil servants working on deal quit in six months /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Tweeted nearly 9 months ago by @guyverhofstadt, there is increasing evidence that this is a clear and present danger. Yet the EU is still too dozy, and as for Brexit Britain, it cheers the fifth column on. Britain has become what was in its better days its worst enemy.  
There's quite an astonishing news line buried in this Irish Times story from a few days ago: "The Irish Times understands the British government is likely to reintroduce direct rule to Northern Ireland if there is a no-deal Brexit."H/t @SJAMcBride 
Brexit: Boost for Corbyn as Labour voters in party's heartlands back Final Say referendum - The Independent  
Nobody who voted Brexit ever wanted a deal let alone a crap one that cost us 39bn we just want what we voted for and to you remainers we do know what we voted for   
We have fabulous grandmother's, grandfather's, daughters, sons, sisters, brothers, mums, dad's and even family pets following us today  Let's follow them all back and be ready to mobilise the support for a clean WTO Brexit  
LIVING IN NEW ZEALANDPROS:Beautiful as fuckJacinda ArdernNo TrumpNo BrexitNo animals/bugs trying to murder youCONS:Item cost: $5 Shipping Cost $78"World Tour ends in Sydney"All your online friends five billion miles awayHouse pricesMike Hosking 
Apparently there is now a ‘Hop, Skip & Jump Brexit’See: Good. About time we got into Ministry of Silly Walks Brexits. I shall add this scalp to the list: 
This thread people. Stop getting stuck in the mud and let’s go the full way with Labour policy... that means roaring onto PV and arguing to boot this clearly failed Brexit into the long grass.Then let’s focus on building a better Britain AND Europe for all of us.  
MPs get three votes on #Brexit in three months?But we’re not allowed a second one after three years!  
Westminster can’t agree to rule out No Deal. And it looks like it isn’t  going to rule in a Peoples Vote.  So WTF can parliament do? My @heraldscotland column on the 28 Days of Brexit. Tomorrow. (Complete with Zombies) 
If Brexit happens we’ll become the 51st state of chlorinated chicken. So much for taking back control.  
Your Brexit name is your favourite long-life food + your biggest fear 
(26) Now, it seems May can only roll her Brexit bill through Parliament if she agrees to resign sooner rather, than later.  
How is the UK supposed to prosper in a knowledge-based world economy if its universities are forced to contract by #Brexit and other pressures? 
(24) The people, having voted already and settled the matter, has now to pressure their leaders not to find any excuse to betray Brexit. A hard Brexit, if it needs be.  
Know what concerns me more than SNC-Lavalin?Rising right-wing extremismThe CPC's cozy relationship with the far-rightClimate change and the CPC's lack of a climate planThe triple threat of Scheer, Ford, and KenneyAnti-vaxxersTrumpBrexitRussian interference#cdnpoli 
(18) She inherited the task of making Brexit happen from her predecessor John Cameron. And she is NOT excelling at the task.  
Don't be surprised if the members of the ERG vote for TM's deal. If they can't get their wet dream no deal #Brexit, they'll vote for anything that gets the UK out of the EU. They don't care if it's a good or bad deal. For them, Leave means Leave, whatever! #RevokeArticle50 
Trump pumped his Scottish golf club via tweet this am. He tends to project cover b4 a story hits. He inexplicably visited the Scottish property after clinching the 16 nom- low on cash w/ the GOP convention looming. He also pushed Brexit. Keep an eye on it. 
Brexit boost for PM as Sir Graham Brady signals he will back her deal  
Having too much FUN last night! (Myself drinking just water, no less) partying with @PARISDENNARD Mr. Brexit @Nigel_Farage and @ChrisGarciaUSA  at @raheemkassam @willchamberlain @HumanEvents CRAZY WILD @cpac afterparty.  #maga #love Dress @calvinklein #humanevents 
The University of Surrey has offered voluntary redundancy to all staff as it seeks to make £15m cuts. Vice chancellor Max Lu said universities faced "unprecedented pressures", including Brexit and a possible reduction in tuition fees. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Arguably this is the most important statement made today by EU Brexit negotiator ⁦@MichelBarnier⁩ - “nobody has said a no deal has terrible consequences...Consequences will be much more serious for the UK” 
Labour voters in party's heartlands back fresh Brexit referendum, poll finds  
.@andrealeadsom and @Jeremy_Hunt The active pursuit of a delay to Brexit, with no purpose beyond frustration, is a betrayal of referendum result  
It's very simple Len: When you backed Brexit, you turned your back Honda, and you turned your back on their workers. You're supposed to be a union leader, not backing Tory disaster projects. You're a disgrace 
NEW POLLING:Labour’s heartlands support calls for a #PeoplesVote - the idea that voters in north & midlands will thank Labour MPs who facilitate a Tory Brexit is put to bed. #PutItToThePeople#FFS 
Brexiters desperately trying to hustle Brexit through because they know the country is firmly against it. This is contemptible: #PeoplesVote is essential. “Now Tory Brexiteers plan a 'hop, skip and jump' exit from EU on March 29” - Mirror Online 
Why? What precisely is wrong with a WTO Brexit? Stop using silly language like 'crashing out' and explain in clear English. We don't believe you.  
One thing is for sure, Brexiters will NOT rest until a true Brexit arrives, Kicking the can down the road will only mean more prolonged insecurity, we will not be fooled into a half brexit. we won, its our democratic right, not an opportunity for you to ignore us,its WTO time NOW 
Britain doesn't need a new Remain party. Remainers already run the country:  #Brexit 
For all the worth the Pound will have after Brexit, we'd be better trading in empty Irn Bru bottles, they'll be worth more as a currency than Sterling  
 Nothing that involves Brexit does not come at a cost: you even have to pay to march for it.  
The EU says it would allow flights between Britain and the EU to continue for 12 months after Brexit day  
INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: Labour’s heartlands want final say referendum #tomorrowspaperstoday 
“MPs are our representatives not delegates”Yup, and as our representatives they realised Brexit was too big of an issue to be settled by themselves without the people’s opinion. Therefore, using parliamentary sovereignty, they voted for the referendum and consequently Article 50 
When the Remoaner movement suggest technocrats in London and Brussels have a keener, more direct appreciation of the problems facing society than your average Brexit voter.  
A factor that I think is being overlooked is that, for quite a few ERGers multiple extension, losing a second referendum and Remain would be a more acceptable option than any ideological compromise on their part. 
This is sensational. The effective head of @vote_leave my friend @DanielJHannan, like me a LIFE-LONG Leave supporter, says we must Delay Brexit rather than take a bad deal. He is absolutely correct  
UK Brexit negotiating team arrives in Brussels  
In tomorrow's Sunday National ... Michael Russell on May's Brexit disaster  
This is very good news. @DanielJHannan who was a driver of @vote_leave joins me in arguing we must delay #Brexit and vote down the deal. A delay to 2020 is in Britain’s interest, he says, and he is right.  
Despite Brexit.  
So chlorinated chicken is back on the menu after Brexit  
Brexit delay now unavoidable, says EU, as Andrea Leadsom and Jeremy Hunt warn of attempt to frustrate departure  
Nigel Farage: Our leader has negotiated a Withdrawal Agreement that reads like a surrender document of a nation that's been beaten at war!The sheer awfulness of May's Withdrawal Agreement means we would Leave #EU in name only.No more Mr Nice Guy!#Brexit 
.@RaheemKassam explains the key pillar to the Brexit movement.  #CPAC2019 #WhatMakesAmericaGreat 
sometimes when I see the mess we're making of Brexit I think of her looking down on us, how disappointed she must be, how her heart must ache to see us like this, I speak of course of Princess Diana 
UK Tory minister tries to deny Scotland access to the lifeboats because they've all been taken by the rich rats desperately fleeing the sinking HMS Brexit ...#DissolveTheUkUnion #ScotlandIsNow 
Away from Brexit : I live in Romford not far away from where that poor poor girl was stabbed last night-last week someone else was stabbed opposite our house - I’d love to ask my local MP: WHAT THE HELL IS HAPPENING IN HAVERING . But I can’t . He’s blocked me . 
#Tories wont be forgiven for hard #Brexit - it's imposing massive tax increase on corporate UK  @iNews @RightToVote @Anna_Soubry 
You need to have a word with Michael Gove - he seems to think tariffs and higher food prices are needed to protect our farmers after Brexit.So do the farmers, come to think of it. 
Since TIG quit to create an anti-Brexit group, TMs announced a vote on No Deal and Labour has announced support for a second refAnd they represent at type of politics that no one in the country wantsThey literally have no purpose@Anna_Soubry et al must feel like idiots 
If I was a political strategist for the Green party my message would have been:Brexit or No Brexit or Whatever Brexit, we are heading towards a catastrophic event and only we, the Green Party, are taking this seriously 
MPs who put Britain's interests first should join the campaign to cancel Brexit with a people's vote before it’s too late (via @bopinion) 
Buba Galadima-Atiku's spokesperson arrested.Uyi Giwa-Osagie- Atiku's lawyer arrested.And now... EFCC arrests @Atiku's son in-law and Finance  Director  The famous "Referendum on honesty" #GoHarderBuhari 
The result of the 1979 referendum was rejected because of a turnout threshold rule clearly set out in advance. And the sense of unfairness generated by that threshold rule is the reason why we've never had anything other than simple majority requirements again.  
BREXIT CRISIS: Brexit exodus as quarter of civil servants working on deal quit in six months /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
Johnson utters falsehoods every time he opens his mouth. He doesn’t say a single truthful thing. Today the EU, whose every decision UK influenced, is ‘run by ‘foreigners’. And there’ll be ‘anger if there’s 2nd referendum’ although most of the anger is against Brexit. 
There are a lot of variables and unknowns involved in BrexitBut one thing is absolutely clear: No sane person could vote for TM's deal  Any MP who votes in support is signing this country's suicide noteNothing else matters nowThis deal from hell Must. Not. Pass 
Brexit is 650 hours away. #brexit 
Nvm, I actually counted. In two weeks, the senior editor of HuffPostUK made 11 tweets or re-tweets attacking Vanessa Beeley. No other topic - not even Brexit - came close. 
Revealed: scale of Labour opposition to second referendum from Jeremy Corbyn's front bench  
Going full authoritarian now are you Tom? After the call for a 2nd referendum.Interesting... not sure how many votes it's going to win you though. Political parties usually try this when they're IN POWER. 
Their children (dual British & Spanish nationals) were too young to vote in the referendum, & of course, his wife was denied a vote.I asked him what his wife was doing about getting settled status, & he said "nothing".5/8 
@zelo_street is right that Islamophobia is on a serious scale in the Tories.Think about Brexit and where the focus of the biggest racist messages were.See the links to threads below.  
Thanks. I doubt we'll ever know the answer to that. Similar to viral FB posts during the referendum (the one starting "we'll still be in the EEA" is my favourite) that were never officially part of the Leave campaign. Remember there's huge £ pouring in to the no deal folks. 
Watch this speech, give it a like & share - and help kickstart a campaign to expose corrupt UK councils Rochdale is a key target & perhaps a litmus test in the next election to see how UKIP do as a post-Brexit partyIt’s a fantastic speech: 
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 2: Theresa May is trying to slowly and limpy get us to the end of #Brexit but if we are not careful, we'll crash and fall  
Best Brexit take I have seen. Perfect metaphor.   
Barnier SAVAGES May's deal: Britain on brink of no deal as NO new Brexit proposals made. No Deal is what We Want!   
BREXITRuins everything, has big cult of weirdos#NewKaiju 
In a Brexit parallel universe, the Queen would dissolve Parliament then abdicate. Ultimate mic drop. 
Brexit is scheduled, ready or not, for March 29th. But neither Theresa May nor Jeremy Corbyn can necessarily deliver on recent commitments:  
Remain will never go away. If  Brexiters manage to steal our country out of the EU, on the morning afterwards Remain will become Rejoin & we will be back with our friends & partners in Europe soon. Brexit is futile. Time, history & demographics are against it. #StopBrexit 
Absolutely rightful call to ban live exports to non-EU countries. But could have significant impacts if successful if we Brexit.  
Didn’t Nick used to have a very long beard? Do we all think he’s shaved it off so no one will remember or recognise  his intensely stupid role in May’s 2017 election or the Brexit fiasco for which he is seeking to escape his large share of red line blame ? 
Reporter: “So why did you vote for #Brexit?”British Bigot :  
Breaks my heart that young people are being fucked over by Brexit - how can collaboration between countries be anything but a good thing  
The alternative is to be collaborators in the theft of our children’s futures, the betrayal of our EU friends, family, neighbours, co-workers, carers & allies, the destruction of our economy & submission to the far-right coup that is Brexit.So, yes, I will be a revolutionary.  
There are FOUR Great Offices of State in the UK. All are run by people who voted at the EU Referendum for the UK to Remain in the EU.The Prime Minister: MayThe Home Office: JavidThe Treasury: HammondThe Foreign Office: HuntBy a winning margin of 4%, the UK voted to Leave. 
If I were to hazard a guess it's that Caroline Lucas has devoted more of her time trolling Jeremy Corbyn over a second referendum than she has on environmental issues.  
There is no good Brexit.Referendum was marginal bad advice obtained by fraud, so no mandate, and should be ignored.So why are we leaving?Seriously.#nationalcrisis#StopBrexit#RevokeA50 
Brexit's biggest financial backer is Arron Banks and the source of his fortune is hard to track. We tried to untangle it  
It wasn’t a ‘mistake’ she was put there for a purpose by the Tory party - to ensure that Brexit would be betrayed. Seen from that perspective  she is being very successful. When she goes I expect she will move on to a fabulously well rewarded second career. 
Chris Grayling in 2016: Negotiating Brexit will be simpleChris Grayling in 2017: Nobody ever said negotiating Brexit would be simpleBillboard location: Ramsgate (where else?)  
Congratulations ⁦@NewStatesman⁩ for the most ludicrous weekly Brexit project fear story. Stock up on marsbars magnum icecreams, fresh fruit & condoms. We’re all doomed if we say goodbye to Juncker & his mates..  
You’re wrong you pompous git that’s what we voted for. #wtoexit‘Nobody wants a hard Brexit’ - Slovenia president 
#Brexiteer Liam Fox MP - siding with Trump’s ambassador - is keen to kill off our chickens in the British coop, but is unnaturally benevolent towards chlorinated American chickens.. #Brexit  
Let’s get these coaches all filled. Scotland will march on Westminster to tell them we do not want their stinking Brexit!  
Why is it when #Brexiteers DON'T have an answer to a question about #NoDeal #Brexit, they always resort to" I'm sure we'll find a way! "And IF WE DON'T?!!What about the people who will lose THEIR jobs? And what about THEIR wageless families?Its not YOUR job - ITS THEIRS!! 
27 days to go & the only quantifiable #Brexit job losses will be in the House of Commons, once we get to play at democracy again.#DrainTheSwamp. 
German companies plan to pass all extra costs caused by #Brexit on to UK businesses and UK consumers.Another #Leave own goal. 
Anna Soubry "I promised to respect and honour the vote”"I agreed to the referendum and in so doing agreed to be bound by the result""You can't go back on your word because you don't agree with the result"TRAITOR AND LIAR!  
.@HicksPolitics and Carl Benjamin (Sargon of Akkad) discuss what now appears to be the inevitable extension of Article 50 and the betrayal of Brexit.WATCH:  
There is no single aspect of Brexit debacle that any other country would have toleratedLies cheating illegality lost votes margin division damage poison chaos incompetence destruction etcNo wonder May the Insane wants to hurry it throughMPs must stop her before UK is destroyed 
The 2016 referendum wasn’t an instruction to the UK govt to negotiate a new deal with the EU. Rather, it was (explicitly, literally & in terms) a *rejection* of the new deal the UK govt had negotiated with the EU. 
Remain will never go away. If the Brexiters manage to thieve our country out of the EU, on the morning afterwards Remain will become Rejoin & we will be back with our friends & partners in Europe soon. Brexit is futile. Time, history & demographics are against it. #PeoplesVote 
The criminal EU referendum only stands bc it was advisory.  
Audience BOOS at Labour MP Rachel Reeve's second referendum pleas - ‘We ALREADY voted!’ She was calling for a second Brexit referendum and arguing Labour would have handled the Brexit negotiations “differently”..  
Watch the ITV Exposure on Monday night 10.45 pm for more about #Brexit and the web @DamianCollins 
US ambassador slams fears that Brexit means lower food standards, it doesn’t. Remainers are scaremongering over a UK-US trade deal because they want Brexit to fail & don't want the UK to thrive outside the EU. The US is a larger market than the EU 27..  
If you’re gong to cancel Brexit, go ahead & cancel. But don’t imagine threats of cancellation will either persuade Leavers to back a deal worse than Remaining or make any difference to whether we Leave in the end.  
I wish someone would pay me 650k to talk Brexit on twitter all day.Currently I do it for free. 
Angry people whether you voted Leave or Remain, the people pushing for any Brexit are the same people who have consistently failed this country causing all the problems. Any Brexit will not be the ‘salvation’ but our eternal damnation!   
ERG that vote for deal will perhaps say ‘at least we leave’. But don’t underestimate what good Communists Mogg et al are. Could be strongly tempted to vote against May’s deal and risk Remain to become martyrs and say Brexit would have been a success if only it had been tried 
POLL: Which of the following is the most credible and believable? Hope Not Hate’s ‘State of Hate’ report.Michael Cohen’s Testimony re Trump. Theresa May’s ‘Brexit means Brexit’.Encyclopaedia of Fairies and Elves. 
Overheard in Yorkshire:Just walked behind two ladies in York station saying. I know we all voted for brexit but that doesn't mean we want it now. 
People laughed about #Tsipras in 2013 and guess what.. People laughed about the #brexit referendum in 2016 and guess what..People laughed about the #Trump in 2016 and guess what..People laughed about #Salvini & #DiMaio in 2018 and guess what..The people are revolting... 
Labour's support for a "public vote" opens the door to debates about the conditions under which a second referendum would take place  
The worst thing about Brexit is the betrayal of those who voted for itImagine voting to help the NHS then @TheBMA says it hurts itImagine voting for more control but Leaving the EU means we have lessImagine voting to help your forgotten town but your town bears the brunt 
Listening to vox pops on #UK programmes re. #Brexit I am constantly struck by references to the war & lack concern for #UK’s youth who overwhelmingly support remaining in #EU. Usually societies think of the young. UK Brexit looks back not forward. 
We have 650 MPs, around 500 are Remainers and are prepared to ignore the referendum result. What do we do? 
Brexit is the biggest dogs dinner Britain has ever seen!To stop #Brexit, hundreds of dogs will be holding the biggest dogs dinner outside Parliament on 10 March.It’s time to bark out #StopBrexit #BrexitDogsDinner #wooferendum #BiggestDogsDinnerEver pic.twitter.com/tgw1EUKD2O 
despite brexit, I still seem to be in the single market 
Brexit is a fire-sale of UK industries  
Oh dear, read this, Brexiteers ! You said German companies would plead with Mrs Merkel to make compromises to get a good deal with the UKTurns out they're just going to pass on extra costs to British consumers "because Brexit isn't Germany's fault" :) 
Don’t be fooled: this Brexit deal creates a triple lock to shackle the UK to Brussels forever  via @BrexitCentral 
The next bull-run is going to make the last one look like a testnet launch-- with Brexit near, shaky interest rates, slowing economies, and about 40 trillion "missing" dollars, crypto *is* the way out. Bankers know what's coming, and will wish to control access. 
As in the same Westminster which hauled our elected government before the Supreme Court? For daring to attempt to protect our people from the most damaging aspects of an enforced English Brexit? A Brexit which Scottish people want no part of? That Westminster, aye?  
This proves what I’ve been saying for months. Brexit doesn’t even deliver on its core promises to give more sovereignty, control our money or reduce immigration. We will become more vulnerable not less. It is completely reckless to ‘get Brexit over the line.”#InformedConsent 
"Our company didn't cause Brexit, so why should we suffer for it."  
Rich London banker who says he's OK with Brexit making people poorer, going to one of the most economically neglected parts of the UK, to charge people for the privilege of walking with him.And calls everyone else "elite".#SunderlandMarch #MarchtoLeave 
In a straight choice between holding a second referendum and leaving with no deal, 44% back holding a public vote on what to do next and 42% support leaving with ‘no deal’ 
What Brits want to do if Parliament rejects May’s Brexit deal:Leave March 29 even if No Deal 38%Revoke Article 50 & Remain 25%Delay Article 50 until greater idea of what deal has support 24% 
Sorry, Janet, but you’re wrong. First because May’s deal isn’t Brexit at all — it leaves us controlled by Brussels indefinitely, maybe forever. Second because the EU’s punishment terms are worse than EU membership. 
Brexiteers against Brexit. A small but growing movement. 
Herman Van Rompuy, the former President of the EU Council, said about the UK and Brexit the other day, “with their backs against the wall, the abyss in front of their eyes and a knife on their throat. We are nearly there.” This is what our former "partners" think of us. 
Brexit news: Lawyers blow hole in plan for short extension favoured by May in order to pass her deal.Article 50 extension to June illegal unless UK takes part in MEP elections at end of May, German parliament told. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
err, I thought the SNP ambition was to leave the UK ... not be in its govt?The referendum was a majority for brexit .. what is it u don't understand when the people speak?  
Corbyn will be happy if anti-referendum Labour MPs defeat Labour on a #PeoplesVote. As one MP put it: “He will go into the division lobby with his fingers crossed behind his back.” Which is why we Remainers must pile the pressure on those MPs. #Brexit 
"Hundreds of thousands of EU nationals living in the UK may not be able to vote in the upcoming European parliament election because of Brexit."@EuropeStreet looks at which nationalities are mostly affected. 
Three Sundays to Brexit – cartoon  
I haven’t always seen eye to eye with @jayrayner1 on poultry welfare. But totally agree- the “no brainer” is keeping American mass/produced chicken - cruelly farmed & chlorine rinsed - out of the UK. One of many potential food perils of post Brexit Britain. 
The thing the Remainers don't get is that they're bored of Brexit after three years, we, the Brexiters, won't get bored. We've been chasing this for ten to twenty years and May's fake Brexit won't placate us. 
Good to see & hear @NFUtweets Deputy President @essexpeasant reinforcing the message on @BBCNews that British farming standards must not be sacrificed in any future US trade deal. #brexit #BackBritishFarming 
Remainer attempts to throw Brexit supporter over a railing on a bridge in Exeter and the only coverage it gets is Devon Live?!Imagine if this was a Brexiteer attacking a Remainer!Police hunt after 'threats to throw' pro Brexit protester from BRIDGE  
If the Withdrawal Agreement (Theresa May’s “deal”) is passed then it becomes a treaty. Breaking it would then be a breach of international law, effectively tying the hands of future UK leaders to a painful, protracted Brexit, until a 2nd referendum to Remain.It is a trap. 
Here's how Corbyn can force a 2nd referendum on Brexit."When the PM brings back her deal in the next week or so, she will try to impose a choice on MPs: my deal or no deal. That is a choice we, the Labour Party & the majority in parliament must reject"  
I wonder how many of the 2 million UK nationals living in the EU are considering relinquishing their UK nationality if #Brexit goes ahead!  
Any form of #Brexit whatsoever is going to cost jobs long and short term. Time for #Farage, #ReesMogg, #Johnson, #Gove etc to get on a big red bus, face the people losing jobs now and apologise on their wealthy, hedge funded, self-seeking, knees. End of. #RevokeA50 #Remain 
How sad it must be, to be a yoon who cheers on the fact that WM would try to block an independence referendum. How much do these people loathe themselves. 
.@Telegraph cartoon#TheresaMay #Brexit #vaping 
David, May's deal IS No Brexit. And it has more locks and chains to keep us in than are involved in simply Remaining a member.  
Nice bit of play from Noble followed up by a decent dollop of Brexit football just to balance things out. 
It's too late. This is brexit. You'd be better off getting your members to March on the 23rd to try and stop brexit and save other car plants. But this one? It's done 
What they said before the 2016 EU Referendum -: BBC News - No UK trade benefit from EU membership - Civitas report  
Looking forward to speaking this afternoon at #CPAC2019 on Brexit, and why it is great for Britain and the United States. Brexit is about sovereignty, self-determination and freedom. @CPAC 
Revealed: scale of Labour opposition to second referendum from Jeremy Corbyn's front bench  
Politicians and lobbyists in the pocket of American agribusiness falling over themselves to explain how American chicken is or isn't washed in chlorine or peracetic acid...a convenient distraction as to why they have to wash in the first place. 
So much for “global Britain”.To investors and employers, Brexit Britain currently looks like a laughing-stock.Let’s revoke Article 50 and stop this Brexit shambles.Write to your MP to demand a #PeoplesVote & #Remain today. 
From LEADING the EU, the biggest and most successful free trade bloc the world has ever known...To being America's malformed gimp, fed a diet of bleached chicken and privatised health care.Wow.When did we lose our collective minds??#Brexit 
The United States is giving the United Kingdom a preview of what it can expect from take-no-prisoners trade negotiations after Brexit  
Really admire you, Andrea. Thanks for everything you are doing to achieve #Brexit.  
Brexit means... watching tens of thousands of jobs and hundreds of billions of pounds leave. 
Nothing is worse than May’s deal. However, if MPs vote to stop a #WTOBrexit by delaying #Brexit then they have sole responsibility for what will follow.If they want to deny Brexit, they can own it.#StandFirm #WTOBrexit 
Brexit means... subjecting the UK Government to being sued by private companies whenever a policy change threatens their profits. 
How strange that you relentlessly persist with Brexit when your constituents don't want it and you both sit on wafer thin majorities @MarkLancasterMK & @iainastewart. Risky strategy that.  #RevokeArticle50 
One of my cats has been trying to catch raindrops for a long while, and I feel that there's a really deep metaphor for #Brexit somewhere in that  #cats 
The establishment's dishonest betrayal of the 17million people who voted to leave the EU will not be forgotten or forgiven:  #Brexit 
The UK needs to be strong after Brexit,for all our sakes we've got to make a proper go of it,we've got to succeed and flourish.  I am Scottish and I realise that Scotland has a part to play in that success,  we can't let #indyref2 get in the way of something as important as this. 
'Gina Miller is no stranger to adversity, but her role in the Brexit debate turned her into a prominent target. She talks about her new memoir 'Rise' at the Glasgow @AyeWrite book festive 14th March 
McCluskey is forcing brexit down the throats of his members and the whole of the Labour movement against their will. Then pretends to care when his brexit - as every informed person warned - destroys manufacturing jobs. Vile hypocrisy.  
“The outcome of #Brexit now depends on Geoffrey Cox, Arlene Foster and Nigel Dodds”. How does that sound to you, #Scotland ? 
Government Leak Confirms No Deal Brexit Includes Replacing Internet With Teletext  
This guy has been the best thing about Brexit...  
How the Irish government and the EU elite worked together to overturn the democratic Irish rejection of the Lisbon Treaty:  #Brexit 
Thanks Jenny@theresa_may and @michaelgove have both promised to "maintain and enhance" environmental standards as we #BrexitAND"to not lower our food standards as part of a future trading agreement" ...So I look forward to the Government backing relevant amendments  
It's precisely what brexit is all about; a firesale of rights & standards & a realighnment of wealth further towards the already wealthy. A coup. 
No. No it couldn't. Durex condoms are manufactured outside the EU in countries with no formal trade agreements with the EU. This is more Project Fear nonsense. #brexit #ProjectFear @durex 
Up to 17 members of Corbyn's Shadow Cabinet have indicated that they could rebel against his second referendum policy.  
A larger question; Can Scotland run a Scottish referendum free from Westminster, Whitehall and Broadcasting House London interference and funding?  
The answer must be political. The new #European parliament will have to find majorities on the major stakes of the next decade : climate, environment, education, culture, innovation, security and defense. [2/2] #Brexit @Harvard European Law Association 
This is just a tiny selection of the things you said and did @BorisJohnson. You don't get to now claim that Brexit isn't xenophobic. You don't get to say a #PeoplesVote would cause division. You already did that. So no, you don't get to 'nicewash' Brexit. Own your Brexit. 9/9 
The #Brexit has taught us Europeans a lesson of unity : in the last three years, the European countries have remained united. The Union stayed firm on its fundamental principles. [1/2] @Harvard European Law Association 
.@BorisJohnson, making a case for Brexit and against a #PeoplesVote, had this to say in India earlier today: "It was a very acrimonious, very divisive campaign ... [and Brexit is misunderstood by those who see it as] xenophobic". Let's have a closer look, shall we. [THREAD] 
To keep Honda in Swindon we need to bin #brexit and soon. Hope we manage to to save your jobs and many others. There is a march in London on 23rd March. Would be great if there was a big Unite/Honda presence to get the message across. Good luck. 
Which begs the question: why didn't Gov't spend the last three years thrashing out that agreement? Instead of a backstop that no one wants & undermines Brexit.  
We now know the great prize of Brexit: becoming Trump’s prey.So much for “trade deals on day one”.Brexit means ripping up British standards to allow American chlorinated chicken imports to flood in.Nobody voted for this. #RevokeA50 & #StopBrexit. 
This is truly awful ! A man dying on the streets is bad in fact dreadful ! But to be identified by his obedient distressed dogs name tag should make us all think@Conservatives what have you created ?#myheartbleedsBTW not too sure if this poor chap gave a fig about Brexit  
It’s official. There’s a particular breed of Leaver who thinks Brexit should happen whatever the cost to you and me. This particular one would be quite happy to see us living off stewed grass if meant leaving the EU. Whatever happened to the sunlit uplands? #BarmyBrexit 
Remainer MPs, please respect democracy.Distinctive daily #Brexit research & news : #GoWTO 
final Brexitometer results from the @EuroMove_MK stall in Milton Keynes! there's a lot of love for a #PeoplesVote, but #RevokeArticle50 has absolutely smashed it once again!  the people of MK just want Brexit stopped!!@peoplesvote_uk @euromove @BrexitometerC 
Popped in to my neighbours last night for a cup of tea and hobnob, oh and 7 cans of larger!! looked at @BBC for 10 minuets I see their still coming out with their own anti Brexit figures and forecasts. Hoping to see a few top bosses heads roll after Brexit for their  CORRUPTION!! 
Here's part of the Cardiff march.Well done @Cardiff4EU @WalesForEurope @EuromoveWales There's a bit of 'We're not going to Brexit' at 4 mins in from @ChrisHa33342711 
“Let’s show some strength and steel and stand up for what people voted for” - @andreajenkyns#GoWTODaily #Brexit research & news :  
“Brexit gives us the opportunity to finish the job that Margaret Thatcher started.”Nigel Lawson, FormerTory ChancellorChairman, Vote Leave  
What a day @Cardiff4EU & @ValeforEurope were just 2 of the groups today in #Cardiff. So many new people too & lots of new interest.People in #Wales want to #Remain & #Reform. #Brexit will be a disaster for Wales. Join a local group. Look on twitter & Facebook. Now is the time  
Mother of all Brexit comparisons..#Brexit  
Newport has changed it’s mind about #Brexit & the desire for political change was palpable.A great compliment paid to me today was ‘I can tell from the way you talk that you will stick to your convictions & follow through.’ This can be applied to any @RenewParty candidate. 
Unfortunately, Labour’s failure to support our amendment meant yet another opportunity to secure a #PeoplesVote was missed on Wednesday. Parliament is stuck in Brexit gridlock. (4/7) 
Only a public inquiry will unearth the truth about what has gone on, basic arithmetic proves what Cummings has claimed doesn't add up and where to start with Gunster and LeaveEU over their spending? This MP explains how easy it is to circumvent our laws...... pic.twitter.com/1vIrCg1pJK 
Tuesday saw the Independent Group table a cross-party amendment to the PM’s Brexit motion to call for an immediate #PeoplesVote to prevent a disastrous no-deal. (3/7) 
On Monday, Independent Group MPs had their first formal meeting. With our values agreed, they discussed the need for a #PeoplesVote to break the Brexit deadlock and the steps ahead. (2/7)  
Just stop supporting #Brexit you twonk. That's why your members jobs are being lost. It is literally YOUR fault. 
EU panics as Barnier REFUSES to put time limit on Brexit backstop ‘I’m very worried’  
Welcome to the newest #Brexit parody account on the block .@BitchesvBrexit. They're 18 hours younger than us and they're on Give them a follow! 
Meat export orders cancelled due to BrexitThe really annoying thing is we said EU countries would rather buy internally if we left. We were told by brexitears they need us more than we need them. Well guess what, that was bollocks.   via @thepigsite 
@ByDonkeys Finally got chance to stop for a pic with this excellent piece of work! You'll be pleased to know I had several supportive beeps from passing 'remoaners'!  #Brexit #Liverpool #ledbydonkeys 
Everyone should check out her podcast @gaslitnation. This week a great interview with UK journalist Carole Callwalladr on similarities of US situation and Brexit. 
‘Brexit shows democracy doesn’t work’: An interview with Titania McGrath  
By spending, the EU is an agricultural union before anything else. And US agribusiness seems to be one of the most enthusiastic supporters of Brexit.  
“US wants chlorinated chicken in British supermarkets for post-Brexit trade deal” Remind me again .. what happens when you have different food regs crossing borders ?YOU NEED PEOPLE TO CHECK IT ! 
Another great @theSNP morning knocking doors with @InvernessSNP once again, folk really engaged and keen to discuss the Westminster shambles over #Brexit  and the possibilities of an Independent Scotland #ActiveSNP 
Yeah. It's happening. The UK shall henceforth be known as the 51st state of the US, with Theresa May serving as Donald Trump's caddy and stair navigator. Thanks, Brexit.  
Brexit in GIF form....  
INTERNATIONAL OPINION - Listen to New Zealand Otago University Professor @Robert_Patman latest radio interview - "No Scenario Produced by International or National Research Organisations Suggest Britain Will be Better Off"...... 
I do hope you will indeed be voting it down. There are some worrying reports coming from serious Brexiteers who seem to be softening in a way I never thought I would see. Even with the backstop 'tweaked' the WA is a disaster & is not Brexit. 
Britons living in sunny Spain dodge a no-deal Brexit bullet after government guarantees health care and other benefits  
Do something! Wake up Great Britain - It’s time to fight like cornered tigers! BREXIT!!!!! 
“Chlorine washing #chicken is a “public safety no-brainer” to eliminate germs.”-Trump’s ambassador to the UK.So lighten up, Brits!!#SpecialRelationship#USUKTradeDeal#Brexit 
Brexit billboards spotted in Wrexham today @ByDonkeys Well done guys.  
Labour's biggest priorities:PalestineGDPR regulationsRalliesPetitionsSmears against Dear Leader Blairites not leaving the partyDeselectionsVenezuelaLabour's lowest priorities:BrexitTackling anti-SemitismMPs leaving the partyHelping the poorest in society 
DUP are totally out of step with people of Northern Ireland, business, farmers, community & voluntary sector on Brexit. Alliance are speaking for the people of Northern Ireland who voted to remain- your actions are putting NI at risk of No Deal  
Pitching in on the sensitive issue of a post-Brexit trade deal, the US ambassador to Britain claims "Inflammatory and misleading terms like ‘chlorinated chicken’ and ‘hormone beef’ are [being] deployed to cast American farming in the worst possible light."  
Hundreds turn out in Cardiff for protest against Brexit  
No-deal Brexit would bring "severe disruption and terrible consequences" and a "real possibility" of shortages, Associated British Foods says  
I hope so. #Brexit is a fraud. A con. A trick.Watch as American big pharma and agriculture circle over a weakened UK, isolated from the strength of solidarity of EU membershipMeanwhile, you zealots have turned those EU friends & allies into competitorsWhat a shit-show 
Businesses are screaming out for certainty – which is why delaying Brexit would be so alarming - Tom Bohills  
Great event next Wednesday in Parliament in the run-up to International Women’s Day: Love Feminism, Hate Brexit  @EventbriteUK 
Nigel Farage tears apart May's 'SURRENDER' Brexit deal ‘sheer awfulness!’  
Anti-Brexit protests on the streets of Cardiff this afternoon @Cardiff4EU @WalesForEurope @WalesOnline 
Trade Between the United States and UK Set to Boom Post-Brexit  
This is the most coherent argument for Brexit that I've heard 
Get real. Inward investment in the UK car industry fell 46.5% last year. The Society of Motor Manufacturers and Traders says Brexit has done "enormous damage". What makes you think JLR's planned investment is an "opportunity from Brexit" rather than in spite of it?  
When Brexit dies, which it will, I vote the first person in Prison is this clueless piece of shit.Irony is, the Brexit he craves would turn his constituency into a lorry park.  
But Darren, according to you and the other Brexit Wanks, we can't trade outside the EU while we're members.  
The proposed US-UK trade deal would turn the NHS “into a playpen for huge US corporate interests.”A major plus, no doubt, for the Rees-Moggs & Farages. But for patients? A catastrophic consequence of Brexit. #PeoplesVote 
Always remember, Japanese car manufacturers originally invested in UK when there was still an Iron Curtain. When the wall came down their loyalty to the UK held them back from moving production to Eastern Europe as other manufacturers did. Brexit has freed them of that obligation 
Trump is clearly salivating with excitement over Brexit . First, he wants you buying his repulsive chlorine-washed chicken.Second, he want his grubby mitts all over our NHS.#PeoplesVote 
'Yellow Vest'-ers out in London. Nationalist idiots again threatening 'civil war' if no Brexit.  
In other words... Trumps knows that Brexit will make us vulnerable, and his grabby little hands are now reaching for our NHS. 
Thanks Paul. As a lifelong @UKLabour supporter I wholeheartedly agree with this. There is now only one #Brexit on offer (no more fantasies) and that is Theresa May's deal. Now we need to be asked if this is better than staying in the #EU #PutItToThePeople 
To keep Honda in Swindon, STOP BREXIT.  
Is the BBC News coverage biased Pro-Brexit or Pro-Remain?#BrexitDebate 
found a good explanation why brexit was necessary  
Cancel the Brexit-pocalypse: Jaguar Signals Massive Investment in British Manufacturing  
This is the best explanation of #Brexit I've heard yet. Why? It's simple, accurate and funny. It's only a minute, so give it a watch.  
It's the great downgrading of Britain. And amid that perpetual horror story, we'll keep in fighting about Brexit forever. Remainers will have been forced out. Brexiters will pretend it would be fine if we'd done it their way 
Janet Daley: We promised the voters we would leave - if that means backing Theresa May's Brexit deal for now, so be it  
 Elton John on #Brexit:“It’s like walking through Hampton Court maze blindfolded, being turned around 16 times and trying to find your way out. British people were promised something that was completely ridiculous and wasn’t economically viable.”  
“Many Ministers (inc. the Prime Minister) see Brexit as a damage limitation exercise... If you see it in that way then inevitably you're not going to be prepared to take the kind of steps that would enable you to fully realise the economic opportunities of leaving. ” Nick Timothy  
Share and shareBREAKING: Mueller Looks to London - How Roger Stone's Arrest by the FBI spells Trouble for Nigel Farage and Brexit  via @BylineTimes 
Was  obvious from the start. If #Brexit happens the tax-dodgers will push to dismantle this from UK law = offshore tax-fiddles a-go-go.  
Brexit is pouring good money after bad.We were promised Brexit would save money to fund the NHS.Instead, it’s wasting millions on Brexiters’ mistakes and vanity projects.Let’s stop this madness.#RevokeA50, #StopBrexit and fund our NHS instead. 
Donald Trump's ambassador urges Britain to ditch EU's 'traditionalist' food standards for post-Brexit trade deal 
Too many on the #Remain side have NEVER accepted the result and have done  everything they can to make leaving as difficult as possible. That is the number 1 reason why #Brexit has got into the mess it's in.  @CCHQPress @theresa_may @ConHome @Conservatives 
Reasons for #Brexit surfacing where UK becoming American Mutt, obedient, serving their interests. Far from taking back control, we're about to become their subservient 51st state. 
This, and not having to implement EU tax avoidance measures, is what brexit is all about. We'll be easy prey for the worat of US businesses. 
Brexit is illegal & corrupt. Why don’t the MSM @Peston @jonsnowC4 @bbclaurak @BBCNews tell you that. Uk is victim of colossal, establishment fraud & our media keeps stum. 
Parliament: "We can't agree on Brexit, we have to go back to the people"Is that some sort of a joke?You can't do your jobs properly so Brexit has to be cancelled/overturned?If you're unable to effect the democratic will of the people, resign and we'll find MPs that can 
The PM & all MPs should do what we elected them to do.  1. Honour the 2016 referendum.2.Honour Thier manifesto promises.3.Honour those who elected them.4. Honour Democracy.5. Honour the trust with what the people handed to them to be Thier MP to fight for us.  
Cabinet members should stay away from by-elections unless they want it to be a referendum on the government’s performance. They should realized by now they have nothing much to show for it at this point. 
It’s a shame that Theresa May has to focus on Brexit when you know she really wants to be doing the bread and butter stuff she got into power for - like defending the murderous soldiers of Bloody Sunday 
So the government with a number of members who have said they’d like to privatise the NHS is using Brexit as a coup d’grace against the NHS? What’s the word for being equal parts unsurprised, devastated and furious? 
Read FAQ , Reports and Blogs on  website to find out how food, water, rights and a lot more will be affected by #brexit . Easy to understand.  We know there have been a spike in searches for such ?s in the past 48 hours on #Google and other search engines 
The idea that May is going for damage limitation regarding Brexit is bollocks.This is to forget her gung-ho attitude from the time she became PM.Her red linesHer threats in Article 50 letterHer xenophobiaThe Conservative Party Conference in 2016The Lancaster house speech 
An alternative interpretation could be:  as the DUP are the only party in Westminster AND have been embroiled in Nama, Redsky, RHI and Brexit there's more to attack.  
'Supermarkets have begun removing product ranges and lowering their standards when it comes to fresh produce in preparation for Brexit, and British customers are already showing recessionary behaviours, according to new research from Kantar.' 
.@naomi_long “In an act of gratuitous self-harm, the very people who claim to value the union above all else, the DUP, backed Brexit and in doing so put the question of the Irish border back at the centre of political debate.” #APNI19 #DemandBetter 
Are you a passionate Brexiteer with only a few followers? Don't worry, we're here to connect you with like-minded friends on twitter. Retweet this #BREXITTRAIN and we'll all FOLLOW BACK. Let's mobilise and connect the patriotic forces of #Brexit - Your Country Needs You!  
Message to the 11 Remoaners trying to stop Brexit, very soon thousands of democratic Brexiters will set off fromSunderland to look you straight in the eye in London to stop your miserable little undemocratic Games. 
America just published its plans for UK-US trade post-Brexit.Private US firms to have equal access to UK government contracts.UK must automatically accept US pharmaceuticalsThey want to be able to sue our government in a special court if we don't. 
Well this is astonishing. Post Brexit trade deal withe USA will depend on the UK accepting chlorinated chicken and hormone pumped beef. Who could have predicted that?  
How an Irish observer warned in 2013 how the pro-EU elite would seek to block Brexit - M E Synon  
Jay Rayner says letting in chlorine-washed chicken post-Brexit ‘harmful to UK’  
In my weekly shop I swap EU fresh produce for British or world-wide goods. You can ask the French Farmer's  how do you like "those" or "them" Apple's. Farmer Giles Cannon in Kent now supplies my Apples! #BuyBritish #Brexit  
Over 1,200 followers in the first 18 hours! Let's spread the word that the Bitches will not back down over Brexit#BAB #bitchesagainstbrexit 
Yet, ironically and hilariously, headbanger Brexiters hold up "taking back control of our fishing industry" as one of the biggest prizes of a hard Brexit. Shows how little they know. 
You and your backing of @UKLabour Lexit choosing to compete with rather than oppose the the Tory brexit caused this @LenMcCluskey !This is your shit Len, own it. 
Long read for the weekend: Remainers should get ready for what this political chaos may bring. My latest Brexit Blog post:  
Any of the MPs following our account, or the accounts of our followers who we ask to retweet, would you please attempt to ask the Prime Minister this question at the next PMQ? Thank you. 
Barely any support in #Bicester today for #Brexit, and those who do still want to leave are split between the ‘leave at any cost’ no dealers, and those who who’d back @theresa_may’s deal simply to avoid disaster. Vast majority - again - in favour of a #peoplesvote and remaining. 
Labour MPs are duty bound to vote against a second referendum. The Labour Party is breaking its election promise.  
Not since Cromwell dissolved one has there been a more dysfunctional parliament than this. Sunk in skullduggery utterly unrepresentative bereft of vision and even simple competence. Meanwhile our watchdogs in the 4th estate salivate rabidly about everything but the point. #Brexit 
Defra has put out a detailed Brexit preparedness notice, explaining exactly how dead the UK fisheries industry will be in the case of no-deal. (TL/DR version: very very dead.) No access to EU waters or automatic right to land fish in EU ports.  
Brexit news: Businessman urges UK to leave with no deal so UK can make their OWN products | UK | News |  
Good work Andrea, although I’ve almost given up on brexit as it’s going to be taken from us by hook or crook I feel. However the next general election is going to be a shocking bloody nose to any traitorous M.P. Hopefully 
 I haven’t forgotten my promise to send only positive tweets in the weekends. This is a British Conservative MP... Sorry, not positive. - Shocked by the #inequality in the UK- Shocked that I am still shocked by these numbers- And 27 days until #Brexit...  
Madness ....:   Britain must hold EU Parliament elections 'or be sued by Brussels' if Brexit is extended  
2016."We can be like Switzerland."2017."We can be like Singapore."2018."We can be like Canada."2019."We can be like Greenland."#Brexit  
This is what Brexit has always bee about for the likes of Redwood, Rees-Mogg, Barclay Bros, Ashcroft, Banks, Philip May and the rest of them. They want to turn the UK into a low regulation tax haven 
Tales from todays campaigning. What my constituents are telling me about Brexit.  
Criminal overspending buying billions of views on Facebook like this... No I don't accept the result of the 2016 EU referendum. Shame on anyone who does.  
With all due respect to you Chris, and @TheIndGroup - right now this has to be your starting point: 
If true, interesting that asking Parliament the same question on Brexit repeatedly is ok but suggesting we ask the British people a question on the same issue when the terms have changed is “treachery” & “betraying the will of the people”. Baffling double standards #RightToVote 
A PM should Brexit on WTO rules now. Stop foreign aid, scrap HS2. Sort out business rates, council tax, income tax, benefits system. Reduce VAT. Deport foreign prisoners +dependents. Money saved, spend on social care, state pension, education, armed forces, police, infrastructure 
Talking of Brexit lies, do you recall when David Cameron enlisted the help of his buddy, President Obama, to spread anxiety and fear ahead of the referendum? Listen to the lies and ask why a foreign power was allowed to intervene in our domestic politics. We still voted to leave.  
The Brexit being lined up bears no resemblance to the Brexit(s) posited by the Leave campaigns during the referendum. Yet we are told that people “knew what they were voting for.”The question is: HOW did they know? 
We now know the great prize of Brexit: becoming Trump’s prey 
WATCH: DJ Sara Cox - Brexit is like being dragged away from a party by two uncool parents /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
For God’s sake! This PM is prepared to ruin our economy in a desperate attempt to hold her rotten party together & force her botched #Brexit deal through. #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote 
Astonishing this happening in the European Union.  Political prisoners - incarcerated for holding a referendum.  
MPs prepared to avoid No Deal makes it harder for us to secure better Brexit, says @TheSun 
Brexit is like being dragged away from a party by two uncool parents in a car where the wheels are falling off  
With Brexit and President Trump, Britain and the U.S. appear to be retreating from the rest of the world.The same cannot be said for their native language, however: English  
It has become clear that the small number of NI born Irish citizens being recognised as Irish by the UK Home Office is not an indication of policy change.It is still the UKG position & the law that we are automatically British irrespective of the Good Friday Agreement #Brexit  
Out with a fab team chatting to people on the doorsteps about Brexit, getting ready for the People's Voice public meeting - 1pm in Milngavie Town Hall - all welcome, whatever your view on #Brexit  
Chicken with some chlorine? Beef with growth hormones? Yuk! What many of us have been warning about for some time is now available to read in US ambassador’s document. We must not let food safety and animal welfare standards slip in post-Brexit scramble for trade deals. 
But most polls ( not Express, obviously) now show Remain ahead by c 55:45%, Patrick. It’s not that many have changed their minds since 2016, but young voters & those 27% who didn’t vote last time ( assumed Brexit would lose, as Farage, cynical Boris & co did) are mostly Remain 
[gets into taxi at Dublin airport]Me: *please don’t ask about Brexit*Driver: where are you coming from?Me: *think of a lie, quick!* Lond...Driver: what’s going on with that Brexit at all? What’s going to happen with it? 
Farage has handed you an opportunity to highlight to the whole country the essential difference between the two camps.You have almost the whole of Britain's creative industries with you.When is the anti-Brexit milieu going to organise beyond the tired old protest format? 
Anti-Brexit people should stage PR stunts that aren't all angry & protesty. Happy, entertaining events, where the multiplicity of our British European heritage & ties are celebrated. Music, dance, art, food, culture in all its variety.Take the opportunity to contrast with Leave 
Palace of Westminster has become a nest of aggressive, desperate elitists prepared to do anything to save their greasy grasp.They lieDeceiveBetrayDissemble.They can delay #BrexitBut there will be no rebuilding the country’s trust.Not for years.#EU 
This brexit stuff has distracted me from taking the piss out of flat earthers. Normal service will be resumed. For example, below is a magnificent confusion between spinning around and moving, a difference one can demonstrate for oneself by hopping and rotating on one leg.  
Interesting. Ireland now pays more than it receives... and the Netherlands (and 6 other EU countries)contribute more per capita than #brexit UK. Listening to brexiteers you'd have thought the UK was up at the top in per cap contributions. Nope.  
The strangest thing about #NoDealBrexit advocates, the relatively thoughtful ones anyhow, is that their whole theory for while we'll be okay rests on the EU being unbelievably accommodating - which cuts completely against why they want Brexit in the first place. 
We shouldn't even need to ask for one?  Independence for Scotland is a Scottish decision and only involves the voting public living in Scotland! If Westminster don't like our decision that is tough. We don't like their Brexit decision. We are Scotland, a country in our own right!  
I have been angry and scared about Brexit ever since the vote. Today I just feel deeply sad. Our rights are being taken away from us because the Prime Minister is a xenophobe. My nephews will never get the opportunity to exercise the FoM right they were born with because of her. 
Lee Rowley takes on Remain MPs and ministers who have done everything they can to undermine the Brexit process while the EU has done the same.   
Isn't it about time we put @Number10cat in charge of Brexit? He couldn't do a worse job, let's face it. #Caturday 
I doubt if anyone will disagree with me when I say our country is split down the middle. People are now more Leave or Remain than they are Tory or Labour. The country can perhaps come back together, but it will take time. And the potential problems created by #Brexit won't help. 
This is the perfect response to MPs trying to sabotage Brexit. If they won’t do their democratic duty they must be rooted out & replaced with MPs who will. Grieve, Spelman etc must pay for their duplicity.  Deselect all MPs who vote against no deal.   
#BorisJohnson: "The gross sum of £350m per week which was on the side of a red bus during the referendum campaign, it now turns out that the actual gross figure by 2022 were we to stay in would be £438m a week. So we're going to need a bigger bus!"  #BREXIT 
Brexiteers will not allow this scenario to unfold. Period. The Government will fall and a General Election will ensue if Brexit is deliberately thwarted by a Europhile Parliament. Resistance is a two way street.  
To deal with the consequences of Brexit, and to address its root causes, we need more power in Greater Manchester. Central government just doesn’t have the time or expertise. Me for the @MENnewsdesk 
I had a dream last night....Brexit was cancelledFarage was in jailCorbyn was living in Venezuela Aaron Banks was skintTheresa May was in DigbyLayla Moran was PMBBC was closed downJacob Rees-Mogg was an undertaker andAll was well....Then some bastard woke me up..... 
Parliament can't stop Brexit. It can only temporarily prevent it, because parliament itself is only temporaryIf this parliament won't implement Brexit, we can change who sits in parliament& we will, if that's what it takes, until our instructions to leave the EU are honoured 
Every single one of those who remain complicit in the corruption surrounding Brexit, including Theresa May, should be held fully accountable for their actions & referred to the Met Police & NCA, as others have. We are no longer operating in a democracy, but a corrupt country.  
Now then... what’s been happening in the football? No paper, no phone signal, no internet for 8 days!!!! What about this Brexit business   
The DUP desperately need clarifications on the backstop. Remainer Amber Rudd, Greg Clark and David Gauke have all forced Mrs May to take no-deal off the table, exactly what incentive does Brussels now have to offer anything?It’s almost like they don’t want Brexit to happen  
On the way to last night’s event with @OxfordStays I saw a squeaky Boris Johnson-dog toy in a shop window, and bought it to illustrate a point about pundits and #Brexit. But then @pimlicat’s dog Wrigley got hold of Boris and made a much more devastating critique than I could... 
It's OK to make mistakes. That's not stupid. What is stupid is persisting with it when you find out. #Brexit is an epic mistake —even at this late stage, we don't have to go through with this. Let's not be stupid. 
When asked how history will judge Theresa May, Nick Timothy talks about how parliament voted for a referendum despite believing that Brexit could not "realistically be delivered in a good way" and says that May is "trying her best".How will history judge David Cameron?  
Don’t trust the Project Fear myths: Foreign direct investment inflows have picked up sharply to hit their highest level since 2008.Financial powerhouses are pouring more money into Britain, betting on Britain's sustained Brexit success over the long-term. 
Then I cannot tell you how much you will enjoy American pork or bacon with ractopamene. Banned in Russia,China and other health conscious nations ie everywhere except the US and S Korea as far as I can tell, Brexit Bacon Sarnies  
The more I think about this implicit attack on Eurotunnel by Chris Grayling, the more extraordinary I think it is - because it is to frame a no-deal Brexit as an avoidable act of god, or an act of aggression by a foreign power, rather than as a UK political choice  
Here is the *truth* about #BrexitProject RealityI've been saying this re my #cancer & getting trolled for years.ANYBODY advocating a #nodealbrexit a #wtobrexit a #Standup4brexit anf #LeaveMeansLeave YOU will be responsible for the deaths of others.Shame on each one of you 
Visited a Brexiter recently. He was moaning, a lot, about how hard life has got recently. Complained about prices going up, wages not keeping up, about how his customers are complaining.I pointed out that this is down to Brexit.'No. It's down to foreigners' I give in. 
Enough.The referendum was fraudulent and illegal. This is proven.So what if the MPs voted to trigger article 50. They did so on the basis of the referendum being legal and correct. It clearly wasn't.Why on earth should the MPs respect it? #RevokeArticle50 Or#PeoplesVote 
Gyimah emailed his local party in December to explain his resignation, but made no mention at all of his shift to Remain, despite him having endorsed a second referendum the same day!"Those are my principles, and if you don't like them I have others." 
We know that Brexit is all downsides. It's is often called an act of national self-harm, but letting in chlorine washed chicken as woody demands, would be literally harmful to the health of the nation. It makes me sick, in so many bloody ways. 8/ 
At least the US Ambassador was upfront in making clear that he was using the media to open up negotiations on an FTA, allowing access to UK markets for US food producers. Dear old @michaelgove has insisted food standards will not drop post Brexit but does he mean it? 4/ 
Thread: We shouldn't be surprised the US Ambassador @woodyjohnson4 wants the UK to embrace chlorine washed chicken as part of a post Brexit FTA but we should tell him where he can stick it. Because, contrary to what he says, it's risky stuff.   1/ 
If you're a betting person, Brexit fears have made Easter holidays abroad super-cheap. (But watch out for the small print in travel insurance policies because most won't cover Brexit disruption).  
'Brexit will make our society poorer. It is often said that Brexit will hit the worst off in society hardest. However, it is often forgotten that it is not humans that are worst off in society, but sentient animals.' 
The "Take Back Control" #Brexit Menu.  
I'm crowdfunding to get these Brexit quotes pasted all over Britain – join me  @bydonkeys  
So... let me get this right: the people aren’t allowed a second referendum to sign off on what Brexit means, but the Prime Minister can have as many as she sees fit. Rank hyprocisy of the highest order. #PeoplesVote 
#DominicRaab is absolutely right to highlight that any Brexit delay proves to Brussels that intransigence works: We must face down the EU. It may well be our stronger position to leave now & negotiate from the strength of being an independent third country  
Thank you for your reply. In polling this January the Chorley constituency was 58.91% in favour of a #finalsay. Please get in touch with @RightToVote_UK to support our campaign for the #RightToVote that the people of Chorley seem to want now that the Brexit facts are clearer  
The Irish border with Wales may be the bigger Brexit threat to the economy 
The Brexit university casualties begin. My prediction: we will see a major UK university go under completely, within a year. Quite a few mid-ranking UK universities will find it hard to replace EU funds.  
At the last election Labour promised to accept and honour the result of the referendum.Now one spokesman after another demonstrates they intend to overturn that result and keep us in the EU. Promise broken.  
We’re at the stage where mainland European media are describing Brexit and the Uk with exasperation and actual pity. It is the greatest act of self harm in our history. We will NOT be better off. PM May knows this, and is resigned to dealing with that reality. 
Except...: actually, in 20 years we almost certainly won't be talking about Brexit AT ALL. Those of us who haven't died prematurely due to #ClimateBreakdown will be focussed on survival. If we think of 2019, we'll be lamenting why we wasted these years..#ExtinctionRebellion 
EU countries will struggle for tourism post-Brexit. No 'rich' country's people travel more than the Brits (Germans on par?).Just for 2019 folks, go to the British seaside resort you went to as a kid. Skegness? Great Yarmouth? Newquay? Cornwall, etc?  
I am embarrassed to what we have become as a nation, playing second fiddle to this gang of miscreants. They can smell our fear? They can’t smell mine I don’t have any #brexit #nodeal 
"We have seen in the last few days how Westminster will try to not allow Scotland to have another independence referendum – that’s not a Union, that’s colonialism" // @mstewart_23 
And my White German Shepherd bitch @AlbaWhiteWolf is always very happy to contribute to some #Brexit destroying!  #EUsuperwolf #Wooferendum@BitchesvBrexit - count us in! pic.twitter.com/tzQfdnejFr 
Special Budget and Brexit votes meeting, Monday  11th March from 1pm with @johnredwood, Tim Congdon, Chairman of @LeaveMnsLeave @JLongworthLML, @DrGerardLyons & Patrick Minford 
Sarah a period of silence wouldn’t go amiss. You have already lost credibility as does any other MP who doesn’t respect the referendum and their manifesto. 
As always interesting interview by Sir Ivan Rogers on Brexit: "What Surprises Me Is the Extent of the Mess"  via @SPIEGELONLINE It was the dangerous obsession with immigration which caused the extent of this #Brexit mess. 
Trump administration issues an 18 page list of 'demands' for a trade deal- @BBCNews does NOT even mention it- BBC, instead, does a spin on "US attacks chlorinated chicken myth"When are we going to get proper #brexit news from the #BBC ??? 
What are you getting from this Union that in 2014 nearly 50% of the Scottish population felt they were not getting? How can a nation that is clearly subservient, outvoted at every turn in WM because of the democratic deficit be regarded as an equal? #Brexit epitomises this gulf. 
One of my German friends keeps me abreast of what the Europeans think of what Britain is currently doing to itself. Here are the latest images he sent me... #Brexit  
Thread - Where Sir Ivan Rogers tries to explain UK Brexit decisions to baffled Germans.  
That poisonous 2012 immigration speech seems to have been her personal manifesto for premiership, with #Brexit just the convenient instrument  
You must read this!! The Lancet: all Brexit scenarios will cause significant harm to the NHS  
How’s brexit going?  
Stark comments on Brexit & science from Prof Sir Paul Nurse, Nobel Laureate, Director @TheCrick & previous President @royalsociety cc @NatureNV @ProfBrianCox @Kevin_Fong @jimalkhalili @paulcoxon @pollytoynbee @Scientists4EU @FunSizeSuze @sophiescott 
"Immigration and the free movement of people is the central question for Theresa May." As Ivan Rogers says, the course of the Brexit negotiations to datewas determined by Theresa May's obsession with reducing immigration: 
Dominic Grieve, Mark Pawsey, Caroline Spelman and Sam Gyimah now all facing No Confidence bids from their local associationsThere are many more to comeTurns out lying to hard-working Tory campaigners isn't popular. Who'd of thoughtJustice for their Brexit betrayal is coming 
A bit of Brexit news. I spoke to the German finance minister this morning and he said he didn’t like it, but he’d have to go along with it. 
LEAVE: 50 local Tory members were preparing ‘no confidence’ in anti-Brexit MP @sarahwollaston, activist claims. “She resigned the whip two days later, revealing her well-developed plan to go” 
I'm grateful to the UK for being so much worse than the US right now.We can vote Trump out in two years, but you'll be stuck with #Brexit forever.Racism and nationalism are hella powerful drugs. 
Greenland is not the world's fifth largest economy.However, they did vote to leave the EU in 1982, they did respect the result of that referendum and they did conclude a withdrawal agreement within two years.And then they left. 
Michel Barnier says Brexit will not happen on time on 29 March, even if MPs back the deal. Short extension wd be needed. Longer extension shd be to “fix a problem, not delay the solution”.  Thread  
Seems that quite a few folk who voted leave:Didn’t believe the vast majority of experts who said Brexit would be hugely damagingThink Millennium Bug was a hoaxAre climate change deniersHave a strange view of UK historySeriously, is there some sort of connection here? 
2 years ago @ScotGov was warning  about likely lowering of food, welfare & environmental standards by @GOVUK  to secure #Brexit trade deals.  This is now firmly on the Agenda........##UK-US trade deal: Envoy attacks 'myths' about US farming - BBC News 
32 voices, from 32 counties for Irish Unity "The Good Friday Agreement allows for a referendum on Irish Unity. Let's get the wheel turning and let's have that conversation." - Catherine Carey, Co. Tipperary. #Time4Unity #Tá32 
But that’s exactly what it is. Damage limitation. Every govt assessment shows us worse off under any brexit. Leave leaders now say the same. The only opportunities are for disaster capitalist vultures seeking profit through our pain. There’s no better deal than the 1 we have now.  
I'm a fan of Elton. But the multi-millionaire lives in a different world to the Brits who voted for Brexit. It was nothing to do with that bus - or the publicity campaign. It was to cut immigration and stop towns, schools, hospitals and welfare being flooded by the Third World.  
Lord Heseltine - #Brexit is a betrayal of our self interest, it's a betrayal of the younger generation & it should be stopped & it should be stopped now!#PeoplesVote #FinalSay #RevokeA50 
#REMOANERS said before the #EURef that 820,000 jobs would be lost if we had the audacity to vote for #Brexit.As with ALL these forecasts the opposite is the case.Unemployment has never been lower.People have stopped listening to #ProjectFear . 
Sir Paul Nurse is the wisest person I have ever met: “UK research will lose up to £1 billion a year after Brexit... the first referendum was so strongly informed by misunderstanding and even mistruths of a gargantuan type...” 1/2 
Total of U.K.women in 2011 32,153,000. Only 8m women voted for brexit. Which means 24,153,00 did not vote for brexit. Brexit not the will of the people. Oops looks as if 2016 EU ref broke so many election laws it should not be considered valid. Revoke article 50 
Postpone Brexit? Maybe get a do-over? The negotiations enter a high-stakes game-theory stage:  
This is the moment a certain type of Brexiteer feared. Brexit is about to happen. Then what will they do with themselves?Me for @thetimes 
In 2017 1000's voted @Conservatives because they trusted us to keep our word to deliver a proper Brexit on schedule. If we now fail to keep our word and delay or fudge the disillusionment will be massive. I for one am committee to leaving on 29/3. This is about trust in politics. 
Delighted @exeterlabour has decisively passed a motion backing @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer & the party leadership’s support for a #FinalSay #peoplesvote on May’s botched #Brexit deal, with Remain as an option. The only realistic way to avert Tory #BrexitShambles 
The Labour movement is bigger than one person, one policy or one issue.Whatever you think of Corbyn, Brexit or the antisemitism headlines, always have the bigger picture in mind.Have the moral fibre to stick with Labour.  There is a war to win. 
nobody is pretending indy (leaving the UK) is the same as Brexit (leaving the EU)we share a currency in the UK, we receive massive fiscal transfers *from* rUK, we trade far more with auK single market, we are far more integrated with rUKindy would be *way* worse than Brexit  
We were lied to before the referendum, with appalling, lying scaremongering and a £9 million booklet.  
The reality is Julia, there's no such thing as an extreme Brexit or Brexiteer. Extreme Brexit is a duplicitous term made up by Europhiles to describe the act of merely #Leaving the EU! 
She has never said a POSITIVE word about Brexit and it’s great opportunity for Britain! Ex-aide claims PM NEVER believed in Brexit – all just 'DAMAGE LIMITATION'  
You don't have to put up with this embarrassing Brexit. You can demand better.Join our march against Brexit. 
I voted Remain in the Referendum. Last time I looked in the Lobby I was voting for the Agreement to Leave the EU on March 29 and some Tories who voted to Leave in the Referendum were not. So who’s keeping us in the EU? End irony. Vote for the deal.  
I keep wondering too.  People ask why Labour has been criticised by Remain and this is precisely why.  A complete failure to actually oppose for 2 years until this last month & STILL they are flogging their jobs first brexit horse instead of asking these questions of government 
"If we’re not leaving the single market or the customs union, what is it we’re leaving?" Theresa May’s former Joint Chief of Staff, Nick Timothy.Think about that. No Deal is off the table; so there can only be a 'soft Brexit' = SM, CU, but no voice, no influence, rule taker... 
Last time I checked the UK was a Parliamentary democracy, and I recall one of the arguments for leave being to preserve this. Also last time I checked the 2017 election came after the 2016 referendum. Also don't recall a majority voting for a no-deal Brexit. Apart from that...  
Another type of cooperative funding we will lose IF we leave. We can still stop #Brexit, yes really!  
Since Parliament cannot enact  their wishes, and May's deal may not be what they voted for, they get the chance to vote again. I would make the referendum binding. 
Britain may be leaving the European Union, but Brexit won't stop the UK taking part in the Eurovision song contest.#Brexit | #Eurovision 
LETS BE CLEAR-Parliament if you dont want a 2nd referendum, Sort this mess out! Stop squabbling amongst yourselves Just do what is right for Britain! No matter what Leavers say there is no form of Brexit that will benefit UK-So scrap Brexit NOW so we can all get on with our lives 
One minute there’s going to be a sperm shortage, the next minute this...Brexit is a reproductive minefield   
Morning all. So we’re building the Bitches Against Brexit website and as soon as it’s ready I’ll launch it. Let’s kick ass, bitches. I’m going to make Brexit fun if it kills me. When we go live, I’ll be all ears as to what you’d like our new online club to be. Get ready. 
7/7 A reminder: Stalinism has destroyed every movement in Britain it's had control of: forget the economic nationalism of the Morning Star - they actively seek a no-deal Brexit. So back the Labour membership and fight for Labour values. More here:  
One of the many issues of #brexit is the use of terminology. The negative ‘Remoaners’ vs the valiant sounding ‘Brexiteers.’ This needs to change: i think ‘Brexiturds’ is more fitting, eh say you @mrjamesob ? #BrexitShambles 
"Brexit is one of the biggest catastrophes this country has faced in a very, very long time... I think really the only alternative is a People's Vote"Agree? Help support the campaign   
"The referendum result was perhaps the biggest-ever vote of confidence in the United Kingdom, its past and its future. But the British establishment doesn’t seem to share that confidence"TONY ABBOTT Prime Minister  Australia 2013-15  
500 deaths a year from food-borne salmonella in the US. Zero in the UK. When our government drops food standards for a post-Brexit trophy trade deal, we’ll start seeing some of those deaths here. And when voters tell parliament to do something about it, they will be powerless. 
Scotland will undoubtedly vote to become an independent country and then rejoin the EU if the UK goes ahead with #Brexit, any form of #Brexit. And who can blame them! This will of course mean there will be another land border between an EU country and what's left of the UK. 
ACTION: Wave of Tory Remainer MPs face 'no confidence' from party activists. Brits voted for Brexit, Conservatives want to Leave. Why are MPs ignoring the wishes of the people?  
As my friend @AlbertoNardelli says:“All this, to end the free movement of people. It's quite extraordinary if you think about it.” #Brexit  
Brexit is becoming a bit like when Withnail & I go on holiday. The chief protagonists increasingly seem to be claiming that it’s all happening by accident.  
Corbyn kowtowed to Brussels before telling members, voters, MPs and supporters that they were u-turning on a rerun of the referendum, Barnier tells German press. Not a great look.  
Minette Batters, president of the NFU, deeply worried about the future of British farming. Given the US ambassador's instruction for us to accept grim US food standards or forget a trade deal, she's absolutely right to be."Take back control" = TOTAL FRAUD#r4today #Brexit 
I see Oliver Letwin is today reprising his claim that "no deal" Brexit will be a political disaster for the Tory party. So let me reprise my article about why he is completely wrong  
2/ Do we want to stop May's Brexit - yes or no? If no you are basically turning Britain into a rule-taking state with no advantages for working people. If yes, how? ... 
Labour members have one job  in the next few days - to persuade 20+ wavering English Labour MPs to back the amendment - supported by the members and the leadership - to call a second Brexit referendum. Here's why... 1/ 
So tell me, Jacob, how do the low paid prepare for Brexit? They can’t afford to save, can’t afford to stockpile, and could lose their jobs.So ... how do they prepare?As a single self-employed person I have no Brexit cushion or safety net ... YOU, however, will profit.  
Meanwhile, there goes our food export sector. “Overseas buyers 'cancel' British meat orders due to Brexit” - Farming UK News #TakingBackControl 
Brexit voters can almost never point to a specific piece of EU legislation they object to. But Rees-Mogg and his chums can: the Anti Tax-Avoidance Directive  
- Michel Barnier 'working on legal add-on' to the Brexit deal- Brexiteers seek DUP’s opinion on legal changes to backstop- Jaguar Land Rover plans big UK investment- UK should ditch EU farming to agree trade deal, says US  
Come on Dominic Grieve! - this man has more integrity in his little finger than the whole lot of the proponents of a no deal Brexit! #TheyAreNotWorthyInTheFaceOfDominicGrieve 
This shows complete failure of the BBC to inform and educate.That 44% of people don't think brexit will have a negative effect is shocking. Pure ignorance.BBC Failure.Welsh shame.BBC News - Attitudes to Brexit and economy quizzed in poll for BBC Wales  
One day soon we are going to be amazed and perhaps ashamed we spent so much time on conventional political spats and ignored the future. By 2099 Brexit/Remain or today’s MENA divisions may be of little relevance.  
More facts about the reality of Brexit are now on the table.Why not give the electorate a #FinalSay and #PutItToThePeople?That's how democracy works.@peoplesvote_uk@BarbaraWant @dunc_saboteur @ValeforEurope @ElspethElspeth @RemainingKind #Sodem #PiesNotLies #PeoplesVote 
UK taxpayers have financed No-Deal Brexit preparations to the tune of £4.2bn! Who is profitting here? This is money that could have contributed to the fix of NHS underfunding, education shortfalls, social care or emergency services. Brexit is making us all poorer! #BrexitShambles 
#marr Not that bloody multimillionaire war criminal bore on again FFS Tony Blair. On TV all the time trying to stop Brexit. Get it through your thick skull 17.4 million voted leave the EU. We’re leaving. No ones listening to to you Yesterday’s MAN. Shut up.  
Anna Soubry "I promised to respect and honour the vote ""I agreed to the referendum and in so doing agreed to be bound by the result""You can't go back on your word because you don't agree with the result"  
Excellent thread. The nationalist argument seems to be, let’s compound the economic consequences of Brexit by talking about a separate Scottish currency.  And to all those saying “but the pound will crash” remember the proposal is to peg it to the pound.   
How come british army veterans are being persecuted over bloody sunday 50 years ago while isis fighters are being welcomed back to the uk and rewarded with council houses? Something really bent is going on #TommyRobinson ,#Brexit  
Not even paid Leave Means Leave 'campaigners' know what Brexit is.Brexit means... ?#YouOnlyHadOneJob(nb. not photoshopped)#Sodem #StopBrexit 
Michael Gove admits farmers may never recover from a no deal #brexit this news will be welcomed in Boston Lincolnshire since getting rid of farming should get rid of  immigrants  
9 years of unnecessary Tory austerity are undermining the social fabric of our society and leaving our public services at breaking point. Yet austerity is still not over, and the Government’s bungling of Brexit is threatening economic catastrophe. #SpringStatement2019 
Well, well ;END of Project Fear? Mark Carney speech was 'STRONG ENDORSEMENT' of Brexit potential  
Brexit outcome on 29 of March? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
If brexit isn’t enough to boil your blood the comments on Bloody Sunday have actually nearly pushed me over the edge. The attitude that veterans shouldn’t face up to is a joke. The dup should actually take note this is what some English people think of the citizens in the North 
Brexit or Remain?It’s reported that some politicians believe ‘people’ could live with Brexit delay. Others would prefer a permanent delay. But, the uncertainty needs to be resolved. What’s your preference?Please vote and retweet, thank you.It’s time to agree to: 
Here's a thought. Grayling set up the failed ferry contracts to mitigate the  problems he thought there would be in Dover/Calais after #Brexit. If #Brexit is such a great idea, why would the government need to mitigate against any negative impacts?#ProjectReality perhaps. 
Businessman URGES UK to implement no deal Brexit - ‘MUST make our products in BRITAIN!'  
Germany heading for RECESSION - Brexit and trade wars BLOWING HOLE in economy, experts say  
Often in UK reporting, basic ignorance of the system logics of EU27 politics is compensated through a facade of bullying bluster.One reason why the UK is in a position where Brexit means a possibly long transition in which the UK state enforces EU laws it has no influence over 
.Of 650 MPs, around 500 are Remainers.The very real fear is they will seize control of #Parliament and stop a No Deal #Brexit and end up keeping us in the #EU 
Why do they all hide behind the Telegraph paywall? US just wants to flog us all the stuff they can't sell. The EU told them to get lost on this & so should we. If those who support Brexit are true patriots, they'll stand up for our farmers & resist this. March for that, Nigel. 
Brexit was meant to be about taking back control. Surely this level of dilution in U.K. food standards cannot be done without our knowledge and consent. At least, in the EU, for all it flaws we get to have a say in food standards. This would give control to the US! 
The Times today says I fear a No Deal #Brexit.I do not.  I think a clean No Deal is right for the #UKBut I do fear No Brexit at all.So unless I am persuaded otherwise, I will vote for the #Deal IF the backstop is changed and IF the DUP believe it works for Northern Ireland. 
Brexit is a multi-sided process with various players shaping events in Edinburgh, Cardiff, Brussels, Dublin, Berlin, Paris, Madrid, Warsaw, Rome and all other EU27 capitals.Attempts to write the story of Brexit only from the perspective of Westminster lead to faulty analysis. 
I've signed an open letter to Liam Fox demanding the government tells us their plans for trade after Brexit. Will you add your name?  
I was a Corbynite until he ballsed up over Brexit. And he really did balls it up. And this is exactly how it looks to someone like me who follows politics rather than cover it. Patronising, rude and dodging big questions  
Welcome to Brexit Britain - Surrey University makes £15m cuts and offers redundancy to all staff  
Brexit: Tobias Ellwood says ministers will stop no-deal 'whenever' @Tobias_Ellwood you’re not the moderate view, but a hardline extremist ignoring democracy and from what I’m being told on the doorstep, your view is out of sync with the electorate. 
Looks like the Kyle-Wilson amendment is becoming the most credible way out of the Brexit fiasco.  It's also basically what the LibDems were advocating nearly three years ago. 
No deal Brexit: 2,800,000 fewer jobs / £158bn loss per year.Trade agreement Brexit (outside the single market): 1,750,000 fewer jobs / £99bn loss per year.Single Market Brexit: 700,000 fewer jobs / £39bn loss per year.Remain in EU: No impact on jobs / No £ loss per year.  
This is outrageous, & @joannaccherry deserves a medal for raising this, chasing it & not accepting the disengenuous answers given so far. Perhaps we should stick the £33 million figure on the side of a bus. #Brexit #ferrygate 
Rudd has NOT boosted her leadership prospects by leading a Remainer faction in Cabinet dedicated to overturning the referendum result or delivering Brexit in name onlyShe may be win over Remain MPs but would never be accepted by grassroots Tory Leavers 
Even if May's Deal were to be voted through in 10 days time, we'd probably need all of the mooted "technical extension" just for the legislative process.But it is very unlikely to be voted through, meaning an extension beyond the EU elections.... making No Brexit more likely. 
Very clear from Paul Nurse on #r4today on why Brexit is a disaster for science. 1. Loss of money (£0.5-£1 bn a year), 2. Immigration from non-EU countries is complex and shambolic for science, 3. Our govt must foster good relationships with EU partners 
Brexit promise - a big shiny trade deal with Trump’s US Brexit truth - chlorinated chicken and dismembered NHS for saleWe’ll be sold for lies  
Brexit BOMBSHELL: Negotiation expert outlines how 'power WILL shift' in Brexiteers FAVOUR  
Privileged young woman endorses wealthy old man as both pretend they are not part of a gilded elite that stands in solidarity with racists and seeks to inflict Brexit misery on millions of ordinary people.  
The UK is not ready for no-deal Brexit. The UK is not ready for any kind of Brexit. #StopBrexit (#Sodem protest in the CNN video too)  
Well done, Leavers - this is what you've done to yourselves and future generations of Brits. Bit of an own goal, huh? Better to stop #Brexit whilst we still can.  
The only people in Parliament who are sticking to a Manifesto which the public voted for and the EU referendum result, are the same people being criminalised on news media. The #ERG. Is it now considered wrong, evil, racist to uphold a democratic pledge to the people of the UK? 
As Universal Credit plunges families into poverty and irresponsible backbenchers push for the economic catastrophe of a No Deal Brexit, MPs are getting a pay rise. My @ScotNational column on the growing disconnect between parliament and the people. 
By taking the biggest risk of their political careers, they have increased the likelihood that Brexit could be stopped altogether. 
A very important point: after Brexit businesses will have to pay VAT on their exports to other EU counties. Many small business are not even registered for VAT and are totally unprepared for this change. Making the change is likely to be too expensive to be viable.@fsb_policy 
“Right now, we are part of a bloc big enough to stand up to the demands of an America First Trump administration. After Brexit, we will be a single medium-sized economy standing alone, with much less ability to say no.”  
Deregulation of the economy is at the core of the Brexiteers' motives. Precious rghts, standards and protections will be shredded unless somehow we can stop this Brexit madness. #RevokeA50 #indyref2 
I’ve always been a fan of a hard Brexit...  
The broken promises of @theresa_may Rebelling against her own manifesto and negotiated the worst deal in history #Brexit #LetsGoWTO #BrexitBetrayal 
Good news - essential to grasp the opportunities from Brexit to demonstrate that the UK is an outward-looking, global, centre for enterprise, innovation and investment.Jaguar Land Rover plans big UK investment - BBC News  
BREXIT SHAMBLESIf May’s deal doesn't pass, parliament will vote whether to proceed with No Deal. This'll be defeated. Parliament will then vote on whether to request an extension from the EU. This will pass. At this point we'd be in the weakest position ever in this negotiation.  
"The big problem is that many ministers, and I would include Theresa in this, struggle to see any economic upside of Brexit. They see it as a damage limitation exercise."A damning indictment of the Government's Brexit policy from Nick Timothy, the PM’s former Chief of Staff pic.twitter.com/7u0xxeroNN 
Today's front page: FM accuses Tories of running scared over another independence referendum. In shops now!  
Because Turkey is joining. That's why we're leaving the EU? #Brexit 
So less than a month away from brexit and nobody has any idea what the future trading and regulatory relationship will be between (what's left of) the UK and its closest neighbours...While millions of people sweat on whether they'll get to keep their homes families and jobs. 
Holiday prices plunge as Brexit fears put off travellersNo, its Disgust with EU treatment of U.K.! Many now on Staycation! 
Where do Remain MPs get their deceit from? EU from day 1 was built on the dishonest foundations of Monnet’s federative politics, so sovereignty is slowly eroded and voters’ control is non-existent. EU is a Byzantine opaque power structure, devoid of democratic legitimacy. #Brexit  
From watching how the EU treated Ireland, I warned in 2013 how the pro-EU elite would seek to block Brexit, says M.E. Synon  
This is what Spain did to peaceful citizens in 2017. #spain #1O #Police #PoliciaNacional #spanishpolice #rightshumans #Referendum #PoliceBrutality #PoliceViolence #Catalonia #freecatalonia #freedom #nonexistencejustice #Violencia #Violence #SayNoToViolence #SayNoToDiscrimination 
WARNING Read carefully -  ‘Dozens of anti-EU MPs want to take control of the Tory party so they can steer the second phase of Brexit negotiations, the future UK-EU economic relationship, away from the close partnership envisaged by Mrs May’ via @FT 
Well @theresa_may didn’t do a very good job.If she had done a better job we might not be in this awful Brexit mess! Why didn’t she use the tools available to her to ensure that EU nationals were supporting themselves?Brexit is utterly pointless and she is the one we fault.  
Brexit explained beautifully and perfectly comprehensibly to anyone who's ever made a cup of tea  
86. A5"It's irresponsible to scare EU nationals in UK by hinting their status may change after Brexit. No one's suggesting such a thing." - @DanielJHannan "EU citizens & families need to apply to EU settlement scheme to continue living in UK after 31/12/20  - @ukhomeoffice 
Brexiters failure to be honest, and present the country with a professionally produced plan and conduct a legally robust referendum has been shown to be a penny wise and billions-of-pounds foolish #FoolsFool 
It's a "thorny Brexit process" largely because of the subterfuge of MPs like you Sam. 
We remember it David we know it to be fact but Theresa May has her own agenda and won’t stop until she’s tied us to a rotting EU we need her out and somebody to deliver Brexit as the majority voted for  
The death of centrism is long overdue#Brexit #ChangePolitics 
You can slag off my politics all you want - Brexit wanker - but don't tell me I sing out of tune.  
Allen’s a chill guy. I don’t swear on here either but if I was in a wheelchair & saw this go unfixed under #PortageAndMain four months after a selfish referendum in a city with a Canadian Human Rights Museum & spent 10 extra minutes just to cross a fucking street, i’d swear too.  
If Brexit has taught us one thing as with Mr Grayling and the failing  Ministry of Transport again this week is that we cannot trust underqualified Politicians and overrated Civil Servants to run our vital Offices of State!All Parties!Stick to Politics and Diplomacy please? 
A controversial referendum passed this week establishes a bill of rights for the Great Lake and grants it legal standing in suing polluters.  
Brexit is 666 hours away. #brexit 
Unite has pressed for a Brexit that makes marginal auto manufacturing in the UK unprofitable. It seems cynical to now be offering thoughts and prayers to workers whose jobs you have had a hand in losing. 
I disagree with @SamGyimah on Brexit. But he's intelligent. He's switched on. He's on top of the issues facing the tories. He's a serious asset. It would stupid to deselect him.  
"I don't dislike the other countries in Europe, but I just think we [the UK] should run our own affairs!" @Nigel_Farage tells @ericbolling.  "The Brexit vote — as much as anything —was about taking back control of our borders."  
Watching @MelJStride trying to explain the shambles that is Brexit whilst simultaneously trying to justify the loan charge reminds me of the time ‘chemical Ali’ claimed “we are in control” as the allies tanks were driving towards him in the background. 
President of Slovenia says EU could approve short Brexit delay  
"Donald Trump's administration has called on the UK to abandon its "unwarranted" food and agriculture standards before it can sign a free trade deal with the US after Brexit."  via @businessinsider 
Brexit was influenced by Russia.The UK needs a do-over. 
brexit came so soon. it feels like brenter was just yesterday 
I've a confession to make. I don't boycott @BBCNews. I watch it to check on the language they use about #Brexit. For months on end they've been blindly saying "when the UK leaves the European Union" Interestingly they're now saying "when the UK is *scheduled* to leave". #FBPE 
According to a House of Lords report, we do not owe the EU a penny in a no deal Brexit.  
Britain's economy is set to boom and become the largest in Europe - because of Brexit  via @Telegraph 
"Spain to guarantee British residents' rights in event of no-deal Brexit"  
If Trump, Brexit and Ford have taught us anything - and I’m not sure they have - it’s that the worst way to deal with a problem is to vote for the people whose only skill in life is getting you really mad about that problem. 
Brexit is 668 hours away. #brexit 
Brexit: Spain to give 400,000 Britons rights under no deal - more proof that UK exit from the EU without a deal can be managed. We just need to make it clear that we are leaving - offer free trade (A24) leave and then negotiate worldwide..  
Brexit delay: what it would take for the EU to agree article 50 extension -  it’s unlikely to do so without imposing strict conditions and financial penalties. Much better to avoid kicking the can, offer free trade (A24), leave under WTO and then negotiate  
We should keep an eye on Steve Bannon bc he was the VP of Cambridge Analytica, which was central to both Trump 2016 & Brexit, and bc CA has re-formed as Emerdata, as Bannon advises multiple far right leaders throughout Western Europe b4 the EU elections.  
Who called it Brexit and not the Great British Take-off? 
MPs prepared to avoid No Deal makes it harder for us to secure better Brexit, says @TheSun 
So how is the old United Kingdom doing? Oh dear #brexit  
Surprise, Surprise ... It turns out that Theresa May was never fully committed to Brexit ... Shock, Horror ... Hardly news eh ?  
How do we regain democracy?Our vote system is broken and there are no extra pressure release valves in place Many people are calling for more direct democracy and we have the technology in place to create it. Some of the ideas include ReferendumRecallPetitions 
People like @LenMcCluskey think #Brexit is an opportunity to make money for themselves. Who else is going to try to regain some of your rights after they've been thrown into the dumpster fire?Say no! #DumpUnite & form a new union that'll stand up for your job when it's at risk. 
You know when you move out on your own after living with the same people for a long time, then realize they owned the couches and ps4, they drove you to work every morning, you all chipped in on bills and all of your friends were actually their friends? That's Brexit, right? 
It chilled me to read that US see Brexit as a 'new opportunity' for US to expand and deepen the our trade relationships. Much protectionist, exploitative language in US position. Proof that Trump-Brexit axis had a joint plan to tear us from our EU allies and make money out of it 
You and that Corbyn fool have turned your back on Honda & other Japanese firms with your idiotic and xenophobic Brexit headbanging. #NastyPartyYou need to personally apologise to every person you've chosen to put out of work and pledge to start opposing Brexit. #FinalSayForAll 
There are only 27 days left until  #BREXIT and #FREEDOM for #BRITAIN ! #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #NoDeal #WTO ......... If @theresa_may and the @Conservatives extend or delay #Article50 for any reason...... then the 17,410,742 must DESTROY the #ConservativeParty! 
OVER 360,000 NOW and STILL growing Don'T miss "OUT" on this opportunity to be on the right side for Brexit .  
Jesus! The country that invented economics, has a great financial industry, founded the Bank of England & France & more, never mind inventing ATMs & chip&pin need to prove themselves.Just what brainwashed monkeys have Scots become.They need us to fix the Brexit fuck up for them 
The Scottish people are governed by consent. Our government was elected on a manifesto to hold another referendum if we faced leaving EU despite voting against it.The UK govt do not have the moral right to deny this manifesto commitment. 
According to the i, the ERG and DUP are desperate to fall in behind May. It also says that any attempt to delay Brexit could be subject to a legal challenge in the view of German experts. 
Clinton election: Done deal Brexit: zero chance Hanoi Summit: Trump caving is certain Trade deal: Weak deal is 100%Maybe just maybe,  thinking out loud here ....musing if you will, you need to tweak your models? 
YOU can start broadcasting the fact that the 2016 referendum result was fraudulent and May's own legal team said she knew at time of invocation if it. #BREXIT needs binning. #RevokeArticle50 
And here's Hannan at a Atlas Network dinner; it's well worth listening to what this key member of Vote Leave and Tufton St disciple is advocating...... pic.twitter.com/YVGwEZXTOa 
Unlike the Catalan referendum which the Spanish written constitution (however unreasonably or unfairly) prohibited, the unwritten UK constitution is governed by precedent such as unanimous acceptance of the Claim of Right in the HoC following a debate by @IanBlackfordMP & @theSNP 
hey girl are you any sort of sensible resolution to brexit because I want to have you on the table 
How do we move on from the Brexit debate ASAP?Do we have a Referendum on the deal, and vote for EU membership, so by 2020 we can discuss other things?Or do we spend the next 5 years negotiating a trade deal which will clearly go about as well as these talks have. 
Brilliant .. Brutal Honesty!! So many nails hit firmly on the head here. Remind me not to get on the wrong side of @JaneyGodley . #Brexit  
Greenland is not the world's fifth largest economy, nor a member of the G7, nor home to the financial capital of the world. However, they did vote to leave the EU in 1982, they did respect the result of that referendum and they did leave within two years..  
Here in Salisbury almost all but the Blukip brigade have ditched the local Conservative association. I understand that the Blukippers are baying for a No Deal #Brexit without an ounce of concern or compassion for the destruction it will bring to the local farming community. 
"Of the 45 target seats in England and Wales that Labour need to win, 35 voted for Brexit. At the same time, of Labour’s 20 most vulnerable seats, 16 are Leave constituencies."Still, as long as we keep Hampstead happy.  
Brexit in March. A day when no-one could understand why a Tory Minister, who intends to support the Government’s position, resigns, and no one understands why a Tory Minister, Chris (no ferries) Grayling, doesn’r.  #toryfail 
While America is distracted by supposed "fight" against Maduro and Europe by Brexit and immigrants, the real battle takes place higher and nobody pays attention to it. The highest position of one of the most important organizations in the world has just been awarded to communism.  
Let's all spread the word - her lawyer told a Court in London last Thursday , Mrs May KNOWS that the 2016 EU leave vote was corrupt and illegal in terms of the  RP Act 83 - ie she is now actually trying to implement a policy, "brexit" , built on a criminally procured vote 
How is the Arron Banks' Criminal Investigation coming along. ? It is taking a suspiciously long time - are there shenannigans going on with the Investigators.? Under the Brexit driven Theresa May crime doesn't seem to be crime any more. 
Brexit was always a project of English nationalism. No wonder they will march from Sunderland to London.  
@BBCNews ran 6th item @Jaguar doing big investment in Midlands in electric cars. If ‘Jag’ cutting jobs would be 1st item & blamed on Brexit 
The Scottish government ‘does’ have the power to deliver an independence referendum bill. Great piece, check it out. #IndyRef2 @NicolaSturgeon @IanBlackfordMP @KeithBrownSNP 
This is it in a nutshell - given the history of British-Irish relations, Irish society is hardwired against having to accept ‘any costs of British politics’ - it just so happens that #Brexit imposes hugh externalities on island of Ireland  
You backed a #Brexit which makes it more expensive for manufacturers to make cars here. Now you want us to sign an impotent petition to save an industry you're helping consign to oblivion? Seriously, Len. GTF forever!  
I’ve been lied to. I voted for Scotland to stay part of the UK&NI. I voted no to #indyref based on the “facts” presented at the time. Facts have spectacularly changed with #brexit .  I would now vote for #indyref2 for Scotland. Not supporting an #SNP ticket, but Scotland. 
The revolving door from Tufton St. to Portland Place still well and truly turning then..... 
A brief reminder: #Brexit may be on the ropes, but it's not beaten. Dont count your chickens yet. Tell your MPs to vote against Theresa May's lousy deal and then against no deal. Only then will we be able to move on to a #PeoplesVote and/or #RevokeArticle50 and avoid Armageddon. 
Brexit has been the biggest waste of money in history because, if the government drags us out. We will take us back in, who are the fools? our gutless politicians. 
When the black tide of Brexit has rolled over us and the last light of decency has flickered out, I will not sit quiet in the darkness, and shame on anyone who does.The battle will not be over. It will have only just started. 
If brexit did happen we'd spend the next 10 years negotiating Trade deals. We'd be desperate  for them, so we'd be screwed by every country -not least the USA.So it's lucky that brexit won't happen. It would be suicide for the UK.#PeoplesVote #RevokeArticle50 
Hi Mike. Glad to see you’re in good spirits. I was wondering if you could explain why some referendums are sacrosanct (Brexit) and others you’d actually vote against implementing (welsh devolution).  
The media have so far effectively suppressed the fact that, according to her own lawyer,  May KNOWS that the 2016 leave vote was corrupt and unlawful - but we can expect the public , as the facts becomes fully known , to demand that "brexit" is stopped 
Presumably he waded through the same turgid detail from the UK Government on Brexit. On no, wait...  
 Project Fear Latest: Hard Brexit Will Cause More Unplanned Pregnancies -  
I voted remain in the last referendum. but after suffering 2 years plus of bitching and complaining by those who lost; I am now a confirmed believer in Democracy as we have lived it in this country. If losers can overturn our Democracy as easily as this we are lost.  
 a smart, informative, investigative take on Brexit. Russia had a multi-pronged strategy to attack democracies. Thanks for @sarahkendzior @AndreaChalupa @carolecadwalla and this special podcast episode  
Berlin set to hold referendum on banning big landlords and nationalising private rented housing  
I have learned 2 things tonight - firstly, if you've drunk enough jäger, you can briefly convince yourself that you just made #Brexit up because you've drunk too much jäger, and secondly, this state of mind is far too welcoming to me to be healthy  
As one of the big Brexit campaigns our database of members contain large numbers of Conservative & UKIP party members that have rejoined. We are helping to bring local members together & propose votes of no confidence. Most people rejoining were Tory members to start with ..  
Weird how many of the Brexit baddies look like boiled eggs  
Ha! my little bro has unfollowed me. Probs because of my stance on Brexit I suspect..bye remoaner!  
One of the prime drivers of #Brexit is English nationalism. England is a grotesquely over-centralised country, with no political existence in the Union. The distant bureaucrats are not in Brussels, they are in London. England urgently needs regional governments#PeoplesVote 
"The relationship between our countries has been special for many years, but #Brexit has given us a once-in-a-generation opportunity to raise it to a new level." - Liam Fox, Nov 2018Yeah, right. Thanks for this "opportunity" @LiamFox.#StopBrexit 
I can't speak to his constituency relations - or his views on Brexit. But have always been impressed by @SamGyimah's passion for ideas. Definitely an asset to the Tories 
“If I have to do this again …  next time there will be no more mister nice guy!” @Nigel_Farage on if he has to fight for Brexit again. #CPAC2019 #WhatMakesAmericaGreat 
Let’s be honest, Brexit or no Brexit, our country is fucked. But no Brexit will fuck us less than Brexit. 
A section of the press box is hooting for Farage. He is now ranting against Facebook and Zuckerberg, which is funny since Brexit would have failed without it, and now he is spinning conspiracies about the death of Andrew Breitbart and conservative media oppression, or whatever. 
Spain moves to protect British residents in case of no-deal Brexit 
Brexit has become a litmus test for MPs. MPs who are acting to overturn the vote are understandably not seen as trustworthy or credible.  
I'm honored to have joined @krishgm and Shankar Singham on @Channel4News today to talk Brexit, and tariffs. Those of you in the UK or with technical wizardry can watch the full clip here .  
Oh come on Robert !  Last Thursday , May's QC told the Court in Wilson vs May that May KNOWS that the 2016 EU leave vote was corrupt and illegal re RPA 83. This is simply the tip of the "brexit" corruption iceberg - much more will now come out. "Brexit" IS ILLEGAL AND CORRUPT 
On such a critical issue, it’s unsurprising that some in the Association are choosing to make their views known in this way. I look forward to continuing the debate with them, the rest of the Association, and constituents more broadly as we go through the thorny Brexit process.  
First, #Russia never seized the parliament building in Simferopol - there were NO Russian troops there. Second, why is every referendum and election outcome the US doesn't like called a 'sham' or 'fraudulent?' Third, when you're torching the world, you can't point fingers.  
The remain campaign was full of lies.There will be no EU army, care to explain how they are now forming one?Some countries follow the EU rules others don't, take Hungary for example. Brexit quick. 
I’m told that one aggravation was the feeing that Gyimah was trying to downplay support for a second referendum, calling it “just one option” from “looking at all scenarios”. Several in the audience felt that was less than straight up given headlines like:  
"What do we still want to know about #Brexit?" asks #bbcnewsten.Good question!I still want to know why the govt persists in pursuing a course of action that all its own studies and almost every credible expert confirm will be damaging to the country.This makes no sense. 
On both sides of the pond we must keep fighting against those who want to stop Trump and Brexit. Watch my speech LIVE from CPAC.   
More awful Brexit news: Jaguar Land Rover plans big UK investment  
Caught up with the lovely @LaylaMoran and she had some rather blunt words for what's happening with Brexit! (Block your ears if you are offended )  
This is why they can't have a second referendum. The establishment lies and cheats to get what the establishment wants.  
So late in the day.  Brexit is driving Japanese investment out and other investment too 
People are saying they’re also not shaving ‘til Brexit. Maybe this can be a movement!If you are on board, tweet us with #NoShaveTilBrexit #TheLastLeg 
Project Fear Latest: Hard Brexit Will Cause More Unplanned Pregnancies  
"Brexit Referendum Was Corruptly Won, But Result Stands Thanks To Loophole" - LBC @LBC 
No Deal it is then..Brexit news: Lawyers blow hole in plan for short extension favoured by May in order to pass her deal - The Independent  
Student calls on Britons to IGNORE Project Fear and look at OPPORTUNITIES of Brexit - …  #Brexit #News 
Come on folks we need to show Labour MPs who've said they intend to vote for May's deal without a #PeoplesVote what their actions would do to Labour's vote: Please RT. #Brexit #FBPE 
18 of #Cornwall's leading tech companies warn MPs of #Brexit impacts:"We are concerned about the immediate & longer term impact on the UK’s economy & security which will affect our staff, families & all of us in Cornwall and beyond." 
And just so we are clear from the outset, Bitches Against Brexit is fully inclusive of all who identify as anti-Brexit bitches ;) 
Alongside @chrisgreybrexit and @IanDunt, @GuitarMoog alias Steve Bullock is the Brexit commentator I have most enjoyed and benefited from reading for his humour, his insight and his decency. I hope you will join me in wishing him well and hoping he can bring himself to return. 
You own this Len, you are a disgrace to the trades Union movement.All that time pushing #Brexit when these consequences were entirely predictable.I hope your members choose a replacement who actually cares about their jobs instead of some ill thought out ideology. 
**UPDATED** £33m on the Brexit ferry case, £500m on failed probation privatisation, and much, much more.  But how much public money has Chris Grayling wasted exactly? #FailingGrayling 
my local pro-Brexit group are moaning on their fb page that Brexit will be betrayed and we'll end up staying in the EU one way or another and i wish i had their confidence in Remain lol i'm terrified 
By the way, everyone, the European Medicines Agency left London today. Brexit, you spoil us.  
'Many ministers - and I would include Theresa in this - struggle to see any economic upside to Brexit.'Even the Prime fucking Minister of the United fucking Kingdom doesn't believe in fucking #Brexit.What the actual fuck are we doing?I want an actual fucking answer.  
We now know the great prize of #Brexit: becoming #Trump’s prey. The US would give us a great trade deal, we were told. This week the president has shown how volatile and untrustworthy he is 
Paging Len McCluskey’s brain. Brexit = job losses. Don’t pretend you care. 
Well done Tories!  You've managed to ruin Maggie's, & my, Party!I DECLARE I WILL NEVER EVER VOTE FOR THE TORIES AGAIN!Surprisingly Brexit has been an education & certainly shown U all up!@Conservatives@gerardjasper@BrexitKnight@Mitchel06512105@theresa_may@BrandonLewis 
Spain to guarantee British residents' rights in event of no-deal Brexit  
A tweet by @LenMcCluskey, a Brexit cheerleader, regarding #SaveHondaSwindon, in a 55% Leave-voting Swindon:"Our members may have been betrayed by #Honda."Couldn't make it up. 
An anonymous referendum and yet '8 million women voted to leave' ...... not a fact just a guess....might as well put it on the side of a bus with all the other shit  
Brexit supporters feel a sense of looming betrayal. That's why @Nigel_Farage is leading a long march for freedom. Here's @soniasodha and I discussing it on @SkyNews. Sign up via @LeaveMnsLeave 
Brexit Causes More Unplanned Pregnancies.UK’s most popular condom, Durex, is produced “entirely in China, India, & Thailand” – all countries which EU has no free trade agreements with. Another Project Fear prediction which can be safely binned. 
EXC: No confidence bid launched against Sam Gyimah- Motion tabled after Gyimah's appearance at SEM tonight- Unhappy members feel he has misled them over his Brexit reversal- Activists nickname him "Where's Sam" after poor attendance at local events 
You want to save Honda, and indeed the rest of UK manufacturing.STOP. SUPPORTING. BREXIT. 
“I completely recognise why the idea of a second referendum is so worrying - all the concerns of ‘Why didn’t you trust us when we voted the first time?’ I genuinely get that.” (2/4) 
@heidiallen75 speaks on @BBCRadio4 about her belief in a second referendum and why it would not be patronising to the British people: (1/4) 
The one thing #Brexit has revealed is just how broken the political system is in the UK and how utterly worthless most politicians are. 
Umar for PM @umarksiddiqui #Brexit #Gogglebox 
Tomorrow's front page: FM accuses Tories of running scared over another independence referendum after reports suggest they want to fix the date, question and franchise for indyref2  
Where were you in 2016 when Japan warned about such exits because of Brexit?   
“It’s Tom Watson and his subalterns that decided Labour’s disastrous lurch I warned against last Friday on the issue of Brexit.. Labour is now Hampstead not Hartlepool. Labour imagines it can win over the soft shoe shufflers of the Waitrose battalions of the FBPE brigade.” #MOATS 
Here's Schona Jolly, an exceptionally gifted lawyer who has tirelessly railed most eloquently against Brexit. Along with Jessica Simor, she ought to go down in history as one of the most prominent women warrior lawyer Remainers. Compare and contrast with the likes of Esther McVey  
This tweet in exactly TWO AND A HALF YEARS OLD. Two and a half years later and still no fucking cue what's happening, with days to go. #Brexit #NoDealBrexit #WithdrawalAgreement 
Grayling under fire as Government pays out £33m in dispute over ‘secretive’ Brexit contracts  
Brexit Blame Game: Leave Voters Blame Saboteur MPs  via @GuidoFawkes 
You fucking serious Len?This is due to Brexit. It's the UK that's fucking up, not Honda.Get your head out of your arse and see the signs.  
Former @GovernorDeal endorses the referendum to expand MARTA to Gwinnett - the highest profile Republican to do so. #gapol 
The minister Christopher GraylingFound government isn't plain sailing;He racked up a billOf 33 milThrough yet more incompetent failing.#Brexit#ChrisGrayling#ferrygate #Eurotunnel 
UK buys a £100 billion a year more from the #EU than they buy from us.If a no deal Brexit would be as catasrophic for the UK as #Remain MPs & MSM claim, it must surely follow that a no deal brexit would be even more catastrophic for #EU.HOC voting against no deal is illogical 
I don’t think anyone wants an “illegal”referendum but I’m sure there’s a more sophisticated strategy than this to cope with the inevitable refusal of a section 30 order by the hapless Theresa May 
Here's a simple hard fact. Westminster will never give Scotland another Section 30 order to hold an independence referendum. How we deal with that is up to us. 
@heidiallen75 speaks on @BBCRadio4 about the current Brexit negotiations: (1/3) 
Andrew voted leave, but he considers he was misled by the #brexit campaign and would now act differently.Respect @andrew_cawthraw it's ok to change your mind when facts change. So many feel as you do.Do contact your MP, your voice is very important.#remainernow #FinalSay 
Watch in full: @henningwehn absolutely smashes it on Brexit."If you were worried that the country is run by unelected European Union bureaucrats, well I don't know what would have changed your mind on that one over the past two years!" #BBCQT 
The real disgrace and story here is why the @BBCNews won’t cover this. The bias within that organisation is quite incredible. The BBC exists purely now to advance an anti-Brexit, globalist, neo-leftist ideology. What other org could advertise jobs only non-whites could apply for? 
This has happened because of people like you voting for, and pushing, Brexit.Sadly, it’ll be just one of many companies to relocate.Which is why many of us have been fighting Brexit for nearly 3 years.Own it. 
Thanks to Brexit, if you’re either pro-Tory or pro-Labour, your party is struggling. Read this thread on how both Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn, leaders of the respective parties, have been fighting for survival: 
Every politician responsible for Brexit should have to make up the loss to the UK economy out of their own pockets for life (soon to be about £200bn a year)  
We can now safely conclude that Theresa May really wants to deliver #Brexit, after all if she was playing some clever game of being seen to have tried to deliver it, but hoping to fail, May would have made Chris Graying Secretary of State for DExEU.  
No we need to leave the European Union as per what people voted for. Everything else comes second. It is ridiculous  MPs like Amber Rudd trying to have a half in half out Brexit that no one voted for that is doing the most damage to the country.  
You know Brexit is in trouble when an IEA economist tweets this:  
Don't pray for a transition period - that means praying for Brexit. If you are going to get down on your knees, set your sights higher, on a no Brexit!  
Agreed. I literally know thousands of people who voted remain, but now want a no deal Brexit, a tattoo of Farage on their arse, and the complete nuclear destruction of western civilisation  
Only UKIP is a true people’s alternative here for Brexit & Beyond  
The LP drops on March 29th. Tell @BBC6Music if you feel like you can Brexit to this.  
Wonder when I was blocked by Professor Brian Cox?Possibly around the time I told him to stop condescendingly dismissing Brexit voters?  
In 20 years’ time we’ll either be like:“Why did MPs and large parts of civic society suspend their critical faculties and put what was then the UK on a path to sad decline following a deeply flawed referendum?”Or“Do you remember that shitfest we managed to dodge?” 
Nigel Farage’s 277-mile ‘March to Leave’ for Brexit explained in FULL.  
Everything Grayling has been really enthusiastic about has turned out to be totally ill-conceived. Grayling is really enthusiastic about Brexit. 
Revoke A50 & launch an independent enquiry into the illegal 2016 referendum. 
Spanish government guarantee rights for Brits post-Brexit  
What do you think the government should do now that Brexit is less than a month away? #bbcaq 
Economists examined 12 economic simulation models estimating the impact of #Brexit. Only two models derive gains for the UK after Brexit - and they are both based on unrealistic assumptions.  
Brexit scare 768 debunked.   
Hopefully Dominic Grieve's constituents will do the same 
The EU has absolutely not sought any quarrel with #brexit ing Britain. This is as baseless as it is mean-spirited and vile. May the UK one day recover from Tory brextremism. 
Chris Grayling 'must be sacked by Monday' over £33m Brexit no-deal contract row payout  
Refusing a second referendum is basically saying: "recognition of a voter's right to change their minds, once aspirations become reality, is not built in to our democracy." If that's true, our democracy deserves to fail, and will. 
BREXIT BAMFORD SENDS LEEDS FLYING OUT OF THE PLAY OFFS WITH NO DEAL 
#Zoido former interior minister of #Spain -in charge over #Catalonia's  #1oct #1o #Independence#Referendum- denies giving the order to stop the poll to Spanish military Police& Civil Guard"which left 1000 civilians injured"via .@ScotNational 
This is just one example - a very expensive one - of what happens when you have a government that stubbornly refused to plan and prepare. If there is a scandal regarding #Brexit, it’s the government’s startling degree of incompetence.  
PUT THIS MAN IN CHARGE OF BREXIT IMMEDIATELY! #LUFC 
Paddy Power has slashed the odds on reunification within five years as research shows Ireland could be heading for a referendum... via @IrishCentral 
Remarkable: "Nick Timothy, Theresa May's right-hand man in her first year in office, says she & other ministers are treating Brexit as a "damage limitation exercise" & says she is "struggling to see any economic upside" from leaving the EU"! So WHY is she still proeceeding? 
i spent half an hour today wandering around staring at the ground until i found someone else's old elastic hair tie to use because i couldn't justify spending £1.50 on a new pack and that is a glimpse of what life will be like post-Brexit 
With Mr. BREXIT @Nigel_Farage now!Livestreaming:  
Len you backed Brexit all the way mate! You’ve stood by & let this happen to the Car industry. You should have been shouting about the disaster that is Brexit to your members - but you did the reverse. Shame on you #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople #RevokeArticle50 #IndependentGroup 
Make no mistake: delaying Brexit will be seen by Leave supporters as a route to stopping Brexit altogether.  
But Leavers ARE either racist, stupid or bitter ld gammons. Nothing over the last two years has disproved that fact. Otherwise they'd be able to name a tangible, practical and realistic benefit of Brexit for our daily lives.  
And the promised trade deals with the rest of the world have not happened and probably won't happen. The people who voted Leave did so because they believed what they were told. But, they were lied to! And if #Brexit goes ahead, they are the ones who will be hurt most! 3 of 3 
WM: We might give you a referendum but we'd want to decide the time, question, rules and franchise.Scotland: NO! The claim of right says the PEOPLE have the sovereign right to determine their future! Not those we're deciding about! Dictation is not self-determination! 
Perfect representation of Brexit half arsed, utterly pointless & abandoned when the effort gets too much. 
Tory party activists are kicking off after Theresa May opened the door to a delay to Brexit this week. Expect more of these votes through AGM season for Tory parties. The careers of some Conservative MPs are now on the line.  
It's difficult to imagine that, in any circumstances other than Brexit, Chris Grayling would hold on to his job. To put it another way. not only has Grayling added to the costs of Brexit, he is a cost of Brexit.  
UK Consumers More Optimistic Than European Counterparts (yes, you guessed it) “despite Brexit”  
If May’s deal is defeated it would be very unlikely that a referendum could  be held on her twice rejected deal and an already rejected Remain option. It wouldn’t make sense. So it must be rejected. Any second referendum would be embarrassing under any circumstances. 
Does this idiot live in the same world as the rest of us? He quits as Brexit Secretary after making a mess and then blames Eurotunnel for NHS no deal problems. I know what's happened, he's been drinking in the HoC bar again?  
What with this and Brexit it’s becoming increasingly obvious: we’re too stupid to live.  
"We were regularly overruled by Downing Street."Former Brexit Ministers @DavidDavisMP, @DominicRaab, @SteveBakerHW, and @SuellaBraverman reveal the truth behind the EU negotiations  pic.twitter.com/cc1iT3TFYw 
But Layla luv, that doesn't answer the question: What if Leavers win again? Please use your loaf … what is your Brexit plan? Do tell, instead of going on TV to promote your fame.  
How about campaigning vigorously against Brexit in any form, you old hypocrite? Then you wouldn't need a bloody petition. 
Passionate interviews with ceramics industry people on @Channel4News - making clear they worry the industry risks massive decline because of Brexit 
Sounds like a very constructive idea so we have a deal and every one of us can say whether this is the Brexit we want.  
Chris Grayling 'must be sacked by Monday' over £33m Brexit no-deal contract row payout  
As we approach Spring and the Channel gets calmer while a No Deal Brexit looms, boats of illegal immigrants will increase as the French coastguard appears unable to stop them. Our politicians who moan about lack of housing, schools, hospitals and creaking welfare stay silent.  
“Jaguar Land Rover plans big UK investment” - wonder how the anti-Brexit crowd will explain this business decision?  
Your constituency will get a vote on you before we have a second referendum !  
Hugely misleading from @DenisMacShane. The article specifically warns to “be careful to see this poll as a measurement of the present rather than a prediction of the future”. If UK took part in EP elections (because of a Brexit delay) the established parties would be pulverised.  
BREXIT EXPLAINED:If you are a little dude (UK) and you keep kicking a very very big dude (EU) on the shins and calling it (EU) an asshole, and threatening it repeatedly, and calling it stupid, eventually you (UK) are going to pay for it. 
One of my worries about a second referendum is that it will give the debate back to polarising figures like Farage and Blair and that Remain will argue for a return to the status quo ante. This article may help us to avoid that disastrous mistake.  
Benidorm suffers HUGE drop in British tourists with Spanish blaming no deal Brexit  Ballcocks. Spain must stop interfering in our democracy or even more people will stop going their. A WTO BREXIT is best for Britain. 
[WATCH] German Comedian Henning Wehn Nails it on Brexit #BBCQT 
Alan, Parliament will never agree to no deal. They’d much rather a second referendum. Which would be truly appalling. 
For me People's Vote is a backstop.I don't want Brexit.There is no benefit from itThe corruptly gained marginal advice  does not mandate it So best to #RevokeA50 But at the very least we must not countenance any form of Leave without a #FinalSay vote with an #OptionToRemain 
Ok enough twitter for a few days - gonna try and enjoy Florence without thinking too much about Brexit. And you know, maybe read a book or two. Stuff I used to be good at doing .... 
Britain's economy is set to boom and become the largest in Europe - because of Brexit | @LiamHalligan 
SHOCKING:The Party Chairman ordered someone to film the National Conservative Convention's debate on the motion rejecting a second referendum or any Brexit delay beyond the European Elections This is completely unacceptable. 
. This whole "Ladies for leave“/the menfolk have botched #Brexit-approach would be a whole lot more convincing if the British Prime Minister wasn‘t, you know, a lady.  
Pleased the Commons supported this amendment, which I signed as a Shadow Brexit Minister. @BritishInEurope and @the3million have been subject to avoidable uncertainty and worry for 2.5 years. Guaranteeing their rights no matter what is long overdue. 
Nugget from @JGForsyth's excellent Spectator column this week..."Of the 45 Labour target seats in Egland and Wales, that Labour need to win, 35 voted for Brexit. Of Labour's 20 most vulnerable seats, 16 are Leave constituencies."Think on that. 
And this is just the tip of the iceberg of "brexit" criminality and corruption. And do bear in mind, May's QC told the Court in Wilson vs May last Thursday in London that May KNOWS that the 2016 UK EU Referendum leave vote was corrupt and illegal re RPA 83 . 
Can you imagine if the following happened in a banana republic. A leading Brexit backing MP expected to make £700 mil out of no deal  Brexit. A minister who gives a contract to a company with no ferries. Now £33 mil for ET. A fuck up at the justice service. Unbelievable 
Has Labour betrayed the working class over Brexit? 
We've already had a referendum and remain was rejected by the electorate.Theresa May won the last General Election and is tasked with negotiating a deal, if the deal isn't a good one we leave on WTO terms.That's the rules of article 50 as voted for by parliament.@DavidLammy 
US, CUBAN OPPOSITION DENOUNCE COMMUNIST REFERENDUM AS FRAUD @epochtimes#FreeTheCubanPeople#CommunismIsSocialismPerfected"The entire process has been marked by carefully managed political theater and repression of public debate.” 
Donald Trump’s administration has published negotiating objectives for a post-Brexit deal which include demands for a block on state institutions - such as the NHS - discriminating against American companies when purchasing goods and services.  
If anyone suggests Brexit will cost jobs, mention Chris Grayling. It keeps him in his. Nothing else could, or should. #ChrisGrayling #FailingGrayling 
Unless something important explodes or I die of nerves, I'll be on @Channel4News in about half an hour to talk Brexit and tariffs. 
We've had enough of arrogant Remainers in Westminster running roughshod over the referendum result and we're taking action, targeting the Tory AGMs this month and filing no confidence motions in Remainer MPs!Contact us at info@leave.eu for more info  
Nigel Farage is organising a march from Sunderland to London, presumably to stress that come Brexit there will no cars made in Britain  to make the journey in. 
It’s obvious that there is NO mandate, either from the referendum or in Parliament, for any version of Brexit now on offerThe ONLY democratic way forward, and ONLY way to give any outcome democratic legitimacy, is to #PutItToThePeople in a #PeoplesVote with #OptionToRemain 
How can a man who regularly dines with Billionaires and who says it doesn't really matter how much poorer his Brexit makes ordinary British people, be seen as the champion of the working class?  
Reflecting on the 1979 Referendum and other election campaigns, one of the things that has been imprinted on me. NEVER campaign over the winter. The weather in the run up to the Referendum and polling day was horrendous. 
Delaying Brexit: time to take part in the EU elections. May envisages only a short delay. But any extension of article 50 raises big issues that would take months to sort out.I could live with a long extension - 100 years minimum would do for a start.  
Len.  Honda clearly said no customs union and single market will make it impossible for them.  Wait until Nissan starts winding down.  You want brexit you own it and that petition won't make a tiny difference . 
London are now adopting the Madrid approach to the Scottish Indyref2. Which is yet another miscalculation by Theresa. Of one thing I am sure. If London believed they would win an Independence referendum, they would be falling over themselves to back one. 
Bremain in Spain chair @Suewilson91's response: a lot of our members would be sleeping better as a result of the Royal Decree.(However, the best plan is still no Brexit.)#StopBrexit #the5Million 
Brexit: Michael Gove admits farmers may never recover from no-dealCan we give all the other Brexiters the truth serum too now please?   
Martin Rowson on Chris Grayling and the Brexit ferry fiasco #FailingGrayling #ChrisGrayling - political cartoon gallery in London  
So these Ladies are supporting a policy ( "brexit") which Sir James Eadie QC told the Court in London last week was known to Mrs May to be corrupt and illegal re RPA 83. So these "Ladies" clearly support the use of crime to achieve political change - do spread the word, Carole 
Will Cox’s codicil deliver the Brexit victory @theresa_may craves? Here is why I doubt it  
If Brexit doesn't happen, 82% of Leave voters will blame Remoaner saboteurs who opposed Theresa May’s Brexit deal because they wanted to stop Brexit.Grieve, Greening, Lee, Wollaston, Soubry, Allen & co. are playing with fire... pic.twitter.com/jAr0RdIrv0 
Brexit news: 'Italy PRIMED and ready' to QUIT EU - Brussels 'terrified'. Well we can all hope..  
Soundbite of the day from @AndyMcDonaldMP on the £33m cost of the latest Brexit farce: "This country cannot afford Chris Grayling". 
.⁦⁦⁦@rosaltmann⁩ warns hard Brexit is equivalent of huge business tax hike: “In pursuit of their little England, nationalist agenda, extreme Brexiteers appear willing to destroy the profitability of our corporate sector” 
One step towards fairer decision making after Brexit "The Home Secretary has agreed to make key changes to the settled status scheme to make it fairer" Success for @JCWI_UK and @the3million! Thank you!!!! 
#Kashmir has its Right of Self-determination according to the following @UN resolution 1948. The referendum for both, Indian Occupied J&K & Pakistani administrated area AJK.#FreeKashmir 
#Brexit metaphor Number 11 ? via youmuppet_ #football 
Watching Granada TV and they're interviewing teenagers about #Brexit. All of them complaining about the opportunities that they're losing because of it.These kids get it, why don't #Leavers? You will never be forgiven by future generations for your selfish actions. 
Many of us have vivid memories of the 1979 devolution referendum - not least the cynical invention of a 40% of the total electorate threshold by a London based Scottish Labour MP. Thus when yes won by a bigger margin than Leave in 2016, it found it had actually lost! 
I don't know the source, but they've absolutely nailed #BrexitShare widely @AuroraBlogspot@snb19692@DavidLammy@Femi_Sorry@JasonJHunter@Anna_Soubry@RCorbettMEP@peoplesvote_uk@BestForBritain@ChukaUmunna@thatginamiller@DavidWCummins@ProMediaRes1@remain_central#fbpe pic.twitter.com/KhVmdZPyiT 
We have an issue. It’s called #Brexit. We would like you to stop it on behalf of the many Morley & Outwood constituents who have told us that they want to Remain in the EU. Could you represent them please, as you are paid to do?  
What betrayed Brexit? Brexit betrayed Brexit. It collapsed under the weight of its contradictions and impracticalities, leaky, flammable, and structurally unsound. No one would have insured it, but the government built it. And now we're supposed to climb aboard. 
Britain's hopes of a trade deal with America just suffered a big blow 1 CNN has no axe to grind when it comes to Brexit2 This isn’t #ProjectFear, it’s #ProjectTruth  3 USA doesn’t seem to value UK as an equal 4 we are in the because of the Tory s 
Nick Timothy, May’s former chief of staff, says she sees Brexit as a ‘damage limitation exercise’ with no benefits and so doesn’t take the necessary steps to make it succeed. Who would have guessed? 
Exactly the kind of sneering, supercilious attitude that meant #Remain lost the referendum. Some people never learn!  
The about-turns by Mrs May and Mr Corbyn show two leaders who have lost control of their own Brexit policies  
EU see May's proposed short extension of 2 months as pointless. Longer extension requires UK to participate in EU elections, but EU earlier suggested a 21 month extension, instead of a transition period. Plenty of time for a referendum! 
Parliament's made up 408 MPs whose constituents voted leave 242 MPs represent constituencies that voted remainYet around 150 MPs are fighting for proper Brexit& around 500 are fighting for no Brexit/BRINOThey think they can do what they likeWe need to get rid of them 
When #LionelShriver said on #bbcqt that #TheresaMay #Brexit deal is essentially #Remain, #FionaBruce said sharply "No, it's not". Good old #BBC impartiality. 
Someone should let "Ms. Hitler was a really great guy until he crossed the border into Poland" know that there's probably going to be another Brexit vote since the UK realized the Russians & racism from the Brexit crowd got Brexit passed.  
It was a huge mistake to put someone in charge of Brexit who doesn't believe in it.This is why   
Thank you to @NaomiOhReally and @PassportIrish for taking the time to speak with me about our case and the wider implications of Brexit on citizens rights and the Good Friday Agreement.You can catch the full podcast episode   
Brexit supporters think economic disaster is a price worth paying for  fewer Polish people 
Tonight, @Tom_Watson asks: “What will it take to make you realise this government is making a shambles of Brexit?”  
First tide pods now milk coke.  The internet will kill this generation before the Brexit Food Riots even get the chance.   
The people will not sit by whilst the establishment betray Brexit. Join the March to Leave: @IsabelOakeshott: "The reason for this is becausethere is a real feeling amongst Brexit voters of a looming betrayal coming up on Brexit."  
UK's biggest investors bet on the British economy in Brexit show of faith 
. @thecarolemalone says: “It's now clear that the entire political establishment is working against the British people to thwart #Brexit.” This comes after the Labour Party backed a second referendum. Watch the full debate here #ThePledge 
A good hard Brexit will get you up the duff - Who knew ?  
Scotland will be an independent country. I know it, you know it, the U.K. Government knows it. That’s why they’re terrified of a referendum. 
Owen Jones remarks that Remain voters are now more angry about Brexit than they were the morning after the result. I can understand his surprise. I mean, it's all been going so well. 
God punish UK. They are just interested in holding on to relationships that will benefit them after Brexit.  
Spain wants to guarantee the rights of British expats living in the country in the event of a no-deal #Brexit  
BBC Question Time audience brilliantly PROVE why second Brexit referendum will NOT work  
Just heard some rather underinformed #Brexiters on @BBCRadio4 PM saying they wanted to hear more positives about #Brexit.Here goes!I'm positive this #BrexitShambles is doing irreparable harm to the UK & will be a clusterf***!! Unless we positively #RevokeA50.Positive enough? 
Now you speak as though pouring (and wasting) millions of taxpayer £ into something that is entirely avoidable is a good thing. We do not need to leave the EU and we should not leave the EU. From the rigged referendum to lie after lie, leaving the EU is an utterly wasteful folly. 
#ClimateChange is a far bigger threat to Britain and the rest of the world than #Brexit will ever be. The consequences of not defending #nature will be catastrophic. Let's declare a #ClimateEmergency and deal with this crisis.@ExtinctionR @Team4Nature 
Radio 4 PM are interviewing 3 Brexiters about Brexit and news coverage.How is that balanced, not even a single remain supporter was asked their opinions?Now we get David Henig Director, ECIPE, part of the Atlas Network of libertarian climate change deniers.Get a grip BBC 
Fed up with this #Brexit mess? Write to your MP today and tell them a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal is the #OnlyWayForward: 
1/ A few clips from @RemainiacsCast centenary edition with swearing, giggles and two special guests, @ClaireHanna & @paalfrisvold. May delays and U turns on Brexit, but is it a trap to stitch up her deal after a short extension. @IanDunt pulls no punches in his assessment. 
Why Squirrels fear Brexit...Catch the full clip on our YouTube channel  
A reminder: Chris Grayling awarded a company with *no ships* a £14m contract for a ferry service, to prep for Brexit contingency plans.Just HOW?!!! It beggars belief.  Shameful that HMG have settled (for £33m!) to avoid further details becoming public. Sack him.  
Project Fear Latest: Hard Brexit Will Cause More Unplanned Pregnancies  
Brexit: Michael Gove admits farmers may never recover from no-deal  
Labour says Transport Secretary Chris Grayling has "incompetence that knows no bounds" and should be sacked for giving Eurotunnel £33m to drop its no deal Brexit ferry legal claim  
"Back my Brexit deal or you'll never sleep again."  
MAY BOMBSHELL: Ex-aide says PM NEVER believed in Brexit– it's all just 'DAMAGE LIMITATION'  
Trump Administration Outlines Potential Future of Post-Brexit UK-U.S. Trade  
We MUST grasp the huge opportunities afforded by a clean Brexit.This could include cuts in VAT, corporation tax and tariffs, a variety of tax reliefs to boost spending, and a wider review of the UK’s regulatory regime. 
Nick Timothy former chief of staff to @theresa_may says she never believed in economic virtues of Brexit & regarded it as a damage limitation exercise. is that why her Brexit deal is so bad? join me @lbc from 7 
But that could change if other options, like May's deal and softer Brexit, fall down. Then those wanting to stop no deal will lean to referendum. Even May cd conceivably find the Kyle-Wilson idea appealing ie Labour wd support or abstain on May deal if she promises ref... /10 
The Chair of Sevenoaks Conservative Association has resigned, in protest at Michael Fallon's stance on Brexit (he voted with Grieve/Greening/Letwin in support of a Cooper anti-No-Deal amendment in January). She says "he wants to remain in the EU". (1/2)  
Hard Brexit, united Ireland - America has one focus this St. Patrick’s Day #think32  via @IrishCentral 
This is an outrageous waste of taxpayer money. How is Grayling still in Government?Grayling reaches £33m settlement over Brexit ferry fiasco court case  
"The US has outlined its objectives for a post-Brexit trade deal with the UK, demanding greater access to the food markets where products such as chlorinated chicken or hormone-fed beef are banned under EU rules." @qmscotland @NSA_Scotland @scotfoodjames  
Brexit is the biggest dogs dinner Britain has ever seen!To stop #Brexit, hundreds of dogs will be holding the biggest dogs dinner outside Parliament on 10 March.It’s time to bark out #StopBrexit #BrexitDogsDinner #wooferendum #BiggestDogsDinnerEver 
Worried about Friday 29.3.2019?Based in Berlin?I’ve just got the confirmation of a venue for #FUXIT2 for that eveningWhatever happens with #Brexit, come along and dance the night away! Details will follow ASAP.    
Brexit means Teabag 
The exact terms of Brexit should be presented back to the country so everyone gets a #FinalSay#PeoplesVoteNow 
With less than 20 working days to go until Brexit day, it was good to catch up with @Liverpool4EU at Wavertree Technology Park Station. £8.3m of EU money was invested here to deliver the Olive Mount chord to re-instate a missing link to boost rail freight and reduce road traffic. 
destroying our scientific seed corn - President of Royal Society, virtually all University Vice-Chancellors all believe a no-deal Brexit will wreak destruction on higher education and research; but hey they are "experts" and we're sick of them aren't we?  
Let's get this trending: "I think one of the reasons we are where we are is that many Ministers, & I would include Theresa (May) in this, struggle to see any economic upside to Brexit." (Nick TImothy). If the Govt believes this, it has a duty to be honest with the electorate. 
Oh the irony. An apparently original 1971 poster spotted on the @HiddenLondon tour of Aldwych disused Underground station today. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
The Govt has been right to help the NHS with No Deal Brexit planning????No, the govt has acted irresponsibly in planning to break trading (and pharmaceutical) arrangements without a safe alternative in place. Time to stop blaming everyone else David and admit. You messed up. 
Friend of a friend of a friend has informed me that KCC is informing staff No Deal Brexit will probably result in Operation Stack/Brock reaching Dartford. No idea if that means A2. Meaning disruption in surrounding areas 
If you could find an honest Brexiter (yes, I know that's not likely),  they would tell you a no deal #Brexit never even crossed their mind. It was certainly not mentioned in the period leading up to the EURef 2016. But that won't stop Leavers telling you it was! #RevokeArticle50 
I went to a wonderfully inspiring Pro-Brexit, Pro-Britain speech from @SuellaBraverman today  If only all MPs were like Suella, who believes in fully honouring the referendum result, things would be very different! Suella makes me proud to be British   
Getting the impression that the ’big five’ who own about 50% of fishing quotas are likely to do very well out of Brexit - whether deal or No Deal - but smaller inshore fishing and seafood companies going to be screwed.  
"Ar an nuacht tá sé just Brexit, Brexit, Brexit"We have a video as Gaeilge every day for the next 17 days to celebrate #SnaG19. Inniu tá muid ag caint faoin mBreatimeacht! @SnaGaeilge #SnaG 
Overseas customers interested in British meat are now cancelling orders and buying their produce elsewhere due to the lack of clarity around Brexit 
"The main objective is to leave no British or Spanish citizen, or their families, unprotected."Spanish Foreign Minister Josep Borrell says hundreds of thousands of British people living in his country will have their rights protected under a no-deal Brexit.  
Your vote led to the WA. Own it. You don't like it? Guess what? Remainers don't like a referendum won on the basis of criminality, lies and Russian influence. Time for a #PeoplesVote. What are you scared of? 
DUP "Ulster nationalists" want as hard a border as possible so as to create as much distance between Northern Ireland and the Republic as possible. Motivated by sheer spite #brexit  
As we leavers have predicted, more people want to leave the EU than before the referendum. That is why I could not understand all those people pushing for a second referendom. For what? To be humiliated again? 
Spain says it will ease residency for Britons in case of no-deal Brexit  
After all the What Happens Next? flowcharts for the Brexit process, someone should make one for the Who Gets Blamed? process 
Quite. This has been a visionless, drab, reactionary, recalcitrant and technocratic Brexit. Very sadBut a #BetterDeal for a brighter future is possible:#PlanAPlus 
"We've stood up alone before. What makes us think that we can't stand up alone again?"These World War II survivors call out politicians for comparing Brexit to the war.  
Yes Brexit is insane but let’s not kid ourselves: the other side are fucking lunatics too.  
Serious question:Over the last couple of years we've learnt that leaving the EU is so difficult it probably can't be done without causing great damage.What would it be like for Scotland to leave the UK? As difficult as #Brexit, or easier? 
I bet the HS2 project management team are thrilled about brexit. The delivery of brexit is going to make HS2 Look like the most cost efficient, brilliantly executed government project ever 
Scandalous squandering of public money Who on earth can think Brexit is a worthwhile adventure?  
CHRIS Grayling is clearly messing up every Government department to show Theresa May he's got the skills to be Brexit Secretary 
London Stock Exchange strikes upbeat Brexit note  
The more irate Esther McVey becomes about “Brexit betrayal”, the bigger hair seems to get. By the time we hit 29th March, owls will be nesting in it.  
This government has made it abundantly clear that they have ZERO interest in N Ireland. Continuing to block LGBTQ rights & women's rights...not to mention #Brexit @Conservatives you really have excelled yourselves.But you will not win.We will.#LoveWins #NotTheBigots  
Bitches Against Brexit CRIMES, Emma. Doin’ it for Democracy.. 
She's still pushing it because 1) she & husband will make £ millions out of #Brexit and 2) if she doesn't push it, the Tory party will shred itself. 
Michel Barnier has once again confirmed that the EU will not agree to a time limited backstop or an exit mechanism. It's time for Tory Brexiteers to stop playing along with May's games and praying for the impossible. Walk away from Brussels and back a WTO Brexit on March 29! 
Occurred to me that Leavers scared of NOT getting Brexit. Actually scared. What are they scared of exactly? What do they think they are going to actually lose? It's not like we're going to start hunting them down with pitchforks for the hell they put us through is it guys? Guys? 
Labour MP @CarolineFlintMP will be responding to the Labour Party’s decision to back a second Brexit referendum. Tune in at 9am #Sunday #SkyNews #Ridge 
Belinda was scared the EU would make her posh friends actually pay taxes so voted leave 'cos she can buy her way out of anything that goes wrong after Brexit. 
I can finally open my Brexit advent calendar. There’s absolutely fuck all behind each door. pic.twitter.com/5BDoaogXE1 
This is no more than a distancing exercise by Timothy. He knows it'll be a disaster so is busy putting the narrative, with the help of the BBC, that Brexit would have been fine if TM had done it his way. 
Just had a lovely chat with my postman about the way I have decorated my workroom window. He passionately pro EU and is incensed about Brexit, but didn’t know of the 23 March march. He now plans to go! @peoplesvote_uk #stopbrexit 
Pence Frames 2020 As Referendum On Socialism  
Don’t fall for the con trick when the Tories when they say they’ll protect workers’ rights post #Brexit. It’s all about fewer rights & making it easier to sack people.  
The main threat now to getting a #PeoplesVote is Labour MPs like Caroline Flint and John Mann who have shown themselves to be willing to vote for Tory #Brexit and opposed to a #PeoplesVote. Please RT this or the poll.#FBPE 
May’s deal is SO bad!It locks us forever in #EU with NO say on tax, financial regulation, foreign policy, tariffs, defence, security.How any MP can support this & proclaim they're being democratic is mind-boggling!Conservatives will be destroyed#Brexit 
The Spanish Public Television station TVE did not broadcast a documentary about the 2017 October 1st independence referendum, arguing that it could "influence the minds of the judges."  
We always knew that the PM & the vast majority of MPs thought Brexit as a damage limitation exercise. Their heart has never been in it.We need a million plus people marching for Brexit. Let's fill up those roads from Sunderland to London from 16th to 29th March March. 
MPs "don't understand the perspective of many Leave voters - they write them off as racist, stupid, or too old to have a stake in the future"Theresa May's ex-aide Nick Timothy talks to @bbclaurak for BBC2's 'Inside The Brexit Storm'[tap to expand]  
Gang, not even joking. Bitches Against Brexit is happening.Watch this space. 
Brexit Latest: Government pays Eurotunnel £33m in compensation after secretly awarding contract to ferry company with no ferries, no experience and T&C nicked from a pizza delivery company. Strong & Stable Government  
The Tories award a £14 million contract to a sham ferry company with no ferries. Eurotunnel then take them to court for £100 million due to this. The Tories settle for £33 million and are now claiming it’s a great deal. Eh? What?Brexit in a fucking nutshell. 
READY TO POUNCE - Norway with the biggest national wealth fund in the world is getting ready to cheaply buy up failing & less valued British companies & assets after Brexit It’s not a statement of confidence in leaving EU. It’s a fire-sale of the remnants of the fall-out of it. 
#Brexit - it feels like it's been going on foreverBut when the referendum was announced, Prince Harry and Meghan Markle hadn't even met yet 
Britain must – and can – hold its nerve.#Brexit #NoDealBrexit #WTOBrexitNo deal? No problem 
This Labour frontbencher admits a second referendum would undermine trust in democracy.And then says he supports one anyway.Come on mate, this is shameful stuff @BarryGardiner. 
'Leave now & hope something will turns up later' is no basis for running a country. The biggest liability we have is Leavers. They're so scared of not getting their precious Brexit they are prepared to rush it & take any Brexit at any cost. It's awful.  
Wow if only Elton John had said this before the referendum, I'm sure the only reason 17.4m people voted to Leave is because they thought Elton was on board. 
Unfortunately even one or two people in the SNP have slipped into using this propaganda language, but it should still be called out for what it is.  A referendum not sanctioned by Westminster is not the same thing as an "illegal" referendum. 
Labour party officials demanding Kate Hoey to stand down because she voted Brexit.Guess what?17.4 million did too. There was a majority for Brexit.Could Labour be more out of touch? 
After Womad festival reports it is struggling to book artists due to Brexit uncertainty, organisers announce the current headline acts:  
Second EU referendum would undermine trust in democracy, says Barry Gardiner 
Post-Brexit I want the kind of job security that #ChrisGrayling has. 
I find this picture rather disturbing but it shows exactly what the #WithdrawalAgreement is about. #StandUp4Brexit #EU #Brexit  
Excellent to see other fishing organisations getting the time to air their opinions on Brexit. The partisan Pro-Tory group SFF have let Scottish fishermen down  
Question for leave voters:After we leave the EU, what is the first thing you are going to do that you were unable to do while we were members?  @terrychristian @francesbarber13 #brexit #stopbrexit 
Brexit: US drug firms would be able to charge NHS more under Trump trade plan, campaigners claim – Politics live  
Another Brexit shopping done today. Just wondering, can human Dads survive a whole year on tinned chilli and rice pudding? 
I'm a young person. My friends are young people.If Labour 'follow through' with a second referendum. Not only will they never forgive them. They'll never vote for them for the rest of their lives.And I can't blame them.  
.@ByDonkeys, any chance of a cheeky billboard somewhere in the South Wales Valleys? Around a quarter of the Welsh votes cast in the 2016 Referendum were in the Valleys. Show us some love   
This bitch bites when it comes to #Brexit! I’m in! pic.twitter.com/sXid1XB30r 
I chose to make the UK my home. I'm an immigrant AND Conservative. Brexit does not anger me.  What does anger me is how Remainers use EU migrants as an emotional bargaining chip to make Brexiteers feel bad about choosing to reclaim their sovereignty from Brussels. #StandUp4Brexit 
It's in!Local members unhappy with Spelman's attempts to frustrate Brexit have tabled a motion of no confidence against her. It's time MPs listen to their constituents and deliver a true Brexit. All Meriden members should do their duty and attend the AGM. Let's deselect her! 
MAY BOMBSHELL: Ex-aide says PM NEVER believed in Brexit– it's all just 'DAMAGE LIMITATION'  
If there ever is another referendum first thing to do is move all your bank and building society accounts to English banks.You would need to get your cash out quick before the SNP had a chance to expropriate it.  
I'll be travelling from #MiltonKeynes to join the #PeoplesVote march on Saturday 23rd March! My generation are sick and tired of being ignored by politicians; we DEMAND that MPs #PutItToThePeople and let *us* have the #FinalSay on Brexit!@peoplesvote_uk @euromove 
Luxembourg Times - European Union - UK must hold EU polls if Brexit delayed beyond May, says Bundestag  
At a time when people are arguing that the UK's international standing will be hurt if we cancel Brexit, it's important to note "You backed Brexit, so what would you know about maintaining our standing in the world" is actually a thing in Canada.  
BBC News - No-deal Brexit: Leaked letters reveal London food and fuel fears. Has anyone talked about fuel shortages yet? Real threat and small interruptions can lead to big disruption  
A horse called ‘Brexit means Brexit’ has won the 3:35 at Lingfield!  (Not #Lichfield)Hope that’s a good omen!!!! 
Grayling is totally, utterly and completely incompetent. He’s only still in his job because May is so isolated in her Brexit bunker she needs what few friends she can muster. In normal times this tragically incapable minister wd be long gone   
Brexit is due to take place exactly 11 years after Derby were relegated from the PL with 11 points 
The PM must now break free from the enemies of Brexit, demands TIM NEWARK  
It's extraordinary how, across a range of subjects (Brexit, Scotland, Climate Change, political balance...), the BBC seems to have squandered so fine a reputation in so little time. 
Brexit: what it means for passports, and when you might need a visa 
Not true, but even if it had been, that would make the case for overturning the referendum result even stronger, not weaker.  
I've been told this article does not help anyone. But Brexit is failing and we need to ask what kind of leadership will take us back to the EU. It's intended as a step towards winning the fight  
A huge scandal of corruption at the heart of Brexit raised in this tweet & replies, w @fascinatorfun comprehensive threadThis must be top @TheIndGroup priority @Anna_Soubry @heidiallen75 @MikeGapes @ChrisLeslieMP @ChukaUmunna @lucianabergerCorruption is the enemy of democracy 
Spanish government guarantee rights for Brits post-Brexit  
Theresa May's ex-chief of staff reveals she sees Brexit as a 'damage limitation exercise.''This is the problem we face. We are 'led' by a Remain prime minister who simply cannot see and is unwilling to embrace the opportunities Brexit will bring'- Nick Timothy 
Do us a favour, please, and note that the majority here DO NOT WANT TO LEAVE THE EU. The referendum was a scam, May is only PM because she bribed the DUP, and most of us want to #RemainInTheEU. 
We asked for the Brexit backstop. The EU humoured our request. And now we're irked at them because they're insisting they can't muck around with it to make it pointless. A time-limited backstop is as protective as a condom with a slow leak, after all...  
The BBC are on a propaganda process about themselves today.  Controlling the questions and curbing pro Brexit answers while continually reiterating how un-biased and democratic the BBC is. Very clumsy, this only highlights their failure to cover #Brexit  in a fair and open way.  
Look I know things are bad right now - no executive, Brexit and so on but at least Karen is in charge and not Chris Grayling 
And brexit mean brexit......  
#FailingGrayling has: Overseen rail punctuality hit 13 year low  Awarded a Brexit ferry contract to a firm with no ships Lost £33m of tax payers money to legal issues with Eurotunnel Cost taxpayers £171m through the failed part-privatisation of probation services 
'Brexit betrayal' march: Nigel Farage charging Leave protesters £50 to join him on walk to LondonHe’s a self serving money grabbing con man. If you haven’t worked that out yet...  
"The country cannot afford Chris Grayling... he stumbles from catastrophe to disaster"Labour's Andy McDonald says the transport secretary should be sacked for "gross incompetence" leading to Eurotunnel's #Brexit ferry lawsuit 
Nick Timothy, blaming Theresa May for not 'making the most for Brexit', while we stockpile body bags and money flows out of the economy. You have to wonder how such a sharp mind could have blown a 20 point lead in the polls 
£33m on the Brexit ferry case, £500m on failed probation privatisation. How much public money has Chris Grayling wasted exactly?  #FailingGrayling 
According to @theresa_may’s ex-aide, she's always seen #Brexit as a “damage limitation exercise”, struggling to see any economic upside.Why then, are the Govt so determined to take the country down this disastrous path?Totally irresponsible.Stop ignoring the facts.#StopBrexit 
UK pays Eurotunnel 33 million pounds to settle a claim over the secretive process to award ferry contracts to cope with a no-deal Brexit — One of the companies awarded a contract did not have any ships and the deal was subsequently terminated last month. 
Spain's government moves to protect UK citizens' rights in no-deal Brexit  
Here is your Second Referendum Ballot paper.SIMPLY RETWEET TO VOTE NOW!  
When you read this guidance, there can be no denying that Brexit will change lots of things people take for granted.  
The Prime Minister has told Donald Tusk that Brexit might need to be delayed even if she gets her deal through Parliament.Promise broken. 
So @Nigel_Farage is heading a Brexit Betrayal march from Sunderland to London. We've worked out how to cover the city in our billboards on his big day. It's gonna cost £4728. Anyone wanna chip in, make it happen, wipe that smile off his face? >>>  
Ministers who want to stop Brexit don't have to resign. That's all you need to know about this Tory Govt.  
How might Brussels view a delay to Brexit? @anandMenon1 joins @BBCAlicia & @ThimontJack on #TheWeekinParliament tonight at 11pm   
Anti-Brexit events are taking place across the UK over the next fortnight. Find out your nearest here   
It is going to be very hard to predict.Perhaps it will come down to a choice between a bad deal, and rolling the dice on a General Election. Or between a botched Brexit or no Brexit (that leaves you free to complain for evermore)... Tick-tock. Good weekend all. /ENDS 
Great interview with #fishermen and #ShellfishMerchants in #TartbertArgyll today on @BBCScotlandNews re. the effect of #brexit on exporting shellfish. Spoiler Alert - it's not good news! #uncertainty 
I can just about handle Brexit ruining our lives .I can almost stomach Britain's wider political melt down.But Milk Coke is too far.Sick. Sick. Filthy Pigs.  
If you wanted to stop Brexit one of the things you might try is to create a deal thats so atrocious its worse than membership and then tell people its the only option if we want to leave the EUThen engineer it so that parl can block us leaving without a dealSound familiar? 
Michel Barnier has reportedly told EU ambassadors that no progress has been made in Brexit negotiations, commenting that the the UK keeps pushing for changes to the backstop that the EU will never make. 
Brexit Blame Game: Leave Voters Blame Saboteur MPs  
Political Quarterly @po_qu have done a wonderful job in getting out my blogs on why a second referendum is consistent with democratic values.  Here is the first in case you missed it:  
A new bonus episode for our Patreon supporters is out!We speak to @EmmandJDeSouza about her fight with the Home Office and the questions over the rights of Irish citizens in Northern Ireland after Brexit  
The Brexit opportunity maybe "great" for Somerset Capital Management's Dublin based investment funds, but it is catastrophic for Britain.  
But of course Brexit is nothing to do with xenophobia, racism, hate nor is it borne of a narrow minded arrogant misplaced unearned outdated empiric pride, perish the very thought. 
 I had a busy surgery in Cults today. Lots of issues from Brexit to the Loan Charge raised. As always if there’s anything at all that I can do to help please do not hesitate to get in touch with me at any time  ross.thomson.mp@parliament.uk  01224 592229 
NEW: Theresa May Told Donald Tusk That Brexit Might Have To Be Delayed Even If MPs Back Her Deal  via @albertonardelli 
How a no-deal Brexit screws the NI & Irish fishing industries (superb little 8min film).  
I'm in. The majority of women voted remain and it is women who will be hardest hit by the consequences of Brexit. And frankly, the term 'Ladies' should be restricted to a toilet.  
Tax receipts have been booming for years whilst you promoted austerity Jakey, and Brexit, with its Singaporean off the shores of Europe, low tax, small state, deregulated regime, a utopian dream for you but a dystopian nightmare for everyone else, heralds continuity austerity.  
The latest Government #Brexit Update has just released!   Catch up on all the latest Brexit advice, news, and supports here:  You can sign-up to get these updates directly into your inbox here: #GettingIrelandBrexitReady 
READ: Post #Brexit US trade deal would turn the NHS into "a playpen for huge US corporate interests".:  #PeoplesVote 
"Brexit may well prove not just to be a short-term economic shock, but to do long-lasting damage to young people’s career prospects"Milkround stdy finds that more than 3/4 of this yr's uni grads believe Brexit will have a negative impact on their careers. 
The Govt faces court challenges left right & centre over its mishandling of #Brexit, abandoning due process in a frantic bid to crash out the #EU. They wasted £13.8m on a ferry company with no ships & now the Govt must pay £33m to settle the Eurotunnel lawsuit! #FailingGrayling 
PM’s attempt to limit Brexit’s damage must be why she keeps threatening us with economic oblivion if she doesn’t get her own way  
You have to be a big person to admit you've been conned. No shame in admitting 'we were misled with the Leave vote, people were saying we were going to be better off; we're not going to be better off, we're going to be worse off' 'it's a bit naughty'  
Cardiff University calls for two-year Brexit delay - BBC News: Cardiff University calls for two-year…  #Brexit #News 
Brexit bus update."We send the EU £350 million a week, let's fund Chris Grayling's mistakes instead."#Brexit  
"From a supplier’s perspective, there is little doubt amongst retailers, producers and farmers that Brexit will result in a significant disruption to the UK’s food supply, including unharvested produce and empty supermarket shelves." 
If UK leaves the EU, I won't stop fighting Brexit & I don't think I'll be alone. When the suspected corruption, some of it proven, some treachery, is exposed & grasped, and for sure it will be, all hell will break loose: Not a threat, a predicted reaction to staggering corruption 
THIS @ClarkeMicah is spot onA passionate eurosceptic for years who understands that being 'half in/half out' by remaining in the Single Market was the sensible option. Yet people who never used to be bothered or advocated soft Brexit have become hardliners.THREAD  
WATCH: @Janice4Brexit's car attacked while reporting on the migrant crisis in Ouistreham, France. Due to #FakeNews fearmongering, these migrants are increasingly desperate to get to the #UK before #Brexit — See ALL of Janice's reports at  | #tcot 
What has happened is DOT threw away 33m+ on this project that could have been spent ON the NHS. Nobody voted for a no deal Brexit. 
As ever, the real Brexit/US chlorine chicken issues is this:If UK wants to ensure its exports of animal origin can enter EU without them needing to enter via border inspection posts & be subject to checks it will need to remain within EU's SPS (food hygiene) regime. 
#Brexit: Spain to give Britons rights under no deal  
Ambassador @AdrianGONeill writes in the @theirishworld to reassure the Irish community that they will still be able to live, travel, study & work freely in the U.K. after Brexit, under the Common Travel Area.  for more information. 
“You cannot eliminate the harm that a no deal #Brexit will do to Wales” says Wales First Minister Mark Drakeford#bbcwato  
Too many on the Remain side have NEVER accepted the result and have done everything they can to make leaving as difficult as possible. That is the number 1 reason why Brexit has got into the mess it's in.  
“What #Brexit has actually laid bare is the deep dysfunction at the heart of the British state” says Leader of Plaid Cymru Adam Price#bbcwato  
The Government has been right to help the NHS with No Deal Brexit planning. It’s very regrettable that Eurotunnel seems to have tried to block this from happening. 
.@LiamHalligan: "Britain's economy is set to boom and become the largest in Europe - because of Brexit"  
Nigel Farage calls the #Brexit referendum "the biggest democratic excersise [sic] in the history of our nation".Anyone can make a spelling mistake. Serious criminal offences against electoral law take much more effort. Anyway, we fixed the subtitles for him.#GammonballRun 
And we have yet to have a single euro spent on helping us overcome the same no-deal Brexit...THIRTY THREE MILLION POUNDS wasted. We have vulnerable people struggling to stay in their homes, needing specialist legal help as we exit the EU and he has blown £33 million...  
No. Brexit is a national embarrassmentMay is disgracing herself & humiliatimg our countryWe are paying £500 million pounds a week for this crap. Nothing useful is being doneOur alliances are being hurtWe are treating EU citizens appallingly This must stop. 
Spain would grant residency to c. 400,000 British citizens in the event of a hard Brexit, Spanish daily El Pais reports. The plan makes clear that measures agreed by Spain would be conditional on Britain offering similar treatment for Spaniards living and working in UK (Reuters) 
If there is a second referendum and it's a choice between these, how would you vote? 
Brexit: @MichelBarnier has apparently told EU27 ambassadors there is no movement as the British keep trying to undo the backstop. EU appetite for extension diminishing rapidly as no deal edges closer. Games in British Parliament have entirely misjudged the European mood. 
I'm marching because it's clear Brexit is going to be devastating. People will be travelling from far and wide to join the #PutItToThePeople March on 23 March. Be there:  
I never thought they had a ‘STOP BREXIT’ button. I just thought they might help us build one. If they had, perhaps it might have had a chance of coming into existence.  
Hi Jess, I’m one of the ‘ladies’ in this. I admire you a lot, and with the narrative on the Brexit debate heavily dominated by men I felt something like this would be something I can get behind to promote the female voice! Fed up of being put in a box because i’m young and female 
Politics in Japan is often dominated by established figures, but 27-year-old Jinshiro Motoyama masterminded this month's Okinawa referendum on the national government's plan to relocate a longstanding but controversial US air base  
What has the EU ever done for Wales? ....a hell of a lot actually!!  #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
SPAIN: Government guarantees rights for Brits post-Brexit, residency for 400,000 even after No Deal. Thank you @sanchezcastejon @JosepBorrellF this goodwill is appreciated by our country.  
Spain to give 400,000 Britons residency in event of hard Brexit deal: El Pais  
On March 1st 1992, 99.7% who turned out to vote for a referendum on Bosnian Independence voted yes to the question: “Are you in favor of a sovereign and independent Bosnia-Herzegovina, a state of equal citizens and nations of Bosniaks, Serbs, Croats and others who live in it?" 
How a clique of multimillionaires and billionaires with multiple foreign interests have managed to sell themselves as "anti-elite, patriotic champions of the working class" is a veritable miracle of marketing.   via @brexit_sham 
Sums Brexit up, really.#StopBrexit 
Excellent item on BBC Scotland news highlighting how the Scottish shellfish industry, built up over 30 years on exports to France and Spain could be destroyed in two weeks following a No Deal Brexit. 
Labour has long been accused of possessing a big red shiny 'STOP BREXIT!' button. We are about to find out that it doesn't exist, and that it never did.  
You might don't care about yourself #brexit voter, but think about your children, grandchildren, nieces or nephews.. or just the future. #LeaveMeansLeave a much worst world to future generstions. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Nick Timothy the reason people struggle to see the upside of #brexit is because they are dwarfed by the economic downsides. I am grateful to you though for screwing up May’s election campaign. Without you she might have the majority she needs to wreck the country. 
Explosive from former Chief of Staff to PM who admits Theresa May and Ministers “struggle to see any economic upside” to #Brexit and that PM sees it as a “damage limitation exercise” - all the more reason why this must go back to the people for #FinalSay 
Our @StevenEdginton is getting his walking boots ready for the March to Leave. Join us from Sunderland to London here:  to stop the Brexit betrayal.  
WATCH: @peterkyle explains how a #PeoplesVote can break the logjam in Parliament. Join the #PutItToThePeople March on 23 March when we will be demanding a public vote on the #Brexit deal:  
La Poste (French Post Office) just sent me message warning that there is a potential risk of delays to parcels and mail to the UK after Brexit because of customs formalities. Please note UK friends expecting regular food parcels ;) 
Spotted this billboard from @ByDonkeys in the centre of Newcastle. The North East will lose more than any other region from Brexit. We are the biggest exporter to the EU and we get the most regional investment from the EU. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Listening to this  is strangely even more surreal than what's become normalised by Brexit.H.O. Minister says May's policy has always been to exclude as many foreigners from the country as possible.At least we can now stop speculating about her personal motives.#RevokeA50 
Delay'Confirmatory' referendum'Rule out no deal'Don't fall for these excuses from Remain politicians - they will use ANYTHING as a reason not to implement the decision of 17.4 million voters. 
#FF has got to be for @ByDonkeys for giving those of us here in Newcastle this beauty by Central Library:#Brexit  
Brexit story so far: 2016 £millions on the side of a bus 2019 £millions lost down a tunnel Time for #PeoplesVoteNow 
Today I give my support to the Labour Campaign for Free Movement which was set up to unite supporters to defend and extend the free movement of people in the context of the debate around Brexit - how dare the Tories try take it away from us! @labfreemvmt 
We spoke to this businessman in Barnstaple this morning about what Brexit means for him  
Marie on BBC News: She's disappointed and thinks the BBC should show more of the positive aspects of #Brexit. Mmm, like most Leavers, she's asking for the impossible! 
"If we’re not leaving the single market or the customs union, what is it we’re leaving?"Theresa May’s former Joint Chief of Staff, Nick Timothy, discusses the PM's Brexit red lines - and responds to claims that he drew them up "in a room with the Prime Minister alone."  
This tweet explains not just how the 2016 referendum was unfairly stacked against EU membership, but how any version of Brexit will, by definition, be against the wishes of millions of Brexit voters. 
This has registered 6 on The Grayling Scale.Grayling reaches £33m settlement over Brexit ferry fiasco court case  
We've been going less than 24 hours and we've got 46 followers. Our Nemesis account, Brexit Express has 644 followers and a big eff-off billboard at Vauxhall Cross. Can you help by following & sharing?#FBPE #WATON #TIG #BollocksToBrexit 
James Acaster's teabag metaphor is quite possibly the most irreverently brilliant comment ever made on Brexit.  
Confirmed: Spanish Royal Decree guarantees Brits rights, around 400,000 eligible for residency even after No Deal Brexit.Covers healthcare, pensions/social security and driving licenses. What a contrast to shameful @Channel4News scaremongering. 
[WATCH] Nick Timothy: Theresa May Sees Brexit as a "Damage Limitation Exercise"  
"What's happened with @UKLabour this week is an absolute betrayal of democracy" That's what @UKIP's @davidkurten thinks about @jeremycorbyn's party saying they'll demand a second #Brexit referendum.  
The ERG are a ‘drag anchor’ on the Tory Party. “No-deal is not something we can contemplate. We will stop it” Defence Minister @Tobias_Ellwood tells Political Thinking podcast & warns ERG that delay will lead to a softer Brexit & perhaps a customs union  
.@theresa_may is xenophobic racist - pass it on.#Brexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
A no-deal Brexit would have devastating effects & we cannot be confident the Govt will act effectively. Today I met with senior officials from across the capital to discuss how to reduce the impact on Londoners’ lives. Our resource hub can help businesses:  
As it's Brexit advent - here's a cartoon from the archive  
This #StDavidsDay we’re celebrating the iconic species that are at risk of being less protected after Brexit. Join us in asking @wgmin_rural to bring forward the @WelshGovernment proposals to protect nature once we leave the EU by tweeting her today #WeNeedNature #WelshNature 
I take it the SNP are losing a bit of support so are dragging  up the possibility of another referendum just to quell the mutiny, how many times is that now? 
Process of restoring our rights was always going to take years. This is not a ploy to prevent us voting in any further referendum. In fact the government have driven this bill - it was Labour that nearly prevented it progressing last time around@BremainInSpain #Votesforlife 
instead, they hardened. It is utterly remarkable to see many of the people involved in this - particularly Campbell and Blair - blaming the left and Jeremy Corbyn for the anger that fuelled much of the Brexit vote.Utterly shameless. 
New video this month is titled "PragerU's Case for Brexit" or alternatively, "Reality is often disappointing" 
NEW: Chris Grayling left red-faced as Government agrees £33m payout to Eurotunnel over Brexit ferry fiasco 
It’s almost possible to feel slightly sorry for the likes of Hove Labour MP Peter Kyle who refers to Brexit as a ‘nightmare’. Brexit is a brilliant, well supported opportunity for our country to shift up a gear, become more competitive and strike profitable trade deals worldwide. 
Jarrow March where people marched on London to protest poverty and unemployment Farage March where people march on London to make themselves poorer and unemployed for farage and his wealthy friends how mad is that #BREXIT #FARAGE #remainernow #leave #labour #tory #libdems #TIG 
Brexit in a nutshell.  
Nobel-prizewinning geneticist Paul Nurse: "The scientific community, top to bottom, is overwhelmingly against Brexit. Ultimately we do need a second referendum because the first was so strongly informed by misunderstanding & mistruths of a gargantuan type." 
#POLL I keep hearing all this nonsense about 'gender fluid.'So...Which gender fluid do you have? Please vote and RT! #auspol#MAGA #Brexit 
Oh, it turns out we don’t care about Brexit that much after all. Cheers for letting us know @profbriancox - wish you’d mentioned it sooner! (I can’t retweet him because he’s blocked me for having a different opinion from him because, er, that’s what scientists do now apparently) 
A drawing about #Brexit  
Bloody hell, those Murdoch lads really planned things well when they shafted @TurnbullMalcolm   It has turned into a complete basket case just like the Trump thingy and Brexit.  Ole Rupert has lost his marbles and young Lachlan never had any. 
In 1997, when Labour came to power, just 3% of voters put asylum in their three top political concerns. Up to 2000 it was never higher than 10 per cent. Sadly, the rot which made Brexit possible starts under New Labour. 
US wants UK not to deal with #China.At all.#Brexit has made this country what's called a "#distressednegotiator-i.e.hands-up!Used to call the UK the "51st State.  "Get ready for it to happen for real.#DonnieNeedsAWin...28 days to go!pic-@NinaDSchick 
“The big problem is that many ministers, and I would include Theresa in this, struggle to see any economic upside of #Brexit, they see it as a damage limitation exercise” Nick Timothy, Mrs May’s former Chief of Staff  
Just heard that in response to our petition, as there was no Brexit plan by 25 February, Parliament will debate revoking Article 50, on 11 March.Wouldn't it be lovely if MPs truly voted for the good of the country and it was suddenly all over!*relief* 
More #Brexit lies #estherMcvey patronising us 
Great to hear about the new Brexit Tour which will go from Sunderland to London later this month!!! Not sure how many stages it is but it’s sure to be brilliant. 
FYI, "you cant have a referendum", isn't an argument against independence. It's an argument for it.#indyref2 
Theresa May sees #Brexit as "a damage limitation exercise", according to her ex-aide Nick Timothy PM's former chief of staff speaks to @bbclaurak for BBC2 documentary 'Inside the Brexit Storm'[tap to expand]  
Well that’s club cricket thrashed out. Shall we move on to Brexit?  
Spain to pass new law to protect rights of Britons in case of no-deal Brexit.We will be watching the developments very closely & commenting on the soon. @Bremaininspain via @TheLocalSpain 
Sitting beside a Stag party on way to Dublin from Gatwick who had just spent £30 on plug/phone adaptors for their weekend.... that's taking #Brexit to a new level... 
More Brexit waste and chaos. More Tory government incompetence. Less money for battered public services. Time to end this Tory Brexit madness. 
WATCH | Theresa May's ex-chief of staff reveals she sees Brexit as a "damage limitation exercise".This is the problem we face - we are led by a Remain prime minister who simply cannot see and is unwilling to embrace the opportunities Brexit will bring! 
Yeah mate, UKIP infiltrated the Conservative Party, that's why we're getting this half-arsed approach to Brexit and a possible delay to our departure. I'm afraid this line of argument is Soubry-spouted bollocks.  
Dear Mr Tusk @eucopresident,I have been a bargaining chip in the Brexit negotiations since 2016, but thanks to @AlbertoCostaMP, it could finally be the end of it if the EU agreed to ring-fence #citizensrights with the UK in case of no-deal Brexit. Can you please help?  
Sorry. No. Brexit is a national embarrassment that is going from bad to worse. May is disgracing herself and bringing humiliation on our countryObscene amounts of money are being wastedNothing useful is being doneOur alliances are being hurtThis has gone too far 
What parallel universe is this when the man leading Better Together which told Scotland it could not keep the pound, that keeping the pound is in Scotland's best interest.What happens if as seems likely, the value of the pound collapses on Brexit?  
Another reason we should walk away No Deal ......     Brexit news: Germany warns UK will be FORCED to hold EU elections in Brexit delay | UK | News |  
David is a brave MP doing his utmost to overturn Brexit and thwart the tyranny of democracy.But he is *also* a superb comedy critic who understands that making people laugh is secondary to advancing the kind of intersectional politics that reminds us how silly white people are.  
The rehabilitation of people like Michael Heseltine simply because he likes the EU is remarkable. He once wrote:"a very large number of those seeking asylum are cheats, deliberately making bogus claims and false allegations". These people, I would argue, made Brexit happen! 
Nick Timothy, who was for years one of the Prime Minister’s closest advisors, has told the BBC that MPs write off Leave voters as being “racist, stupid or too old” and warned that the Government mishandling of Brexit risks “opening up space for a populist right-wing party.” 
day before the referendum, former prime minister Alex Douglas-Home promised a better devolution deal if people voted NoThere was fat chance of that happeningSound vaguely familiar?  
London has cemented its status as the home of more young billion-dollar tech companies than any other European city, despite #Brexit.  Economy remarkably resilient.  
SAD: Theresa May views Brexit as 'damage limitation exercise', former Chief of Staff reveals. Explains a lot.  
Legal experts have advised the German parliament that any Brexit delay beyond the European elections on 23-26 May could be in breach of EU law and leave the UK open to legal action, according to a confidential report seen by Die Welt..  
‘Tis but more kindling in the bonfire of our money that is Brexit. 
The new Statutory Instrument ending the requirement to fly the  flag in Northern Ireland on Europe Day breaches the spirit of the Good Friday Agreement. ness is part of ness. #brexit @hayward_katy @SorchaEastwood @simoncoveney @columeastwood @MichealMartinTD @BrendanHowlin 
Brexit is working up to its big season finale, isn't it? How very exciting. I keep thinking it might be like one of those American series that launches with a lot of hype, and bravely ends on a cliffhanger – but is then cancelled before we get to find out what happens. 
This is a scandalous, needless, reckless waste of public money caused by the Tories' gross failure in Brexit negotiations and their botched effort to prepare for the disastrous folly of a no deal  - which shouldn't even be on the table. Heads must roll. 
A journalist with @CNN speaks to the young Okinawa who organized the referendum where 70+% of islanders voted against Abe’s expansion of a US Marine base. There were large demonstrations in Tokyo today supporting Okinawa.  
Britain is like a child in the playground, stamping “but I want, I want.” Not getting the ludicrous demand, the hapless child whimpers a little. “Poor me. It’s not fair”.Brexit is mortifying. (And it looked even worse from 6000 miles away. Back in the fray again folks.) 
I am delighted that also analysing the Cox proposals will be  Barnabas Reynolds, Partner, Shearman & Sterling and author of “A Blueprint for Brexit”  
5/5 EU is underpinned by human rights. Citizens’ Rights fall into that category; I will continue to support the WA & vote by 12 March, it would be politically injudicious for the European Council/UK not to agree a separate deal on Citizens’ Rights whatever the Brexit outcome. 
ANGER: Local Tory Chairman resigns over MP Fallon's Brexit stance. “Michael Fallon is his own person and he wants to Remain within the EU...He is not backing the people of Sevenoaks” 
Very little @BBCRadio4 comedy is funny now, it is leftist, anti-Brexit and obsessed with gender and sexuality... pity, because @BBC used to do brilliant comedy, they have a very proud history in this respect - another victim of extreme PC. 
Northern Labour MPs were elected on a manifesto promise to respect the referendum outcome. Do you agree with their request to be allowed to vote with their conscience on a 2nd Referendum?(please retweet to widen the sample size) 
#BrexitCatGIFs Day 1. #Brexit is like waiting for the inevitable disaster to happen....we can see it coming, it's going to be bad, but we are powerless to stop it.  
With 28 days to go until #Brexit, I'm going to mark the occasion with a new series I've creatively called #BrexitCatGIFs. Up to 28 GIFs that represent in feline form the #BrexitShambles.  I'm still hoping not to get to the end of the series though....Pls RT and join in. 
Whoever re-branded the Brexit walk to the #GammonballRun  deserves a pint or five tonight. 
A no-deal Brexit would cause significant harm to London and the UK's economy. City Hall are preparing for every eventuality - today @metpoliceuk, @londonfire, @TfL @NHSEnglandLDN & local authorities came together to discuss how we address the impact on the lives of Londoners. 
LexitNOUNThe pursuit of an egalitarian socialist utopia by means of handing Brexit Island's arse on a silver platter to a small elite of hard-right neofeudal ubercapitalists. 
NEW: Good Friday Agreement architect Lord Trimble and @KateHoeyMP write to the PM urging her not to let her Brexit decisions be "dominated by groundless fears about Northern Ireland"  
How patronising can you get. I support Brexit now for exactly the same reasons I did when I voted for it. James believes what he wants to believe and I do the same. Deal with it. 
Trump administration sets out aims to remove “unwarranted barriers” relating to “sanitary and physiosanitary” standards in the farming industry.Post-Brexit US trade deal deepens fears around UK chicken and beef standards.No one voted for this. 
During a televised press-conference in Minsk today, #Belarus|ian president Alexander #Lukashenka claimed that if a referendum on unification with #Russia were held, 98% Belarusians would have voted against it: 
Did the UK have to ask for the EU's "permission" to hold a referendum on its continued membership? Why, no - it didn't.Just one of the many, many differences between the European and UK "unions". 
A #Brexit deal must allow for continued free movement of artists between Ireland and the UK.Pictured at special Dublin meeting: @HENLEYDARREN @ace_national; @McBrideOrlaith @artscouncil_ie; @Roisinamcd @ArtsCouncilNI; Nick Capaldi, @Arts_Wales_; @Iain_Munro @CreativeScots 
This is wrong. She saw Brexit as an opportunity to kick foreigners out of the country because she just doesn't like them.It only became damage limitation because her and Nick Timothy's crude project fell flat on its arse.  
Parliament need to stop playing games on Brexit.  The deal must be improved, taking no deal off the table only weakens our position and there is no point in extending art. 50.  False choices won’t wash.  If the deal works, I will vote . Otherwise, it will still be a no.  
If the Tories fail to deliver Brexit and seek to delay or obfuscate it instead, they will usher in a Corbyn Government. There are many, like George Eustice, who will resign if they sense betrayal of the referendum result. It's a protest that would be joined by millions of voters. 
Government pays £33m to Eurotunnel over no-deal Brexit ferry contracts! This must surely be it for Chris Grayling  
"The EU has openly said it wants to make life more difficult for us. It has pushed us far enough already. It has made demands that have been accepted by a weak government""If Brexit is finished, then so is democracy"Robert Tombs, Professor of History Cambridge 
Leavers online are STILL equating Brexit panic w/ the Y2k Millennium Bug & the fact that everything was OK. They don't seem to realise that over 300bn was spent preparing computers so that there wouldn't be a problem. Brexit is different. We're days away with nothing in place. 
If the UK does not take part in the European elections while it is still officially a member of the bloc, “British nationals resident in the UK would be denied a core set of rights giving them EU citizenship status,” 
We are a NEW, direct action group. Our aim is to organise and coordinate action against those whose intention is to delay/stop #Brexit Please follow and retweet us in our efforts to galvanise a core of  activists and protestors.  
Says it all. May knows Brexit will damage Britain. 
‘A damage limitation exercise’ - Nick Timothy tells me how the PM really sees Brexit - been talking to him as part of a documentary coming soon - story online in a sec 
Theresa May sees #Brexit as 'damage limitation', says ex-aide Nick Timothy  
It's clear the #Brexit we voted for is being deliberately delayed and  resisted. We must organise ourselves in direct action and protest.  Follow us and mobilise! #BrexitDirectActionGroup 
Britain will be FORCED to hold EU elections in Brexit delay or be SUED - Germany WARNING  
New Government Brexit No Deal TV Ad:“Hello!Is your school closing on Fridays due to underfunding?Well tough shit. We just paid £33m to Eurotunnel because Chris Grayling fucked up again in relation to no deal Brexit planning.Brexit - fucking up your future since 2016” 
Fiona Bruce: “Labour has now come round to the idea of a second referendum. But you said last year, a second referendum undermines the whole principle of democracy. It’s a bit embarrassing, isn’t it? given where you are now.”Barry Gardiner: “The straight answer is, yes,"  
#Wales has been at the mercy of the UK Tory Govts #austerity measures for the last 9 years. #Brexit is only set to make that worse. I will continue to fight for our communities, jobs and public services – and a #finalsay with option to remain. 2/2#StDavidsDay @LabPeoplesVote 
Grrr! You think we are stupid. The only way May is going to get a legally binding time limit on the backstop is to hold No Deal over the EU's heads. If she can get this legal solution the ERG & DUP will back her deal & it will pass in Parliament. Removing No Deal stops Brexit. 
#LBC James crybaby   O’ Brien  doing everyday because he doesn’t like Brexit the CRYBABY.   
Repeat: Brexit is a far right, racist project. Labour should be nowhere near it. Oppose. #PeoplesVote #Remain 
Disgraceful. Is it any wonder we arebecoming the laughing stock of the world? /#Brexit #FinalSay 
Inflow of asylum seekers to UK under the Dublin Regulations in 2018 was nearly six times the outflow (Source: Home Office). Why on earth would the government say, in the recent White Paper (p.18), that it wants to continue to participate in this process after Brexit? 
It's hotting up in Sevenoaks after Michael Fallon's local association chair walks out in disgust over his anti-Brexit stance: He "must now back majority leave voters wishes and support a no deal or step aside himself." Sevenoaks members, get in touch with us at info@leave.eu! 
Brexit is scary, but not as scary as 21 degree sunbathing weather in late February. Is it a coincidence that many people out there deny that either is scary ? 
#ChrisGrayling (i.e. you and me) reach a £33mil settlement with #Eurotunnel over his #Seaborne (the company with no ships)  fiasco.There goes our £39 mil saved by choosing #Brexit 28 days to go-#IcebergSighted !#Brexitanic#BrexitChaos#FridayFeeling 
Unbelievable. @TheLancet #FakeNews scaremongering about a WTO Brexit earlier this week was bad enough, but this misinformation is leading to patient deaths. The journal needs to take action or it’s going to lose all credibility .  
“I have been very directly involved in the No Deal playing and the truth is it's not true to say that we're not ready... People on the Brexit side of this debate frankly don't believe in going around threatening to resign and trying to buffet the Prime Minister“ George Eustice  
33 fucking million quid paid out over a corrupt contract debate to a shipping company with no fucking ships -Government pays Eurotunnel £33m over Brexit ferry case - BBC News  
Former Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab lambasts EU for insisting on the withdrawal agreement negotiated by former Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab. 
The Trump administration says the UK must remove what it calls "unjustified" food and agriculture standards, such as the ban on chlorinated chicken, before it will sign a post-Brexit trade deal with the US.  
POLL: if Brexit was just stopped without a referendum, no democratic vote - just cancelled - would you be outraged? - YES! Please share widely for as many votes as possible! (My view - we voted for it!)#FBPE #Remain #PeoplesVote #LeaveMeansLeave #Brexit #WTOBrexit #NoDeal 
Poll: Will #Brexit break up the UK, Scotland will become independent? Vote and retweet for a big sample @theSNP 
So far just today Chris grayling has been blamed for costing the taxpayer £533 million of wasted money ( £ 500m on  probation and £33m on cross border brexit ferry to eurotunnel) is this a record? Just asking for a friend #failinggrayling 
#Brexit is built on crime, gerrymandering, hate, lies, concealment of information and foreign interference. We need to make it much clearer to politicians that if they push #Brexit through without a #PeoplesVote they will face prosecution. 
This is proof - as strong as you could get really - that the hostile environment policy has increased racism and hasn't even helped control immigration (in the case of this policy anyway). In ordinary political times this would be resignation material but, Brexit 
I'm sure many are as reassured as I am that in the event of a no deal Brexit the person responsible for ensuring that the essential medicines we need will be brought here is Transport Sec Chris Grayling 
Every word of this!I’d add another argument: fear of the “betrayal narrative”.Whatever the outcome - no Brexit, soft Brexit, May’s Deal, no Deal - there’s a betrayal narrative ready.We can’t avoid it. We have to confront it. Otherwise we’ve no business being in politics.  
 via @GuidoFawkesHere is an ex minister who can be proud of himself.A man who hasn’t let the 17.4m who voted for Brexit down.Hopefully George Eustice will become a minister again once the Judas’s are kicked out and once the Appeaser vanishes from sight. 
There's hope that a couple of things could help the younger generations:Booming employment levelsA cooling housing marketBut with Brexit taking its toll, and homes still out of reach for first-time buyers, the government shouldn't be complacent   
The very fact that Dominic Raab and his ilk, cannot even place recognise the Border as a legitimate issue tells you all you need to know about the state of Brexit negotiations and how we got here. If you refuse to recognise Ireland other than an EU pawn, you deserve your fate  
Jeremy Corbyn, by backing a second referendum, has given a life line to pro-EU campaigners.Time for the attacks from them to stop. No more ‘Where’s Jeremy Corbyn’ or ‘I can’t back him on Brexit’.Labour conceded ground and now you should use your energy to help Corbyn win. 
If the product doesn't fit the description you have the chance to return it. We have the chance to think again on Brexit, the #finalsay is our receipt. 
While the 'Brexit Dividend' has been exposed as entirely bogus, there is in fact a 'Common Sense Dividend' to be had - in which we can save an absolute fortune simply by handing Chris Grayling his P45 and telling him to piss off. 
This man was Brexit Secretary during the period the UK -- repeat the UK -- lobbied for the backstop to be a UK-wide customs union. The EU eventually conceded this. Raab now says it was the EU's strategy "in order effectively to try and lock us into a range of their laws".  
Imagine the outrage if Westminster were required ask the permission of Brussels in order to hold a referendum.....  
Chris Grayling's No Deal Brexit preparations lie in tatters and yet more public money has been wasted. His incompetence knows no bounds. Why on earth hasn't Theresa May sacked him?  
Theresa May said that absolutely no public funds were spent as a result of her governments botch #Brexit ferries contract. Bt look, it's actually going to cost us £33M - no news here though  ... She's a liar and #Grayling is completely incompetent, again 
NEWS! Lack of defibrillators on route puts Nigel Farage’s Brexit walk in doubt  #GammonBallRun 
#FailingGrayling is using OUR money again to cover up for his failings.Why is he still in a job?How many #NHS nursing bursaries would this have paid for?BBC News - Government pays Eurotunnel £33m over Brexit ferry case 
The biggest cause of uncertainty is coming from those who wish to delay #Brexit, or even hold a #SecondReferendum We just want to get on with it. Read ABE's article on @BrexitCentral below: 
Can you imagine the outcry in England if in 2015 David Cameron had had to ask the European Union for an Article 50 to hold the Brexit Referendum? Why should Scotland have to ask the British Union for any kind of permission? 
Donald Trump's administration has called on the UK to abandon its "unwarranted" food and agriculture standards before it can sign a free trade deal with the US after Brexit.   
Brexit, Trump and Merkel skewered by carnival art maestro  
This is just outrageous. We were right to object to this shocking attitude to public money. What else are they wasting our cash on at the altar of brexit? Government pays Eurotunnel £33m over Brexit ferry case.  
#Labour moving towards plan to let May's #Brexit deal pass if it faces public vote  
This would be great if true & the case is made formally. May’s WA must surely be in breach of U.K. treason law, the Referendum & Tory manifesto promises too...  
FFS.  Stop this stupid brexit NOW.  It’s costing us millions.  It’s costing the taxpayer absolute millions and I might also add there are 3 million taxpayers who didn’t even get a vote.  This govt is THE worst ever in my lifetime and Brexit is THE worst idea EVER!!!!!!   #FBPE 
Reviewed Tweet Archives to 11/30 /18 Topics of Obama Comey Spygate Immigration Brexit Peaceful end to War 1A & ALL Pro Trump Accomplishments ALL RETWEETS REMOVED Growth frozen for 6 months 58k Followers #WTFJack 
.@wesstreeting – Eurotunnel settlement shows Brexit “descending into colossal waste of time and money”  
Blunder after blunder after blunder. No wonder the UK a laughing-stock. My German colleagues now call GB the Island of Monkeys ie stupid. BBC News - Government pays Eurotunnel £33m over Brexit ferry case  #brexit #ferries #eurotunnel #grayling 
When historians eventually begin to examine the many counterfactual obsessions that gripped the western world in the second decade of the 21st Century — the whole business with Trump and Brexit, climate change denial, anti-vaxxers, flat earthers, and the anti-trans affair ...  
It is competely disgusting that a man who has already admitted his ignorance over the importance of our border arrangements (Dover Calais) is now recklessly disregarding the effect of his Brexit on Northern Ireland and blaming the EU for OUR DECISION! @DominicRaab 
My article in @LabourList on why those (few) #Labour MPs who still have misgivings about a new #referendum on #Brexit should reconsider  
The greatest Brexit negotiator we never had  
This - wasting millions and millions of taxpayers' money trying and failing to deliver the outcome of an secretive and unlawful process - is so on-message for Brexit.  
 LISTEN | @DominicRaab is absolutely right to highlight that any Brexit delay proves to Brussels that intransigence works:"We must face down the EU. It may well be our stronger position to leave now and negotiate from the strength of being an independent third country.”   
No. These anti Scottish stooges should be kept well away from our vote. Imagine the EU said to the English, aye, you can have a Brexit vote but we will control the date, the terms, the franchise.  
Layla Moran was outstanding on Question Time last night. She should be the Liberal Democrat Leader. Here she is highlighting why a no-deal Brexit would be catastrophic.#bbcqt Via @bbcquestiontime 
Incompetence unlimited: UK Government pays Eurotunnel £33m over Brexit ferry case. It could not even sort out one contract. What hope of trade deals? 
Sir Simon Fraser - "Brexit will reduce our influence internationally.. There's a lot of empty talk about Global Britain." #Brexit  
Britain's economy is set to boom and become the largest in Europe - because of Brexit  via @Telegraph 
Grayling’s Transport Dept settles with Eurotunnel after the botched ferry contracts agreeing to pay £33million for measures to improve freight in event of No Deal Brexit 
amazingly the government has just settled £33m out of court for failing to include Eurotunnel in planning for a no-deal Brexit which isn't meant to happen anyway  
Is there no end to Failing Grayling’s expensive disasters? “Government pays Eurotunnel £33m over Brexit ferry case”  
It's important to keep in mind that the UK Government, knowing they're going to lose the next independence referendum, want to put us off even ASKING for a Section 30 order, because they know being forced to publicly say "no" will incense folk. 
Too many are in denial here. This day: #Watson decides who is in the party and who’s out. Which films you can watch, what you can say about Apartheid, who you can “no confidence” what Labour will do on #Brexit. #Corbyn is currently in charge of a membership he will not mobilise. 
*BREAKING*Apple announce new Brexit emoji#emoji#brexit  
Well Failing Grayling strikes againWhat has this imbecile got to do to get sacked?£33m of our money gone to Euro tunnel how many homeless people could that have helpedScandalous BBC News - Government pays Eurotunnel £33m over Brexit ferry case 
Sources familiar with the case say the government was essentially "held over a barrel" by Eurotunnel, and was left with little choice but to settle. Principally, the DfT would have had to prove that it could not have foreseen a no-deal Brexit before Oct/Nov 2018. 
40 people willing to get up at 6am, spend 5 hours down on a bus, 5 hours demonstrating, 5 hours back on the bus, many not home til 1 or 2 the next morning. Took a day off work and paid their own way to hire the bus.  Feel strongly enough to do that cos Brexit is just so stupid. 
Dramatic Brexit-related headline, but a useful sum-up of JET's achievements, its upcoming work and its role as a "dress rehearsal" for #ITER. #fusionenergy @fusionenergy 
I can't stress this enough. Chris Grayling is by far the most incompetent minister I've ever seen given cabinet responsibility in a British govt.Is it any wonder the UKs Brexit plans are in disarray with morons like this running the show?@lbc @mrjamesob 
Not sure it'd even be possible for a referendum tabled by the Scottish Parliament to use anything other than the Scottish Parliament franchise. If the UK Government wants to use its exclusionary franchise for a referendum, they'll have to hold it themselves.  
Imagine the outrage if it was suggested that Juncker did this for the Brexit vote  
New podcast with writer and columnist @DawnHFoster on #Brexit, the toxic discourse and the real crises beyond the Brexit Bubble.Listen:Join:  
#Breaking Eurotunnel has withdrawn its legal claim against the Department for Transport over post-Brexit ferry contracts after reaching an agreement worth up to £33 million, the Government said today  
Brexit is this month LOL 
NHS Brexit Scare Report Written by Diehard Remain Campaigners and Former Eurocrats -  
Isn’t it very telling that the Brexit Betrayal March is from Sunderland to London! Added to London trying to dictate Scotland’s future, it really doesn’t resemble a “UNION” does it.Some in Scotland have always seen this for what it is and many many others are now seeing it 
Jesus. Imagine if in 2016 the EU wanted to set the date, question, terms around the Brexit vote. Imagine the absolute gammon rage.  
BREAKING: Government has settled its Brexit ferry fiasco high court case after agreeing a deal with Eurotunnel which was suing it over its award of a contract to Seaborne Freight, a company with no ships 
With PEI's broken election system, Islanders don't get what they vote for. If they did, the circles in this video would match.  Instead we get "clean-sweep" inflated majorities with almost no opposition MLA's elected to hold government accountable.#peipoli #Referendum #MMP 
Trump tells May to abandon 'unwarranted' food standards for Brexit trade deal  
From LotR: see also, #brexit  
The 10 things the US want us to eat - all banned today:Chlorinated chickenHormone-treated beefRactopamine in porkChicken litter as animal feedAtrazine-treated cropsGM foodBrominated veg oilPotassium bromateAzodicarbonamideFood colourants#Brexit #Poison 
UK government pays £33m to Eurotunnel after accusation of "secretive" process over no-deal Brexit ferry contracts  
Here is Chris Grayling’s take. But his department’s handling of Brexit contingency contracts has cost taxpayers £33m. (For context, all three contracts, inc Seaborne’s amounted to just over £100m)  
Well, now. Friend who was a visceral, emotional and adamant *NO!* in 2014 told me this morning that all that the Indy campaign needs to win is to let the Tory Brexit train wreck  be witnessed a bit longer. If people like him are beginning to shift . . 
Trump tells May to abandon the UK's 'unwarranted' food standards for Brexit trade deal 
From now on anyone advocating of the viability WTO or No Deal, will be muted without warning. I'm not interested in debating with you. You have been brainwashed. You are the climate change deniers or flat Earthers of the Brexit debate. Your views do not merit reasoned discussion. 
Anyone who utters the words "unelected bureaucrats" on a Brexit radio phone-in should be asked to explain how they think the European Council, Commission and Parliament are appointed, but they never are. 
"In the last and final vote they should back a lengthy extension of Article 50 so that the nation can think again before inflicting upon itself the terrible act of self-harm that is Brexit."Britain has a chance to think again on Brexit. 
new @foodresearchuk report on Wales and Food Brexit:  Wales has barely registered in Whitehall or UK news yet its farming will be hammered by EU exit. Paper shows vibrant new food movement innovating and growing in Wales. Is England holding Wales back? Yes 
WOW. The goverment has spent £33 MILLION to settle case with Eurotunnel over procurement of no deal Brexit ferry capacity. 
Those of us who believe in Britain must be prepared to stand up and stop the Brexit betrayal. Join us on our journey:  
George Eustice praised as 'brave and right' by Boris Johnson for quitting Government over Brexit 
The EU’s Customs Union works as a protectionist mechanism to protect large EU companies from overseas competition - and it does so at consumers' expense:  #Brexit 
Interesting question on Sky News: What would Margaret Thatcher have thought of #Brexit? It is generally thought that she was anti-EU. She wasn't! She was however very keen to negotiate the best possible terms for the UK, whilst remaining a member of the EU. For that, I miss her! 
This is a big deal - the acid test of the divide over customs union now or activated backstop or Norway vs Canada for Future Relationship is - will we be able to do a proper trade deal with the US under new arrangements with EU post-Brexit?The point of leaving the CU is   
Former #Brexit Sec Dominic Raab: The dishonourable way EU tried to bully us & shove us around.It's time for us to stand up as a Govt & as a country.They've used NI Backstop to try & lock us into a range of their laws really just to undercut our competitive market.#BBCtoday#EU 
UK Military WILL NOT LEAVE. This vital video clip exposes that UK military will remain locked into EU Defence Union under single (EU) point control even after Brexit  Censored it has had just 48 retweets. Please can you help with retweets & dissemination 
What does #Putin really make of Britain’s #Brexit mess? A quick piece from me for @spectator's Coffee House blog(I confess my original title had been 'Brexit, pursued by a bear')  
This below  is one of the biggest indictments of the May Government. A new EU defence equipment scheme ONLY for countries accepting EU rules.The budget, the scheme, the rules and even British firms’ involvement were all promoted by the May Government AFTER the Brexit vote.  
This woman speaks for Brexit. What a lovely lady.  
BREAKING - With the country's economy continuing to slow sharply, factories cut jobs at the fastest pace in six years and are increasingly downbeat about the future. Official data confirms that manufacturing sector is already in recession. 
To mark 29 days to Brexit I have decided to post a picture of 28 European cakes, one for each EU member state.First up from my beloved Germany, the engine room of European cakery, the famous 'Schwarzwäldertorte' or 'Black Forest Gateaux'.#28CakesLater #Brexit  
The chaos in Westminster over Brexit is evidence of Britain breaking whilst Wales remains an afterthought. #PlaidCymru #NewWales  
We've all long suspected Theresa May has a problem with immigration, but now we know that everyone who's worked with her knows she does. It should have excluded her from running for PM & being in charge of delivering Brexit. Why didn't it?  
 I think it's all noise, she can't really refuse it, if she does she'll guarantee there will be a comprehensive Yes vote in an advisory referendum held by the Scottish Government and then the ongoing legal battles will only turn the tide further against the UK Government.  
The Spanish government will work to make things easier for British residents in Spain, even those without permanent residency status, in the event of a no-deal Brexit. This includes residency papers for around 400,000 UK nationals. 
Wales voted leave in 2016 (52.5%) but in a poll out for #StDavidsDay, now only 20% think #Brexit will be positive for the economy and.only 19% consider it will be positive for life in Wales as a whole.So many people are #remainernow(Report - ) 
After Brexit is sorted out the BBC needs to be sorted out.  
So you agree Brexit making us a global laughing stock? You know that @theresa_may deal will damage places like Burnley? You know no deal will devastate? But you categorically rule out giving people the chance to say if the Brexit on offer is what they want?  
Labour in disarray again. At least someone on the Front Bench is accepting that a second referendum would be betraying the trust people have in politics  
I voted leave, in large part, to stem the influx of #immigrants & preserve our traditional culture, values and ethics. If I must, I will vote leave again.#Brexit...#indyref2 #scotland #ScotlandForScots #snp #nicolasturgeon #theresamay #brexitdeal #nodeal #migrants #refugees 
When it threatens the  very existence...what happens to the  and their valued credit rating, post Brexit sans Scotland  not forgetting the Oil, Water, Whisky, Seafood....oh and where to dock Trident? #DissolveTheUnionNow #McCroneReport #lifewithoutnukes 
Remainers should get ready for what this political chaos may bring. This week's Brexit Blog post:  
There are probably not enough votes from the Tory/DUP alliance alone. She will have to rely on Labour Party rebels to get it through. These people will be enabling a Tory #Brexit and betraying their constituents, their party, the British people and all of our young people. 2 of 2 
There is of course a chance Theresa May will win the vote on her bloody awful deal. This would be a huge mistake and we must not yield to the pressure.  #Brexit is bad news for our country and there is no way of reversing it on the very favourable terms we currently enjoy. 1 of 2 
£700,million that's what Mogg is expected to make out of a no deal Brexit. This is disaster capitalism. His father wrote a book on this subject. If you voted Leave you've been played by Mogg. He doesn't give a toss about trade, jobs, sovereignty. Mogg wants a no deal for the cash 
I'm SO EXCITED to finally be able to share the COVER for #TinCanCook, and so aptly in this Month Of Brexit... (That tin is not photoshopped in, by the way, I'm just a champion tosser). 75 recipes, all from tins, for a fiver. Go on  
yes I genuinely have a Brexit advent calendar. I felt the little chocolate was a bit inappropriate given the subject of the picture, actually 
Conservatives have failed us with Brexit. Labour is useless, so who do we vote for? Farage could be PRIME MINISTER by 2021 with support of 17.4million voters  
Shout out to Cath, a @bbc5live legend, who's taken more calls on Brexit than I've had hot dinners (and could give any pollster a run for their money on where this country's at on it)  
We host a 14yr old Spanish exchange student for a week. She was advised by her parents not to mention Brexit to British people because it could be dangerous. Worst thing: I could not advise her any differently. #BrexitRuinsBritain #WATON 
Climate Change eclipses Brexit in importance and yet most MPs ignore this reality. Does their wealth make them feel secure against the forces of nature? We can't trust this government to protect humanity or the environment @XRShef @SheffieldGreens 
Only 28 sleeps until Brexit. So exciting. Isn't it, though? It is though, isn't it? Isn't it? #28DaysLater 
Brexit is a great big mess. Let’s get back to rationality. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Who would Leave voters blame if Brexit didn't happen? % holding [x] responsible:MPs who wanted no Brexit - 82%EU - 80%MPs who wanted softer Brexit- 80%Corbyn - 75%May - 69%MPs who wanted harder Brexit - 63%MPs who wanted no deal Brexit - 59% pic.twitter.com/GZYyWzhmIS 
They say imitation is the sincerest form of flattery.Jeremy Hosking, Vote Leave's #3 Donor in 2016 (£1,691,296) is funding a series of posters through his vehicle "Brexit Express" (hence Brexit Expires...)  
These trends, of ignoring experts and smashing up systems for your own dimwitted reactionary ends, did not start with Brexit. But they always have the same result. 
What does it say about us that our PM is more embarrassed by dropping a deadline than destroying thousands of lives? Brexit is directly inverting all past conceptions of reality, decency and sense.Me on the new normal of British politics  
“It’s precisely because Britain will thrive after Brexit that we attracted record foreign direct investment last year...British start-ups raised almost £8bn in venture capital during 2018 – some 70% more than their French and German counterparts.”  
Brexit in one tweet. Failed Brexit minister now stands on the sidelines bullshitting to hoodwink people into believing it was someone else’s fault and the media nod respectfully instead of telling him he’s a fucking disgrace. 
You know what really undermines trust in democracy?Admitting a second referendum would undermine trust in democracy but supporting one anywayDo the right thing @BarryGardiner 
Ex-England manager Sam Allardyce savages Theresa May's Brexit failure – 'we look stupid'  
The @IrexitFreedom party is calling for us to leave the European Union. They're meeting in Tralee tonight and believe the time is right to follow the UK out of the EU. This and more with @jerosullivanRK . #Irexit #Brexit  
Please tell me this Remainer stockpiling baked beans, etc, ahead of Brexit is a parody...   
For those who are worried that we'd get more Ukip representation - that's the point of democracy. To debate ideas with people you don't agree with. Without it, with no MPs - Ukip were able to cause this brexit debacle rather than us taking on their arguments over past decade. 
Indeed Liz, worth taking a look at this from our website, takes in Paterson, Singham, Hannan and the Federal Register. 
Not a leading question, not playing the old ‘suggestio’ rhetorical trick - oh no not at all -. How about ‘Would not a referendum on the facts, now that we know more & can guard against criminal interference in the process, be the proper democratic way to resolve Brexit?’  
This by @AnthonyBarnett is spot on - if Remain is to win a future referendum, it has to approach things very differently to last time.Doing so with the same people running the show is not the right approach!I'd start by bringing in Yes Scotland people 
Happy Brexit Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve Eve #March1st 
A CLEAR AND HONEST ANALYSIS.BRITAIN has leverage and a bit of Credibility, in the Firm Deadline. EXIT FIRST, IRON OUT THE REST LATER. Dominic Raab calls on May to RULE OUT Brexit extension and demands NEW team in Brussels  
So basically he’s going to turn up at all of the photo and media opportunities and skip the actual walking bit.What a complete sham. How apt that this collection of utter charlatans have organised a sham ‘march’ that matches their Brexit ideology perfectly. 
This is incredible.  Let's Bin Brexit and put that energy and time into putting our country right, and repair our international reputation by taking a bold lead on climate change.  
With a 2nd referendum looking ever more likely, it couldn't be more important to shout loudly about the amazing work EU nationals do in our NHS the threat of privitisation  the availability of medicinesPlease support our crowdfunder 
The Brexit opportunity is great and need not be delayed. 
Let’s revoke article 50, forget about toxic, dangerous, annoying, tiresome Brexit, go to the pub and resume our peaceful life in Britain.  
Former Environment Minister George Eustice: "If you get to a position where you can no longer stay part of a government then you just resign. That's why more Brexit people have resigned than Remainers."@JuliaHB1 |  
Have our wretched politicians (bar a few heroes & heroines among them) brought us to this? Unforgivable. Completely unforgivable. “Supermarkets on alert for looting in case of no-deal Brexit”  
“Brexit is fundamentally about trust”. I love it!  You just couldn’t make it up. It’s about absolute shamelessness. Telling lies and distorting facts without the slightest compunction. Misleading people and selling out the younger generation.  That’s what Brexit is about. 
if the student loans company are reading, my repayments are also "facing Brexit delay"  
Heard Dominic Raab on the radio today. As Brexit secretary he achieved nothing and on the radio he only talks resentful nonsense about the EU without any understanding how it works. Why people like him or David Davis are still considered as experts on anything is beyond me.  
“In our country, which is a democracy, people’s will - which was directly demonstrated by the referendum - has more weight than anything; this must be respected,” #Okinawa Gov Denny Tamaki says after meeting with PM Abe over Sunday’s vote against US base construction at Henoko 
John Humphreys' interview on @BBCr4today with former Tory minister Dominic Raab was yet more rabid populist nonsense spouted unopposed by a right-wing anti-EU propagandist. Raab had a couple of things to say about Brexit too. 
This is quite brilliant! The first comedian I've seen on #bbcqt who's dealt with the referendum respectfully, with good humour, without derision & with better observation than most panellists.  
It’s now mainstream May took the decision and is proceeding on the basis she understands the referendum was tarnished by corruption she is just ignoringKeep putting that message outYou have all the backing you need in a line of legal casesMay is ploughing on with corruption 
The underhand tactics of those trying to thwart the EU referendum makes me despair. I have worked with African leaders in failing states who have a better moral compass than most of our MPs. If this was Africa someone would have attempted a coup  
Tories would like to pass the blame for Brexit to Labour, remainers, Varadkar, Barnier, anybody in fact, but they can't. Brexit was designed & implemented by the Tory party. They own this mess & will never be forgiven for it. 
With this kind of track record it is astonishing Chris Grayling has not yet been promoted to Brexit Secretary. Perhaps it’s his turn next. Probation: 'Rushed' reforms cost MoJ extra £500m, report says  
I do, and agreed. Since the first referendum in 1975, a lot had changed. The Maastricht treaty was signed, along with other treaties, turning the trading block the UK voted for into a political union we didn't vote for. Hence why we needed the 2nd referendum in 2016.  
Whoever came up with #GammonballRun for Farage's ridiculous #Brexit march needs a statute or something. That's very high quality hashtagage. 
In the words of ⁦@ShankerASingham, “they’re coming in now!”- US takes tough line with UK on post-Brexit trade talks.  
spent an hour on FB truly amazed that utter buffoons who have previously tipped a bucket of ice over themselves for make believe charities & posted selfies of cock in a sock are now self proclaimed Brexit experts Stick to taking photos of shite Sunday dinners you fucking whoppers 
#marchofthegammons Well, walking bits of it and missing other sections - about as accurate as everything he's  ever said about Brexit.  
Junior minister George Eustice resigns over Theresa May’s ‘undignified Brexit retreats’ amidst threat of ‘final humiliation’ by Brussels: Brexit News for Friday 01 March 
Thank God for @joannaccherry, I am not going mad. I just heard Dominic Raab spout the biggest heap of dangerous, maniacal #Brexit crap about the #backstop, #EU and #Ireland on @BBCr4today where Humphrys gave him a free run. Dear God, we are screwed. 
Britain's economy is set to boom and become the largest in Europe - because of Brexit  
Former Brexit Secretary and hardline Brexiteer Dominic Raab was on #r4today peddling myths and lies with very little or no challenge.By not calling out myths and lies the BBC therefore becomes complicit in spreading them.Awful journalism. 
And the big story today is that Westminster still wants to deny Scotland its democracy by blocking a referendum. Who would want to stay in a ‘union’ that attempts to do this?  
Don’t know whose thicker. Tory puppet, hardline Brexiteer and #r4today presenter John Humphry’s or former Tory Brexit  Dominic Raab. 
Dominic Raab’s disgraceful comments & ill informed comments  on #backstop on @BBCr4today are indicative of a mindset that cannot understand why #EU won’t throw #Ireland under the bus because that’s what his ilk have done for 800 years #Brexit  
Shameless bile and lies from @DominicRaab right now on #r4today. This corrupt little shit is blaming the EU for the ERG's red lines on #Brexit... pic.twitter.com/A0F908gdVJ 
I hope every farmer who voted for Brexit has now realised the error of her/his ways now the USA has published its demands for a post Brexit deal: lower sanitary standards & lower/no tariffs. This is the death of British farming & a catastrophe for the health of the meat counter. 
So the US wolf, having separated the runty UK lamb from the EU herd, has already pounced. And Brexit not even happened yet. What it wants? Lower sanitary standards & the reduction or elimination of tariffs.  What a surprise. This will be a mass slaughter of British farming. 
Why misgivings about a new referendum are unfounded - @RCorbettMEP responds to four arguments against another public vote: 
An attempt to delay Brexit would put us at the EU's mercy, as the conditions the EU places upon an extension could mean in practice that Brexit is thwarted altogether.  
“The Establishment are trying to give us a choice between the worst deal in history or remain”. Watch the man in the checked shirt on #bbcqt attack the attempt by Remainers to rig a second referendum.  
Remember @C4Ciaran’s Brexit hatchet job from Spain? He ignored fact PM had said Brits would be protected ‘whatever the scenario‘.Today, Spain will announce Royal Decree giving access to healthcare and social security. Reality vs Remainer spin. 
When we stop Brexit, like it or not, we’re going to have to support the Gammon-centric towns that led the leave vote, and ensure that those people see a benefit to being in the EU. Else we end up back here again. 
“From a supplier’s perspective, there is little doubt amongst retailers, producers and farmers that Brexit will result in...unharvested produce and empty supermarket shelves.” - recent study reveals, by Ray Gaul and Fraser McKevitt for @Kantar 
As expected, in any trade deal with the USA, the USA have just made it clear they will want to sell us chicken washed in chlorine.No need to worry, @LiamFox enjoys eating it when he goes to there.The benefits of #Brexit are finger-licking good! 
As concerns over a #NoDealBrexit dominate the news, it is important to remember that the PM's deal is also a hard Brexit which does not give us frictionless trade or any binding agreement for the future, as @CharlesTannock MEP says here. 
Nations are built on choice not chance.The choice ahead for Britain is Brexit. The choice is courage. And courage is contagious.Let's have the courage to deliver what the British people had the courage to vote for.Brexit means Brexit.  
This is the only credible way forward. If the Prime Minister wants Britain to leave the EU on her terms, she must put it to the people. The public can then either ratify her Brexit or reject it and remain in the EU. 
The worst thing the BBC could think about Brexit is: we're getting it from both sides, we must be getting something right. Everyone gets it from all sides now. It doesn't mean anything. 
“The elite” - says ex public schoolboy and city banker Farage, a man who regularly travels by private plane. He *is* the elite! He doesn’t care about Sunderland, or the people who live there. Whatever your views on Brexit, if you fall for this charlatan’s patter, you’re a mug.  
The U.K. is due to end our membership of the European Union *this month*. Almost 3 years since the referendum there is no deal, no clarity & no plan for the future. Whatever people think about another public vote it is important we remember what a colossal *Tory* failure this is. 
If Remainers succeed in keeping us tied to Brussels, Brexiteer MPs should resign the Conservative whip. The government would collapse. There would be a GE, they could all run as Brexit candidates and we could get a Brexit supporting parliament. We know who the saboteurs are now. 
Britain's economy is set to boom and become the largest in Europe - because of Brexit' | via @telegraph 
Business is not ready. Government is not ready. A no-deal Brexit will be a wrecking ball on the UK economy.  @cbicarolyn on @BBCr4today 
This says a lot about @theresa_may and how, as @Anna_Soubry said last week, her built in issue with immigration, is leading her approach to a damaging #brexit.Absolutely ashamed that she is our PM with views like this.Many leave voters who are #remainernow are the same. 
Dominic Grieve: ‘People were misled on Brexit by propaganda and mad fantasies’ | Latest Brexit news and top stories - The New EuropeanPeople were misled to vote against themselves. Now we must make clear how they can save their future.   
We are strong, outward-looking and resourceful, which is why we will make a success of Brexit. But we are powerless, left behind and incapable of effecting change, which is why we had to vote for Brexit. 
Coming up after 8 @BBCRadioFoyle - a Donegal woman’s experience of cross border cancer care and why she feels co-operation in healthcare across the border is vital after #brexit. Thanks to @siobhanpatten for sharing her story with me 
On @BBCr4today just now: The pound is worth 12% less than just before the referendum. Yes 12%! Bring nappies, water, food if you’re travelling eg to Spain if we exit without a deal. Why, why, why are we doing this?#StopBrexit 
the main antagonist of portal 2 being a funny english person who makes terrible decisions that endanger them and everybody around them has aged horribly after brexit 
For remain to win a second referendum, the old guard must step aside 
Plans for Nigel Farage’s ‘March for Brexit’ have been leaked: 1. Walk with lots of yellow vesters for 100 yards (not meters) whilst the tv cameras are rolling.2. Nip around the corner and jump into a car3. Have a fag.4. Drive 30 miles (not 50k)5. Repeat daily 
"If we do end up with a second referendum, I still believe that that does undermine trust in democracy in this country.”Yet he supports Labour’s position.The views from London coffee houses trump the views of Labour’s leave-voting base up North now.  
Define "real job"? As far as i'm aware I've been working most hours of every day since the #Brexit vote trying to divert this car-crash...  
For what it's worth, as a constituent of Streatham, I'd just like to put on record that Brexit was not the reason I voted for @ChukaUmunna in 2016. And I would like the chance to vote again as he no longer represents the Labour party manifesto I did vote for. 
Some of the U.K.’s most vital public services aren’t prepared for worst-case scenarios in a messy Brexit, according to Sadiq Khan  
“Delay..is a crucial step in the slow motion betrayal that has been underway since June 2016”Watch as Lionel Shriver on #bbcqt brilliantly sums up the way voters are being betrayed by Parliament’s deliberate sabotaging of Brexit.  
UK supermarkets lowering standards and dropping products ahead of Brexit, study finds - The Independent  
This is a great #Brexit letter. If hundreds of thousands of ordinary voters send it, it will make a difference.#GoWTO 
Let me peer out from paternity leave and point you to a documentary I have on @bbcradio4 at 11am this morning. And it’s not about Brexit. Produced by the brilliant @MarkWRickards and researched by Zoe Morrison 
The Referendum result was more democratic than the first past the post electoral system. However, If the Ref result is translated into FPTP results then approx two thirds of constituencies voted Leave. Any party would like to win 2/3 of seats in an election. 
WATCH: German Comedian Nails it on Brexit on #bbcqt 
The British politicians who assured everyone in the UK that Trump would swoop in and sign a quick and generous trade deal with Britain post-Brexit were lying—and that was obvious to anyone with even a minimal understanding of Trumpian politics/trade policy  
Sorry to disappoint but this is not about the PM, it is about the people. The ONLY thing that will change my mind is a change to the backstop. We have to deliver Brexit as promised or politics is finished in this country and I refuse to be part of that.  
Britain has a chance to think again on Brexit  via @financialtimes 
Four weeks till a possible hard Brexit. If it happens, people will die.Here's the evidence. We're all fed up, but we need to keep up the pressure in whatever way we can.  
Michael Heseltine on why Brexit is based on delusion and is a complete betrayal of our younger generations. 
Tory MEP WARNS Brexit will 'end in TEARS' as May continues 'to kick can down the road'  
Nigel Farage is organising a 'Brexit Betrayal' march - presumably to explain & apologise to the nation that his lies (and LeaveEU electoral fraud) betrayed the whole electorate. No? - well he damn well should! #BrexitCrisis 
When it comes to Brexit the London-centric Labour Party listens more to the big business lobby and Blairites than it does to Leave-voting working class communities outside of London that they're abandoning.  
I met a chap last night who has worked in Telecomms over the last 30 years project managing mast installations all over Europe.Since the EU Ref his work has dried up as no one knows what’s happening with UK workers / Brexit / FoM so they are employing EU workers instead.   
Most #migration to #Britain is from outside the EU - regulated by British, not EU, rules - and that is becoming even more the case now as Brexit looms. The change in balance comes at a cost @InFactsOrg 
In the last year, the 1st, 2nd & 5th most popular tweets by @jeremycorbyn weren't about austerity or Brexit but attacking Israel.@UKLabour is more obsessed with attacking the world's only Jewish State than domestic policy or socialism.They're obsessed with JewsH/t: @mishtal 
Is the BBC biased in favour of Remain?Listener Marie gives her verdict on #Brexit news coverage.#BrexitYourStories | #5livebreakfast 
Some rash Brexit predictions:1. The ERG will mostly fold & support the PM’s Deal2. The Deal will pass, supported by ~30 Labour MPs3. Geoffrey Cox will be hailed as a hero for “the Cox codicil”4. Theresa May will want a snap election5. The ERG will try to replace Theresa May 
To cheer you up:1. Brexit negotiations, of one sort or another, will go on for at least another 5 years.2. Theresa May is likely to be your PM till 2022.3. Trump may very well win a second term.4. Eventually we all die 
WATCH: We take a look back at why this week was good for a People's Vote. Both Labour's move to back a public vote after their #Brexit deal was voted down, and May's promise of a vote to delay Brexit if her deal is rejected, bring us closer to a #PeoplesVote. 
‘When they’ve spoken out against Brexit, they’ve received really nasty feedback. It’s much easier for businesses to keep their heads down and just try and get on with it. Many are preparing to leave.’ James Ramsbottom, Chief Exec, CoC, NE. No news is NOT good news.#r4today 
This video sums up Brexit in many ways. Will sound bites, weak jabs, and a bit of sneering undermine the British values of integrity, steadiness, fairmindeness and quiet authority?  
Exclusive: Internal report by German Parliament warns that #Brexit extension beyond May EU election breaks EU law. Legal action against U.K. only one possible consequence @welt 
Our listener Marie says the BBC is biased on #Brexit in favour of remain. Agree? #BrexitTakeover #BrexitYourStories @bbc5live 
And, in terms of paid advertising on Facebook there are 430 running political ads under the Brexit search term, with 95 of those belonging to Britain’s Future, a sample of which looks like this:  
Assume you lied when you signed the Edinburgh Agreement to respect the 2014 result and you lied when you said that vote would be ‘once in a lifetime’? The UK is leaving the EU (although you’d have taken Scotland out earlier). If Brexit is bad then Scexit from UK massively worse.  
Talking to ⁦@kprescott⁩ ⁦@BBCr4today⁩ with less than a month to go and Government forecasts still showing that ⁦@NEEChamber⁩ members will be hardest hit by #Brexit  - real sense of anger amongst business leaders.  
I would like to have seen some joined up thinking from MPs on #brexit, it's funny what politicians focus on. #nffc 
I've asked an awkward question, who should lead the pro-EU side if there is a referendum 
Falling EU immigration to Britain exposes the Brexit divide. And businesses struggling to fill vacancies are alarmed  
Other countries concern and discuss about science, how to cure cancer, a new earth-like planet that could sustain life, data mining, Brexit (it’s March btw) etc etc.. Meanwhile in Indonesia :  
Brexit - the most damage any peacetime government has done to the UK. All in the Conservative Party interest. It is March, Brexit happens this month & it is still undefined, unplanned, uncertain...Industries leaving, businesses collapsing #GroundhogDay #BrexitShambles 
It’s Brexit month! You can all use the term ‘eleventh hour’ without exaggeration. 
BREXIT ASAP  
Brexit isn’t about furthering personal ambitions. Brexit is about the future of the entire UK and its territories; every aspect of our lives will be affected by it. Turning the unprecedented constitutional change into a game of who becomes PM is dangerous and deeply irresponsible  
Britain's economy is set to boom and become the largest in Europe - because of Brexit  via @Telegraph 
May can refuse all she wants, Scotland can still hold a referendum, 
It's March and it's the month the UK will leave the EUWe want to know how you are feeling about #Brexit this morning#BrexitYourStories | #5livebreakfast 
WATCH: German Comedian Nails it on Brexit 
PEI begins its #ProRep #MMP education campaign! @ReferendumPEI is distributing referendum voter guides and doing information sessions across PEI. #peipoli #ElectoralReform 
Hi @ByDonkeys, loving your work.You may already be in to this, but is there any billboard space on the #GammonballRun route??Would be a shame not to point out the real Brexit betrayal #leavemeanslies 
‘Theresa May, true to what Heath calls her “distaste for commerce, capitalism and conservative values”, continues to chase the votes of TIG style Remoaner centrists, kills Brexit – and reaps a whirlwind’.  
"We will literally be over the barrel of a gun"  Tory MP George Eustice on why he's quit government over vote on delaying #Brexit, saying it will be "highly dangerous" to go begging to the EU  
Britain's economy is set to boom and become the largest in Europe - because of Brexit.  
You cannot block a referendum. Wrong question asked. If Scot has a ref will WM refuse to accept result? THAT is the question.  Union of supposed equals means can leave anytime with a majority of MPS. Which SNP have. Even Thatcher agreed. 
The leaders of #Bougainville and #PNG have agreed to hold the referendum from the 12th to the 17th of October this year. PNG PM Peter O’Neill said K30m has been committed to staging the vote.  
Thank you also to people also travelled from further afield to spend time at #Sodem and make a stand against Brexit. France! @percyfrance1 Germany! @GrahamMead1 Spain! @jimbobalobg @ElspethElspeth @BremainInSpain#StopBrexit #PiesNotLies 
Guys we don’t HAVE to act like eery single game is a referendum. For example, the fact that Houston neeeded 58 from Harden to beat a sub-.500 Miami team on a SEGABABA at home doesn’t mean the Rockets suck.  
REMAIN voter and activist Nimco Ali passionately defended her support for a no deal Brexit, claiming the behaviour of the European  Union during the negotiations sparked a change of heart in many young  Remainers.  
Former Apprentice winner @MichelleDewbs explained how insulted she felt as she reflected on the controversial comments from Labour MP @OwenSmith_MP that Brexit was a “racist and xenophobic project”.  
Britain will have to give up its last African colony thanks to the UN—and Brexit  
It's the #GammonballRun 
The ideas that Jeremy Corbyn represents, far more than the man himself, have energized a new generation of voters and widened the realm of political possibility. #Labour #Brexit  
CPAC highlight #BREXIT #TrumpHotel 
Brexit riddle goes on: May's deal, delayed no-deal or referendum?  
The days when England got to decide are over. I expect a Unification referendum in NI as well. No one is stopping England getting the Brexit they deserve but they are no ones colonial masters. Not any more 
For folks interested in migration, borders, crisis, Brexit, &/or media discourse: now out online ahead of print with @BritJPIR 'Closed due to ‘flooding’? UK media representations of refugees and migrants in 2015–2016 – creating a crisis of borders'  
The country’s top ten investors have all increased their investments in the U.K. since the referendum on average by a third. More good Brexit news. 
Politics in Japan is often dominated by established figures, but 27-year-old Jinshiro Motoyama masterminded this month's Okinawa referendum on the national government's plan to relocate a longstanding but controversial US air base  
El Sr. Juan Ignacio "Desconozco" Zoido: Can a former interior minister really not remember anything, nor even why and how Spanish police officers were deployed in Catalonia before the 1 October 2017 referendum?  
#Brexit beyond parody  
‘The establishment are trying to put together a choice between the worst deal in history and #Remain’ This audience member voices his concerns over #Brexit!   @ConHome @TheConWom @Conservatives @CCHQPress @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns @BrexitStewart @SteveBakerHW 
Not only did most people miss this, but this latest attempt by Brussels to seize member states’ powers has never been proposed to EU citizens.There was no democratic vote on it. It won’t appear in any election manifesto. No referendum, obviously.The EU is not a democracy.  
Mark is threatening Scotland with no Trade with England post BrexitCurrently England has a Trade deal with the Faroe Islands & SwitzerlandEvery other Country is laughing at themAnd Mark is unwittingly lying to youScotland trades more with the EU than it does with England  
BBC top trolling: Within an hour Peter Bone and Theresa Villiers beamed into living rooms on the morning news - followed by 'Republican's Overseas' chair Sarah Smith. She is, of course, the wife of Matthew Elliott. If that wasn't enough we then suffer Darren Grimes on Radio4. 
People who’ve asked me to get them @UHCougarMBK tickets for Saturday: - Alum who trashed my stadium referendum in 2011 - tea sips - aggies- a “you’re always gonna be Cougar High” guy - my Starbucks barista - anyone who’s not caller 10 on 97.9What a time to be a Coog!   
Let’s get this straight. @Nigel_Farage and his cronies are charging £50 so people can join a march that is over 277 miles long, but that won’t actually be 277 miles, and will end in Parliament on the 29th? Who came up with that, it’s almost as bonkers as #Brexit. 
#OTD 40 years ago: 1 March 1979: Scotland's first devolution referendum. Scotland voted 52:48 for devolution but blocked by threshold requiring 40% of electors vote for change. If we had such a requirement for #Brexit UK would not be in this mess: 37% of electorate voting Leave.  
How can a squirrel be “illegal?” How can an animal that’s been part of the environment for over 150 years be an “alien?”: Rescue groups banned from releasing 'illegal alien' grey squirrels back into wild after Brexit  #CompassionIsNotACrime 
This cannot be real? If it is, let's have another referendum tomorrow. Leave would win easily.  
Latest Brexit twist: certain ERG types are rumoured to be willing to back Theresa May's deal in return for her quitting immediately. But that ramps up the Labour danger, because any promise she makes them won't survive a change of leader. Labour need to hold their nerve. 
Nigel Farage has announced he will lead a march from Sunderland to London alongside Leave campaigners protesting against the "betrayal of Brexit"..  
The Conservatives must have known that Theresa May has personality problems. Her hatred towards immigrants is beyond a sociopathic level. This mess on brexit is entirely her fault and she has already run this country back at least three decades before brexit. 
Jon Benton, who headed up the National Crime Agency’s international corruption unit, said a more senior official linked to the Foreign Office told him to drop his inquiry. 
Tragic. EU migration down. The neighbours, colleagues, friends, family that could have been. And, as a result, non-EU migration is up. We have a an aging population and need more workers.Brexit is a tragic, dangerous waste of time. #StopBrexit. 
40th anniversary today, 1 March, of the 1979 Devolution Referendum. Although YES won by 51.6% to NO 48.4%, it was to be another 20 years before we had a Scottish Parliament. 
I was blocked for sending unethical lying journalist & Brexit supporter Andrew Neil this very polite tweet after watching him on many occasions allowing fellow Brexit supporters talk of a Brexit dividend without ever challenging them & himself implying there will be one. #BBCTW 
If you don't see that we have to fight tooth and nail to stop the greedy vultures pushing us off the hard Brexit cliff, then you either have the mind of a lemming or you are a vulture hungry to devour flesh.#bbcqt 
Giving Voice to the Silenced #Qanon #FreeSpeech #FreeTommy #FreeLoomer #Censorship #MAGA #KAG #DTS #DeepState #BREXIT  
This is pure self-serving delusion by @ChukaUmunna. The big issue in Streatham at the last election was austerity, not Brexit, and his increased vote was down to Corbyn's popularity, not his own.Stand down & give us a by-election! #PeoplesVote4Streatham #ThisWeek 
Here’s mine: We Brexit because we don’t want an EU army or closer political union or Turkey joining. But if we remained we could veto all these things. #thebrexitparadox 
If JC is forced to support a PV, he is apparently insisting that it is Remain v a ‘credible’ Leave deal. That tells me that he is still a Leaver. It should be Remain v Crashing Out if he really wants to kill Brexit. 
I applied to be on. Heard nothing back. One of the questions was how did you vote in the referendum.  Lewisham was 70% remain. That audience didn't reflect that, so why ask. 
#LeaveLies B. Johnson.#PeoplesVote#Brexit  
Why are The Independent Group not putting a candidate up in the Newport West by-election to prove “Brexit regret”, since the vote there was ~54% Leave? 
Brexit: UK withdraws from Eurovision Song Contest after The Dave Clammy band refuse to sing White Christmas  
Liz Kendall nailing it, political party’s still haven’t looked at the reasons why people voted for #Brexit instead many remainers have simply dismissed 17million of our countrymen as xenophobic morons @bbcthisweek #bbctw 
"Anna Soubry has this illusion the Conservative Party is being driven by the Brexiteers, whereas all the evidence is rather the contrary" says Michael Portillo who reckons "Brexit is now a receding possibility" #bbctw 
US takes tough line with UK on post-Brexit trade talks  
What is the difference between a referendum and a peoples' vote, apart from the fact that the last one will be rigged to get the answer remain wants. 
Nonsense. No mandate. Your manifesto promised an orderly brexit with with a deal. You campaigned saying we’d stay in the single market. You are a scoundrel.  
The most accurate cartoon about #Brexit & Brexit leaders  
Brexit baby  
I do really wonder, if there is a second referendum and leave wins again, what would be the remainers' excuse for holding a 3rd one, or simply attempting to use Parliamentary sovereignty to override it? 
UK buys a £100 billion a year more from the #EU than they buy from us.If a no deal Brexit would be as catasrophic for the UK as #Remain MPs & MSM claim, it must surely follow that a no deal brexit would be even more catastrophic for #EU.HOC voting against no deal is illogical 
But Wow @LaylaMoran was so powerful, stood her ground even with the Brexit hostile audience. She is really outstanding!  She has the intellect too.  I liked her from the start & she sure hasn't disappointed me, far from it. My administration for her grows each time I see her! 
NEWIndependent Group has assigned jobs to its MPsKey roles:Umunna - group spokesman (de facto leader?)Shuker - convenor (chief whip?)Wollaston - recruitment of new MPsSoubry - Brexit(!)Leslie - TreasuryAllen - welfare (obv)Berger - home affairsGapes - foreign affairs 
The ERG are effective propagandists. Every time they shift the goalposts their grassroots supporters will buy into the narrative. Since the ERG want no deal they will pick fault with any deal, and their ovine adherents will oblige. #Brexit 
Brexit is 695 hours away. #brexit 
Can Jeremy Corbyn Save Britain From Brexit?        
brexit boom fire and ice 
